





MONSTER BLOOD III 

Goosebumps - 29 
R.L. Stine 

1 


“The Monster Blood! It’s growing again!” Evan Ross stared at the quivering 
green blob in his driveway. It looked like an enormous wad of sticky green 
bubble gum, and was bigger than a beach ball. Bigger than two beach balls! 

The green blob trembled and shook as if it were breathing hard. It made 
disgusting sucking sounds. Then it started to bounce. 

Evan took a step back. How did the sticky goo get out of its can? he 
wondered. Who left it in the driveway? Who opened the can? 

Evan knew that once Monster Blood starts to grow, it can’t be stopped. It 
will grow and grow, and suck up everything in its path. 

Evan knew this from painful experience. 

He had seen a giant glob of Monster Blood swallow kids whole. And he 
had seen what had happened when his dog, Trigger, had eaten Monster Blood. 
The cocker spaniel had grown and grown and grown—until he was big enough 
to pick up Evan in his teeth and bury him in the backyard! 

A small chunk of Monster Blood had turned Cuddles, the tiny hamster in 
Evan’s class, into a raging, growling monster. The giant hamster—bigger than a 
gorilla—had roared through the school, destroying everything in its path! 

This gunk is dangerous, Evan thought. It may be the most dangerous green 
slimy stuff on Earth! 

So how did it get in Evan’s driveway? 

And what was he going to do about it? 

The Monster Blood bounced and hiccupped. It made more disgusting 
sucking sounds. 

As it bounced, it picked up sticks and gravel from the driveway. They stuck 
to its side for a moment, before being sucked into the center of the giant wet ball. 

Evan took another step back as the ball slowly started to roll. “Oh, noooo.” 
Alow moan escaped his throat. “Please. Noooo.” 

The Monster Blood rolled over the driveway toward Evan, picking up speed 
as it moved. Evan had tossed one of his Rollerblades by the side of the house. 
The green goo swallowed up the skate with a loud thwoccccck. 

Evan gulped as he saw the skate disappear into the bouncing green ball. “I 
—I’m next!” he stammered out loud. 



No way! he told himself. I’m getting out of here. 

He turned to run—and went sprawling over the other skate. 

“Ow!” he cried out as he fell hard on his elbows and knees. Pain shot up his 
arms. He had landed on both funny bones. 

Shaking away the tingling, he scrambled to his knees. He turned in time to 
see the seething goo roll over him. 

He opened his mouth to scream. But the scream was trapped inside him as 
the heavy green gunk splatted over his face. 

He thrashed both arms wildly. Kicked his feet. 

But the sticky goo wrapped around him. Pulling him. Pulling him in. 

I—I can’t breathe! he realized. 

And, then, everything turned green. 



2 


“Evan—stop daydreaming and eat your Jell-O,” Mrs. Ross scolded. 

Evan shook his head hard. The daydream had seemed so real. His mother’s 
voice still sounded far away. 

“Evan—hurry. Eat the Jell-O. You’ll be late.” 

“Uh... Mom...” Evan said softly. “Could you do me a really big favor?” 

“What favor?” his mother asked him patiently, pushing back her straight 
blond hair into a ponytail. 

“Could we never have green Jell-0 again? Could you just buy other colors? 
Not green?” 

He stared at the shimmering, quivering green mound of Jell-0 in the glass 
bowl in front of him on the kitchen counter. 

“Evan, you’re weird,” Mrs. Ross replied, rolling her eyes. “Hurry up. 
Kermit is probably wondering where you are.” 

“Kermit is probably busy blowing up his house,” 

Evan replied glumly. He pulled the spoon out of the Jell-O. It made a gross 
sucking sound. 

“All the more reason for you to hurry over there,” his mother said sharply. 
“You are responsible for him, Evan. You are in charge of your cousin until his 
mom gets home from work.” 

Evan shoved the green Jell-0 away. “I can’t eat this,” he murmured. “It 
makes me think of Monster Blood.” 

Mrs. Ross made a disgusted face. “Don’t mention that slimy stuff.” 

Evan climbed down from the stool. Mrs. Ross pushed a hand gently through 
his curly, carrot-colored hair. “It’s nice of you to help out,” she said softly. “Aunt 
Dee can’t really afford a babysitter.” 

“Kermit doesn’t need a baby-sitter. He needs a keeper!” Evan grumbled. 
“Or maybe a trainer. A guy with a whip and a chair. Like in the circus.” 

“Kermit looks up to you,” Mrs. Ross insisted. 

“Only because he’s two feet tall!” Evan exclaimed. “I can’t believe he’s my 
cousin. He’s such a nerd.” 

“Kermit isn’t a nerd. Kermit is a genius!” Mrs. Ross declared. “He’s only 
eight, and already he’s a scientific genius.” 



“Some genius,” Evan grumbled. “Mom, yesterday he melted my sneakers.” 

Mrs. Ross’ pale blue eyes grew wide. “He what?” 

“He made one of his concoctions. It was a bright yellow liquid. He said it 
would toughen up the sneakers so they would never wear out.” 

“And you let him pour the stuff on your sneakers?” Evan’s mother 
demanded. 

“I didn’t have a choice,” Evan replied unhappily. “I have to do everything 
Kermit wants. If I don’t, he tells Aunt Dee I was mean to him.” 

Mrs. Ross shook her head. “I wondered why you came home barefoot 
yesterday.” 

“My sneakers are still stuck to Kermit’s basement floor,” Evan told her. 
“They melted right off my feet.” 

“Well, be careful over there, okay?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. He pulled his Atlanta Braves cap over his head, 
waved to his mother, and headed out the back door. 

It was a warm spring day. Two black-and-yellow monarch butterflies 
fluttered over the flower garden. The bright new leaves on the trees shimmered 
in the sunlight. 

Evan stopped at the bottom of the driveway and lowered the baseball cap to 
shield his eyes from the sun. He squinted down the street, hoping to see his 
friend Andy. 

No sign of her. 

Disappointed, he kicked a large pebble along the curb and started to make 
his way toward Kermit’s house. Aunt Dee, Kermit’s mom, paid Evan three 
dollars an hour to watch Kermit after school every afternoon. Three hundred 
dollars an hour would be a lot more fair! he thought angrily. 

But Evan was glad to earn the money. He was saving for a new Walkman. 
Trigger had mistaken his old Walkman for a dog bone. 

But Evan was earning every penny. Kermit was impossible. That was the 
only word for him. Impossible. 

He didn’t want to play video games. He didn’t want to watch TV. He 
refused to go outside and play ball or toss a Frisbee around. He didn’t even want 
to sneak down to the little grocery on the corner and load up on candy bars and 
potato chips. 

All he wanted to do was stay downstairs in his dark, damp basement lab 
and mix beakers of chemicals together. “My experiments,” he called them. “I 



have to do my experiments.” 

Maybe he is a genius, Evan thought bitterly. But that doesn’t make him any 
fun. He’s just impossible. 

Evan definitely wasn’t enjoying his after-school baby-sitting job watching 
Kermit. In fact, he had several daydreams in which Kermit tried one of his own 
mixtures and melted to the basement floor, just like Evan’s sneakers. 

Some afternoons, Andy came along, and that made the job a little easier. 
Andy thought Kermit was really weird, too. But at least when she was there, 
Evan had someone to talk to, someone who didn’t want to talk about mixing 
aluminum pyrite with sodium chlorobenzadrate. 

What is Kermit’s problem, anyway? Evan wondered as he crossed the street 
and made his way through backyards toward Kermit’s house. Why does he think 
mixing is so much fun? Why is he always mixing this with that and that with 
this? 

I can’t even mix chocolate milk! 

Kermit’s house came into view two yards down. It was a two-story white 
house with a sloping black roof. 

Evan picked up his pace. He was about fifteen minutes late. He hoped that 
Kermit hadn’t already gotten into some kind of trouble. 

He had just pushed his way though the prickly, low hedges that fenced in 
Kermit’s yard when a familiar gruff voice made him freeze. 

“Evan—were you looking at my yard?” 

“Huh?” Evan recognized the voice at once. It belonged to Kermit’s next- 
door neighbor, a kid from Evan’s school. 

His name was Conan Barber. But the kids at school all called him Conan 
the Barbarian. That’s because he had to be the biggest, meanest kid in Atlanta. 
Maybe in the universe. 

Conan sat on top of the tall white fence that separated the yards. His cold 
blue eyes glared down at Evan. “Were you looking at my yard?” Conan 
demanded. 

“No way!” Evan’s voice came out in a squeak. 

“You were looking at my yard. That’s trespassing,” Conan accused. He 
leaped down from the high fence. He was big and very athletic. His hobby was 
leaping over kids he had just pounded into the ground. 

Conan wore a gray muscle shirt and baggy, faded jeans cutoffs. He also 
wore a very mean expression. 



“Whoa. Wait a minute, Conan!” Evan protested. “I was looking at Kermit’s 
yard. I never look at your yard. Never!” 

Conan stepped up to Evan. He stuck out his chest and bumped Evan hard, 
so hard he stumbled backwards. 

That was Conan’s other hobby. Bumping kids with his chest. His chest 
didn’t feel like a chest. It felt like a truck. 

“Why don’t you look at my yard?” Conan demanded. “Is there something 
wrong with my yard? Is my yard too ugly? Is that why you never look at it?” 

Evan swallowed hard. It began to dawn on him that maybe Conan was 
itching for a fight. 

Before he could answer Conan, he heard a scratchy voice reply for him. 
“It’s a free country, Conan!” 

“Oh, noooo,” Evan groaned, shutting his eyes. 

Evan’s cousin, Kermit, stepped out from behind Evan. He was tiny and 
skinny. A very pale kid with a pile of white-blond hair, and round black eyes 
behind big red plastic-framed glasses. Evan always thought his cousin looked 
like a white mouse wearing glasses. 

Kermit wore enormous red shorts that came down nearly to his ankles, and 
a red-and-black Braves T-shirt. The short sleeves hung down past the elbows of 
his skinny arms. 

“What did you say?” Conan demanded, glaring down menacingly at 
Kermit. 

“It’s a free country!” Kermit repeated shrilly. “Evan can look at any yard he 
wants to!” 

Conan let out an angry growl. As he lumbered forward to pound Evan’s 
face into mashed potatoes, Evan turned to Kermit. “Thanks a lot,” he told his 
cousin. “Thanks for all your help.” 

“Which way do you want your nose to slant?” Conan asked Evan. “To the 
right or to the left?” 



3 


“Don’t do it!” Kermit shrieked in his scratchy mouse voice. 

Conan raised a huge fist. With his other hand, he grabbed the front of 
Evan’s T-shirt. He glared down at Kermit. “Why not?” he growled. 

“Because I have this!” Kermit declared. 

“Huh?” Conan let go of Evan’s shirt. He stared at the glass beaker Kermit 
had raised in both hands. The beaker was half-full with a dark blue liquid. 

Conan let out a sigh and swept a beefy hand back through his wavy blond 
hair. His blue eyes narrowed at Kermit. “What’s that? Your baby formula?” 

“Ha-ha,” Kermit replied sarcastically. 

If Kermit doesn’t shut up, we’re both going to get pounded! Evan realized. 
What is the little creep trying to do? 

He tugged at Kermit’s sleeve, trying to pull him away from Conan. But 
Kermit ignored him. He raised the beaker close to Conan’s face. 

“It’s an Invisibility Mixture,” Kermit said. “If I pour it on you, you’ll 
disappear.” 

We should both disappear! Evan thought frantically. He let his eyes dart 
around the backyard. Maybe I can make it through that hedge before Conan 
grabs me, he thought. If I can get around the next house and down to the street, I 
might escape. 

But would it be right to leave little Kermit at Conan’s mercy? 

Evan sighed. He couldn’t abandon his cousin like that. Even though Kermit 
was definitely asking for it. 

“You’re going to make me invisible with that stuff?” Conan asked Kermit 
with a sneer. 

Kermit nodded. “If I pour a few drops on you, you’ll disappear. Really. I 
mixed it myself. It works. It’s a mixture of Teflon dioxinate and magnesium 
parasulfidine.” 

“Yeah. Right,” Conan muttered. He peered at the liquid in the beaker. 
“What makes it blue?” 

“Food coloring,” Kermit replied. Then he lowered his squeaky voice, trying 
to sound tough. “You’d better go home now, Conan. I don’t want to have to use 
this stuff.” 



Oh, wow! Evan thought, pulling the bill of his Braves cap down over his 
face. I can’t bear to watch this. This is sad. Really sad. Kermit is such a jerk. 

“Go ahead. Try it,” Evan heard Conan say. 

Evan raised the cap so he could see. “Uh... Kermit... maybe we should go 
in the house now,” he whispered. 

“Go ahead. Make me invisible,” Conan challenged. 

“You really want me to?” Kermit demanded. 

“Yeah,” Conan replied. “I want to be invisible. Go ahead, Kermit. Pour it on 
me. Make me disappear. I dare you.” 

Kermit raised the beaker over the gray muscle shirt that covered Conan’s 
broad chest. 

“Kermit—no!” Evan pleaded. “Don’t! Please don’t!” 

Evan made a frantic grab for the beaker. 

Too late. 

Kermit turned the beaker over and let the thick blue liquid pour onto the 
front of Conan’s shirt. 



4 


Out of the corner of his eye, Evan saw a monarch butterfly fluttering over the 
low hedges. I wish I were a butterfly, he thought. I wish I could flap my wings 
and float away. 

As far away from here as I can get! 

The blue liquid oozed down the front of Conan’s muscle shirt. All three 
boys stared at it in silence. 

“Well? I’m not disappearing,” Conan murmured, narrowing his eyes 
suspiciously at Kermit. 

Then his shirt started to shrink. 

“Hey—!” Conan cried angrily. He struggled to pull off the shrinking shirt. 
It got tinier and tinier. “It—it’s choking me!” Conan shrieked. 

“Wow!” Kermit squeaked, his black eyes glowing excitedly behind his 
glasses. “This is cool!” 

Evan gazed in amazement as the muscle shirt shrank down to a tiny shred 
of cloth. And then it vanished completely. 

Now Conan stood in front of them bare-chested. 

A heavy silence fell over the backyard. All three of them stared at Conan’s 
broad, bare chest for a few moments. 

Conan broke the silence. “That was my best muscle shirt,” he told Evan 
through gritted teeth. 

“Uh-oh,” Evan uttered. 

“I like your nose that way,” Andy told Evan. “It kind of tilts in both directions at 
once.” 

“I think it will go back to the way it was,” Evan replied, patting his nose 
tenderly. “At least it stopped hurting so much.” He sighed. “All the other cuts 
and bruises will go away, too. In time.” 

It was two days later. Evan sat across from Andy in the lunchroom at 
school. He stared down sadly at the tuna fish sandwich his mom had packed for 
him. He hadn’t taken a bite. His mouth wasn’t working exactly right yet. It kept 
going sideways instead of up and down. 

Andy wiped a chunk of egg salad off her cheek. She had short brown hair 



and big brown eyes that stared across the table at Evan. 

Andy didn’t dress like most of the other kids in their sixth-grade class. She 
liked bright colors. A lot of bright colors. 

Today she wore a yellow vest over a magenta T-shirt and orange Day-Glo 
shorts. 

When Andy moved to Atlanta in the beginning of the school year, some 
kids made fun of her colorful clothes. But they didn’t anymore. Now everyone 
agreed that Andy had style. And a few kids were even copying her look. 

“So what happened after Conan the Barbarian pounded your body into 
coleslaw?” Andy asked. She pulled a handful of potato chips from her bag and 
shoved them one by one into her mouth. 

Evan took a few bites from a section of his tuna fish sandwich. It took him 
a long time to swallow. “Conan made me promise I’d never look in his yard 
again,” he told Andy. “I had to raise my right hand and swear. Then he went 
home.” 

Evan sighed. He touched his sore nose again. “After Conan left, Kermit 
helped me hobble into his house,” Evan continued. “A little while later, Aunt 
Dee got home.” 

“Then what happened?” Andy asked, crinkling up the empty potato chip 

bag. 

“She saw that I was messed up,” Evan replied. “So she asked what 
happened.” 

Evan shook his head and scowled. “And before I could say anything, that 
little rat Kermit piped up and said, 'Evan picked a fight with Conan.’” 

“Oh, wow,” Andy murmured. 

“And Aunt Dee said, ‘Well, Evan, if you’re just going to get into fights 
instead of taking care of Kermit, I’m going to have to talk to your mom about 
you. Maybe you’re not mature enough for this job.’” 

“Oh, wow,” Andy repeated. 

“And the whole thing was Kermit’s fault!” Evan shouted, pounding his fist 
so hard on the table that his milk carton tipped over. Milk spilled over the 
tabletop, onto the front of his jeans. 

Evan was so upset, he didn’t even move out of the way. “And do you know 
the worst thing?” Evan demanded. “The worst thing?” 

“What?” Andy asked. 

“Kermit did it deliberately. He knew what that blue mixture would do. He 



knew it would shrink Conan’s shirt. Kermit wanted me to get pounded by 
Conan. He did the whole thing to get me in trouble with Conan.” 

“How do you know?” Andy asked. 

“The smile,” Evan told her. 

“Huh? What smile?” 

“The smile on Kermit’s face. You know that twisted little smile he has 
where his two front teeth stick out? That’s the smile he had when he helped me 
back to the house.” 

Andy tsk-tsked. 

Evan finished the section of tuna fish sandwich. “Is that all you’re going to 
say?” he snapped. 

“What can I say?” Andy replied. “Your cousin, Kermit, is a weird little 
dude. I think you should teach him a lesson. Pay him back.” 

“Huh?” Evan gaped at her. “How do I do that?” 

Andy shrugged. “I don’t know. Maybe you could... uh...” Her dark eyes 
suddenly flashed with excitement. “I know! Doesn’t he have a snack after school 
every day? You could slip some Monster Blood into his food.” 

Evan gulped and jumped to his feet. “Hey—no way! No way, Andy!” he 
shouted. 

Several kids turned to stare at Evan, startled by his loud cries. 

“Don’t even think it!” Evan shouted, ignoring the stares. “No Monster 
Blood. Ever! I never want to hear those words again!” 

“Okay, okay!” Andy cried. She raised both hands, as if to shield herself 
from him. 

“By the way,” Evan said, a little calmer, “where is the Monster Blood? 
Where did you hide it? You didn’t take any of it out—did you?” 

“Well...” Andy replied, lowering her eyes. A devilish grin spread across her 
face. “I put a little bit of it in the tuna fish sandwich you just ate.” 



5 


Evan let out a cry so loud, it made two kids fall off their chairs. Two other kids 
dropped their lunch trays. 

His eyes bulged and his voice rose higher than the gym teacher’s whistle. 
“You—you—you—!” he sputtered, grabbing his throat. 

Andy laughed. She pointed at his chair. “Evan, sit down. I was only 
joking.” 

“Huh?” 

“You heard me,” Andy said. “It was a joke. The Monster Blood is home, 
safe and sound.” 

Evan let out a long sigh. He sank back into the chair. He didn’t care that he 
was sitting in the milk he had spilled. 

“Annndrea,” he said unhappily, stretching out the word. “Annnndrea, that 
wasn’t funny.” 

“Sure it was,” Andy insisted. “And don’t call me Andrea. You know I hate 
that name.” 

“Andrea. Andrea. Andrea,” Evan repeated, paying her back for her mean 
joke. He narrowed his eyes at her sternly. “That new can of Monster Blood your 
parents sent you from Europe—it really is hidden away?” 

Andy nodded. “On the top shelf of a closet in the basement. Way in the 
back,” she told him. “The can is shut tight. No way the stuff can get out.” 

He stared hard at her, studying her face. 

“Don’t look at me like that!” she cried. She balled up the sandwich tinfoil 
and tossed it at him. “I’m telling the truth. The Monster Blood is totally hidden 
away. You don’t have to worry about it.” 

Evan relaxed. He pulled the Fruit Roll-Up from his lunch bag and started to 
unwrap it. “You owe me now,” he said softly. 

“Excuse me?” 

“You owe me for playing that stupid joke,” Evan said. 

“Oh, yeah? What do I have to do?” Andy demanded. 

“Come with me after school. To Kermit’s,” Evan said. 

Andy made a disgusted face. 

“Please,” Evan added. 



“Okay,” she said. “Kermit isn’t that bad when I’m around.” 

Evan held up the sticky Fruit Roll-Up. “Want this? I begged my mom not to 
buy the green ones!” 


* * * 


After school, Evan and Andy walked together to Kermit’s house. It was a gray 
day, threatening rain. The air felt heavy and wet, as humid as summer. 

Evan led the way across the street. He started to cut through the backyards 
—but stopped. “Let’s go the front way,” he instructed. “Conan might be hanging 
out in back. Waiting for us.” 

“Don’t say us,” Andy muttered. She shifted her backpack to the other 
shoulder. She scratched her arm. “Ow. Look at this.” 

Evan lowered his eyes to the large red bump on Andy’s right arm. “What is 
that? A mosquito bite?” 

Andy scratched it some more. “I guess so. It itches like crazy.” 

“You’re not supposed to scratch it,” Evan told her. 

“Thanks, Doc,” she replied sarcastically. She scratched it even harder to 
annoy him. 

A few sprinkles of rain came down as they made their way up Kermit’s 
driveway. Evan opened the front door and stepped into the living room. 

“Kermit—are you here?” 

No reply. 

A sour smell attacked Evan’s nostrils. He pressed his fingers over his nose. 
“Yuck. Do you smell that?” 

Andy nodded, her face twisted in disgust. “I think it’s coming from the 
basement.” 

“For sure,” Evan muttered. “Kermit must already be in his lab.” 

“Kermit? Hey—Kermit, what are you doing down there?” Evan called out. 

Holding their noses, they made their way quickly down the stairs. The 
basement was divided into two rooms. To the right stood the laundry room and 
furnace; to the left the rec room with Kermit’s lab set up along the back wall. 

Evan hurried across the tiled floor into the lab. He spotted Kermit behind 
his lab table, several beakers of colored liquids in front of him. “Kermit—what’s 
that disgusting smell?” he demanded. 

As Evan and Andy ran up to the lab table, Kermit poured a yellow liquid 



into a green liquid. “Uh-oh!” he cried, staring down at the bubbling mixture. 
Behind his glasses, his eyes grew wide with horror. 

“Run!” Kermit screamed. “Hurry! Get out! It’s going to BLOW!” 



6 


The liquid swirled and bubbled. 

Kermit ducked under the lab table. 

With a cry of horror, Evan spun round. Grabbed Andy’s hand. Started to 
pull her to the stairs. 

But he had only taken a step when he stumbled over Dogface, Kermit’s 
huge sheepdog. 

“Oof!” Evan felt the wind knocked out of him as he fell over the dog and 
landed facedown on the tile floor. He gasped. Struggled to choke in a mouthful 
of air. 

The room tilted and swayed. 

“It’s going to BLOW!” Kermit’s shrill warning rang in Evan’s ears. 

He finally managed to take a deep breath. Raised himself to one knee. 
Turned back to the lab table. 

And saw Andy standing calmly in the center of the rec room, her hands at 
her waist. 

“Andy—it’s going to BLOW!” Evan choked out. 

She rolled her eyes. “Evan, really,” she muttered, shaking her head. “Did 
you really fall for that?” 

“Huh?” Evan gazed past her to the long glass table. 

Kermit had climbed back to his feet. He was leaning with both elbows on 
the table. And he had the grin on his face. That grin. 

The twisted grin with the two front teeth sticking out. The grin Evan hated 
more than any grin in the world. 

“Yeah, Evan,” Kermit repeated, mimicking Andy, “did you really fall for 
that?” He burst into his squealing-high laugh that sounded like a pig stuck in a 
fence. 

Evan pulled himself up, muttering under his breath. Dogface hiccupped. 
The dog’s tongue tumbled out, and he began to pant loudly. 

Evan turned to Andy. “I didn’t really fall for it,” he claimed. “I knew it was 
another one of Kermit’s dumb jokes. I was just seeing if you believed it.” 

“For sure.” Andy rolled her eyes again. She was doing a lot of eye-rolling 
this afternoon, Evan realized. 



Evan and Andy stepped up to the table. It was littered with bottles and glass 
tubes, beakers and jars—all filled with colored liquids. 

On the wall behind the table stood a high bookshelf. The shelves were also 
jammed with bottles and jars of liquids and chemicals. Kermit’s mixtures. 

“I was only a few minutes late getting here,” Evan told Kermit. “From now 
on, don’t do anything. Just wait for me.” He sniffed the air. “What’s that really 
gross smell?” 

Kermit grinned back at him. “I didn’t notice it until you came in!” he joked. 

Evan didn’t laugh. “Give me a break,” he muttered. 

Andy scratched her mosquito bite. “Yeah. No more jokes today, Kermit.” 

The big sheepdog hiccupped again. 

“I’m mixing up something to cure Dogface’s hiccups,” Kermit announced. 

“Oh, no!” Evan replied sharply. “No way! I can’t let you give the dog one 
of your mixtures to drink.” 

“It’s a very simple hiccup cure,” Kermit said, pouring a blue liquid into a 
green liquid. “It’s just maglesium harposyrate and ribotussal polythorbital. With 
a little sugar for sweetness.” 

“No way,” Evan insisted. “You’re not giving Dogface anything to drink but 
water. It’s too dangerous.” 

Kermit ignored him and continued to mix chemicals from one glass beaker 
into another. He glanced up at Andy. “What’s wrong with your arm?” 

“It’s a really big mosquito bite,” Andy told him. “It itches like crazy.” 

“Let me see it,” Kermit urged. 

Andy eyed him suspiciously. “Why?” 

Kermit grabbed Andy’s hand and tugged her closer. “Let me see it,” he 
insisted. 

“It’s just a mosquito bite,” Andy said. 

“I have some of that blue shrinking mixture left,” Kermit announced. “The 
stuff I shrank Conan’s shirt with.” 

“Don’t remind me,” Evan groaned. 

“It’ll shrink your mosquito bite,” Kermit told Andy. He picked up the 
beaker. 

“You’re going to pour that stuff on my arm?” Andy cried. “I don’t think 

so!” 

She tried to step away. 

But Kermit grabbed her arm. And poured. 



The blue liquid spread over the mosquito bite. 
“No! Oh, no!” Andy shrieked. 



7 


“My arm!” Andy shrieked. “What did you do to me?” 

Evan lurched to the lab table, nearly stumbling over the dog again. He 
grabbed Andy’s arm and examined it. “It—it—” he stammered. 

“It’s gone!” Andy cried. “The mosquito bite—it’s gone!” 

Evan stared at Andy’s arm. Perfectly smooth, except for a few drips of the 
blue liquid. 

“Kermit—you’re a geniusl” Andy cried. “That mixture of yours shrank the 
mosquito bite away!” 

“Told you,” Kermit replied, grinning happily. 

“You can make a fortune!” Andy exclaimed. “Don’t you realize what 
you’ve done? You’ve invented the greatest cure for mosquito bites ever!” 

Kermit held up the beaker. He tilted it one way, then the other. “Not much 
left,” he said softly. 

“But you can mix up some more—right?” Andy demanded. 

Kermit frowned. “I’m not sure,” he said softly. 

“I think I can mix up a new batch. But I’m not sure. I didn’t write down 
what I put in it.” 

He scratched his white-blond hair and stared at the empty glass beaker, 
twitching his nose like a mouse, thinking hard. 

Dogface let out another loud hiccup. The hiccup was followed by a howl. 
Evan saw that the poor dog was getting very unhappy about the hiccups. 
Dogface was a big dog—and so he had big hiccups that shook his sheepdog 
body like an earthquake. 

“I’d better get to work on the hiccup cure,” Kermit announced. He pulled 
some jars of chemicals off the shelf and started to open them. 

“Whoa. Wait a minute,” Evan told him. “I told you, Kermit—I can’t let you 
feed anything to the dog. Aunt Dee will kill me if—” 

“Oh, let him try!” Andy interrupted. She rubbed her smooth arm. “Kermit is 
a genius, Evan. You have to let a genius work.” 

Evan glared at her. “Whose side are you on?” he demanded in a loud 
whisper. 

Andy didn’t answer. She unzipped her orange-and-blue backpack and 



pulled out some papers. “I think I’ll do my math homework while Kermit mixes 
up his hiccup cure.” 

Kermit’s eyes lit up excitedly behind his glasses. “Math? Do you have math 
problems?” 

Andy nodded. “It’s a take-home equations exam. Very hard.” 

Kermit set down the test tubes and beakers. He hurried out from behind the 
lab table. “Can I do the problems for you, Andy?” he asked eagerly. “You know I 
love to do math problems.” 

Andy flashed Evan a quick wink. Evan frowned back at her. He shook his 
head. 

So that’s why Andy is being so nice to Kermit! Evan told himself. It was all 
a trick. A trick to get Kermit to do the math test for her. 

Kermit could never resist math problems. His parents had to buy him stacks 
and stacks of math workbooks. He could spend an entire afternoon doing all the 
problems in the workbooks —for fun ! 

Dogface hiccupped. 

Kermit grabbed the math test from Andy’s hand. “Please let me do the 
equations,” he begged. “Pretty please?” 

“Well... okay,” Andy agreed. She flashed Evan another wink. 

Evan scowled back at her. Andy is going to get in trouble for this, he 
thought. Andy is a terrible math student. It’s her worst subject. Mrs. McGrady is 
going to get very suspicious when Andy gets every problem right. 

But Evan didn’t say anything. What was the point? 

Kermit was already scribbling answers on the page, solving the equations as 
fast as he could read them. His eyes were dancing wildly. He was breathing hard. 
And he had a happy grin on his face. 

“All done,” he announced. 

Wow, he’s fast! Evan thought. He finished that math test in the time it 
would take me to write my name at the top of the page! 

Kermit handed the pencil and math pages back to Andy. “Thanks a lot,” she 
said. “I really need a good grade in math this term.” 

“Cheater,” Evan whispered in her ear. 

“I just did it for Kermit,” Andy whispered back. “He loves doing math 
problems. So why shouldn’t I give him a break?” 

“Cheater,” Evan repeated. 

Dogface hiccupped. Then he let out a pained howl. 



Kermit returned to his lab table. He poured a yellow liquid into a red liquid. 
It started to smoke. Then it turned bright orange. 

Andy tucked the math test into her backpack. 

Kermit poured the orange liquid into a large glass beaker. He picked up a 
tiny bottle, turned it upside down, and emptied silvery crystals into the beaker. 

Evan stepped up beside Kermit. “You can’t feed that to Dogface,” Evan 
insisted. “I really mean it. I won’t let you give it to him.” 

Kermit ignored him. He stirred the mixture until it turned white. Then he 
added another powder that made it turn orange again. 

“You have to listen to me, Kermit,” Evan said. “I’m in charge, right?” 

Kermit continued to ignore him. 

Dogface hiccupped. His white furry body quivered and shook. 

“Let Kermit work,” Andy told Evan. “He’s a genius.” 

“Maybe he’s a genius,” Evan replied. “But I’m in charge. Until Kermit’s 
mom gets home, I’m the boss.” 

Kermit poured the mixture into a red dog dish. 

“I’m the boss,” said Evan. “And the boss says no.” 

Kermit lowered the dog dish to the floor. 

“The boss says you can’t feed that to Dogface,” Evan said. 

“Here, boy! Here, boy!” Kermit called. 

“No way!” Evan cried. “No way the dog is drinking that!” 

Evan made a dive for the bowl. He planned to grab it away. 

But he dove too hard—and went sliding under the lab table. 

Dogface lowered his head to the dog dish and began lapping up the orange 
mixture. 

Evan spun around and stared eagerly at the dog. All three of them were 
waiting... waiting... waiting to see what would happen. 



8 


Dogface licked the bowl clean. Then he stared up at Kermit, as if to say, “Thank 
you.” 

Kermit petted the big dog’s head. He smoothed the white, curly fur from in 
front of Dogface’s eyes. The fur fell right back in place. Dogface licked Kermit’s 
hand. 

“See? The hiccups are gone,” Kermit declared to Evan. 

Evan stared at the dog. He waited a few seconds more. “You’re right,” he 
confessed. “The hiccups are gone.” 

“It was a simple mixture,” Kermit bragged. “Just a little tetrahydropodol 
with some hydradroxilate crystals and an ounce of megahydracyl oxyneuroplat. 
Any child could do it.” 

“What a genius!” Andy exclaimed. 

Evan started to say something. But Dogface interrupted with a sharp yip. 

Then, without warning, the big sheepdog sprang forward. With another 
shrill yip, Dogface raised his enormous front paws—and leaped on to Kermit. 

Kermit let out a startled cry and stumbled back against the wall. Bottles and 
jars shook on the shelves behind him. 

Dogface began barking wildly, uttering shrill, excited yips. The dog jumped 
again, as if trying to leap into Kermit’s arms. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Kermit squealed. 

The dog jumped again. 

The shelves shook. Kermit sank to the floor. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Kermit shrieked, covering his head with both arms. 
“Stop it, Dogface! Stop jumping!” 

The excited dog used his head to push Kermit’s arm away. Then he began 
licking Kermit’s face frantically. Then he began nipping at his T-shirt. 

“Stop! Yuck! Stop!” Kermit struggled to get away. But the big dog had 
Kermit pinned to the floor. 

“What’s going on?” Andy cried. “What’s gotten into that dog?” 

“Kermit’s mixture!” Evan replied. He dove at the dog, grabbed Dogface 
with both hands, and tried to tug him off Kermit. 

Dogface spun around. With another high-pitched yip, he bounded away, 



running at full speed across the basement. 

“Stop him!” Kermit cried. “He’s out of control! He’ll break something!” 

CRAAAASH. 

A shelf of canning jars toppled to the floor. 

Barking loudly, the dog bounded away from the shelf and began running in 
wide circles, his big paws clomping on the tile floor. Round and round, as if 
chasing his tail. 

“Dogface—whoa!” Evan called, chasing after the sheepdog. He turned back 
to Andy. “Help me! We’ve got to stop him! He’s acting crazy!” 

Dogface disappeared into the laundry room. “Dogface—come back here!” 
Evan called. 

He burst into the laundry room in time to see the dog crash into the ironing 
board. It toppled over, along with a stack of clothes that had been resting on it. 
The iron clattered over the hard floor. 

Dogface yelped and climbed out from under the spilled clothes. Spotting 
Evan, the dog’s stubby tail began wagging—and he leaped across the room. 

“No!” Evan screeched as the huge dog knocked him over backwards to the 
ground. Dogface frantically licked Evan’s face. 

Behind him, Evan heard Andy laugh. “Too much energy! He’s acting like a 
crazy puppy!” she declared. 

“He’s too big to think he’s a puppy!” Evan wailed. 

Dogface was sniffing furiously under the washing machine. He pounced on 
a large black ant. 

Then he turned and came bounding over to Andy and Evan. 

“Look out!” Evan cried. 

But the big sheepdog lumbered past them, back into the other room. They 
followed him, watching him roll over a few times, kicking his big, furry paws in 
the air. 

Then Dogface jumped to his feet—and came charging at Kermit. 

“Whoa! Whoa, boy!” Kermit cried. He turned to Andy. “You’re right. This 
is just the way Dogface acted when he was a puppy. The mixture gave him too 
much energy!” 

The sheepdog crashed into an old couch against the wall. He climbed up 
onto the couch, sniffing the cushions, exploring. His stubby tail wagged 
furiously. 

“Dogface, you’re not a puppy!” Evan cried. “Please listen to me! You’re too 



big to be a puppy! Dogface—please!” 

“Look out!” Andy shrieked. 

The dog jumped off the couch and went running full speed toward Kermit. 

“No! Stop!” Kermit cried. He dove behind the lab table. 

The dog tried to slow down. But his big legs were carrying him too fast. 

Dogface crashed into the lab table. Bottles and beakers flew into the air, 
then crashed to the floor. The table toppled over on top of Kermit. 

The shelves fell off the wall, and all of the jars and tubes and beakers 
tumbled to the floor, shattering, clattering, chemicals pouring out over the floor. 

“What a mess!” Evan cried. “What a horrible mess!” 

He turned—and let out a loud gasp. 

Aunt Dee stood in the doorway. Her mouth was opened wide in surprise, 
and her eyes nearly bulged out of her head. 

“What on Earth is going on down here?” she shrieked. 

“Uh... well...” Evan started. 

How could he begin to explain? And if he did find a way to explain, would 
Aunt Dee believe him? 

Aunt Dee pressed her hands against her waist and tapped one foot on the 
floor. “What has happened here?” she demanded angrily. 

“Uh... well...” Evan repeated. 

Kermit spoke up first. He pointed an accusing finger at Evan. “Evan was 
teasing the dog!” he cried. 



9 


Kermit’s mom glared angrily at Evan. “I’m paying you to take care of Kermit,” 
she said sternly. “Not to play silly jokes on the dog and wreck my house.” 

“But—but—but—” Evan sputtered. 

“Evan didn’t do it!” Andy protested. 

But her words were drowned out by Kermit, who let out a loud, phony wail 
—and burst into tears. “I tried to stop Evan!” Kermit sobbed. “I didn’t want him 
to tease Dogface! But he wouldn’t stop!” 

Kermit rushed into his mother’s arms. “It’s okay,” Aunt Dee said 
soothingly. “It’s okay, Kermit. I’ll make sure Evan never does it again.” 

She narrowed her eyes angrily at Evan as Kermit continued to sob, holding 
on to his mother like a baby. 

Evan rolled his eyes at Andy. Andy replied with a shrug. 

“Evan, you and Andy can start cleaning up this mess,” Mrs. Majors 
ordered. “Kermit is a very sensitive boy. When you play jokes like this, it upsets 
him terribly.” 

Kermit sobbed even louder. His mom tenderly patted his head. “It’s okay, 
Kermit. It’s okay. Evan won’t ever tease Dogface again,” she whispered. 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered. 

How could Kermit put on such an act? 

How could he deliberately get Evan into trouble? This mess wasn’t Evan’s 
fault. It was Kermit’s! 

“I really don’t think—” Andy started. 

But Aunt Dee raised a hand to silence her. “Just get this mess cleaned up— 
okay?” 

She turned to Evan. “I’m not going to tell your mom about this, Evan,” she 
said, still patting Kermit’s head. 

“Thanks,” Evan muttered. 

“I’m going to give you one more chance,” she continued. “You don’t really 
deserve it. If you weren’t my nephew, I’d make you pay for all the damage. And 
I’d get someone else to take care of Kermit.” 

“Evan is mean,” Kermit murmured, removing his glasses and wiping tears 
off his cheeks. “Evan is really mean.” 



What a little rat! Evan thought. But he remained silent, his eyes lowered to 
the floor. 

“Kermit, let’s get you cleaned up,” Aunt Dee said, leading him to the stairs. 
“Then we’ll have to give the dog a bath.” 

She turned back to Evan and pointed a finger at him. “One more chance,” 
she warned. “One more chance.” 

In the corner, Dogface let out a loud hiccup. 

“See how you’ve upset the dog?” Kermit’s mom called to Evan. “You’ve 
given poor Dogface the hiccups!” 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered again. 

As Evan struggled to find words to defend himself, Kermit and his mom 
disappeared up the stairs. 

Two hours later, Andy and Evan wearily headed for home. 

“What a mess,” Evan moaned. “Look at me. I’m covered in chemicals.” 

“Two hours,” Andy muttered. “Two hours to clean up the basement. And 
Dogface stood there watching us, hiccupping the whole time.” 

“Kermit is such a little creep,” Evan said, kicking a stone across the 
sidewalk. 

Andy shook her head bitterly. “Do you have any more cousins like him?” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Kermit is one of a kind.” 

“He’s such a little liar,” Andy said. 

“Hey—you stuck up for him,” Evan accused. “You said he was a genius, 
remember? You were so happy that he did your math problems for you, you 
thought he was wonderful.” 

Andy shifted her backpack onto her other shoulder. A smile crossed her 
face. “I forgot all about the math problems,” she said. “Kermit may be a little 
creep—but he’s also a genius. I’m going to get an A in math!” She let out a 
happy cheer. 

“Winners never cheat, and cheaters never win,” Evan muttered. 

Andy gave him a playful shove. “Did you just make that up? It’s very 
catchy.” 

“Give me a break,” Evan growled. He turned and made his way up his 
driveway without saying good-bye. 


Andy called him two nights later. “Your cousin Kermit is a total creep!” She 



shouted so loudly, Evan had to hold his phone away from his ear. 

“Do you know what he did? Do you know what he did?” Andy shrieked. 

“No. What?” Evan asked softly. 

“He did all the math equations wrong,” Andy cried. 

“Excuse me?” Evan wasn’t sure he heard correctly. “The genius got 
everything wrong?” 

“On purpose!” Andy declared. “He got them wrong on purpose. He made 
up answers for all of them! He didn’t even read the problems. He just wrote 
down stupid answers.” 

“But why?” Evan demanded. 

“Why? Why? Because he’s Kermit!” Andy screamed. 

Evan swallowed hard. Poor Andy, he thought. Now she will fail in math. 

“What a mean, rotten trick!” Andy shrieked into the phone. “Mrs. McGrady 
called me up to her desk and asked me to explain my answers. She asked me 
how I could possibly be so totally off on every single equation.” 

Andy sighed bitterly. “Of course I couldn’t answer her. I just stood there 
with my mouth open. I think I drooled on her desk!” 

“After we left his house, Kermit probably laughed his head off,” Evan said. 

“That brat has such a sick sense of humor,” Andy wailed. “We have to pay 
him back, Evan. We really have to.” 

“Yeah. We do,” Evan agreed. 

“We have to get out the Monster Blood,” Andy urged. “We have to use the 
Monster Blood to pay him back.” 

“Yeah. We do,” Evan agreed. 



10 


Evan called Andy back later that night. “I changed my mind,” he said. “I don’t 
want to use the Monster Blood.” 

“What’s your problem?” Andy demanded. “Kermit deserves it. You know 
he does.” 

“Monster Blood is too dangerous,” Evan told her. “It turned Cuddles the 
hamster into a giant, roaring monster. I don’t want to turn Kermit into a giant, 
roaring monster.” 

“Neither do I!” Andy exclaimed. “I don’t want to feed it to him, Evan. I just 
want to slip a tiny bit into one of his mixtures. He thinks he’s so smart and can 
do anything. I want to see Kermit’s face when his mixture goes berserk!” 

She laughed gleefully. 

What an evil laugh, Evan thought. 

“It’ll be awesome!” Andy exclaimed. 

“Forget about it,” Evan insisted. “I have nightmares about Monster Blood 
almost every night. I don’t want to see that stuff again, Andy. I really don’t. 
Leave it locked up—please!” 

“But you said we could do it!” Andy pleaded. 

“I made a mistake,” Evan told her. “Don’t take it out of the closet, Andy. 
Leave it safe and sound in its can—okay?” 

Andy didn’t reply. 

“Okay?” Evan demanded. “Okay?” 

“Okay,” Andy finally agreed. 

“We’re going to play outside today, Kermit,” Evan said firmly. “It’s a beautiful 
day, and we’re going to go out and not stay in the stupid basement. Get it?” 

It was a sunny, warm Thursday afternoon. Golden sunlight filtered down 
through the dust-covered basement windows up near the ceiling. 

Standing behind his lab table, arranging his jars and bottles of chemicals, 
Kermit muttered something to himself. 

“No argument,” Andy added. “We’re going outside even if Evan and I have 
to drag you out.” 

“But I have a mixture I want to try,” Kermit whined. 



“You need some sunshine,” Evan told him. “Look how pale you are. You 
look just like a white mouse.” 

Kermit was wearing a huge olive-colored T-shirt over baggy brown shorts. 
With his white-blond hair, beady eyes, and buck teeth, he looked more like a rat 
in human clothes. 

He frowned, hurt by Evan’s description. 

“Okay. I’ll go outside with you,” he murmured unhappily. 

“Yaay!” Andy whooped. It was the first time Kermit had ever agreed to 
leave his basement lab. 

“But first I have to have a drink,” Kermit said. He stepped out from behind 
the lab table and made his way toward the basement stairs. “You want an orange 
soda?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. He and Andy followed Kermit up the stairs to 
the kitchen. 

“I can’t believe he agreed to go out and play,” Andy whispered. “Do you 
think he’s sick or something?” 

“Maybe he feels bad about the mean tricks he’s pulled,” Evan whispered. 

The kitchen phone rang. Evan answered it. It was the wrong number. 

He hung up the phone. He and Andy stepped up to the counter. Andy was 
wearing pink jeans, a yellow sleeveless T-shirt, and bright orange high-tops. 

Kermit had already poured out three glasses of orange soda. The soda was 
the same color as Andy’s high-tops, Evan noticed. They all drank the soda down 
quickly. 

“I was really thirsty,” Kermit said. Evan didn’t pay any attention to the 
strange smile on Kermit’s face. After all, Kermit always had a strange smile on 
his face. 

“This orange soda is very sweet,” Andy commented. She made a face. “Too 
sweet! It makes my teeth itch!” 

Kermit laughed. “I think it’s good,” he said. 

They set their glasses down in the sink and stepped out the back door. Evan 
found a red Frisbee on the back stoop. He flipped it to Andy. 

Andy trotted across the backyard and flipped it back to Evan. “Let’s play 
keep-away from Kermit!” she cried. 

“Hey—no way!” Kermit protested. “Toss it to me!” 

Andy sent the Frisbee flying over Kermit’s head to Evan. Kermit made a 
wild grab for it, but it sailed out of his reach. It hit Evan’s hands, but Evan 



dropped it. 

Andy started to laugh. 

“What’s so funny?” Evan demanded. 

Andy shrugged. “I don’t know.” She let out another giggle. 

Evan flipped the Frisbee to Kermit. It bounced off Kermit’s chest. 

This kid is a real klutz, Evan thought. It’s because he never plays sports. He 
never comes up out of his basement. 

Andy uttered a high-pitched laugh. 

Evan started to laugh, too. 

Kermit picked up the Frisbee. He tried to toss it to Andy, but the Frisbee 
sailed way over her head. It hit the side of the garage and bounced off. 

Evan and Andy both laughed harder. 

Evan trotted over to the garage. He sent a sidearm toss toward Andy. She 
missed, and the Frisbee flew into the low hedges at the side of the yard. 

Andy didn’t chase after it. She was laughing too hard. 

Evan laughed even harder. Tears ran down his cheeks. 

What’s happening to me? he wondered, suddenly feeling frightened. 

Why can’t I stop laughing? What’s going on? 

Kermit grinned at both of them. That grin! 

Evan laughed even harder. So hard, his stomach hurt. 

Something is wrong, Evan realized. Something is terribly wrong. 

“K-Kermit—why are we 1-laughing?” he stammered. 

Andy wiped tears from her eyes. She held her sides and laughed some 
more. 

“Why are we laughing?” Evan demanded. 

“I gave you my laughing mixture,” Kermit told them. “I put it in the orange 
soda.” 

Evan tossed back his head and laughed. Andy giggled so hard, she choked. 
But she kept on laughing. 

This isn’t funny. This is scary, Evan thought. But he let out a shrill giggle. 

“How—how long are we going to laugh like this, Kermit?” Evan managed 
to ask. 

“Probably forever,” Kermit replied, flashing his famous toothy grin. 



11 


Evan took a deep breath and tried to hold it. But the laughter burst out of him so 
hard, his chest ached. 

Laughing giddily, Andy made a grab for Kermit. 

Kermit ducked out of her reach and went scampering toward the fence at 
the back of the yard. 

Evan shook his head hard, trying to shake off the effect of the laughter 
potion. But it didn’t help. He laughed until tears rolled down his face. 

Andy chased after Kermit, laughing shrilly. 

Evan followed, gasping for breath. I can’t breathe, he realized. I’m laughing 
so hard, I can’t breathe. 

“K-Kermit—!” Evan choked out. “You’ve got to s-stop it!” A high giggle 
burst out of his throat. “You’ve g-got to!” 

“I don’t know how,” Kermit replied calmly. 

Andy and Evan laughed in reply. 

“It’s awesome—isn’t it!” Kermit declared happily. “The mixture works 
perfectly!” 

Andy made a grab for Kermit’s throat. 

Again, Kermit ducked away. 

Andy and Evan laughed a little harder. 

Andy picked up the Frisbee and tried to heave it at Kermit. But she was 
laughing too hard to control it. The Frisbee sailed over the fence. 

“Hey—get that back. That’s mine!” Kermit demanded. 

Evan and Andy laughed. 

A familiar face popped up on the other side of the fence. 

“Conan!” Kermit cried. 

Conan peered first at Andy, then at Evan. “Are you looking at my yard?” he 
asked Evan. 

Evan struggled to hold it in. But he let out a high, shrill laugh. 

“Didn’t I warn you last week about looking at my yard?” Conan demanded. 

Evan laughed. 

“Conan, give me back my Frisbee,” Kermit whined. 



Conan leaped over the fence. Evan saw that he had the Frisbee in his left 
hand. Conan quickly hid the Frisbee behind his back. 

Andy and Evan laughed. Andy wiped tears from her eyes. Her whole body 
shook with laughter. 

“Give me back my Frisbee,” Kermit insisted. 

Conan ignored him. “What’s so funny?” he asked Andy and Evan. He 
balled his right hand into a fist. 

Andy giggled. 

If we keep laughing, he’ll pound us! Evan realized. But he couldn’t help 
himself. He let out a loud belly laugh. 

“Hey—I want my Frisbee!” Kermit whined. 

“I don’t have your Frisbee,” Conan lied, keeping his left hand behind his 
back. 

Evan tossed his head back and laughed. 

“Yes, you do. It’s behind your back,” Kermit said. “Give it back, Conan.” 

“Who’s going to make me?” Conan demanded in a low, menacing voice. 

Evan let out a high giggle. Andy laughed, too. 

“They are!” Kermit replied to Conan. “They’re going to make you!” He 
turned to Evan. “Make Conan give back my Frisbee.” 

Evan laughed in reply. 

“What’s so funny?” Conan asked again. 

Andy shook her head. “Nothing. Nothing’s funny,” she choked. Then she 
burst out laughing. 

“I don’t like people laughing at me,” Conan said. 

This is horrible! Evan thought. One more laugh—and Conan could 
explode! 

Evan let out a long hyena laugh. 

“I really go ballistic when people laugh at me,” Conan warned. 

Evan and Andy laughed some more. 

“I have to hurt people who laugh at me,” Conan threatened. 

Evan and Andy laughed in reply. 

Conan turned to Kermit. “Why are they laughing like that?” 

Kermit shrugged. “Beats me. I guess they think you’re funny.” 

“Oh, is that right?” Conan shouted angrily, turning back to Evan and Andy. 
“You two think I’m funny?” 

Evan and Andy held their sides and laughed. 



“Give me my Frisbee!” Kermit shouted. 

“Okay. Go chase it.” Conan flung the Frisbee across the hedges. It sailed 
over two yards and disappeared in a clump of evergreen shrubs. 

Kermit went running after it. 

Conan scowled at Evan and Andy. “I’m going to count to three,” he 
growled. “And if you don’t stop laughing by the count of three, I’ll make you 
stop!” He raised both fists to show them how he would make them stop. 

“One...” Conan said. 

Evan laughed. Andy pressed her hand over mouth, but couldn’t stop a 
giggle from escaping. 

“Two...” Conan counted, his face twisted in anger. 

I’ve got to stop laughing! Evan told himself. I’m in serious trouble here. 
Serious. 

He opened his mouth, and a booming “Hahahahaha!” burst out. 

Andy had both hands pressed over her mouth. But it didn’t stop the snickers 
and guffaws from pouring out her nose. 

Kermit came jogging back into the backyard. “I can’t find the Frisbee,” he 
complained. “Somebody has to help me. I can’t find it anywhere.” 

Conan turned to him. “You sure you don’t know why they’re laughing like 
that?” he asked. 

Kermit shook his head. “They told me they think you’re funny-looking,” he 
told Conan. “I guess that’s why they’re laughing.” 

I don’t believe this! Evan thought, so angry he wanted to explode. That 
little creep! How can he do this to us? 

Conan turned back to Andy and Evan. “Last chance to stop,” he said. He 
took a deep breath, stretching out his big, powerful chest. “Three!” 

Andy laughed. 

Evan laughed even harder. 

“I warned you,” Conan growled. 



12 


Andy phoned Evan that night to see how he was feeling. Evan had to hold the 
phone away from his ear. His head hurt too much to press a phone against it. 

“I guess I’ll survive,” Evan groaned. “I’m getting used to looking in the 
mirror and seeing a pile of coleslaw where my head used to be.” 

Andy sighed. “Your cousin is such a creep,” she said. 

“How are you feeling?” Evan asked. “How long did it take you to climb 
down from the tree?” 

“Not too many hours,” Andy replied weakly. 

Conan had said he never hit girls. So he picked Andy up and stuck her onto 
a high tree branch. 

“At least Conan stopped us from laughing,” Evan said. “My stomach still 
hurts from laughing so hard.” 

“Mine, too,” Andy told him. “I’m never going to laugh again. Never. If 
someone tells me the funniest joke in the world, I’ll just smile and say, ‘Very 
funny.’” 

“I can’t believe Kermit did that to us,” Evan moaned. 

“I believe it,” Andy replied dryly. “Kermit will do anything to get us into 
trouble. That’s what he lives for—getting us into major trouble.” 

“Did you hear that little mouse laughing while Conan pounded me into the 
ground?” Evan asked. 

“I was up in the tree, remember? I could see him laughing!” Andy declared. 

There was a long silence at the other end. And then Andy spoke in a hushed 
voice, just above a whisper, “Evan—are you ready to use the Monster Blood on 
Kermit?” 

“Yeah,” Evan replied without having to think about it even for a second. 
“I’m ready.” 



13 


After school the next afternoon, Evan and Andy found Kermit behind his lab 
table as usual. “Hi, Kermit,” Evan called, tossing his backpack down and 
stepping up to the table. 

Kermit didn’t glance up. He was busy stirring ingredients in a large mixing 
bowl, using a large wooden spoon. 

Evan peered into the bowl. It looked like pie dough in there. It was thick 
and gooey and yellowish. 

Kermit hummed to himself as he stirred. 

Andy was wearing a sleeveless, hot pink T-shirt over bright yellow shorts 
and matching yellow sneakers. She stepped up beside Evan and peeked into the 
bowl. “Making a pie?” she asked. 

Kermit ignored her, too. He kept stirring and humming, stirring and 
humming. 

Finally he stopped and glanced up at Evan. “I told my mom you lost my 
Frisbee,” he said, sneering. “She says you have to get me a new one.” 

“Huh? Me?” Evan cried. 

Andy walked around to Kermit’s side of the table. She lowered her head to 
the bowl. “Smells lemony,” she said. “What is it, Kermit? Is it some kind of 
dough?” 

“It was your fault my Frisbee got lost,” Kermit told Evan, ignoring Andy’s 
questions. “Mom says you’re a very bad baby-sitter.” 

Evan let out an angry cry. He balled his hands into fists. He struggled to 
keep himself from strangling Kermit. 

It was a real struggle. 

“Mom wanted to know who drank up all the orange soda,” Kermit 
continued. “I told her you and Andy drank it.” 

“Kermit!” Evan shrieked. “You played a horrible trick on us yesterday! You 
put chemicals in our orange soda! You made us laugh and laugh and laugh— 
until it hurt. Then you got us in major trouble with Conan! Did you tell your 
mom that? Did you? Did you ? ” 

Kermit put his hands over his ears. “Don’t shout, Evan,” he whined. “You 
know I have very sensitive ears.” 



Another angry growl escaped Evan’s throat. He felt about to explode with 

rage. 

“I told my mom that you shout at me all the time,” Kermit continued. 
“Mom says you’re just immature. She thinks you’re very babyish. She only lets 
you stay with me because you’re my cousin.” 

Kermit picked up the wooden spoon and started to stir the doughy mixture 
again. 

Evan spun away, trying to control his anger. 

I’m glad Andy and I are going to do what we’re going to do, he thought. 
I’m glad we’re going to give Kermit a little scare. He’s been asking for it. He 
really has. And now he’s going to get it. 

Evan walked over to his backpack. He unzipped it and pulled out a candy 
bar. “Mmmm. A Choc-O-Lik Bar,” he murmured. He crossed back to the lab 
table, unwrapping the candy bar as he walked. 

Standing in front of Kermit, Evan took a big bite of the chocolate bar. It 
made a loud crunch as his teeth sank into it. “Mmmmmm!” he proclaimed. 
“Choc-O-Lik Bars are cool.” 

The candy bar was part of the plot. 

Evan knew that the Choc-O-Lik Bar was Kermit’s favorite. 

The candy bar was supposed to distract Kermit. While Kermit stared at the 
candy and pleaded with Evan to give him a bite, Andy would slip a tiny chunk of 
Monster Blood into Kermit’s mixture. 

Evan crunched the candy bar loudly, making lip-smacking sounds as he 
chewed. 

Kermit glanced up. He stopped stirring the yellowish dough. “Is that really 
a Choc-O-Lik Bar?” he asked. 

Evan nodded. “Yeah. Sure is.” 

“My favorite,” Kermit said. 

“I know,” Evan replied. He took another crunchy bite. 

Kermit stared at the candy bar. 

Andy stood beside Kermit. Evan saw the blue container of Monster Blood 
in her hand. Just seeing the can made Evan shiver. 

So many bad memories. So many nightmares. 

The green gunk inside the can was so dangerous. 

“Can I have a piece of the Choc-O-Lik Bar?” Kermit asked Evan. 

Andy lifted off the top of the Monster Blood container. 



“Maybe. Maybe not,” Evan told Kermit. 

Andy stuck two fingers in the container. She pulled out a gooey green hunk 
of Monster Blood. 

“Please? Pretty please?” Kermit begged Evan. 

Andy dropped the chunk of Monster Blood into Kermit’s big bowl of 
dough. Then she quietly snapped the cap back on the container and slid it back 
into her bag. 

Evan took another bite of the candy bar. 

“You shouldn’t eat a candy bar unless you have enough to share with 
everyone,” Kermit scolded. 

“You haven’t been very nice to me,” Evan told him. “So I’m not going to 
share.” 

Kermit started stirring the dough again. He stared angrily at Evan as he 
stirred. He didn’t see the green Monster Blood being stirred up in the yellow 
dough. 

Evan took another bite of the Choc-O-Lik Bar. Only a few bites left. 

“I’m going to tell Mom you were mean to me,” Kermit threatened. “I’m 
going to tell her you wouldn’t share.” 

Evan shook his head. “See what I mean? You’re not nice to me, Kermit. If 
you were nice to me, I’d share all my candy bars with you.” 

Andy winked at Evan. Then she peered into the bowl. 

Kermit stirred and stirred. 

Andy’s expression became tense. She gripped the edge of the table with 
both hands. Evan saw her nibble her bottom lip. 

Watching Kermit stir the Monster Blood, Evan suddenly had a heavy 
feeling in his stomach. 

We’ve done it, he thought. 

We’ve opened another can of Monster Blood. 

He stared at the yellow dough in the bowl. It made a soft plopping sound as 
Kermit pushed the wooden spoon through it. 

Now what? Evan wondered. 

Now what’s going to happen? 



14 


Kermit stirred the yellow dough. The big wooden spoon scraped the bowl. The 
doughy mixture plopped softly, tumbling and swirling as Kermit worked. 

Andy kept nibbling her lower lip, her eyes locked on the bowl. Her brown 
hair fell over her face. But she made no move to push it back. 

Evan watched from the other side of the table. His heart began doing flip- 
flops in his chest. He took another bite of the chocolate bar. 

He chewed as quietly as possible. He didn’t want to disturb Kermit. As he 
chewed, he stared at the bowl. 

He and Andy were waiting. Waiting to see what the little hunk of Monster 
Blood would do to Kermit’s mixture. 

Waiting to see the look of horror on Kermit’s face. 

Waiting to pay him back for being such a little monster. 

Kermit didn’t seem to notice how quiet it had become in the basement. 
Dogface came lumbering in, panting loudly, his paws thudding on the tile floor. 

No one turned to look at him. 

The dog hiccupped, turned, and padded out of the room. 

Evan bit off another chunk of the candy bar. 

Kermit stirred, humming to himself. The spoon scraped the side of the 
bowl. The dough slapped against the edge. 

And spilled over. 

Kermit stopped stirring. “Weird,” he muttered. 

Evan’s heart did a flip-flop up to his throat. “What’s weird?” he asked. 

“It grew,” Kermit replied, scratching his white-blond hair. “Look.” 

Kermit pointed to the yellow dough with the wooden spoon. It plopped up 
over the top of the bowl. 

“It—it’s growing really fast!” Kermit declared. 

Evan took a few steps closer. Andy leaned down to get a better look. 

The dough rose up, shimmering and quivering. 

“Wow!” Kermit cried. “It wasn’t supposed to do this! It was supposed to 
turn sticky and black!” 

Andy winked at Evan. Her brown eyes lit up excitedly. A smile spread 



across her face. 

The yellow blob quivered up over the top of the bowl, as big as a beach 

ball. 

How big was it going to get? 

“Oh, wow! This is awesome!” Kermit declared. 

The dough shimmered higher. Wider. 

It rose up high over the bowl. It overflowed the sides. 

Bigger. Bigger. It started to look like an enormous hot air balloon. 

“It’s taller than me!” Kermit declared. His voice had changed. He didn’t 
sound excited now. He was beginning to sound frightened. 

“We’d better stop it, I think,” he murmured. 

“How?” Andy asked. She stepped out from behind the lab table and joined 
Evan on the other side. 

Andy grinned at Evan. She was enjoying the expression of fear on Kermit’s 
face. Evan had to admit he enjoyed it, too. 

The ball of yellow dough shimmered and shook, growing bigger every 
second. It bubbled up faster and faster, pressing Kermit back against the 
basement wall. 

“Hey—help!” he sputtered. 

Andy’s grin grew wider. “He’s terrified now,” she whispered to Evan. 

Evan nodded. He knew he was supposed to enjoy this. It was supposed to 
be sweet revenge. 

But Evan was terrified, too. 

How much bigger would the huge yellow blob grow? Could they stop it? 
Or would it grow and grow and grow until it filled the entire basement? 

“Evan—help me!” Kermit cried. “I’m trapped back here!” 

The dough began to shake harder. It bobbed up against the basement 
ceiling. 

Evan glanced down and realized he was still holding a chunk of candy bar 
in his hand. The chocolate had started to melt. 

Evan started to pop the candy into his mouth—just as the giant dough ball 
exploded with a deafening roar. 



15 


“ULP!” 

Evan swallowed hard as the doughy goop exploded. The force of the blast 
sent the candy chunk flying down his throat. 

He started to cough and choke. 

With a hard splat, globs of sticky dough hit him in the face. The yellow goo 
spread over his hair and covered his eyes. 

“Hey!” Evan choked out. He frantically wiped the dough from his eyes, 
blinking hard. 

He could taste it on his tongue. “Yuck!” He spit it out and rubbed the sticky 
stuff off his lips. Then he pulled thick wads of goo off his face. 

“It’s stuck to my hair!” Andy wailed. 

“Help me! Help me!” Kermit’s cries sounded as if they were coming from 
far away. Evan quickly saw why. Kermit was buried under a big heap of yellow 
goop. 

Pulling dough from his hair, Evan hurried behind the lab table. He reached 
down with both hands and tugged Kermit up from under the dough. 

“Wow. I’m kind of dizzy!” Kermit cried. He leaned heavily against the lab 
table. His hands slid in the yellow goo that covered the table. 

“Til never get it out of my hair!” Andy wailed, tugging at her hair with both 
hands. “Never!” She turned to Evan. “It wasn’t supposed to explode. Just get 
big. I guess something in the dough made it blow up.” 

Wiping dough off the front of his T-shirt, Evan gazed around the basement. 
The yellow dough had splattered over everything. Now it dripped down the 
walls, making soft plopping sounds as it hit the floor. 

“That was an awesome explosion!” Kermit declared. His eyeglasses were 
covered with yellow goop. He pulled them off and squinted around the room. 

He turned to Andy. “Did you put something in the bowl?” 

“Never mind,” Andy replied, still pulling sticky yellow globs from her hair. 

Kermit tugged her arm. “What was it? What did you put in my mixture?” 

“Why do you want to know?” Andy demanded. 

“So we can do that again!” Kermit declared gleefully. “It was so awesome !” 

“No way we’re doing it again!” Evan moaned. 



Their revenge on Kermit hadn’t exactly worked out, Evan realized bitterly. 
Kermit should be in tears by now. Or he should be quivering in fear and terror. 

Instead, his eyes were dancing with excitement and he was grinning from 
ear to ear. 

We were total jerks! Evan thought sadly. Kermit is loving this! 

Kermit pulled out a cloth and cleaned his glasses. “What a mess!” he 
declared, gazing around the room. “Evan, you’re going to be in major trouble 
when Mom gets home.” 

Evan swallowed hard. He had forgotten about Kermit’s mom. 

She had given him one last chance to prove that he was a good baby-sitter. 

Now she was going to come home to a basement splattered with sticky 
yellow goop from floor to ceiling. And Kermit was sure to tell her the whole 
thing was Evan’s fault. 

Aunt Dee will tell everyone in the world why she had to take the job away 
from me, Evan thought unhappily. And I’ll never get another baby-sitting job as 
long as I live. 

Bye-bye, Walkman, he thought grimly. No way he’d ever earn the money 
for one now. 

“This is your fault!” he snapped at Andy, pointing an accusing finger at her. 
A spot of yellow dough stuck to his fingernail. 

“My fault?” Andy shrieked. “You’re the one who wanted to teach Kermit a 
lesson!” 

“But you ’re the one who wanted to use the Monster Blood!” Evan cried. 

“Look at my hair!” Andy wailed. “It’s solid goop! It looks like I’m wearing 
a helmet! It’s ruined! Ruined!” She uttered an angry growl. 

Kermit giggled. He bent down and picked up a chunk of the sticky yellow 
dough. “Think fast!” he shouted—and heaved it at Evan. 

The dough ball hit the front of Evan’s T-shirt and stuck there. “Stop it, 
Kermit!” he shouted angrily. 

“Let’s have a dough fight!” Kermit suggested, grinning. He scooped up 
another handful of the stuff. 

“No! No way! Stop it!” Evan cried. He pulled the dough ball off his T-shirt. 
“This is dangerous! We’ve got to clean this up!” 

Kermit flung another big chunk of yellow goo at Evan. 

Evan tried to dodge out of the way. But his sneakers slipped on a big, slimy 
puddle of goop, and he hit the floor hard. He landed on his side with a loud 



“OOF!” 

Kermit let out a gleeful laugh. “That was awesome!” he declared. “What a 
shot!” 

Andy hurried over and helped tug Evan to his feet. “Maybe we can vacuum 
it all up,” she suggested. She turned to Kermit. “Where does your mom keep the 
vacuum cleaner?” 

Kermit shrugged. “Beats me.” 

Evan leaned against the lab table. His hand rested in a puddle of dough, but 
he didn’t care. 

He suddenly felt strange. 

His entire body started to tingle. His stomach felt queasy. He shut his eyes, 
trying to force the strange feeling away. 

But the tingling grew stronger. 

He heard a shrill whistling sound in his ears. His muscles started to ache. 
He could feel the blood throbbing at his temples. 

“Maybe we can mop it up,” Evan heard Andy say. But her voice sounded 
tiny and far away. 

He turned to see her pick up a mop and bucket from against the basement 

wall. 

That bucket is too tiny, Evan thought. Why does Andy want to use such a 
tiny mop? 

The room tilted—to the right, then to the left. 

Evan blinked hard, trying to straighten everything out. 

His whole body buzzed, as if an electrical current were shooting through 
him. He shut his eyes and pressed both hands against his throbbing temples. 

“Evan—aren’t you going to help me?” Andy’s voice sounded so faint, so 
far away. “Evan—?” he heard her call. “Evan—?” 

When he opened his eyes, he saw that Andy and Kermit were staring up at 
him. Their expressions had changed. Their eyes bulged in fright and surprise. 
Their mouths were wide open. 

“What’s going on?” Evan demanded. His voice boomed through the 
basement, echoing off the concrete walls. 

Andy and Kermit stared up at him. The tiny mop fell out of Andy’s hand 
and clattered to the floor. 

Such a tiny mop, Evan thought again, staring down at it. Such a tiny bucket. 

And then he realized that Andy and Kermit were tiny, too. 



“Oh!” A cry of surprise escaped Evan’s throat. 

Everyone is so small. Everything is so tiny. 

It took Evan a long time to figure out what had happened. 

But when it finally dawned on him, he let out a shriek of horror. 

“Oh, no! No!” he moaned. “I’m growing ! I’m growing bigger and bigger!” 



16 


Evan lowered his eyes to the floor. It seemed so far below. 

“My—my legs—” he stammered. 

Andy and Kermit still hadn’t said a word. They stared up at him, their faces 
twisted in surprise. 

Evan swallowed hard. “What’s going on?” he cried. His voice boomed 
through the small room. “I must be eight feet tall!” 

“You—you’re a giant]” Kermit declared. He stepped forward and grabbed 
on to Evan’s knee. “Me, too! Okay? Okay, Evan? Make me a giant, too!” he 
begged. 

“Give me a break,” Evan muttered. He picked up Kermit easily and set him 
down on top of the lab table. 

Then Evan turned to Andy. “What am I going to do? This is terrible!” 

“Not so loud!” Andy pleaded, covering her ears with her hands. “Please, 
Evan—try to whisper or something, okay?” 

“What am I going to do?” Evan repeated, ignoring her plea. 

Andy forced a smile. “Try out for basketball, I guess.” 

Evan balled his huge hands into huge fists. “I’m not in the mood for your 
sick sense of humor, Andy,” he snapped. 

His body started to tingle again. His muscles ached. 

I’m growing even bigger, he realized. 

Evan’s throat suddenly felt very dry. He realized his knees were shaking. 
They made a loud banging sound as they hit together. 

Don’t panic! he instructed himself. 

The first rule is—don’t panic. 

But why shouldn ’t he panic? His head was nearly pushing up against the 
basement ceiling. 

Kermit stood up on top of the lab table. His white high-tops were splattered 
with yellow dough. They looked like little doll shoes to Evan. 

“Make me a giant, too!” Kermit pleaded. “Why can’t I be a giant?” 

Evan stared down at his cousin. Kermit really did look like a little white 


mouse now. 



Evan’s body tingled harder. The room tilted and swayed again. “This is 
your fault, Andy!” he shouted. 

Andy shrank back against the wall. “Huh? My fault?” 

“You and your Monster Blood!” Evan thundered. “I—I swallowed some!” 

Andy stared up at him. “How?” 

“When Kermit’s mixture exploded,” Evan replied. “I was putting the candy 
bar in my mouth. The dough exploded. I started to choke. The dough hit me in 
the face. I remember I tasted it. It was on my lips. And—and—” 

“And it had Monster Blood in it!” Andy finished his sentence for him. Her 
face filled with horror. “Oh, Evan. I’m sorry. I really am.” 

But then her face brightened. “The Monster Blood splashed on your 
clothes, too. That was lucky. They’re growing with you.” 

Evan let out an exasperated sigh. “Lucky?” he cried. “You call this lucky? 
What if I keep growing and never stop?” 

Kermit remained standing on the lab table. He stared up at Evan. “You 
mean if I eat some of the dough, I’ll turn into a giant, too?” He bent down and 
scooped up a handful of dough. 

“Don’t you dare!” Evan screamed. He leaned over and flicked the dough 
out of Kermit’s hand with two fingers. Then he hovered over Kermit, glaring at 
him menacingly. “I can squash you, Kermit. I really can,” Evan warned. 

“Okay, okay,” Kermit muttered, his voice trembling. He slid off the table 
and stepped behind Andy. 

Wow, Evan thought, I actually have Kermit afraid of me! That’s a first. 
Maybe growing so big isn’t all bad! 

His body tingled and vibrated. The whistling in his ears grew louder. He 
could feel himself grow some more. 

He turned to see Dogface pad into the room. The big sheepdog looked like 
a tiny poodle. 

The dog hiccupped. It sniffed at a yellow puddle of dough on the floor. 

“No!” Evan cried. “Don’t eat that! Dogface—no!” 

He bent over and picked up the sheepdog. 

Seeing a giant human lift him up easily off the floor, Dogface let out a yelp 
of terror. All four legs thrashed the air as the frightened dog struggled to break 
free. 

But Evan cradled the sheepdog in one arm and held on to him tightly. 

When he realized he couldn’t escape from the giant, the dog’s terrified 



yelps turned to quiet whimpers. 

“Take Dogface out of here. Lock him outside,” Evan ordered Kermit. He 
lowered the whimpering dog to the floor. 

Kermit obediently led the dog away. Halfway to the stairs, he turned back to 
Evan. “Hey, you cured Dogface’s hiccups!” 

I guess I scared them out of him! Evan told himself. 

Kermit led Dogface up the stairs. Evan turned to Andy. “I told you to leave 
the Monster Blood in the closet!” he cried. “Now look at me!” 

He had to duck his head. Otherwise it would brush against the ceiling. 

“Who told you to eat the stuff?” Andy replied. “Why did you have to be 
eating that candy bar?” 

“It was part of the plan—remember?” Evan snapped angrily. He uttered a 
bitter sigh. “Great plan we had!” 

“I guess it didn’t work out too well,” Andy admitted. 

“I guess it didn’t,” Evan muttered. “Now what will happen to me? What 
will Mom and Dad say?” 

“What will you eat?” Andy added. “You’ll probably have to eat sixteen 
meals a day! And where will you sleep? And how can you go to school? There 
aren’t any desks big enough for you. And what will you wear? They’ll have to 
make your T-shirts out of bedsheets!” 

“You’re not cheering me up,” Evan murmured glumly. 

He felt his body tingle. Again, he could feel his skin stretching, feel all of 
his muscles throb. 

“Ow!” he cried out as the top of his head banged against the ceiling. 

He had to lean over to rub his head. 

“Evan—you’re growing!” Andy exclaimed. 

“I know. I know,” Evan grumbled. The basement ceiling was at least nine 
feet high. Evan had to stoop to keep from banging the ceiling. That meant he 
was more than nine feet tall. 

A shiver of fear shook his body. He glanced around the basement. “I have to 
get out of here!” he cried. 

Kermit returned to the room. He stopped and gawked at Evan. “You grew 
even more!” he cried. “I’ll bet you weigh three hundred pounds!” 

“I don’t have time to weigh myself,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “I have 
to get out of here. I’m so big, I can’t stand up. I’m so big, I—” 

He stopped. He felt himself grow a little more. 



“I’m too big now!” he cried. “I’m trapped down here! There’s no way I can 
get out!” 



17 


“Stay calm,” Andy called up to him. 

“Calm? How can I stay calm?” Evan shrieked. “I’m going to spend the rest 
of my life in this basement! I’m too big for the stairs!” 

“Mom won’t like that,” Kermit said, shaking his head. 

“Try the stairs!” Andy cried. “Maybe you can squeeze up if you hurry!” 

Evan turned to the basement stairs. “I—I don’t think I’ll fit,” he stammered. 
The stairway appeared very narrow. And Evan was now very wide. 

“Come on,” Andy urged. “We’ll help you.” 

“You push and I’ll pull,” Kermit said, running to the stairs. 

Evan lumbered toward the stairs. His sneakers thudded heavily on the tile 
floor. He stooped his shoulders to keep his head from crashing against the 
ceiling. 

“Try not to grow any bigger!” Andy called, following closely behind him. 

“Great advice!” Evan replied sarcastically. “Do you have any more advice 
like that?” 

“Don’t be nasty,” Andy scolded. “I’m only trying to help you.” 

“You’ve already helped me more than enough,” Evan grumbled. 

He felt his body start to tingle. His muscles started to throb. 

“No! Please—no!” He uttered a silent plea. I don’t want to grow any more! 

He sucked in a deep breath and held it. He shut his eyes tight and tried to 
concentrate—concentrate on not growing. 

“I think I just saw you grow another few inches,” Andy called to him. 
“You’d better hurry, Evan.” 

“How big is Evan going to get?” Kermit asked. He had climbed halfway up 
the stairs. “Is he going to get bigger than an elephant?” 

“That’s not helpful, Kermit,” Evan muttered unhappily. “Please stop asking 
questions like that—okay?” 

“If you get as big as an elephant, will you give me a ride?” Kermit 
demanded. 

Evan glared angrily at his cousin. “Do you know what elephants do to 
mice?” he bellowed. Evan raised one foot and brought it down with a crunching 
thud to demonstrate to Kermit what elephants do to mice. 



Kermit swallowed hard and didn’t say anything more. 

Evan walked over to the stairway. He glanced up the stairs. “I don’t think I 
can make it,” he told Andy. “I’m too big.” 

“Give it a try,” she urged. “You’ve got to, Evan.” 

Evan stepped on to the first step. Leaning low, he raised himself to the next 

step. 

“You’re doing it!” Kermit cried happily. He stayed at the top of the stairs, 
watching Evan’s progress eagerly. 

Evan took another step. The wooden stairs creaked under his weight. He 
tried to lean on the banister. But it snapped beneath his hand. 

He climbed two more steps. 

He was a third of the way up when he became stuck. 

His body was just too wide for the narrow stairway. 

Kermit pulled both of Evan’s hands. Andy pushed him from behind. 

But they couldn’t budge him. 

“I—I can’t move,” Evan stammered. He felt panic choke his throat. “I’m 
jammed tight in here. There’s no way I’ll ever get out!” 

Then he felt his body start to tingle. And he knew he was growing even 


more. 



18 


As Evan grew, he heard a cracking sound. 

Soft at first. Then louder. Very close by. 

He cried out as the wall to his left crumbled. His expanding body had 
broken the wall away. 

As the wall cracked and fell, Evan took a deep breath and lurched up the 
stairs. 

“Made it!” he cried as he squeezed through the doorway. 

A few seconds later, he burst out through the kitchen door, into the sunlit 
backyard. 

Dogface lay stretched out near the fence. The dog jumped to his feet as the 
gigantic Evan appeared. Frightened, Dogface gave a loud bark, his stubby tail 
wagging furiously, then turned and bolted from the yard. 

Kermit and Andy followed Evan into the backyard, cheering and shouting, 
“You made it! You’re free!” 

Evan turned to face them. “But now what?” he asked. “Now what do I do? 
I’m nearly as tall as the garage. How tall am I going to grow?” 

Kermit stepped closer to Evan. “Look—I’m standing in your shade!” he 
declared. 

Evan’s shadow fell across the yard like the shadow of a tree trunk. “Kermit, 
give me a break,” Evan muttered. “I have a little bit of a problem here, you 
know?” 

“Maybe we should get you to a doctor,” Andy suggested. 

“A doctor?” Evan cried. “What could a doctor do for me?” 

“Put you on a diet?” Andy joked. 

Evan leaned over her, squinting down at her menacingly. “Andy, I’m 
warning you. One more bad joke, and—” 

“Okay, okay.” Andy raised her hands as if trying to shield herself from him. 
“Sorry. Just trying to keep it light.” 

“Evan isn’t light. He’s heavy!” Kermit chimed in. His idea of a joke. 

Evan let out an unhappy growl. “I don’t think a doctor can help me. I mean, 
I couldn’t fit into a doctor’s office.” 

“But maybe if we brought the can of Monster Blood along, the doctor could 



figure out an antidote,” Andy suggested. “Some kind of cure.” 

Evan started to reply. But shrill voices on the other side of the tall wooden 
fence at the back of the yard made him stop. 

“Cut it out, Conan!” a girl pleaded. 

“Yeah. Leave us alone, Conan!” Evan heard a boy shout. 

Evan lumbered over to the fence and peered into Conan’s yard. He saw 
Conan Barber furiously swinging a baseball bat, swinging it hard, forcing a little 
boy and girl to back up against the fence. 

“Let us go!” the little girl screamed. “Why are you so mean?” 

Conan swung the bat, bringing it close to the boy and girl, making them cry 

out. 

Evan leaned over the fence. His broad shadow fell over Conan. “Want to 
play ball with me, Conan?” Evan thundered. 

The two little kids spun around. They stared up at the enormous Evan. It 
took them a long time to realize they were staring at a real, giant human. 

Then they began to scream. 

Conan’s mouth dropped open and a strangled gurgling sound escaped his 
throat. 

“Hey, Conan, how about a little batting practice?” Evan asked, his voice 
booming over the backyard. Evan reached over the fence and plucked the bat 
from Conan’s hand. 

The little boy and girl ran away screaming. They darted through the hedge 
at the side of Conan’s yard and kept running until they vanished from view. 

Evan took the bat and snapped it in two between his hands. It cracked apart 
like a toothpick. 

Conan froze in place, staring up at Evan in disbelief. He pointed a 
trembling finger. “Evan—you—you—you—” he stammered. 

Evan tossed the two pieces of the cracked bat at Conan’s feet, forcing 
Conan to hop out of the way. 

“You ate Monster Blood!” Conan accused. “That sticky green stuff. The 
stuff that Cuddles the hamster ate last year! You ate some—didn’t you!” 

Evan didn’t want to be reminded of Cuddles the hamster. The little creature 
had turned into a huge, vicious beast after eating Monster Blood. Cuddles had 
returned to hamster size only because the Monster Blood was old and stale. 

But the Monster Blood Evan had swallowed was new and fresh. 

Now I’m a huge, vicious beast, Evan thought sadly. 



“Are you crazy? Are you totally messed up? Why did you eat Monster 
Blood?” Conan demanded. 

“It was an accident,” Evan told him. 

Conan continued to stare up at Evan, but his fearful expression faded. 
Conan suddenly started to laugh. “I’m glad it happened to you and not me!” he 
exclaimed. 

“Huh? Why?” Evan demanded. 

“Because I’m afraid of heights!” Conan replied. He laughed again. “I 
always thought you were a nerd, Evan!” Conan declared. “But now you’re a BIG 
nerd!” 

Evan let out an angry growl and lurched forward. He tried to climb over the 
fence. But he didn’t step high enough. Conan’s fence splintered beneath Evan’s 
heavy sneaker. 

“Hey—!” Conan cried in alarm. 

He tried to turn and run, but Evan was too fast for him. 

Evan grabbed Conan under the shoulders and lifted him off the ground as if 
he weighed nothing. 

“Let go! Let go of me!” Conan screamed. He kicked his arms and legs like 
a baby. 

“I never knew you were afraid of heights,” Evan said. Holding Conan in 
both hands, he raised him high in the air. 

“Let me go! Let me go!” Conan cried. “What are you going to do?” 

“Let’s see if you know how to fly!” Evan exclaimed. 

“Noooooo!” Conan’s shrill cry rose up over the yard. He kicked and 
thrashed as Evan raised him even higher. “Put me down! Put me down!” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed. “I’ll put you down.” He set Conan down on a high 
tree branch. 

Conan clung to the trunk for dear life, trembling and crying. “Evan—don’t 
leave me up here! Please! I told you, I’m afraid of heights! Evan—come back! 
Evan!” 

A huge grin on his huge face, Evan turned away from Conan. “That was a 
lot of fun!” he called down to his friends. 

Conan continued to weep and wail up in the tree. Evan took a few steps 
toward the front yard. “That was excellent!” Evan said, still grinning. 
“Excellent!” 

“Where are you going?” he heard Andy call up to him. 



“Yeah! What are you going to do now?” Kermit asked eagerly. 

“This is kind of cool!” Evan declared. Having his revenge on Conan had 
put him in a better mood. “Let’s go see if we can have some more fun!” 

“Yaaaay!” Kermit cried, racing to keep up with Evan. 

Evan ducked his head to keep from banging it on a low tree branch. He took 
several big steps toward the street. 

“Oh!” He stopped and cried out when he felt himself step on something. He 
heard a cracking, then a crunch beneath his enormous sneaker. 

He turned to see Kermit raise both hands to his face. “Oh, no!” Kermit 
shrieked. “You squashed Andy! Evan—you squashed Andy!” 



19 


Evan gasped and jerked up his foot. 

Kermit let out a high-pitched laugh. “Gotcha, Evan!” 

Andy came running over from the driveway. “That wasn’t funny!” she 
scolded Kermit. “That was a really dumb joke, Kermit. You scared Evan to 
death.” 

“I know!” Kermit laughed, very pleased with himself. 

Evan let out a sigh of relief. He bent down to see what he had stepped on. 
Conan’s skateboard. It lay crushed and splintered, flat on the grass. 

He turned angrily to Kermit. “No more stupid jokes,” he thundered. “Or I’ll 
put you up in the tree with Conan.” 

“Okay. Okay,” Kermit mumbled. “You think you’re tough just because 
you’re so big.” 

Evan held up a pointer finger. “Careful, Kermit,” he warned. “I could knock 
you over with one finger.” 

“Conan is still yelling for help back there,” Andy reported. 

Evan smiled. “Let’s see who’s hanging out at the playground. Maybe we 
can surprise some other kids.” 

Evan crossed the street, taking long, heavy strides. He felt as if he were 
walking on stilts. This is kind of cool, he told himself. I’m the biggest person in 
the world! 

He passed by the neighbors’ basketball hoop, which stood on a pole at the 
curb. Hey—I’m at least six feet taller than the basket! he realized. 

“Hey—wait up!” Andy called breathlessly. “Don’t walk so fast!” 

“I can’t help it!” Evan called back. 

A small blue car rolled by, then squealed to a stop. Evan could see a woman 
and two kids in the car. They were all staring out at him. 

A little girl on a bike turned the corner. She started pedaling toward Evan. 
He saw the look of surprise on her face when she spotted him. 

She braked her bike hard, nearly toppling over the handlebars. Then she 
wheeled around and sped out of sight. 

Evan laughed. 

Another car screeched to a halt. 



As he started to cross another street, Evan turned to see who was in the car. 
He didn’t watch where he was going. 

A loud crunch made him stop. 

With a gasp, he peered down—and saw that he had stepped on a car. 

“Oh, no!” Evan cried. His sneaker had crushed in the top of the car—as if it 
were made of tinfoil. 

Evan backed away in horror. Was someone inside? 

He dropped to his knees to stare in the window. “Thank goodness!” he cried 
when he saw that the car was empty. 

“Wow!” Kermit exclaimed, walking around and around the smashed-in car. 
“You must weigh at least a ton, Evan!” 

Andy stepped up beside Evan, who remained on his knees. “Be careful,” 
she warned. “You’ve got to watch every step.” 

Evan nodded in agreement. “At least I think I’ve stopped growing,” he 
called down to her. 

As they reached the playground, Evan saw several kids shouting and 
pointing excitedly at a tall maple tree on the corner. 

What’s going on? Evan wondered. 

As he lumbered closer, he saw the problem. Their yellow kite had become 
stuck up in the tree. 

“Hey—no problem!” Evan boomed. 

The kids screamed and cried out in surprise as Evan stepped up to them. 
They all backed away, their faces tight with fear. 

Evan reached up easily and tugged the kite loose from the tree limb. Then 
he leaned down and gently handed it to the nearest kid. 

“Hey, thanks!” A grin spread across the kid’s freckled face. 

The other kids all cheered. Evan took a bow. 

Andy laughed. “You need a red cape and a pair of blue tights,” she shouted 
up to him. “It’s Super Evan!” 

“Super Evan!” the kids shouted as they ran off happily with their kite. 

Evan leaned down to talk to Andy. “If I stay big like this, do you think I 
really could get a job as a superhero?” 

“I don’t think it pays very well,” Kermit chimed in. “In the comic books, 
you never see those guys getting paid.” 

They crossed the street and headed toward the playground. Evan glanced at 
the redbrick school building on the corner. It’s so small, he thought. 



He suddenly realized that he stood at least two stories tall. If I walk over 
there, I can see into the second-floor classrooms, he thought. 

How will I go to school? Evan wondered. I can’t squeeze through the door. 
I won’t fit in Mrs. McGrady’s room anymore. 

Feeling a wave of sadness roll over him, he turned away from the school 
building. He heard cheers and shouts. A softball game was underway on the 
practice diamond. 

Evan recognized Billy Denver and Brian Johnson and some of the other 
kids. He always had to beg to play softball with them. They never wanted Evan 
on their team because he wasn’t a very good hitter. 

He strolled over the grass to the practice diamond. Andy and Kermit ran 
behind him, struggling to keep up. 

Brian was starting to pitch the ball. But he stopped short when he spotted 
Evan. The ball dropped from his hand and dribbled to the ground. 

Players on both teams gasped and shouted. 

Evan strode up to Brian on the pitcher’s mound. Brian’s eyes bulged in fear 
as Evan drew near. Brian raised his hands to shield himself. “Don’t hurt me!” he 
pleaded. 

“Hey—it’s Evan!” Billy exclaimed. “Look, guys! It’s Evan!” 

Kids from both teams gathered around, murmuring excitedly, nervously. 

Brian slowly lowered his hands and stared up at the giant Evan. “Wow! It 
really is you! Evan—how did you do that?” 

“What happened to you?” another kid cried. 

“He’s been working out!” Andy told them. 

The kids laughed. Very tense laughter. 

Andy always has a joke for everything, Evan thought. 

“Uh... want to play?” Brian asked. “You can be on my team.” 

“No. My team!” Billy insisted. 

“No way! He’s on my team!” Brian shouted. “We’re one man short, 
remember?” 

“Don’t say short around Evan!” Andy joked. 

Everyone laughed again. 

Billy and Brian continued to fight over which team would get Evan. Evan 
stood back and enjoyed the argument. He picked up a wooden bat. It had always 
seemed so heavy before. Now it felt as light as a pencil. 

Billy won the argument. “You can bat now, Evan,” he said, grinning up at 



him. 

“How can I pitch to him? He’s a giant!” Brian complained. 

“Pitch it really high,” Evan suggested. 

“Evan, do your mom and dad know you grew like this?” Billy asked, 
walking to home plate beside Evan. 

Evan swallowed hard. He hadn’t thought about his parents. They’d be 
getting home from work soon. They weren’t going to be happy about this. How 
would he break the news to them? he wondered. 

And then he thought: I won’t have to break the news to them. They’ll see 
for themselves what has happened! 

He stepped up to the plate and swung the bat onto his shoulder. “Wish we 
had a bigger bat,” he muttered. It was a little larger than a drinking straw. 

“Get a hit!” Billy shouted from behind the backstop. 

“Get a hit, Evan!” several other players called. 

Brian’s first pitch sailed past Evan’s ankles. 

“Higher!” Evan called out to him. “You’ll have to throw it higher.” 

“I’m trying!” Brian grumbled. He pulled the softball back and tossed it 
again. 

This time, the pitch flew past Evan’s knees. 

“It’s hard to throw that high,” Brian complained. “This isn’t fair.” 

“Strike him out, Brian!” the first baseman cried. “You can do it. Evan 
always strikes out!” 

It’s true, Evan thought unhappily. I do usually strike out. 

He gripped the little bat tighter, poising it over his shoulder. He suddenly 
wondered if being so big would make a difference. 

Maybe he’d just strike out bigger ! 

Brian’s next pitch sailed higher. Evan swung hard. The bat hit the softball 
with a deafening thwack —and cracked in two. 

The ball sailed up, up, up. Off the playground. Over the school. And out of 
sight, somewhere in the next block. 

Cheers and cries of amazement rang out over the diamond. 

Evan watched the ball fly out of sight. Then he leaped joyfully in the air 
and began running the bases. 

The longest home run in the history of the world! 

It took only four steps between bases. He had just rounded second base 
when he heard the sirens. 



Evan turned his eyes to the street in time to see two fire trucks squeal 
around the corner. The trucks pulled right up onto the playground grass and 
came roaring toward the softball diamond, sirens blaring. 

Evan stopped at third base. 

The sirens cut off as the two fire engines skidded to a halt along the first 
base line. 

Evan’s mouth dropped open as Conan Barber leaped out of the first truck. 
Several black-uniformed firefighters dropped to the ground behind Conan. 

“There he is!” Conan cried, pointing furiously at Evan. “That’s him! Get 
him!” 



20 


Grim-faced firefighters began hoisting heavy firehoses off the trucks. Others 
moved toward Evan, hatchets clutched menacingly in their hands. 

“That’s him!” Conan shrieked. “He’s the one who put me in the tree and 
wrecked my parents’ fence!” 

“Huh?” Still standing on third base, Evan froze in shock. 

Was this really happening? 

The playground rang out with shouts of surprise. But the voices were 
drowned out by more sirens. 

Evan saw flashing red lights. And then two black-and-white police cars 
roared over the grass, screeching up behind the fire engines. 

A man and woman came running behind the police cars. “That’s the one!” 
they called breathlessly, pointing at Evan. “That’s the one who crushed the car. 
We saw him do it!” 

The firefighters were busily connecting the hoses to hydrants at the curb. 
Blue-uniformed police swarmed on to the field. The kids on the two softball 
teams huddled together on the pitcher’s mound. They all seemed dazed and 
frightened. 

“He tried to kill me!” Conan was shouting to a woman police officer. “That 
giant put me in a tree and left me there!” 

“He crushed a car!” a woman screamed. 

Evan hadn’t moved from third base. He gazed past the fire engines to Andy 
and Kermit. They stood near the backstop. Kermit had the dumb, toothy grin on 
his face. 

Andy had her hands cupped around her mouth. She was shouting something 
to Evan. But he couldn’t hear her over the wail of sirens and the excited shouts 
and cries of everyone in the playground. 

Some of the police and fire officers huddled together, talking rapidly. They 
kept glancing up at Evan as they talked. 

What are they going to do to me? Evan wondered, frozen in fear. 

Should I run? Should I try to explain? 

More people came hurrying across the playground. As soon as they spotted 
Evan, their expressions turned to surprise and amazement. 



They’re all staring at me, Evan realized. They’re pointing at me as if I’m 
some kind of freak. 

I am some kind of freak! he admitted to himself. 

Firefighters formed a line, holding their hatchets waist-high. Others readied 
the firehoses, aiming them up at Evan’s chest. 

Evan heard more sirens. More police cars rolled on to the playground. 

A young police officer with wavy red hair and a red mustache stepped up to 
Evan. “What—is—your—name?” he shouted, speaking each word slowly, as if 
maybe Evan didn’t speak English. 

“Uh... Evan. Evan Ross,” Evan called down. 

“Do you come from another planet?” the officer shouted. 

“Huh?” Evan couldn’t help himself. He burst out laughing. 

He heard some of the softball players laughing, too. 

“I live in Atlanta,” he shouted down to the officer. “Around the corner. On 
Brookridge Drive.” 

Several officers and firefighters held their ears. Evan’s voice came out 
louder than he had planned. 

Evan took a step toward them. 

The firefighters raised a firehose. Several others readied their hatchets. 

“He’s dangerous!” Evan heard Conan shout. “Watch out! He’s really 
dangerous!” 

That got everyone shouting and screaming. 

The playground was filling with people. Neighborhood people. Kids and 
their parents. Cars stopped and people climbed out to see why the crowd had 
gathered. 

More police cars bumped over the grass. Their wailing sirens added to the 
deafening noise, the shouts and cries, the frightened murmurs. 

The noise. The staring eyes. The pointed fingers. 

It all started to make Evan dizzy. 

He felt his legs tremble. His forehead throbbed. 

The police had formed a line. They started to circle Evan. 

As they closed in, Evan felt himself explode. “I can’t take any more!” he 
screamed, raising his fists. “Stop it! Stop it! All of you! Get away! Leave me 
alone! I mean it!” 

Silence as the sirens cut off. The voices hushed. 

And then Evan heard the red-haired police officer shout to the others: “He’s 



turned violent. We have to bring him down!” 



21 


Evan didn’t have time to be frightened. 

The firehoses chugged and gurgled—then shot out thick streams of water. 

Evan ducked low. Dove forward. Tried to get away from the roaring water. 

The force of the water stream ripped the ground to his side. 

Evan dodged to the other side. 

Wow! That’s powerful! he thought, horrified. The water is strong enough to 
knock me over! 

Frightened shouts rose up over the roar of the water. 

Evan plunged through the line of dark-uniformed police officers—and kept 
mnning. “Don’t shoot!” he screamed. “Don’t shoot me! I’m not from another 
planet! I’m just a boy!” 

He didn’t know if they could hear him or not. 

He dodged past several startled onlookers. A long hook-and-ladder stood in 
his path. 

He stopped. Glanced back. 

Firefighters were turning the hoses. The powerful spray arced high. Water 
crashed to the ground just behind Evan, loud as thunder. 

Kids and parents were running in all directions, frantic, frightened 
expressions locked on their faces. 

Evan took a deep breath. Bent his knees. And leaped over the fire truck in 
his path. 

He heard shouts of surprise behind him. He vaulted high over the truck. 
Landed hard on the other side. Stumbled. Caught his balance. 

Then, ducking low, his arms stretched out in front of him, Evan ran. 

His long legs carried him away quickly. As he reached the street, a low tree 
branch popped up as if from nowhere. 

Evan dipped his head just in time. 

Leaves scratched over his forehead, but he kept running. 

Got to watch out for tree branches, he warned himself. Got to remember 
that I’m two stories tall. 

Breathing hard, he plunged across the street. The late afternoon sun was 



lowering behind the trees. The shadows were longer now, and darker. Evan’s 
shadow seemed a mile long as it stretched out in front of him. 

He heard the rise and fall of shrill sirens behind him. Heard angry shouts. 
Heard the thud of footsteps, people running after him. 

Where can I hide? he asked himself. Where will I be safe? 

Home? 

No. That’s the first place the police will look. 

Where? Where? 

It was so hard to think clearly. They were close behind him, he knew. 
Chasing him. Eager to bring him down. 

If only he could stop somewhere, close his eyes, shut them all out, and 
think. Then maybe he could come up with a plan. 

But he knew he had to keep running. 

His head throbbed. His chest ached. 

His long legs were taking him quickly away from the playground. But he 
still felt awkward, with his sneakers so far below him and his head so high in the 
trees. 

I’ll hide out at Kermit’s house, he thought. 

Then he quickly decided that was a bad idea, too. 

“I can’t get in Kermit’s house!” he cried out loud. “I’m too big!” 

And then he had a truly frightening thought: “I can’t fit in any house!” 

Where will I sleep? he wondered. And then: Will they let me sleep? 

Can’t the police see I’m just a boy? Evan asked himself bitterly. He turned 
the corner and ran past his house. The lights were all off. The door closed. No 
car in the driveway. 

His parents hadn’t come home from work. 

He kept running. Running across yards. Ducking low. Trying to hide behind 
shrubs and tall hedges. 

Can’t they see I’m a boy? Not a creature from another planet? 

Why do they think I’m so dangerous? 

It’s all Conan’s fault, Evan decided. Conan got the firefighters and police all 
crazy with his wild stories. 

His wild, true stories. 

And now where can I run? Where can I hide? 

The answer came to him as he neared Kermit’s house. Two doors down, a 
lot had been cleared. And an enormous stack of lumber had been piled at the 



back. Someone was about to build a house on the lot. 

Breathing hard, sweat pouring down his broad forehead, Evan turned and 
ran across the lot. He ducked behind the tall pile of lumber. And stopped. 

He dropped to his knees and leaned against the lumber stack, struggling to 
catch his breath. He wiped the sweat off his forehead with the sleeve of his T- 
shirt. 

Maybe I’ll hide here for a while, he thought. He lowered himself to a sitting 
position. 

If I sit down and hunch my shoulders, the lumber pile hides me from the 
street. And it’s shady and cool behind it. And I can keep an eye on Kermit’s 
house from here. 

Yes. This is a good hiding spot for now, Evan decided. Then, after dark, I’ll 
sneak over to my house and try to explain to my parents what happened. 

He leaned his back against the lumber pile and shut his eyes. 

He had just started to relax a little when he heard a voice cry: “Got him!” 



22 


Evan’s eyes shot open. 

He tried to scramble to his feet. 

But then he saw who had shouted. 

“Kermit!” he cried angrily. “You scared me to death!” 

Kermit flashed his annoying grin. “I knew you’d hide here, Evan,” he said, 
smirking. “I’m so smart.” 

Kermit turned and called out, “He’s back here! I was right!” 

A few seconds later, Andy gingerly poked her head behind the stack of 
lumber. Her eyes studied Evan for a few seconds. Then a smile crossed her face. 

“You’re okay?” she asked softly. “I was so worried—” 

“Yeah. I’m okay—for now,” Evan replied bitterly. 

“The whole town is after you!” Kermit exclaimed. “It’s really awesome! It’s 
like a movie!” 

“I don’t want to be in a movie!” Evan griped. “This movie is too scary.” 

“They’ve got guns and everything!” Kermit continued excitedly, ignoring 
Evan’s complaint. “And did you see those firehoses? It’s amazing! They all want 
to catch you!” 

“They think you’re an alien from outer space,” Andy added, shaking her 
head. 

“And who told them that? Conan?” Evan asked bitterly. 

“Conan made them believe you’re real dangerous,” Kermit said, grinning 
that grin Evan hated so much. 

“I am dangerous!” Evan declared. He growled menacingly at Kermit. 

The growl shocked the grin off Kermit’s face. 

Evan turned to Andy. “What am I going to do? I can’t run and hide for the 
rest of my life. They’re going to catch me. If you two tracked me down, the 
police will track me down, too.” 

Evan let out a long, frightened sigh. “There’s nowhere I can hide. I’m too 
big to hide! So what can I do? What?” 

Andy scratched her arm. She knotted up her face, thinking hard. “Well...” 

And suddenly Evan knew exactly what to do. 



Watching Andy, Evan knew how to solve the whole problem. 



23 


Evan jumped to his feet. His heart began to pound. For the first time in hours, a 
big smile spread across his face. 

“Evan—what’s wrong?” Andy demanded. His sudden move had startled 
her. 

“I know what we can do!” Evan declared. “Everything is going to be okay!” 

“Get down!” Kermit cried. “I hear sirens. They’ll see you.” 

In his excitement, Evan had forgotten that he was taller than the lumber 
pile. He dropped back to his knees. Even on his knees, he was a lot taller than 
Kermit and Andy. 

The sirens blared louder. Closer. 

Evan gazed around. The sun had fallen behind the trees. The sky was 
evening gray now. The air grew cooler. 

“We’ve got to hurry,” Evan told them. He put a hand on Kermit’s slender 
shoulder. “Kermit, you’ve got to help me.” 

Behind his glasses, Kermit’s little mouse eyes bulged with excitement. 
“Me? What can I do?” 

“The blue mixture,” Evan said, holding on to his cousin’s shoulder. 
“Remember the blue mixture?” 

“Wh-which one?” Kermit stammered. 

“The one that shrank my mosquito bite!” Andy chimed in. She suddenly 
realized what Evan was thinking. 

“That’s right,” Evan explained to Kermit. “Watching Andy scratch her arm 
reminded me. That blue mixture of yours shrank the mosquito bite instantly.” 

“Maybe it can shrink Evan, too!” Andy exclaimed excitedly. 

Kermit nodded, thinking hard. “Yeah. Maybe it can.” 

“I’ll rub it all over my body, and I’ll shrink back to my normal size,” Evan 
said happily. 

“It’ll work! I know it will!” Andy cried enthusiastically. She let out a cheer 
and jumped up and down. Then she tugged Kermit’s arm. “Come on, Kermit. 
Hurry! Let’s get to your basement. You still have the blue mixture, don’t you?” 

Kermit narrowed his eyes, trying to remember. “I think so,” he told them. 
“A lot of stuff got wrecked, remember? But I think I have it.” 



“He has to have it!” Evan cried. “He has to!” 

Evan climbed to his feet. “Come on. Hurry.” 

They heard sirens. Loud and near. 

Kermit peered around the lumber pile toward the street. “A police car!” he 
whispered. “They’re cruising this block.” 

“You’d better wait here,” Andy warned Evan. 

Evan shook his head. “No way. I’m coming with you. I want to get that blue 
mixture as fast as I can.” 

He ducked his head. “We can walk through the backyards. No one will see 

us.” 

“But, Evan—” Andy started to protest. 

She stopped when Evan stepped away from the lumber pile and started 
loping quickly across the backyard toward Kermit’s house. 

Dogface greeted them in the driveway. The sheepdog barked happily, 
jumping up on Kermit, nearly knocking him to the ground. 

“Shhh. Quiet, boy! Quiet!” Kermit cried, petting the dog, trying to stop his 
barks. “We don’t want anyone to hear us.” 

Dogface gazed up at Evan—and got very quiet. The dog slumped across the 
driveway. It stared up suspiciously at Evan, panting hard, its stubby tail wagging 
furiously. 

Evan’s eyes darted up and down the driveway. No car. “Your mom isn’t 
home yet, Kermit,” he said. 

“She must be working late,” Kermit replied. “That’s good news. This is our 
lucky day!” 

Evan let out a bitter laugh. “For sure. Lucky day,” he muttered. 

Kermit and Andy hurried to the kitchen door. Evan started to follow. Then 
he remembered he didn’t fit in the house. 

“Wait right there,” Andy instructed him. “Make sure no one sees you.” 

Evan nodded. “Hurry—please!” 

He watched them disappear through the door. Then he sat down behind the 
house. He motioned for Dogface to come over to him. He felt like holding on to 
something. 

But the big dog just stared back and wouldn’t budge. 

The whole town is looking for me, Evan thought unhappily. The whole 
town is looking for a giant me. But they’ll never find the giant me. Because in a 
few seconds, I’ll shrink back to normal size. 



Then everything will be okay again. 

He raised his eyes to the house. What is keeping Andy and Kermit? he 
wondered. Can’t they find the bottle of blue liquid? 

He took a deep breath. Don’t panic, Evan, he instructed himself. They’ve 
only been in the house a few seconds. They’ll be out soon. And everything will 
be okay. 

To pass the time, he counted slowly to ten. Then he counted slowly to ten 
again. 

He was about to start counting one more time when the screen door flew 
open. Kermit stepped out, carrying the blue beaker. Andy followed right behind. 

“Found it!” Kermit cried happily. 

Evan jumped to his knees. He reached out eagerly. “Quick—let me have it.” 

Kermit stretched up his hand. Evan grabbed for the glass beaker. 

It slipped out of his grasp. 

It started to fall. 

“Ohhh!” Evan let out a horrified moan—and caught the beaker just before it 
crashed against the driveway. 

“Wow! Nice catch!” Kermit exclaimed. 

Evan’s heart had leaped to his mouth. He took a deep breath. He grasped 
the beaker tightly in his hand. “Close one,” he murmured. The beaker was so 
tiny in his hand, like something made for a dollhouse. 

They heard sirens in the distance. 

The search for the giant Evan was still on. 

“I—I hope this mixture works,” Evan declared. 

He raised the beaker. Tilted it upside down over his other hand. Waited. 

And waited. 

Finally, a tiny blue drop of liquid dripped on to Evan’s palm. 

Nothing more. 

He shook the beaker. Hard. Harder. The way he shook a ketchup bottle 
when the ketchup stuck. 

Then he raised the beaker to his eye and peered inside. 

A few seconds later, he let out a long, sad sigh. He tossed the bottle 
disgustedly onto the grass. “It’s empty,” Evan reported. “Totally empty.” 



24 


“I knew there wasn’t much left,” Kermit murmured, shaking his head. 

The empty bottle rolled under a shrub. Dogface walked over and sniffed it. 

“I’m doomed,” Evan muttered. Forgetting how strong he was, he angrily 
kicked a pebble down the driveway. The pebble sailed up into the air and 
disappeared over the house across the street. 

“Be careful,” Andy warned. “You could break a window.” 

“Who cares?” Evan snapped. “My life is ruined.” 

“No way!” Kermit cried. “You’ll be okay, Evan.” He started running to the 
house. “Be right back!” 

“Kermit, where are you going?” Evan called glumly. 

“To mix up another batch!” Kermit replied. “It will only take me a few 
seconds, Evan. I’ve got all the ingredients.” 

Evan could feel his sadness lifting. “Do you really think you can do it?” he 
asked his cousin. 

“No problem,” Kermit replied, flashing Evan a thumbs-up sign. “I think I 
remember what I put in it. I’ll mix up more blue shrinking stuff and be back in a 
jiffy.” 

Kermit disappeared into the house. “I’m coming, too!” Andy called after 
him. She turned back to Evan. “I can try to clean up some of the lab while 
Kermit mixes the liquid. If Kermit’s mom gets home and sees the basement, 
you’ll be in big trouble.” 

Evan let out a weak laugh. “Big trouble. Very funny, Annnndrea. You’re a 

riot.” 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she shot back, ignoring his sarcasm. He watched 
her hurry into the house. 

Dogface got tired of sniffing the blue bottle. The sheepdog lumbered across 
the yard to inspect the fence that Evan had knocked down earlier. 

Evan sighed. I wonder if my own dog will recognize me now? he thought. 
Trigger, Evan’s cocker spaniel, had been the first to eat Monster Blood. The dog 
had grown bigger than a horse. 

I wonder if Trigger ever has nightmares about that? Evan asked himself. 

He knew he’d be having nightmares about today for a long time to come. 



He glanced at his watch. Almost dinnertime. His parents would be getting 
home soon. And Kermit’s mom would be pulling up the driveway at any minute. 

“Wow. She’ll be surprised when she sees me!” Evan exclaimed out loud. 

He turned to the house in time to see Kermit step out. He was carrying a 
fresh bottle of blue liquid. “See? No problem!” Kermit declared. 

Evan carefully took the bottle from Kermit’s hand. 

Andy walked over, her eyes raised to Evan’s. “Go ahead. Rub it all over,” 
she urged. “Hurry!” 

Evan carefully poured a puddle of blue liquid into his palm. Then he rubbed 
it onto his cheeks, his forehead, his neck. 

He poured more into his hand. He rubbed blue liquid onto his arms. Then 
he raised his T-shirt and rubbed some on his chest. 

Please let it work, he prayed silently. Please let it work. 

He turned to Andy and Kermit. “See any change?” 



25 


Andy’s mouth dropped open. 

Kermit’s eyes bulged, and he uttered a choking sound. 

“Well?” Evan demanded eagerly. “Do you see any change? Do you?” 

“Uh... well... uh...” Kermit sputtered. 

“You turned blue! ” Andy cried. 

“Excuse me?” Evan demanded. He knew he hadn’t heard her correctly. 

“Your skin—it’s bright blue!” Andy wailed, pressing her hands against her 
cheeks. 

“My—what?” Evan shrieked. “You mean—HIC!—” A powerful hiccup 
made his entire body shake. 

Evan stared down at his hands. 

“They—they’re blue!” he cried. “HIC!” 

Another hiccup burst from his open mouth. His enormous body shook as if 
struck by an earthquake. 

Frantically, he pulled up the T-shirt and stared at his stomach. His blue 
stomach. 

His arms. His chest. All blue. Bright blue. 

“HIC!” 

“I don’t believe it!” Evan screamed. “I’m bright blue, and—HIC!—I’ve got 
the hiccups!” 

He glared down furiously at Kermit. 

Kermit was so frightened, his legs trembled and his knees actually knocked 
together. “I—I can fix it,” he called up to Evan. “N-no problem! I just mixed it 
up wrong. I’ll be right back with another mixture.” 

He ran to the house. At the screen door, he turned back to Evan. “Don’t go 
anywhere—okay?” 

Evan let out a furious roar, interrupted by a deafening hiccup. “Where can I 
go?” he shrieked at the top of his lungs. “Where can I — HIC! — go?!” 

The door slammed behind Kermit. 

Evan let out another roar, clenching his blue fists and shaking his blue arms 
over his head. He paced back and forth on the driveway, hiccupping every few 



seconds. 

“Try to calm down a little,” Andy called up to him. “People will hear you.” 

“I—I—HIC!—can’t calm down!” Evan complained bitterly. “Look at me!” 

“But the neighbors will hear you. Or see you,” Andy warned. “They’ll call 
the police.” 

Evan replied with a hiccup that nearly knocked him off his feet. 

Kermit came running out of the house. He raised another bottle of blue 
liquid to Evan. “Here! Try this!” 

“HIC!” Evan declared. He grasped the bottle in his blue hand. 

Without saying another word, he turned the bottle upside down. With quick, 
frantic motions, he splashed the blue liquid all over him. Over his cheeks. His 
forehead. His hands and arms. His chest. 

He rolled up his jeans and rubbed the mixture onto his knees and legs. He 
pulled off his socks and sneakers and smoothed the blue liquid over his ankles 
and feet. 

“It’s got to work!” he cried. “This time, it’s got to!” 

Andy and Kermit stared up at him eagerly. 

They waited. 

Evan waited. 

Nothing happened. No change at all. 

Then Evan began to feel it. 

“Hey—I’m tingling!” he announced happily. 

He felt the same electric tingling he had felt before. The itchy feeling he 
had every time he was about to grow a little more. 

“Yes!” Evan cheered. “Yes!” 

The tingling grew sharper, stronger, as it spread over his entire body. 

“It’s working! I can—HIC!—feel it!” Evan shouted. “It’s really working! 
I’m tingling! I’m itching! I can feel it! It’s working!” 

“No, it isn’t,” Andy murmured quietly. 



26 


“Huh?” Evan narrowed his eyes at her. 

The tingling became a violent itch. He started to scratch. But pulled back 
his hand because his skin felt so strange. 

“It... didn’t... work....” Andy said sadly, her voice trembling. 

“Yuck! He looks so gross!” Kermit declared, making a disgusted face. 

“Huh? HIC!” Evan replied. 

He uttered a horrified gasp as he stared at his arms. “F-f-feathers!” he 
stammered in a high, shrill voice. 

He checked out his arms. His stomach. His legs. 

“Noooooo!” Along, low wail burst from his chest. 

His entire body was covered in fluffy white feathers. 

“Noooo—HIC! —oooooooo! ” 

“I’m sorry,” Kermit said, shaking his head. “I don’t know what I’m doing 
wrong. I thought I had the mixture right this time.” 

“You look like a big eagle,” Andy commented. “Except eagles aren’t blue.” 

“HIC!” Evan cried. 

“And eagles don’t get hiccups,” Andy added. She gazed up at him with 
concern. “Poor Evan. That must itch like crazy. You’re having a real bad day.” 

Evan frantically scratched his feathery chest. “It can’t get any worse than 
this,” he muttered. 

And then he saw a police car pull up in front of the house. 



27 


“HIC!” Evan cried. He backed off the driveway and crouched low against the 
back wall of the house. “The police!” he whispered. 

His throat tightened in panic. His feathers all stood up on end. 

What should I do? he asked himself, pressed against the house, ducking his 
head. Should I run? Should I give myself up? 

“One more try!” Kermit cried, leaping into the house. “Let me try one more 
mixture. I think I can get it this time!” 

The door slammed behind him. 

“Hurry!” Andy called from the driveway. “The police—they’re climbing 
out of their car.” 

“How many are there?” Evan whispered. His feathers itched, but he was too 
frightened to scratch. 

“Two,” Andy replied, staring through the gray evening light to the street. 
“They look kind of mean.” 

A sudden cool gust of wind ruffled Evan’s feathers. His huge body 
trembled. 

“They’re walking up the driveway,” Andy reported. “They’re going to be 
here in a few seconds!” 

“I’d better make a run for it,” Evan declared. He took one step away from 
the house and nearly fell. It was hard to run when your feet were covered with 
stiff, prickly feathers. 

His entire body itched. He pressed himself against the house again. “I’m 
doomed,” he murmured to himself. 

“They stopped to check out the front door,” Andy told him. “You’ve still 
got a few seconds.” 

“Hurry, Kermit! Hurry!” Evan urged out loud. 

He turned to the kitchen door. No sign of Kermit. 

Would Kermit get the mixture right this time? Could he get the mixture to 
Evan before the two police officers entered the backyard? 

The screen door opened. Kermit burst out. He tripped on the back stoop. 
The blue bottle nearly went flying. 

He caught his balance. He handed the bottle up to Evan. “Good luck!” 



Kermit called up to Evan. Kermit raised both hands. He had his fingers tightly 
crossed on both hands. 

“Here come the police,” Andy warned. “They’re walking really fast now.” 

The bottle trembled in Evan’s hand. He turned it upside down. It puddled in 
his enormous, feathery palm. 

Frantically, he began rubbing it over his feathers, over his blue skin. 
Splashing it wildly. Pouring it over his body. 

Please work! he silently urged it. Please work! 

He waited. 

Kermit stared up at him hopefully, his fingers still crossed. 

“They’re here!” Andy reported from the driveway. 

Evan gulped. 

The mixture hadn’t worked. 

He hadn’t changed. Not a bit. 

The two dark-uniformed officers approached the back of the house. “Hello, 
there,” one of them called to Andy. 



28 


Evan heard a loud POP. 

He uttered a startled cry as he felt himself falling. Falling to the ground. 

He reached out a hand and steadied himself against the house. 

It took him a second or two to realize that he hadn’t fallen. He had shrunk. 

The two officers stepped into the backyard. One was very tall. The other 
was short and plump. “Sorry to bother you kids,” the tall one said. “But we got a 
call from a neighbor.” 

“A call? About what?” Andy demanded. She cast a surprised glance at 
Evan. She didn’t expect to see him back to normal. 

“Did you kids see a giant in the neighborhood?” the short officer asked. He 
narrowed his eyes at them, trying to appear tough. 

“A giant? What kind of giant?” Kermit asked innocently. 

“A giant kid,” the short officer replied. 

Evan, Andy, and Kermit shook their heads. “He didn’t come back here,” 
Andy told them. 

“No. We didn’t see him,” Evan said. He couldn’t keep a smile from 
crossing his face. His voice was back to normal, too. 

The tall officer pushed his cap back on his head. “Well, if you see him, be 
careful,” he warned. “He’s dangerous.” 

“He’s very dangerous,” the short officer added. “Call us right away— 
okay?” 

“Okay,” all three kids replied in unison. 

The officers gave the backyard one last look. Then they turned and headed 
back down the driveway to their car. 

As soon as they were gone, Evan burst into a long, happy cheer. Andy and 
Kermit joined in, clapping him joyfully on the back, slapping high fives all 
around. 

“Am I a genius or what?” Kermit demanded, grinning his toothy grin. 

“Or what!” Evan joked. 

They were still laughing and celebrating Evan’s return to Evan-size when 
Kermit’s mom pulled up the driveway. As she climbed out of her car, she 
appeared surprised to find them outdoors. 



“Sorry I’m so late,” she called. She hugged Kermit. “How was your 
afternoon?” 

Kermit glanced at Evan. Then he smiled at his mother. “Oh, it was kind of 
boring,” he told her. 

“Yeah. Kind of boring,” Andy repeated. 

“Kind of boring,” Evan agreed. 

Evan knew he’d have nightmares about what had happened to him. And that 
night, he had a really scary one. In the dream, he was a giant boy being chased 
by giant rats. The rats all looked like Kermit. 

Evan sat up in the dark, shivering all over. 

“Just a nightmare,” he murmured, glancing at his clock radio. Midnight. “It 
was just a nightmare.” 

He sat up straight, wiping sweat off his forehead with his pajama-top 
sleeve. I need a glass of cold water, he decided. 

He started to climb out of bed—but stopped when he saw what a steep drop 
it was to the floor. 

Huh? What’s going on? he asked himself. 

He tried to click on the bedtable lamp. But it towered high above him, way 
beyond his reach. 

He stood up on the bed. As his eyes adjusted to the dim light, he saw that 
his bed seemed to stretch on forever. A lump in the bedspread curled up over 
Evan’s head. 

I—I’m short! he realized. I’m as short as a mouse! 

Kermit! 

Kermit strikes again! Evan thought bitterly. 

He made the blue shrinking mixture too powerful. 

I shrank—and shrank—and shrank. And now I’m as tiny as a mouse. 

“I’ll pound Kermit! I really will!” Evan cried. His voice came out as tiny 
mouse squeaks. 

Standing on the edge of his bed, staring down, down—miles down—to the 
floor, Evan heard a rumbling sound. Loud panting that sounded like a strong 
wind through the trees. 

A big head popped up in front of him. Two dark eyes. 

“No! Trigger! Go back to sleep!” Evan pleaded in his little mouse voice. 
“No! Trigger—down!” 



Evan’s squeaks had awakened the cocker spaniel. 

Evan felt the dog’s hot breath blow across his face. 

“Yuck! Dog breath!” he squeaked. 

Then he felt sharp teeth close around his waist. Felt himself tilted sideways. 
Felt the hot, wet saliva of Trigger’s mouth as the dog secured Evan between its 
teeth. 

“Trigger—down! Put me down!” Evan begged. 

He was bounced hard now. The dog teeth tightened their grip. 

“Trigger! Put me down! Where are you taking me?” 

Through the dark hallway. The hot breath blowing over Evan’s helpless 
body. 

Into his parents’ room. Evan gazed up to see his mom and dad getting ready 
for bed. 

Mr. Ross leaned over the dog. “What have you got there, Trigger? Did you 
find a bone?” 

“Uh... Dad? Dad?” Evan squeaked up at him. “Dad? It’s me? Do you see 
me? Dad? Uh... I think we have a little problem!” 




IT CAME FROM 
BENEATH THE SINK! 

Goosebumps - 30 
R.L. Stine 

1 


Before my brother and I found the strange little creature under the sink, we were 
a normal happy family. In fact, I’d have to say we were very lucky. 

But our luck quickly changed when we pulled the creature from its dark 
hiding place. 

The sad, frightening story begins on the day we moved. 

“Here we are, kids.” Dad honked the horn happily as we rounded the corner 
onto Maple Lane and pulled up in front of our new house. “Ready for the big 
move, Kitty Kat?” 

My dad is the only one who can get away with calling me Kitty Kat. My 
real name is Katrina (ugh!) Merton, but only the teachers call me Katrina. To 
everyone else I’m simply Kat. 

“Definitely, Dad!” I shouted. I jumped out of the station wagon. 

“Rowf! Rowf!” Killer, our cocker spaniel, barked in agreement and 
followed me out onto the sidewalk. 

Daniel, my goofy little brother, is the one who named the dog. What a 
dumb name. Killer is afraid of everything. The only thing he kills is his rubber 
ball! 

Daniel and I had hiked past the new house plenty of times already. It’s only 
three blocks away from where we used to live, on East Main. 

But I still couldn’t believe we’d be living here. I mean, I always thought our 
old house was pretty great. But this place is awesome! 

Three stories high, sitting up on its own little hill, with butter-yellow 
shutters and at least a dozen windows. A wide porch wraps around the whole 
house. The front yard must be about the size of a football field. 

It’s not a house—it’s a mansion! 

Well, practically a mansion. Enormous—but not exactly fancy. What Mom 
calls “a comfortable old shoe kind of house.” 

Actually, today it really looked messy and old. A few of the shutters hung 
crookedly, the grass needed mowing, and the whole place seemed to be covered 
with an inch of dust. 

But as Mom said, “Nothing that can’t be taken care of with a good cleaning, 
a coat of paint, and a few bangs with the hammer.” 



Mom, Dad, and Daniel climbed out of the car, and we all stood staring 
excitedly at the house. Today, I’d finally get to see the inside! 

Mom pointed to the second floor. “See that big balcony?” she asked. 
“That’s the room where your father and I will sleep. The next room over is 
Daniel’s.” 

She gave my hand a little squeeze. “The little balcony—that’s outside your 
room, Kat.” She beamed. 

My very own private porch! I leaned over and gave Mom a big hug. “I love 
it already,” I whispered into her ear. 

Naturally, Daniel started whining immediately. He’s ten years old, but most 
of the time he acts as if he’s about two. 

“How come Kat’s room has a balcony—and mine doesn’t?” he complained. 
“It’s not fair! I want a balcony, too!” 

“Get a life, Daniel,” I muttered. “Mom, tell him to be quiet. Don’t I get 
something for being two years older?” 

Well, almost two years older. My birthday was in four days. 

“Quiet, kids,” Mom ordered. “Daniel, you don’t have a balcony. But you 
are getting something neat, too—bunk beds. So Carlo can sleep over whenever 
you want.” 

“Excellent!” Daniel shouted. Carlo is Daniel’s best friend. They’re always 
together—and always bugging me. 

Daniel is okay—most of the time. But he insists on being right. Dad calls 
him Mr. Know-It-All. 

And sometimes Dad calls Daniel the Human Tornado, because he runs 
around like a whirlwind and makes unbelievable messes. 

I’m a lot more like my Dad—sort of calm and quiet. Well, usually calm. 
And we both have the same favorite foods—lasagna, really sour garlic pickles, 
and mocha-chip ice-cream. 

I even look like my father, tall and thin with a lot of freckles and reddish 
hair. I usually wear my hair in a ponytail. Dad doesn’t have much hair to worry 
about. 

Daniel looks more like my mother. Straight, light brown hair that’s always 
falling in his eyes, and what Mom calls a “sturdy” build. (That means he’s 
chunky.) 

Today, Daniel was definitely in Human Tornado mode. He ran up onto the 
big green lawn and began spinning around in a circle. “It’s huge,” he shouted. 



“It’s gigantic. It’s... it’s... it’s super-house!” 

He collapsed in a heap on the grass. “And this is the super-yard! Hey, Kat, 
look at me—I’m Super-Daniel!” 

“You’re super-dumb,” I told him, messing up his hair with both hands. 

“Hey, quit it!” Daniel yelped. He pulled out his super-soaker gun and 
squirted the front of my T-shirt. “You’re captured,” he announced. “You are my 
prisoner!” 

“I don’t think so,” I replied, tugging on the water pistol. “Give up the gun!” 
I commanded. I pulled harder. “Let go!” 

“Okay!” Daniel grinned. He loosened his grip so suddenly that I staggered 
backwards—and fell on to the sidewalk. 

“What a klutz!” Daniel snickered. 

I knew how to get him. I zoomed up the porch steps. “Hey, Daniel,” I 
called, “I’m going to be first in the new house!” 

“No way!” he exclaimed, scrambling up off the lawn. He hurled himself at 
the steps and grabbed me by the ankle. “Me first! Me first!” 

That’s when Dad walked up the driveway, carrying an overstuffed 
cardboard box with Kitchen written on the side. Two moving men followed, 
hauling our big blue couch. 

“Hey, stop goofing around! Mom and I really need your help today. That’s 
why we allowed you to miss a school day,” he called. “Daniel, walk Killer—and 
make sure he has food and water. Kat, keep an eye on Daniel. 

“And Kat, clean the inside of the kitchen cabinets, okay?” Dad added. 
“Mom wants to start putting the dishes and pots away.” 

“Sure, Dad,” I answered. I saw Daniel rummaging through a box on the 
lawn. The box was marked Cards and Comics. 

“Hey, where’s the dog?” I yelled to him. 

He shrugged. 

“Daniel!” I frowned. “I don’t see Killer anywhere. Where is he?” 

He dropped a stack of baseball cards. “Okay, okay, I’ll go find him,” he 
mumbled. He stood up and made his way to the driveway, calling the dog’s 
name. 

As soon as he disappeared around the side of the house, I hurried to the box 
marked Cards and Comics and checked through it. Sure enough, the little brat 
had stolen some of my comics. 

I tucked them under my arm and walked inside to the kitchen to clean out 



the cabinets. One quick glance made me groan. 

Cabinets filled just about every square inch of the big bright room! Sighing, 
I yanked paper towels and a bottle of cleaner out of the Cleaning Supplies box 
and started scrubbing. 

Spritz, rub, spritz, rub. 

This could take hours! 

After I finished a cabinet, I stepped back to admire my work. Then I knelt 
down in front of the cabinet under the sink. 

But something—a squeaky noise, like the sound of a footstep on an old 
wooden stair—made me stop short. 

What is that? I wondered, my heart beating faster. 

I slowly opened the cabinet. Tried to peek inside. 

I opened it a little wider. A little wider. 

I heard the noise again. 

My heart was pounding now. 

I opened the cabinet door another inch. 

And then it grabbed me. 

A dark, hairy claw. 

It wouldn’t let go. 

I screamed. 



2 


“Daniel! You scared me to death!” I screamed. I pounded him on the back. 

Laughing his head off, my brother yanked off the stupid rat costume he had 
insisted on packing. “You should have seen your face!” he cried. “Know what? 
I’m going to start calling you Scaredy-Kat!” 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” I replied, rolling my eyes. Did I mention that Daniel 
also thinks he’s the king of practical jokes? 

I suddenly remembered what my brother was supposed to be doing. “Dad 
asked you to find Killer. Where is he?” 

“I didn’t have to find him.” Daniel snickered. “He was never lost.” 

“What do you mean?” I demanded. 

“I stuck Killer in the basement,” he said proudly. “While you were hanging 
around on the porch, I ran in through the side door and hid under the sink.” 

“You really are a big rat!” I exclaimed. 

I heard a funny tap-tapping on the linoleum floor. “What’s that noise?” I 
asked. 

Daniel’s mouth dropped open. “Oh, no, it’s a real rat!” he shrieked. “Kat, 
look out! Move!” 

Without thinking, I jumped on to a kitchen chair as... Killer came trotting 
into the kitchen. 

Daniel let out a high-pitched laugh. “Twice on the same trick!” He was very 
pleased with himself. 

I dove at my brother, ready to tickle him. “Prepare to die laughing!” I 
yelled. 

“Stop! Help! No!” he gulped. “Kat, please. Stop, please. I... can’t... take... 
it!” 

“Give up?” I asked. 

Daniel nodded. “Yes!” he half-gasped, half-laughed. 

“All right,” I said generously. “You can get up now.” 

“Thanks!” he said. “Hey, what’s Killer doing over there?” 

“No way. I’m not falling for another one of your tricks,” I declared. 

But when I glanced over, the cocker spaniel did seem very interested in 
something inside the sink cabinet I’d left open. 



He pulled it out, then sniffed. Pushed it with his nose and gave a head¬ 
tossing growl. 

That’s weird, I thought. Killer never growls. 

“What do you have there, boy?” I called to him. 

The dog didn’t even look up. 

Sniff, sniff, sniff... growl. 

I leaned in for a closer view. 

“What is it, Kat?” Daniel asked. 

“Nothing much,” I answered casually. “Just an old sponge, I think.” 

Sniff, sniff, sniff... growl. 

It seemed perfectly ordinary—small, round, and light brown. A little bigger 
than an egg. 

But the sponge had Killer all excited and nervous. The dog danced around 
it, barking and growling. 

I snatched the sponge from him to get a better look. And my sweet dog tried 
to bite me! 

“Killer!” I yelled. “Bad boy!” 

He slunk to a corner. And with an embarrassed howl, he lay his head down 
sadly on his paws. 

I held the sponge up close to my face, to study it better. 

Whoa! Wait a minute! 

I suddenly understood Killer’s strange behavior. 

“Daniel—check it out!” I exclaimed. “Wow! I don’t BELIEVE this!” 



3 


“Huh? What is it, Kat?” Daniel cried. 

I stared in shock at the tiny sponge. 

“Maybe my eyes are playing tricks on me,” I muttered. “It’s totally weird!” 

“Come on, Kat,” Daniel insisted. “What is it?” 

I studied the sponge some more. “Wow!” I gasped. My eyes weren’t fooling 
me. 

The round sponge moved in my hand, gently and slowly, in and out, in and 
out in a lazy rhythm. 

As if it were breathing! 

But sponges don’t breathe. Do they? 

This one sure did! 

I could even hear its little breaths: Whoa-ahhh, whoa-ahhh. 

“Daniel! I don’t think this is just a sponge,” I stammered. “I think it’s 
alive!” I tossed it back into the sink cabinet. I admit it. I felt a little scared. 

My brother put his hands on his hips. “That’s a pretty lame joke,” he 
snickered. 

“But, Daniel—” I started. 

“You can’t get me with that one, Kat. It’s an old sponge,” he insisted, 
grinning. “A dirty old sponge that’s probably been here for a hundred years.” 

“All right, don’t believe me!” I exclaimed. “When I’m famous for 
discovering this thing, I won’t tell them you’re my brother.” 

Mom walked by, carrying an armload of winter coats. I knew that she 
would believe me. 

“Mom!” I yelled. “The sponge! It’s alive!” 

“That’s nice, dear,” she murmured. “Only a few more things to bring in. 
Now, where did I put that box of silverware?” 

My mother acted as if she didn’t even hear me! “Mom,” I started again, 
even louder this time. “The sponge! Under the sink! It’s breathing!” 

She ignored me and kept walking through the kitchen and right out the 
screen door into the backyard. 

Nobody cared about my amazing find. 



Except for Killer. He seemed really interested. 

Maybe too interested. 

Killer bent his neck down low, poked his head into the cabinet, gave the 
sponge a long stare—and growled, deep in his throat. 

Grrrr. Grrrr. 

Why was he growling again? 

Killer touched his wet nose to the sponge. He shoved it around, sniffing and 
sniffing. He gazed up at me for a moment, a puzzled expression on his dog face. 
Grrrr. Grrrr. 

Killer opened his mouth and grabbed the sponge in his teeth. 

“Hey, that’s not lunch!” I yelped, grabbing Killer by his collar and yanking 
him out from under the sink. “That could be a very important discovery.” 

I turned to my brother. 

“See, Daniel? Killer knows it’s alive,” I insisted. “Honest, it’s not a trick. 
Look closer—I promise that you’ll see it breathing.” 

Daniel smirked as if he didn’t believe me. But he poked his head into the 
cabinet. 

“Hey, whoa! You might be right,” he admitted. He pulled himself up to face 
me. “I think it is alive! And I also think... it’s mine!” 

With that, he dove under the sink to grab the sponge. 

“No way!” I protested. I grabbed the back of his T-shirt and hauled him out. 
“I saw it first. The sponge belongs to me!” 

He shook me off and dove back down again. “Finders, keepers!” he cried. 

I made another grab for him. 

But before I could touch him, Daniel uttered a bloodcurdling scream of 

pain! 



4 


“AAAAAIIIIIIII!” 

You could probably hear Daniel’s wail for blocks. 

That got Mom’s attention. She came banging through the screen door from 
the backyard. 

“What happened? Who screamed? What’s wrong? What’s going on?” Mom 
demanded. 

Daniel backed out from under the sink, holding his head. He squinted up at 
us. “I hit my head on the sink,” he wailed. “Kat pushed me!” 

Mom knelt down and put her arm around Daniel. “You poor thing,” she said 
soothingly. She patted his head softly. 

“I did not push him,” I declared. “I didn’t even touch him.” 

Daniel groaned and rubbed the side of his head. “It really hurts,” he 
complained. “I’ll probably have a huge bump there.” 

He glared at me. “You did it on purpose! And it’s not your sponge, anyway. 
It was in the house. So it belongs to all of us!” 

“It is so my sponge!” I insisted. “What’s your problem, Daniel? Why do 
you always want what’s mine?” 

“That’s enough!” Mom cried impatiently. “I can’t believe you’re fighting 
over a stupid sponge!” 

Mom turned to me. “Kat, you are supposed to be keeping an eye on your 
brother, aren’t you?” she demanded. “And, Daniel, don’t take things that aren’t 
yours.” 

She turned to leave the room. “Not one more word about a silly sponge! Or 
you’ll both be sorry!” 

As soon as Mom left the room, Daniel stuck out his tongue at me and 
crossed his eyes. “Thanks for getting me in trouble,” he grumbled. 

He stomped off, with Killer at his heels. 

Alone in the kitchen, I bent down, reached my hand under the sink, and 
picked up the sponge. 

“Everyone’s yelling and screaming around here,” I whispered to it. “You’re 
causing a lot of trouble—aren’t you?” 

I felt sort of dumb talking to a sponge. 



But it didn’t feel like a sponge. Not at all. 

It’s warm, I thought in surprise. Warm and damp. 

“Are you alive?” I asked the wrinkled little ball. 

I closed my hand around it softly—and the weirdest thing happened. The 
sponge started moving in my hand. 

Well, not exactly moving. 

Pulsing—slowly and gently. 

Ca-chunk. Ca-chunk. 

It moved like the plastic model heart we used in science class. 

Could I be feeling a heartbeat? 

I peered curiously at the thing. I ran my fingertips over the wrinkles that 
covered it, pushing back the folds of spongy, moist material. 

“Whoa!” I cried, startled. Two wet, black eyes stared out at me. 

I shuddered. “Yuck!” 

You aren’t a sponge at all, I thought. Sponges don’t have eyes, do they? 
What are you? 

I needed some answers. Quick. But who could I talk to? 

Not Mom. She didn’t want to hear about the sponge. 

“Dad! Dad!” I called out, dashing through the living room and dining room. 
“Where are you?” 

“Mmmmph,” he shouted. “Mmmmmpph.” 

“What?” I yelled, running through the house. “Oh, here you are.” 

Dad stood at the top of a ladder in the front hall. He had a hammer in one 
hand and a big roll of black electrician’s tape in the other. 

And a bunch of nails in his mouth. “Mmmmpph,” he mumbled. 

“Dad, what are you trying to say?” I asked. 

He spit the nails out. 

“Sorry,” Dad grumbled. “I’ve got to get this hall light working. These darn 
old wires.” 

He stared down at a pile of tools on the floor. “Kat, hand me those pliers. If 
this doesn’t do it, I’ll have to call an electrician.” 

Dad is great at getting flowers to bloom and grass to grow. But when it 
comes to handyman stuff, he messes up. A lot. 

One time, he tried to fix a fan—and knocked out the electricity all over the 
neighborhood. 

“Here, Dad.” I handed him the pliers and held up the sponge. 



“Check this out,” I urged. I stood on tiptoes so he could see the sponge up 
close. “I found it under the sink, and it’s warm and it has eyes and it’s alive. I 
can’t figure out what it is.” 

Dad peered out from under his baseball cap. “Let’s have a look at that,” he 
offered. 

I shoved the sponge up so he could reach it. 

He leaned down to grab the sponge from me. 

I didn’t see the ladder wobble. 

And I didn’t see it start to tilt over. 

I only saw Dad’s expression change. I saw his eyes go wide. And his mouth 
open in a startled scream. 

As he started to fall, he grabbed at the light in the ceiling for support. 

“Nooooooo!” 

The light came crashing down on his head. Dad sailed off the top of the 
ladder. He lay on the hall floor, perfectly still. “Mom! Mo-om! Mom!” I 
shrieked. “Come quick! It’s Dad!” 



5 


Mom, Daniel, and I huddled around Dad. His eyes fluttered open. He blinked. 

“Huh?” he murmured. “What happened?” 

Dad shook his head and pushed himself up onto his elbows. “I think I’m 
okay, guys,” he said shakily. 

Dad tried to stand up. But he collapsed to the floor. “My ankle. I think it 
may be broken.” He groaned in pain. 

With me on one side and Mom on the other, we helped Dad to the couch. 
“Oof, that really hurts,” he moaned. He rubbed the ankle tenderly. 

“Daniel, go put some ice into a towel for your father,” Mom instructed. 
“Kat, get him a cold drink.” 

“Now, honey,” Mom whispered, wiping Dad’s brow, “tell me what 
happened.” 

When I came running back into the living room with a tall glass of ice 
water, Mom and Dad had the weirdest expressions on their faces. 

“Kat,” said Mom angrily, “did you push your father?” 

“Why did you push the ladder?” Dad asked, rubbing his ankle. 

“Huh? Excuse me?” I spluttered. “I didn’t push you! I wouldn’t!” 

“We’ll discuss this later, young lady,” Mom said sternly. “For now, I’ve got 
to take care of your father.” 

She leaned over and applied the ice pack to Dad’s swelling ankle. 

I felt a hot red flush of embarrassment creep over my face. How could Dad 
think I pushed him? 

I lowered my eyes and realized I still held the sponge. 

And I realized something else. Something strange and scary. 

Instead of pulsing gently, the sponge throbbed in my hand. Throbbed 
wildly. 

Ba-boom, ba-boom, ba-boom. 

Vibrating—as if someone had turned a blender to high speed. The sponge 
practically purred with excitement. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

I sat down on the hall floor, feeling shaky. 



What’s going on here? I wondered. Daniel thought I pushed him. And then 
Dad said the same thing. 

They both think I pushed them. Why? 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. Ba-boom. The sponge throbbed warmly in my hand. 

I shivered with fear. Suddenly, the sponge seemed kind of scary. I didn’t 
want the thing anywhere near me—or my family. 

I ran outside. I found a big metal garbage can near the garage. I lifted the 
lid. Dropped the sponge inside. Pushed the lid shut firmly. 

Back inside the house, Mom called me into the living room. “I think Dad’s 
ankle is only sprained,” she said. “Now, tell me what happened.” 

Thursday, I sat at my desk, writing down the names of guests for my birthday 
party. The big day was only two days away. 

I had to give the list to Mom today, so she could buy enough favors by 
Saturday. 

I heard Daniel babbling away to Carlo as the two boys clambered noisily up 
the stairs. 

“Check it out—it looks like an old sponge. But it’s alive!” Daniel 
explained. “I bet it’s a prehistoric creature, like a dinosaur or something.” 

I jumped up and ran out of my room. 

“Hey!” I yelled at Daniel. “What are you doing with that?” I pointed at the 
sponge in his hands. “I threw that thing away.” 

“I found it in the garbage can,” Daniel replied. “It’s too cool to throw away. 
Right, Carlo?” 

Carlo shrugged, his shaggy black hair touching his shoulders. “It looks like 
an old sponge. What’s the big deal?” 

“It’s a very big deal,” I shot back. “And that thing is definitely not a 
sponge.” 

I pulled a large book from my new bookcase. “I checked the encyclopedia,” 
I explained. “Under sponges. You should have left it in the trash, Daniel. You 
really should have.” 

“What did the encyclopedia say?” Daniel asked eagerly, plopping down on 
my bed. He held the sponge between his hands. 

“It said that sponges do not have eyes,” I replied. “And they can live only in 
the water. If they’re out of the water for more than thirty minutes, they die.” 

“See, Carlo? It’s not a sponge,” Daniel declared. “Our creature has eyes. It’s 



been out of water since we found it.” 

“Well, I don’t see any eyes. And it sure doesn’t look alive to me,” said 
Carlo doubtfully. 

Daniel leaped off the bed and offered his friend the sponge. “Hold it. You’ll 

see.” 

Carlo carefully cradled the sponge in his hands. His big brown eyes grew 
wide. “It’s warm! And... and... it’s moving. It’s squirming! It is alive.” 

Carlo spun around to face me. “But if it’s not a sponge, then... then, what is 

it?” 

“I haven’t figured that out yet,” I admitted. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of a super-sponge,” Daniel offered. “So powerful 
that it can live on land.” 

“It could be part sponge and part another animal,” added Carlo, gazing at it. 
“Can I take it home for a while? It’ll really spook Sandy.” 

Sandy is Carlo’s baby-sitter. “I’ll bring it right back,” Carlo promised. 

“No way, Carlo,” I said quickly. “I think I’ll keep the sponge right here until 
I know exactly what it is. Here—stick it in this old gerbil cage.” 

“Aw, come on,” Carlo begged, petting the sponge on the top of its wrinkled 
head. “See? It likes me.” 

“No way!” I replied. “Daniel, tell your friend to quit bugging me.” 

“Okay, okay,” Carlo muttered. “Hey, what does this little guy eat, anyway?” 
“I don’t know,” I replied. “But it seems to be fine without eating. Put it in 
the cage.” 

Carlo reached into the gerbil cage and set the creature down. As he did, his 
face filled with horror. 

I saw his arm tremble. 

Then he let out a terrified scream. 

“Aaagh! My hand! It ate my hand!” 



6 


“Noooo!” I shrieked. 

His mouth twisted in horror, Carlo yanked his arm from the gerbil cage— 
and shoved it in my face. 

“Oh!” I gasped. 

Carlo wiggled his hand in my face and began to laugh. His hand was 
perfectly okay. 

“You are horrible!” I yelled. “That is so completely not funny. It’s sick!” 

Carlo and Daniel collapsed with laughter. 

“Excellent joke!” Daniel grinned. “Hey, Carlo. Give me a... hand! Haw, 
haw, haw.” 

He and Carlo slapped each other high fives. “Way to go, dude!” Daniel 
cried. 

I glared at the dumb, immature brats. 

“You know, guys, this isn’t funny,” I said seriously. “We don’t know what 
kind of creature the sponge is.” 

“We don’t know what kind of creature you are, either!” Daniel announced 
with a big grin. 

“If I’m a creature, you’re a creature’s baby brother!” I shot back. 

“Hey, I have an idea,” said Carlo, winking at Daniel. “Maybe you should 
put the sponge on a leash and take it for a walk. The exercise will give it an 
appetite!” He hooted with laughter. 

He really cracked himself up. 

“But it doesn’t have legs,” Daniel chimed in. 

“She can roll it down Maple Lane!” Carlo suggested. 

More laughter. 

“That’s it, you guys. Get out!” I shouted. “Leave me and the sponge alone! 
Now!” 

Slapping each other another high five, Daniel and Carlo turned to leave. 

I could hardly wait for them to go. I needed to be by myself for a while. To 
sit and figure out what I should do with the little round creature. 

But before Carlo and Daniel got out the bedroom door, a scream made me 



nearly jump to the ceiling. 

I turned to see Carlo hopping frantically up and down on one foot. 

“Oh, right,” I said. “Like I’m going to believe another one of your stupid 
jokes.” 

Carlo, his face twisted in pain, pointed wildly to his foot. Falling back onto 
the bed with a groan, he yanked off his sneaker. 

Blood oozed through his white sock. 

“A nail!” he gasped. “I stepped on a nail!” 

I dropped my eyes to the sneaker on the floor. 

Along nail had poked through the thick rubber sole—and into Carlo’s foot! 

Weird, I thought. Where did a nail come from? 

“Hey, it’s really bleeding!” Carlo wailed. “Do something!” 

I searched around frantically for something to use as a bandage. As I did, 
my eyes rested on the sponge in the gerbil cage. 

“Whoa!” I cried. 

The sponge quivered and shook. 

It shook with what seemed like joy\ 

And it breathed—so loudly that I could hear the eerie sound from the other 
side of the room! 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

As I wrapped an old T-shirt around Carlo’s foot, two questions ran through 
my mind—what in the world is happening here? Why did the sponge creature 
suddenly get so excited? 

I wouldn’t find out the frightening truth about the sponge creature until the 
next day. 

When I learned it, I understood why there were so many accidents in our 
new house. 

And it made me wish that I had never opened that cabinet, never reached 
under the sink, and never found the spongy... thing. 

Because now it was too late. 

Too late for us all. 



7 


“Kat, it’s all set.” Mom grinned at me the next morning when I walked into the 
kitchen for breakfast. 

“What’s all set?” I asked sleepily. 

“Your birthday party tomorrow!” Mom replied, giving me a quick hug. 
Mom’s very big on hugging. 

“How could you forget?” she asked in surprise. “We’ve been planning your 
birthday for weeks!” 

“My party!” I breathed with delight. “Oh, I can’t wait!” I sat down at the 
table for cornflakes and orange juice. 

Birthday parties are a really big deal around the Merton house. Mom 
always orders a big cake. And she makes all the invitations and decorations by 
hand. 

This year, I helped with the invitations. We cut them out of purple 
construction paper and used a pink sparkle pen to write the words. 

I usually have a theme for my parties. Last year’s theme was “Make your 
own pizza.” And it was awesome! My friends talked about it for weeks. 

Now that I’m going to be twelve, I decided I’m too old for a theme. So 
Mom and Dad are taking me and five of my best friends to WonderPark—for the 
entire day. 

WonderPark is definitely the coolest. It has two wave pools, a whole bunch 
of water slides, and the Monster Masher. That’s the scariest upside-down roller 
coaster I’ve ever been on! 

Just how cool is it? Well, last summer, Carlo lost his lunch after a ride on 
the Masher. 

Pretty cool. 

“This is going to be my best birthday ever!” I exclaimed, smiling across the 
table at Mom. I turned to Daniel. “Sorry, you’re not invited. This is for twelve- 
year-olds only.” 

“No fair! Why can’t I come along?” he complained, banging his spoon into 
his cereal and splashing milk all over the table. “I promise I won’t talk to any of 
Kat’s friends. Who would want to? Please let me come!” 

I started to feel sort of bad. I started to change my mind. 



And then Daniel totally mined his chance. 

He folded his arms over his chest. “Kat gets everything around here,” he 
grumbled. “She won’t even share the sponge with me!” 

“That old thing Kat found under the sink?” Mom asked in surprise. “Who’d 
want it?” 

“Me!” yelled Daniel. 

“Well, I found it, so it’s mine. And I’m bringing my sponge to school 
today,” I informed Daniel. 

“Why?” Mom asked. 

“I’m going to show it to Mrs. Vanderhoff,” I explained. “Maybe she’ll 
know what it is. Now I need to find a carrier for my sponge.” 

I searched around in the kitchen cabinets. “Perfect!” I proclaimed, holding 
up a plastic container labeled Deli. It still smelled faintly of potato salad. 

With an old pair of scissors, I punched a few air holes in the top of the 
container. Then I ran upstairs to get the sponge. 

Back in the kitchen, I set the sealed container on the floor and opened the 
refrigerator. 

“Mom,” I called, “which lunch bag is mine?” 

“The blue one, honey,” she replied. 

I grabbed my lunch and shut the refrigerator. 

I heard a sniffing sound coming from the kitchen floor. I looked down. 

“Killer, what are you doing, boy?” I smiled at the floppy-eared dog. 

Snrff. Snrff. Snrff. 

He sniffed at the container. 

Grrr. Grrr. 

He pawed the ground and growled. 

Here we go again, I thought. 

Killer set his ears back, circling the container suspiciously. 

And barked. 

And barked. And barked. 

“Killer! Get back!” I shouted. 

But the dog was way too excited to listen to me. 

“Mom, Daniel!” I called. “Help me get Killer away. I think he wants to eat 
the sponge for breakfast!” 

Mom grabbed Killer by his collar and hauled him, still growling, away from 
the container. She pushed the door open and shooed the dog into the backyard. 



“Go outside, boy, there you go,” she said gently. 

Mom turned to me. “What’s got that dog so upset? He sure is acting 
strange. Now get a move on, or you’ll be late for school. And then I’ll be 
growling and barking!” 

Throwing my backpack over my shoulder, I gave Mom a quick kiss good¬ 
bye and followed Daniel out the door. 

“Watch this!” he yelled, dashing across the street to the Johnsons’ house 
and planting himself underneath their basketball hoop. 

Daniel faked a dribble and a pass, and ran madly around in circles. “Bet you 
can’t jump this high!” he said, pretending to sink a basket. 

“Come on, Daniel,” I replied, walking quickly down the street. “Mrs. 
Vanderhoff will keep me after school if I show up late.” 

Daniel trotted over to me. Suddenly, his eyes bulged! 

“Kat! Look out!” he screamed. 

Craaack! 

I heard a frightening sound above my head. A loud cracking. As if someone 
had cracked about a thousand knuckles at the same time. 

I glanced up in time to see a huge dead tree branch hurtling down through 
the air. 

I froze. 

I couldn’t scream. I couldn’t move. 

I couldn’t move a muscle. 

I was about to be crushed into Kat litter! 



8 


“Ohhhhhhh.” A terrified moan escaped my throat. 

I felt someone shove me hard from behind. 

The force of it sent me flying to the ground. 

I lay there in shock and watched the huge tree branch crash down to the 
ground, cracking and shattering. 

It landed a few feet behind me. 

As I struggled to pull myself up, the sponge container rolled out of my 
hand. The little creature came spilling out onto the sidewalk. 

“Saved your life!” cried Daniel. “Now you owe me big!” 

I barely heard him. 

The sponge. I could only stare at the sponge. 

Whoa-ahhh, whoa-ahhh. 

Breathing louder and faster and deeper than I’d ever heard before. 

Whoa-ahhh, whoa-ahhh. 

Throbbing its little heart out. Practically hopping around on the ground in 
excitement. 

Ba-boom, ba-boom. 

Very weird. I’d almost been killed by the falling branch. And the sponge 
seemed really excited. As if it enjoyed my near accident. As if my accident made 
it really happy. 

“Mrs. Vanderhoff!” I called, rushing into the classroom. “I have to show you 
something!” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff is a brain. She basically knows everything about 
everything. 

She’s very smart. And she takes us on great class trips. At Halloween, we 
visited a spooky old theater that’s supposed to be haunted by the ghosts of dead 
actors. 

But Mrs. Vanderhoff is also really strict. Anyone who goofs off or talks out 
of turn stays after school for a week! 

One other problem. She has no sense of humor at all. I’ve never even seen 
her crack a smile. 



“Check this out, Mrs. Vanderhoff,” I blurted out, shoving the sponge under 
her nose. “I found it under the kitchen sink of our new house. And when Daniel 
went to grab it, he hit his head. And my Dad thought I pushed him, and—and—” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff peered at me over her wire-rim glasses. “Kat, sshh,” she 
ordered sharply. “Now, start over—slowly and clearly.” 

I took a deep breath and began again, starting with moving day and ending 
with the falling tree branch. 

“And you say it throbs and breathes?” Mrs. Vanderhoff asked, staring hard 
at me. 

“Yes!” I exclaimed. 

“Let me see it,” Mrs. Vanderhoff replied. I handed over the container. 

Hesitantly, she stuck her hand in and lifted the sponge out. 

“Oh, wow.” I groaned in disappointment. The sponge appeared dry and 
shriveled. 

It didn’t breathe. It didn’t throb. 

Mrs. Vanderhoff glared at me. “Kat, what’s the meaning of this?” she 
huffed. “This is an ordinary kitchen sponge.” 

She made a face. “A dirty one, I might add.” 

“You’re wrong!” I cried shrilly, desperate for her to believe me. “It’s much 
more than a sponge. It’s alive. It has eyes—see? You’ve got to see!” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff squinted at me, shaking her gray-haired head. 

“Oh, all right,” she said with a sigh. She bent her head and examined the 
sponge closely. She ran her fingers over its wrinkled surface. 

“I don’t know what in the world you’re talking about,” she said angrily, 
motioning for me to take my seat. “This thing doesn’t have eyes. And it’s not 
alive. It’s a dirty, dried-up old sponge.” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff glared at me. “If this is your idea of a joke, Katrina, I don’t 
get it. I don’t get it at all.” 

“But...” I started. 

Mrs. Vanderhoff held up her hand. “Not another word,” she instructed. She 
handed the sponge back—dropping it into my hand like a piece of junk. 

My stomach churned with disappointment. 

Couldn’t I say anything else to convince her? 

The sharp rap of a ruler on her desk interrupted my thoughts. “I’m going to 
pass back the papers from your math test last week,” Mrs. Vanderhoff 
announced. 



Everyone groaned. The surprise quiz on long division had been a major 
disaster for all of us. 

“Settle down,” Mrs. Vanderhoff snapped. 

She reached into her desk to pull out the test papers, and —slammed her 
fingers in the drawer! 

With a howl of pain, she shrieked, “My fingers! Owww—I think I broke 
my fingers! ” 

I was still standing beside her desk. Holding her hand, she turned to me. 
“Help me, Katrina. I’ve got to get to the nurse’s office!” 

I opened the classroom door for Mrs. Vanderhoff. Then I helped her down 
the hall to the infirmary. 

“What’s happened?” Mrs. Twitchell, the school nurse, jumped up from her 
desk and came running up to us. Her starchy white uniform rustled as she 
moved. She sat Mrs. Vanderhoff in a comfortable chair. 

“My fingers,” groaned Mrs. Vanderhoff, holding up her red, swollen hand. 
“I smashed them in the desk drawer!” 

“All right,” Mrs. Twitchell said soothingly. “We’ll put some ice on that 
hand. And I’ll make sure the principal sends somebody to watch your class.” 

“Thank you,” Mrs. Vanderhoff moaned. “Katrina, you can go on back to 
class now. You’ve been very helpful.” 

Helpful? 

Everywhere I went these days, I told myself, somebody seemed to get badly 

hurt! 

Unhappily, I shuffled my way back toward classroom 6B. 

“Kat! Kat!” I heard someone shouting my name. 

Daniel raced out of the library, nearly tripping over his untied shoelaces. He 
crashed right into me. 

“I found it!” he cried breathlessly. “I found the sponge creature! In a book! I 
know what it is!” 



9 


I grabbed Daniel by the front of his shirt. “What is it? What?” I demanded. “I 
have to know!” 

“Whoa. Take it easy. Cool your jets.” Daniel pushed my hands off his shirt. 
“Til show you,” he promised. “I have a picture in here.” 

“In where?” I asked. 

Daniel gazed around the hall. No one in sight. 

He pulled a book out from under his shirt and handed it to me. A big black 
volume. 

I glanced quickly at the title: Encyclopedia of the Weird. 

“Is your picture in there?” I teased. 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” he replied. He grabbed the book away from me. “Do 
you want to see your sponge?” 

“Definitely!” 

Daniel flipped the pages quickly, muttering to himself, “Grebles, Griffins, 
Grocks. Here it is!” 

He shoved the book under my nose. It smelled funny—sort of musty. I 
guessed it had been sitting on the library shelf a long, long time. 

Daniel pointed to a drawing on page 89.1 lowered my eyes to the page. 

Wrinkly skin. Tiny black eyes. “It does look like the sponge,” I gasped. 

I began reading the story underneath the drawing. 

“This is a Grool. ” 

A Grool? I thought. What in the world is that? I returned to the book: 

“The Grool is an ancient and mythical creature. ” 

“Mythical?” I cried. “That means it’s not real—that it’s made up! But it is 
real!” 

“Keep reading,” Daniel urged. 

“The Grool does not eat food or drink water. Instead, it gets its strength 
from luck. Bad luck. ” 

“Daniel,” I stammered. “This is weird. Really weird.” He nodded, his eyes 
wide. 

“The Grool has always been known as a bad-luck charm. It feeds on the 



bad luck of other people. The Grool becomes stronger each time something bad 
happens around it. ” 

“This book is crazy,” I muttered. I eagerly read some more: 

“Bad luck for the Grool owner never ends. The Grool cannot be killed—by 
force or by any violent means. And it cannot — ever—be given away or tossed 
aside. ” 

Why not? I wondered. 

The next lines gave me the answer: 

“A Grool is only passed on to a new owner when an owner dies. Anyone 
who gives the Grool away will DIE within one day. ” 

“That is so stupid!” I exclaimed. “Stupid. Stupid. Stupid.” 

Turning to Daniel, I said in a low voice, “There is no such thing as a 
creature that lives on bad luck.” 

“How do you know, genius?” Daniel demanded. 

“Everything needs food and water,” I replied. “Everything that’s alive, 
anyway.” 

“I don’t know,” Daniel said. “I think the book could be right.” 

The drawing of a creature on another page caught my eye. “Hey, what’s 
this?” I asked. 

It looked like a potato—oval and brown. But it had a mouth full of sharp, 
pointy teeth. 

I quickly read the description. 

“The Lanx is a cousin of the Grool. But it is much more dangerous. ” 

“Yuck!” Daniel cried, making a face. 

I kept reading: 

“Once the Lanx latches on to someone, it never lets go—until it has drained 
every drop of energy from that person. ” 

I slammed the encyclopedia shut. “Here, Daniel, take this dumb book!” I 
shoved the Encyclopedia of the Weird back into my brother’s arms. “This stuff is 
totally crazy. I don’t believe any of it.” 

“But I thought you wanted to know more about the sponge,” Daniel said. 

“I do. But not this made-up stuff!” I told him. 

I knew I was acting sort of rotten to Daniel. And that he only wanted to 

help. 

But give me a break. After all that had been happening, I was a little 
stressed out. 



I mean, it had been a bad couple of days—with Dad falling off the ladder, 
and Mrs. Vanderhoff slamming her hand in the desk. 

And me nearly being crushed by the tree branch! 

I stomped down the hall back to class. “Stupid book,” I muttered to myself. 
But another thought kept forcing its way into my mind: What if the book is 
right? 

I stared at the Grool, still sitting in its container on the corner of Mrs. 
Vanderhoff’s desk. I walked up to it. 

It was wet again. And breathing. Its cold, black eyes stared back. 

I felt a chill of fear and a prickling all over my skin. 

“Mythical creatures don’t exist,” I whispered to the creature. “I’m not going 
to believe that book. I’m not!” 

The sponge stared up at me, breathing softly. 

I picked up the container and shook it angrily. “What are you?” I cried. 
“What?” 

Daniel told Carlo the whole story on the walk home. I walked behind them, 
trying to think about something else. Anything else. 

“It’s called a Grool. And it’s a bad-luck charm,” Daniel explained excitedly. 
“Right, Kat?” 

“I think you’re the bad-luck charm,” I snapped. “And I don’t think that 
book makes any sense.” 

“Oh, yeah?” he cried. He grabbed my backpack. 

“You don’t need these books, do you?” he teased. “You’re so smart, you 
know more than the encyclopedia.” 

Dancing down the street with my books, Daniel turned on to Maple Lane. 
“Hey, Mom’s outside!” he cried, surprised. He started to run. 

Carlo and I hurried to catch up with Daniel. 

Mom stood at the door, waiting for us. Her face wore a tense, worried 
expression. “Hi, kids. Come on inside,” she said. 

Daniel, Carlo, and I followed Mom into the kitchen. 

“I’m afraid I have some very bad news,” she began sadly. 



10 


“Killer is gone,” Mom announced. She bit her lower lip. 

“Gone?” Daniel and I shrieked at once. 

“He ran away,” Mom explained. “I can’t find him anywhere. He must have 
slipped out when I went to put some things in the garage.” 

“But, Mom—” I protested. “Killer never runs away. He’s never done it 
before.” 

“Kat is right!” Daniel agreed. “He’s not brave enough to run away.” 

“Don’t worry,” Mom said. “I’m sure we’ll find him. I’ve called the police, 
and they’re out searching for him right now.” 

“I’ll find Killer,” Daniel cried. “Bet I can find him before the police! Come 
on, Carlo!” 

Daniel grabbed a handful of doggie treats and ran out. Carlo followed close 
behind. 

The door slammed shut behind them. 

Poor Killer, I thought. Out somewhere alone. Probably lost. Bet he’s scared. 

Our new house is so close to the highway—to all those speeding cars. What 
will happen to my little dog? 

I suddenly felt like crying. I grabbed the sponge in its container and ran up 
the stairs. 

“It’s all your fault, isn’t it?” I accused the creature. “I bet you are a Grool 
after all!” 

As I talked, the Grool pulsed. It shook so hard, I expected it to throb right 
out of the container. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. 

And it breathed fast and deep. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

I yanked the Grool out. “We’ve had enough bad luck!” I wailed. “Maybe 
this will stop you!” I hurled the horrible thing as hard as I could against the wall. 

The Grool hit the wall with a sickening splat. 

And I let out a shrill cry of pain. 



11 


I glanced down and saw red. 

Red blood. 

Flowing over my left hand. 

As I threw the Grool, I slammed the hand down on my desk—onto the 
sharp point of a pair of scissors! 

“Ohhh!” I moaned, checking out my hand. A deep, nasty cut. 

I wrapped some tissues around the cut to slow the bleeding. Then I spotted 
the Grool down on the floor. 

Dead, I hoped. 

I bent down. 

“Gross!” I yelped. The Grool was breathing and throbbing—faster and 
harder than ever before. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

I leaned in closer. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

“Hey, what’s that?” I murmured. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

I guess you’d call the noise a laugh. A dry, cruel snicker that sounded more 
like a cough. 

Then, as I listened to that evil laugh, the Grool began changing. 

Its color suddenly brightened—from dull brown to light pink. As I stared in 
amazement, the Grool turned bright tomato-red. 

As red as the blood on my cut hand. 

My hand! Yuck! Blood seeped through the tissues and dripped slowly onto 
the floor. 

I needed help with this. Mom’s help. 

“Mom!” I called, leaping up. “I need a Band-Aid. A big one!” 

As I hurried down the hall, a jumble of questions ran through my mind. 

Why did the Grool change color? I wondered. And that laugh—I’d never 
heard it before. What did it mean? Was it really laughing? 

Did I hurt the Grool when I threw it against my bedroom wall? Is that why 



it turned red? 

So many frightening questions.... 

I listened at the door, cupping my hand around my ear. 

Voices. Inside my room. 

“Who’s there?” I called out shakily. 

The door flew open. 

“It’s the ghost of the Grool,” Daniel whispered in a spooky voice. 
“Owoooooooo.” 

Daniel and Carlo stood over the gerbil cage, giggling. 

“Oh, I’m so scared,” I sneered. “Did you find Killer?” 

“No,” Daniel replied sadly. “Carlo and I searched all over the 
neighborhood. Mom says the police will find him.” 

I turned my eyes to the gerbil cage. “How did the Grool get back in there?” 

“I found it on the floor, so I stuck it back in the cage,” Daniel replied. “How 
did it get out?” 

“Beats me.” I shrugged. I didn’t feel like explaining. 

Carlo, who’d been studying the Grool closely, stared at me. “Hey, what 
happened to your hand?” he asked, pointing to my bandage. 

I didn’t want to tell them. 

“Oh, uh, nothing,” I replied. “Just a little cut. Why are you guys standing 
there staring at the Grool?” 

“Carlo still wants to borrow it,” Daniel explained, tapping the side of the 
cage to get the creature’s attention. “I told him no.” 

Carlo turned to me. “Please,” he begged. “I promise I’ll be careful. Please, 
please, please, please...” 

That stupid Grool! “Oh, take it and keep it!” I snapped. 

“Excellent!” Carlo’s eyes lit up, and he reached eagerly into the plastic cage 
to grab his prize. 

“Wait!” Daniel cried, grabbing Carlo’s arm to stop him. “Kat, remember 
what the Encyclopedia of the Weird said.” 

Daniel began reciting the Grool entry from memory, staring at me all the 
while. 

“You cannot give a Grool away. Anyone who gives the Grool away will DIE 
within one day. ” 

A feeling of dread grew in my stomach. 



But I couldn’t believe that stupid book. Could I? 

Did the encyclopedia say that Grools laugh? Or change color? 

No. 

Carlo and Daniel stared at me. Waiting for my decision. Should I give the 
sponge creature to Carlo? 

I studied the Grool. 

“Don’t do it, Kat,” Daniel urged. “Please don’t give it away. It’s too 
dangerous.” 

I knew only one thing. I wanted to get the Grool away from me as quickly 
as I could. And if Carlo wanted it so badly, I decided, let him have it! 

“Go ahead, Carlo,” I said. “Take the gross, disgusting thing.” 

Daniel grabbed the Grool out of the cage and held it tightly. “No!” he cried. 
“Carlo is not taking it. I don’t care what you say. I won’t let him take it!” 

“Now who’s the scaredy-cat?” I asked, giving Daniel a poke in the arm. 

“I’m trying to save you!” Daniel exclaimed. “Don’t you understand?” 

Poor Daniel. He seemed so serious, so frightened. I decided to give him a 
break. 

“Well, okay. Carlo, I guess you’d better not take the Grool,” I announced. 

Daniel heaved a sigh of relief. 

Carlo frowned. “Okay. Bye. I’m out of here.” 

“I’ll go with you,” Daniel said, tossing the Grool back into the cage. “Come 
on, let’s ride our bikes to the park. Maybe Killer’s there.” As he hurried out of 
the bedroom, Daniel turned and gave me a thumbs-up. 

After the boys left, I collapsed on my bed. What’s going to happen next? I 
wondered. 

I lifted my eyes to the plastic cage and glared at the Grool. I felt a deep 
hatred for the little creature. 

“If one more bad thing happens around here, I’ll bury you,” I promised it. 
“I’ll bury you so far in the ground that no one will ever find you or see you 
again. Ever.” 

It was a promise I would soon have to keep. 



12 


The next morning I woke up with a jolt. 

Toot! Toot! Daniel stood at the foot of my bed, blowing away on a party 

horn. 

“Time to get up, Kat!” he squealed. 

I reached out to grab the noisy horn away. “Quit it, you loser!” I grumbled. 
Then I remembered. 

My birthday! Finally! Something to celebrate. 

I jumped out of bed. Time to get ready to go to WonderPark! 

I planned to be on the Seattle Log Flume and the Wild Wave Slide all day 

long! 

Running to the window, I peeked out through the glass. “No!” I cried in 
disappointment. “No! It can’t be!” 

Rain poured down. Lightning crackled through the sky. Thunder boomed so 
loud, I felt the house shake. 

How could we go to WonderPark in this mess? 

“Kat,” Mom called from downstairs. “Breakfast.” 

I threw on my purple-and-pink-striped leggings and a purple T-shirt and ran 
to the kitchen. On my birthday Mom always makes my favorite—waffles with 
strawberries and powdered sugar. 

“Here’s the birthday girl. Happy birthday, honey.” Mom beamed, giving me 
a big hug. 

“I’m dressed for my party,” I said hopefully as I sat down at the table. 

“Oh, honey, I’m afraid we’ll have to cancel your party,” Mom said sadly. 
“We certainly can’t go to WonderPark in this storm.” 

Cancel? I poked unhappily at my waffles. 

“Can’t we have the party here—indoors?” I pleaded. “We’ll order pizza and 
play computer games in the den.” 

“You know that we can’t do that,” Mom said. “The painters will be here all 
day in the living room and dining room. With all those ladders and buckets of 
paint, I can’t have your friends running around.” 

What rotten luck. 

“But, Mom, it’s my birthday!” I protested, throwing down my fork. “And 



you promised I could have a party. You promised!” 

Mom sighed. “I know how disappointed you are, Kat. We’ll have your party 
another day. Maybe next weekend.” 

Another day wouldn’t be my birthday. “Everything’s going wrong!” I cried. 
“Ever since we moved!” 

I hated this new house. I even hated my birthday. 

Most of all, I hated the Grool. 

Leaving my waffles on the plate, I ran up to my room. I snatched the Grool 
out of its cage and shook it as hard as I could. 

“I warned you!” I threatened. “You ruined my birthday! Now you’ll pay!” 

The Grool throbbed happily in my hand, and I hurled it back into the gerbil 
cage. “I hate you!” I shrieked. “I really hate you! You and your bad luck!” 

Plopping down at my desk, I decided I had to take action. Strong action. 

No birthday party. No more Grool. 

“I’m keeping my promise,” I told the creature. 

I pulled a notebook out of my desk drawer and began to make some plans 
to get rid of it. 

“Daniel, it’s not raining anymore,” I whispered to my brother. “Come on, it’s 
time.” 

The Grool vibrated in its plastic container. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. 

Daniel glanced up from his computer screen. “Now?” he asked. “Give me a 
break, Kat. I’m on level ten, and I need to slay only one more troll before I can 
open the treasure chest.” 

“This is important. Really important,” I insisted. 

Daniel sighed. “Do you think you should do it? You know what the book 
said.” 

“I’ve got to!” I cried. “Remember, it’s the Grool’s fault that Killer ran 
away.” 

Daniel was definitely nervous. And scared. 

But he obediently hit the save button on Troll Terror and followed me 
outside to the backyard. It had rained all day. But now a few stars shone high 
above us in the charcoal night sky. 

“Here. You hold the Grool,” I whispered. I shoved the creature into his 
trembling hands. 



I skipped over to the garage—feeling happy for the first time in days. “I’m 
getting rid of the Grool,” I sang to myself. 

Grabbing the biggest shovel I could find, I made my way back to Daniel. 
Then I started to dig. 

This had to be a serious hole, a deep hole. Something the Grool could 
never, ever climb out of. 

A cool breeze blew around me. But digging in the damp ground was hard 
work. Sweat rolled down my back and forehead. 

I didn’t feel scared at all. I had to do something to make life normal again. I 
had to stop all the bad luck. 

And if it meant burying a living sponge, fine. As long as I never had to see 
that stupid, snickering creature again. 

I peered down into the hole. It seemed pretty deep, about as long as my 

arm. 

“I’m finished,” I told my brother. “Pass me the Grool.” 

Daniel silently handed the sponge to me. 

As I held it over the deep hole, the sponge didn’t throb. It didn’t breathe. It 
didn’t even feel warm. 

It felt dry and dead, like an ordinary kitchen sponge. 

But I knew better. 

I dropped the Grool into the hole and watched happily as it tumbled down 
the steep dirt sides to the bottom. 

Picking up the shovel again, I began throwing dirt onto the creature—heap 
after heap. 

Dig. Throw. Dig. Throw. 

Finally, the hole was filled up. I used the back of the shovel to smooth the 
dirt flat. “There,” I said. “No one but us will know the Grool is buried here.” 

I lowered my eyes to the soft, wet dirt. “Bye, bye Grool,” I called out 
happily. “Daniel, I think our luck is going to change now.” 

Daniel didn’t reply. 

I spun around. “Daniel? Daniel? Where are you?” 

My brother had disappeared. 



13 


What had I done? 

I dropped the shovel in a panic. “Daniel!” I shrieked. “Where are you?” 

Had I made my brother disappear? Did burying the Grool somehow make 
Daniel vanish into thin air? 

“Daniel? Daniel?” I called in a trembling voice. 

I heard a soft rustling sound coming from behind the garage. 

I crept quietly toward it. “Daniel,” I whispered. “Is that you?” 

No reply. 

I peeked behind the garage. 

Daniel sat with his arms locked around his knees. Safe and sound. 

“Daniel!” I cried. I felt so relieved that I pinched him. 

“Cut it out,” he snapped. He leaped to his feet. 

“What are you doing back here? I was so worried—I thought the Grool got 
you!” 

Daniel didn’t reply. He lowered his eyes to the ground. 

“Why did you hide?” I demanded. 

“I was scared,” he murmured. “I thought the Grool might explode or fight 
back or something.” 

“You were scared?” I asked. “Why didn’t you at least answer me when I 
called you?” 

“I thought maybe the Grool was chasing you,” he confessed, his face 
turning red. 

“Daniel, don’t worry,” I said. The poor guy was really frightened. And 
embarrassed that he had hid. 

I put both hands on his shoulders. “The Grool is gone. It’s buried deep in 
the ground.” 

He swallowed hard. “But what if it comes back? What if what the book said 
comes true?” 

“We’ll never see the Grool again,” I said quietly. “And don’t forget—the 
book said Grools don’t really exist. It’s all made up. Just a myth, a fairy tale.” 

Daniel sighed. “I hate to admit it, but you’re right, Kat,” he said. “At least 



this time.” 

“This time?” I shot back. “How about all the time?” I slugged Daniel on the 

arm. 

“Oh, that hurts so much I think I’m going to pass out!” Daniel cried 
sarcastically. He fell on to the wet lawn and pretended to faint. 

“Come on, let’s go in,” I urged. “You’re getting soaked. And I’m covered 
with dirt.” 

Daniel scrambled up and elbowed me aside. 

“Race you!” he cried, running toward the house. 

I leaped up the steps and beat him into the house by about a second. I 
slammed the screen door and held it closed, so Daniel couldn’t open it. 

“I won!” I shouted. 

“Only because I let you,” Daniel cried. He banged on the door. 

“Do you want to get in here?” I asked. 

Daniel nodded. 

“Then say, ‘Kat beat me fair and square’,” I commanded. 

“No way!” he replied. 

“Stay out there all night, then—with the Groooooooool!” I told him. I let 
out a ghostly howl. 

“Okay, okay. Kat beat me fair and square,” Daniel grumbled. “But I’ll win 
next time!” 

Actually, I didn’t really care about the race. I felt so glad that I buried the 
Grool, I would have let Daniel win ten races. 

As we burst into the living room, Mom and Dad raised their eyes from their 
newspapers. The house smelled of fresh paint. 

“Where were you?” Dad asked. 

“Oh, just fooling around in the yard,” I replied. 

“Is everything all right?” Mom asked with concern. “You’re filthy!” 

“Everything is fine,” I answered. “Now.” 

“Okay, go and wash up,” Mom ordered. “Then come into the kitchen.” 

Daniel and I crowded into the bathroom, leaned over the sink, pushing and 
bumping each other, and cleaned ourselves up. 

“Do you know what time it is?” Mom asked as I raced back into the 
kitchen. 

“Yes!” I shouted happily. “It’s time for my birthday cake.” 

Mom beamed. “Well, sit right down here.” 



I dropped excitedly into the chair she offered. Finally, I thought, things are 
going right again. 

Daniel perched on the chair next to mine. He grabbed my arm. “Something 
bad is going to happen,” he whispered. “I know it. I just know it.” 

I’m not going to let anything wreck tonight, I thought. 

“Don’t be such a wimp,” I whispered. “Everything’s fine.” 

At the kitchen counter, Mom hovered over the cake. She touched a match to 
each of the thirteen candles—one for each year and an extra one for luck. 

What an awesome cake! Mom had ordered it from the bakery down the 
street. It had all my favorites: pink frosting roses, chocolate icing, and a layer of 
strawberries. A tiny chocolate Ferris wheel sat on top. 

“Ready, Kat?” Mom asked. She carried the cake to the table. Her faced 
glowed happily in the candlelight. Dad flashed me a big grin. 

They all began to sing “Happy Birthday”. 

I saw Daniel watching me closely as he sang. 

They finished the song. I shut my eyes and made my wishes. 

“I wish Killer would come home,” I said to myself. “And I wish the Grool 
would never return. And that Daniel is wrong—that nothing bad will happen.” 

I leaned forward, closer to the candles, and blew hard. 

Pop! 

The loud noise from the kitchen nearly made me fall into my cake! 



14 


“Boy, that cork was loud!” chirped Mom. 

She set down a tray of glasses and a large green bottle. “It’s your favorite— 
sparkling apple cider,” she announced. “I know it’s not as good as a day at 
WonderPark....” 

“Oh, Mom!” I gasped, my heart still pounding. “It’s great. Everything is 
going to be great.” 

An excellent birthday. Cake, sparkling cider, and presents—two new video 
games, a Discman and some CDs, a purple backpack, and a sweatshirt in pink 
and purple—my favorite colors. 

That night before bed, I stuffed my school books into my new backpack. I 
stared at the gerbil cage. Empty and clean—as if the Grool had never even 
existed. 

I got rid of the disgusting creature, I thought happily. I really did. 

My family will finally be safe from bad luck. 

The clock in the hall chimed ten. Time for bed. I climbed into my nightshirt 
and dove under the covers. 

When the alarm rang the next morning, I bounced out of bed and ran to the 
window to check the weather. 

“Oh, nooo!” 

I uttered a low moan of horror. 

The backyard—it looked like a desert! 

Overnight, the grass had all burned brown. All the pink begonias dropped to 
the ground, dead and brown. Dad’s red roses had shriveled and turned black. 

Poor Dad, I thought. He worked so hard to make the yard beautiful. And, 
now... 

As I stared at the ugly, dead yard, I tried to force the thought from my mind. 
But deep down inside, I knew exactly how it all happened. 

The Grool. 

From its grave, the Grool had turned its evil powers on the lawn. And it 
killed every single living plant, flower, and blade of grass! 

What should I do? I wondered, staring out at the burned, dried-out, dead, 



dead yard. 

Should I remove the Grool from the ground? 

Did I have a choice? 

Not really. 

I quickly pulled on my new sweatshirt and a pair of jeans. Then I crept 
downstairs. I sneaked out to the spot where I had buried the Grool. 

And I began to dig. 

Brown, dry leaves rained down on my head. My shoulder ached from lifting 
the damp, heavy dirt. My stomach didn’t feel too great, either. 

Dig, toss. Dig, toss. 

The more I dug, the worse I felt. 

I wanted to throw the shovel down and run from the spot. To leave the 
terrible creature buried for good. 

But I had to face the truth. 

If I left the Grool buried, it would keep on punishing me. It would punish 
my whole family. 

I dug to the bottom of the hole. Then I bent down and pushed the dirt away 
with both hands. 

Slowly, before my frightened eyes, the Grool throbbed into view. More 
alive and excited than ever. 

“I should smash you with this shovel!” I yelled at it. 

The Grool vibrated crazily, almost as if what I said made it happy. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. I could hear it breathe. 

And then once again, it turned from brown to pink to tomato-red. And it 
kept changing color as it breathed. 

Brown. Pink. Red. 

Brown. Pink. Red. 

I grabbed the Grool from its grave. It pulsed so hard that it throbbed right 
out of my hand and fell to the ground. 

“Stay still!” I shrieked, snatching it up. 

The Grool stared at me. Its tiny, round eyes glowed red with evil. 

I shivered. 

I gritted my teeth and shoved the Grool into the pocket of my new 
sweatshirt. I trudged back to the house, through the kitchen door, and into the 
hall that led to the stairs. 

At the bottom of the stairs, I heard a noise. It came from Mom and Dad’s 



bedroom. 

They’re awake, I thought. I’ve got to hurry before they see me and ask 
questions. That’s all I need. 

I leaped up the stairs, taking them two at a time. 

Whomp! I slipped and landed hard on my right knee. “Ouch!” I shrieked. 

I felt the Grool shake in my pocket. I heard its ugly, soft snicker. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

It was laughing at me! 

I jerked it out of my pocket and squeezed it so hard that my fingers hurt. 
Then I ran to my room and threw the Grool into the gerbil cage. 

“I’ll find a way to destroy you,” I promised. I rubbed my aching knee and 
glared at the little beast. “Before you can bring us any more bad luck, I will 
destroy you!” I cried. 

But how? I wondered. 

How? 



15 


“Kids, Aunt Louise is coming tomorrow,” Mom told Daniel and me the next 
morning. “So I want you both to clean up your rooms after school today.” 

“Aunt Louise is coming?” I asked. “Great!” 

Aunt Louise is my favorite aunt. Even though she^s a grown-up, she^s 
completely cool. 

She wears long, flowery dresses and drives a bright yellow convertible. 

And Aunt Louise blows the biggest bubble gum bubbles! And she knows a 
lot of really funny jokes. 

Mom says Aunt Louise has her head in the clouds. I guess that means she 
has a wild imagination. I don’t know about that, but she does know a lot about 
things like astrology and tarot cards. 

And, maybe—about Grools. 

That night, after I cleaned my room and before I went to bed, I said a 
special good night to the Grool. 

“My aunt is coming tomorrow and she’s going to help me get rid of you 
forever,” I whispered. It stared up at me, breathing softly. 

After school the next afternoon, Daniel and I turned the corner onto our block. 
And we saw Aunt Louise’s yellow convertible in the driveway. We ran the rest 
of the way home. 

“Hey—what’s up?” Aunt Louise called as we burst into the house. A floppy 
yellow straw hat covered her black curly hair. 

Before Daniel could get to her, I threw my arms around Aunt Louise and 
whispered in her ear, “Come upstairs with me. Now. It’s super-important.” 

My aunt pulled off her hat and set it on my head. She admired me in the hat. 
“Super-important?” she asked. 

“Yes,” I whispered, grabbing her hand and tugging her toward the stairs. 

“Have you ever heard of a Grool?” I asked. 

“A Grool? Hmmm. I’ll have to think about that one for a minute,” she 
replied thoughtfully. “No, I don’t think so. What is a Grool?” 

“Well,” I explained, “Daniel found a picture in an encyclopedia. And the 
book said it was an ancient, mythical creature....” 



“Well, if it’s mythical, honey, that means it doesn’t exist,” Aunt Louise 
interrupted. 

“But it’s not mythical!” I cried impatiently. “I should know because I have 
one. And it causes trouble, lots of trouble.” 

Aunt Louise followed me to my room. 

“Have you ever heard of a Lanx?” I asked. 

She shook her head. 

“That’s another creature in that encyclopedia. It looks like a potato, but it 
has a mouth full of sharp teeth.” 

“Good heavens. It sounds disgusting!” Aunt Louise exclaimed. “But tell me 
about this... Grool. What does it look like?” 

“Here. I’ll show you,” I said. I pulled her into my room. 

I pointed at the gerbil cage. The Grool squatted in the corner. 

Aunt Louise walked up to the cage. “So you’re a Grool,” she said, leaning 
down. She reached over to pick it up. 

“Wait,” I cried. “Maybe you shouldn’t touch it.” 

But I was too late. 



16 


Aunt Louise picked up the Grool and placed it in the palm of her hand. She 
studied it for a long while. 

Then she turned to me. “Kat, it’s only a dried-up sponge. What’s the big 
idea?” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Oh, I get it!” she laughed. “You really had me fooled! I thought you were 
serious!” She tossed the Grool to me. 

I tried to catch it, but I didn’t want to touch it. It plopped to the floor. 

“Pretty funny, kid.” She chuckled as she turned to leave. “You have a great 
imagination. Just like your aunt.” 

I picked up the Grool and examined it closely. 

Not warm. 

Not breathing. 

Not moving at all. 

Dry and hard. 

An ordinary sponge. 

Aunt Louise thought I was joking. But the joke was on me. 

The Grool had tricked me again! 

I hurled the creature back into the gerbil cage. It lay there lifeless. “I hope 
you rot in there!” I exploded. 

Before my amazed eyes, the dry brown sponge began plumping-up. In a 
few seconds, it became fuller and moister. 

“Yuck!” I groaned, watching it turn pink and then red. 

The Grool huffed and puffed. Whoa-ahhhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

Those little black eyes peered out at me excitedly. 

The Grool snickered softly. 

Why was it so pleased with itself? I wondered. Nothing horrible had 
happened. 

Or had it? 

I thought of Dad’s fall off the ladder. The tree branch. Mrs. Vanderhoff’s 
fingers. Killer running away. My spoiled birthday party. Our dry, rotted 



backyard. 

It was all too much. Too much! 

With a desperate cry, I yanked the evil thing out of its cage. Then I 
slammed it down hard on my desk. 

Breathing hard, my heart pounding, I grabbed one of my heaviest 
textbooks. And I slammed it down onto the Grool. 

“Die!” I shouted. “Please! Die!” 

I raised the book high. Pounded the Grool with it. 

Again. Again. 

I pounded hard enough to kill anything. 

Finally, I stopped. Gasping for breath, my arms aching, I stared down at 
what I’d done. 

Yuck. What a mess. 

Brown and pink shreds of Grool littered my desk. 

I had smashed it to pieces. 

“Yes!” I cried breathlessly. “Yes!” 

Finally! I had finally destroyed the evil creature! 

“Yes!” I cried again. 

But the cry stuck in my throat. 

As the pink and brown shreds started to move, I stared down in horror—and 
began to shake all over. 



17 


“This can’t be happening,” I whispered. 

But it was. 

The pieces—the shreds of Grool—they were sliding across the desktop. 
Slithering. Rolling together. 

Coming back together. 

Forming a brown ball. A sponge. 

It didn’t take long. A minute at the most. 

And now the Grool stared up at me again. And it vibrated so hard that my 
desk actually began to rock. 

Its cruel snicker cut through my shocked silence. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

“Shut up! Shut up!” I screamed. 

But it snickered even louder. 

Frantic, I grabbed a dirty sock from the clothes hamper. I used it to pick up 
the Grool. And then I hurled the thing back into the cage. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

With a cry, I threw myself face down on my bed and covered my ears. “Will 
I have this bad luck for the rest of my life? Is there anything I can do?” 

I was so frightened. So angry. So confused. 

I couldn’t even pretend to be my usual cheery self. 

When Aunt Louise took me and Daniel out to an ice-cream parlor, I 
couldn’t even finish a small butterscotch sundae. Usually, I’m good for a triple 
decker. 

But how could I ever be happy again? I was stuck with the Grool—forever. 

“Wake up, Kat! Wake up!” A frantic voice whispered in my ear. 

I slowly raised my head off the pillow. “Huh?” 

Daniel was waving his bookbag back and forth about an inch above my 
head. “Get that away!” I shouted, grabbing for it. 

“Hey, I’m only trying to help you,” he replied, snatching the pack away. 
“You’re going to be late for school. You’d better get moving!” 



He ran out of the room. 

I tore the covers off and raced to the closet. I slipped on my Save the Earth 
sweatshirt and purple flowered leggings. Then I remembered. 

“Daniel, you little dweeb!” I bellowed. “We have no school today! There’s 
a teachers’ conference!” 

He peeked back into my room. 

“Got you!” he gloated. 

I hurled a pillow at his head and hit him in the face. A nice shot. 

“You’re a bad sport,” he said, laughing. “Carlo’s coming over after 
breakfast. We can play Mega Monster Warriors. ” 

I slammed the door in his face. 

Daniel’s stupid tricks usually don’t bother me too much. 

And a day off from school always puts me in a great mood. 

But how could I enjoy myself? I just kept wondering what bad thing was 
going to happen next. 

What bad luck would the evil Grool bring today? 

After breakfast, I hung around on the back porch, reading a magazine. And 
trying to ignore Daniel’s and Carlo’s shrieks and wild laughter as they played 
computer games. 

I really missed Killer. He usually sits next to me when I read. 

After about an hour, I got bored. I decided to go up to my room and work 
on my social studies assignment. 

I had to write an essay for Mrs. Vanderhoff. My Family and What They 
Mean to Me. 

But I kept thinking about the Grool and how it was totally ruining my 
family. 

So far, all I had written was: “I’m Kat Merton and my family means an 
awful lot to me.” 

Not exactly grade-A material. And the paper was due tomorrow morning. 

I decided to take a break. I went to the kitchen and poured myself a glass of 
chocolate milk and grabbed a handful of oatmeal cookies. 

On my way back upstairs, I peeked into the den. Things seemed very quiet 
in there. 

I didn’t see Carlo. Only Daniel, playing Underwater Adventure Quest. 

“Where is Carlo?” I asked. 

“Um,” Daniel replied, his eyes glued to the submarines and torpedoes 



flashing across the computer screen. 

“Was my question too hard for you?” I asked sarcastically. “I’ll go slower 
now. Where... is... Carlo?” 

“Home,” he mumbled. 

“Did he get mad because you sank more enemy submarines than he did?” I 
joked. 

Daniel didn’t answer. 

I headed upstairs to my room. I set down my milk and cookies. I couldn’t 
help but glance at the gerbil cage. 

It wasn’t what I saw that made a prickle of fear run down my back. It was 
what I didn’t see. 

The cage stood empty. 

The Grool was gone. 

Escaped. 



18 


How had it escaped? The Grool had never even tried to get out of its cage 
before. 

In fact, the stupid sponge never seemed very interested in going anywhere. 

Why did it disappear now? And where did it go? 

And what kind of trouble was it planning to make? 

It couldn’t get very far, I told myself. It had no legs. 

I started to call to Daniel. But my throat choked with panic. 

I frantically started to search for the Grool. I slid on my stomach under the 
bed. Not there. 

I pulled everything out of my closet. I opened dresser drawers. No sign of 
it. 

I checked every inch of the room. I even called out to it: “Here Grool, here 
Grool.” 

No. No way. The creature was gone. 

The words from the Encyclopedia of the Weird suddenly flashed into my 
mind: “Anyone who gives the Grool away will DIE within one day.” 

“Daniel!” I shrieked. “Daniel!” I tore downstairs and into the TV room. I 
shook him so hard, he dropped his computer mouse. 

“The Grool is gone!” I cried. “It escaped!” 

Daniel turned away from the computer screen. “Excuse me? What do you 
mean—gone?” 

“It’s gone! The cage is empty!” I wailed. 

Daniel scrunched up his face, thinking hard. “I know where it is,” he said. 
“Carlo.” 

“Huh?” I cried. “How could you? How could you let Carlo take it?” 

“I didn’t let him!” Daniel snapped. “He must have grabbed it when he left. 
Carlo thinks it’s all a big joke. He said there’s no way a little sponge can do 
anything bad.” 

“What a jerk!” I sputtered. “Maybe we should let him keep the Grool. It 
would teach him a lesson—a real nasty lesson!” 

“Kat, we can’t!” Daniel exclaimed. “He’s my best friend. We have to get 
the Grool back from him—before something terrible happens!” 



Daniel and I pulled our jackets out of the hall closet. Then we ran out to the 
garage. We jumped on our bikes and pedaled furiously down Maple Lane. 

“Where do you think he went?” I shouted. 

“Let’s try the school playground,” Daniel suggested. “There’s always a 
bunch of kids there.” 

“Yeah, and Carlo’s a big show-off,” I exclaimed. “He probably went 
straight to the playground to show off the Grool.” 

“He is not a show-off,” Daniel protested. 

“Is too!” I argued. Pedaling furiously, I shot way ahead of Daniel. 

I made it to Chestnut Street a few minutes later. “Only two more blocks!” I 
called breathlessly. I slowed down so that Daniel could catch up. 

I turned the corner. 

“Oh, no!” I screamed. 

I squeezed on the brakes. Stopped short. 

Who was that lying in the middle of the street? 

Was it Carlo? 

Yes! 

Carlo. Sprawled on his stomach. His arms and legs stretched over the 
pavement. 

“We’re too late!” Daniel cried. “We’re too late!” 



19 


Our bikes crashed to the ground as Daniel and I leaped off them. We bent over 
Carlo, calling his name. 

“Ohhhh, wow.” Carlo let out a low moan. He clutched his right leg. 

“Carlo!” I yelled breathlessly. “What is it? What happened? Are you okay?” 

Carlo bent his leg carefully and winced. “My knee really hurts. I twisted it 
when I fell off my bike.” 

I looked up and saw his bike, on its side under a tree. 

“How did it happen?” Daniel asked weakly. My brother hates the sight of 
blood. 

“Some of the older kids wanted to race me,” Carlo groaned. “I didn’t really 
want to race them—but they dared me.” 

He sat up, still rubbing his knee. “Man, I was flying! Then, well, I hit some 
gravel—and skidded into a tree. Those kids all thought it was a riot. They just 
rode off and left me.” 

“Daniel, help me get him up,” I instructed. We put our arms around Carlo 
and guided him over to the curb. 

Then we just sat there, staring at Carlo’s mangled bicycle. The handlebars 
looked like a giant metal pretzel. 

“You know what?” Carlo finally said. “I didn’t even see that stupid tree 
until I was right on top of it.” 

Daniel poked me. I knew he was thinking what I was thinking. 

The Grool strikes again. 

We had to get the Grool back. 

“Carlo, where is the Grool?” I asked. 

“Right there in my bike basket.” He pointed. 

I reached over the tangled handlebars and felt around the basket with my 
hand. 

And felt again. 

Nothing in the basket. Completely empty. 

“Carlo, give me a break,” I complained. “There’s no Grool in there. Where 
is it?” My voice got high and shrill. I could feel the panic sweeping over me. 



“Huh? It’s got to be in there!” Carlo declared. “That’s where I stuck it. I 
was going to take it right home.” 

“Oh, sure, Carlo,” I snapped. “Like you weren’t going to bring it to the 
playground and show it off?” 

Carlo hung his head. “Well, maybe for a couple of minutes.” 

“Great! Just great!” I fumed. “Because of you, the Grool is missing.” 

Daniel leaned close to me, his face pale with fear. “We’ve got to find the 
Grool, Kat,” he whispered. “Remember what the encyclopedia said. If you don’t 
find it in a day, you’ll die!” 

“I remember,” I replied with a shudder. “But how are we ever going to find 
it now? Where can it be?” 



20 


“I don’t even know where to start looking.” I sighed. 

“Maybe it fell out of the basket when I hit the tree,” Carlo suggested. 
“Maybe it rolled somewhere around here.” 

Daniel tugged on my sleeve. “Come on,” he urged. “Let’s start looking.” 

Carlo stood up. “I’d better get home,” he said. He limped away. Luckily, his 
house was on the next block. 

Daniel and I hunted all over the block. In doorways, underneath cars, in 
flower beds—anywhere the Grool might have rolled. 

No luck. 

As we were about to give up, I spotted a sewer grating a few feet away 
from Carlo’s bike. Could the Grool have tumbled down there? 

Daniel saw the sewer, too. “Kat? I’ll bet it rolled down into the sewer! It’s 
down there. I know it is!” 

I dropped to the pavement. On my stomach. I peered into the darkness 
through the grating. 

“It’s way too dark to see anything,” I reported. “Somebody will have to go 
down there.” 

“Uh... somebody? Maybe... maybe I could go,” my brother offered in a 
shaky voice. 

Daniel acts really brave. But I know he’s afraid of a lot of things. Like dark 
sewers. 

He’d freak out down in the sewer. 

“No. I’ll do it,” I said. “The Grool knows me better.” 

We lifted off the heavy grate. I felt around with my sneaker. It slid against a 
narrow ladder built into the side of the sewer. 

“I guess this is the only way down,” I said softly. “Here I go.” 

Slowly, I lowered myself into the dark wet hole. The ladder rungs were wet 
and slippery. The walls were thick with sewer slime. 

“This place really stinks /” I called up. “I can’t believe I’m doing this.” 

Squishhhhh! 

As I reached the sewer floor, my sneaker landed on something wet and 
oozy. 



“Gross!” I screamed, pulling my foot back up. 

“Are you okay?” Daniel called from above. He sounded ten miles away. 

“Yeah,” I shouted back. “I think I stepped in a pile of slime. Wow, it’s really 
dark down here.” 

I carefully touched my feet down again, and gripped the ladder tightly with 
one hand—afraid I would never find my way back if I let go. 

It’s too dark, I realized. I’ll never find the Grool down here. 

Then I heard it. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhhh. 

Breathing! 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhhh. 

The Grool! But where? 

I held my breath and stood completely still. I concentrated really hard, 
trying to figure out exactly where in the inky blackness the breathing came from. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhhh. 

Somewhere to my right? 

I knew I had to walk over there and snatch the Grool. But I was afraid to let 
go of the ladder. Finally, I decided to count my steps there, find the Grool—then 
count the same number of steps back to the ladder. 

I swallowed hard and let go of the ladder. I stepped into the blackness and 
started counting. 

“One... two... three... four...” 

The breathing sounded a little closer. 

“Five... six...” 

I stopped. I listened hard. 

“Huh?” I cried to myself. “What’s that scratching sound?” Then I saw the 
eyes. Not the Grool’s small, round eyes. Big, bright eyes. Several pairs of them. 
All glowing at me in the dark. 



21 


The scratching grew louder. The eyes stared up at me. 

Yellow eyes. Glowing in the darkness. 

I heard a creature scrabble over the floor. Felt something warm and furry 
brush against my leg. 

Were they raccoons? Rats? 

I didn’t want to know. 

Another one brushed against me. They were all starting to scrape around on 
the sewer floor. They were growing restless. 

I forced myself to breathe. 

Turned. 

And started to run. 

Get me out of here! I thought. Get me out of here before they attack! 

My sneakers slid over the damp, slimy floor. 

“Please let me find my way out of here,” I prayed as I stumbled through the 
darkness. 

“Oww!” 

My knee slammed into something hard. 

I cried out and reached for something to lean on. 

And caught hold of the ladder. 

“Yes! Yes!” I cried happily. 

Ignoring my throbbing knee, I scrambled up the slimy rungs. Up, up, up 
toward the light. 

“Daniel—help me out!” I cried. 

Daniel leaned down and grabbed my hands. He helped pull me out of that 
awful hole. 

I fell on to the pavement and nearly sobbed with relief. 

Daniel dropped down next to me. “Did you get it?” he asked eagerly. “Did 
you find it?” 

I wiped my sludge-covered hands on my jeans. “No,” I told him. “No 
Grool.” 

“I should have gone down there,” he declared. “I definitely would have 



found it.” 

“You definitely would have been terrified!” I replied angrily. “There were 
animals down there. Rats, maybe. Dozens of them.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” he said, rolling his eyes. He sighed. “Now what do we do?” 
He kicked a pebble across the street. 

I sighed. “Don’t worry—we’ll find the Grool.” 

“But how?” he cried. “We can’t even find Killer. We’ll never find a little 
sponge.” 

I had never seen Daniel this upset. “Daniel, the police will find Killer. I 
know they will,” I said softly. 

“We must have missed the sponge,” he said, ignoring my words. “We have 
to check everywhere again.” 

We started to search again. In the street. In the grass. Behind hedges. Under 
trees. 

Carlo appeared as we were about to give up. He was walking fine. He 
examined his mangled bike. Then he helped us with our search. 

The afternoon sun was settling behind the trees. The air felt cooler. Evening 
was approaching. 

I sank down on the sidewalk, feeling totally hopeless. 

The warning in the encyclopedia kept running through my mind. Was it 
possible? Could it be true? If we didn’t find the Grool, would my life really be 
over by tomorrow? 

“There it is!” 

Daniel’s excited shout interrupted my frightening thoughts. 

“There it is!” my brother cried happily. “I see it! I see the Grool!” 



22 


Daniel took off, running full speed. 

“Way to go!” My heart pounding, I leaped up from the sidewalk. “You are 
the most awesome brother in the entire universe!” 

I was so excited and happy, I threw my arms around Carlo. “He saved my 
life!” I shouted. “He saved my life!” 

“Hey—give me a break!” Carlo cried, squirming away. 

I hurried after Daniel. I watched him bend down to pick up something. 
Something small and round and brown. 

But a gust of wind rolled the Grool away from him. 

“Hey—!” he cried out. He stumbled after it. The wind blew it out of his 
reach again. 

“Got you!” Daniel cried, pouncing on it. 

“Bring it here!” I yelled. 

“Oh, wow,” he murmured. His face fell. “Sorry about that. It’s not the 
Grool.” 

I grabbed the thing from his hands. “No, it’s not,” I whispered sadly. 

Not the Grool. Only a brown paper bag, all wadded up in a ball. 

Daniel hurled the paper bag to the ground and stomped on it. 

My stomach lurched. I really felt sick. 

Time is running out, I thought. And we have no idea where the Grool might 
be. 

A tear came to my eye, and I blinked it away quickly. I didn’t want Daniel 
and Carlo to see how scared I was. 

The panic rose in my chest. Would I really die if we didn’t find that evil 
creature? 

I suddenly pictured Mom and Dad sitting around crying and missing me. I 
pictured Aunt Louise wailing, “It’s all my fault. I didn’t believe her.” 

I imagined Daniel walking to school all alone. 

I gazed down at my brother, who slumped sadly on the curb with Carlo. 

And I had a truly terrifying idea. Maybe the Grool xvasn ’t lost. 

Maybe the creepy little creature had decided to hide. 



To hide from me. 

So it could perform its most evil trick of all. 

Hide for twenty-four hours so that I’d have the ultimate bad luck. 

Death! 

Carlo startled me by jumping to his feet. His dark eyes glowed excitedly. “I 
—I have an idea!” he cried. 

“An idea?” I demanded. “What kind of idea?” 

He smiled at me and grabbed my arm. “Come on. Hurry. I think I know 
where the Grool might be!” 



23 


“You know those guys who raced me?” Carlo asked, tugging me forward along 
the street. “The ones who hang out at the playground?” 

“Yeah. What about them?” I asked. 

“HI bet one of them picked up the Grool. I kind of remember—” 

Daniel didn’t even wait for Carlo to finish the sentence. “Let’s go!” he 
shouted. He sprang onto his bike and raced off toward the playground. 

I picked up my bike and started pedaling after my brother. Carlo ran behind 
us, calling, “Wait up! Wait up!” 

We pedaled to the playground and walked our bikes to the baseball field. 
That’s where the older kids usually hang out. 

“There they are,” Carlo said. He pointed to a group of boys taking turns 
batting and fielding balls. 

“Carlo,” Daniel whispered nervously. “Those guys are really big. They look 
like they’re in high school.” 

I spotted two older boys standing on the side of the baseball field. Their 
heads were bent, and they were staring at something in the taller boy’s hands. 

Something small and round and brown. 

The Grool! 

I ran up to them. “Hey, how’s it going?” I said in my friendliest voice. “I 
know this sounds dumb, but you’ve got my favorite sponge. Can I have it back?” 

The tall boy narrowed his eyes at me. He was kind of good-looking, with 
bright green eyes, and straight blond hair down over his shoulders. 

“Your favorite sponge?” he repeated. He grinned. “Sorry. You’re mistaken. 
This is my favorite sponge.” 

“No. Really,” I insisted. “It fell off that kid’s bike.” I pointed to Carlo. He 
and Daniel stood watching from a distance. “I really need it.” 

“Can you prove it’s yours?” the boy demanded. He rolled it around in his 
hand. “I don’t see your name on it.” 

I narrowed my eyes and gave him my meanest glare. “You’d better give it 
back to me,” I threatened. “Because it’s not really a sponge. It’s evil. It brings 
bad luck to anyone who has it.” 

“Oooh, I’m really scared,” he teased. “Maybe it’s bad luck for you— 



because you’re not getting it back!” 

He waved the Grool in front of my face, then called to his friend, “Hey, 
Dave. Catch!” 

He tossed the Grool to Dave. “Here,” he snickered. “Catch some bad luck!” 

“Hey, give me that!” I leaped for the Grool. But the sponge sailed high over 
my head. 

Back and forth they threw the Grool, laughing, keeping it high over my 
head, out of my reach. 

They were having fun. I wasn’t. 

After ten minutes of their stupid keep-away game, I gave up. 

Fine, I thought. Let them play with the Grool. 

They would soon find out that it didn’t play fair, I thought nastily. 

As I backed off, I shouted at the two older boys, “You’ll be sorry.” 

The blond guy shrugged his shoulders, laughed, and hurried off to take his 
turn at bat. He made a big show of tucking the sponge into his back pocket— 
where he knew I couldn’t get it. 

He stepped to the plate, crouched in a batter’s stance... 

Thwock! 

The very first pitch beaned the guy in the head. 

His eyes rolled around wildly. He wobbled, then sank to the ground. He 
collapsed in a heap and didn’t move. 

“Help!” the other boys were shouting. “Somebody—help!” 

The Grool had done its work. The bad luck had struck again! 

“Is he okay?” Daniel asked. “Is he—?” 

I didn’t answer. I saw the Grool roll out of the boy’s back pocket and onto 
the ground. 

I darted forward and dove for the evil sponge. 

But my hands closed around dry grass. 

Dave, the blond boy’s friend, snatched the Grool before I could reach it. 

“Go chase it!” he cried. He heaved the little creature high into the sky. 



24 


I made a desperate grab. But Dave was much taller than me. He caught the Grool 
easily. 

“Here. Take it,” he said. He tossed it at me. Then he hurried over to check 
on his friend. 

The blond boy was sitting up now, rubbing his head. “I’m okay,” he kept 
repeating. “Really. I’m okay. What hit me?” 

Daniel and I hurried to our bikes. Carlo came running after us. I tossed the 
Grool into my bike basket. 

The sponge creature pulsed so violently that the basket shook as I rode. Its 
body changed from red to black, red to black, changing in time to its horrible 
breathing. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. 

It snickered with joy. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

It acted so pleased with itself. So happy it had knocked the blond boy out. 

“You’re disgusting!” I shouted. “I’m taking you home and locking you in 
that cage!” 

I pedaled rapidly, standing up for an extra boost of speed. Home, I thought. 
Get me home. 

I zoomed down Oak Street, hunching over the bike with my head down. 
Faster, faster I pedaled. 

The wind whipped my hair into my eyes. 

I heard Daniel calling out from behind me. 

But I was riding too fast. The wind rushed past me. I couldn’t make out 
Daniel’s words. 

I heard him call out again. 

And then I heard the blare of a horn and the shrill squeal of brakes. 

I turned around in time to see an enormous black and silver truck skidding 
over the street, about to crush me like a bug. 



25 


I squeezed my brakes hard. 

The truck skidded up behind me, tires scraping the pavement, horn blaring. 

My bike lurched to a stop—and I tumbled off. 

Hit the pavement hard on my elbows and knees. 

The bike bounced on to the curb. Toppled over. 

I rolled on to the grass. 

As the truck swerved away. Squealed to a stop. 

Missed me by less than a foot. 

I climbed shakily to my feet. And stood there on the side of the road, too 
terrified to move. 

I turned to see the truck driver toss open the door of his cab. “What were 
you doing in the middle of the street?” he shouted at me. “I could have killed 
you! Do your parents know you’re out here like this?” 

Great, I thought bitterly. First this guy almost squashes me into a pancake— 
then he yells at me. 

“Sorry!” I called. 

What else could I say? 

I waited for the truck driver to back up and drive away. 

And all the time, I kept thinking: Bad luck forever. I’m going to have bad 
luck forever. 

I called to Daniel and Carlo that I was okay. Then I raced down Oak Street 
and turned on to Maple. 

Only two houses to go, I thought. I pushed down harder on the pedals. 

Blam! 

My front tire hit something. A broken bottle, I think. 

The bike toppled on to its side, and I fell with it. 

“Ow!” I cried. I’m spending a lot of time on the ground, I realized. 

I examined the tire. Completely shredded. 

Bad luck. Bad luck forever. 

Heh, heh, heh. I heard the Grool’s wicked laugh. 

The sound filled me with rage. I kicked the bicycle and stubbed my toe on 



the metal wheel rim. 

“Oww!” I yelped, grabbing my foot. 

Bad luck. Bad luck forever. 

With a furious cry, I grabbed the evil sponge and flung it to the ground. 
Then I jumped back on my bike and started to run over the Grool. 

Back and forth, back and forth. 

Squishing the evil creature into the ground. 

“Stop it! Stop!” Daniel screamed, riding up onto the grass. “You can’t kill 
the Grool. You’re only giving it what it wants.” 

I glared at my brother. I struggled to catch my breath. 

“Look at it!” Daniel shouted, pointing. “The Grool is getting even more 
excited. You’re helping it, not hurting it!” 

I lowered my eyes to the Grool. It pulsed faster than before. An evil light 
shone from its ugly little eyes. Its blood-red body gleamed in the afternoon sun. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

The cruel snicker cut through the air like fingernails on a blackboard. 

I grabbed my bike and wheeled it to our driveway. I let it fall on to the 
asphalt. 

Then I ran back to the Grool, gripped it tightly in one hand, and carried it 
into the house. 

Daniel followed close behind me. “Now what are you going to do?” he 
asked. 

“You’ll see,” I said. I made my way into the kitchen. 

My heart pounded. I could feel the blood racing at my temples. 

I jammed the Grool into the kitchen sink drain. Then I grabbed a wooden 
spatula and stabbed at the Grool, shoving it deep into the pipe. 

Daniel stood beside me, watching in silence. 

I turned the hot water on full force. I flicked a switch next to the sink and 
smiled at my brother. 

The garbage disposal gurgled on. 

The gurgle became a whine. 

The whine became a roar as the grinding teeth went to work. 

“Yes!” I cried happily. “Yes!” 

A few seconds later, the disposal had ground up the Grool. 

“That’s the end of that,” I told Daniel, sighing happily. I listened to the 
pipes run clean. “Down the drain! Yaaay!” 



Carlo came running into the kitchen. “What’s happening?” he cried 
breathlessly. “Where’s the Grool?” 

I turned to Carlo, grinning. “It’s gone. The Grool is gone!” I announced 
gleefully. 

Then I heard my brother gasp. 

I saw his mouth drop open as he stared down at the sink. “No, it’s not.” His 
voice was so low, I could barely hear him. “No, it’s not gone,” he whispered. 



26 


I lowered my eyes to the sink. 

And realized at once what had horrified Daniel. 

The hot water had started to back up. 

It splashed and spurted up from the drain. As if something were pushing it 
with great force. 

The hot water churned quickly—rolling up from the pipe below. 

“I don’t believe it!” Carlo cried. 

The Grool popped up, bobbing in the churning hot water. 

There it was. Still in one piece. It had turned bright purple, an angry purple. 
As I stared down at it in horror, it thumped wildly in the sink. 

“No!” I screamed. “It’s impossible! You can’t be back!! You can’t!” 

I grabbed the sopping wet Grool and squeezed it as hard as I could. 

A river of water ran out of the slimy thing and into the sink. 

The harder I gripped, the warmer the Grool felt. 

Warmer and warmer and... 

“Ow!” I dropped it as it became scorching hot. Quickly, I ran my hands 
under soothing cold water. 

The Grool perched on the side of the sink. It throbbed with joy, leered up at 
me with its creepy eyes, and let out an evil cackle. 

“Daniel, Carlo,” I moaned. “There has to be a way to kill this thing! There 
has to! Think, guys!” 

But the two of them stared in silence at the throbbing Grool. 

“Come on, Daniel—think!” I waved my hand in front of Daniel’s face. 
“Help me! I’m all out of ideas.” 

Suddenly, his eyes came back into focus. “I’ve got an idea,” he said quietly. 

He rushed out of the kitchen. “I’ll be right back,” he shouted, leaving Carlo 
and me alone with the nasty creature. 

“I hate you!” I shouted at it. But my anger seemed to make it pulse faster. 

A short while later, Daniel hurried back into the room. “Maybe this will 
help,” he announced. He set the Encyclopedia of the Weird on the kitchen table. 

“I borrowed it from the library,” he explained. “I thought we might need it.” 



He started to search for “Grool” in the index. 

“Oh, Daniel,” I sighed wearily. “We’ve already read everything in that book 
about Grools. It can’t help us.” 

“But maybe you missed something important,” Carlo insisted. 

Daniel flipped through the pages of the encyclopedia. “Here’s the part about 
killing the Grool,” he said. “Let’s see what it says.” 

He started reading: “The Grool cannot be killed—by force or by any violent 
means. ” 

“That’s it?” I demanded. “There’s nothing else?” 

Daniel slammed the book shut. “Nothing else,” he replied sadly. “Kat, it 
really can’t be killed. It’s the most evil creature in the world and it can’t be 
killed. Not by force. Not by violence. Not by anything.” 

“Not by force,” I repeated, thinking hard. “Not by violence.” 

I stared at the throbbing, purple creature. 

“Hmmmm.” I couldn’t help but smile. 

“Kat? What’s your problem?” Daniel demanded. “Are you totally losing it? 
Why are you smiling?” 

“Because the Grool can be killed,” I announced. “And I’ve just figured out 
how to do it.” 

“Huh?” Carlo cried. “You’ve really figured it out?” 

“What are you going to do?” Daniel demanded. “You can’t kill it. It always 
conies back to life.” 

I shook my head. “We’ll see,” I replied. 

I wanted to think my plan through before I explained it to them. 

Actually, it turned out to be pretty simple. 



27 


Much as I hated to, I picked up the throbbing Grool from the sink and held it 
gently in my hands. 

I patted the disgusting creature tenderly on its wrinkled head. Then I sang to 
it sweetly: 

“Lullaby and good night, little Grool, I love you. Please sleep tight, little 
Grool, la la la, la la la.” 

“Kat, I’m worried about you,” Daniel groaned. “Stop it, okay? You’re a 
little messed up. You need to lie down.” 

But I just kept singing as sweetly as I could. 

“What is she doing?” Daniel asked Carlo. “Do you get it?” 

Carlo shook his head. 

I didn’t pay any attention to them. 

I had to concentrate. 

I forced myself to stroke the Grool lovingly. I hugged the slimy thing and 
cuddled it in my arms—as I would a soft puppy. 

I cooed in its ear: 

“Little Grool, cute Grool, you are so nice, so sweet, so wonderful. I love 
you, Grool.” 

“Kat, please stop,” Daniel begged. “You’re upsetting me. I’m really worried 
about you, Kat.” 

“How can you pet the thing?” Carlo demanded. “It’s so gross!” 

“Sweet, Grool,” I whispered. “So sweet.” I cuddled it tenderly and stroked 
its wrinkled skin. 

If this doesn’t work, I told myself, nothing will. 

“I’m going to get Mom and Dad,” Daniel threatened. He started backing 
toward the kitchen door. 

“Ssshhh.” I raised a finger to my lips. Then I pointed down at the Grool 
cradled in my arms. “Look, guys.” 

The Grool’s violent throbbing had slowed to a gentle pulse. 

I sang some more, softly, gently, sweetly. 

And we all watched in amazement as the Grool’s color faded. From red to 



pink, and—finally—back to its ordinary dull brown color. 

“Wow!” Daniel whistled. 

“Keep watching,” I said, hugging the Grool closely. I sang another lullaby. 

The Grool let out a low sigh. I could see it shrinking, see it drying up in my 
arms. 

Its eyes closed. The dry, brown skin covered them up. 

“It—it’s getting weaker, Kat,” Daniel whispered excitedly. 

“Keep watching,” I told him. Then I cooed to the Grool, “There, there little 
Grool. What a sweet Grool.” I rocked it like a baby. 

The Grool’s breathing slowed—slowed—then stopped. 

The Grool slumped lifelessly in my hand. Not a sound. Not a throb. Not a 
twitch. 

“Now, check this out!” I announced to Daniel and Carlo. 

I raised the wrinkled sponge to my face—and planted a big fat kiss on it. 



28 


The two boys made disgusted faces. 

But I knew what I was doing. 

I lowered the Grool from my face and studied it carefully. 

“Aaaaaaaah. ” The sponge let out a long, slow sigh—and shrank into a tiny 

ball. 

I took a deep breath and blew. 

The tiny ball flew apart. Dry, brown puffs floated into the air. 

I watched the feathery puffs float to the floor. Then I wiped my hands off on 
a towel. “All done.” 

“It—it’s gone!” Carlo declared. 

“But how?” Daniel demanded. 

“Well, you helped give me the idea,” I told him. 

“I did?” 

“Yes,” I replied. “When you read that part of the encyclopedia that said the 
Grool can’t be killed by force or violence.” 

I smiled. “I kept going over that in my mind. And finally, it hit me.” 

“What hit you?” Carlo asked. 

“I knew the Grool couldn’t be killed by force or violence,” I explained. 
“But what about the opposite? I guessed that no one had ever tried being nice to 
it before.” 

Both boys stared at me in rapt silence. “That gave me the idea that being 
kind was the secret to destroying the Grool,” I continued. “And it worked. The 
Grool was so evil that it couldn’t stand being loved.” 

“Wow!” Carlo breathed. 

“Excellent!” Daniel exclaimed. “I’m glad I came up with it.” 

“Yeah, it’s great to have a genius in the family,” I said sarcastically. 

I reached into my back pocket and pulled out the twelve dollars my 
grandma had sent for my birthday. “What do you say we celebrate with ice¬ 
cream?” I suggested with a grin. 

“Excellent!” the two boys cried happily. 

“Maybe our luck will change now,” I told Daniel. “I bet we become the 



luckiest family on the block.” 

Then I heard it. That familiar, terrifying, breathing sound again. 

I swung around and faced the door. 

“What’s that?” I cried, my heart sinking. “Do you hear it, too?” 

Yes. We all heard it. 

My throat felt dry. Cold chills ran down my back. The breathing grew 
louder. Closer. “I didn’t kill it,” I moaned. “It’s back. It’s back!” 



29 


Daniel grabbed my hand. I could see the fear on his face. 

Carlo took a step back from the door. He backed up till he bumped against 
the kitchen counter. 

We huddled together in the kitchen, afraid to move. Afraid to go look. 

“We have no choice,” I choked out finally. “If it’s back, we have to let it 

in.” 

I took a deep breath. My legs didn’t want to carry me. They felt as if they 
were made of lead. 

But I forced myself to the back door. 

My entire body trembled as I reached for the doorknob. And yanked the 
door open. 

“Oh!” I let out a startled cry. 

Killer gazed up at me, breathing noisily, his stub of a tail wagging furiously. 

“Killer!” I yelled joyfully. “You’re back!” I bent down to hug him. But the 
dog ran past me, into the kitchen. 

Daniel let out a happy cry and pulled the wiggling dog into his arms. Killer 
covered Daniel’s face with wet licks. 

“Our luck has changed!” I declared. 

I looked outside. 

Wow! Healthy green grass covered the ground. The flowers lifted their 
drooping heads and burst back into dazzling color as I watched. 

All of the Grool’s evil seemed to be disappearing. 

I grabbed Killer and hugged him hard. “Killer, Killer,” I crooned. “We got 
rid of the Grool.” 

“Come on,” Daniel cried. “Ice-cream time!” 

I set Killer back on the floor and kissed him on the head. “We’ll be back 
soon, boy,” I said. 

“To the ice-cream parlor!” Daniel shouted as he dashed outside. “Race 
you!” he cried as he ran down the street. “The winner gets a triple-decker 
sundae!” 

Carlo and I took off after Daniel. I pumped my legs hard and pulled out in 
front. 



But at the last minute, Daniel pushed past me and tagged the door of the 
restaurant. “I won!” Daniel cried happily. 

We hurried into the ice-cream parlor. “Table for three,” Daniel said with a 
grin. The waitress seated us, handed out menus, and wiped the table with a... 
sponge! 

“Yuck! Get that thing out of here!” Daniel shrieked. 

The waitress didn’t understand. But we all laughed—for the first time in 
weeks. 

“Don’t mind my brother,” I said. “He’s got a thing about sponges.” He 
kicked me under the table, and I pinched him back hard. 

The waitress rolled her eyes. Then she took our orders. 

As we shoveled down our sundaes, I realized how hungry I was—and how 
happy I was. 

The Grool was gone—forever. 

We were so full that we practically rolled back home. 

“Killer. Here, boy!” I pushed the back door open and stepped into the 
kitchen. 

“Hey—Killer? Come here! Aren’t you glad to see us?” 

Killer didn’t turn around. 

He stood at the sink, growling and wagging his tail. He had his nose pressed 
up against the cabinet door, trying to push it open. 

“All right, Killer. We had our ice-cream. Now it’s time for your treat,” I 

said. 

I put down a fresh bowl of dog food—and added a few small pieces of last 
night’s turkey. 

“Come on Killer. Dinnertime,” I called. 

He growled at the cabinet underneath the sink. 

What’s going on? This dog never walks away from a meal, I thought. 
“Killer,” Daniel said, “what are you doing under there? Killer?” 

I bent down and petted the dog’s back. “Killer, there’s nothing in there. The 
Grool is gone.” 

But Killer kept growling. 

“Okay, okay.” I yanked the cabinet door open for the dog. “See?” 

Killer shoved his head inside. 

I grabbed him by the scruff of his neck and pulled him out. He carried 



something in his teeth. 

“What is that, boy?” Daniel asked. 

Killer dropped his find on the floor, then gazed up at me. 

I picked it up. Hmmm. Something hard. Lumpy. 

“What is it?” Daniel asked, stepping close. 

I breathed a sigh of relief. “No problem. It’s only a potato.” 
I started to hand it to Daniel. 

But something sharp pricked my finger. 

“Ow!” I cried, startled. 

I rolled the potato over in my hand. 

It felt warm. I could feel it breathing. 

“Daniel, I don’t like the looks of this,” I murmured. 

The potato had a mouth full of teeth. 




NIGHT OF THE 
LIVING DUMMY II 

Goosebumps - 31 
R.L. Stine 


1 


My name is Amy Kramer, and every Thursday night I feel a little dumb. That’s 
because Thursday is “Family Sharing Night” at my house. 

Sara and Jed think it’s dumb, too. But Mom and Dad won’t listen to our 
complaints. “It’s the most important night of the week,” Dad says. 

“It’s a family tradition,” Mom adds. “It’s something you kids will always 
remember.” 

Right, Mom. It’s something I’ll always remember as really painful and 
embarrassing. 

You’ve probably guessed that on Family Sharing Night, every member of 
the Kramer family—except for George, our cat—has to share something with the 
rest of the family. 

It isn’t so bad for my sister, Sara. Sara is fourteen—two years older than me 
—and she’s a genius painter. Really. One of her paintings was chosen for a show 
at the art museum downtown. Sara may go to a special arts high school next 
year. 

So Sara always shares some sketches she’s working on. Or a new painting. 

And Family Sharing Night isn’t so bad for Jed, either. My ten-year-old 
brother is such a total goof. He doesn’t care what he shares. One Thursday night, 
he burped really loud and explained that he was sharing his dinner. 

Jed laughed like a lunatic. 

But Mom and Dad didn’t think it was funny. They gave Jed a stern lecture 
about taking Family Sharing Night more seriously. 

The next Thursday night, my obnoxious brother shared a note that David 
Miller, a kid at my school, had written to me. A very personal note! Jed found 
the note in my room and decided to share it with everyone. 

Nice? 

I wanted to die. I really did. 

Jed just thinks he’s so cute and adorable, he can get away with anything. He 
thinks he’s really special. 

I think it’s because he’s the only redhead in the family. Sara and I both have 
straight black hair, dark green eyes, and very tan skin. With his pale skin, 
freckled face, and curly red hair, Jed looks like he comes from another family! 



And sometimes Sara and I both wish he did. 

Anyway, I’m the one with the most problems on Family Sharing Night. 
Because I’m not really talented the way Sara is. And I’m not a total goof like 
Jed. 

So I never really know what to share. 

I mean, I have a seashell collection, which I keep in a jar on my dresser. But 
it’s really kind of boring to hold up shells and talk about them. And we haven’t 
been to the ocean for nearly two years. So my shells are kind of old, and 
everyone has already seen them. 

I also have a really good collection of CDs. But no one else in my family is 
into Bob Marley and reggae music. If I start to share some music with them, they 
all hold their ears and complain till I shut it off. 

So I usually make up some kind of a story—an adventure story about a girl 
who survives danger after danger. Or a wild fairy tale about princesses who turn 
into tigers. 

After my last story, Dad had a big smile on his face. “Amy is going to be a 
famous writer,” he announced. “She’s so good at making up stories.” Dad gazed 
around the room, still smiling. “We have such a talented family!” he exclaimed. 

I knew he was just saying that to be a good parent. To “encourage” me. Sara 
is the real talent in our family. Everyone knows that. 

Tonight, Jed was the first to share. Mom and Dad sat on the living room 
couch. Dad had taken out a tissue and was squinting as he cleaned his glasses. 
Dad can’t stand to have the tiniest speck of dust on his glasses. He cleans them 
about twenty times a day. 

I settled in the big brown armchair against the wall. Sara sat cross-legged 
on the carpet beside my chair. 

“What are you going to share tonight?” Mom asked Jed. “And I hope it isn’t 
another horrible burp.” 

“That was so gross!” Sara moaned. 

“Your face is gross!” Jed shot back. He stuck out his tongue at Sara. 

“Jed, please—give us a break tonight,” Dad muttered, slipping his glasses 
back on, adjusting them on his nose. “Don’t cause trouble.” 

“She started it,” Jed insisted, pointing at Sara. 

“Just share something,” I told Jed, sighing. 

“I’m going to share your freckles,” Sara told him. “I’m going to pull them 
off one by one and feed them to George.” 



Sara and I laughed. George didn’t glance up. He was curled up, napping on 
the carpet beside the couch. 

“That’s not funny, girls,” Mom snapped. “Stop being mean to your brother.” 

“This is supposed to be a family night,” Dad wailed. “Why can’t we be a 
family?” 

“We are!” Jed insisted. 

Dad frowned and shook his head. He looks like an owl when he does that. 
“Jed, are you going to share something?” he demanded weakly. 

Jed nodded. “Yeah.” He stood in the center of the room and shoved his 
hands into his jeans pockets. He wears loose, baggy jeans about ten sizes too big. 
They always look as if they’re about to fall down. Jed thinks that’s cool. 

“I... uh... learned to whistle through my fingers,” he announced. 

“Wow,” Sara muttered sarcastically. 

Jed ignored her. He pulled his hands from his pockets. Then he stuck his 
two little fingers into the sides of his mouth—and let out a long, shrill whistle. 

He whistled through his fingers two more times. Then he took a deep bow. 
The whole family burst into loud applause. 

Jed, grinning, took another low bow. 

“Such a talented family!” Dad declared. This time, he meant it as a joke. 

Jed dropped down on the floor beside George, startling the poor cat awake. 

“Your turn next, Amy,” Mom said, turning to me. “Are you going to tell us 
another story?” 

“Her stories are too long!” Jed complained. 

George climbed unsteadily to his feet and moved a few feet away from Jed. 
Yawning, the cat dropped on to his stomach beside Mom’s feet. 

“I’m not going to tell a story tonight,” I announced. I picked up Dennis 
from behind my armchair. 

Sara and Jed both groaned. 

“Hey—give me a break!” I shouted. I settled back on the edge of the chair, 
fixing my dummy on my lap. “I thought I’d talk to Dennis tonight,” I told Mom 
and Dad. 

They had half-smiles on their faces. I didn’t care. I’d been practicing with 
Dennis all week. And I wanted to try out my new comedy routine with him. 

“Amy is a lousy ventriloquist,” Jed chimed in. “You can see her lips move.” 

“Be quiet, Jed. I think Dennis is funny,” Sara said. She scooted toward the 
couch so she could see better. 



I balanced Dennis on my left knee and wrapped my fingers around the 
string in his back that worked his mouth. Dennis is a very old ventriloquist’s 
dummy. The paint on his face is faded. One eye is almost completely white. His 
turtle-neck sweater is torn and tattered. 

But I have a lot of fun with him. When my five-year-old cousins come to 
visit, I like to entertain them with Dennis. They squeal and laugh. They think 
I’m a riot. 

I think I’m getting much better with Dennis. Despite Jed’s complaints. 

I took a deep breath, glanced at Mom and Dad, and began my act. 

“How are you tonight, Dennis?” I asked. 

“Not too well,” I made the dummy reply in a high, shrill voice. Dennis’ 
voice. 

“Really, Dennis? What’s wrong?” 

“I think I caught a bug. ” 

“You mean you have the flu?” I asked him. 

“No. Termites!” 

Mom and Dad laughed. Sara smiled. Jed groaned loudly. 

I turned back to Dennis. “Well, have you been to a doctor?” I asked him. 

“No. A carpenter! ” 

Mom and Dad smiled at that one, but didn’t laugh. Jed groaned again. Sara 
stuck her finger down her throat, pretending to puke. 

“No one liked that joke, Dennis,” I told him. 

“Who’s joking?” I made Dennis reply. 

“This is lame,” I heard Jed mutter to Sara. She nodded her head in 
agreement. 

“Let’s change the subject, Dennis,” I said, shifting the dummy to my other 
knee. “Do you have a girlfriend?” 

I leaned Dennis forward, trying to make him nod his head yes. But his head 
rolled right off his shoulders. 

The wooden head hit the floor with a thud and bounced over to George. The 
cat leaped up and scampered away. 

Sara and Jed collapsed in laughter, slapping each other high fives. 

I jumped angrily to my feet. “Dad!” I screamed. “You promised you’d buy 
me a new dummy!” 

Jed scurried over to the rug and picked up Dennis’ head. He pulled the 
string, making the dummy’s mouth move. “Amy reeks! Amy reeks!” Jed made 



the dummy repeat over and over. 

“Give me that!” I grabbed the head angrily from Jed’s hand. 

“Amy reeks! Amy reeks!” Jed continued chanting. 

“That’s enough!” Mom shouted, jumping up off the couch. 

Jed retreated back to the wall. 

“I’ve been checking the stores for a new dummy,” Dad told me, pulling off 
his glasses again and examining them closely. “But they’re all so expensive.” 

“Well, how am I ever going to get better at this?” I demanded. “Dennis’ 
head falls off every time I use him!” 

“Do your best,” Mom said. 

What did that mean? I always hated it when she said that. 

“Instead of Family Sharing Night, we should call this the Thursday Night 
Fights,” Sara declared. 

Jed raised his fists. “Want to fight?” he asked Sara. 

“It’s your turn, Sara,” Mom replied, narrowing her eyes at Jed. “What are 
you sharing tonight?” 

“I have a new painting,” Sara announced. “It’s a watercolor.” 

“Of what?” Dad asked, settling his glasses back on his face. 

“Remember that cabin we had in Maine a few summers ago?” Sara replied, 
tossing back her straight black hair. “The one overlooking the dark rock cliff? I 
found a snapshot of it, and I tried to paint it.” 

I suddenly felt really angry and upset. I admit it. I was jealous of Sara. 

Here she was, about to share another beautiful watercolor. And here I was, 
rolling a stupid wooden dummy head in my lap. 

It just wasn’t fair! 

“You’ll have to come to my room to see it,” Sara was saying. “It’s still 
wet.” 

We all stood up and trooped to Sara’s room. 

My family lives in a long, one-story ranch-style house. My room and Jed’s 
room are at the end of one hallway. The living room, dining room, and kitchen 
are in the middle. Sara’s room and my parents’ room are down the other hall, 
way at the other end of the house. 

I led the way down the hall. Behind me, Sara was going on and on about all 
the trouble she’d had with the painting and how she’d solved the problems. 

“I remember that cabin so well,” Dad said. 

“I can’t wait to see the painting,” Mom added. 



I stepped into Sara’s room and clicked on the light. 

Then I turned to the easel by the window that held the painting—and let out 
a scream of horror. 



2 


My mouth dropped open in shock. I stared at the painting, unable to speak. 

When Sara saw it, she let out a shriek. “I—I don’t believe it!” she screamed. 
“Who did that?” 

Someone had painted a yellow-and-black smile face in the corner of her 
painting. Right in the middle of the black rock cliff. Mom and Dad stepped up to 
the easel, fretful expressions on their faces. They studied the smile face, then 
turned to Jed. 

Jed burst out laughing. “Do you like it?” he asked innocently. 

“Jed—how could you!” Sara exploded. “I’ll kill you! I really will!” 

“The painting was too dark,” Jed explained with a shrug. “I wanted to 
brighten it up.” 

“But... but... but...” my sister sputtered. She balled her hands into fists, 
shook them at Jed, and uttered a loud cry of rage. 

“Jed—what were you doing in Sara’s room?” Mom demanded. 

Sara doesn’t like for anyone to go into her precious room without a written 
invitation! 

“Young man, you know you’re never allowed to touch your sister’s 
paintings,” Dad scolded. 

“I can paint, too,” Jed replied. “I’m a good painter.” 

“Then do your own paintings!” Sara snapped. “Don’t sneak in here and 
mess up my work!” 

“I didn’t sneak,” Jed insisted. He sneered at Sara. “I was just trying to 
help.” 

“You were not!” Sara screamed, angrily tossing her black hair over her 
shoulder. “You ruined my painting!” 

“Your painting reeks!” Jed shot back. 

“Enough!” Mom shouted. She grabbed Jed by both shoulders. “Jed—look 
at me! You don’t seem to see how serious this is. This is the worst thing you’ve 
ever done!” 

Jed’s smile finally faded. 

I took another glance at the ugly smile face he had slopped on to Sara’s 
watercolor. Since he’s the baby in the family, Jed thinks he can get away with 



anything. 

But I knew that this time he had gone too far. 

After all, Sara is the star of the family. She’s the talented one. The one with 
the painting that hung in a museum. Messing with Sara’s precious painting was 
bound to get Jed in major trouble. 

Sara is so stuck-up about her paintings. A few times, I even thought about 
painting something funny on one of them. But of course I only thought it. I 
would never do anything that horrible. 

“You don’t have to be jealous of your sister’s work,” Dad was telling Jed. 
“We’re all talented in this family.” 

“Oh, sure,” Jed muttered. He has this weird habit. Whenever he’s in trouble, 
he doesn’t say he’s sorry. Instead, he gets really angry. “What’s your talent, 
Dad?” Jed demanded, sneering. 

Dad’s jaw tightened. He narrowed his eyes at Jed. “We’re not discussing 
me,” he said in a low voice. “But I’ll tell you. My talent is my Chinese cooking. 
You see, there are all kinds of talents, Jed.” 

Dad considers himself a Master of the Wok. Once or twice a week, he 
chops a ton of vegetables into little pieces and fries them up in the electric wok 
Mom got him for Christmas. 

We pretend it tastes great. 

No point in hurting Dad’s feelings. 

“Is Jed going to be punished or not?” Sara demanded in a shrill voice. 

She had opened her box of watercolor paints and was rolling a brush in the 
black. Then she began painting over the smile face with quick, furious strokes. 

“Yes, Jed is going to be punished,” Mom replied, glaring at him. Jed 
lowered his eyes to the floor. “First he’s going to apologize to Sara.” 

We all waited. 

It took Jed a while. But he finally managed to mutter, “Sorry, Sara.” 

He started to leave the room, but Mom grabbed his shoulders again and 
pulled him back. “Not so fast, Jed,” she told him. “Your punishment is you can’t 
go to the movies with Josh and Matt on Saturday. And... no video games for a 
week.” 

“Mom—give me a break!” Jed whined. 

“What you did was really bad,” Mom said sternly. “Maybe this punishment 
will make you realize how horrible it was.” 

“But I have to go to the movies!” Jed protested. 



“You can’t,” Mom replied softly. “And no arguing, or I’ll add on to your 
punishment. Now go to your room.” 

“I don’t think it’s enough punishment,” Sara said, dabbing away at her 
painting. 

“Keep out of it, Sara,” Mom snapped. 

“Yeah. Keep out of it,” Jed muttered. He stomped out of the room and down 
the long hall to his room. 

Dad sighed. He swept a hand back over his bald head. “Family Sharing 
Night is over,” he said sadly. 


* * * 


I stayed in Sara’s room and watched her repair the painting for a while. She kept 
tsk-tsking and shaking her head. 

“I have to make the rocks much darker, or the paint won’t cover the stupid 
smile face,” she explained unhappily. “But if I make the rocks darker, I have to 
change the sky. The whole balance is ruined.” 

“I think it looks pretty good,” I told her, trying to cheer her up. 

“How could Jed do that?” Sara demanded, dipping her brush in the water 
jar. “How could he sneak in here and totally destroy a work of art?” 

I was feeling sorry for Sara. But that remark made me lose all sympathy. I 
mean, why couldn’t she just call it a watercolor painting? Why did she have to 
call it “a work of art”? 

Sometimes she is so stuck-up and so in love with herself, it makes me sick. 

I turned and left the room. She didn’t even notice. 

I went down the hall to my room and called my friend Margo. We talked for 
a while about stuff. And we made plans to get together the next day. 

As I talked on the phone, I could hear Jed in his room next door. He was 
pacing back and forth, tossing things around, making a lot of noise. 

Sometimes I spell the word “Jed” B-R-A-T. 

Margo’s dad made her get off the phone. He’s real strict. He never lets her 
talk for more than ten or fifteen minutes. 

I wandered into the kitchen and made myself a bowl of Frosted Flakes. My 
favorite late snack. When I was a little kid, I used to have a bowl of cereal every 
night before bed. And I just never got out of the habit. 

I rinsed out the bowl. Then I said good night to Mom and Dad and went to 



bed. 


It was a warm spring night. A soft breeze fluttered the curtains over the 
window. Pale light from a big half-moon filled the window and spilled on to the 
floor. 

I fell into a deep sleep as soon as my head hit the pillow. 

A short while later, something woke me up. I’m not sure what. 

Still half asleep, I blinked my eyes open and raised myself on my pillow. I 
struggled to see clearly. 

The curtains flapped over the window. 

I felt as if I were still asleep, dreaming. 

But what I saw in the window snapped me awake. 

The curtains billowed, then lifted away. 

And in the silvery light, I saw a face. 

An ugly, grinning face in my bedroom window. Staring through the 
darkness at me. 



3 


The curtains flapped again. 

The face didn’t move. 

“Who—?” I choked out, squeezing the sheet up to my chin. 

The eyes stared in at me. Cold, unblinking eyes. 

Dummy eyes. 

Dennis. 

Dennis stared blankly at me, his white eye catching the glow of the 
moonlight. 

I let out an angry roar, tossed off the sheet, and bolted out of bed. To the 
window. 

I pushed away the billowing curtains and grabbed Dennis’ head off the 
window ledge. “Who put you there?” I demanded, holding the head between my 
hands. “Who did it, Dennis?” 

I heard soft laughter behind me. From the hallway. 

I flew across the room, the head still in my hands. I pulled open my 
bedroom door. 

Jed held his hand over his mouth, muffling his laughter. “Gotcha!” he 
whispered gleefully. 

“Jed—you creep!” I cried. I let the dummy head drop to the floor. Then I 
grabbed Jed’s pajama pants with both hands and jerked them up as high as I 
could—nearly to his chin! 

He let out a gasp of pain and stumbled back against the wall. 

“Why did you do that?” I demanded in an angry whisper. “Why did you put 
the dummy head on my window ledge?” 

Jed tugged his pajama pants back into place. “To pay you back,” he 
muttered. 

“Huh? Me?” I shrieked. “I didn’t do anything to you. What did I do?” 

“You didn’t stick up for me,” he grumbled, scratching his red curly hair. His 
eyes narrowed at me. “You didn’t say anything to help me out. You know. About 
Sara’s painting.” 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “How could I help you out? What could I say?” 

“You could have said it was no big deal,” Jed replied. 



“But it was a big deal!” I told him. “You know how seriously Sara takes her 
paintings.” I shook my head. “I’m sorry, Jed. But you deserve to be punished. 
You really do.” 

He stared at me across the dim hallway, thinking about what I’d said. Then 
an evil smile spread slowly over his freckled face. “Hope I didn’t scare you too 
much, Amy.” He snickered. Then he picked Dennis’ head up off the carpet and 
tossed it at me. 

I caught it in one hand. “Go to sleep, Jed,” I told him. “And don’t mess with 
Dennis again!” 

I stepped back into my room and closed the door. I tossed Dennis’ head 
onto a pile of clothes on my desk chair. Then I climbed wearily back into bed. 

So much trouble around here tonight, I thought, shutting my eyes, trying to 
relax. 

So much trouble... 

Two days later, Dad brought home a present for me. A new ventriloquist’s 
dummy. That’s when the real trouble began. 



4 


Margo came over the next afternoon. Margo is real tiny, sort of like a mini¬ 
person. She has a tiny face, and is very pretty, with bright blue eyes, and delicate 
features. 

Her blond hair is very light and very fine. She let it grow this year. It’s just 
about down to her tiny little waist. 

She’s nearly a foot shorter than me, even though we both turned twelve in 
February. She’s very smart and very popular. But the boys like to make fun of 
her soft, whispery voice. 

Today she was wearing a bright blue tank top tucked into white tennis 
shorts. “I bought the new Beatles collection,” she told me as she stepped into the 
house. She held up a CD box. 

Margo loves the Beatles. She doesn’t listen to any of the new groups. In her 
room, she has an entire shelf of Beatles CDs and tapes. And she has Beatles 
posters on her walls. 

We went to my room and put on the CD. Margo settled on the bed. I 
sprawled on the carpet across from her. 

“My dad almost didn’t let me come over,” Margo told me, pushing her long 
hair behind her shoulder. “He thought he might need me to work at the 
restaurant.” 

Margo’s dad owns a huge restaurant downtown called The Party House. It’s 
not really a restaurant. It’s a big, old house filled with enormous rooms where 
people can hold parties. 

A lot of kids have birthday parties there. And there are bar mitzvahs and 
confirmations and wedding receptions there, too. Sometimes there are six parties 
going on at once! 

One Beatles song ended. The next song, “Love Me Do”, started up. 

“I love this song!” Margo exclaimed. She sang along with it for a while. I 
tried singing with her, but I’m totally tone deaf. As my dad says, I can’t carry a 
tune in a wheelbarrow. 

“Well, I’m glad you didn’t have to work today,” I told Margo. 

“Me, too,” Margo sighed. “Dad always gives me the worst jobs. You know. 
Clearing tables. Or putting away dishes. Or wrapping up garbage bags. Yuck.” 



She started singing again—and then stopped. She sat up on the bed. “Amy, 
I almost forgot. Dad may have a job for you.” 

“Excuse me?” I replied. “Wrapping up garbage bags? I don’t think so, 
Margo.” 

“No. No. Listen,” Margo pleaded excitedly in her mouselike voice. “It’s a 
good job. Dad has a bunch of birthday parties coming up. For teeny tiny kids. 
You know. Two-year-olds. Maybe three- or four-year-olds. And he thought you 
could entertain them.” 

“Huh?” I stared at my friend. I still didn’t understand. “You mean, sing or 
something?” 

“No. With Dennis,” Margo explained. She twisted a lock of hair around in 
her fingers and bobbed her head in time to the music as she talked. “Dad saw 
you with Dennis at the sixth-grade talent night. He was really impressed.” 

“He was? I was terrible that night!” I replied. 

“Well, Dad didn’t think so. He wonders if you’d like to come to the 
birthday parties and put on a show with Dennis. The little kids will love it. Dad 
said he’d even pay you.” 

“Wow! That’s cool!” I replied. What an exciting idea. 

Then I remembered something. 

I jumped to my feet, crossed the room to the chair, and held up Dennis’ 
head. “One small problem,” I groaned. 

Margo let go of her hair and made a sick face. “His head? Why did you take 
off his head?” 

“I didn’t,” I replied. “It fell off. Every time I use Dennis, his head falls off.” 

“Oh.” Margo uttered a disappointed sigh. “The head looks weird all by 
itself. I don’t think little kids would like it if it fell off.” 

“I don’t think so,” I agreed. 

“It might frighten them or something,” Margo said. “You know. Give them 
nightmares. Make them think their own head might fall off.” 

“Dennis is totally wrecked. Dad promised me a new dummy. But he hasn’t 
been able to find one.” 

“Too bad,” Margo replied. “You’d have fun performing for the kids.” 

We listened to more Beatles music. Then Margo had to go home. 

A few minutes after she left, I heard the front door slam. 

“Hey, Amy! Amy—are you home?” I heard Dad call from the living room. 

“Coming!” I called. I made my way to the front of the house. Dad stood in 



the entryway, a long carton under his arm, a smile on his face. 

He handed the carton to me. “Happy Un-birthday!” he exclaimed. 

“Dad! Is it—?” I cried. I tore open the carton. “Yes!” Anew dummy! 

I lifted him carefully out of the carton. 

The dummy had wavy brown hair painted on top of his wooden head. I 
studied his face. It was kind of strange. Kind of intense. His eyes were bright 
blue—not faded like Dennis’. He had bright red painted lips, curved up into an 
eerie smile. His lower lip had a chip on one side so that it didn’t quite match the 
other lip. 

As I pulled him from the box, the dummy appeared to stare into my eyes. 
The eyes sparkled. The grin grew wider. 

I felt a sudden chill. Why does this dummy seem to be laughing at me? I 
wondered. 

I held him up, examining him carefully. He wore a gray, double-breasted 
suit over a white shirt collar. The collar was stapled to his neck. He didn’t have a 
shirt. Instead, his wooden chest had been painted white. 

Big, black leather shoes were attached to the ends of his thin, dangling legs. 

“Dad—he’s great!” I exclaimed. 

“I found him in a pawnshop,” Dad said, picking up the dummy’s hand and 
pretending to shake hands with it. “How do you do, Slappy.” 

“Slappy? Is that his name?” 

“That’s what the man in the store said,” Dad replied. He lifted Slappy’s 
arms, examining his suit. “I don’t know why he sold Slappy so cheaply. He 
practically gave the dummy away!” 

I turned the dummy around and looked for the string in his back that made 
the mouth open and close. “He’s excellent, Dad,” I said. I kissed my dad on the 
cheek. “Thanks.” 

“Do you really like him?” Dad asked. 

Slappy grinned up at me. His blue eyes stared into mine. He seemed to be 
waiting for an answer, too. 

“Yes. He’s awesome!” I said. “I like his serious eyes. They look so real.” 

“The eyes move,” Dad said. “They’re not painted on like Dennis’. They 
don’t blink, but they move from side to side.” 

I reached my hand inside the dummy’s back. “How do you make his eyes 
move?” I asked. 

“The man showed me,” Dad said. “It’s not hard. First you grab the string 



that works the mouth.” 

“I’ve got that,” I told him. 

“Then you move your hand up into the dummy’s head. There is a little lever 
up there. Do you feel it? Push on it. The eyes will move in the direction you 
push.” 

“Okay. I’ll try,” I said. 

Slowly I moved my hand up inside the dummy’s back. Through the neck. 
And into his head. 

I stopped and let out a startled cry as my hand hit something soft. 

Something soft and warm. 

His brain! 



5 


“Ohhh.” I uttered a sick moan and jerked my hand out as fast as I could. 

I could still feel the soft, warm mush on my fingers. 

“Amy—what’s wrong?” Dad cried. 

“His—his brains—!” I choked out, feeling my stomach lurch. 

“Huh? What are you talking about?” Dad grabbed the dummy from my 
hands. He turned it over and reached into the back. 

I covered my mouth with both hands and watched him reach into the head. 
His eyes widened in surprise. 

He struggled with something. Then pulled his hand out. 

“Yuck!” I groaned. “What’s that!” 

Dad stared down at the mushy, green and purple and brown object in his 
hand. “Looks like someone left a sandwich in there!” he exclaimed. 

Dad’s whole face twisted in disgust. “It’s all moldy and rotten. Must have 
been in there for months!” 

“Yuck!” I repeated, holding my nose. “It really stinks! Why would someone 
leave a sandwich in a dummy’s head?” 

“Beats me,” Dad replied, shaking his head. “And it looks like there are 
wormholes in it!” 

“Yuuuuuck!” we both cried in unison. 

Dad handed Slappy back to me. Then he hurried into the kitchen to get rid 
of the rotted, moldy sandwich. 

I heard him run the garbage disposal. Then I heard water running as he 
washed his hands. A few seconds later, Dad returned to the living room, drying 
his hands on a dish towel. 

“Maybe we’d better examine Slappy closely,” he suggested. “We don’t 
want any more surprises —do we?” 

I carried Slappy into the kitchen, and we stretched him out on the counter. 
Dad examined the dummy’s shoes carefully. They were attached to the legs and 
didn’t come off. 

I put my finger on the dummy’s chin and moved the mouth up and down. 
Then I checked out his wooden hands. 

I unbuttoned the gray suit jacket and studied the dummy’s painted shirt. 



Patches of the white paint had chipped and cracked. But it was okay. 

“Everything looks fine, Dad,” I reported. 

He nodded. Then he smelled his fingers. I guess he hadn’t washed away all 
of the stink from the rotted sandwich. 

“We’d better spray the inside of his head with disinfectant or perfume or 
something,” Dad said. 

Then, as I was buttoning up the jacket, something caught my eye. 

Something yellow. A slip of paper poking up from the jacket pocket. 

It’s probably a sales receipt, I thought. 

But when I pulled out the small square of yellow paper, I found strange 
writing on it. Weird words in a language I’d never seen before. 

I squinted hard at the paper and slowly read the words out loud: 

“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano.” 

I wonder what that means? I thought. 

And then I glanced down at Slappy’s face. 

And saw his red lips twitch. 

And saw one eye slowly close in a wink. 



6 


“D-d-dad!” I stuttered. “He—moved!” 

“Huh?” Dad had gone back to the sink to wash his hands for a third time. 
“What’s wrong with the dummy?” 

“He moved!” I cried. “He winked at me!” 

Dad came over to the counter, wiping his hands. “I told you, Amy—he 
can’t blink. The eyes only move from side to side.” 

“No!” I insisted. “He winked. His lips twitched, and he winked.” 

Dad frowned and picked up the dummy head in both hands. He raised it to 
examine it. “Well... maybe the eyelids are loose,” he said. “I’ll see if I can 
tighten them up. Maybe if I take a screwdriver I can—” 

Dad didn’t finish his sentence. 

Because the dummy swung his wooden hand up and hit Dad on the side of 
the head. 

“Ow!” Dad cried, dropping the dummy back onto the counter. Dad grabbed 
his cheek. “Hey—stop it, Amy! That hurt!” 

“Me?” I shrieked. “I didn’t do it!” 

Dad glared at me, rubbing his cheek. It had turned bright red. 

“The dummy did it!” I insisted. “I didn’t touch him, Dad! I didn’t move his 
hand!” 

“Not funny,” Dad muttered. “You know I don’t like practical jokes.” 

I opened my mouth to answer, but no words came out. I decided I’d better 
just shut up. 

Of course Dad wouldn’t believe that the dummy had slapped him. 

I didn’t believe it myself. 

Dad must have pulled too hard when he was examining the head. Dad 
jerked the hand up without realizing it. 

That’s how I explained it to myself. 

What other explanation could there be? 

I apologized to Dad. Then we washed Slappy’s face with a damp sponge. We 
cleaned him up and sprayed disinfectant inside his head. 



He was starting to look pretty good. 

I thanked Dad again and hurried to my room. I set Slappy down on the chair 
beside Dennis. Then I phoned Margo. 

“I got a new dummy,” I told her excitedly. “I can perform for the kids’ 
birthday parties. At The Party House.” 

“That’s great, Amy!” Margo exclaimed. “Now all you need is an act.” 

She was right. 

I needed jokes. A lot of jokes. If I was going to perform with Slappy in 
front of dozens of kids, I needed a long comedy act. 

The next day after school, I hurried to the library. I took out every joke 
book I could find. I carried them home and studied them. I wrote down all the 
jokes I thought I could use with Slappy. 

After dinner, I should have been doing my homework. Instead, I practiced 
with Slappy. I sat in front of the mirror and watched myself with him. 

I tried hard to speak clearly but not move my lips. And I tried hard to move 
Slappy’s mouth so that it really looked as if he were talking. 

Working his mouth and moving his eyes at the same time was pretty hard. 
But after a while, it became easier. 

I tried some knock-knock jokes with Slappy. I thought little kids might like 
those. 

“Knock knock,” I made Slappy say. 

“Who’s there?” I asked him, staring into his eyes as if I were really talking 
to him. 

“Jane,” Slappy said. 

“Jane who?” 

“Jane jer clothes. You stink!” 

I practiced each joke over and over, watching myself in the mirror. I wanted 
to be a really good ventriloquist. I wanted to be excellent. I wanted to be as good 
with Slappy as Sara is with her paints. 

I practiced some more knock-knock jokes and some jokes about animals. 
Jokes I thought little kids would find funny. 

I’ll try them out on Family Sharing Night, I decided. It will make Dad 
happy to see how hard I’m working with Slappy. At least I know Slappy’s head 
won’t fall off. 

I glanced across the room at Dennis. He looked so sad and forlorn, 
crumpled in the chair, his head tilted nearly sideways on his shoulders. 



Then I propped Slappy up and turned back to the mirror. 

“Knock knock.” 

“Who’s there?” 

“Wayne.” 

“Wayne who?” 

“Wayne wayne, go away! Come again another day!” 

On Thursday night, I was actually eager to finish dinner so that Sharing Night 
could begin. I couldn’t wait to show my family my new act with Slappy. 

We had spaghetti for dinner. I like spaghetti, but Jed always ruins it. 

He’s so gross. He sat across the table from me, and he kept opening his 
mouth wide, showing me a mouth full of chewed-up spaghetti. 

Then he’d laugh because he cracks himself up. And spaghetti sauce would 
run down his chin. 

By the time dinner was over, Jed had spaghetti sauce smeared all over his 
face and all over the tablecloth around his plate. 

No one seemed to notice. Mom and Dad were too busy listening to Sara 
brag about her grades. For a change. 

Report cards were being handed out tomorrow. Sara was sure she was 
getting all A’s. 

I was sure, too. Sure I wasn’t getting all A’s! 

I’d be lucky to get a C in math. I really messed up the last two tests. And I 
probably wasn’t going to do real well in science, either. My weather balloon 
project fell apart, so I hadn’t handed it in yet. 

I finished my spaghetti and mopped up some of the leftover sauce on my 
plate with a chunk of bread. 

When I glanced up, Jed had stuck two carrot sticks in his nose. “Amy, 
check this out. I’m a walrus!” he cried, grinning. He let out a few urk urks and 
clapped his hands together like a walrus. 

“Jed—stop that!” Mom cried sharply. She made a disgusted face. “Get 
those out of your nose.” 

“Make him eat them, Mom!” I cried. 

Jed stuck his tongue out at me. It was orange from the spaghetti sauce. 

“Look at you. You’re a mess!” Mom shouted at Jed. “Go get cleaned up. 
Now! Hurry! Wash all that sauce off your face.” 

Jed groaned. But he climbed to his feet and headed to the bathroom. 



“Did he eat anything? Or did he just rub it all over himself?” Dad asked, 
rolling his eyes. Dad had some sauce on his chin, too, but I didn’t say anything. 

“You interrupted me,” Sara said impatiently. “I was telling you about the 
State Art Contest. Remember? I sent my flower painting in for that?” 

“Oh, yes,” Mom replied. “Have you heard from the judges?” 

I didn’t listen to Sara’s reply. My mind wandered. I started thinking again 
about how bad my report card was going to be. I had to force myself to stop 
thinking about it. 

“Uh... I’ll clear the dishes,” I announced. 

I started to stand up. 

But I stopped with a startled cry when I saw the short figure creep into the 
living room. 

A dummy! 

My dummy. 

He was crawling across the room! 



7 


I let out another cry. I pointed to the living room with a trembling finger. “M- 
mom! Dad!” I stammered. 

Sara was still talking about the art competition. But she turned to see what 
everyone was gaping at. 

The dummy’s head popped out from behind the armchair. 

“It’s Dennis!” I cried. 

I heard muffled laughter. Jed’s muffled laughter. 

The dummy reached up both hands and pulled off his own head. And Jed’s 
head popped up through the green turtleneck. He still had spaghetti sauce 
smeared on his cheeks. He was laughing hard. 

Everyone else started to laugh, too. Everyone but me. 

Jed had really frightened me. 

He had pulled the neck of his sweater way up over his head. Then he had 
tucked Dennis’ wooden head inside the turtleneck. 

Jed was so short and thin. It really looked as if Dennis were creeping into 
the room. 

“Stop laughing!” I shouted at my family. “It isn’t funny!” 

“I think it’s very funny!” Mom cried. “What a crazy thing to think of!” 

“Very clever,” Dad added. 

“It’s not clever,” I insisted. I glared furiously at my brother. “I always knew 
you were a dummy!” I screamed at him. 

“Amy, you really were scared,” Sara accused. “You nearly dropped your 
teeth!” 

“Not true!” I sputtered. “I knew it was Dennis—I mean—Jed!” 

Now everyone started laughing at me! I could feel my face getting hot, and 
I knew I was blushing. 

That made them all laugh even harder. 

Nice family, huh? 

I climbed to my feet, walked around the table, and took Dennis’ head away 
from Jed. “Don’t go in my room,” I told him through clenched teeth. “And don’t 
mess with my stuff.” I stomped away to put the dummy head back in my room. 



“It was just a joke, Amy,” I heard Sara call after me. 

“Yeah. It was just a joke,” Jed repeated nastily. 

“Ha-ha!” I shouted back at them. “What a riot!” 

My anger had faded away by the time we started Family Sharing Night. We 
settled in the living room, taking our usual places. 

Mom volunteered to go first. She told a funny story about something that 
had happened at work. 

Mom works in a fancy women’s clothing store downtown. She told us 
about a really big woman who came into the store and insisted on trying on only 
tiny sizes. 

The woman ripped every piece of clothing she tried on—and then bought 
them all! “They’re not for me,” the woman explained. “They’re for my sister!” 

We all laughed. But I was surprised Mom told that story. Because Mom is 
pretty chubby. And she’s very sensitive about it. 

About as sensitive as Dad is about being bald. 

Dad was the next to share. He brought out his guitar, and we all groaned. 
Dad thinks he’s a great singer. But he’s nearly as tone deaf as I am. 

He loves singing all these old folk songs from the sixties. There’s supposed 
to be some kind of message in them. But Sara, Jed, and I have no idea what he’s 
singing about. 

Dad strummed away and sang something about not working on Maggie’s 
farm anymore. At least, I think that’s what he was saying. 

We all clapped and cheered. But Dad knew we didn’t really mean it. 

It was Jed’s turn next. But he insisted that he had already shared. “Dressing 
up like Dennis—that was it,” he said. 

No one wanted to argue with him. “Your turn, Amy,” Mom said, leaning 
against Dad on the couch. Dad fiddled with his glasses, then settled back. 

I picked up Slappy and arranged him on my lap. I was feeling a little 
nervous. I wanted to do a good job and impress them with my new comedy act. 

I’d been practicing all week, and I knew the jokes by heart. But as I slipped 
my hand into Slappy’s back and found the string, my stomach felt all fluttery. 

I cleared my throat and began. 

“This is Slappy, everyone,” I said. “Slappy, say hi to my family.” 

“Hi to my family! ” I made Slappy say. I made his eyes slide back and forth. 

They all chuckled. 



“This dummy is much better!” Mom commented. 

“But it’s the same old ventriloquist,” Sara said cruelly. 

I glared at her. 

“Just joking! Just joking!” my sister insisted. 

“I think that dummy reeks,” Jed chimed in. 

“Give Amy a break,” Dad said sharply. “Go ahead, Amy.” 

I cleared my throat again. It suddenly felt very dry. “Slappy and I are going 
to tell some knock-knock jokes,” I announced. I turned to face Slappy and made 
him turn his head to me. “Knock knock,” I said. 

“Knock it off! ” came the harsh reply. 

Slappy spun around to face my Mom. “Hey — don’t break the sofa, fatso!” 
he rasped. “Why don’t you skip the French fries and have a salad once in a 
while?” 

“Huh?” Mom gasped in shock. “Amy—” 

“Amy, that’s not funny!” Dad cried angrily. 

“What’s your problem, baldy?” Slappy shouted. “Is that your head—or are 
you hatching an ostrich egg on your neck?” 

“That’s enough, Amy!” Dad cried, jumping to his feet. “Stop it—right 
now!” 

“But—but—Dad—!” I sputtered. 

“Why don’t you put an extra hole in your head and use it for a bowling 
ball?” Slappy screamed at Dad. 

“Your jokes are horrible!” Mom exclaimed. “They’re hurtful and insulting.” 

“It’s not funny, Amy!” Dad fumed. “It’s not funny to hurt people’s 
feelings.” 

“But, Dad—” I replied. “I didn’t say any of that! It wasn’t me! It was 
Slappy! Really! I wasn’t saying it! I wasn’t!” 

Slappy raised his head. His red-lipped grin appeared to spread. His blue 
eyes sparkled. “Did I mention you are all ugly?” he asked. 



8 


Everyone started shouting at once. 

I stood up and dropped Slappy facedown on the armchair. 

My legs were trembling. My entire body was shaking. 

What’s going on here? I asked myself. I didn’t say those things. I really 
didn’t. 

But Slappy can’t be talking on his own —can he? 

Of course not, I realized. 

But what did that mean? Did that mean I was saying those horrible, 
insulting things to my parents without even knowing it? 

Mom and Dad stood side by side, staring at me angrily, demanding to know 
why I insulted them. 

“Did you really think that was funny?” Mom asked. “Didn’t you think it 
would hurt my feelings to call me fatso?” 

Meanwhile, Jed was sprawled on his back in the middle of the floor, 
giggling like a moron. He thought the whole thing was a riot. 

Sara sat cross-legged against the wall, shaking her head, her black hair 
falling over her face. “You’re in major trouble,” she muttered. “What’s your 
problem, Amy?” 

I turned to Mom and Dad. My hands were balled into tight fists. I couldn’t 
stop shaking. 

“You’ve got to believe me!” I shrieked. “I didn’t say those things! I really 
didn’t!” 

“Yeah. Right. Slappy is a baaad dude!” Jed chimed in, grinning. 

“Everybody, just be quiet!” Dad screamed. His face turned bright red. 

Mom squeezed his arm. She didn’t like it when he got too angry or excited. 
I guess she worried he might totally explode or something. 

Dad crossed his arms in front of his chest. I saw that he had a sweat stain on 
the chest of his polo shirt. His face was still red. 

The room suddenly fell silent. 

“Amy, we’re not going to believe you,” Dad said softly. 

“But—but—but—” 



He raised a hand to silence me. 

“You’re a wonderful storyteller, Amy,” Dad continued. “You make up 
wonderful fantasies and fairy tales. But we’re not going to believe this one. I’m 
sorry. We’re not going to believe that your dummy spoke up on his own.” 

“But he did! ” I screamed. I felt like bursting out in sobs. I bit my lip hard, 
trying to force them back. 

Dad shook his head. “No, Slappy didn’t insult us. You said those things, 
Amy. You did. And now I want you to apologize to your mother and me. Then I 
want you to take your dummy and go to your room.” 

There was no way they’d ever believe me. No way. I wasn’t sure I believed 
it myself. 

“Sorry,” I muttered, still holding back the tears. “Really. I’m sorry.” 

With an unhappy sigh, I lifted Slappy off the chair. I carried him around the 
waist so that his arms and legs dangled toward the floor. “Good night,” I said. I 
walked slowly toward my room. 

“What about my turn?” I heard Sara ask. 

“Sharing Night is over,” Dad replied grumpily. “You two—get lost. Leave 
your mom and me alone.” 

Dad sounded really upset. 

I didn’t blame him. 

I stepped into my room and closed the door behind me. Then I lifted Slappy 
up, holding him under the shoulders. I raised his face to mine. 

His eyes seemed to stare into my face. 

Such cold blue eyes, I thought. 

His bright red lips curled up into that smirking grin. The smile suddenly 
seemed evil. Mocking. 

As if Slappy were laughing at me. 

But of course that was impossible. My wild imagination was playing tricks 
on me, I decided. 

Frightening tricks. 

Slappy was just a dummy, after all. Just a hunk of painted wood. 

I stared hard into those cold blue eyes. “Slappy, look at all the trouble you 
caused me tonight,” I told him. 

Thursday night had been awful. Totally awful. 

But Friday turned out to be much worse. 



9 


First I dropped my tray in the lunchroom. The trays were all wet, and mine just 
slipped out of my hand. 

The plates clattered on the floor, and my lunch spilled all over my new 
white sneakers. Everyone in the lunchroom clapped and cheered. 

Was I embarrassed? Take three guesses. 

Later that afternoon, report cards were handed out. 

Sara came home grinning and singing. Nothing makes her more happy than 
being perfect. And her report card was perfect. All A’s. 

She insisted on showing it to me three times. She showed it to Jed three 
times, too. And we both had to tell her how wonderful she was each time. 

I’m being unfair to Sara. 

She was happy and excited. And she had a right to be. Her report card was 
perfect— and her flower painting won the blue ribbon in the State Art Contest. 

So I shouldn’t blame her for dancing around the house and singing at the 
top of her lungs. 

She wasn’t trying to rub it in. She wasn’t trying to make me feel like a 
lowly slug because my report card had two C’s. One in math and one in science. 

It wasn’t Sara’s fault that I had received my worst report card ever. 

So I tried to hold back my jealous feelings and not strangle her the tenth 
time she told me about the art prize. But it wasn’t easy. 

The worst part of my report card wasn’t the two C’s. It was the little note 
Miss Carson wrote at the bottom. 

It said: Amy isn’t working to the best of her ability. If she worked harder, she 
could do much better than this. 

I don’t think teachers should be allowed to write notes on report cards. I 
think getting grades is bad enough. 

I tried to make up some kind of story to explain the two C’s to my parents. I 
planned to tell them that everyone in the class got C’s in math and science. “Miss 
Carson didn’t have time to grade our papers. So she gave us all C’s—just to be 
fair.” 

It was a good story. But not a great story. 

No way Mom and Dad would buy that one. 



I paced back and forth in my room, trying to think of a better story. After a 
while, I noticed Slappy staring at me. 

He sat in the chair beside Dennis, grinning and staring. 

Slappy’s eyes weren’t following me as I paced—were they? 

I felt a chill run down my back. 

It really seemed as if the eyes were watching me, moving as I moved. 

I darted to the chair and turned Slappy so that his back was to me. I didn’t 
have time to think about a stupid dummy. My parents would be home from work 
any minute. And I needed a good story to explain my awful report card. 

Did I come up with one? No. 

Were my parents upset? Yes. 

Mom said she would help me get better organized. Dad said he would help 
me understand my math problems. The last time Dad helped me with my math, I 
nearly flunked! 

Even Jed—the total goof-off—got a better report card than me. They don’t 
give grades in the lower school. The teacher just writes a report about you. 

And Jed’s report said that he was a great kid and a really good student. That 
teacher must be sick! 

I stared at Jed across the dinner table. He opened his mouth wide to show 
me a mouth full of chewed-up peas. 

Sick! 

“You reek,” he said to me. For no reason at all. 

Sometimes I wonder why families were invented. 

Saturday morning, I called Margo. “I can’t come over,” I told her with a sigh. 
“My parents won’t let me.” 

“My report card wasn’t too good, either,” Margo replied. “Miss Carson 
wrote a note at the bottom. She said I talk too much in class.” 

“Miss Carson talks too much,” I said bitterly. 

As I chatted with Margo, I stared at myself in the dresser mirror. I look too 
much like Sara, I thought. Why do I have to look like her twin? Maybe I’ll cut 
my hair really short. Or get a tattoo. 

I wasn’t thinking too clearly. 

I was too angry that my parents weren’t allowing me to go over to Margo’s 
house. 

“This is bad news,” Margo said. “I wanted to talk to you about performing 



with Slappy at my dad’s place.” 

“I know,” I replied sadly. “But they’re not letting me go anywhere until my 
science project is finished.” 

“You still haven’t turned that in?” Margo demanded. 

“I kind of forgot about it,” I confessed. “I did the project part—for the 
second time. I just have to write the report.” 

“Well, I told you, Daddy has a birthday party for a dozen three-year-olds 
next Saturday,” Margo said. “And he wants you and Slappy to entertain them.” 

“As soon as I finish the science report, I’m going to start rehearsing,” I 
promised. “Tell your dad not to worry, Margo. Tell him I’ll be great.” 

We chatted for a few more minutes. Then my mom shouted for me to get 
off the phone. I talked for a little while longer—until Mom shouted a second 
time. Then I said good-bye to Margo and hung up. 

I slaved over my computer all morning and most of the afternoon. And I 
finished the science report. 

It wasn’t easy. Jed kept coming into my room, begging me to play a 
Nintendo game with him. “Just one! ” And I had to keep tossing him out. 

When I finally finished writing the paper, I printed it out and read it one 
more time. I thought it was pretty good. 

What it needs is a really great-looking cover, I decided. 

I wanted to get a bunch of colored markers and do a really bright cover. But 
my markers were all dried up. 

I tossed them into the trash and made my way to Sara’s room. I knew that 
she had an entire drawer filled with colored markers. 

Sara was at the mall with a bunch of her friends. Miss Perfect could go out 
and spend Saturday doing whatever she wanted. Because she was perfect. 

I knew she wouldn’t mind if I borrowed a few markers. 

Jed stopped me outside her door. “One game of Battle Chess!” he pleaded. 
“Just one game!” 

“No way,” I told him. I placed my hand on top of his head. His red, curly 
hair felt so soft. I pushed him out of my way. “You always murder me at Battle 
Chess. And I’m not finished with my work yet.” 

“Why are you going in Sara’s room?” he demanded. 

“None of your business,” I told him. 

“You reek,” he said. “You double reek, Amy.” 

I ignored him and made my way into Sara’s room to borrow the markers. 



I spent nearly an hour making the cover. I filled it with molecules and 
atoms, all in different colors. Miss Carson will be impressed, I decided. 

Sara returned home just as I finished. She was carrying a big shopping bag 
filled with clothes she’d bought at Banana Republic. 

She started to her room with the bag. “Mom—come see what I bought,” she 
called. 

Mom appeared, carrying a stack of freshly laundered towels. 

“Can I see, too?” I called. I followed them to Sara’s room. 

But Sara stopped at her door. 

The bag fell from her hand. 

And she let out a scream. 

Mom and I crowded behind her. We peered into the bedroom. 

What a mess! 

Someone had overturned about a dozen jars of paint. Reds, yellows, blues. 
The paint had spread over Sara’s white carpet, like a big, colorful mud puddle. 

I gasped and blinked several times. It was unreal! 

“I don’t believe it!” Sara kept shrieking. “I don’t believe it!” 

“The carpet is ruined!” Mom exclaimed, taking one step into the room. 

The emptied paint jars were on their sides, strewn around the room. 

“Jed!” Mom shouted angrily. “Jed—get in here! Now!” 

We turned to see Jed right behind us in the hall. “You don’t have to shout,” 
he said softly. 

Mom narrowed her eyes angrily at my brother. “Jed—how could you?” she 
demanded through clenched teeth. 

“Excuse me?” He gazed up at her innocently. 

“Jed—don’t lie!” Sara screamed. “Did you do this? Did you go in my room 
again?” 

“No way!” Jed protested, shaking his head. “I didn’t go in your room today, 
Sara. Not once. But I saw Amy go in. And she wouldn’t tell me why.” 



10 


Sara and Mom both turned accusing eyes on me. 

“How could you?” Sara screamed, walking around the big paint puddle. 
“How could you?” 

“Whoa! Wait! I didn’t! I didn’t!” I cried frantically. 

“I asked Amy why she was going in here,” Jed chimed in. “And she said it 
was none of my business.” 

“Amy!” Mom cried. “I’m horrified. I’m truly horrified. This—this is sick!” 

“Yes, it’s sick,” Sara repeated, shaking her head. “All of my poster paint. 
All of it. What a mess. I know why you did it. It’s because you’re jealous of my 
perfect report card.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” I wailed. “I didn’t! I didn’t! I didn’t!” 

“Amy—no one else could have,” Mom replied. “If Jed didn’t do it, then—” 

“But I only came in here to borrow markers!” 

I cried in a trembling voice. “That’s all. I needed markers.” 

“Amy—” Mom started, pointing to the huge paint puddle. 

“I’ll show you!” I cried. “I’ll show you what I borrowed.” 

I ran to my room. My hands were shaking as I scooped Sara’s markers off 
my desk. My heart pounded. 

How could they accuse me of something so terrible? I asked myself. 

Is that what everyone thinks of me? That I’m such a monster? 

That I’m so jealous of my sister, I’d pour out all her paints and ruin her rug? 

Do they really think I’m crazy? 

I ran back to Sara’s room, carrying the markers in both hands. Jed sat on 
Sara’s bed, staring down at the thick red, blue, and yellow puddle. 

Mom and Sara stood over it, gazing down and shaking their heads. Mom 
kept making clucking noises with her tongue. She kept pressing her hands 
against her cheeks. 

“Here! See?” I cried. I shoved the markers toward them. “That’s why I 
came in here. I’m not lying!” 

Some of the markers fell out of my hands. I bent to pick them up. 

“Amy, there were only three of us home this afternoon,” Mom said. She 



was trying to keep her voice low and calm. But she spoke through gritted teeth. 
“You, me, and Jed.” 

“I know—” I started. 

Mom raised a hand to silence me. “I certainly didn’t do this horrible thing,” 
Mom continued. “And Jed says that he didn’t do it. So...” Her voice trailed off. 

“Mom—I’m not a sicko!” I shrieked. “I’m not!” 

“You’ll feel better if you confess,” Mom said. “Then we can talk about this 
calmly, and—” 

“But I didn’t do it! ” I raged. 

With a cry of anger, I flung the markers to the floor. Then I spun around, 
bolted from Sara’s room, and ran down the long hall to my room. 

I slammed the door and threw myself facedown onto my bed. I started 
sobbing loudly. I don’t know how long I cried. 

Finally, I stood up. My face was sopping wet, and my nose was running. I 
started to the dresser to get a tissue. 

But something caught my eye. 

Hadn’t I turned Slappy around so that his back was turned to me? 

Now he was sitting facing me, staring up at me, his red-lipped grin wider 
than ever. 

Did I turn him back around? Did I? 

I didn’t remember. 

And what did I see on Slappy’s shoes? 

I wiped the tears from my eyes with the backs of my hands. Then I took a 
few steps toward the dummy, squinting hard at his big leather shoes. 

What was that on his shoes? 

Red and blue and yellow... paint? 

Yes. 

With a startled gasp, I grabbed both shoes by the heels and raised them 
close to my face. 

Yes. 

Drips of paint on Slappy’s shoes. 

“Slappy—what is going on here?” I asked out loud. “What is going on?” 



11 


When Dad came home and saw Sara’s room, he nearly exploded. 

I was actually worried about him. His face turned as red as a tomato. His 
chest started heaving in and out. And horrible gurgling noises came up from his 
throat. 

The whole family gathered in the living room. We took our Sharing Night 
places. Only, this wasn’t Family Sharing Night. This was What Are We Going 
To Do About Amy Night. 

“Amy, first you have to tell us the truth,” Mom said. She sat stiffly on the 
couch, squeezing her hands together in her lap. 

Dad sat on the other end of the couch, tapping one hand nervously against 
the couch arm, chewing his lower lip. Jed and Sara sat on the floor against the 
wall. 

“I am telling the truth,” I insisted shrilly. I slumped in the armchair across 
from them. My hair fell over my forehead, but I didn’t bother to brush it back. 
My white T-shirt had tear stains on the front, still damp. “If you would only 
listen to me,” I pleaded. 

“Okay, we’re listening,” Mom replied. 

“When I went into my room,” I started, “there were splashes of paint on 
Slappy’s shoes. And—” 

“Enough!” Dad cried, jumping to his feet. 

“But, Dad—” I protested. 

“Enough!” he insisted. He pointed a finger at me. “No more wild stories, 
young lady. Storytime is over. We don’t want to hear about paint stains on 
Slappy. We want an explanation for the crime that was committed in Sara’s room 
today.” 

“But I am giving an explanation!” I wailed. “Why did Slappy have paint on 
his shoes? Why?” 

Dad dropped back onto the couch with a sigh. He whispered something to 
Mom. She whispered back. 

I thought I heard them mention the word “doctor”. 

“Are you—are you going to take me to a psychiatrist?” I asked timidly. 

“Do you think you need one?” Mom replied, staring hard at me. 



I shook my head. “No.” 

“Your father and I will talk about this,” Mom said. “We will figure out the 
best thing to do.” 

The best thing to do? 

They grounded me for two weeks. No movies. 

No friends over. No trips to the mall. No trips anywhere. 

I heard them talking about finding me a counselor. But they didn’t say 
anything about it to me. 

All week, I could feel them watching me. Studying me as if I were some 
kind of alien creature. 

Sara was pretty cold to me. Her room had to be emptied out and a new rug 
installed. She wasn’t happy about it. 

Even Jed treated me differently. He kind of tiptoed around me and kept his 
distance, as if I had a bad cold or something. He didn’t tease me, or tell me that I 
reek, or call me names. 

I really missed it. No kidding. 

How did I feel? I felt miserable. 

I wanted to get sick. I wanted to catch a really bad stomach flu or 
something so they’d all feel sorry for me and stop treating me like a criminal. 

One good thing: They said I could perform with Slappy at The Party House 
on Saturday. 

Whenever I picked Slappy up, I felt a little weird. I remembered the paint 
on his shoes and the mess in my sister’s room. 

But I couldn’t come up with one single explanation. So I practiced with 
Slappy every night. 

I had put a lot of good jokes together. Silly jokes I thought little three-year- 
olds would find funny. 

And I studied myself in the mirror. I was getting better at not moving my 
lips. And it was getting easier to make Slappy’s mouth and eyes move correctly. 

“Knock knock,” I made Slappy say. 

“Who’s there?” I asked. 

“Eddie.” 

“Eddie who?” I asked. 

“Eddie-body got a tissue? I hab a teddible cold!” 

And then I pulled back Slappy’s head, opened his mouth really wide, and 



jerked his whole body as I made him sneeze and sneeze and sneeze. 

I thought that would really crack up the three-year-olds. 

Every night, I worked and worked on our comedy act. I worked so hard. 

I didn’t know that the act would never go on. 

On Saturday afternoon, Mom dropped me off at The Party House. “Have a good 
show!” she called as she drove away. 

I carried Slappy carefully in my arms. Margo met me at the door. She 
greeted me with an excited smile. 

“Just in time!” she cried. “The kids are almost all here. They’re total 
animals!” 

“Oh, great!” I muttered, rolling my eyes. 

“They’re total animals, but they’re so cute!” Margo added. 

She led me through the twisting hallway to the party room in back. Clusters 
of red and yellow balloons covered the ceiling. I saw a brightly decorated table, 
all yellow and red. A balloon on a string floated up from each chair around the 
table. Each balloon had the name of a guest on it. 

The kids really were cute. They were dressed mostly in jeans and bright T- 
shirts. Two of the girls wore frilly party dresses. 

I counted ten of them, all running wildly, chasing each other in the huge 
room. 

Their mothers were grouped around a long table against the back wall. 
Some of them were sitting down. Some were standing, huddled together, 
chatting. Some were calling to their kids to stop being so wild. 

“I’m helping out, pouring the punch and stuff,” Margo told me. “Dad wants 
you to do your act first thing. You know. To quiet the kids down.” 

I swallowed hard. “First thing, huh?” 

I had been excited. I could barely choke down my tuna fish sandwich at 
lunch. But now I began to feel nervous. I had major fluttering in my stomach. 

Margo led me to the front of the room. I saw a low wooden platform there, 
painted bright blue. That was the stage. 

Seeing the stage made my heart start to pound. My mouth suddenly felt 
very dry. 

Could I really step up on that stage and do my act in front of all these 
people? Kids and mothers? 

I had forgotten that the mothers would all be there. Seeing adults in the 



audience made me even more nervous. 

“Here is the birthday girl,” a woman’s voice said. 

I turned to see a smiling mother. She held the hand of a beautiful little girl. 
The girl gazed up at me with sparkling blue eyes. She had straight black hair, a 
lot like mine, only silkier and finer. She had a bright yellow ribbon in her hair. It 
matched her short yellow party dress and yellow sneakers. 

“This is Alicia,” the mother announced. 

“Hi. I’m Amy,” I replied. 

“Alicia would like to meet your dummy,” the woman said. 

“Is he real?” Alicia asked. 

I didn’t know how to answer that question. “He’s a real dummy,” I told 
Alicia. 

I propped Slappy up in my arms and slipped my hand into his back. “This is 
Slappy,” I told the little girl. “Slappy, this is Alicia.” 

“How do you do?” I made Slappy say. 

Alicia and her mother both laughed. Alicia stared up at the dummy with her 
sparkling blue eyes. 

“How old are you?” I made Slappy say. 

Alicia held up three fingers. “I’m fffree,” she told him. 

“Would you like to shake hands with Slappy?” I asked. 

Alicia nodded. 

I lowered the dummy a little. I pushed forward Slappy’s right hand. “Go 
ahead,” I urged Alicia. “Take his hand.” 

Alicia reached up and grabbed Slappy’s hand. She giggled. 

“Happy Birthday,” Slappy said. 

Alicia shook his hand gently. Then she started to back away. 

“We can’t wait to see your show,” Alicia’s mother said to me. “I know the 
kids are going to love it.” 

“I hope so!” I replied. My stomach fluttered again. I was still really 
nervous. 

“Let go!” Alicia cried. She tugged at Slappy’s hand. She giggled. “He won’t 
let go!” 

Alicia’s mom laughed. “What a funny dummy!” She grabbed Alicia’s other 
hand. “Let go of the dummy, honey. We have to get everyone in their seats for 
the show.” 

Alicia tugged a little harder. “But he won’t let go of me, Mommy!” she 



cried. “He wants to shake hands!” 

Alicia gave a hard tug. But her tiny hand was still wrapped up inside 
Slappy’s. She giggled. “He likes me. He won’t let go.” 

“Oh, look,” her mother said, glancing to the door. “Phoebe and Jennifer just 
arrived. Let’s go say hi.” 

Alicia tried to follow her mom, but Slappy held tight to her hand. Alicia’s 
smile faded. “Let go!” she insisted. 

I saw that several kids had gathered around. They watched Alicia tug at 
Slappy’s hand. 

“Let go! Let me go!” Alicia cried angrily. 

I leaned over to examine Slappy’s hand. To my surprise, it appeared that his 
hand had clenched tightly around hers. 

Alicia gave a hard tug. “Ow! He’s hurting me, Mommy!” 

More kids came over to watch. Some of them were laughing. Two little 
dark-haired boys exchanged frightened glances. 

“Please—make him let go!” Alicia wailed. She tugged again and again. 

I froze in panic. My mind whirred. I tried to think of what to do. 

Had Alicia gotten her hand caught somehow? 

Slappy’s hand couldn’t really close around hers—could it? 

Alicia’s mother was staring at me angrily. “Please let Alicia’s hand out,” 
she said impatiently. 

“He’s hurting me!” Alicia cried. “Ow! He’s squeezing my hand!” 

The room grew very quiet. The other kids were all watching now. Their 
eyes wide. Their expressions confused. 

I didn’t know what to do. I had no control for Slappy’s hands. 

My heart pounded in my chest. I tried to make a joke of it. “Slappy really 
likes you!” I told Alicia. 

But the little girl was sobbing now. Little tears rolled down her cheeks. 
“Mommy—make him stop!” 

I pulled my hand out from Slappy’s back. I grabbed his wooden hand 
between my hands. “Let go of her, Slappy!” I demanded. 

I tried pulling the fingers open. 

But I couldn’t budge them. 

“What is wrong?” Alicia’s mother was screaming. “Is her hand caught? 
What are you doing to her?” 

“He’s hurting me!” Alicia wailed. “Owwww! He’s squeezing me!” 



Several kids were crying now. Mothers rushed across the room to comfort 
them. 

Alicia’s sobs rose up over the frightened cries of the other three-year-olds. 
The harder she tugged, the tighter the wooden hand squeezed. 

“Let go, Slappy!” I shrieked, pulling his fingers. “Let go! Let go!” 

“I don’t understand!” Alicia’s mother cried. She began frantically tugging 
my arm. “What are you doing? Let her go! Let her go!” 

“Owwwww!” Alicia uttered a high, heartbreaking wail. “Make him stop! It 
hurts! It hurts!” 

And then Slappy suddenly tilted his head back. His eyes opened wide, and 
his mouth opened in a long, evil laugh. 



12 


I burst into the house and let the screen door slam behind me. I had taken the city 
bus to Logan Street. Then I had run the six blocks to my house with Slappy 
hanging over my shoulder. 

“Amy, how did it go?” Mom called from the kitchen. “Did you get a ride? I 
thought we were supposed to come pick you up.” 

I didn’t answer her. I was sobbing too hard. I ran down the hall to my room 
and slammed the door. 

I hoisted Slappy off my shoulder and tossed him into the closet. I never 
wanted to see him again. Never. 

I caught a glimpse of myself in the dresser mirror. My cheeks were swollen 
and puffy from crying. My eyes were red. My hair was wet and tangled, and 
matted to my forehead. 

I took several deep breaths and tried to stop crying. 

I kept hearing that poor little girl’s screams in my ears. Slappy finally let go 
of her after he uttered his ugly laugh. 

But Alicia couldn’t stop crying. She was so frightened! And her little hand 
was red and swollen. 

The other kids were all screaming and crying, too. 

Alicia’s mother was furious. She called Margo’s dad out from the kitchen. 
She was shaking and sputtering with anger. She said she was going to sue The 
Party House. 

Margo’s dad quietly asked me to leave. He led me to the front door. He said 
it wasn’t my fault. But he said the kids were too frightened of Slappy now. There 
was no way I could do my show. 

I saw Margo hurrying over to me. But I turned and ran out the door. 

I had never been so upset. I didn’t know what to do. A light rain had started 
to come down. I watched rainwater flow down the curb and into the sewer drain. 
I wanted to flow away with it. 

Now I threw myself onto my bed. 

I kept picturing little Alicia, screaming and crying, trying to twist out of 
Slappy’s grasp. 

Mom knocked hard on my bedroom door. “Amy? Amy—what are you 



doing? What’s wrong?” 

“Go away!” I wailed. “Just go away.” 

But she opened the door and stepped into the room. Sara came in behind 
her, a confused expression on her face. 

“Amy—the show didn’t go well?” Mom asked softly. 

“Go away!” I sobbed. “Please!” 

“Amy, you’ll do better next time,” Sara said, stepping up to the bed. She put 
a hand on my trembling shoulder. 

“Shut up!” I cried. “Shut up, Miss Perfect!” 

I didn’t mean to sound so angry. I was out of control. 

Sara stepped back, hurt. 

“Tell us what happened,” Mom insisted. “You’ll feel better if you tell us.” 

I pulled myself up until I was sitting on the edge of the bed. I wiped my 
eyes and brushed my wet hair off my face. 

And then, suddenly, the whole story burst out of me. 

I told how Slappy grabbed Alicia’s hand and wouldn’t let go. And how all 
the kids were crying. And the parents were all screaming and making a fuss. And 
how I had to leave without doing my act. 

And then I leaped to my feet, threw my arms around my mom, and started 
to sob again. 

She petted my hair, the way she used to do when I was a little girl. She kept 
whispering, “Ssshh shhhh shhhh.” 

Slowly, I began to calm down. 

“This is so weird,” Sara murmured, shaking her head. 

“I’m a little worried about you,” Mom said, holding my hands. “The little 
girl got her hand caught. That’s all. You don’t really believe that the dummy 
grabbed her hand—do you?” 

Mom stared at me hard, studying me. 

She thinks I’m crazy, I realized. She thinks I’m totally messed up. 

She doesn’t believe me. 

I decided I’d better not insist that my story was true. I shook my head. 
“Yeah. I guess her hand got caught,” I said, lowering my eyes to the floor. 

“Maybe you should put Slappy away for a while,” Mom suggested, biting 
her bottom lip. 

“Yeah. You’re right,” I agreed. I pointed. “I already put him in the closet.” 

“Good idea,” Mom replied. “Leave him in there for a while. I think you’ve 



been spending too much time with that dummy.” 

“Yeah. You need a new hobby,” Sara chimed in. 

“It wasn’t a hobby!” I snapped. 

“Well, leave him in the closet for a few days—okay, Amy?” Mom said. 

I nodded. “I never want to see him again,” I muttered. 

I thought I heard a sigh from inside the closet. But, of course, that was my 
imagination. 

“Get yourself cleaned up,” Mom instructed. “Wash your face. Then come to 
the kitchen and I’ll make you a snack.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. 

Sara followed Mom out the door. “Weird,” I heard Sara mutter. “Amy is 
getting so weird.” 

Margo called after dinner. She said she felt terrible about what had happened. 
She said her dad didn’t blame me. “He wants to give you another chance,” 
Margo told me. “Maybe with older kids.” 

“Thanks,” I replied. “But I put Slappy away for a while. I don’t know if I 
want to be a ventriloquist anymore.” 

“At the party today—what happened?” Margo asked. “What went wrong?” 
“I don’t really know,” I said. “I don’t really know.” 

That night, I went to bed early. Before I turned out the light, I glanced at the 
closet door. It was closed tightly. 

Having Slappy shut up in the closet made me feel safer. 

I fell asleep quickly. I slept a deep, dreamless sleep. 

When I awoke the next morning, I sat up and rubbed my eyes. 

Then I heard Sara’s angry screams down the hall. 

“Mom! Dad! Mom! Hurry!” Sara was shouting. “Come see what Amy did 
now!” 



13 


I shut my eyes, listening to my sister’s screams. 

What now? I thought with a shudder. What now? 

“Ohh!” I let out a low cry when I saw that my closet door was open a crack. 
My heart pounding, I climbed out of bed and began running down the hall 
to Sara’s room. Mom, Dad, and Jed were already on their way. 

“Mom! Dad! Look what she did!” Sara screamed. 

“Oh, no!” I heard Mom and Dad shriek. 

I stopped in the doorway, peered in—and gasped. 

Sara’s bedroom walls! They were smeared with red paint! 

Someone had taken a thick paintbrush and had scrawled AMY AMY AMY 
AMY in huge red letters all over Sara’s walls. 

“Noooo!” I moaned. I covered my mouth with both hands to stop the sound. 
My eyes darted from wall to wall, reading my name over and over. 

AMY AMY AMY AMY. 

Why my name? 

I suddenly felt sick. I swallowed hard, trying to force back my nausea. 

I blinked several times, trying to blink the ugly red scrawls away. 

AMY AMY AMY AMY. 

“Why?” Sara asked me in a trembling voice. She adjusted her nightshirt and 
leaned against her dresser. “Why, Amy?” 

I suddenly realized that everyone was staring at me. 

“I—I—I—” I sputtered. 

“Amy, this cannot continue,” Dad said solemnly. His expression wasn’t 
angry. It was sad. 

“We’ll get you some help, dear,” Mom said. She had tears in her eyes. Her 
chin trembled. 

Jed stood silently with his arms crossed in front of his pajama shirt. 

“Why, Amy?” Sara demanded again. 

“But—I didn’t!” I finally choked out. 

“Amy—no stories,” Mom said softly. 

“But, Mom—I didn’t do it!” I insisted shrilly. 



“This is serious,” Dad murmured, rubbing his whiskery chin. “Amy, do you 
realize how serious this is?” 

Jed reached out two fingers and rubbed them over one of the red paint 
scrawls. “Dry,” he reported. 

“That means it was done early in the night,” Dad said, his eyes locked on 
me. “Do you realize how bad this is? This isn’t just mischief.” 

I took a deep breath. My whole body was shaking. “Slappy did it!” I blurted 
out. “I’m not crazy, Dad! I’m not! You’ve got to believe me! Slappy did it!” 
“Amy, please—” Mom said softly. 

“Come with me!” I cried. “I’ll prove it. I’ll prove that Slappy did it. Come 

on!” 

I didn’t wait for them to reply. I turned and bolted from the room. 

I flew down the hall. They all followed silently behind me. 

“Is Amy sick or something?” I heard Jed ask my parents. 

I didn’t hear the answer. 

I burst into my room. They hurried close behind. 

I stepped up to the closet and pulled the door open. 

“See?” I cried, pointing to Slappy. “See? That proves it! Slappy did it!” 



14 


I pointed triumphantly at Slappy. “See? See?” 

The dummy sat crossed-legged on the closet floor. His head stood erect on 
his narrow shoulders. He appeared to grin up at us. 

Slappy’s left hand rested on the closet floor. His right hand was in his lap. 

And in his right hand he clutched a fat paintbrush. 

The bristles on the brush were caked with red paint. 

“I told you Slappy did it!” I cried, stepping back so the others could get a 
better view. 

But everyone remained silent. Mom and Dad frowned and shook their 
heads. 

Jed’s giggle broke the silence. “This is dumb,” he told Sara. 

Sara lowered her eyes and didn’t reply. 

“Oh, Amy,” Mom said, sighing. “Did you really think you could blame it 
on the dummy by putting the paintbrush in his hand?” 

“Huh?” I cried. I didn’t understand what Mom was saying. 

“Did you really expect us to believe this?” Dad asked softly. His eyes stared 
hard into mine. 

“Did you think you could put the brush into Slappy’s hand, and make us 
think he painted your name on Sara’s walls?” 

“But I didn’t /” I shrieked. 

“When did he learn how to spell?” Jed chimed in. 

“Be quiet, Jed,” Dad said sharply. “This is serious. It isn’t a joke.” 

“Sara, take Jed out of here,” Mom instructed. “The two of you go to the 
kitchen and get breakfast started.” 

Sara began to guide Jed to the door. But he pulled away. “I want to stay!” 
he cried. “I want to see how you punish Amy.” 

“Get!” Mom cried, shooing him away with both hands. 

Sara tugged him out of the room. 

I was shaking all over. I narrowed my eyes at Slappy. Had his grin grown 
even wider? 

I stared at the paintbrush in his hand. The red paint on the bristles blurred, 



blurred until I saw only red. 

I blinked several times and turned back to my parents. “You really don’t 
believe me?” I asked softly, my voice trembling. 

They shook their heads. “How can we believe you, dear?” Mom replied. 

“We can’t believe that a wooden dummy has been doing these horrible 
things in Sara’s room,” Dad added. “Why don’t you tell us the truth, Amy?” 

“But I am!” I protested. 

How could I prove it to them? How? 

I let out an angry cry and slammed the closet door shut. 

“Let’s try to calm down,” Mom urged quietly. “Let’s all get dressed and 
have some breakfast. We can talk about this when we’re feeling better.” 

“Good idea,” Dad replied, still squinting at me through his glasses. He was 
studying me as if he’d never seen me before. 

He scratched his bald head. “Guess I’ll have to call a painter for Sara’s 
room. It’ll take at least two coats to cover up the red.” 

They turned and made their way slowly from my room, talking about how 
much it was going to cost to have my sister’s room painted. 

I stood in the center of the room and shut my eyes. Every time I closed 
them, I saw red. All over Sara’s wall: 

AMY AMY AMY AMY. 

“But I didn’t do it!” I cried out loud. 

My heart pounding, I spun around. I grabbed the knob and jerked open the 
closet door. 

I grabbed Slappy by the shoulders of his gray jacket and pulled him up from 
the floor. 

The paintbrush fell from his hand. It landed with a thud beside my bare 

foot. 

I shook the dummy angrily. Shook him so hard that his arms and legs 
swung back and forth, and his head snapped back. 

Then I lifted him so that we were eye to eye. 

“Admit it!” I screamed, glaring into his grinning face. “Go ahead! Admit 
that you did it! Tell me that you did it!” 

The glassy blue eyes gazed up at me. 

Lifelessly. 

Blankly. 

Neither of us moved. 



And then, to my horror, the wooden lips parted. The red mouth slowly 
opened. 

And Slappy let out a soft, evil, “Hee hee hee. ” 



15 


“I can’t come over,” I told Margo glumly. I was sprawled on top of my bed, the 
phone pressed against my ear. “I’m not allowed out of my room all day.” 

“Huh? Why?” Margo demanded. 

I sighed. “If I told you, Margo, you wouldn’t believe me.” 

“Try me,” she replied. 

I decided not to tell her. I mean, my whole family thought I was crazy. Why 
should my best friend think it, too? 

“Maybe I’ll tell you about it when I see you,” I said. 

Silence at the other end. 

Then Margo uttered, “Wow.” 

“Wow? What does wow mean?” I cried. 

“Wow. It must be pretty bad if you can’t talk about it, Amy.” 

“It—it’s just weird,” I stammered. “Can we change the subject?” 

Another silence. “Daddy has a birthday party for six-year-olds coming up, 
Amy. And he wondered—” 

“No. Sorry,” I broke in quickly. “I put Slappy away.” 

“Excuse me?” Margo reacted with surprise. 

“I put the dummy away,” I told her. “I’m finished with that. I’m not going 
to be a ventriloquist anymore.” 

“But, Amy—” Margo protested. “You loved playing with those dummies. 
And you said you wanted to make some money, remember? So Daddy—” 

“No,” I repeated firmly. “I changed my mind, Margo. I’m sorry. Tell your 
dad I’m sorry. I—I’ll tell you about it when I see you.” 

I swallowed hard. And added: “If l ever see you.” 

“You sound terrible,” Margo replied softly. “Should I come over to your 
house? I think I could get my dad to drop me off.” 

“I’m totally grounded,” I said unhappily. “No visitors.” 

I heard footsteps in the hall. Probably Mom or Dad checking up on me. I 
wasn’t allowed to be on the phone, either. 

“Got to go. Bye, Margo,” I whispered. I hung up the phone. 

Mom knocked on my bedroom door. I recognized her knock. “Amy, want to 



talk?” she called in. 

“Not really,” I replied glumly. 

“As soon as you tell the truth, you can come out,” Mom said. 

“I know,” I muttered. 

“Why don’t you just tell the truth now? It’s such a beautiful day,” Mom 
called in. “Don’t waste the whole day in your room.” 

“I—I don’t feel like talking now,” I told her. 

She didn’t say anything else. But I could hear her standing out there. Finally 
I heard her footsteps padding back down the hall. 

I grabbed my pillow and buried my face in it. 

I wanted to shut out the world. And think. 

Think. Think. Think. 

I wasn’t going to confess to a crime I didn’t do. No way. 

I was going to find a way to prove to them that Slappy was the culprit. And 
I was going to prove to them that I wasn’t crazy. 

I had to show them that Slappy wasn’t an ordinary dummy. 

He was alive. And he was evil. 

But how could I prove it? 

I climbed to my feet and began pacing back and forth. I stopped at the 
window and gazed out at the front yard. 

It was a beautiful spring day. Bright yellow tulips bobbed in the flower 
patch in front of my window. The sky was a solid blue. The twin maple trees in 
the center of the yard were starting to unfurl fresh leaves. 

I took a deep breath. The air smelled so fresh and sweet. 

I saw Jed and a couple of his friends. They were Rollerblading down the 
sidewalk. Laughing. Having a good time. 

And I was a prisoner. A prisoner in my room. 

All because of Slappy. 

I spun away from the window and stared at the closet door. I had shoved 
Slappy into the back of the closet and shut the door tightly. 

I’m going to catch you in the act, Slappy, I decided. 

That’s how I’m going to prove I’m not crazy. 

I’m going to stay up all night. I’m going to stay up every night. And the 
first time you creep out of that closet, I’ll be awake. And I’ll follow you. 

And I’ll make sure that everyone sees what you are doing. 

I’ll make sure that everyone sees that you are the evil one in this house. 



I felt so upset. I knew I wasn’t really thinking clearly. 

But having a plan made me feel a little better. 

Taking one last glance at the closet door, I crossed the room to my desk and 
started to do my homework. 


* * * 


Mom and Dad let me come out for dinner. 

Dad had grilled hamburgers in the backyard, the first barbecue of spring. I 
loved grilled hamburgers, especially when they’re charred real black. But I could 
barely taste my food. 

I guess I felt too excited and nervous about trapping Slappy. 

No one talked much. 

Mom kept chattering to Dad about the vegetable garden and what she 
wanted to plant. Sara talked a little about the mural she had started to paint in her 
room. Jed kept complaining about how he wrecked his knee Rollerblading. 

No one spoke to me. They kept glancing over the table at me. Studying me 
like I was some kind of zoo animal. 

I asked to be excused before dessert. 

I usually stay up till ten. But a little after nine, I decided to go to bed. 

I was wide awake. Eager to trap Slappy. 

I turned out the light and tucked myself in. Then I lay staring up at the 
shifting shadows on the bedroom ceiling, waiting, waiting... 

Waiting for Slappy to come creeping out of the closet. 

I must have fallen asleep. 

I tried not to. But I must have drifted off anyway. 

I was startled awake by sounds in the room. 

I raised my head, instantly alert. And listened. 

The scrape of feet on my carpet. A soft rustling. 

A shiver of fear ran down my back. I felt goose-bumps up and down my 
arms. 

Another low sound. So near my bed. 

I reached forward quickly. Clicked on the bed table lamp. 

And cried out. 



16 


“Jed—what are you doing in here?” I shrieked. 

He stood blinking at me in the center of the room. One leg of his blue 
pajama pants had rolled up. His red hair was matted against one side of his head. 

“What are you doing in my room?” I demanded breathlessly. 

He squinted at me. “Huh? Why are you yelling at me? You called me, 
Amy.” 

“I—I what?” I sputtered. 

“You called me. I heard you.” He rubbed his eyes with his fingers and 
yawned. “I was asleep. You woke me up.” 

I lowered my feet to the floor and stood up. My legs felt shaky and weak. 
Jed had really scared me. 

“I was asleep, too,” I told him. “I didn’t call you.” 

“Yes, you did,” he insisted. “You told me to come to your room.” He bent to 
pull down the pajama leg. 

“Jed, you just woke me up,” I replied. “So how could I call you?” 

He scratched his hair. He yawned again. “You mean I dreamed it?” 

I studied his face. “Jed—did you sneak into my room to play some kind of 
prank?” I demanded sternly. 

He wrinkled his face up, tried to appear innocent. 

“Did you?” I demanded. “Were you going into the closet to do something 
with Slappy?” 

“No way!” he protested. He started to back out of the room. “I’m telling the 
truth, Amy. I thought you called me. That’s all.” 

I squinted hard at him, trying to decide if he was telling the truth. I let my 
eyes wander around the room. Everything seemed okay. Dennis lay in the 
armchair, his head in his lap. 

The closet door remained closed. 

“It was a dream, that’s all,” Jed repeated. “Good night, Amy.” 

I said good night. “Sorry I got upset, Jed. It’s been a bad day.” 

I listened to him pad back to his room. 

The cat poked his head into my room, his eyes gleaming like gold. “Go to 



sleep, George,” I whispered. “You go to sleep, too, okay?” He obediently turned 
and disappeared. 

I clicked off the bed table lamp and settled back into bed. 

Jed was telling the truth, I decided. He seemed as confused as I was. 

My eyes suddenly felt heavy. As if there were hundred-pound weights over 
them. I let out a loud yawn. 

I felt so sleepy. And the pillow felt so soft and warm. 

But I couldn’t let myself fall back to sleep. 

I had to stay awake. Had to wait for Slappy to make his move. 

Did I drift back to sleep? I’m not sure. 

Aloud click made my eyes shoot open wide. 

I raised my head in time to see the closet door start to open. 

The room lay in darkness. No light washed in from the window. The door 
was a black shadow, sliding slowly, slowly. 

My heart began to pound. My mouth suddenly felt dry as cotton. 

The closet door slid slowly, silently. 

A low creak. 

And then a shadow stepped out from behind the dark door. 

I squinted hard at it. Not moving a muscle. 

Another creak of the door. 

The figure took another silent step. Out of the closet. Another step. Another. 
Making its way past my bed, to the bedroom door. 

Slappy. 

Yes! 

Even in the night blackness I could see his large, rounded head. I watched 
his skinny arms dangle at his sides, the wooden hands bobbing as he moved. 

The heavy leather shoes slid over my carpet. The thin, boneless legs nearly 
collapsed with each shuffling step. 

Like a scarecrow, I thought, gripped with horror. 

He walks like a scarecrow. Because he has no bones. No bones at all. 

Up and down, his whole body bobbed as he crept away. 

I waited until he slithered and scraped out the door and into the hall. Then I 
jumped to my feet. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I tiptoed through the darkness after him. 



Here we go! I told myself. Here we go! 



17 


I stopped at the bedroom door and poked my head into the hall. Mom keeps a 
small night-light on all night just outside her bedroom door. It cast dim yellow 
light over the other end of the hall. 

Peering into the light, I watched Slappy pull himself silently toward Sara’s 
room. The big shoes shuffled along the carpet. Slappy’s body bobbed and bent. 
The big, wooden hands nearly dragged along the floor. 

When my chest started to ache, I realized I hadn’t taken a breath. As 
silently as I could, I let out a long whoosh of air. Then I took another deep breath 
and started to follow Slappy down the hall. 

I had a sudden impulse to shout: “Mom! Dad!” 

They would burst out of their room and see Slappy standing there in the 
middle of the hall. 

But, no. 

I didn’t want to shout for them now. I wanted to see where Slappy was 
heading. I wanted to see what he planned to do. 

I took a step. The floorboard creaked under my bare foot. 

Did he hear me? 

I pressed my back against the wall, tried to squeeze myself flat in the deep 
shadows. 

I peered through the dim yellow light at him. He kept bobbing silently 
along. His shoulders rode up and down with each shuffling step. 

He was just outside Sara’s room when he turned around. 

My heart stopped. 

I ducked low. Dropped back into the bathroom. 

Had he seen me? 

Had he turned around because he knew I was there? 

I shut my eyes. Waited. Listened. 

Listened for him to come scraping back. Listened for him to turn around 
and come back to get me. 

Silence. 

I swallowed hard. My mouth felt so dry. My legs were trembling. I grabbed 
the tile wall to steady myself. 



Still silent out there. 

I gathered up my courage and slowly, slowly poked my head out into the 

hall. 

Empty. 

I squinted toward Sara’s room in the yellow light. 

No one there. 

He’s in Sara’s room, I told myself. He’s doing something terrible in Sara’s 
room. Something I’ll be blamed for. 

Not this time, Slappy! I silently vowed. 

This time you’re going to be caught. 

Pressing against the wall, I crept down the hall. 

I stopped in Sara’s doorway. 

The night-light was plugged in across from Sara’s room. The light was 
brighter here. 

I squinted into her bedroom. I could see the mural she had started to paint. 
A beach scene. The ocean. A broad, yellow beach. Kites flying over the beach. 
Kids building a sand castle in one corner. The mural was tacked up, nearly 
covering the entire wall. 

Where was Slappy? 

I took a step into the room—and saw him. 

Standing at her paint table. 

I saw his big wooden hand fumble over the table of supplies. Then he 
grabbed a paintbrush in one hand. 

He raised and lowered the brush, as if pretending to paint the air. 

Then I saw him dip the paintbrush in a jar of paint. 

Slappy took a step toward the mural. Then another step. 

He stood for a moment, admiring the mural. 

He raised the paintbrush high. 

That’s when I burst into the room. 

I dove toward the dummy just as he raised the paintbrush to the mural. 

I grabbed the paintbrush with one hand. Wrapped my other hand around his 
waist. And tugged him back. 

The dummy kicked both legs and tried to punch me with his fists. 

“Hey—!” a startled voice shouted. 

The light clicked on. 

Slappy went limp on my arm. His head dropped. His arms and legs dangled 



to the floor. 

Sitting up in bed, Sara gaped at me in horror. 

I saw her eyes stop at the paintbrush in my hand. 

“Amy—what are you doing?” she cried. 

And, then, without waiting for an answer, Sara began to shout: “Mom! Dad! 
Hurry! She’s in here again!” 



18 


Dad came rumbling in first, adjusting his pajama pants. “What’s going on? 
What’s the problem?” 

Mom followed right behind him, blinking and yawning. 

“I—I took this from Slappy,” I stammered, holding up the paintbrush. “He 
—he was going to ruin the mural.” 

They stared at the paintbrush in my hand. 

“I heard Slappy sneak out of the closet,” I explained breathlessly. “I 
followed him into Sara’s room. I grabbed him just before—before he did 
something terrible.” 

I turned to Sara. “You saw Slappy—right? You saw him?” 

“Yeah,” Sara said, still in bed, her arms crossed over her chest. “I see 
Slappy. You’re carrying him on your arm.” 

The dummy hung over my arm, its head nearly hitting the floor. 

“No!” I cried to Sara. “You saw him sneak into your room—right? That’s 
why you turned on the light?” 

Sara rolled her eyes. “I saw you come into my room,” she replied. “You’re 
carrying the dummy, Amy. You’re holding the dummy—and the brush.” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

My eyes darted from face to face. They ah stared back at me as if I had just 
landed on Earth in a flying saucer. 

No one in my family was going to believe me. No one. 

The next morning, Mom hung up the phone as I came down for breakfast. 
“You’re wearing shorts to school?” she asked, eyeing my outfit—olive-green 
shorts and a red, sleeveless T-shirt. 

“The radio said it’s going to be hot,” I replied. 

Jed and Sara were already at the table. They glanced up from their cereal 
bowls, but didn’t say anything. 

I poured myself a glass of grape juice. I’m the only one in my family who 
doesn’t like orange juice. I guess I am totally weird. 

“Who were you talking to on the phone?” I asked Mom. I took a long drink. 

“Uh... Dr. Palmer’s secretary,” she replied hesitantly. “You have purple 



above your lip,” she told me, pointing. 

I wiped the grape juice off with a napkin. “Dr. Palmer? Isn’t she a shrink?” 
I asked. 

Mom nodded. “I tried to get an appointment for today. But she can’t see 
you until Wednesday.” 

“But, Mom—!” I protested. 

Mom placed a finger over her mouth. “Sssshhh. No discussion.” 

“But, Mom—!” I repeated. 

“Ssshhh. Just talk to her once, Amy. You might enjoy it. You might think 
it’s helpful.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I muttered. 

I turned to Sara and Jed. They stared down at their cereal bowls. 

I sighed and set the juice glass down in the sink. 

I knew what this meant. It meant that I had until Wednesday to prove to my 
family that I wasn’t a total wack job. 

In the lunchroom at school, Margo begged me to tell her what was going on with 
me. “Why were you locked up in your room all day yesterday?” she demanded. 
“Come on, Amy—spill.” 

“It’s no big deal,” I lied. 

No way I was going to tell her. 

I didn’t need the story going around school that Amy Kramer believes her 
ventriloquist dummy is alive. 

I didn’t need everyone whispering about me and staring at me the way 
everyone in my family did. 

“Dad wants to know if you’ll change your mind about the birthday party,” 
Margo said. “If you want to perform with Slappy, you can—” 

“No. Forget it!” I interrupted. “I put Slappy in the closet, and he’s staying 
there. Forever.” 

Margo’s eyes went wide. “Okay. Okay. Wow. You don’t have to bite my 
head off.” 

“Sorry,” I said quickly. “I’m a little stressed out these days. Here. Want 
this?” I handed her the brownie Mom had packed. 

“Thanks,” Margo replied, surprised. 

“Later,” I said. I crinkled up my lunch bag, tossed it in the trash, and 
hurried away. 



In my room that night, I couldn’t concentrate on my homework. I kept staring at 
the calendar. 

Monday night. I had only two nights to prove that I wasn’t crazy, that 
Slappy really was doing these horrible things. 

I slammed my history book shut. No way I could read about the firing on 
Fort Sumter tonight. 

I paced back and forth for a while. Thinking. Thinking hard. But getting 
nowhere. 

What could I do? 

What? 

After a while, my head felt about to split open. I reached up both hands and 
tugged at my hair. 

“Aaaaagh!” I let out a furious cry. Of anger. Of frustration. 

Maybe I’ll just get rid of Slappy, I decided. 

Maybe I’ll take him outside and toss him in the trash. 

And that will end the whole problem. 

The idea made me feel a little better. 

I turned and took two steps toward the closet. 

But I stopped with a gasp when I saw the doorknob slowly turn. 

As I stared in shock, the closet door swung open. 

Slappy stepped out. 

He slumped forward and stopped a few feet in front of me. 

His blue eyes glared up at me. His grin grew wider. 

“Amy,” he rasped, “it’s time you and I had a little talk.” 



19 


“Amy, now you are my slave,” Slappy said. His threat came out in a harsh, cold 
rasp. The eerie voice made me shiver. 

I stared back at him. I couldn’t reply. 

I gaped into those glassy blue eyes, that red-lipped smirk. 

“You read the ancient words that bring me to life,” the dummy whispered. 
“And now you will serve me. You will do everything I ask.” 

“No!” I finally managed to choke out. “No! Please—!” 

“Yes!” he cried. The grinning wooden head bobbed up and down, nodding. 
“Yes, Amy! You are my slave now! My slave forever!” 

“I w-won’t!” I stammered. “You can’t make me—” My voice caught in my 
throat. My legs wobbled like rubber. My knees buckled, and I nearly fell. 

Slappy raised one hand and grabbed my wrist. I felt the cold, wooden 
fingers tighten around me. 

“You will do as I tell you—from now on,” the dummy whispered. “Or 
else...” 

“Let go of me!” I cried. I struggled to tug my arm free. But his grasp was 
too tight. “Or else what?” I cried. 

“Or else I will destroy your sister’s mural,” Slappy replied. His painted grin 
grew wider. The cold eyes glared into mine. 

“Big deal,” I muttered. “Do you really think I’ll be your slave because you 
wreck her painting? You’ve already wrecked Sara’s room—haven’t you? That 
doesn’t mean I’ll be your slave!” 

“I’ll keep on destroying things,” Slappy replied, tightening his grip on my 
wrist, tugging me down toward him. “Maybe I’ll start wrecking your brother’s 
things, too. And you will be blamed, Amy. You will be blamed for it all.” 

“Stop—” I cried, trying to twist free. 

“Your parents are already worried about you—aren’t they, Amy?” the 
dummy rasped in that harsh, cold whispery voice. “Your parents already think 
you’re crazy!” 

“Stop! Please—!” I pleaded. 

“What do you think they’ll do when you start wrecking everything in the 
house?” Slappy demanded. “What do you think they’ll do to you, Amy?” 



“Listen to me!” I shrieked. “You can’t—” 

He jerked my arm hard. “They’ll send you away!” he rasped, his eyes 
flashing wildly. “That’s what your parents will do. They’ll send you away. And 
you’ll never see them again—except on visiting days!” 

He tilted back his wooden head and uttered a shrill laugh. 

A low moan escaped my throat. My entire body shuddered with terror. 

Slappy tugged me closer. “You will be an excellent slave,” he whispered in 
my ear. “You and I will have many good years together. You will devote your 
life to me.” 

“No!” I cried. “No, I won’t!” 

I sucked in a deep breath. Then I swung my arm hard, as hard as I could. 

I caught the dummy by surprise. 

Before he could let go of my wrist, I pulled him off balance. 

He let out a startled grunt as I lifted him off the floor. 

He’s just a dummy, I told myself. Just a dummy. I can handle him. I can 
beat him. 

His hand fell off my wrist. 

I ducked low. Grabbed his boneless arm with both hands. Swung my 
shoulder. Flipped him over my back. 

He landed hard on his stomach. His head made a loud clonk as it hit the 
floor. 

Breathing hard, my heart thudding wildly, I dove. 

I can handle him. I can beat him. 

I tried to pin him to the floor with my knees. 

But he spun away and scrambled up, faster than I could believe. 

I cried out as he swung his wooden fist. 

I tried to dodge away. But he was too fast. 

The heavy fist hit me square in the forehead. 

My face felt as if it had exploded. Pain shot down my body. 

Everything went bright red. 

And, holding both sides of my head, I crumpled to the floor. 



20 


I can handle him. I can beat him. 

The words repeated in my mind. 

I blinked my eyes. Raised my head. 

I refused to give up. 

Through the haze of red, I reached up with both hands. 

I grabbed Slappy by the waist and pulled him down. 

Ignoring my throbbing forehead, I wrestled him to the ground. He kicked 
both feet and thrashed his arms wildly. He swung at me, trying to land another 
blow. 

But I dug my knee into his middle. Then I wrapped my hands around his 
thrashing arms and pinned them to the floor. 

“Let go, slave!” he squealed. “I command you—let go!” He struggled and 
squirmed. 

But I held tight. 

His eyes darted frantically from side to side. 

His wooden jaw clicked open and shut, open and shut, as he strained to 
squirm free. 

“I command you to let go, slave! You have no choice! You must obey me!” 

I ignored his shrill cries and swung his arms behind his back. Holding them 
tightly in place, I climbed to my feet. 

He tried to kick me with both shoes. But I let go of the arms and grabbed 
his legs. 

I swung him upside down. Once again, his head hit the floor with a clonk. 

It didn’t seem to hurt him a bit. 

“Let go! Let go, slave! You will pay! You will pay dearly for this!” He 
screamed and protested, squirming and swinging his arms. 

Breathing hard, I dragged him across the rug—and swung him into the open 
closet. 

He dove quickly, trying to escape. 

But I slammed the door in his face. And turned the lock. 

With a sigh, I leaned my back against the closet door and struggled to catch 



my breath. 

“Let me out! You can’t keep me in here!” Slappy raged. 

He began pounding on the door. Then he kicked the door. 

“ITl break it down! I really will!” he threatened. He pounded even harder. 
The big wooden hands thudded against the wooden door. 

I turned and saw the door start to give. 

He’s going to break it open! I realized. 

What can I do? What can I do now? I tried to fight back my panic, 
struggled to think clearly. 

Slappy furiously kicked at the door. 

I need help, I decided. 

I bolted into the hall. Mom and Dad had their bedroom door closed, I saw. 
Should I wake them up? 

No. They wouldn’t believe me. 

I’d drag them into my room. Slappy would be slumped lifelessly on the 
closet floor. Mom and Dad would be even more upset about me. 

Sara, I thought. Maybe I can convince Sara. Maybe Sara will listen to me. 

Her door was open. I burst into her bedroom. 

She stood at the mural, brush in hand, dabbing yellow paint on the beach. 

She turned as I ran in, and her face tightened in anger. “Amy—what do you 
want?” she demanded. 

“You—you’ve got to believe me!” I sputtered. “I need your help! It wasn’t 
me who did those horrible things. It really wasn’t, Sara. It was Slappy. Please— 
believe me! It was Slappy!” 

“Yes. I know,” Sara replied calmly. 



21 


“Huh?” My mouth dropped open. I stared at her in surprise. “What did you say?” 

Sara set down the paintbrush. She wiped her hands on her gray smock. 
“Amy—I know it’s Slappy,” she repeated in a whisper. 

“I—I—” I was so stunned, I couldn’t speak. “But, Sara—you—” 

“I’m sorry. I’m so sorry!” she cried with emotion. She rushed forward and 
threw her arms around me. She hugged me tightly. 

I still didn’t believe what she had said. My head was spinning. 

I gently pushed her away. “You knew all this time? You knew it was Slappy 
and not me?” 

Sara nodded. “The other night, I woke up. I heard someone in my room. I 
pretended to be asleep. But I had my eyes open partway.” 

“And—?” I demanded. 

“I saw Slappy,” Sara confessed, lowering her eyes. “I saw him carrying a 
red paintbrush. I saw him painting AMY AMY AMY AMY all over my walls.” 

“But you didn’t tell Mom and Dad?” I cried. “You made them think it was 
me? And the whole time, you knew the truth?” 

Sara kept her eyes on the floor. Her black hair fell over her face. She 
brushed it back with a quick, nervous sweep of one hand. 

“I—I didn’t want to believe it,” she confessed. “I didn’t want to believe that 
a dummy could walk on its own, that it could be... alive.” 

I glared at her. “And, so—?” 

“So I accused you,” Sara said with a sob. “I guess the truth was just too 
scary. I was too frightened, Amy. I wanted to believe it was you doing those 
horrible things. I wanted to pretend it wasn’t the dummy.” 

“You wanted to get me in trouble,” I accused. “That’s why you did it, Sara. 
That’s why you lied to Mom and Dad. You wanted to get me in trouble.” 

She finally raised her face to me. I saw two tears trailing down her cheeks. 
“Yeah, I guess,” she murmured. 

She wiped the tears off with her hands. Her green eyes locked on mine. “I 
—I guess I’m a little jealous of you,” she said. 

“Huh?” My sister had stunned me again. I squinted at her, trying to make 
sense of her words. “You?” I cried. “You’re jealous of me?” 



She nodded. “Yeah. I guess. Everything is easy for you. You’re so relaxed. 
Everyone likes your sense of humor. It’s not like that for me,” Sara explained. “I 
have to paint to impress people.” 

I opened my mouth, but no sound came out. 

This had to be the biggest surprise of all. Sara jealous of me? 

Didn’t she know how jealous I was of her? 

I suddenly had a funny feeling in my chest. My eyes brimmed with tears. 
Strong emotion swept over me like an ocean wave. 

I rushed forward and hugged Sara. 

For some reason, we both started laughing. I can’t explain it. We stood there 
in the middle of her room, laughing like lunatics. 

I guess we were just so glad that the truth was out. 

Then Slappy’s painted face flashed back into my mind. And I remembered 
with a chill why I had burst into my sister’s room. 

“You have to help me,” I told her. “Right now.” 

Sara’s smile vanished. “Help you do what?” she demanded. 

“We have to get rid of Slappy,” I told her. “We have to get rid of him for 
good.” 

I tugged her hand. She followed me down the hall. 

“But—how?” she asked. 

Stepping into my room, we both cried out at once. 

We heard a final kick—and the closet door swung open. 

Slappy burst out, his eyes wild with rage. 

“Guess what, slaves?” he rasped. “Slappy wins!” 



22 


“Grab him!” I cried to my sister. 

I reached out both arms and made a frantic dive for the dummy. But he 
scampered to the side and slipped away from my tackle. 

His blue eyes flashed excitedly. His red lips twisted in an ugly grin. 

“Give up, slaves!” he rasped. “You cannot win!” 

Sara held back, hands against the door frame. I could see the fear in her 

eyes. 

I made another grab for Slappy. Missed again. 

“Sara—help me!” I pleaded. 

Sara took a step into the room. 

I leaped at Slappy, grabbed one boneless ankle. 

With a grunt, he pulled out of my grasp. He darted toward the door—and 
ran right into Sara. 

The collision stunned them both. 

Sara staggered back. 

Slappy teetered off balance. 

I threw myself at him, caught his arms, and pulled them behind his back. 

He squirmed and twisted. He kicked out furiously. 

But Sara grabbed both of his big leather shoes. “Tie him in a knot!” she 
cried breathlessly. 

He kicked and thrashed. 

But we held tight. 

I twisted his arms behind him. Twisted them around each other. Twisted. 
Twisted. Then tied them in as tight a knot as I could. 

Slappy squirmed and bucked, grunting loudly, his wooden jaws clicking. 
When I glanced up from my work on the arms, I saw that Sara had wrapped 
his legs in a knot, too. 

Slappy tilted back his head and uttered a roar of rage. His eyes slid up into 
his head so that only the whites showed. “Put me down, slaves! Put me down at 
once!” 

With one hand, I grabbed a wad of tissues from my bed table and jammed it 



into Slappy’s mouth. 

He uttered a grunt of protest, then went silent. 

“Now what?” Sara cried breathlessly. “Where should we put him?” 

My eyes shot around the room. No, I decided. I don’t want him in my room. 
I don’t want him in the house. 

“Outside,” I instructed my sister, holding on to the knotted arms with both 
of my hands. “Let’s get him outside.” 

Struggling to hold on to the bucking legs, Sara glanced at the clock. “It’s 
after eleven. What if Mom and Dad hear us?” 

“I don’t care!” I cried. “Hurry! I want him out of here! I never want to see 
him again!” 

We dragged Slappy out into the hall. Mom and Dad’s door remained closed. 

Good, I thought. They hadn’t heard our struggle. 

Sara carried him by the knotted legs. I held on to the arms. 

Slappy had stopped struggling and squirming. I think he was waiting to see 
what we were going to do with him. The wad of tissues had silenced his cries. 

I didn’t know where to take him. I only knew I wanted him out of the 
house. 

We carried him through the darkened living room and out the front door. 
We stepped into a hot, sticky night, more like summer than spring. A pale sliver 
of a moon hovered low in a blue-black sky. 

There was no breeze. No sounds of any kind. Nothing moved. 

Sara and I carried the dummy to the driveway. “Should we take him 
somewhere on our bikes?” she suggested. 

“How will we balance him?” I asked. “Besides, it’s too dark. Too 
dangerous. Let’s just carry him a few blocks and dump him somewhere.” 

“You mean in a trash can or something?” Sara asked. 

I nodded. “That’s where he belongs. In the trash.” 

Luckily, the dummy didn’t weigh much at all. We made our way to the 
sidewalk, then carried him to the end of the block. 

Slappy remained limp, his eyes rolled up in his head. 

At the corner, I spotted two circles of white light approaching. Car 
headlights. “Quick—!” I whispered to Sara. 

We slipped behind a hedge just in time. The car rolled by without slowing. 

We waited for the glow of red taillights to disappear in the darkness. Then 
we continued down the next block, carrying the dummy between us. 



“Hey—how about those?” Sara asked, pointing with her free hand. 

I squinted to see what she had spotted. A row of metal trash cans lined up at 
the curb in front of a dark house across the street. 

“Looks good,” I said. “Let’s shove him in and clamp down the lid. Maybe 
the trash guys will haul him away tomorrow.” 

I led the way across the street—and then stopped. “Sara—wait,” I 
whispered. “I have a better idea.” 

I dragged the dummy toward the corner. I motioned to the metal drain down 
at the curb. 

“The sewer?” Sara whispered. 

I nodded. “It’s perfect.” Through the narrow opening at the curb, I could 
hear running water far down below. “Come on. Shove him in.” 

Slappy still didn’t move or protest in any way. 

I lowered his head to the drain opening. Then Sara and I pushed him in 
headfirst. 

I heard a splash and a hard thud as he hit the sewer floor. 

We both listened. Silence. Then the soft trickle of water. 

Sara and I grinned at each other. 

We hurried home. I was so happy, I skipped most of the way. 

The next morning, Sara and I came to the kitchen for breakfast together. Mom 
turned from the counter, where she was pouring herself a cup of coffee. 

Jed was already at the table, eating his Frosted Flakes. “What’s he doing 
down here?” Jed asked. 

He pointed across the table. 

At Slappy. Sitting in the chair. 



23 


Sara and I both gasped. 

“Yes. Why is that dummy down here?” Mom asked me. “I found him sitting 
there when I came in this morning. And why is he so dirty? Where has he been, 
Amy?” 

I could barely choke out a word. “I... uh... I guess he fell or something,” I 
finally mumbled. 

“Well, take him back upstairs,” Mom ordered. “He’s supposed to be kept in 
the closet—remember?” 

“Uh... yeah. I remember,” I said, sighing. 

“You’ll have to clean him up later,” Mom said, stirring her coffee. “He 
looks as if he’s been wallowing in the mud.” 

“Okay,” I replied weakly. 

I hoisted Slappy up and slung him over my shoulder. Then I started to my 
room. 

“I—I’ll come with you,” Sara stammered. 

“What for?” Mom demanded. “Sit down, Sara, and eat your breakfast. 
You’re both going to be late.” 

Sara obediently sat down across from Jed. I made my way down the hall. 

I was halfway to my room when Slappy raised his head and whispered in 
my ear, “Good morning, slave. Did you sleep well?” 

I tossed him into the closet and locked the door. I could hear him laughing 
inside the closet. The evil laugh made me shake all over. 

What am I going to do now? I asked myself. What can I do to get rid of this 
creature ? 

The day dragged by. I don’t think I heard a word my teacher said. 

I couldn’t get Slappy’s evil, grinning face out of my mind. His raspy voice 
rattled in my ears. 

I won’t be your slave! I silently vowed. I’ll get you out of my house—out of 
my life—if it’s the last thing I do! 


That night, I lay wide awake in my bed. How could I sleep, knowing that evil 



dummy sat in the closet a few feet away? 

The night was hot and steamy. I had pushed the window open all the way, 
but there was no breeze. A fly buzzed by my head, the first fly of spring. 

Staring up at the twisting shadows on the ceiling, I brushed the fly away 
with one hand. As soon as the buzzing vanished, another sound took its place. 

A click. A low squeak. 

The sound of the closet door opening. 

I raised myself up off the pillow. Squinting into the darkness, I saw Slappy 
creep out of the closet. 

He took a few shuffling steps, his big shoes sliding silently over my carpet. 
He turned. 

Was he coming toward my bed? 

No. 

His head and shoulders bobbed as he pulled himself to the door. Then out 
into the hall. 

He’s going to Sara’s room, I knew. 

But what was he going to do there? Did he plan to pay us back for what we 
did to him last night? 

What new horror was he going to create? 

I lowered my feet to the floor, climbed out of bed, and followed him out 
into the hall. 



24 


My eyes adjusted quickly to the dim yellow light from the night-light at the other 
end of the hall. I watched Slappy slither toward my sister’s room. He moved as 
silently as a shadow. 

I held my breath and kept my back against the wall as I followed behind 
him. When he turned into Sara’s room, I stepped away from the wall and started 
to run. 

I reached the bedroom doorway in time to see Slappy pick up a wide 
paintbrush from Sara’s supply table. He took a step toward the mural on the wall. 

One step. 

And then another small figure leaped out of the darkness. 

The lights flashed on. 

“Dennis!” I cried. 

“Stand back!” Dennis ordered in a high, shrill voice. He lowered his 
wooden head and charged at Slappy. 

Sara sat up in her bed and uttered a frightened cry. 

I could see the stunned expression on Slappy’s face. 

Dennis flew at Slappy. He slammed his head into Slappy’s middle. 

Slappy let out a loud “Oooof!” He staggered back. Fell. 

A loud thud rang through the room as the back of Slappy’s head hit Sara’s 
iron bedpost. 

I raised both hands to my cheeks and gasped as Slappy’s head cracked 
open. 

The wooden head split down the middle. 

I watched the evil face crack apart. The wide, shocked eyes slid in different 
directions. The red lips cracked and fell away. 

The head dropped to the floor in two pieces. And then the body collapsed in 
a heap beside them. 

My hands still pressed against my face, my heart pounding, I took a few 
steps into the room. 

Dennis ran past me, out to the hall. 

But my eyes were locked on the two pieces of Slappy’s head. I stared in 
horror as an enormous white worm crawled out of one of the pieces. The fat 



worm slithered and curled to the wall—and vanished into a crack in the molding. 

Sara climbed out of bed, breathing hard, her face bright red from the 
excitement. 

The closet door swung open. Mom and Dad came bursting out. 

“Girls—are you okay?” Dad cried. 

We nodded. 

“We saw the whole thing!” Mom exclaimed. She threw her arms around 
me. “Amy, I’m so sorry. I’m so sorry. We should have believed you. I’m so sorry 
we didn’t believe you.” 

“We believe you now!” Dad declared, staring down at Slappy’s broken 
head, his crumpled body. “We saw everything!” 

It was all planned. Sara and I had worked it out before dinner. 

Sara convinced Mom and Dad to hide in the closet. Mom and Dad were 
really creeped out by the way I was acting. They were willing to do anything. 

So Sara pretended to go to sleep. Mom and Dad hid in the closet. 

I left the closet door unlocked to make it easier for Slappy to get out. 

I knew Slappy would creep into Sara’s room. I knew Mom and Dad would 
finally see that I’m not crazy. 

And then Jed burst out dressed as Dennis, with Dennis’ head propped up on 
top of his turtleneck sweater. 

We knew that would shock Slappy. We knew it would give us a chance to 
grab him. 

We didn’t know what a great job Jed would do. We didn’t know that Jed 
would actually destroy the evil dummy. We didn’t know that Slappy’s head 
would crack apart. That was just good luck. 

“Hey—where is Jed?” I asked, my eyes searching the room. 

“Jed? Jed?” Mom called. “Where are you? You did a great job!” 

No reply. 

No sign of my brother. 

“Weird,” Sara muttered, shaking her head. 

We all trooped down the hall into Jed’s room. 

We found him in bed, sound asleep. He groggily raised his head from the 
pillow and squinted at us. “What time is it?” he asked sleepily. 

“It’s nearly eleven,” Dad replied. 

“Oh, no!” Jed cried, sitting up. “I’m sorry! I forgot to wake up! I forgot I 
was supposed to dress up like Dennis!” 



I felt a shiver run down my back. I turned to my parents. “Then who fought 
Slappy?” I asked. “Who fought Slappy?” 





THE BARKING GHOST 
Goosebumps - 32 
R.L. Stine 


1 


For the zillionth time that night, I threw the covers off my legs and bolted up 
from the bed. 

I definitely heard something that time. 

And it wasn’t the wind, either. I’m always hearing things. But no matter 
what I hear, Mom says, “It’s just the wind, Cooper. Just the wind.” 

But the wind doesn’t sound like heavy footsteps crunching through the 
leaves. And that’s what I heard this time. Definitely. 

I stood next to my bedroom window. Then I leaned over and peered out. It 
sure was spooky out there. 

I squinted to see better in the dark. Don’t lean over too far, I thought. Don’t 
let whoever or whatever is out there see you. 

My eyes searched the backyard. I lifted my head—and spotted them. A few 
feet away. Huge, black, gnarly arms. Reaching out toward the window. 

Ready to grab me. 

No. It was only the branches of the old oak tree. 

Well, give me a break. I said it was dark out! 

My eyes swept over the yard again. The sound. There it was! 

I ducked. My legs trembled as I crouched beneath the window. I broke out 
into a cold sweat. 

Crunch. Crunch. 

Even louder than before. 

I swallowed hard and took another peek. Something moved in the shadows. 
Under the oak tree. I held my breath. 

Crunch. Crunch, crunch. 

A gust of wind blew the tree branches furiously. 

Crunch, crunch, crunch. 

The frightening sounds grew louder. Closer to the house. 

As I peered out, two eyes suddenly flashed in the dark. My throat went dry. 
I couldn’t cry out. 

The eyes flashed again. They were even closer to the house this time. Right 
outside my window. 



Staring at me. 

Moving toward me. 

The creature’s dark shape began to take form. It was a— 

—bunny rabbit?? 

I let out a long sigh. 

The first night in my new house—and I was already shaking in terror. 

I shuffled into the bathroom for a towel. As I mopped the sweat from my 
forehead, I stared at my reflection in the medicine chest mirror. 

Whenever I’m scared, my freckles really stand out. There they were. 
Millions of them. 

I ran my fingers through my hair. I wear it long. To help cover my big, 
droopy ears. 

I’ve had these huge ears my whole life. Mom keeps telling me not to worry. 
She says I’ll grow into them. But I’m twelve now, and nothing has changed. My 
ears are still huge. Huge and droopy. 

I wear a cap most of the time to help hide them. It’s my favorite cap from 
my favorite baseball team—the Red Sox. So I don’t mind wearing it. 

A bunny rabbit, I mumbled as I stared at myself in the mirror. Scared by a 
bunny rabbit. 

I’d made it through the entire day without being scared once. That’s pretty 
good for me. 

Back where I used to live—in Boston, Massachusetts—my best friends, 
Gary and Todd, always made fun of me. 

“Cooper,” they’d say, “you probably scare yourself on Halloween!” 

They were right. I get scared a lot. Some people just scare easier than 
others. I’m an easy scarer. 

Take last summer at camp. I got lost in the woods on my way to the 
bathroom cabin. What did I do? 

Nothing. I just stood there. 

When the kids from my bunk finally found me, I was shaking all over. 
Practically in tears. Turns out I was standing a few feet from the dining hall the 
whole time. 

So, okay. I admit it. When it comes to bravery, I’m not exactly Indiana 
Jones! 

When my parents announced we were moving from the city into a house in 
the woods, I was a little tense. 



Maybe even scared. 

Scared to leave the apartment I’d lived in my entire life. 

Scared of a house in the woods. 

And then I learned that our new house was deep in the woods, somewhere 
in Maine. Miles from the nearest town. 

The only two scary books I’d ever read took place in Maine. In the woods. 

But I had no choice. We were moving. Mom’s new job landed us in Maine, 
and there was nothing I could do about it. 

I left the bathroom and crept back to my bed. The floorboards creaked and 
cracked with each step. It was going to be hard getting used to that. 

It was also going to be hard getting used to all the other strange noises this 
old house made. The rattling pipes. The scraping shutters. And some weird noise 
that thumped really loudly every hour. 

At dinner, Mom said that the thumping noise was only the house “settling”. 

Whatever that means. 

At least she didn’t say, “It’s just the wind, Cooper.” 

I jumped into bed and pulled the covers up to my chin. Then I fluffed my 
pillows two or three times, trying hard to get comfortable. I felt a little safer in 
bed. 

I love my bed. Mom wanted to trash it when we moved. She said I needed a 
new one. But I said no way. It had taken me years to break this bed in. The 
mattress had just the right amount of lumps, and they were in all the right spots. 

In the dark, I glanced around my new room. It was so weird seeing all my 
things in this strange place. When the movers carried my stuff in here this 
morning, I had them put the furniture exactly the way it was in my old room. 

Across from my bed, my dad built a really cool bookcase for all my snow 
domes. It has a light in it and everything. 

I can’t wait to unpack my snow domes. I have seventy-seven of them from 
all over the world—even Australia and Hong Kong. I guess you could call me a 
snow dome collector. 

Anyway, I was finally beginning to relax, thinking about my snow domes— 
when I heard another noise. 

Not a bunch of little crunches like before—but one long, drawn-out crunch. 

I shot straight up in bed. This time I was sure. One hundred percent sure. 
Someone—or something—was creeping around out there. Right outside my 
window! 



I threw off the covers. Then I dropped to the floor on my hands and knees. 
Moving slowly, I crawled to the window. Then I carefully pulled myself up and 
peered outside. 

What was it? 

A snake? 

I flung open the window. I grabbed a softball from the floor and tossed it at 
the snake. Then I fell back down to my knees and listened. 

Silence. No crunching. No slithering. 

A direct hit. Great! 

I stood and leaned carefully out the window. I was feeling pretty proud of 
myself. After all, I had just saved my family from a deadly— 

—garden hose! 

I let out a disappointed sigh and shook my head. Get a grip, Cooper. 

If Gary and Todd were here, they would never let me hear the end of this. 
They’d be laughing their heads off. 

“Nice going, Coop!” Gary would say. “Saved your family from a poisonous 
garden hose!” 

“Yeah. Super Cooper strikes again!” Todd would say. Back in bed again, I 
fluffed up my pillows one more time. Then I closed my eyes as tightly as I 
could. 

That’s it, I said to myself. I am not getting up again. I don’t care what I hear 

next. 

I will not get up from this bed again. No matter what. 

And then I heard another noise. A different kind of noise. A sound that 
made my heart pound right through my chest. 

Breathing. 

Deep, heavy breathing. 

In my room. 

Under my bed! 



2 


I didn’t move. 

I couldn’t move. 

I stared at the ceiling. Listening. Listening to the raspy breathing under my 

bed. 

Okay, Cooper, I told myself. Calm down. It’s probably your imagination. 
Playing tricks on you again. 

The breathing grew louder. Raspier. 

I covered my ears and shut my eyes tight. 

It’s nothing. It’s nothing. It’s nothing. 

It’s an old house, I thought, still covering my ears. Old houses have to 
breathe—don’t they? 

Or, what was it that Mom said? Settling? Yeah, that’s what it must be. The 
house settling. 

Or maybe it’s the pipes. We had pipes in our apartment in Boston, and they 
made crazy noises all the time. I’ll bet that’s what it is—the pipes. 

I lowered my hands. 

Silence now. No settling. No pipes. No breathing. 

I must be losing my mind. 

If I told Gary and Todd about this one, they’d really laugh their heads off. 
And then the breathing started again. Raspy and wet. Hoarse breathing. 
Like a sick animal. 

I couldn’t just lie there. I had to see what it was. 

I swung my legs out of bed. I took a deep breath. Then I lowered myself to 
the floor. 

Carefully, I lifted the blanket from the bottom of the bed. Then carefully, 
carefully, I lowered my head and peeked under the bed. 

That’s when the hands darted out—and grabbed me. Two strong, cold 
hands. Slowly tightening their grip around my throat. 



3 


I screamed. 

So loudly, I surprised myself. 

My attacker must have been surprised, too. He quickly let go of my neck. I 
clutched my throat and sputtered for air. 

“Cooper, will you keep it down?” a voice whispered. “You’ll wake Mom 
and Dad!” 

Huh? 

Oh, man. 

It was Mickey. My totally obnoxious older brother. 

“Mickey! You jerk!” I cried. “You scared me to death!” 

Mickey slid out from under the bed and wiped some dust off his pajamas. 
“No big challenge,” he muttered. 

“Shut up,” I snapped, rubbing my sore neck. In the mirror I could see where 
Mickey’s hands had grabbed my throat. Dark red blotches circled my neck. 

“Look what you did!” I cried. “You know I bruise easily!” 

“Oh, don’t be such a baby! I got you, man!” Mickey cried, grinning. 

I stared furiously at my idiot brother. I wished I could wipe that grin off his 
face. And not get in trouble for it. 

“You’re a jerk!” was all I could think to say. 

“Grow up!” Mickey shot back. He headed for the door, then turned around. 
“Would Cooper like a little night-light next to his bed?” he asked in a tiny baby 
voice. 

That’s when I lost it. 

I leaped on to his back and pounded his head with my fists. 

“Hey!” he screamed, trying to shake me off. “What do you think you’re 
doing? Get off me!” 

Mickey’s legs buckled under him, and he fell to the floor. I clung to his 
back. I kept pounding him with my fists. 

Mickey is three years older than me, and he’s a lot bigger. But I had him in 
the right position, and landed a few good punches. 

Then he shifted to the right. 



And started pounding me back. Luckily, he got in only one really good 
wallop before Mom and Dad ran in to break it up. 

“Cooper! Mickey! What’s going on in here?” 

“He started it!” I called out, trying to duck Mickey’s fists. 

My father reached down and pulled Mickey off me. “I don’t care who 
started it!” he said angrily. “This is no way to act on the first night in your new 
house. Mickey, get back to your room!” 

“But, Dad, he—” 

“Never mind who started it. This behavior had better stop—now! Because 
if there is a next time, you’ll both start off the new school year grounded!” 

Grumbling, Mickey stomped out of the room. But not before sticking his 
tongue out at me. Mickey was the baby. Not me. 

“Really, Dad, Mickey started it,” I said when he was gone. 

“And you’re totally innocent, right?” my father asked, rolling his eyes. 

“Yes!” I insisted. 

Dad just shook his head. “Go to sleep, Cooper.” 

When my parents left the room, I paced back and forth, rubbing my neck. 

I was so steamed! 

It wasn’t the first time Mickey’s pulled something like this. For as long as I 
can remember, Mickey has played tricks on me, trying to terrify me. 

He usually succeeds, too. 

Once, when Mom and Dad went away for a weekend, he hid a tape recorder 
in my room. It played horrifying screams all night long. 

And another time, he didn’t come to get me after Little League practice. He 
left me standing there, all alone on the playground, while he hid out and watched 
me panic. 

But hiding under my bed tonight was the worst. He has to be one of the 
biggest jerks alive. 

I climbed back into bed and stared up at the ceiling. I had to think of a way 
to get Mickey back. 

What could I do? Hide outside his window and scream? 

Jump out from behind the shower curtain when he’s brushing his teeth? 

No. Too dumb. It would have to be something totally excellent. Something 
so creepy it would scare me. Even though I was the one doing it. 

I watched the spooky shadows move along my walls and ceiling. And 
listened to the frightening noises of my new house—noises I would have to hear 



for the rest of my life. 

The pipes rattling. The dogs barking. 

Wait a minute. 

Dogs? 

I sat up. We don’t have a dog. And there isn’t another house around here for 
miles. 

But I definitely heard a barking dog. 

I listened closely. The dog barked again. Then started to howl. 

I sighed and pulled off the covers again. I started to climb out of bed. Then 
it hit me. 

Mickey! 

This had to be another one of my brother’s stupid tricks. He was an 
excellent dog-barker. He practiced it all the time. 

Smiling, I settled back on my pillow. I wouldn’t get up. I wouldn’t go to the 
window. 

He wasn’t going to get me this time. No way. 

I lay there listening to Mickey make a fool of himself. Howling and barking 
like a big old dog. 

What a jerk. 

Then, suddenly, I sat up again. Whoa. I heard two dogs howling now. 

Even Mickey couldn’t pull that off. 

The howling turned to piercing cries. So close. Right under my window. 

As I said, I made it through a whole day without being scared. But, boy, 
was I making up for it tonight! 

For the zillionth and third time, I slowly crept to the window. I could hear 
them clearly. Two dogs. Wailing and howling. 

For the zillionth and third time, I gazed out the window. 

But for the first time, I couldn’t believe what I saw. 



4 


I didn’t see anything. 

Nothing at all. No dogs. Not one. 

I squinted into the yard. Empty. 

How could they have vanished so quickly? 

I stood at the window for a few more seconds, but no dogs appeared. 

I shivered. I’ll never sleep again, I thought. Not as long as I have to live 

here. 

I crept back to bed. I pulled the covers up to my chin. And counted the 
green and blue squigglies on the wallpaper by my head. 

I guess I finally fell asleep. When I opened my eyes, light streamed in 
through my window. 

Yawning, I glanced at the clock. Six-thirty. I’m usually an early bird. I like 
to start my day as soon as possible. 

I leaped out of bed and checked the yard. It didn’t seem half as scary in the 
morning light. 

I smiled when I noticed the jungle gym in the far corner. The last owners of 
the house built it. It had a slide and really high monkey bars. Yesterday, Dad 
hung a rope and tire from one of its beams, so now it had a swing, too. 

Behind the jungle gym, the woods stretched all around. Woods thick with 
all different kinds of trees and shrubs and weeds. The woods surrounded our 
house on three sides. It seemed to go on forever. 

I changed quickly, pulling a clean Red Sox T-shirt over my jeans. Grabbing 
my baseball cap, I flew through the house and ran outside. 

A great summer day! Sunny and warm. If I were back home in Boston, I 
would hop on my bike and ride over to Gary’s or Todd’s house. Then we would 
spend the day outdoors, playing softball at the playground. Or just messing 
around. 

But I’m not in Boston anymore. Better get used to that, I told myself. 

I hoped some cool kids lived in this neighborhood. When we drove up to 
our house yesterday, I didn’t see any other houses around. I guessed I’d have to 
spend the next few days alone—until school started next week. 

I wandered over to the jungle gym. I swung on the tire swing for a little 



while. Back and forth. Back and forth. Staring at my bedroom window from the 
outside. Back and forth. Back and forth. Remembering last night. 

Remembering just how brave Super Cooper had been. Yuck! 

Back and forth. Back and forth. 

Remembering the dogs. 

Hey. That’s weird, I thought. Those dogs I heard should have left paw prints 
all over the yard. But I couldn’t see a single one. 

I hopped off the swing and searched the ground all around the house. No 
sign of any dogs. 

That’s funny. I knew there were dogs out here last night. 

I glanced up at the edge of the woods. Maybe those dogs were lost, I 
thought. Maybe they came to the house last night searching for help. 

Maybe I should go track them down. 

I bit my lower lip. A kid could lose his way—forever—in those woods, I 
thought nervously. 

Well, I’m going in, I decided. Today is the first day of the new me. Super 
Cooper—for real. I wanted to find those dogs. To prove to myself that I wasn’t 
going crazy. 

Who knows? If I find the dogs, maybe Dad will let me keep one, I decided. 
It might be fun to have a dog. 

I’d always wanted a puppy. But Mom said the fur made her sneeze. Maybe 
she’d change her mind. 

I took one long, deep breath. Then I stepped into the woods. I saw some 
amazing trees. I saw beautiful old birch trees with smooth, white trunks. And I 
saw sassafras and maple trees. Their trunks were gnarled and thick. 

They could be over a hundred years old, I thought. Awesome. 

Maybe Dad can build a tree house back here, I told myself excitedly. That 
would be so cool. Then when Gary and Todd came to visit, we could hang out in 
it. 

I kept my eyes on the ground as I walked, searching for any sign of dogs. 

Nothing. No prints. No broken branches. 

How weird. I definitely heard dogs last night. 

Or maybe I just thought I’d heard those dogs. It was kind of late, and I was 
pretty sleepy. Maybe it was my imagination. 

Or maybe it was Mickey after all. 

Maybe he tape-recorded another dog and barked along with it. 



He would do something like that. 

He’s that sneaky. 

I really had to pay him back. Something way creepy. Maybe I could do 
something out here in the woods. 

I made my way through the thick trees and tall weeds, the whole time 
thinking of how to scare Mickey. 

I suddenly realized I hadn’t been paying attention to where I was going. 

I spun around and peered through the thick trunks. 

My house! I couldn’t see it! 

Okay, Cooper, keep cool. You can’t be that far away, I told myself. 

But my palms began to sweat. 

I swallowed hard, then tried to remember which way I’d come. 

Definitely the left. 

No, wait. Maybe right. 

I hung my head and moaned. It’s no use, I thought. 

I’m lost. Hopelessly lost. 



5 


I really didn’t want to cry. 

Who needed Mickey seeing me with wet, red eyes? 

I’d never hear the end of it. 

Besides, today was the first day of the new me. The new Super Cooper. 

I took a really deep breath and tried to calm down. 

I decided to walk a little to my right. If I didn’t see my house, I’d turn and 
double back to the left. 

It was worth a try. 

What did I have to lose? I was lost anyway. 

I turned to the right. I tried to take the straightest path possible. 

The snapping of branches behind me made me spin around. 

No one there. 

It’s just a harmless squirrel or something, I told myself. Just keep going. 

I returned to my straight path again. But with my first step, I heard leaves 
mstling behind me. 

I didn’t turn around. I quickened my pace. 

And I heard it again. 

Twigs snapping. Leaves rustling. 

My throat suddenly felt dry. Don’t panic. Don’t panic. “Wh-who’s there?” I 
croaked. 

No answer. 

I turned back. 

Whoa! Which way had I been walking? My head began to spin. I suddenly 
felt dizzy. Too dizzy to remember where I had been. 

Snap. Snap. Crack. Crunch. 

“Who is there?” I called out again. My voice didn’t sound all that steady for 
Super Cooper. 

“Mickey, is that you? This isn’t funny! Mickey?” 

Then I felt something horrible scrape my cheek. Something cold. And 
sharp. 

I couldn’t help it. I started to scream. 



6 


A leaf. A dumb leaf. 

Come on, Cooper! Get a grip! 

I sat down on the ground for a second. I checked my watch. It was almost 
eight. 

Dad would be out in the yard soon. He planned to set up the new barbecue 
grill first thing this morning. I figured I could just wait for the hammering to 
start, then walk in the direction of the noise. 

I’d just sit here. And wait. Wait for the hammering. Good idea, I thought. 

I heard something rustle behind me. 

Just the leaves, I told myself. The dumb leaves. 

I stole a glance up at the trees. I tilted my head way back—and someone 
grabbed my arm. 

I jerked away. Sprang up. Started to run. 

And tripped over my own feet. 

Scrambling up, I gasped in surprise. 

A girl. 

She was about my age and had really long, red hair. It was frizzy, and it 
stuck out in a million directions. She had big green eyes. She wore a bright red 
T-shirt and red shorts. She reminded me of a rag doll Todd’s little sister used to 
carry around. 

“You okay?” she asked, her hands on her waist. 

“Yeah, sure. Fine,” I muttered. 

“Didn’t mean to scare you,” she said. 

“I wasn’t scared,” I lied. 

“Really,” she said. “I would have been scared, too, if someone grabbed me 
like that. I really didn’t mean to.” 

“I told you,” I said sharply, “I wasn’t scared.” 

“Okay. Sorry.” 

“What are you sorry about?” I asked. This had to be the weirdest girl I’d 
ever met. 

“I don’t know,” she replied, shrugging. “I’m just sorry.” 



“Well, you can stop apologizing,” I told her. I brushed the dirt off my 
clothes and picked up my baseball cap. I quickly set it back on my head. To 
cover my ears. 

The girl stared at me. She stood there and stared. Without saying a word. 
Was she staring at my ears? 

“Who are you?” I finally asked. 

“Margaret Ferguson,” she replied. “But people call me Fergie. Like the 
duchess.” 

I didn’t know what duchess she was talking about. But I pretended I did. 

“I live through the woods that way,” she said, pointing behind her. 

“I thought no one lived around here for miles,” I said. 

“Yeah. There are some houses around here, Cooper,” she replied. “They’re 
pretty spread out.” 

“Hey! How did you know my name?” I asked suspiciously. 

Margaret, or Fergie, or whatever her name was, turned beet-red. 

“I, uh, watched you move in yesterday,” she confessed. 

“I didn’t see you,” I replied. 

“That’s because I hid in the woods,” she said. “I heard your father call you 
Cooper. And I know your last name, too. It’s Holmes. I saw it written on all the 
boxes in the moving van. And I know you have a brother, Mickey,” she added. 
“He’s a jerk.” 

I laughed. “You got that right!” I exclaimed. “So how long have you lived 
around here?” 

She didn’t answer. She kept her eyes on the ground. 

“I said, how long have—” 

Suddenly, her head jerked up and she gazed into my eyes. 

“Wh-what’s wrong?” I asked when I saw her frightened face. 

Her face tightened, as if she were in pain. Her lips trembled. 

“Margaret!” I cried. “What? What is it?” 

She opened her mouth, but no words came out. She breathed deeply, 
gulping air. Finally, she clutched my shoulders and shoved her face right up 
close to mine. 

“Dogs,” she whispered. Then she let go of me and darted away. 

I froze for a moment. Then I chased after her. 

She made it to a big tree stump before I caught up. I grabbed hold of the 
back of her T-shirt and spun her around. 



“Margaret, what do you mean ‘dogs’?” I asked. 

“No! No!” she cried. “Just let me go! Let me go!” 

I held her tightly. 

“Let me go! Let me go!” she cried again. 

“Margaret, what did you mean back there?” I repeated. “This is important. 
Why did you say ‘dogs’?” 

“Dogs?” Her eyes grew wide. “I don’t remember saying that.” 

My jaw fell open. “You did!” I insisted. “You looked straight at me and 
said, ‘dogs’! I heard you!” 

She shook her head. “No, I don’t remember that,” she replied thoughtfully. 

Now I’ve met weird kids in my life, but Margaret here takes the cake. She 
almost makes Mickey seem normal. 

Almost. 

“Okay,” I said, trying to sound calm, “here’s what happened. You freaked 
out. Then you grabbed me. Then you said, ‘Dogs’. Then you freaked out again.” 

“Don’t remember,” she replied softly, shaking her head from side to side. 
“Why would I say that?” 

“I don’t know!” I screamed, starting to lose it. “I’m not the one who said 
it!” 

She gazed around in all directions, then focused those green, crazy eyes on 
me. 

“Listen to me, Cooper,” she whispered mysteriously. “Get away from here.” 

“Huh?” 

“I’m warning you, Cooper! Tell your parents they must leave at once!” She 
glanced nervously behind her, then turned back to me. 

“Please—listen to me. Get away from here! As fast as you can!” 



7 


Fergie let go of my shoulders and ran. 

For a few seconds, I stared after her, too shocked to move. Then I decided 
I’d better not let her get away. 

“Fergie!” I called out. “Wait up!” 

For a girl, Fergie ran pretty fast. Actually, most girls I know are fast 
mnners. 

Whoever said they were slower than boys in the first place? It isn’t true. 
Lots of girls in my class last year could beat any guy in a race. 

Anyway, / happen to be a very fast runner. When you’re afraid of 
everything, you learn to run—fast! 

“Fergie!” I called again. “Please! Tell me what’s going on!” But I couldn’t 
catch up. 

Then, to my surprise, she stopped and turned back to me. “Listen, Cooper,” 
she said, calmer than before. “The woods are haunted. Your house is probably 
haunted, too. Go home. Go home and tell your parents to move back to wherever 
you came from.” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

“It’s too dangerous here,” Fergie warned. “Get away, Cooper. As fast as you 
can!” 

With that, she turned and walked away in the direction of her house. 

I didn’t follow her this time. 

I should have. I totally forgot that I was lost. 

I turned around. My house is probably in the opposite direction, I decided. 

She disappeared through the trees. Fine with me, I thought angrily. It would 
be fine with me if I never saw her again. 

Why did she tell me all that? 

Why did she say the woods were haunted? 

Because it was tme? 

Leave it to my parents to buy a haunted house in haunted woods! 

I continued on, unable to shake the creepy feeling I had. I felt as if a 
hundred eyes were stalking me through the trees. 



I wished Fergie had kept her mouth shut. 

The longer I walked, the more frightened I became. Now I was positive that 
the woods were haunted. Haunted by ghosts tracking every step I made. 

Then, in the distance, I heard a faint banging. It startled me at first. When I 
realized it was Dad working on the grill, I shrieked with joy. 

“All right! I’m almost home!” My plan had worked. 

I followed the hammering sounds. 

Something rustled the branches above my head and made me jump. 

I gazed up. 

Just a bird. 

Staring up at the trees, I nearly fell headfirst into a stream. 

The water lapped quietly against the grassy shore. It reflected the pale blue 
morning sky above it. 

Funny, I hadn’t seen this stream here before. 

I bent down to touch the water. Cold. 

This is awesome! I thought. Areal stream, practically in my own backyard. 
Then I remembered that it wouldn’t be my backyard for long. As soon as I 
told my parents what Fergie had said, we’d pack up and move back to Boston. 

As I dried my hand on my shirt, I had that creepy feeling again. The feeling 
of eyes watching me. My head jerked up, and I gasped. 

There were eyes watching me. 

Four dark eyes glared at me from across the stream. 

The eyes of two enormous black Labradors. 

One dog panted loudly, its tongue hanging out. The other dog flashed its 
teeth at me. Ugly, yellow teeth. 

They both uttered low, menacing growls. 

Not friendly. Not friendly at all. 

Run! I urged myself. Run! 

But my legs wouldn’t budge. 

Growling, the dogs eyed me hungrily. 

Then they attacked. 



8 


Their heavy paws thudded the ground as they came bounding toward me. Their 
eyes glowed with excitement. Their large heads bobbed up and down. 

With a terrified cry, I turned and ran. 

If only I could fly! 

“Helllllp!” Was that me letting out that frightened wail? 

Yes. I think it was. 

Suddenly, I caught a glimpse of light through the trees. Sunlight glistening 
off the jungle gym slide! 

Yes! 

Almost home. 

The two black Labs ran at my heels. I could feel their hot breath on the 
backs of my legs. I felt a pair of sharp teeth scrape my ankle. 

With one last gasp of speed, I burst through the trees and out of the woods. 
“Dad!” I yelled, racing toward my father. 

“Help me!” I shrieked. “The dogs! The dogs!” I threw my arms around his 
waist and held on. 

“Cooper, calm down! What’s gotten into you?” my father asked, grabbing 
me by the shoulders. 

“The dogs!” I wailed, refusing to let go of him. 

“Cooper, what dogs?” Dad demanded. 

I blinked at him in confusion. Didn’t he hear them? Couldn’t he see them? 

I let go of him and pointed toward the woods. 

“Wild dogs. Big, black Labs, I think. They chased me, and—” 

I scanned the yard frantically. Dad and I were alone. 

No barking. 

No snarling. 

The sunlight glistened off the slide. 

The tire swung lazily from its rope. 

The dogs had vanished. 



9 


“Cooper, this is a joke—right?” Dad asked, shaking his head. 

“Huh? No way!” I cried. “They were right behind me. One almost bit me, 
and—” 

“And then they disappeared into thin air!” Dad declared. 

“Come into the woods with me,” I pleaded. “They’ve got to be there.” I ran 
to the edge of the woods, desperately searching for some sign of the dogs. Dad 
followed right behind. 

But there was nothing to see. 

I turned and slunk back to the house. 

Dad didn’t say anything until we were back in the yard. He sat down on the 
jungle gym slide. His eyes studied me. 

“Cooper, tell me what’s wrong,” Dad said in a low voice. I could tell he 
thought I had made all this up. 

“I told you, Dad. Two dogs chased me through the woods. They were 
inches from me! One tried to tear my leg off!” 

Dad continued to stare up at me, his expression thoughtful. 

“Dad, listen,” I pleaded. “We have to move. We can’t live here!” 

He climbed to his feet. “What are you talking about, Cooper?” 

“We have to move back to Boston,” I insisted. “We can’t stay here!” 

“Why not?” Dad asked. 

“It’s this house!” I shouted, my voice cracking. “It’s haunted!” 

“Now, Cooper—” 

“Dad! Listen to me,” I begged. “The woods... this house... they’re all 
haunted. Everybody around here knows it already! We never should have moved 
here!” 

“Cooper, you’re not making any sense,” Dad replied, keeping his voice low 
and calm. “You know, walking in the woods by yourself can be scary. Why don’t 
you come inside and calm down? Mom made a big breakfast. Have some French 
toast. You’ll feel better.” He put his arm around my shoulders. 

Now I really felt upset. My own father didn’t believe me. 

“But, Dad, it’s true!” I insisted. “The woods are haunted, and this weird girl 
I met warned me to move out! She—” 



“Cooper, I know you’re unhappy about the move,” Dad said. “But these 
wild stories aren’t going to change anything. This is where we live now.” 

“But—” 

“When school starts, you’ll make some new friends and everything will be 
fine. So come on in and have breakfast. You’ll feel better. You’ll see.” 

He led me back to the house. 

As Dad held the door open for me, I glanced back and took one last look at 
the woods. 

Two big black dogs stared at me from the trees. 



10 


When I blinked, the dogs vanished. 

Shaking my head, I made my way into the kitchen. 

Mickey had already finished half his breakfast when Dad and I entered the 
room. He leaned over his cereal bowl, snickering about something. I ignored 
him. 

“Cooper, have some French toast,” Mom said. “It’s on your plate, waiting 
for you.” 

I sat across from Mickey, trying hard not to look at his dumb face. I was 
still really steamed at him. 

“Mom, do you know who our neighbors are?” I asked, pouring maple syrup 
over the toast. 

“Why, sure,” Mom answered. “Your father and I met some of them a few 
weeks ago when we came to see the house.” 

“Did you meet the Fergusons?” I asked. 

Mom squinted her eyes, thinking. Then she shook her head. “No, I don’t 
think we met them. We met the Martells. Joel and Shirley. Very nice people.” 
Then she asked, “Who are the Fergusons?” 

I didn’t answer. I pressed on. “Did the Martells tell you our house was 
haunted?” 

Mom laughed. “No, Cooper, they didn’t. It must have slipped their minds,” 
she joked. 

“Ha-ha. It’s nothing to laugh about,” I insisted. “Our house is haunted. And 
so are the woods!” 

“Cooper, what are you talking about?” my mother demanded. 

“Enough, Cooper,” my father warned. “Eat your breakfast.” 

“Yeah,” Mickey said with a snort. “Eat your breakfast, Drooper.” 

I could feel my face turn red. I hated when Mickey called me Drooper. He 
called me that because of my big droopy ears. 

“Shut up, Sickey, ” I replied. 

“Cut it out, you two,” Dad snapped. 

I dug my fork into the French toast. How could they not believe me? Did 
they really think I made this story up? 



I lifted a chunk of toast to my mouth and stuffed it in. 

“Aghhhh!” 

Choking and coughing, I spit the food out on my plate. 

“Gross!” Mickey cried, grinning. “Gross! A guy could lose his appetite 
around here.” 

My eyes teared, and I coughed a few more times. 

“You okay, Cooper?” Mom asked. 

“Somebody dumped salt on my French toast!” I exclaimed angrily. 

Mickey started to laugh. 

That creep. 

My father climbed up from the table. Without saying a word, he stomped 
out of the room. 

That’s how my Dad acts when he’s angry. He gets all quiet, then just walks 
away. Punishments come later. 

I gulped down a glass of milk, trying to wash the salt out of my mouth. 
Mom returned to the stove to make another batch of French toast for me. 

“Mickey,” she said, sighing, “you know that wasn’t funny. Now apologize 
to your brother.” 

“Apologize? But it was just a joke!” Mickey complained. 

“We’re all cracking up,” I muttered bitterly, gulping down a second glass of 
milk. “You’re a real riot.” 

“Apologize!” my mother insisted again. 

Mickey hung his head and stared at the floor. 

I folded my arms across my chest. “I’m waiting!” I sang happily. 

Mickey made an ugly face at me. When Mom turned around, he changed 
his expression to an innocent smile. 

“I’m so sorry, Cooper,” Mickey oozed. “It won’t happen again.” He blinked 
innocently. 

Satisfied, Mom turned back to the stove. 

As soon as she did, Mickey pulled on his ears, trying to stretch them as big 
as mine. 

I’d had it with Mickey. I pushed my chair away from the table and hurried 
out of the room. I didn’t want to get into another fight with my stupid brother 
now. 

I had more important things to do. I had to talk to Dad about the dogs. I had 
to make him believe me. 



Dad sat in his favorite chair, which just didn’t look right in our new living 
room. Even he seemed to notice. He kept shifting uncomfortably. 

“Maybe it’s time for a new chair,” he muttered. 

“Dad, can I talk to you for a second?” I asked. 

“What is it, Cooper?” he asked as he moved Great-grandma’s lamp closer 
to the chair. 

“It’s about the dogs,” I said. 

Dad sighed. “Really, Cooper. Aren’t you making too big a deal about this? 
So what if you saw dogs in the woods? They could belong to anybody!” 

“But they chased me!” I replied, getting all worked up again. “And then 
they disappeared into thin air! And after that girl told me the woods were 
haunted—” 

“What girl?” my dad demanded. 

“She said her name was Margaret Ferguson,” I told him. “She said her 
family lived next door.” 

Dad rubbed his chin. “That’s strange,” he said. “The real estate broker 
never mentioned the Fergusons.” 

“Well, I met her this morning, and she told me everyone around here knows 
that our house is haunted!” 

“Maybe that’s why we got such a good deal on the house,” Dad muttered, 
chuckling. 

I didn’t see what was so funny. 

He stopped laughing and stared at me seriously. “Forget about the dogs for 
now, Cooper. We’ll deal with it if you see them again. In the meantime, I’ll ask 
around in town if anyone knows who owns them. Okay?” 

“But what about the house?” I asked. “Margaret said we should move as 
fast as we can.” 

“French toast is ready!” Mom called out, interrupting me. “Come on, 
Cooper. Before it gets cold.” 

“Go eat,” my father urged. “And please. Not another word about dogs or 
the house being haunted.” 

With a sigh, I headed back to the kitchen. As I stepped through the door, 
Mickey jumped in my face and let out a roar. 

Naturally, it scared me to death. 

“Mom!” I cried. 

“Mickey, enough!” my mother screamed. “Stop teasing Cooper. He’s 



having a hard time adjusting to the new house.” 

“No, I’m not!” I yelled at her. Why wasn’t anybody taking me seriously? 
“This house is haunted. You’ll be sorry you didn’t listen to me. You’ll be sorry!” 

Then I stormed out and stomped off to my room. I collapsed on my bed and 
gazed around. Same old stuff, but the room didn’t feel like my own. 

I stayed in there all day. I didn’t want to see Mickey. I didn’t want to see 
Mom and Dad. And I really didn’t want to see those dogs again. 

By dinnertime, I’d unpacked most of my things. The room felt a little better. 
More like my old bedroom back in Boston. 

After dinner, I lugged all seventy-seven snow domes into the bathroom and 
washed them, one by one. People don’t realize that you have to take care of 
snow domes and keep them clean and filled with water or they’ll dry out. 

When they were all sparkling clean, I arranged them carefully on my new 
bookcase. 

They looked awesome! 

I tried to organize them in some sort of size order, but that didn’t work. 
Instead, I alphabetized them—from Annapolis to Washington, D.C. Of course, I 
placed my absolute favorite dome—a Boston Red Sox snow dome—on the 
middle shelf, front and center. 

I finished at eleven, then got ready for bed. All that unpacking had tired me 

out. 

I had closed my eyes and was just drifting off to sleep when I heard it. 

Loud and clear. 

Barking. 

And growling. 

Outside my window. 

I bolted straight up in bed. 

I waited for my parents and Mickey to come running in. This time, they 
must have heard the dogs, too. 

I waited. And waited. 

The barking grew louder. 

No one else in the house stirred. 

I lowered one foot to the floor, then the other. I stood up, listening hard. 
Listening to the two dogs barking. 

And to my horror, I realized that this time the barking wasn’t outside my 
window. 



This time it was coming from inside my house! 



11 


Frantically, I searched for a weapon. Something to protect me from the barking 
dogs. 

I found my aluminum baseball bat in the closet. I gripped it tightly and 
crept across the room to my bedroom door. 

I pushed it open. And listened. 

Yes. 

The barking was definitely coming from inside the house. From the living 
room, I decided. 

I took a deep breath and slipped into the hallway. Where were my parents? 
Their bedroom is directly over the living room on the second floor. They had to 
hear this. 

Why hadn’t they come running out? 

Mickey’s room was on the first floor down the hall from mine. I peered 
down the hall and saw that his bedroom door was closed. 

What’s his problem? I wondered. Where is everyone? 

I crept quietly down the hall, inching my way to the living room. I could 
hear the dogs racing around in there. 

I gasped when I heard a loud crash. 

Something clattered to the floor. Great-grandma’s lamp, I guessed. 

I stared up at the ceiling—to my parents’ bedroom. Were they deaf or 
something? 

Holding the bat in front of me, I jumped into the living room and snapped 
on the ceiling light. 

The dogs were... 

The dogs were... 

NOT THERE! 

The room stood empty. 

“Huh?” I blinked a few times from the sudden brightness of the light, then 
stared around the room. 

No dogs. 

No growling. No barking. 



But, wait! Great-grandma’s lamp lay on its side on the floor. 

I took a step over to the sofa. Something crunched under my bare feet. 
Potato chips? 

Yes. Potato chips. Scattered across the room. 

I spotted the potato chip bag—ripped to shreds on the floor. 

My heart thumped so hard, I thought it might burst out of my chest. 

As I bent to pick up the torn bag, a shadow fell over me. 

I heard heavy breathing. 

And I felt a gust of hot, smelly breath shoot across my neck. 



12 


“Drooper, what are you doing?” 

I straightened up and spun around. 

“Mickey!” 

“That’s my name. Don’t wear it out,” he replied. 

“Mickey! Did you hear them? Did you?” 

Mickey glanced around the room. “Hear who?” he asked. Then, before I 
could answer, he snapped, “Cooper, you jerk, why did you throw potato chips 
around the living room?” 

“The dogs!” I cried. “The dogs did it! Did you hear them?” 

Mickey shook his head. “No way. I didn’t hear anything.” 

I was stunned. “You didn’t hear wild dogs mnning around the room a few 
minutes ago?” 

Mickey rolled his eyes and whistled. “You’re losing it, Cooper. Hearing 
invisible dogs is one thing. But feeding them potato chips? You’re really messed 
up, man.” 

“I didn’t do this!” I said angrily. “I told you. The dogs did.” 

Mickey shook his head. “Just promise me one thing,” he said seriously. 

“What?” I asked. 

“Promise me when school starts next week, you won’t tell anybody you’re 
related to me.” 

I wanted to throw something at him. I wished I had Great-grandma’s lamp 
in my hand, but I didn’t. So I threw what I did have—the empty potato chip bag. 

It flew about three inches, then dropped at my feet. 

“You’re pathetic!” Mickey laughed. “I know why you’re doing this, too. 
You’re trying to make Mom and Dad think the house is haunted. So then they’ll 
move back to Boston, and you can see your dweeby little friends Gary and Todd 
again.” 

He made a face at me. “Dumb, Drooper. Really dumb.” 

He shuffled away, shaking his head. 

Just you wait, Mickey, I thought. I’m going to get even with you. Just you 

wait. 



And I’m going to make everyone believe me about the dogs. I’m going to 
make everyone believe that I’m telling the truth. 

But how? I wondered, gazing around the empty, silent living room. 

How? 



13 


Sunday morning I woke up early as usual. I had only a few more things to 
unpack, and I knew I could finish before breakfast. 

I unrolled my Red Sox poster and tacked it to the wall, over my bed. Same 
place I’d hung it in Boston. 

Then I rummaged through a box, searching for my lucky pair of red socks. 
As I was slipping them on my feet, I heard the doorbell ring. 

“Cooper!” my mother called to me a few seconds later. “There’s someone 
here to see you!” 

Who could it be? I didn’t know anybody here. 

Then I had a thought. Maybe Gary asked his dad to drive him and Todd up 
to Maine to surprise me! 

Wow! What a great surprise! 

I closed the box and charged out of my room, down the hall, and to the 
front door. I was so excited! 

But no Gary and Todd. 

Fergie stared at me from the front doorway. I could see at first glance that 
she was kind of nervous. She kept shifting her weight from one foot to the other. 
And she twirled a lock of her bright red hair between her fingers. 

“Oh. Hi,” I mumbled, unable to hide my disappointment. 

“I need to talk to you,” she said. “Right away.” 

“Okay, sure,” I replied. 

“Not here,” she said, nudging her head toward the den where my mom and 
dad were reading the newspaper. 

I sighed. “Okay, wait a sec.” I ran back to my room and pulled on a pair of 
sneakers. 

“Let’s go out back,” I suggested. She nodded solemnly and followed me 
outside. 

I swung on the tire and listened to Fergie. “It was all your brother’s idea!” 
she blurted out. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“I don’t know why I agreed to do it, but it was really all his idea. Every bit 
of it.” 



“What was?” I asked. 

“Everything I told you yesterday. About your house. And the woods.” 

“You mean they’re not haunted?” I asked, confused. 

Fergie shook her head. “Of course not.” 

“But why did you tell me they were?” I asked. 

“I told you, it was all Mickey’s idea. I met Mickey the day you moved in,” 
Fergie explained. “He told me it would be funny if I played this trick on you.” 

“He what?” I cried. 

“He told me the two of you always played all kinds of tricks on each other,” 
Fergie replied. “He said you would think it was a riot.” 

“A joke?” I asked. “It was all one of Mickey’s jokes?” I couldn’t believe it. 

Fergie bit her bottom lip and nodded. “Mickey said to tell you the woods 
were haunted. He said to tell you the house was haunted, too.” Fergie sighed. 
“So I did it. But when I saw how scared you were, I felt really bad about it. I 
wished I hadn’t listened to your brother.” 

Mickey. That jerk. 

“But how did you know about the dogs?” I asked. 

Fergie stared blankly at me. “Dogs? What dogs?” 

“That’s the word you whispered to me,” I explained. “Dogs.” 

Fergie twisted her face, thinking hard. “No, I don’t remember saying that. 
Are you sure I said ‘dogs’?” 

I nodded. “Definitely. That was all you said. Dogs. And, then, after you ran 
off, two mean-looking black Fabradors chased me through the woods.” 

“Really?” 

I nodded. “They chased me all the way home. Then they just vanished.” 

“Weird,” Fergie mumbled. 

“Tell me about it,” I replied, rolling my eyes. 

“Where did you first see the dogs?” Fergie asked me. 

I pointed into the woods. “Back there. Near a stream.” 

“That’s the stream that leads to the Martells’ house,” Fergie said. “They’re 
friends of my parents. They don’t own any dogs, Cooper.” 

I shrugged, then batted a fly that buzzed in my ear. “Well, someone around 
here must have dogs,” I told her. 

“I’m scared of dogs,” Fergie admitted. “I’m glad I didn’t see them 
yesterday.” 

“They weren’t nice dogs,” I muttered. “You wouldn’t like them.” 



“Hey, did you see a big rock in the shape of an arrowhead when you were 
near the stream?” she asked. 

I shook my head. “No, I didn’t.” 

“It’s really cool,” she gushed. “You should check it out. I go there all the 
time. It’s a great rock for climbing.” 

“Let’s check it out now,” I suggested. I still thought the woods were scary 
—haunted or not. But I didn’t feel like hanging around the house. 

I hopped off the tire and followed Fergie into the woods. I spotted a long, 
thick stick and picked it up. “In case the dogs come back,” I told Fergie. 

We walked a little while until we reached the stream. Fergie searched 
around for her rock. 

“I know it’s here somewhere,” she said, turning to me. “I can never—” 

She stopped short when her eyes met mine. 

“Cooper!” she whispered. “What is it?” 

I stumbled backwards. My hand trembled as I pointed to the trees directly 
behind Fergie. 

“Mar—Margaret!” I whispered in terror. “The dogs! Look out! They’re 
coming! They’re coming right at us!” 



14 


Fergie spun around. She let out a frightened cry. 

“Here they come!” I shrieked. 

Fergie froze in terror. “Oh, no! Help me, Cooper! I told you! I’m afraid of 
dogs!” 

“Run!” I shouted at her. “Run!” 

In a flash, Fergie dashed past me. I’ve never seen anyone run so fast. 

She ran about ten steps. Then her hands flew up as she tripped over a rock. 

She uttered a shrill cry of panic and went sprawling on the ground. 

I had to laugh. “Got you back!” I cried gleefully. 

“Huh?” Fergie lifted her head. 

“I got you back,” I repeated. “For playing that mean trick on me. For 
helping Mickey.” 

I watched as the color slowly returned to Fergie’s face. “You scared me to 
death,” she muttered. “How could you play such a horrible joke?” 

“Easy,” I replied, still grinning. 

Fergie growled at me. “I told you, it wasn’t totally my fault. Your brother 
said you played tricks on each other all the time.” Then she stood up and shook 
her head. “That was mean, Cooper. Really mean.” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. I know. But now we’re even.” 

Fergie brushed some dirt off her jeans and examined a scrape on her elbow. 
“You know, we should both get back at Mickey,” she said. 

“I’ve been thinking about that all morning,” I told her. “And yesterday, too. 
Mickey’s been playing really mean tricks on me since we moved here. And I 
have to get back at him. But it has to be something totally awesome.” 

We walked along the stream a while longer, trying to figure out how to get 
back at Mickey. Then Fergie found the arrowhead rock. 

She climbed up first, and I followed. It was a big, craggy rock, great for 
climbing. 

We hung out on the rock, thinking up ways to get Mickey back. Fergie 
wanted to drag him deep into the woods blindfolded and leave him stranded. But 
I didn’t think that would scare Mickey one bit. 

I jumped off the rock and began circling it. Sometimes I think better on my 



feet. 


On my third trip around, I got my foot caught in a thick, leafy plant. I 
glanced down—and cried out. “Oh, perfect! I’m standing in poison ivy!” 

Fergie laughed. “It only looks like poison ivy,” she assured me. “My 
science teacher checked it out last year. She told us it’s a harmless weed.” 

I smiled a really evil smile. 

“I think I have a great idea. What if we pulled out a bunch of this stuff? 
What if it somehow ended up in Mickey’s bed? Would he freak—or what?” 

“He might,” Fergie agreed, grinning down at me. 

We gathered a bunch of the weeds. They grew all along the stream. So we 
picked some more as we walked slowly back to my house. 

Just past the stream, Fergie showed me a clearing in the trees I hadn’t 
noticed before. A small clearing filled with wildflowers. 

I knew right away Mom would flip out if she saw them. She always bought 
flowers at the Faneuil Hall market back in Boston. I started to pick some for her. 

I reached down for a few pretty violet and yellow flowers when something 
moving through the trees caught my eye. I glanced up just in time to see Mickey 
stagger into the clearing. 

Fergie and I both cried out when we spotted him. 

Mickey’s clothes were ripped and shredded. 

Dark scratches covered his face and arms. And bright red blood trickled 
down his neck. 

“Cooper,” he croaked weakly, barely able to talk. “Cooper—the dogs—” 

Those were the last words he spoke before he crumpled to the ground. 



15 


“Mickey!” I screamed in horror. 

I dropped the wildflowers and weeds and ran to his side. 

Fergie and I knelt down beside him. “Is he okay?” she asked, her voice 
barely above a whisper. 

I leaned over him and, with both hands, tugged on his tattered shirt. But I 
couldn’t pull him up. With each try, his limp body slumped back to the ground. 

“Mickey! Mickey!” I cried his name again and again. “Are you all right? 
The dogs! Did they—?” 

As I leaned in closer, Mickey’s arms shot up and clamped around my neck. 
He yanked me to the ground. Then he jumped up and sat on top of me. 

He was giggling like an idiot. 

“Oh, Mickey! Mickey!” he shrieked in a high voice. “Mickey! Are you all 
right?” 

I started to sputter, but no words came out. 

“What a wimp!” he teased. “Do you have to fall for the fake blood every 
single time?” He let out another long, high-pitched giggle. 

I shut my eyes and prayed that I’d disappear. I couldn’t believe my brother 
had tricked me again. In front of Fergie. 

My face grew hot. “I’ll pound you for this!” I shouted, struggling to push 
him off me. 

“Ooooh! I’m shaking!” Mickey snorted. 

“Don’t you have anything better to do than to try and scare me?” I yelled. 

“I don’t even have to try,” Mickey replied, grinning. 

Fergie stood over us, her arms crossed in front of her. 

“Were you in on this little joke, too?” I demanded angrily. 

“No! No way!” Fergie insisted. 

Mickey pinned my arms to the ground. “Say ‘Uncle’, wimp.” 

I’d never been so embarrassed in my life. 

Never. 

And that includes the time Mickey locked me out of the house in my 
underwear. 



“You’re dead meat!” I shouted in his face. 

“What are you going to do, Drooper? Knock me out with your bouquet of 
violets?” 

He threw his head back and laughed at his stupid joke. Lucky for me, it 
gave me a chance to bite his arm. 

“Ow! You mutant! Look what you did! I’m bleeding!” 

He jumped up and examined the bite mark on his arm. Then he growled at 
me, turned, and trotted away. 

I wanted to chase after him. But Margaret held me back. 

“Let him go,” she said, clutching my shirt. “He’s a creep. Really.” 

Grumbling to myself, I brushed off my clothes. Then I picked up the 
flowers for Mom. I couldn’t face Fergie. 

“Are you going home?” she asked. 

“Uh-huh,” I grunted. 

“Will I see you in school tomorrow?” 

I shrugged. I wished she would leave me alone. I wanted to be by myself. 

I grunted again. I think she got the message. 

“Well, guess I’ll head home now. Don’t worry, Cooper,” she said, starting in 
the direction of her house. “We’ll come up with a plan to get him back. I 
promise.” 

I didn’t answer. 

“See you tomorrow!” she called out, waving. 

I didn’t bother to wave back. I watched her leave. Then I made my way 
over to the stream to take a drink of cold water. The sight of Mickey all bloody 
had made my throat dry. And it was from screaming. 

I leaned over the sparkling, cool water and lowered my hand. I scooped 
some water up to my mouth and drank. 

But when I saw my reflection in the stream, I choked. 

It wasn’t me. 

The face staring back at me in the water was the face of a black dog! 

I jerked my head up. 

No dogs on the shore. 

No dogs anywhere in sight. 

“Whoa!” I cried aloud. 

I leaned over the stream again and peered into the water. 

The dog stared up at me from beneath the surface. 



I raised my head again. No dog on the shore. 

So how could I see a dog’s reflection in the water? 

Once again, I squinted into the clear stream. The dog appeared to ripple 
with the water. 

And as I gaped at the eerie reflection in horror, it pulled back its thin lips 
and bared its ugly yellow teeth in a silent growl. 



16 


I raced home without glancing back. 

I crashed through the front door and charged straight for the bathroom. I 
had to check myself out in the mirror. 

I don’t know what I thought I’d see. 

A dog face staring back at me? 

Even I know how stupid that sounds. 

But I couldn’t explain the dog reflection in the water. I should have seen my 
face in that stream—not the growling face of a black Lab. 

Stepping into the bathroom, I approached the mirror slowly. I peeked in. 
And I saw—my own freckled face. 

Did it make me feel better? 

Not much. 

I didn’t speak to anyone in my family for the rest of the afternoon. And at 
dinnertime, I nibbled a few bites, then asked to be excused. 

“Are you feeling okay, Cooper?” Mom asked, frowning. “Liver and onions 
is your favorite. I’ve never seen you leave liver and onions on your plate.” 

She walked over and felt my forehead. That’s what she always does 
whenever I act a little strange. Leels my forehead. 

“I’m fine, Mom,” I replied. “I’m just not very hungry. That’s all.” 

“Cooper is probably a little nervous about tomorrow. His first day in a new 
school,” Dad said to Mom. He turned to me. “Am I right?” 

“Yeah, that’s it,” I agreed. No sense in bringing up the dogs again. No one 
would believe me, anyway. 

“Aw. Poor little Drooper. Scared of his new school,” Mickey teased. 

Mom and Dad shot Mickey a warning glance. “Mickey—not tonight,” Dad 
muttered. 

I ignored my dumb brother. I climbed up from my chair and headed for my 
room. 

I couldn’t fall asleep that night. Every time I closed my eyes, I saw the face of 
the angry black dog, rippling in the stream. 



I finally dozed off after midnight. 

I awoke to Mom’s impatient cries. “Cooper. Cooper. You’ve overslept. 
Time to get up!” 

I couldn’t believe it. I’m always up early. I never oversleep. 

I’m going to be late for my first day of school! I thought unhappily. And it’s 
all because of those creepy dogs. 

I threw my T-shirt and jeans on and rushed down the hall to the kitchen. No 
time for a big breakfast. I gulped down a glass of milk. Then I opened the fridge 
and reached for the peanut butter and jelly to make a sandwich for lunch. 

As I spread the peanut butter on the bread, I heard whimpering behind me. 

“Cut it out, Mickey,” I said without turning around. 

The whimpering grew louder. 

“Mickey! Quit it! Stop being such a—” 

They sprang out of nowhere. The dogs. 

They were in the kitchen! 



17 


Their jaws hung loose. They drooled hungrily. Thick yellow drool. 

My knees buckled. I clutched for the counter to steady myself. 

Their dark, furry bodies shimmered under the bright kitchen lights. 
Growling, their teeth bared, they stepped side by side away from the wall. 

I moved back slowly. One small step. 

Their dark eyes tracked my move. 

One more step back. Slowly. Then another. 

Their steady gaze followed me. 

The back door stood inches away. If I reached back, I could touch the 
doorknob now. 

I reached back. Slowly. Very slowly. 

My hand fumbled. Then I found it. The small round knob... 

Too late! 

They jumped. 

I screamed as their dark bodies hurtled toward me. 

I shut my eyes. 

I heard the sound of snapping jaws. 

I opened my eyes in time to see one of the dogs snatch my lunch from the 
counter. 

Then they disappeared. 

Through the kitchen door. They dove right through the wooden door. 
Breathing hard, I sank into a kitchen chair. 

I held my head tightly. I shut my eyes and tried to calm myself. 

I had just seen two dogs run right through a door. How could that be? 

Mom raced into the room. Dad followed. 

“Cooper, what’s wrong?” Mom cried. “What was that horrible scream we 
heard?” 

I had to tell them what happened. I had to. This was too weird. Too scary 
and too weird. 

Sol told them the whole story. 

“Two black dogs—they jumped through the wall. Into the kitchen. One of 



them grabbed my lunch. Then they dove through the door.” 

Big mistake. 

Mom and Dad gave me a lecture about the stress of moving. I think I heard 
them mention the word psychiatrist. 

They didn’t believe a word of it. 

I didn’t have the strength to argue. I shuffled out the door and headed for 
school. 

No way I could stop thinking about those dogs. Dogs that only I could see. Dogs 
that stole lunches. Dogs that could walk through doors. 

I didn’t see them again that week. But every morning I’d hear them barking 
somewhere around the house. Nobody else heard them. 

On Friday, I met Fergie after school and we walked home together. She 
talked nonstop about our math teacher, but I wasn’t really paying attention. I 
couldn’t stop thinking about the dogs. 

“What?” I asked Fergie. She’d just asked me something about math 
homework. 

“I said,” she repeated impatiently, “that we can do our math homework 
together this weekend.” 

I shrugged. “Yeah, whatever.” 

Fergie was going to stay at our house Saturday night. Her parents had to go 
to Vermont for the weekend. 

We had become pretty good friends this past week. So had our parents. 
Mom and Dad invited the Fergusons over for dinner on Tuesday, and the 
Fergusons had us over on Wednesday. 

Maybe having Fergie sleep over will be fun, I thought. If I can shut those 
dogs out of my mind. 

“We still have to come up with a trick to play on Mickey,” Fergie pointed 
out. “I’ve been thinking—” 

“Listen, Fergie,” I said, interrupting her. “There’s something I’ve been 
meaning to tell you all week.” 

She waited for me to begin. 

I took a deep breath, then blurted out the whole story. About the dog 
reflection in the stream. And the dogs in the kitchen. 

“I’ve been hearing them all week,” I confessed. “Sometimes outside the 
house, sometimes inside. It’s been a nightmare.” 



Fergie’s jaw dropped open. “How come you didn’t tell me before?” she 
asked. 

I sighed. “Because no one in my family believes me,” I said. “I thought you 
wouldn’t, either.” 

“I believe you, Cooper,” she replied solemnly. 

I smiled. “Thanks, Fergie. That means a lot.” 

Fergie’s expression turned thoughtful. “Well, maybe we’ll both hear them 
on Saturday night. Your parents will have to believe both of us.” 

I nodded. Fergie was right. Mom and Dad couldn’t think the two of us 
needed to see a doctor. I started to feel a little more cheerful. 

“Now about the get-back-at-Mickey plan,” Fergie said. “I have another 
idea.” 

I tried to listen to Fergie’s plan—it had something to do with rats and a rope 
—but I couldn’t concentrate on what she was saying. I could only think about 
the dogs. 

Would they turn up again this weekend? 



18 


I watched each minute tick away on the alarm clock near my bed. Finally— 
midnight. Time to get moving. 

I tiptoed down the hall to the guest room where Fergie slept. I knocked on 
the door. 

“Fergie,” I whispered. “Fergie, get up!” 

She appeared at the door in an instant, fully dressed. “The dogs? Are the 
dogs here?” she asked, eyes wide with fright. 

She seemed really spooked. And she had awful pillow-hair static. 

“No, dope.” I whispered. “It’s time to scare Mickey.” 

Fergie rubbed her eyes. “Oh, yeah, right.” 

Without saying another word, she slid under the bed and came out with a 
shoe box and some string. 

“Let me see it again,” I said eagerly. 

Fergie smiled, then opened the box. Inside sat a huge, hairy, totally gross, 
disgusting black rat. 

A fake, of course. But it looked so real! Real enough to fool another rat. A 
rat like Mickey. 

I lifted the rat from the box and shook it in Fergie’s face. 

She backed away and let out a yelp, even though she knew it was made of 
mbber or something. 

I tied the string around the rat’s neck and waved at Fergie to follow me. We 
crept silently into the hall and headed for Mickey’s room. 

This was going to be totally awesome! I couldn’t wait to see the look on 
Mickey’s face when our hairy rat slithered across his bed! 

We stopped in the hall outside Mickey’s room. His door stood slightly open. 
I poked my head in and checked out his bedroom. 

By the dim light in the hallway, I could see Mickey in bed, all covered up, 
fast asleep. Mickey never sleeps with a pillow. He always tosses it on the floor 
when he climbs into bed. There it was, next to his shoes. 

I stepped back from the door and pulled Fergie aside. 

“Okay, here’s the plan,” I whispered. “When we’re inside the room, go to 
the left. That’s where the closet is. I’ll tiptoe over to the bed and put the rat on 



Mickey. Then I’ll meet you in the closet.” 

“Check,” Fergie whispered solemnly. 

“And, remember,” I warned her, “be quiet!” 

“Check,” Fergie said again. 

With the rat in one hand, I carefully made my way into Mickey’s room. I 
glimpsed Fergie heading left to the closet. I headed right. 

I had nearly reached Mickey’s bed when I heard a loud crack. 

My heart jumped to my throat. I spun around and stared at Fergie in horror. 

I saw instantly what had happened. She had stepped on Mickey’s 
skateboard. 

We both turned to the bed. 

Mickey didn’t move a muscle. 

He hadn’t heard the noise. 

I let out a quiet sigh of relief, then shot Fergie a warning glance. 

She nodded nervously. 

I watched as she opened the closet door and ducked inside. 

I held the rat out in front of me and edged closer to Mickey’s bed. My hand 
shook, but I gripped the hairy creature tightly. 

I stared down at Mickey under the covers. He slept soundly. 

I crept closer. 

Bundled under the blankets, it was impossible to tell where Mickey’s body 
started. I set the rat down gently, near his stomach, I think. 

Then I tiptoed to the closet. Inside, I knelt next to Fergie and gave her a 
thumbs-up sign. 

Operation “Scare Mickey” was in effect. 

And I couldn’t be more excited. 

It served him right. 

I quietly pulled the closet door toward me, leaving it open just a crack. I 
held tightly onto the end of the string. 

“Ready?” I whispered. 

“Ready,” she whispered back. 

“Okay,” I said. “On three. One... two... uh, Fergie, stop kicking me.” 

“I’m not touching you,” she whispered sharply. 

“You are, too. Stop it, okay?” 

“No way. My feet are all the way over here,” Fergie protested. 



“Ow! You kicked me again!” I whispered. 

She raised her voice. “I did not!” 

I clamped my hand over her mouth. 

We both froze. 

I heard breathing. 

Heavy breathing. 

Not my breathing. Not Fergie’s breathing. 

I swallowed hard. 

“F-Fergie,” I stammered. “We’re not alone in here!” 



19 


A low, steady growl proved me right. 

Someone—or something —was hiding in the closet with us. 

We listened to the low growls for another second or two. 

Then we both flew out of the closet, screaming in horror. 

I only made it a few feet. I tripped over Mickey’s skateboard. Went 
sprawling headfirst. Landed flat on my face. 

As I struggled to my feet, I saw a dark figure step out of the closet. 

“You!” I screamed in a hoarse, frightened voice. 

Mickey grinned back at Fergie and me. “Oooohhh! Ooooooohhh! Look at 
me!” he cried. “I’m a killer poodle!” 

Fergie and I stared at him in disbelief. He had been in the closet the entire 

time. 

I dove to the bed and pulled down the blanket. 

“Oh, wow!” I cried out when I saw a bunch of rolled up sheets and towels. 
“But how did you know?” Fergie asked him. “How did you know we were 
coming?” 

Mickey flashed us both a smug smirk. “When you showed up this morning 
clutching that dumb box and whispering to Cooper, I knew something was up. 
I’ve been spying on you two jerks all day.” 

“You sneak!” I cried. 

“A sneak? Me?” Mickey replied innocently. “What do you call what you’re 
doing, prowling around my room and hiding in my closet?” 

I was so angry. So disappointed. Our great revenge plan—totally ruined. 

I grabbed Fergie by the arm. “Come on. Let’s get out of here.” 

“That’s right!” Mickey called gleefully after us. “Running away with your 
tails between your legs!” Then he howled and barked some more. 

Great guy—huh? 

Fergie and I sat in the hall outside my room. We had really wanted to give 
Mickey a good scare. So he could see how it felt. 

But we had messed up. Totally. 

“We’ll get him next time,” Fergie offered. “We’ll come up with an even 



better plan. Maybe something with knives and fake blood.” 

I shrugged. I didn’t want to wait. I wanted to scare Mickey out of his skin 
— tonight! 

Not much chance of that. 

Fergie and I yawned at the same time. Then we both stood up. “Guess we 
should go back to bed. Maybe—” 

“Did you hear that?” I asked, cutting Fergie off. 

She nodded. “Yeah. I hear it. Barking.” 

“That’s not my brother,” I whispered. “It’s definitely the dogs!” 



20 


“I don’t get it!” Fergie cried in a trembling voice. “Where are your parents? 
Where’s Mickey?” 

I led her down the hall, in the direction of the barking. 

“I told you,” I whispered. “They can’t hear the dogs. I don’t know why. No 
one can hear them but us!” 

We turned into the living room and gasped. 

Two sets of red eyes glowed in the dark. 

I reached for Great-grandma’s lamp, but knocked it over. It crashed loudly 
to the floor. 

The dogs barked. 

Fergie clutched my shoulder. Her hand trembled. “Turn on the lights! 
Please!” she pleaded. 

But before I could reach the switch, the lights snapped on. 

We spun around. And there stood Mom on the stairway, glaring down at us. 
“Cooper! Margaret! What on earth are you two doing?” 

“It’s the dogs, Mom!” I cried. “See? They’re—” 

“What dogs?” Mom called. I spun around. 

No glaring red eyes. No dogs. Except for Fergie and me, the room stood 
empty. 

“Wow, your mom sure was upset,” Fergie whispered as we trudged back down 
the hall to our rooms. 

“But now you believe me, right, Fergie?” I asked. “You heard the dogs 
yourself!” 

Fergie nodded. “For sure. There were definitely dogs here.” 

“Go to sleep!” Mom called sternly. “Immediately!” 

“Okay, Mom!” I called back. I turned to Fergie. “We’ll check out the woods 
in the morning,” I told her. “Those dogs have to be somewhere!” 

“Good idea,” Fergie agreed. “See you in the morning.” 

Back in my room, I couldn’t fall asleep. I sat on my bed and tossed a 
baseball into the air. I watched the numbers slowly click by on my alarm clock. 



I thought about the dogs. They were definitely here tonight. Fergie had 
heard them, too. 

But how do they get in and out of my house? I wondered. 

And how do they vanish into thin air like that? 

And why do they keep bothering me? Why? 

I tossed down the baseball and crept into the hall. 

I knocked softly on Fergie’s door. “It’s me. Can I come in?” 

“What’s wrong?” she whispered, opening the door. 

“Listen,” I said. “I don’t think I can wait until tomorrow. Let’s search for 
those dogs now. ” 

Fergie narrowed her eyes thoughtfully. “It—it might be dangerous,” she 
stammered. 

“I don’t care,” I told her. “Let’s go.” 



21 


A few minutes later, Fergie and I skulked around the backyard with our 
flashlights. 

No moon tonight. No stars. A chilly mist hung in the air. 

We both shivered. 

I pointed my flashlight at the ground and searched for paw prints. 

None. As usual. 

“How come they never leave prints?” I muttered under my breath. 

Fergie shrugged, but didn’t answer. I could tell she was as scared as I was. 
She stuck close by my side. 

The beam of my flashlight fell on the jungle gym. As I stared down at the 
ground ahead of me, something suddenly grabbed my ankle. 

“Hey!” I yelled, tumbling in the dirt. 

I twisted and squirmed, trying to break free. “Help!” 

Fergie rushed over to help. Why was she laughing? 

“What a klutz! You’re all tangled up in the lawn sprinkler!” she exclaimed. 

“It’s not funny,” I insisted. I was glad she couldn’t see me blush in the 
darkness. “I could have broken my leg or something!” 

Fergie bent down to help free me. Then she stopped. “Did you hear that?” 
she asked. 

“Hear what?” 

“Listen.” 

We waited silently in the dark. Hardly breathing. 

Then I heard it, too. A soft creaking coming from the house. It sounded like 
an old door swinging open and shut. 

We carefully made our way toward the sound. To my surprise, we found a 
small window low to the ground. I’d never noticed it before. 

The window was open, swinging back and forth, making the creaking noise. 

“It leads to the basement,” I said, poking my head in. “Do you think this is 
how the dogs get into the house?” 

Fergie didn’t answer me. 

“Fergie?” I called. 



No reply. 

A chill of fear shot down my back. 

I spun around. 

In time to see a dark form come charging at me. 

Startled, I stumbled. The back of my head hit the house with a hard thwack. 
The dark creature leaped on top of me. 

Pinned me to the ground. 

A sour smell filled my nostrils as I struggled to get up. 

But I couldn’t move. 

The creature panted. Its jaws opened wide. Hot saliva dripped on to my 

face. 

The big dog held me prisoner. 

What did it plan to do next? 



22 


“Get off me!” I choked out. 

I reached up both hands—and shoved with all my might. 

To my surprise, the big dog toppled off. 

I jumped to my feet, my heart pounding. Spinning around, I saw Fergie. 
Trapped. Backed up against the house by the other dog. 

“Go home!” she cried meekly to the dog. “Go home!” 

The dog didn’t budge. 

I picked up a stick. I waved it furiously in front of me to keep the dogs a 
good distance away. 

As I approached the animals, Fergie shook her arms wildly at them. 

They lowered their heads and growled softly. 

Then, one of them came running at me. The stick didn’t seem to bother him 
at all. 

I lost my balance and crashed into Fergie. 

Both dogs curled their lips into fierce, ugly snarls. 

My legs were shaking so hard, I could barely stand. 

Growling and snapping their jaws, the dogs backed Fergie and me against 
the house. 

“Now what?” Fergie cried, grabbing my arm. 

“G-good question,” I stammered as the dogs lowered their heads and moved 
closer. 



23 


I shut my eyes. 

I had this crazy idea that if I made them disappear, I’d disappear, too. 

Guess what? It didn’t work. 

I felt a sudden burst of hot, sour dog breath on my face. 

Then I felt tugging. On my sweatpants. 

I opened my eyes. The dog pulled furiously at my sweats. Not biting. 
Tugging. 

Fergie appeared as confused as I was. The other dog tugged at the hem of 
her T-shirt. 

“What do they want?” Fergie whispered. 

“I... I... I don’t know,” I answered. “They—they’re not biting or 
attacking!” 

“Cooper, I think they want us to go with them,” Fergie said. 

“That’s crazy!” I cried. The dog tugged harder on my sweatpants. “I saw 
this on a Lassie show once!” 

“I don’t think it’s crazy, Cooper,” Fergie said. “Watch.” She stepped 
forward slowly, and the dog’s tail began to wag. “See? They want us to go with 
them!” 

I hesitated. It seemed ridiculous. 

But when I edged forward, the dog that had been tugging on my pants 
began wagging his tail, too. 

“See?” Fergie whispered. 

Sorry, but I wasn’t buying it. I turned and started to run. 

“Cooper, don’t!” Fergie cried. 

Too late. 

The big creature took off after me. Leaped high. And knocked me to the 
ground. 

When I climbed to my feet, he started tugging again. 

“Come on. Let’s see what they want,” Fergie pleaded with me. “We don’t 
have much of a choice, anyway. They’re not going to leave us alone.” 

We followed the dogs through the woods. They stayed close by, never 



getting too far ahead. And always glancing back. 

I pointed my flashlight along the path. The dim light didn’t help very much 
at all. I had no idea where we were going. All I knew was that it was very dark 
out—and we were headed deeper and deeper into the woods. 

“I hope we can find our way back, ” I muttered to myself. 

Then, without warning, the dogs sped up. Their big paws trod heavily on 
the soft ground. 

A few seconds later, they began barking and scratching wildly at something 
between the trees. 

I lifted my flashlight and aimed it in their direction. 

In the center of a small clearing stood a broken-down wooden shack. The 
dogs clawed at the door. When they had pushed it open, they came back for us. 
They began tugging again, pulling us toward the shack. 

“Wha—what is this place?” I cried. “Where are we?” 

“I don’t know,” Fergie whispered. “I’ve never seen this shack before.” 

The dogs tugged—furiously now. They really wanted us to go in there. 

“What can be inside?” I whispered to Fergie. 

Fergie swallowed hard. “I don’t know,” she whispered back. “But I think 
we’re going to find out!” 



24 


“Fergie, I don’t like this,” I whispered. “Let’s get away from here—fast!” 

I felt the dog clamp its jaw tighter on my ankle. 

Had he understood what I’d said? 

“They’re not going to let us get away,” Fergie said softly. 

Snarling and growling, the dogs backed us up against the door to the shack. 
“Whoa!” I cried out as the dogs leaped at the side of the shack. 

“I don’t believe it!” Fergie screamed. 

The dogs jumped right through the wooden wall. They disappeared inside. 
“That’s impossible!” Fergie cried. 

“Tell that to the dogs,” I murmured. 

I had seen them do it before—in my own kitchen. 

“They’re ghosts or something!” Fergie cried. 

I grabbed her arm. “Let’s get out of here! Whatever happens... we can’t go 
in that shack!” 

We’d taken only a few steps when the dogs came tearing out through the 
shack wall. 

They edged in close, pressing us up against the shack again. Before we 
could struggle or try to get away, the dogs rose up on their hind legs. 

Standing up, they were taller than us! Fergie and I exchanged terrified 
glances. 

The dogs staggered forward. Pressed their front paws against our chests. 
And shoved us backwards into the shack. 

We screamed as we started to fall. 

The shack had no floor. 

We fell, hurtling down. Tumbling as we fell. 

Down, down, down. 

Into a deep, black hole. 

A deep, black hole that didn’t seem to end. 



25 


I landed softly on my feet. I didn’t even feel it. 

Had we fallen into some kind of well? Or a tunnel dug deep under the 
shack? 

I couldn’t tell. 

I took a deep breath and gazed around the heavy blackness. “Fergie—are 
you okay?” I called. My voice came out tiny and shrill. 

“I—I guess,” she replied after a few seconds. “Cooper— look!” 

I started to reply that it was too dark to see anything. But then I glimpsed 
the two pairs of red eyes, glaring at us through the darkness. 

I gasped. 

“Don ’t move! ” instructed a dry whisper of a voice. 

“Who are you?” I managed to choke out. “What do you want?” 

“Why did you dogs bring us here?” Fergie demanded. 

“We are not dogs,” the voice growled. “We are people.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Silence!” the voice commanded. “Silence while you are in the Changing 
Room.” 

“The what?” I cried. 

The red eyes flared. 

“Centuries ago, my friend and I had an evil spell cast upon us,” the voice 
continued, ignoring my question. “The spell forced us to roam these woods as 
dogs. Ghost dogs.” 

“Too bad,” I muttered. “But what do you want us for?” 

The dogs snickered. It sounded more like dry coughing than laughter. 

“You are in the Changing Room,” the voice told us. “For nearly a hundred 
years, we have tried to get two people in here. And now we have succeeded.” 

“And—?” I demanded. 

“We’re going to change places with you,” the voice said casually. 

“Excuse me?” Fergie cried. “You’re going to what?” 

“We will take your places,” the voice repeated. “And you shall take ours. 
You will be the ghost dogs. You will roam these woods as we did—forever!” 



“No way!” I cried. I wanted to run. 

But where? 

I was surrounded by heavy blackness on all sides. 

“Fergie—” I started. 

But I heard her gasp. And then I began to feel warm. As if someone had 
covered me with a heavy blanket. 

The warmth swept over my body. 

Simmering heat. As if I were in an oven. 

Warmer. Warmer. Until sweat dripped down my face, and I was panting in 
the heat. 

I can’t stand it anymore! I thought. I’m going to melt! 

I opened my mouth to scream. But the sounds that escaped my throat 
weren’t mine. 

In fact, they didn’t sound human at all. 



26 


I opened my eyes to bright sunshine. 

The woods around me appeared fuzzy. I struggled to focus. 

I yawned. Then I stretched my entire body and shook myself awake. 

Yes! That stretch felt good. 

I sniffed the air and shook myself again. Wow! Something smelled 
delicious. 

My stomach growled. I suddenly realized I must be starving. 

Still trying to focus, I took two steps and fell on my face. 

I stood again, feeling unsteady. What’s wrong? I wondered. 

I gazed around the woods. Why were the trees suddenly all black and 
white? Why was the sky gray? The grass gray? 

What had happened to all the color? 

Was this a dream? 

I heard a gruff sound behind me. Someone clearing his throat. 

I turned—and saw a black Labrador. 

I started to cry out—but hoarse barks escaped my throat. 

Startled, I glanced down at my own body. My own fur-covered body. 
“Ohhhh.” I dug my front paws into the dirt. I shook myself hard, trying to shake 
the dog body off. Trying to shake it away so I could see my real body. Cooper’s 
body. 

And as I shook, I jerked my head back. And saw a long, black tail! 

My tail! 

I let out a startled yip. I’m a dog, too, I realized. 

The ghosts in the Changing Room weren’t kidding around. They changed 
places with us. Fergie and I are dogs. 

Fergie whimpered. 

Trembling, we both began to trot, our tails hanging between our legs. 
Fergie’s whimpers turned into mournful howls. 

What was that? Strange! I thought Fergie said something. 

“I did say something,” she insisted. “Well, actually, I thought something. I 
think we can read each other’s thoughts, Cooper.” 



Okay, Fergie, then what am I thinking now? 

“You’re thinking of that leftover fried liver from last night that your mom 
put in the fridge,” Fergie thought. 

That’s right! 

We could read each other’s mind! Cool! 

I licked my lips a few times, thinking about the liver. I loved liver so much, 
Mom made it for me once a week. Man, did I want that liver now! 

Then I remembered I had other things to worry about. 

“Fergie, what are we going to do? We’re dogs!” 

“I can see that, Cooper,” she replied, swatting a fly from behind her floppy, 
black ear. 

“Well, we’ve got to do something!” I cried. “We can’t trot around like this 
forever. Those ghost dogs stole our bodies! They’re probably fooling my parents 
this very minute!” 

Fergie didn’t reply. Instead, she ran around in circles, chasing her tail. 
“Hey! This is fun!” 

“Fergie! Quit messing around! We’re in major trouble!” 

“Okay, okay! I’m sorry! I’m upset about this, too, you know!” 

Fergie dropped to the dirt. She buried her snout in her front paws. Deep in 
thought. “You know what, Cooper?” 

“What?” I asked as I paced back and forth, trying to think of a way to get us 
out of this mess. 

“Your droopy ears look pretty good—now that you’re a dog.” 

“Fergie! Get serious!” I growled. 

Then it hit me. 

“I know!” I cried. “I know what we can do. We have to drag those ghosts 
back to the shack and trade places with them again!” 

“Oh, sure, Cooper. No problem,” Fergie barked. “And how do you suppose 
we do that? Walk up to them and say, ‘Uh, excuse me, but can you come back to 
the shack with us? It’ll only be for a second.’” 

I stared at Fergie. She had become a dog. But her personality hadn’t 
changed one bit! 

“I heard that,” she mumbled. 

I sighed. “Well, do you have a better plan?” I asked, scratching furiously at 
my neck. 

“I’m thinking, I’m thinking,” Fergie answered with a yawn. “I’m really so 



tired. Maybe after a nap—” 

“No! No naps! We have to do something—now! Listen to me. We’ll get my 
parents to help. All we have to do is convince them that we’re the real Cooper 
and Margaret, and that those kids in the house are imposters.” 

“And how are we going to do that?” Fergie asked. 

Good question. Real good question. 



27 


Fergie and I trotted through the woods. I sniffed the ground. Sniffed the weeds. 
So many great smells! 

We stopped at the edge of the woods behind my house. I heard laughing, 
shouting voices. Then I saw my parents. In the backyard. Throwing a Frisbee 
around with Fergie and Cooper! 

Those fakes! 

I growled with anger. 

I bared my teeth. Prepared to attack. 

“Whoa!” Fergie cried. “Cooper, wait! You can’t just barge over there and 
attack them!” 

Fergie was right. That wouldn’t solve anything. 

I watched my dad send the Frisbee flying across the yard. 

I had a strong urge to jump up and go for that Frisbee. 

But I stopped myself. This was no time for playing. 

Then I had an idea. The greatest idea. The idea of a lifetime. 

“Come on!” I urged Fergie. I began loping toward the side of my house. 

“Cooper, where are you going?” she asked. 

I didn’t answer. I stopped outside the wall to Mickey’s room. “This will just 
take a second,” I told Fergie. 

She read my mind. She knew what I planned to do. 

Side by side, we leaped through the wall of the house. 

And burst into Mickey’s room. 

He was standing in his underwear. Leaning over his dresser, sorting out his 
T-shirts. He cried out and spun around as Fergie and I started to growl. 

My brother uttered a short, terrified whimper. He started backing up, his 
eyes wide with fright. 

Fergie and I began barking and jumping up on our hind legs. 

“How—how did you—?” Mickey stammered. 

Those were the only words he could choke out. 

Then he let out another whimper, stumbled past us, and bolted out through 
the bedroom door. “Mommy! Daddy! Help!” I heard him scream. “Mommy! 



Daddy!” 

Fergie and I didn’t want to miss seeing him run through the yard in his 
underwear. We trotted through the wall and watched until he disappeared around 
the garage. 

“Did you see his face?” I yelped happily. “Was that awesome?!” 

“Man, that was excellent!” Fergie cheered. 

“Hey, you two!” a stern voice called. 

I turned around. 

Dad! 

“How did you dogs get in this yard?” my father demanded sharply. “Come 
on. Out! Out!” 

“But, wait! Dad! It’s me, Cooper!” I tried to yell. But all that came out was 
Woof! Woof! Woof! 

“Out! Out!” Dad repeated angrily. 

“Dad! Wait! It’s really me! Listen! You’ve got to listen!” 

“Woof! Woof! Woof, woof, woof! Woof! Woof, woof, woof, woof!” 

My father armed himself with a broom and waved it wildly at Fergie and 
me. ♦Out!^ he cried, shaking the broom at us. 

“What’s going on?” Mom called from the doorway. 

“Mom! It’s me. Cooper!” I barked furiously. 

“Oh, Sam. Please get rid of those animals! You know I’m allergic to dogs!” 

“But, Mom!” I cried. “Can’t you tell it’s me?” 

Woof, woof! Woof, woof, woof, woof, woof! 

“Please, Sam! Call the pound! These dogs look dangerous. They might 
have to be put to sleep! Call the pound. They’ll know what to do.” 

I watched in horror as my dad picked up the phone and dialed. 



28 


Fergie and I bolted into the woods as fast as we could. Even as a dog, Fergie ran 
faster than I did. 

We hid among the trees and watched my parents and the fake Cooper and 
Fergie toss the Frisbee around in the backyard. 

The guys from the pound never showed up. But things still looked pretty 
bad. My parents thought we were stray dogs. And I couldn’t tell them who I was. 

All I could do was bark. 

Hey. Wait a minute. Maybe I could do more than bark. 

“Fergie, I have another idea!” I said, wagging my tail. “Follow me!” 

Fergie and I sneaked around the side of the house and stepped through the 
wall into the living room. I sniffed around, searching for a pen and some paper. 

“I’ll write them a note,” I explained to Fergie. “Mom will definitely 
recognize my handwriting.” 

I found a pen lying on the coffee table, next to some notepaper. 

I tried to lift the pen. 

It slipped out from under my paw. I couldn’t wrap my paw around it. 

Fergie tried to help me. She nosed the pen in my direction, but I still 
couldn’t pick it up. 

Impossible. Dogs can’t hold pens. 

I felt so disappointed. I pushed the pen away, then ripped the paper to 
shreds. That’s when my dad burst in. 

“Hey! I thought I told you two dogs to beat it!” my father yelled. 

My mother and the two phonies came running into the room. 

I started barking, trying to communicate with Dad. But that seemed to 
annoy him even more. 

“Stand up on your hind legs!” I instructed Fergie. “Maybe he’ll think we’re 
trying to tell him something!” 

I hopped up, trying to balance on my back legs. But I wasn’t very good at it. 
I mean, give me a break. I’d only been a dog for a few hours. 

I toppled over onto my stomach. 

I must have looked pretty stupid, because everyone started laughing. 



“Weird dogs,” the Cooper imposter said. 

Fergie and I hopped up again and again. But nobody understood what we 
were doing. And after a while, they grew bored with our little act. Dad picked up 
the broom again. 

I probably could have yanked that stupid broom right out of his hands and 
pinned him to the ground. But what would that prove? 

Dad chased Fergie and me out the back door and into the woods. 

“You’re right,” I told her when we were safely hidden by the trees. “We’re 
going to be dogs for the rest of our lives. And not even real dogs. Ghost dogs.” 

“Don’t worry, Cooper,” Fergie replied, reading my mind. “We’ll convince 
them. There’s got to be a way to show them who we are.” 

I sighed, then rolled on to my back. 

If only Gary and Todd were here. They’d know what to do. 

I rolled back again. And, suddenly, I felt hot. Burning hot. I sprang up on all 
fours. 

“What is it?” Fergie cried out. “What’s wrong?” 

I shook violently from head to tail. Out of control. I couldn’t stop shaking. 
Something had taken over my body. 



29 


“Fleas!” I shrieked. 

There must have been thousands of them! Clinging all over my body! And I 
couldn’t reach them. 

“My back!” I cried helplessly. “My back!” 

Fergie lifted her front paws and scratched the part of my back I couldn’t 
reach. 

“Higher,” I pleaded. “Higher. Aaaaahhhhh, that’s it!” 

My ears drooped low, and I sighed with relief. 

Fergie found us a nice spot under a tall birch tree. I stretched out my body 
and rested my face on my paws. Fergie curled up into a tight ball. It was time to 
think up another plan. 

And time to nap. I couldn’t believe how tired I’d suddenly become. 

The day passed slowly. I think we both dozed off once or twice. 

Around lunchtime, we ran to the stream in the woods for water. Some fleas 
still nipped at my skin. And I thought a cool dip in the stream might help. 

We returned to our spot under the shady birch. Now we were both starving. 

“Maybe we can find some scraps of food at my house—in the garbage,” I 
suggested. 

“Yuck! I’m not eating garbage,” Fergie wailed. “No way.” But she knew we 
had no choice. 

We returned to my house and quietly made our way to the side door, where 
Dad stored the garbage pails. 

As we sniffed around for some food, Mickey and my parents opened the 
back door and stepped out into the yard. 

“I’m telling you, Mom!” Mickey cried. “They’re ghost dogs! They walked 
right through my bedroom wall! They’re not normal!” 

“Save your jokes for Cooper,” my father snapped. 

“Hey, Fergie, maybe Mickey can help us,” I suggested, watching my 
brother. “He’s the only one who believes we’re not normal dogs. Maybe we can 
find a way to tell him who we are.” 

Fergie sighed. “For sure,” she said sarcastically. “Then what? Can you see 
your parents’ faces when Mickey tells them the two dogs hanging around their 



house are really Cooper and Margaret Ferguson?” 

I hung my head. Fergie was right. They’d never believe Mickey, either. 

“Well, we have to do something!” I said, scratching behind my ear. “These 
fleas are driving me crazy! I can’t live like this!” 

“Maybe we can get you a flea collar,” Fergie suggested. 

“Oh, right. I’ll just trot into the Main Street drugstore, put five dollars on 
the counter, and ask for a flea collar. Nobody will think that’s weird.” I rolled my 
eyes. 

Fergie snapped at me. “Well, excuse me, Cooper. I was only trying to help!” 

Fergie and I spent the rest of the day snapping at each other, getting on each 
other’s nerves. 

When dinnertime rolled around, my stomach rumbled loudly. Then I 
smelled the most wonderful smell. 

I raised my nose high in the air and sniffed excitedly. 

I’d know that aroma anywhere. 

Liver! The leftover liver from last night! 

“Come on!” I barked to Fergie. “I’ve got to get some of that liver!” 

We trotted over to the back door and peered inside. My whole family had 
gathered around the table, ready to eat. 

“You’re drooling,” Fergie said to me in disgust. “Gross.” 

Like I cared. 

I couldn’t take my eyes off the plate of liver Mom carried to the table. I 
watched hungrily as she placed a big slab on my father’s plate. 

Then she served some to Mickey. Mickey seemed edgy, nervous. I hoped he 
was still upset from my little trick this morning. 

Then Mom placed a piece of liver on the phony Cooper’s plate. He jumped 
from his seat. “Yuck!” he cried out in disgust. “I hate liver!” 

Mom’s jaw dropped. “Cooper! What are you saying? You love liver!” 

The phony Cooper began to stutter. 

“Oh, uh, did I say I hated it? Oh, no. I’m, uh, just joking, Mom. I love liver. 
Everyone knows that!” 

Mom stared at him suspiciously. “Really, Cooper. You haven’t been 
yourself all day!” 

My eyes widened. 

This was my chance! 

Now was the perfect time to show Mom he wasn’t himself! He was a total 



phony! 

“I’m going in!” I told Fergie. 

I burst through the kitchen door and headed straight for the plate of liver. 
I’ll show Mom who the real Cooper is, I thought happily. The Cooper who loves 
liver. She’ll know it’s me instantly! 

This has got to work. 

It’s our last chance, I knew. Our only chance. 



30 


Panting excitedly, I charged into the kitchen and leaped up at the table. 

Mom screamed and dropped the plate of liver on the floor. 

In a flash, I bent down and began lapping it up. Delicious! 

“See, Mom? Look, it’s me! Your son, Cooper!” I yelped in between bites. 

“Sam! Do something! That animal is eating our dinner!” 

Huh? Animal? “No, Mom! It’s me! Your son! Look, I love liver!” 

But it was no use. 

All Mom heard was, “Woof, woof! Woof, woof! Woof, woof! Woof, woof, 
woof, woof! ” 

Dad shoved his chair away from the table and grabbed a newspaper from 
the counter. He rolled it up, then swatted my nose. 

“Ow!” 

That hurt! 

“I’ll see if the line to the pound is still busy,” Mom said, picking up the 
phone. “Try to chase the dogs into the pantry and lock the door. We’ll hold them 
in there until the pound can come get them.” 

The fake Cooper and Margaret helped Dad back us toward the pantry. “Bad 
dogs! Bad!” the phony Margaret shouted. 

“Dad, do you think the pound will use a tranquilizer gun on them?” the 
phony Cooper asked. 

“Maybe,” Dad replied. 

I glanced over at Fergie. 

Tranquilizer guns? No thank you! 

I never ran so fast in all my life. I even ran faster than Fergie. 

“Got any other bright ideas, fleabag?” she asked when we were safely in the 
woods. 

I growled at her and turned away. The sun was setting over the trees. The 
air felt cool. It would be dark soon. 

“And thanks for saving some of that liver for me,” Fergie snapped. “I’m 
hungry, too, you know!” 



I ignored her. 

I gazed longingly through the trees. Through the window of my house as 
Mom and Dad washed the dishes. 

I couldn’t help myself. I felt so bad. I started whimpering. 

If only I could be inside my warm, comfortable house right now. In a short 
while, it would be dark. I didn’t want to spend a night in the woods. 

Think, Cooper! Think! I urged myself. There must be a way to get our 
human bodies back. 

“Whoa! Wait a minute!” I cried. “I just thought of something!” 

Fergie awoke from a nap. “What?” she asked lazily. 

“We’re dogs, right?” 

“Right.” 

“So we should act like dogs!” 

Fergie narrowed her eyes. “Cooper, what are you talking about?” 

I took a deep breath. “Okay, listen,” I explained. “Remember how those 
ghost dogs got us out to the shack?” 

Fergie nodded. 

“That’s what we should do! We should pull those kids back there, the way 
they pulled us! That’s what dogs would do!” 

Fergie raised her head. Her ears perked up. “Not bad! Not bad at all!” 

“We’re dogs,” I continued. “We have sharp teeth, right? Very sharp teeth. 
We’ll drag them into the woods and into the Changing Room—and before you 
know it, we’ll be Cooper and Fergie again!” 

Fergie bounced up and began panting happily and wagging her tail. 
“Excellent!” she cried. 

“Okay, here’s the plan.” With my paw, I drew a diagram in the dirt. “The 
phonies are here, in the den. We’ll walk through the wall and haul them out 
through the kitchen door. It’s okay if Mom and Dad follow. We can outrun 
them.” 

“I’m ready. Let’s do it!” Fergie exclaimed. 

We trotted to the house and pushed through the wall, as planned. 

Inside, the fake Cooper and Fergie were watching MTV on the den TV. We 
burst through the den wall and surprised them. 

“Mom!” the fake Cooper screamed at the top of his lungs. “Dad! Help! It’s 
the dogs!” 

Fergie and I moved in on them, snarling as ferociously as we knew how. 



I clamped on to the fake Cooper’s ankle just as my parents and Mickey 
burst into the room. I motioned to Fergie to get on with it. In a flash, she leaped 
on to the phony Fergie and clamped her jaws around her wrist. 

Then we tugged. 

“Mom! Dad! Help!” the phony Cooper yelled. 

“Mr. Holmes!” the phony Fergie cried. “Do something! They’re attacking 

us!” 

Mom ran for the broom. But before Dad could swing into action, Fergie and 
I had dragged the imposters through the kitchen. 

I caught a glimpse of Mickey as I tugged. He was hiding in the corner, 
shaking all over. 

Too bad I didn’t have time to enjoy that picture. 

We were out the door now. Everything was working perfectly. Fergie and I 
would be back to normal in no time. 

The phonies knew where we were taking them. But there was nothing they 
could do about it. Fergie and I were too strong, too ferocious. 

“Dad! Help!” the fake Cooper cried again. 

“Don’t worry!” Dad called out to him. “The dogs don’t seem to want to hurt 
you! I think they want us to follow them!” 

Way to go, Dad! 

A short while later, I spotted the clearing where the old shack stood. It 
won’t be long now, I thought happily. In a few minutes, Fergie and I will walk 
home with my parents. On two legs. No more fleas. No more food from garbage 
pails. I couldn’t wait! 

We panted wildly as the struggling imposters attempted to break free. But 
Fergie and I held on to them for dear life, tugging them, tugging with all our 
canine strength. 

And, then, finally, we were there. The old shack. We pushed the phonies up 
against the door. 

I released the fake Cooper from my grip for a second. I had no choice. I had 
to scratch a flea. 

The phony tried to make a run for it. 

“Cooper! He’s getting away!” Fergie barked. 

“No way!” I barked back. I bounded off after him and clamped my jaws 
down on the hem of his shirt. Then I dragged him back to the shack. 

The fake Fergie screamed with all her might. “No! No! Not in there again!” 



I glared up at her. 

“Hold on, Margaret,” I heard Mom call. “Don’t be afraid. Let’s see what the 
dogs are trying to show us.” 

It was time. Time to make the switch. 

“Now!” I yelped. 

Fergie and I jumped on the imposters and sent them tumbling into the 
shack. Then we leaped in after them. 

All four of us fell down, down, down. Down into the solid blackness. 

Once again, I felt dizzy and warm. 

Warmer. Warmer. As if the warm blanket were being pulled over me. 

I could feel myself changing. Changing in the darkness, in the sweltering 

heat. 

I gazed above my head. A glowing shadow hovered over me. A shadow 
with tiny red eyes. 

My body shuddered. I began to shake. 

And all at once I knew. Something wasn’t right. 

“Fergie!” I cried out in a harsh whisper. “It’s not working! Something is 
wrong! Something is very wrong!” 



31 


“Cooper!” my mom cried happily, running toward the shack with outstretched 
arms. “Are you okay?” 

“Margaret, what happened in there?” Dad called. “What happened to the 
dogs?” 

“We’re okay,” Margaret muttered. “It’s just an empty shack. That’s all.” 

“I’m going to call the pound again as soon as we get home,” Mom 
announced. “Those dogs shouldn’t be allowed to roam free. They’re dangerous!” 

“Let’s just get out of here, okay, Dad?” Cooper said. 

Fergie nodded in agreement. “We’re okay, Let’s go home.” 

“What an adventure!” Mom sighed. 

“At least it isn’t boring up here in our new home,” Dad added. 

“For sure,” Cooper agreed. 


* * * 


“What happened?” I asked, rubbing my eyes. 

I watched my parents walking away from the shack, their arms around two 

kids. 

“Hey! Those kids!” I cried. “They’re not us!” 

The door to the shack opened, and two black Labs stumbled out in a daze. 
Their eyes met, then they bolted away, barking frantically. 

What’s their problem? I wondered. 

I watched the dogs disappear into the trees. 

What’s going on? I asked myself, totally confused. 

I’m not a kid—and I’m not a dog, either! 

“Hey, Fergie? Fergie?” 

Where was she? 

When she popped up next to me, we both gasped. 

“Oh, no! Please—no! No! No! Noooo!” she wailed. 

Her head cocked to one side, and her little brown nose twitched furiously. 
“Tell me we’re not!” I begged her. “Please, Fergie—tell me we’re not...” 



“We are!” Fergie squeaked. “We... we’re chipmunks !” 

We both squeaked and chittered our surprise. 

Fergie gazed down at her furry little body. “How did this happen, Cooper? 
How did this happen?” 

“The woods are filled with chipmunks,” I sighed. “Two of them must have 
wandered into the Changing Room. And we—” 

“We switched with the chipmunks—not the kids!” Fergie cried. Her bushy 
tail thumped furiously on the ground. 

I examined my tiny black paws. I moved my teeny little fingers. I twitched 
my button nose. 

Cute. I was so cute! 

“Now what?” Fergie wailed. “What do we do now?” 

“Uh... hunt for acorns?” I suggested. 

Fergie’s beady little eyes squinted into mine. “Excuse me?” 

“Let’s hunt for acorns!” I said. “I’m starving!” 




THE HORROR AT 
CAMP JELLY JAM 

Goosebumps - 33 
R.L. Stine 


1 


Mom pointed excitedly out the car window. “Look! A cow!” 

My brother, Elliot, and I both groaned. We had been driving through 
farmland for four hours, and Mom had pointed out every single cow and horse. 

“Look out your side, Wendy!” Mom cried from the front seat. “Sheep!” 

I stared out the window and saw about a dozen gray sheep—fat, woolly 
ones—grazing on a grassy green hill. “Nice sheep, Mom,” I said, rolling my 
eyes. 

“There’s a cow!” Elliot exclaimed. 

Now he was doing it! 

I reached across the backseat and gave him a hard shove. “Mom, is it 
possible to explode from boredom?” I moaned. 

“BOOOOOOM!” Elliot shouted. The kid is a riot, isn’t he? 

“I told you,” Dad muttered to Mom. “A twelve-year-old is too old to go on 
a long car trip.” 

“So is an eleven-year-old!” Elliot protested. 

I’m twelve. Elliot is eleven. 

“How can you two be bored?” Mom asked. “Look—horses!” 

Dad sped up to pass a huge yellow truck. The road curved through high, 
sloping hills. In the far distance, I could see gray mountains, rising up in a heavy 
mist. 

“There’s so much beautiful scenery to admire,” Mom gushed. 

“After a while, it all looks like some boring old calendar,” I complained. 

Elliot pointed out of his window. “Look! No horses!” 

He doubled over, laughing. He thought that was the funniest thing anyone 
had ever said. Elliot really cracks himself up. 

Mom turned in the front seat. She narrowed her eyes at my brother. “Are 
you making fun of me?” she demanded. 

“Yes!” Elliot replied. 

“Of course not,” I chimed in. “Who would ever make fun of you, Mom?” 

“When do you ever stop?” Mom complained. 

“We’re leaving Idaho,” Dad announced. “That’s Wyoming up ahead. We’ll 



be up in those mountains soon.” 

“Maybe we’ll see Mountain Cows!” I exclaimed sarcastically. 

Elliot laughed. 

Mom sighed. “Go ahead. Ruin our first family vacation in three years.” 

We hit a bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us. Dad had hooked one of 
those big, old-fashioned trailers to the back of our car. We had dragged it all over 
the West. 

The trailer was actually kind of fun. It had four narrow beds built into the 
sides. And it had a table we could sit around to eat or play cards. It even had a 
small kitchen. 

At night, we’d pull into a trailer camp. Dad would hook the trailer up to 
water and electricity. And we spent the night inside, in our own private little 
house. 

We hit another bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us again. The car 
lurched forward as we started to climb into the mountains. 

“Mom, how do I know if I’m getting carsick or not?” Elliot asked. 

Mom turned back to us, frowning. “Elliot, you never get carsick,” she said 
in a low voice. “Did you forget?” 

“Oh. Right,” Elliot replied. “I just thought it might be something to do.” 

“Elliot!” Mom screamed. “If you’re so bored, take a nap!” 

“That’s boring,” my brother muttered. 

I could see Mom’s face turning an angry red. Mom doesn’t look like Dad, 
Elliot, and me. She is blond and has blue eyes and very fair skin, which turns red 
very easily. And she’s kind of plump. 

My dad, brother, and I are skinny and sort of dark. The three of us have 
brown hair and brown eyes. 

“You kids don’t know how lucky you are,” Dad said. “You’re getting to see 
some amazing sights.” 

“Bobby Harrison got to go to baseball camp,” Elliot grumbled. “And Jay 
Thurman went to sleepaway camp for eight weeks!” 

“I wanted to go to sleepaway camp, too!” I protested. 

“You’ll go to camp next summer,” Mom replied sharply. “This is the chance 
of a lifetime!” 

“But the chance of a lifetime is so boring!” Elliot complained. 

“Wendy, entertain your brother,” Dad ordered. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “How am I supposed to entertain him?” 



“Play Car Geography,” Mom suggested. 

“Oh, no! Not again!” Elliot wailed. 

“Go ahead. I’ll start,” Mom said. “Atlanta.” 

Atlanta ends with an A. So I had to think of a city that starts with an A. 
“Albany,” I said. “Your turn, Elliot.” 

“Hmmmmm. A city that starts with a Y...” My brother thought for a 
moment. Then he twisted up his face. “I quit!” 

My brother is such a bad sport. He takes games too seriously, and he really 
hates to lose. Sometimes he gets so intense when he’s playing soccer or softball, 
I really worry about him. 

Sometimes when he thinks he can’t win, he just quits. Like now. 

“What about Youngstown?” Mom asked. 

“What about it?” Elliot grumbled. 

“I have an idea!” I said. “How about letting Elliot and me ride in the trailer 
for a while?” 

“Yeah! Cool!” Elliot cried. 

“I don’t think so,” Mom replied. She turned to Dad. “It’s against the law to 
ride in a trailer, isn’t it?” 

“I don’t know,” Dad said, slowing the car. We were climbing through thick 
pine woods now. The air smelled so fresh and sweet. 

“Let us!” Elliot pleaded. “Come on—let us!” 

“I don’t see any harm in letting them ride back there for a while,” Dad told 
Mom. “As long as they’re careful.” 

“We’ll be careful!” Elliot promised. 

“Are you sure it’s safe?” Mom asked Dad. 

Dad nodded. “What could happen?” 

He pulled the car to the side of the highway. Elliot and I slid out. We ran to 
the trailer, pulled open the door, and hurried inside. 

A few seconds later, the car pulled back onto the highway. We bounced 
along behind it in the big trailer. 

“This is so cool!” Elliot declared, making his way to the back window. 

“Do I have good ideas or what?” I asked, following him. He slapped me a 
high five. 

We stared out the back window. The highway seemed to tilt down as we 
headed up to the mountains. 

The trailer bounced and swayed as the car tugged it. 



The road tilted up steeper. And steeper. 
And that’s when all our troubles began. 



2 


“I win!” Elliot cried. He jumped up and raised both fists in triumph. 

“Three out of five!” I demanded, rubbing my wrist. “Come on—three out of 
five. Unless you’re chicken.” 

I knew that would get him. Elliot can’t stand to be called a chicken. He 
settled back in the seat. 

We leaned over the narrow table and clasped hands. We had been arm 
wrestling for about ten minutes. It was kind of fun because the table bounced 
every time the trailer rolled over a bump in the road. 

I am as strong as Elliot. But he’s more determined. A lot more determined. 
You never saw anyone groan and sweat and strain so much in arm wrestling! 

To me, a game is just a game. But to Elliot, every game is life or death. 

He had won two out of three about five times. 

My wrist was sore, and my hand ached. But I really wanted to beat him in 
this final match. 

I leaned over the table and squeezed his hand harder. I gritted my teeth and 
stared menacingly into his dark brown eyes. 

“Go!” he cried. 

We both strained against each other. I pushed hard. Elliot’s hand started to 
bend back. 

I pushed harder. I nearly had him. Just a little harder. 

He let out a groan and pushed back. He shut his eyes. His face turned beet- 
red. I could see the veins push out at the sides of his neck. 

My brother just can’t stand to lose. 

SLAM! 

The back of my hand hit the table hard. 

Elliot had won again. 

Actually, I let him win. I didn’t want to see his whole head explode because 
of a stupid arm-wrestling match. 

He jumped up and pumped his fists, cheering for himself. 

“Hey—!” he cried out as the trailer swayed hard, and he went crashing into 
the wall. 



The trailer lurched again. I grabbed the table to keep from falling off my 
seat. “What’s going on?” 

“We changed direction. We’re heading down now,” Elliot replied. He edged 
his way back toward the table. 

But we bumped hard, and he toppled to the floor. “Hey—we’re going 
backwards!” 

“I’ll bet Mom’s driving,” I said, holding on to the table edge with both 
hands. 

Mom always drives like a crazy person. When you warn her that she’s 
going eighty, she always says, “That can’t be right. It feels as if I’m going thirty- 
five!” 

The trailer was bouncing and bumping, rolling downhill. Elliot and I were 
bouncing and bumping with the trailer. 

“What is their problem?” Elliot cried, grabbing on to one of the beds, 
struggling to keep his balance. “Are they backing up? Why are we going 
backwards?” 

The trailer roared downhill. I pushed myself up from the table and stumbled 
to the front to see the car. Shoving aside the red plaid curtain, I peered out 
through the small window. 

“Uh... Elliot...” I choked out. “We’ve got a problem.” 

“Huh? A problem?” he replied, bouncing harder as the trailer picked up 
speed. 

“Mom and Dad aren’t pulling us anymore,” I told him. “The car is gone.” 



3 


Elliot’s face filled with confusion. He didn’t understand me. Or maybe he didn’t 
believe me! 

“The trailer has come loose!” I screamed, staring out the bouncing window. 
“We’re rolling downhill—on our own!” 

“N-n-n-no!” Elliot chattered. He wasn’t stuttering. He was bouncing so 
hard, he could barely speak. His sneakers hopped so hard on the trailer floor, he 
seemed to be tap dancing. 

“OW!” I let out a pained shriek as my head bounced against the ceiling. 
Elliot and I stumbled to the back. Gripping the windowsill tightly, I struggled to 
see where we were heading. 

The road curved steeply downhill, through thick pine woods on both sides. 
The trees were a bouncing blur of greens and browns as we hurtled past. 

Picking up speed. Bouncing and tumbling. 

Faster. 

Faster. 

The tires roared beneath us. The trailer tilted and dipped. 

I fell to the floor. Landed hard on my knees. Reached to pull myself up. But 
the trailer swayed, and I went sprawling on my back. 

Pulling myself to my knees, I saw Elliot bouncing around on the floor like a 
soccer ball. I threw myself at the back of the trailer and peered out the window. 

The trailer bumped hard. The road curved sharply—but we didn’t curve 
with it! 

We shot off the side of the road. Swerved into the trees. 

“Elliot!” I shrieked. “We’re going to crash!” 



4 


The trailer jolted hard. I heard a cracking sound. 

It’s going to break in half! I thought. 

I pressed both hands against the front and stared out the window. Dark trees 
flew past. 

A hard bump sent me sprawling to the floor. 

I heard Elliot calling my name. “Wendy! Wendy! Wendy!” 

I shut my eyes and tensed every muscle. And waited for the crash. 

Waited... 

Waited... 

Silence. 

I opened my eyes. It took me a few seconds to realize that we were no 
longer moving. I took a deep breath and climbed to my feet. 

“Wendy?” I heard Elliot’s weak cry from the back of the trailer. 

My legs were trembling as I turned around. My whole body felt weird. As if 
we were still bouncing. “Elliot—are you okay?” 

He had been thrown into one of the bottom bunks. “Yeah. I guess,” he 
replied. He lowered his feet to the floor and shook his head. “I’m kind of dizzy.” 

“Me, too,” I confessed. “What a ride!” 

“Better than Space Mountain!” Elliot exclaimed. He climbed to his feet. 
“Let’s get out of this thing!” 

We both started to the door at the front. It was an uphill climb. The trailer 
tilted up. 

I reached the door first. I grabbed the handle. 

A loud knock on the door made me jump back. “Hey... !” I cried. 

Three more knocks. 

“It’s Mom and Dad!” Elliot cried. “They found us! Open it up! Hurry!” 

He didn’t have to tell me to hurry. My heart skipped. I was so glad to see 
them! 

I turned the handle, pushed open the trailer door— 

—and gasped. 



5 


I stared into the face of a blond-haired man. His blue eyes sparkled in the bright 
sunlight. 

He was dressed all in white. He wore a crisp white T-shirt tucked into 
baggy white shorts. A small round button pinned to his T-shirt read ONLY THE 
BEST in bold black letters. 

“Uh... hi,” I finally managed to choke out. 

He flashed me a gleaming smile. He seemed to have about two thousand 
teeth. “Hey, guys—everyone okay in there?” he asked. His blue eyes sparkled 
even brighter. 

“Yeah. We’re okay,” I told him. “A little shaken up, but—” 

“Who are you?” Elliot cried, poking his head out the door. 

The guy’s smile didn’t fade. “My name is Buddy.” 

“I’m Wendy. He’s Elliot. We thought you were our parents,” I explained. I 
hopped down to the ground. 

Elliot followed me. “Where are Mom and Dad?” he asked, frowning. 

“I haven’t seen anyone, guy,” Buddy told him. He studied the trailer. “What 
happened here? You came unhitched?” 

I nodded, brushing my dark hair off my face. “Yeah. On the steep hills, I 
guess.” 

“Dangerous,” Buddy muttered. “You must have been really scared.” 

“Not me!” Elliot declared. 

What a kid. First, he’s shaking in terror and calling out my name over and 
over. Now he’s Mister Macho. 

“I’ve never been so scared in all my life!” I admitted. 

I took a few steps away from the trailer and searched the woods. The trees 
creaked and swayed in a light breeze. The sun beamed down brightly. I shielded 
my eyes with one hand as I peered around. 

No sign of Mom and Dad. I couldn’t see the highway through the thick 
trees. 

I could see the tire tracks our trailer had made through the soft dirt. 
Somehow we had shot through a clear path between the trees. The trailer had 
come to rest at the foot of a sharp, sloping hill. 



“Wow. We were lucky,” I muttered. 

“You’re very lucky,” Buddy declared cheerfully. He stepped up beside me, 
placed his hands on my shoulders, and turned me around. “Check it out. Look 
where you guys landed!” 

Gazing up the hill, I saw a wide clearing between the trees. And then I saw 
a huge, red-and-white banner, stretched high on two poles. I had to squint to read 
the words on the banner. 

Elliot read them aloud: “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp.” 

“The, camp is on the other side of the hill,” Buddy told us, flashing us both 
a friendly smile. “Come on! Follow me!” 

“But—but—” my brother sputtered. “We have to find our parents!” 

“Hey—no problem, guy. You can wait for them at the camp,” Buddy 
assured him. 

“But how will they know where to find us?” I protested. “Should we leave a 
note?” 

Buddy flashed me another dazzling smile. “No. I’ll take care of it,” he told 
me. “No problem.” 

He stepped past the trailer and started up the hill. His white T-shirt and 
white shorts gleamed in the sunlight. I saw that his socks and high-tops were 
sparkling white, too. 

That’s his uniform. He must work at the camp, I decided. 

Buddy turned back. “You guys coming?” He motioned with both hands. 
“Come on. You’re going to like it!” 

Elliot and I hurried to catch up to him. My legs trembled as I ran. I could 
still feel the trailer floor bouncing and jolting beneath me. I wondered if I would 
ever feel normal again. 

As we made our way up the grassy hill, the red-and-white banner came into 
clearer view. “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp,” I read the words aloud. 

A funny, purple cartoon character had been drawn beside the words on the 
banner. He looked like a blob of grape bubble gum. He had a big smile on his 
face. He wore a gold crown on his head. 

“Who’s that?” I asked Buddy. 

Buddy glanced up at the banner. “That’s King Jellyjam,” he replied. “He’s 
our little mascot.” 

“Weird-looking mascot for a sports camp,” I declared, staring up at the 
purple, blobby king. 



Buddy didn’t reply. 

“Do you work at the camp?” Elliot asked. 

Buddy nodded. “It’s a great place to work. I’m the head counselor, guys. So 
—welcome!” 

“But we can’t go to your camp,” I protested. “We have to find our parents. 
We have to...” 

Buddy put a hand on my shoulder and a hand on Elliot’s shoulder. He 
guided us up the hill. “You guys have had a close call. You might as well stay 
and have some fun. Enjoy the camp. Until I can hook up with your parents.” 

As we neared the top of the hill, I heard voices. Kids’ voices. Shouting and 
laughing. 

The clearing narrowed. Tall pine trees, birch trees, and maples clustered 
over the hill. 

“What kind of sports camp is it?” Elliot asked Buddy. 

“We play all kinds of sports,” Buddy replied. “From Ping-Pong to football. 
From croquet to soccer. We have swimming. We have tennis. We have archery. 
We even have a marbles tournament!” 

“Sounds like a cool place!” my brother declared, grinning at me. 

“Only the best!” Buddy said, slapping Elliot on the shoulder. 

I reached the top of the hill first and peered down through the trees to the 
camp. It seemed to stretch for miles! 

I could see two long, white, two-story buildings on either side. Between 
them, I saw several playing fields, a baseball diamond, a long row of tennis 
courts, and two enormous swimming pools. 

“Those long, white buildings are the dorms,” Buddy explained, pointing. 
“That’s the girls’ dorm, and that’s the boys’. You guys can stay in them while 
you’re here.” 

“Wow! It looks awesome!” Elliot exclaimed. “Two swimming pools!” 

“Olympic size,” Buddy told him. “We have diving competitions, too. Are 
you into diving?” 

“Only inside the trailer!” I joked. 

“Wendy is into swimming,” Elliot told Buddy. 

“I think there’s a four-lap swim race this afternoon,” Buddy told me. “I’ll 
check the schedule for you.” 

The sun beamed on us as we followed the path down the hill. The back of 
my neck started to prickle. A cool swim sounded pretty good to me. 



“Can anyone sign up for baseball?” Elliot asked Buddy. “I mean, do you 
have to be on a team or something?” 

“You can play any sport you want,” Buddy told him. “The only rule at King 
Jellyjam’s Sports Camp is to try hard.” Buddy tapped the button on his T-shirt. 
“Only The Best,” he said. 

The breeze blew my hair back over my face. I knew I should have had it cut 
before vacation! I decided I’d have to find something to tie it back with as soon 
as I got into the dorm. 

A soccer match was under way on the nearest field. Whistles blew. Kids 
shouted. I saw a long row of archery targets at the far end of the soccer field. 

Buddy started jogging toward the field. Elliot stepped up beside me. “Hey 
—we wanted to go to camp, right?” he said, grinning. “Well? We made it!” 

Before I could reply, he trotted after Buddy. 

I brushed back my hair one more time, then followed. But I stopped when I 
saw a little girl poke her head out from behind a wide tree trunk. 

She appeared to be about six or seven. She had bright red hair and a face 
full of freckles. She wore a pale blue T-shirt pulled down over black tights. 

“Hey—” she called in a loud whisper. “Hey—!” 

I turned toward her, startled. 

“Don’t come in!” she called. “Run away! Don’t come in!” 



6 


Buddy turned back quickly. “What’s the problem, Wendy?” he called. 

When I returned my eyes to the tree, the red-haired girl had vanished. I 
blinked a couple of times. No trace of her. 

What was that girl doing out here? I wondered. Did she hide behind that 
tree just to scare people? 

“Uh... no problem,” I called to Buddy. I followed Elliot and the counselor 
into the camp. 

I quickly forgot all about the girl as we made our way around the soccer 
field and past a long row of fenced-in tennis courts. The thwack of tennis balls 
followed us as we turned on to the main path that led through the camp. 

So many sports! So much activity! 

We pushed our way through kids of all ages, eagerly hurrying to the 
swimming pools, to the baseball diamond, to the bowling lanes! 

“Awesome!” Elliot kept repeating. “Totally awesome!” 

And for once, he was right. 

We passed several other camp counselors. They were all young men and 
women, dressed completely in white, all of them good-looking and smiling 
cheerfully. 

And we passed dozens of little triangular signs showing the purple, blobby 
face of King Jellyjam, smiling out from under his shiny gold crown. Under each 
face was the camp slogan: Only The Best. 

He’s kind of cute, I decided. I realized I was starting to like everything 
about this amazing sports camp. 

And I have to confess I found myself secretly hoping that Mom and Dad 
wouldn’t be able to find Elliot and me for at least a day or two. 

Isn’t that terrible? 

I felt really guilty about it. But I couldn’t help thinking it. This camp was 
just too exciting. Especially after days of riding in the backseat of the car, staring 
out at cows! 

We dropped my brother off at the boys’ dorm first. Another counselor, a 
tall, dark-haired guy named Scooter, greeted Elliot and took my brother off to 
find a dorm room. 



Then Buddy led me to the girls’ dorm on the other side of the camp. We 
passed a gymnastics competition being held in an outdoor arena. Beyond that, 
one of the swimming pools was jammed with kids watching a diving contest off 
the high board. 

Buddy and I chatted as we walked. I told him about my school and about 
how my favorite sports are swimming and biking. 

We stopped at the white double-door entrance to the dorm. “Where are you 
from?” I asked him. 

Buddy stared back at me. He had such a confused expression on his face. 
For a moment, I thought he didn’t understand the question. 

“Do you come from around here?” I asked. 

He swallowed hard. He squinted his blue eyes. “Weird...” he muttered 
finally. 

“What’s weird?” I demanded. 

“I... I don’t remember,” he stammered. “I don’t remember where I’m from. 
Is that weird or what?” He raised his right hand to his mouth and nibbled his 
pointer finger. 

“Hey, I forget stuff all the time,” I told him, seeing how upset he was. 

I didn’t get a chance to say anything else. A young woman counselor with 
very short, straight black hair and bright purple-lipsticked lips came trotting up 
to us. “Hello. I’m Holly. Are you ready for some sports?” 

“I guess,” I replied uncertainly. 

“This is Wendy,” Buddy told her, his expression still troubled. “She needs a 
room.” 

“No problem!” Holly declared cheerfully. “Only The Best!” 

“Only The Best,” Buddy repeated quietly. He flashed me a smile. But I 
could see he was still struggling to remember where his home was. Weird, huh? 

Holly led the way into the dorm. I followed her down a long, white-tiled 
hall. Several girls came running past, on their way to different sports. They were 
all shouting and laughing excitedly. 

I peeked into some of the open rooms as we passed by them. Wow! I 
thought. This place is so modern and luxurious! It’s not exactly your basic, rustic 
summer camp. 

“We don’t stay in the rooms much at all,” Holly told me. “Everyone is 
always outdoors, competing.” 

She pushed open a white door and motioned for me to step in. Bright 



sunlight flooded the room from a wide window on the opposite wall. 

I saw two bright blue bunk beds against each wall. A sleek white dresser 
between them. Two white leather armchairs. 

The walls were white. They were bare except for a small, framed drawing 
of King Jellyjam above the dresser. 

“Nice room!” I exclaimed, squinting against the bright sunlight. 

Holly smiled. Her bright purple lips made the rest of her features seem to 
disappear. “Glad you like it, Wendy. You can take that bottom bunk over there.” 
She pointed. She had purple fingernails that matched her lipstick. 

“Do I have roommates?” I asked. 

Holly nodded. “You’ll meet them soon. They’ll get you started with some 
activities. I think they’re playing soccer on the lower field. I’m not sure.” 

She started out of the room, but turned at the doorway. “You’ll like Dierdre. 
I think she’s about your age.” 

“Thanks,” I said, gazing around the room. 

“Catch you later,” Holly replied. She vanished into the hall. 

I stood in the center of the sunlit room, thinking hard. What am I supposed 
to do for clothes? I wondered. What about swimsuits? Sweats? 

A11 I had were the denim short-shorts and pink-and-blue-striped T-shirt I 
was wearing. 

And why didn’t Holly tell me where to go next? I asked myself. Why did 
she just leave me by myself in this empty room? 

I didn’t have long to ask myself questions. 

I started to cross to the window when I heard voices. Whispered voices 
outside the door. 

I turned to the door. Were my roommates returning? 

I listened to the excited buzz of whispers. 

Then I heard a girl loudly instruct the others. “Come on. We’ve got her 
trapped in there. Let’s get her!” 



7 


I gasped and searched frantically for a place to hide. 

No time. 

Three girls burst into the room, their eyes narrowed, their mouths twisted 
into menacing sneers. They formed a line and moved toward me quickly. 

“Whoa! Wait!” I cried. I raised both hands as if to shield myself from their 
attack. 

The tall girl with streaky blond hair was the first to laugh. Then the other 
two joined in. 

“Gotcha,” the blond girl declared, tossing back her long hair triumphantly. 

I glared back at her, my mouth hanging open. 

“Did you really think we were going to attack?” one of the others asked. 
She was thin and wiry, with very short black hair cut into bangs. She wore gray 
sweats and a torn gray T-shirt. 

“Well...” I started. I could feel my face growing hot. Their little joke had 
really fooled me. I felt like a total jerk. 

“Don’t look at me,” the third girl said, shaking her head. She had frizzy 
blond hair tumbling out from beneath a blue and red Chicago Cubs cap. “It was 
all Dierdre’s idea.” She pointed to the girl with streaky blond hair. 

“Don’t feel bad,” Dierdre told me, grinning. Her green eyes flashed. 
“You’re the third girl this week.” 

The other two snickered. 

“And did the others think you were attacking?” I asked. 

Dierdre nodded, very pleased with herself. “It’s kind of a mean joke,” she 
admitted. “But it’s funny.” 

This time I joined in the laughter. 

“I have a younger brother. I’m used to dumb jokes,” I told Dierdre. 

She swept back her hair again. Rummaged around on the dresser top. Found 
a hair scrunchy to hold it back. “This is Jan and this is Ivy,” she said, motioning 
to the other girls. 

Jan was the one with the short black bangs. She slumped on to a lower 
bunk. “I’m whipped,” she sighed. “What a workout. Look at me. I’m sweating 
like a pig.” 



“Ever hear of deodorant?” Ivy cracked. 

Jan stuck out her tongue at Ivy in reply. 

“Get changed,” Dierdre instructed them both. “We’ve only got ten 
minutes.” 

“Ten minutes till what?” Jan demanded, bending down and rubbing her calf 
muscles. 

“Did you forget the four-lap race?” Dierdre replied. 

“Oh, wow!” Jan cried, jumping up. “I did forget.” She hurried to the 
dresser. “Where’s my swimsuit?” 

Ivy followed her. They began frantically sifting through the drawers. 

Dierdre turned to me. “Do you want to enter the race?” she asked. 

“I—I don’t have a swimsuit,” I replied. 

She shrugged. “No problem. I have about a dozen.” She studied me. “We’re 
about the same size. I’m just a little taller.” 

“Well, I’d love a swim,” I told her. “Maybe I’ll just go to the pool and 
splash around for a while.” 

“Huh? Not compete?” Dierdre cried. 

All three girls turned to me, stunned expressions on their faces. 

“I’ll do some sports later,” I said. “Right now, I just want to dive in and 
swim a little. You know. Cool off.” 

“But—you can’t!” Jan cried. She gaped at me as if I had suddenly grown a 
second head. 

“No way,” Ivy said, shaking her head. 

“You have to compete,” Dierdre added. “You can’t just swim.” 

“Only The Best,” Ivy recited. 

“Right. Only The Best,” Jan agreed. 

I felt totally confused. “What do you mean?” I demanded. “Why do you 
keep saying that?” 

Dierdre tossed me a blue swimsuit. “Put it on. We’re going to be late.” 
“But... but—” I sputtered. 

The three girls hurried to get into their swimsuits. 

I saw that I had no choice. I went into the bathroom and started to change. 
But my questions repeated in my mind. I really wanted them answered. 

Why did I have to compete in the race? Why couldn’t I just have a swim? 
And why did everyone keep repeating “Only The Best”? 

What did they mean? 



8 


The enormous blue pool sparkled under the bright sunlight. The sun hovered 
high overhead. The concrete burned the soles of my bare feet. I couldn’t wait to 
get into the water. 

Shielding my eyes with one hand, I searched for Elliot. But I couldn’t find 
him in the crowd of kids who were waiting to watch the race. 

Elliot has probably already played three sports, I told myself. This had to be 
the perfect camp for my brother! 

I gazed down the line of girls waiting to compete in the four-lap race. We 
all stood on the edge of the deep end of the pool, waiting to jump in. 

I silently counted. There were at least two dozen girls in this race. And the 
pool was wide enough for all of us to have a lane to swim in. 

“Hey, you look terrific in my suit,” Dierdre said. Her green eyes studied me. 
“You should have tied your hair back, Wendy. It’s going to slow you down.” 

Wow, I thought. Dierdre really cares about winning. 

“Are you a good swimmer?” I asked her. 

She swatted a fly on the back of her calf. “The best,” she replied, grinning. 
“How about you?” 

“I’ve never really raced,” I told her. 

The pool counselors were all young women. They wore white two-piece 
swimsuits. Across the pool, I saw Holly sitting on the edge of the diving board, 
talking to another counselor. 

A tall, red-haired counselor moved to the edge of the pool and blew her 
whistle. “Everyone ready?” she called. 

We all shouted back that we were ready. Then the long line of girls grew 
silent. We turned to the pool, leaned forward, and prepared to dive in. 

The water shimmered beneath me. The sun burned down on my back and 
shoulders. I felt about to melt. I couldn’t wait to jump in. 

The whistle blew. I sprang forward and hit the water hard. 

I gasped from the shock of the cold against my hot skin. My arms churned 
hard as I pulled myself forward. 

The splash of thrashing arms and kicking feet sounded like the roar of a 
waterfall. I dipped my face into the water, feeling the refreshing coldness. 



Turning my head, I glimpsed Dierdre a few lengths behind me. She swam 
in a steady rhythm, her arms and legs moving smoothly, gracefully. 

I’m ahead of everyone, I realized, glancing across the pool. I’m winning the 

race! 

With a hard kick, I reached the other end of the pool. I made a sharp turn 
and pushed off. As I started back to the deep end, the other girls were still 
approaching the shallow end wall. 

I pulled myself harder. My heart started to pound. 

I knew I’d win the first lap easily. Then there were three laps to go. 

Three laps... 

I suddenly realized how dumb I was. The other girls were pacing 
themselves. They weren’t swimming full speed because they knew it was a four- 
lap race. 

If I kept swimming this hard, I wouldn’t survive two laps! 

I sucked in a deep breath, then let it out slowly. 

Slowly... slowly... 

That was the word of the day. 

I slowed my kicking. Shot my arms out and pulled them back slowly. Took 
long breaths. Long, slow breaths. 

As I made my turn and started the second lap, several other swimmers had 
moved beside me. I caught Dierdre’s eye as she swam past. 

She never broke her steady rhythm. Stroke. Stroke. Breath. Stroke. 

On the other side of Dierdre, I saw Jan swimming comfortably, easily. Jan 
was so small and light. She seemed to float over the water. 

Into the third lap. I kept a few lengths behind Dierdre. I had to concentrate 
on keeping a slow, even pace. I pretended I was a robot, programmed to swim 
slowly. 

Dierdre turned into the fourth lap a few seconds ahead of me. I saw her 
expression change as she made her turn. She narrowed her eyes. Her entire face 
grew tight and tense. 

Dierdre really wants to win, I saw. 

I wondered if I could catch her. I wondered if I could beat her. 

I made my turn and put on the speed. 

I ignored the aching in my arms. 

I ignored the cramp in my left foot. 

I thrust myself forward, kicking hard from the waist. My hands cut through 



the water. 

Faster. 

I glimpsed Jan fall behind. I saw the disappointment on her face as I passed 

by. 

Pounding, thrusting arms and legs churned the water to froth. The splashing 
became a roar. The roar nearly drowned out the cheers of the kids watching from 
around the pool. 

My heart thudded so hard, I thought my chest might explode. 

My arms ached. They felt as if they each weighed a thousand pounds. 

Faster... 

I pulled up beside Dierdre. Close. So close, I could hear her gasping 
breaths. 

I glimpsed her face, tight with concentration. 

She’s just like Elliot, I decided. She wants to win so badly. 

Lots of times I let Elliot win a game. Because he cared about it so much 
more than I did. And so did Dierdre. 

As we neared the wall at the deep end, I let Dierdre pull ahead. 

I saw how much it meant to her. I saw how desperate she was to finish first. 

What the heck, I thought. There’s nothing wrong with coming in second. 

I heard the cheers ring out as Dierdre won the race. 

I touched the wall, then dipped below the surface. I pulled myself up and 
grabbed the wall. 

My entire body ached and throbbed. I gasped in breath after breath. I shut 
my eyes and pulled my hair back with both hands, squeezing the water out of it. 

My arms were so tired, I could barely pull myself out of the pool. I was one 
of the last swimmers out. 

The others had all formed a circle around Dierdre. I pushed my way into the 
crowd of girls to see what was happening. 

My eyes burned. I brushed water out of them. 

I saw the red-haired counselor hand something to Dierdre. Something gold 
and shiny. 

Everyone cheered. Then the circle broke, and the girls all headed in 
different directions. 

I made my way up to Dierdre. “Way to go!” I exclaimed. “I came close. But 
you’re really fast.” 

“I’m on the swim team at school,” she replied. She held up the gold object 



the counselor had given her. 

I could see it clearly now. A shiny gold coin. It had a smiling King Jellyjam 
engraved on it. I couldn’t read the words around the edge of the coin. But I could 
guess what they were. 

“It’s my fifth King Coin!” Dierdre declared proudly. 

Why is she so excited about it? I wondered. It wasn’t a real coin. It 
probably wasn’t even real gold! 

“What’s a King Coin?” I asked. The coin gleamed in the sunlight. 

“If I win one more King Coin, I can walk in the Winners Walk,” Dierdre 
explained. 

I started to ask what the Winners Walk was. But Jan and Ivy came running 
up to congratulate Dierdre. And the three of them all started talking at once. 

I suddenly remembered my brother. Where is Elliot? I wondered. What has 
he been doing? 

I turned away from Dierdre and the other girls and started toward the pool 
exit. But I had only taken a few steps when I heard someone calling my name. 

I spun around to see Holly jogging toward me. Her purple-lipsticked lips 
were knotted in a fretful expression. “Wendy, you’d better come with me,” the 
counselor told me. 

My heart skipped. “Huh? What’s wrong?” I asked. 

“I’m afraid there’s a problem,” Holly said softly. 



9 


Something happened to Mom and Dad! 

That’s the first thought that burst into my head. 

“What’s wrong?” I cried. “My parents! Are they okay? Are they—” 

“We haven’t found your parents yet,” Holly said. She wrapped a towel 
around my trembling shoulders. Then she led me to a bench at the side of the 
pool. 

“Is it Elliot?” I cried, dropping down beside her. “What is wrong?” 

Holly kept one arm around my shoulders. She leaned close. Her brown eyes 
stared into mine. 

“Wendy, the problem is that you didn’t really try very hard to win the race,” 
she said. 

I swallowed hard. “Excuse me?” 

“I watched you,” Holly continued. “I saw you slow your strokes in the last 
lap. I don’t think you tried your best to win.” 

“But—but—I—” I sputtered. 

Holly continued to stare at me without blinking. “Am I right?” she 
demanded softly. 

“I—I’m not used to swimming that far,” I stammered. “It was my first race. 
I didn’t think—” 

“I know you’re new at camp,” Holly said, brushing a fly off my leg. “But 
you know the camp slogan, right?” 

“For sure,” I replied. “It’s everywhere I look! But what does it mean? ‘Only 
The Best!”’ 

“I guess it’s kind of a warning,” Holly replied thoughtfully. “That’s why I 
decided to talk to you now, Wendy.” 

“A warning?” I cried. I felt more confused than ever. “A warning about 
what?” 

Holly didn’t reply. She forced a smile to her face and stood up. “Catch you 
later, okay?” 

She turned and hurried away. 

I wrapped the towel tighter around my shoulders and started back to the dorm to 



change. As I walked past the tennis courts, I thought hard about Holly’s warning. 

Why was it so important for me to win the race? 

So that I could be awarded, one of those gold coins with the blobby purple 
king on it? 

Why should I care about winning coins? Why couldn’t I just play some 
games, make new friends, and have fun? 

Why did Holly say she was giving me a warning? A warning about what? 

I shook my head, trying to shake away all these puzzling questions. I’d 
heard about sports camps from some of my friends back home. Some camps, 
they said, were really tough. The kids were all serious jock types who wanted to 
win, win, win. 

I guessed this was one of those camps. 

Oh, well, I thought, sighing. I don’t have to love this camp. Mom and Dad 
will be here soon to take Elliot and me away. 

I glanced up—and saw Elliot. 

Sprawled face down on the ground. His arms and legs spread out 
awkwardly. His eyes closed. 

Unconscious. 



10 


“Ooooh!” I let out a frightened wail. 

“Elliot! Elliot!” I dropped down beside him. 

He sat up and grinned at me. “How many times are you going to fall for 
that?” he asked. He started to laugh. 

I slugged him in the shoulder as hard as I could. “You creep!” 

That made him laugh even harder. It really cracks him up when he makes 
me look like a jerk. 

Why do I always fall for the stupid joke? Elliot pulls it on me all the time. 
And I always believe he’s been knocked out cold. 

“I’m never falling for that again. Never!” I cried. 

Elliot pulled himself to his feet. “Come watch me play Ping-Pong,” he said, 
tugging my hand. “I’m in the tournament. I’m beating this kid Jeff. He thinks 
he’s good because he puts a spin on his serve. But he’s pitiful.” 

“I can’t,” I replied. I pulled out of his grasp. “I’m dripping wet. I have to 
change.” 

“Come watch,” he insisted. “It won’t take long. I’ll beat him really fast, 
okay?” 

“Elliot—” He certainly was excited. 

“If I beat Jeff, I win a King Coin,” he announced. “Then I’m going to win 
five more. I want to win six so I can walk in the Winners Walk before Mom and 
Dad come for us.” 

“Good luck,” I mumbled, rubbing my wet hair with the towel. 

“Were you in a swim race? Did you win?” Elliot asked, tugging my hand 
again. 

“No. I came in second,” I told him. 

He snickered. “You’re a loser. Come watch me beat this kid.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Okay, okay.” 

Elliot pulled me to a row of outdoor Ping-Pong tables. They were shielded 
from the sun by a broad, white canvas awning. 

He hurried up to the table on the end. Jeff was waiting for him there, softly 
bouncing a Ping-Pong ball in the air with his paddle. 

I had pictured a little shrimpy guy that Elliot could beat easily. But Jeff was 



a big, red-faced, blond kid with bulging muscles. He had to be twice the size of 
my brother! 

I took a seat on a white wooden bench across from the tables. Elliot can’t 
beat this big guy, I thought. My poor brother is in for a major defeat. 

As they started to play, Buddy came walking over and sat down beside me. 
He flashed me a smile. “No word from your parents yet,” he said. “But we’ll 
find them.” 

We watched the Ping-Pong match. Jeff did his serve with the special spin. 
Elliot slammed it back at him. 

To my surprise, the match was really even. I think Jeff was surprised, too. 
His returns became more and more wild. And a lot of his special serves missed 
the table entirely! 

They had already played two games, Buddy told me. Jeff had won the first, 
Elliot the second. This was the third and deciding match. 

The game was a tie at sixteen, then a tie at seventeen and eighteen. 

I watched Elliot become more and more intense. He wanted desperately to 
win. He leaned stiffly over the table, gripping the paddle so tightly, his hand was 
white. 

Sweat poured off his forehead. He began ducking and dodging, groaning 
with each hit, trying to slam every ball. 

The more frantic and wild Elliot became, the calmer Jeff appeared. 

The game was a tie at nineteen. 

Elliot missed a shot and angrily slammed his paddle against the table. 

I could see that he was losing it. I’d seen this happen to my brother many 
times before. He could never win if he stayed this intense. 

As he held the ball and prepared to serve, I raised two fingers to the sides of 
my mouth and blew hard. He lowered the paddle when he heard my loud 
whistle. 

That was my signal. I’d used it many times before. It meant, “Cool it, 
Elliot. Calm down.” 

Elliot turned and gave me a quick thumbs-up. 

I saw him take a deep breath. Then another. 

My whistle signal always helped him. 

He raised the ball and served it to Jeff. Jeff sent back a weak return. Elliot 
smacked it back into the right corner. Jeff swung off balance and missed. 

Jeff served the next one. Elliot backhanded it. Very soft. The ball tipped 



over the net and dribbled several times on Jeff’s side. 

Elliot had won! 

He let out a gleeful cheer and raised his fists in victory. 

Jeff angrily heaved his paddle to the ground and stomped away. 

“Your brother is good,” Buddy said, climbing to his feet. “I like his style. 
He’s intense.” 

“For sure,” I muttered. 

Buddy hurried over to award Elliot his King Coin. “Hey, guy—you only 
need five more,” Buddy said, slapping Elliot a high five, then a low five. 

“No problem,” Elliot bragged. He held the coin up so I could see it. King 
Jellyjam smiled out at me, engraved on the coin. 

Why did the camp pick this silly little blob for a mascot? I wondered again. 
He looked like a fat hunk of pudding wearing a crown. 

“I’ve got to get changed,” I told Elliot. 

He slid the gold coin into the pocket of his shorts. “I’m going to find 
another sport!” he declared. “I want to win another King Coin before tonight!” 

I waved good-bye, then started toward the dorm. 

I had walked only a few steps when I heard a low rumbling. 

Then the ground started to shake. 

I froze. Every muscle in my body locked as the rumbling grew louder. 
“Earthquake!” I cried. 



11 


The ground shook hard. The awning over the Ping-Pong tables shook. The tables 
bounced on the ground. 

My knees buckled. I struggled to stay on my feet. 

“Earthquake!” I choked out again. 

“It’s okay!” Buddy called, running toward me. 

He was right. The rumbling sound faded quickly. The ground stopped 
shaking. 

“That happens sometimes,” Buddy explained. “It’s no problem.” 

My heart still thudded in my chest. My legs wobbled as if they were rubber 
bands. “No problem?” 

“See?” Buddy motioned around the crowded camp. “No one pays any 
attention. It lasts only a few seconds.” 

I gazed around quickly. Buddy was right again. The kids in the chess 
tournament in front of the lodge didn’t glance up from their chessboards. The 
kickball game on the field across from the pool continued without a pause. 

“It usually happens once or twice a day,” Buddy told me. 

“But what causes it?” I demanded. 

He shrugged. “Beats me.” 

“But—everything shook so hard! Isn’t it dangerous?” I asked. 

Buddy didn’t hear me. He was already jogging over to watch the kickball 
game. 

I turned and started walking to the dorm. I felt kind of shaky. I could still 
hear that strange rumbling sound in my ears. 

As I pulled open the door to the dorm, I bumped into Jan and Ivy. They 
both had changed into white tennis outfits, and they both carried tennis rackets 
over their shoulders. 

“What sports have you been playing?” 

“Did you win a King Coin?” 

“Wasn’t that a great swim race?” 

“Are you having fun, Wendy?” 

“Do you play tennis?” 



They both talked at once and shot out half a dozen questions. They seemed 
really excited. They didn’t give me a chance to answer. 

“We need more girls for the tennis tournament,” Ivy said. “We’re having a 
two-day tournament. Come to the courts after lunch, okay?” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I’m not that good, but—” 

“See you later!” Jan cried. They both hurried away. 

Actually, I am a pretty good tennis player. I have a decent serve. And I do 
all right with my two-handed backhand. 

But I’m not great. 

Back home, my friend Allison and I always play for fun. We don’t try to 
kill each other. Sometimes we just keep volleying back and forth. We don’t even 
keep score. 

I’ll enter the tennis tournament, I decided. And if I lose in the first round, 
it’s no big deal. 

Besides, I told myself, Mom and Dad will be here any minute. And Elliot 
and I will have to leave. 

Mom and Dad... their faces flashed into my mind. 

They must be frantic, I realized. They must be worried sick. I hoped they 
were okay. 

I suddenly had an idea. 

I’ll call home, I decided. I should have thought of this before. I’ll call home 
and leave a message on our answering machine. I’ll tell Mom and Dad on the 
machine where Elliot and I are. 

No matter where he goes, Dad checks for phone messages every hour. Mom 
always makes fun of him for being so nervous about missing a call. 

But they’ll both be glad to get this message! I told myself. 

What a good idea! I congratulated myself. 

Now all I needed was a phone. 

There have to be phones in the dorm, I decided. I searched the small front 
lobby. But I didn’t see any pay phones. 

No one at the front desk. No one I could ask. 

I peered down a long hallway. Rooms on both sides. No phones. 

I tried the other hallway. No pay phones there, either. 

Eager to make my call, I turned and hurried back outside. I let out a long 
sigh of relief when I spotted two pay phones beside the long white dorm 
building. 



My heart pounding, I jogged over to them. 

I picked up the phone closest to me. And I started to raise the receiver to 
ear— 

—when two strong hands grabbed me from behind. 

“Get off the phone!” a voice demanded. 



12 


“Huh?” I shrieked in surprise and dropped the phone. It spun crazily on its cord. 

I turned around. “Dierdre! You scared me to death!” I cried. 

Her green eyes flashed excitedly. “Sorry, Wendy. I just had to tell you my 
news! Look!” 

She held out her hand. I saw a stack of gold King Coins. 

“I just won my sixth coin!” Dierdre declared breathlessly. “Isn’t that 
awesome?” 

“I—I guess,” I replied uncertainly. I still couldn’t figure out why it was 
such a big deal. 

“I’ll be in the Winners Walk tonight!” Dierdre exclaimed. “I can’t believe I 
made it!” 

“That’s great,” I told her. “Congratulations.” 

“Have you won any King Coins yet?” Dierdre asked, still holding out her 
hand. 

“Uh... not yet,” I replied. 

“Well, get going!” Dierdre urged. “Show them what you’ve got, Wendy. 
Only The Best!” She flashed me a thumbs-up with her free hand. 

“Right. Only The Best,” I repeated. 

“We’ll have a party,” Dierdre continued. “In our room. Right after the 
Winners Walk. Okay? We’ll celebrate.” 

“Great!” I replied. “Maybe we can get a pizza from the mess hall or 
something.” 

“Tell Jan and Ivy,” Dierdre instructed. “Or I’ll tell them. Whoever sees 
them first! See you later!” 

She ran off, holding the six gold coins tightly in her fist. 

I realized I was smiling. Dierdre had been so excited, she’d gotten me 
excited. So excited, I forgot about my phone call. 

I have to give this camp a chance, I decided. I have to get into the spirit of 
things and start having some fun. Only The Best! I’m going to win that tennis 
tournament! 


We all ate dinner at long wooden tables in the huge mess hall inside the main 



camp lodge. The long, high-ceilinged room seemed to stretch on forever. 

Loud voices and laughter echoed off the walls over the clatter of plates and 
silverware. Everyone had a story to tell. Everyone wanted to talk about the 
games of the day. 

After dinner, the counselors led us all to the running track. I searched for 
Elliot. But I couldn’t find him in the crowd. 

It was a warm, clear night. A pale sliver of a moon floated low over the 
darkening trees. As the sun set, the sky faded from pink to purple to gray. 

When darkness fell, I saw two flickering yellow lights at the far end of the 
track, moving toward me. As they came near, I could see that they were torches, 
carried by two counselors. 

A blaring trumpet fanfare made us all grow quiet. 

I stepped closer to Jan, who stood at my side. “They sure make a big deal of 
this,” I whispered. 

“It is a big deal,” Jan replied, her eyes straight ahead as the torches 
approached. 

“Do we have any food for the party later?” I whispered. 

Jan raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhhh.” 

Several more torches had been lit. The yellow balls of light glowed like tiny 

suns. 

I heard a drumroll. Then a loud march blared from the loudspeaker, all 
trumpets and pounding drums. 

We stood in silence as the parade of torches passed by. And, then, in the 
flickering yellow light, I saw faces. The smiling faces of the kids who had won 
their sixth King Coin that day. 

I counted eight kids. Five boys and three girls. 

Their gold coins had been strung as necklaces around their necks. The coins 
caught the light of the torches and made the faces of the winners appear to glow 
as they marched by. 

Dierdre marched second in line. She seemed so happy and excited! Her 
coins jangled at her throat. Her smile never faded. 

Jan and I waved and called to her, but she marched right past. 

A counselor’s voice suddenly boomed over the loudspeaker: “Let’s hear it 
for our winners who are taking the Winners Walk tonight!” 

A deafening cheer rose up from the kids watching the parade. We all 
clapped and shouted and whistled until the winners had marched past and the 



final torches had floated out of sight. 

“Only The Best!” the voice shouted over the loudspeaker. 

“Only The Best!” we all chanted back. “Only The Best!” 

That ended the Winners Walk parade. The lights came on. We all scrambled 
toward the dorms. The boys ran in one direction, the girls in the other. 

“The torches were really cool,” I said to Jan as we followed the crowd of 
girls down the path to the dorm. 

“I only need two more King Coins,” Jan replied. 

“Maybe I can win them tomorrow. Are you playing in the softball 
tournament?” 

“No. Tennis,” I told her. 

“There are too many good tennis players,” Jan replied. “It’ll be too hard to 
win a coin. You should play softball, too.” 

“Well... maybe,” I replied. 

Ivy was already waiting for us in the room. “Where’s Dierdre?” she 
demanded as Jan and I entered. 

“We didn’t see her,” Jan replied. 

“Probably hanging out with the other winners,” I added. 

“I found two bags of tortilla chips, but I couldn’t find any salsa,” Ivy 
reported, holding up the bags. 

“Do we have anything to drink?” I asked. 

Ivy held up two cans of diet Coke. 

“Wow! Great party!” Jan exclaimed, laughing. 

“Maybe we should invite some girls in from other rooms,” I suggested. 

“No way! Then we’d have to share the Cokes!” Jan protested. 

We all laughed. 

The three of us joked and kidded around for about half an hour, waiting for 
Dierdre. We sat down on the floor and opened one of the bags of tortilla chips. 

Without realizing it, we finished off the whole bag. Then we passed around 
one of the cans of soda. 

“Where is she?” Jan demanded, glancing at her watch. 

“It’s nearly time for lights-out,” Ivy sighed. “We won’t have much time for 
a party.” 

“Maybe Dierdre forgot we were having a party,” I suggested, crinkling up 
the tortilla chip bag and tossing it toward the trash basket. 

I missed. Basketball is definitely not my sport. 



“But the party was her idea!” Ivy replied. She climbed to her feet and 
started pacing back and forth. “Where can she be? Everyone is inside by now.” 

“Let’s go find her,” I said. The words just popped out of my mouth. That 
happens to me sometimes. I get a bright idea before I know what I’m saying. 

“Yes! Let’s go!” Ivy eagerly agreed. 

“Whoa. Hold it,” Jan said, stepping in front of us, blocking our way to the 
door. “We’re not allowed. You know the rules, Ivy. We’re not allowed outside 
after ten.” 

“We’ll sneak out, find Dierdre, and sneak back in,” Ivy replied. “Come on, 
Jan. What could happen?” 

“Right. What could happen?” I chimed in. 

Jan was outnumbered. “Okay, okay. But I hope we don’t get caught,” she 
muttered. She followed Ivy and me to the door. 

“What could happen?” I asked myself, leading the way into the empty hall. 

“What could happen?” I repeated as we sneaked out the door, into the night. 

“What could happen?” 

I didn’t know it. But the answer to the question was: A LOT! 



13 


The night had grown warmer. And steamier. As I crept out the door, I felt as if I 
were stepping into a hot shower. 

A mosquito buzzed around my head. I tried to clap it between my hands. 
Missed. 

Jan, Ivy, and I edged our way around the side of the building. My shoes slid 
on the dew-wet grass. Bright spotlights shone down from the trees, lighting the 
path. 

We crept in the shadows. 

“Where should we look first?” Ivy whispered. 

“Let’s start at the lodge,” I suggested. “Maybe all of tonight’s winners are 
partying there.” 

“I don’t hear any partying,” Jan whispered. “It’s so quiet out here!” 

She was right. The only sounds I could hear were the steady chirp of 
crickets and the whisper of the warm wind through the trees. 

Keeping in the shadows, we followed the path toward the lodge. We passed 
the swimming pool, empty and silent. The water shimmered like silver under the 
bright spotlights. 

It was such a hot, wet night, I imagined myself jumping into the pool with 
all of my clothes on. 

But we were on a mission: To find Dierdre. No time to think about late- 
night swims. 

Staying close together, we passed the row of Ping-Pong tables. They made 
me think of Elliot. I wondered what he was doing. Probably tucked into bed. 

Like any sensible person. 

We were approaching the first row of tennis courts when Ivy suddenly cried 
out, “Whoa! Get back!” She grabbed me and shoved me hard against the fence. 

I heard soft footsteps on the path. Someone humming. 

The three of us held our breath as a counselor walked past. He had curly 
black hair and wore dark blue sunglasses even though it was night. He wore the 
white T-shirt and white shorts that made up the counselor’s uniform. 

We pressed our backs against the tennis court fence. “That’s Billy,” Jan 
whispered. “He’s kind of cute. He’s always so happy.” 



“He won’t be too happy if he catches us,” Ivy whispered. “We’ll be in 
major trouble.” 

Humming to himself, snapping his fingers, Billy walked past us. The path 
curved around the other side of the tennis courts. I watched him until he 
disappeared. 

I took a deep breath. I hadn’t been breathing the whole time! 

“Where’s he going?” Ivy wondered. 

“Maybe he’s going to the party at the lodge,” I suggested. 

“Why don’t we ask him?” Jan joked. 

“For sure,” I muttered. 

We checked out the path in both directions. Then we started walking again. 

We made our way past the tennis courts. The spotlights in the trees cast 
long shadows across the path. The shadows shifted and moved as the tree limbs 
bobbed in the wind. They looked like dark creatures crawling and slithering over 
the ground. 

Despite the heat of the night, I shivered. 

It was kind of creepy walking over these moving shadows. I had the feeling 
one of them might reach up, grab me, and pull me down. 

Weird thought, huh? 

I turned back in time to see the lights in the dorm windows start to go out. 
Lights-out. 

I tapped Jan on the shoulder. She turned and watched the dorm, too. As the 
lights all went out, the building seemed to disappear in front of our eyes. It faded 
into the black of the night sky. 

“M-maybe this wasn’t such a good idea,” I whispered. 

Ivy didn’t reply. She bit her lower lip. Her eyes were darting around the 
darkness. 

Jan laughed. “Don’t wimp out now,” she scolded. “We’re almost to the 
lodge.” 

We cut through the soccer field. The main lodge stood on a low, sloping 
hill, hidden by wide, old maple and sassafras trees. 

We didn’t have to climb very far up the hill to see that the lodge was as dark 
as the dorm. 

“No party up there,” I whispered. 

Ivy sighed, disappointed. “Well, where could Dierdre be?” 

“We could try the boys’ dorm!” I joked. 



They both laughed. 

Our laughter was cut short by a loud fluttering sound, very close by. 

“What’s that?” Ivy cried. 

“Ohhh!” I let out a low moan as I raised my eyes and saw them. 

The sky was thick with bats. Dozens of black bats. 

Fluttering over the spotlights in the old trees. And, then—swooping down 
to get us! 



14 


I couldn’t help myself. I let out a scream. Then I shielded my face with both 
hands. 

I heard Jan and Ivy gasp. 

The fluttering grew louder. Closer. 

I could feel the bats’ hot breath on the back of my neck. Then I could feel 
them clawing at my hair, tearing at my face. 

I’ve got a real good imagination when it comes to bats. 

“Wendy, it’s okay,” Jan whispered. She tugged my hands from my face. She 
pointed. “Look.” 

I followed her gaze up to the fluttering black wings. The bats were 
swooping low. But they weren’t swooping at us. They were swooping down and 
landing on the swimming pool at the bottom of the hill. 

In the bright spotlights, I could see them dart into the water—for less than a 
second. Then sweep back up to the sky. 

“I—I don’t like bats,” I whispered. 

“Neither do I,” Ivy confessed. “I know they’re supposed to be good. I know 
they eat insects and stuff. But I still think they’re creepy.” 

“Well, they won’t bother us,” Jan said. “They’re just taking a drink.” She 
gave Ivy and me a push to get us started down the hill. 

We were lucky. Nobody had heard me scream. But we had walked only a 
few steps when we spotted another counselor coming down the path. I 
recognized her. She had straight white-blond hair that tumbled down to her waist 
from under a blue baseball cap. 

Without making a sound, all three of us dove behind a tall evergreen shrub 
and crouched down. 

Did she see us? 

I held my breath again. 

She kept walking. 

“Where are these counselors going?” Ivy whispered. 

“Let’s follow her,” I suggested. 

“Stay far back,” Jan instructed. 

We slowly climbed back to our feet. And stepped out from behind the 



shrub. 

And stopped when we heard the low, rumbling sound. 

As the rumbling grew louder, the ground began to shake. 

I caught the frightened expressions on my two friends’ faces. Ivy and Jan 
were just as scared as I was. 

The ground shook harder, so hard that we dropped to our knees. I leaned on 
all fours, holding on to the grass. The ground trembled and shook. The rumbling 
became a roar. 

I shut my eyes. 

The sound slowly faded. 

The ground gave a final tremble, then remained still. 

I opened my eyes and turned to Ivy and Jan. They started to stand. Slowly. 

“I hate when that happens!” Jan muttered. 

“What is it?” I whispered. I stood up on shaky legs. 

“Nobody knows,” Jan replied, brushing grass stains off her knees. “It just 
happens. A few times a day.” 

“I think we should give up on Dierdre,” Ivy said quietly. “I want to go back. 
To the dorm.” 

“Yeah. I’m with you,” I replied wearily. “We can have our celebration with 
Dierdre tomorrow.” 

“She can tell us all about where she was tonight and what she did,” Jan 

said. 

“This was a crazy idea,” I muttered. 

“It was your idea!” Jan exclaimed. 

“Most of my ideas are crazy!” I replied. 

Hiding in the shadows, we made our way down to the path. I gazed toward 
the pool. The bats had disappeared. Maybe the rumbling sound had scared them 
back into the woods. 

The crickets had stopped chirping. The air remained hot, but silent and still. 

The only sound was the scrape of our sneakers on the soft dirt path. 

And, then—before we could move or hide—we heard someone else’s 
footsteps. 

Rapid footsteps. Running hard. Running toward us. 

I stopped short when I heard a girl’s desperate cry. “Help me! Please— 
somebody! Help me!” 



15 


A hot gust of wind shook the trees, making their eerie dark shadows dance. 

I leaped back, startled by the girl’s terrified cries. 

“Help me! Please—!” 

She came running around from the side of the tennis courts. She wore tight 
blue short-shorts and a magenta midriff top. 

Her arms were stretched out in front of her. Her long hair flew wildly 
behind her head. 

I recognized her as soon as she burst into view. 

The little red-haired girl with all the freckles. The one who had hidden in 
the woods and warned Elliot and me not to come into the camp. 

“Help me!” 

She ran right into me, sobbing hard. I threw my arms around her tiny 
shoulders and held her. “You’re okay,” I whispered. “You’re okay.” 

“No!” she shrieked. She tugged away from me. 

“What’s wrong?” Jan demanded. “Why are you out here?” 

“Why aren’t you in bed?” Ivy added, stepping up beside me. 

The little girl didn’t answer. Her entire body trembled. 

She grabbed my hand and pulled me behind the bushes beside the path. Jan 
and Ivy followed. 

“I’m not okay,” she started, wiping the tears off her freckled cheeks with 
both hands. “I’m not. I—I—” 

“What’s your name?” Jan asked in a whisper. 

“Why are you out here?” Ivy repeated. 

I heard the flutter of bat wings again, low overhead. But I stared at the little 
girl and forced myself to ignore them. 

“My name—it’s Alicia,” the girl replied, sobbing. “We’ve got to go. Fast!” 

“Huh?” I cried. “Take a deep breath, Alicia. You’re okay. Really.” 

“No!” she cried again, shaking her head. 

“You’re safe now. You’re with us,” I insisted. 

“We’re not safe,” she cried. “No one. No one here. I tried to warn people. I 
tried to tell you...” Her words were cut off once again by her loud sobs. 



“What is it?” Ivy demanded. 

“What did you try to warn us about?” Jan asked, leaning down to the crying 

girl. 

“I—I saw something terrible !” Alicia stammered. “I—” 

“What did you see?” I asked impatiently. 

“I followed them,” Alicia replied. “And I saw it. Something horrible. I—I 
can’t talk about it. We just have to run. We have to tell the others. Everyone. We 
have to run. We have to get away from here!” 

She let out a long breath. Her entire body trembled again. 

“But why do we have to run?” I asked, placing my hands gently on her 
shoulders. 

I felt so bad. I wanted to calm her. I wanted to tell her that everything would 
be okay. But I didn’t know how to convince her. 

What had she seen? What had frightened her so much? 

Had she had a bad dream? 

“We have to go now!” she repeated shrilly. Her red hair was matted to her 
face by her tears. She grabbed my arm and pulled hard. “Hurry! We’ve got to 
mn! I saw it!” 

“Saw what?” I cried. 

Alicia had no time to reply. 

A dark-haired counselor stepped up in front of the bushes. “Caught you!” 
he cried. 



16 


I froze. My entire body went cold. 

The counselor’s dark eyes flashed in the light of a spotlight. “What are you 
doing out here?” he demanded. 

I sucked in a deep breath and started to answer. 

But another voice replied before I could. “Kind of nosy, aren’t you?” It was 
another counselor. A woman with short, black hair. 

Breathing hard, trying not to make a sound, I ducked lower behind the 
bushes. My two friends dropped to their knees. 

“You aren’t following me—are you?” the first counselor teased. 

“Why would I follow you? Maybe you’re following me!” the woman teased 
back. 

They didn’t see us, I realized happily. We were two feet away from them. 
But they didn’t see us behind the bushes. 

A few seconds later, the two counselors strolled off together. My friends 
and I waited a long while, listening hard until we could no longer hear their 
voices. Then we climbed slowly to our feet. 

“Alicia?” I asked. “Are you okay?” 

“Alicia?” Ivy and Jan cried. 

The little girl had vanished. 

We sneaked back into the dorm through a side door. Luckily, there were no 
counselors patrolling the halls. No one in sight. 

“Dierdre—are you back?” Jan called as we stepped into our room. 

No reply. 

I clicked on the light. Dierdre’s bunk remained empty. 

“Better turn off the light,” Ivy warned. “It’s after lights-out.” 

I clicked the light back off. Then I stumbled toward my bunk, waiting for 
my eyes to adjust to the darkness. 

“Where is Dierdre?” Ivy asked. “I’m a little worried about her. Maybe we 
should tell a counselor that she’s missing.” 

“What counselor?” Jan asked, slumping onto her bed. “There’s no one 
around. The counselors are all out somewhere.” 



“I’m sure she’s partying somewhere and forgot all about us,” I said, 
yawning. I bent to pull down the covers on my bed. 

“What do you think that little girl saw?” Ivy asked, peering out the window. 

“Alicia? I think she had a bad dream,” I replied. 

“But she was so frightened!” Jan said, shaking her head. “And what was 
she doing outside?” 

“And why did she run away from us like that?” Ivy added. 

“Weird,” I mumbled. 

“Weird is right,” Jan agreed. Weird is the word of the night. She made her 
way to the dresser. “I’m getting changed for bed. Big day tomorrow. I’ve got to 
win two more King Coins.” 

“Me, too,” Ivy said, yawning. 

Jan pulled out a dresser drawer. “Oh, no!” she shrieked. “No! I don’t 
believe it!” 



17 


“Jan—what is it?” I cried. 

Ivy and I tore across the room to the dresser. 

Jan continued to stare down into the open drawer. “It’s so dark,” she said. “I 
opened Dierdre’s drawer by mistake. And—and—it’s empty !” 

“Huh?” Ivy and I both uttered our surprise. 

Squinting through the dim gray light, I studied the dresser drawer. Totally 
empty. “Check the closet,” I suggested. 

Ivy crossed the room in three or four quick strides. She pulled open the 
closet door. 

“Dierdre’s stuff—it’s all gone!” Ivy declared. 

“Weird,” I muttered. It was still the word of the night. 

“Why would she move out and not tell us?” Jan demanded. 

“Where did she go?” Ivy added. 

Good question, I thought, staring at the empty closet. 

Where did Dierdre go? 


* * * 


Breakfast was the noisiest meal of the day. Spoons clattered against cereal 
bowls. Orange juice pitchers banged on the long wooden tables. 

Voices rang out as if someone had turned up the volume all the way. 
Everyone talked excitedly about the sports they planned to play today, the games 
they planned to win. 

I had taken the last shower. So Jan and Ivy were already eating breakfast 
when I made my way into the mess hall. 

As I pushed through the narrow aisle between the tables, I searched for 
Dierdre. No sign of her. 

I hadn’t slept very well, even though I was really tired. I kept thinking 
about Dierdre—and about Alicia. And I kept wondering what was taking Mom 
and Dad so long to get in touch with us. 

I spotted Elliot at the end of a table filled with boys about his age. He had a 
stack of waffles in front of him, and he was pouring dark syrup over them. 



“Elliot—what’s up?” I called, squeezing through the aisle to get over to 

him. 

My brother didn’t bother saying good morning. “I’ve got a one-on-one 
tournament this morning,” he reported excitedly. “I could win my third King 
Coin!” 

“Thrills and chills,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “You haven’t heard anything 
about Mom and Dad, have you?” 

He stared at me as if he didn’t remember who they were. Then he shook his 
head. “Not yet. Isn’t this a great camp? Did we luck out, or what?” 

I didn’t reply. My eyes were on the next table. I thought I had spotted 
Dierdre. But it was just another girl with streaky blond hair. 

“Have you won any coins yet?” Elliot asked. He had a mouth full of waffle. 
Syrup dripped down his chin. 

“Not yet,” I replied. 

He snickered. “They should change the camp slogan for you, Wendy. Only 
The Worst!” 

Elliot laughed. The other boys at the table laughed, too. 

As I said, Elliot really cracks himself up. 

I wasn’t in the mood for his lame jokes. My mind was still on Dierdre. 
“Catch you later,” I said. 

I squeezed past the table and headed toward the girls’ side of the room. 
Cheers and laughter rang out at a table near the wall. A scrambled-egg tossing 
battle had broken out. Three counselors rushed to stop it. 

Jan and Ivy’s table was full. I found an empty space at the next table. I 
poured myself a glass of juice and a bowl of cornflakes. But I didn’t feel too 
hungry. 

“Hey—!” I called out when I saw Buddy walk by. He didn’t hear me over 
the noise, so I jumped up and ran after him. 

“Hi. What’s up?” He greeted me with a smile. 

His blond hair was still wet from the shower. He smelled kind of flowery. 
Aftershave, I guessed. 

“Do you know where Dierdre went?” I demanded. 

He narrowed his eyes in surprise. “Dierdre?” 

“A girl in my dorm room,” I explained. “She didn’t come back to the room 
last night. Her closet is empty.” 

“Dierdre,” he repeated, thinking hard. He raised his clipboard to his face 



and ran his finger down it slowly. “Oh, yeah. She’s gone.” His cheeks turned 
bright pink. 

“Excuse me?” I stared up at him. “Dierdre is gone? Where did she go? 
Home?” 

He studied the sheet on his clipboard. “I guess. It just says she’s gone.” His 
cheeks darkened from pink to red. 

“That’s so weird,” I told him. “She didn’t say good-bye or anything.” 

Buddy shrugged. A smile spread over his face. “Have a nice day!” 

He started toward the counselors’ table at the front of the huge room. But I 
ran after him. I grabbed his arm. 

“Buddy, one more question,” I said. “Do you know where I can find a little 
girl named Alicia?” 

Buddy waved to some boys across the room. “Go get ’em, guys! Only The 
Best!” he shouted to them. Then he turned back to me. “Alicia?” 

“I don’t know her last name. She’s probably six or seven,” I told him. “She 
has beautiful, long red hair and a face full of freckles.” 

“Alicia...” He chewed his bottom lip. Then he raised the clipboard again. 

I watched as he ran his finger down the list of names. When his finger 
stopped, his cheeks turned pink again. 

“Oh, yeah. Alicia,” he said, lowering the clipboard. He grinned at me. A 
strange grin. A chilling grin. “She’s gone, too.” 



18 


“Jan! Ivy!” I saw them hurrying from the mess hall, and I chased after them. 
“We’ve got to talk!” I cried breathlessly. 

“We can’t. We’re late.” Jan straightened her bangs with one hand. “If we 
don’t get to the volleyball nets in time, we can’t be in the tournament.” 

“But it’s important !” I called as they jogged to the doors. 

They didn’t seem to hear me. I watched them disappear into the morning 
sunlight. 

My heart pounded in my chest. I suddenly felt cold all over. 

I caught up with my brother, who was playfully boxing a tall, skinny boy 
with short blond hair. “Elliot—come here,” I instructed. “Just for a minute.” 

“I can’t,” he called. “Remember? My one-on-one contest?” 

The tall, skinny boy hurried out the door. I stepped in front of Elliot, 
blocking his path. 

“Give me a break!” he cried. “I don’t want to be late. I’m going against Jeff. 
Remember him? I can beat him. He’s big, but he’s real slow.” 

“Elliot, something strange is going on here,” I said, backing him against the 
wall. Kids were staring at us as they made their way outside. But I didn’t care. 

“You’re the only one who’s strange!” Elliot shot back. “Are you going to let 
me go to the basketball court or not?” 

He started to push past me. I pinned his shoulders to the wall with both 
hands. 

“Just give me one second!” I insisted. “There’s something wrong with this 
camp, Elliot.” I let go of him. 

“You mean the rumbling noises?” he asked, brushing back his dark hair 
with one hand. “That’s just gas under the ground or something. A counselor 
explained it to me.” 

“That’s not what I’m talking about,” I replied. “Kids are disappearing.” 

He laughed. “Invisible kids? You mean like a magic trick?” 

“Stop making fun of me!” I snapped. “It isn’t funny, Elliot. Kids are 
disappearing. Dierdre from my dorm room? She was in the Winners Walk last 
night. Then she didn’t come back to the room.” 

Elliot’s grin faded. 



“This morning, Buddy told me she was gone,” I continued. I snapped my 
fingers. “Just like that. And a little girl named Alicia—she disappeared, too.” 

Elliot’s brown eyes studied me. “Kids have to go home sometime ,” he 
insisted. “What’s the big deal?” 

“And what about Mom and Dad?” I demanded. “They couldn’t have driven 
very far before they realized the trailer had come loose. Why haven’t they found 
us? Why hasn’t the camp found them?” 

Elliot shrugged. “Beats me,” he replied casually. He dodged past me and 
started to the door. “Wendy, you’re just unhappy because you stink at sports. But 
I’m having a great time here. Don’t mess it up for me—okay?” 

“But—but—Elliot—!” I sputtered. 

Shaking his head, he pushed the door open with both hands and escaped 
into the sunlight. 

I balled both hands into tight fists. I really wanted to pound him. Why 
wouldn’t he listen to me? Couldn’t he see how upset and frightened I was? 

Elliot is the kind of kid who never worries about anything. Everything 
always seems to go his way. So why should he sweat it? 

But you’d think he’d be just a little worried about Mom and Dad. 

Mom and Dad... 

I had a heavy feeling in my stomach as I made my way slowly out the door. 
Had they been in a car accident or something? Is that why they hadn’t found 
Elliot and me yet? 

No. Stop making things worse, I scolded myself. Don’t let your imagination 
mn away with you, Wendy. 

I suddenly remembered my plan to call home. Yes, I decided, I will do that 
right now. I will call home and leave a message for Mom and Dad on the 
answering machine. 

I stopped in the middle of the path and searched for a pay phone. A group 
of girls carrying hockey sticks passed by. I heard a long whistle coming from the 
pool across from the tennis courts. Then I heard the splash of kids diving into the 
water. 

Everyone is having fun, I thought—except me. 

I decided to make the call, then find a sport to play. Something to take my 
mind off all my crazy worries. 

I returned to the row of blue and white pay phones at the side of the lodge. I 
ran full speed and picked up the nearest phone. 



I raised the receiver to my ear and started to punch in our number. 
Then I cried out in surprise. 



19 


“Hi there, Camper!” boomed a cheerful, deep voice. “Have a wonderful day at 
camp. This is King Jellyjam greeting you. Work hard. Play hard. And win. And 
always remember—Only The Best! ” 

“Oh, no!” I cried. “A stupid message—!” 

“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day —” The tape started to repeat in 
my ear. 

I slammed the receiver down and picked up the next phone. 

“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day at camp.” The same jolly, 
booming voice. The same recorded message. 

I tried every phone in the row. They all played the same message. None of 
the phones were real. 

Where are the real phones? I wondered. There have to be phones that 
actually work. 

I turned away from the lodge and wandered down the dirt path. As I passed 
the bushes where Jan, Ivy, and I had hid last night, I felt a chill. And thought 
about Alicia. 

Bright sunlight washed over the sloping, grassy hill. I shielded my eyes and 
watched a black-and-gold monarch butterfly. It fluttered toward a patch of red 
and pink geraniums. 

I walked aimlessly, searching for a telephone. All around, kids were 
shouting, laughing, playing hard. I didn’t really hear them. I was deep into my 
own troubled thoughts. 

“Hey! Hey! Hey!” 

My brother’s voice startled me into stopping. I blinked several times, 
struggling to focus. 

I saw that I had wandered down to the basketball court. Elliot and Jeff were 
having their one-on-one basketball competition. 

Jeff dribbled the ball. It thudded loudly on the asphalt court. My brother 
waved both arms in Jeff’s face. Made a grab for the ball. 

Missed. 

Jeff lowered his shoulder. Bumped Elliot out of the way. Dribbled to the 
basket—and shot. 



“Two points!” he cried, grinning. 

Elliot scowled and shook his head. “You fouled me.” 

Jeff pretended not to hear. He was twice as big as Elliot. A big hulk. He 
could push Elliot all over the court, if he wanted to. 

Whatever made Elliot think he could win? 

“What’s the score?” Jeff demanded, wiping sweat off his forehead with the 
back of one hand. 

“Eighteen to ten,” Elliot reported unhappily. I didn’t need twenty guesses to 
figure out that my brother was losing. 

The basketball court was closed off by a mesh-wire fence. I grabbed the 
fence with both hands, pressed my face up against it, and watched. 

Elliot dribbled, moving back, back, giving himself some space. Jeff moved 
with him, leaning forward, adjusting his basketball shorts with one hand as he 
moved. 

Suddenly, Elliot burst forward, his eyes on the basket. He started his jump, 
raised his right hand to shoot—and Jeff grabbed the ball away. 

Elliot jumped and shot nothing but air. 

Jeff dribbled twice. Put up a two-handed layup. 

Swish. The score was twenty to ten. 

Jeff won the game a few seconds later. He let out a cheer and slapped Elliot 
a high five. 

Elliot frowned and shook his head. “Lucky shots,” he muttered. 

“Yeah. For sure,” Jeff replied, using the front of his sleeveless blue T-shirt 
to mop his sweating face. “Hey, congratulate me, man. You’re my sixth victim!” 

“Huh?” Elliot stared at him, hands pressed against his knees, struggling to 
catch his breath. “You mean—?” 

“Yeah.” Jeff grinned. “My sixth King Coin. I get to march in the Winners 
Walk tonight!” 

“Wow. That’s cool,” Elliot replied without enthusiasm. “I still have three 
coins to go.” 

I had the sudden feeling that I was being watched. I let go of the wire fence 
and took a step back. 

Buddy had been staring at me from the path. His eyes were narrowed, and 
his mouth was set in a stern, unhappy expression. 

How long had he been standing there? 

Why did he look so unhappy? His grim expression gave me a chill. 



As I turned to him, he stepped forward. His blue eyes stared hard into mine. 
“I’m sorry, Wendy,” the counselor said softly. “But you have to go.” 



20 


“Excuse me?” I gaped at him. My mouth dropped open. 

What was he saying? Where did I have to go? 

Did he mean I had to go —like Dierdre and Alicia? 

“You have to go find a sport,” Buddy repeated, still speaking softly. His 
solemn expression didn’t change. “You can’t stand around watching other kids 
play. King Jellyjam would never approve of that.” 

I’d like to step on that ugly little blob! I thought angrily. What a stupid 
name. King Jellyjam. Yuck! 

Buddy had just scared me to death. Was he trying to frighten me? I 
wondered. 

No, I quickly decided. Buddy doesn’t know that I’m upset about things. 
How could he know? 

Buddy hurried on to the basketball court. He slapped Jeff on the back and 
handed him a gold King Coin. “Way to go, guy!” he cried, flashing Jeff a 
thumbs-up. “I’ll see you in the Winners Walk tonight. Only The Best!” 

Buddy said a few words to my brother. Elliot shrugged a few times. Then 
he said something that made Buddy laugh. I couldn’t hear their words. 

When Elliot trotted off to find his next sport, Buddy strode quickly back to 
me. He put an arm around my shoulders and guided me away from the 
basketball court. 

“I guess you’re just not a self-starter, Wendy,” he said. 

“I guess,” I replied. What was I supposed to say? 

“Well, I’m going to give you a schedule for today. See if you like it,” 
Buddy said. “First, I have a tennis match fined up for you. You play tennis, 
right?” 

“A little,” I told him. “I’m not that great, but—” 

“After tennis, come down to the softball diamond, okay?” Buddy 
continued. “We’ll get you on one of the softball teams.” 

He flashed me a warm smile. “I think you’ll have a lot more fun if you join 
in—don’t you?” 

“Yeah. Probably,” I replied. I wanted to sound more enthusiastic. But I just 
couldn’t. 



Buddy led me onto one of the back tennis courts. An African-American girl 
about my age was warming up by hitting a tennis ball against a backboard. 

She turned and greeted me as I approached. “How’s it going?” 

“Fine,” I replied. We introduced ourselves. 

Her name was Rose. She was tall and pretty. She wore a purple tank top 
over black shorts. I saw a silver ring dangling from one ear. 

Buddy handed me a racket. “Have fun,” he said. “And watch out, Wendy. 
Rose already has five King Coins!” 

“Are you a good tennis player?” I asked, twirling the racket in my hand. 

Rose nodded. “Yeah. Pretty good. How about you?” 

“I don’t know,” I told her honestly. “My friend and I always play just for 

fun.” 

Rose laughed. She had a deep, throaty laugh that I liked. It made me want 
to laugh, too. “I never play for fun!” she declared. 

She told the truth. 

We volleyed back and forth for a while, to get warmed up. Rose leaned 
forward, tensed her body, narrowed her dark eyes—then started slamming the 
ball back at me as if we were playing the final set of a championship! 

She played even harder once we started our match. 

I found out very quickly that I was no match for her. I was lucky to return a 
few of her serves! 

Rose was a good sport about it. I caught her snickering a few times at my 
two-handed backhand. But she didn’t make fun of my pitiful game. And she 
gave me some really helpful tips as the match continued. 

She won in straight sets. 

I congratulated her. She seemed really excited about winning her sixth King 
Coin. 

A woman counselor I hadn’t seen before appeared on the court and 
presented the coin to Rose. “See you at the Winners Walk tonight,” she said, 
grinning. 

Then the counselor turned to me. “The softball diamond is right over that 
hill, Wendy.” She pointed. 

I thanked her and began walking in that direction. “Don’t walk—run!” she 
called. “Let’s see some spirit! Only The Best!” 

I let out an unhappy groan. I don’t think she heard me. Then I obediently 
started to run. 



Why was everyone always rushing me around here? I complained silently. 
Why can’t I go lie down by the pool and work on my tan? 

As the softball diamond came into view, I started to cheer up a little. I 
actually like softball. I’m not much of a fielder. But I’m a pretty good slugger. 

The teams, I saw, had boys and girls on them. 

I recognized two of the girls from my breakfast table this morning. 

One of them tossed me a bat. “Hi. I’m Ronni. You can be on our team,” she 
said. “Can you pitch?” 

“I guess,” I replied, wrapping my hands around the bat. “Sometimes I pitch 
after school on the playground.” 

She nodded. “Okay. You can pitch the first couple of innings.” 

Ronni called the other kids together and we huddled. We went around the 
circle, giving our names. Then the kids who didn’t have fielding positions chose 
their spots. 

“If we win, do we all get King Coins?” a boy with a fake tattoo of an eagle 
on his shoulder asked. 

“Yes. All of us,” Ronni told him. 

Everyone cheered. 

“Don’t start cheering yet. We’ve got to win first!” Ronni exclaimed. 

She went around the circle, giving the batting order. Since I was the pitcher, 
I batted ninth. 

But since I had a bat, I decided to take a few practice swings. I stepped 
away from the others, behind the third base line. 

Easing my hands up on the bat, I took a soft swing. I like to choke up pretty 
high. I’m not very strong, and it gives me a harder swing. 

The bat felt pretty good. I took a few more soft swings. 

Then I pulled it behind my shoulder—and swung as hard as I could. 

I didn’t see Buddy standing there. 

The bat smacked him hard in the chest. 

It made a sickening thocccck as it crashed into his ribs. 

I let the bat fall from my hands. Then I staggered back. Stunned. Horrified. 



21 


Buddy’s smile faded. He narrowed his blue eyes at me. 

He raised a hand and pointed a finger at me. 

“I like the way you choke up,” he said. “But maybe we could find you a 
lighter bat.” 

“Huh?” My mouth hung open. I couldn’t move. I stood there, gaping at 
him. “Buddy—?” 

He picked up the bat from the ground. “Does it feel comfortable? Let me 
see you swing again, Wendy.” He handed the bat to me. 

My hands trembled as I took it from him. I kept my eyes on him. Waited for 
him to cry out. To grab his chest and collapse in a heap on the ground. 

“Some of the aluminum bats are lighter,” he said. He brushed back his 
blond hair with one hand. “Go ahead. Swing again.” 

I took a few shaky steps away from him. I wanted to make sure I didn’t hit 
him again. Then I choked up on the bat and swung. 

“How is it?” he asked. 

“F-fine,” I stammered. 

He flashed me a thumbs-up and went to talk to Ronni. 

Whoa! I thought. What is the story here? 

I swung that bat into his chest, hard enough to break a few ribs. Or at least 
knock his breath out. 

But Buddy didn’t even seem to notice! 

What is the story here? 

I told Jan and Ivy about it at dinner. 

Jan snickered. “I guess your swing isn’t as hard as you think.” 

“But it made a horrible sound! Like eggs breaking or something!” I 
exclaimed. “And he just went on smiling and talking.” 

“He probably waited until he was out of sight. Then he screamed his head 
off!” Ivy suggested. 

I forced myself to laugh along with my two friends. But I didn’t feel like 
laughing. 



It was all too strange. 

I mean, no one could take a blow like that right in the chest and not even 
say “Ouch!” 

Our team lost by ten points. But after that thocccck, who could think about 
the game? 

I glanced across the room to the counselors’ table. Buddy sat at one end, 
talking and laughing with Holly. He seemed perfectly okay. 

I kept glancing at him all through dinner. Again and again, I heard the 
sickening thocccck the bat made as it smashed into his chest. I just couldn’t get it 
out of my mind. 

I kept thinking about it as we trooped out to the track after dinner for the 
Winners Walk. It was a windy night. The torches flickered and nearly went out. 

The trees around the track shivered and bent. Their branches seemed to 
reach down for the ground. 

The marching music started, and the winners paraded by. Rose waved to me 
as she passed. I saw Jeff walking proudly near the back of the line, his gold coins 
jangling around his neck. 

After the ceremony, I hurried back to the room and climbed into bed. Too 
many troubling thoughts whirred around in my brain. I wanted to go to sleep and 
shut them out. 


The next morning at breakfast, Rose and Jeff were gone. 



22 


I searched for Rose and Jeff. And I searched for my brother all morning. I knew 
he’d be playing hard at one of the sports. But I walked from the soccer field at 
one end of the camp to the driving range at the other end, and I didn’t see him. 

Had Elliot disappeared, too? 

The frightening thought kept tugging at my mind. 

We’ve got to get out of this camp! 

I kept repeating those words to myself as I made my way along the 
crisscrossing dirt paths. 

King Jellyjam, the little purple blob, grinned at me from the signs posted 
everywhere. Even his cartoon smile gave me the creeps. 

Something was terribly wrong at King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp. And the 
more I walked, my eyes searching every face for my brother, the more frightened 
I became. 

Buddy caught up to me after lunch. He led me back to the Softball 
diamond. “Wendy, you can’t leave your team,” he said sternly. “Forget 
yesterday. You still have a chance. If you win today, you guys all win King 
Coins.” 

I didn’t want any King Coins. I wanted to see my parents. I wanted to see 
my brother. And I wanted to get out of there! 

I didn’t pitch today. I played left field, which gave me plenty of time to 
think. 

I planned our escape. 

It won’t be that hard, I decided. Elliot and I will sneak out after dinner when 
everyone is watching the Winners Walk. We’ll make our way down the hill, back 
to the highway. Then we’ll walk or hitchhike to the nearest town with a police 
station. 

I knew the police would find Mom and Dad for us easily. 

A simple plan, right? Now all I had to do was find Elliot. 

Our team lost the game seven to nine. 

I grounded out to end the game. The other kids were disappointed that the 
team lost, but I didn’t really care. 



I still hadn’t won a single King Coin. As we trotted toward our dorms, I saw 
Buddy watching me. He had a fretful expression on his face. 

“Wendy—what’s your next sport?” he called to me. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him and trotted away. 

My next sport is running, I thought unhappily. Running away from this 
horrible place. 

The ground began to rumble and shake as I passed the main lodge. This 
time, I ignored it and kept walking to the dorm. 

I didn’t find Elliot until after dinner. I saw him heading out the mess-hall door 
with two buddies. They were laughing, talking loudly, and bumping each other 
with their chests as they walked. 

“Elliot!” I called, chasing after him. “Hey, Elliot—wait up!” 

He turned away from his two friends. “Oh. Hi,” he said. “How’s it going?” 
“Did you forget you have a sister?” I demanded angrily. 

He narrowed his eyes at me. “Excuse me?” 

“Where have you been?” I asked. 

A grin spread over his face. “Winning these,” he said. He raised the chain 
around his neck to show off the gold King Coins he was wearing. “I’ve got five.” 
“Awesome,” I said sarcastically. “Elliot—we’ve got to get out of here!” 
“Huh? Get out?” He twisted up his face, confused. 

“Yes,” I insisted. “We have to get away from this camp—tonight!” 

“I can’t,” Elliot replied. “No way.” 

Kids pushed past us, on their way to watch the Winners Walk. I followed 
Elliot out the mess-hall door. Then I pulled him off the path, onto the grass at the 
side of the building. 

“You can’t leave? Why not?” I demanded. 

“Not till I win my sixth coin,” he said. He jangled the coin necklace in my 

face. 

“Elliot—this place is dangerous!” I cried. “And Mom and Dad must be—” 
“You’re just jealous,” he interrupted. He jangled the coins again. “You 
haven’t won any—have you!” 

I balled my hands into fists. I wanted to strangle him. I really did. 

He was such a competitive jerk. He always had to win everything. 

I took a deep breath and tried to speak calmly. “Elliot, aren’t you at all 
worried about Mom and Dad?” 



He lowered his eyes for a moment. “A little.” 

“Well, we have to get out of here and find them!” I declared. 

“Tomorrow,” he replied. “After the track meet in the morning. After I win 
my sixth coin.” 

I opened my mouth to argue with him. But what was the point? 

I knew how stubborn my brother can be. If he wanted to win that sixth coin, 
he wouldn’t leave till he won it. 

I couldn’t argue with him. And I couldn’t drag him away. “Right after the 
track meet tomorrow morning,” I told him, “we’re out of here! Whether you win 
or lose. Agreed?” 

He thought about it. “Okay. Agreed,” he said finally. Then he trotted off to 
find his friends. 

Four kids marched in the Winners Walk. As I watched from the sidelines, I 
thought about the kids I knew who had marched before. 

Dierdre. Rose. Jeff... 

Had they all gone home? Were they picked up by their parents? Were they 
back home now safe and sound? 

Maybe I’m frightening myself for no reason, I thought. 

Everyone else in camp seems to be having a great time. Why am I the only 
worrier? 

And then I remembered that I wasn ’t the only worrier. 

Alicia’s tear-stained face floated into my mind. 

What had Alicia seen that had frightened her so much? Why was she 
desperately trying to warn us to get away? 

I’ll probably never find out, I told myself. 

When the Winners Walk ceremony ended, I didn’t feel like going back to 
the dorm. I knew I couldn’t get to sleep. Too many thoughts troubled my mind. 

As the other kids made their way to their rooms, I ducked into the deep 
shadows. Then I sneaked along the path to the sloping hill that led up to the main 
lodge. 

Hiding behind a wide evergreen shrub, I dropped down onto the grass. It 
was a cool, cloudy night. The air felt heavy and damp. 

I raised my eyes to the sky. Clouds covered the stars and the moon. Far in 
the distance, I could see tiny red lights moving slowly against the blackness. An 
airplane. I wondered where it was headed. 



Crickets began to chirp. The wind rustled my hair. 

I gazed up at the starless sky. Trying to relax. Trying to calm myself down. 

After a few minutes, I heard voices. Footsteps. 

I pulled myself up to my knees and ducked low behind the shrub. 

The voices grew louder. A girl laughed. 

Carefully, I peered out from between the piney branches. I saw two 
counselors, walking rapidly along the path that led up the hill. 

Behind them, I spotted another group of counselors making their way 
quickly up the hill. They all seemed to be in a hurry. 

I lowered myself behind the shrub and hid in the darkness. 

They’re heading to the lodge, I decided. Must be some kind of counselors’ 
meeting. 

Their white shorts and T-shirts were easy to see, even on such a dark night. 
Keeping out of sight, I watched them make their way up the path. 

But to my surprise, they didn’t go to the lodge. Several yards from the 
lodge entrance, they turned off the path and ducked into the woods. 

Where were they going? 

I saw two more groups of counselors make their way into the trees. There 
must be a hundred counselors at this camp, I realized. And they’re all going into 
the woods tonight. 

I waited until I thought all of the counselors had passed by. Then I slowly 
pulled myself to my feet. 

I stared into the woods. But I could see only darkness. Shadows upon 
shadows. 

I ducked back down when I heard two more voices. 

Peering through the evergreen branches, I spied Holly and Buddy. They 
were taking long strides, walking side by side. 

I waited till they passed by. Then I jumped up. 

Creeping in the deep shadows, I followed them into the woods. 

I didn’t stop to worry about getting caught. I had to know where the 
counselors were all going. 

Buddy and Holly moved quickly through the woods, pushing tall weeds out 
of their way, stepping over fallen tree limbs. 

To my surprise, a low, white structure came into view. It appeared to glow 
dully in the dim light. 

The building was built low to the ground. The top was curved. 



I squinted at it through the trees. It looks like an igloo, I thought. 

What is this strange building? I wondered. Why is it hidden away in the 
trees? 

A dark opening had been cut into the side. Holly ducked into the low 
entrance. Buddy followed her in. 

I waited nearly a minute. Then I stepped up to the opening. 

My heart pounded. Such a strange, little building. Round and smooth as ice. 

I hesitated. I peered into the entrance, but couldn’t see anything inside. I 
didn’t hear any voices. 

What should I do? I asked myself. 

Should I go in? 

Yes. 

I took a deep breath and lowered myself into the opening. 



23 


Three steep steps led down to a dim entryway. A single red light down near the 
floor gave off the only light. 

I stepped into the dark red glow, then stopped and listened. 

I could hear voices speaking softly in the next room. 

Trailing my hand along the bare, concrete wall, I moved slowly toward the 
voices. An open doorway came up on my right. 

I stopped outside it. Then I slowly, carefully peered in. 

I stared into a large, square room. Four torches hanging at the front of the 
room sent out flickering orange light. 

The counselors sat on long wooden benches, facing a low stage. A purple 
banner hung over the stage. It proclaimed: ONLY THE BEST. 

It’s a little theater, I realized. Some kind of meeting hall. 

But why is it hidden away in the woods? And why are the counselors all 
meeting here tonight? 

I didn’t have to wait long for my answer. 

Buddy stepped on to the small stage. He walked quickly into the flickering 
orange torchlight. Then he turned to face the audience of counselors. 

I crept into the doorway. There were no torches in the back of the hall. It 
was pitch-black back there. 

Walking on tiptoe, I edged my way along the back wall. 

The door to a closet of some kind stood open. I ducked into it. 

Buddy raised both hands. The counselors instantly stopped talking. They all 
sat up straight and stared forward at him. 

“Time to refresh ourselves,” Buddy called out. His voice echoed off the 
concrete walls. 

The counselors sat stiffly. No one moved. No one made a sound. 

Buddy pulled a gold coin from his pocket. A King Coin, I figured. It 
dangled on a long gold chain. 

“Time to refresh our minds,” Buddy said. “Time to refresh our mission.” 

He raised the gold coin high. It glowed in the torchlight as he began to 
swing it. Back and forth. Slowly. 



“Clear your minds,” he instructed them, speaking softly now. “Clear your 
minds, as I have cleared mine.” 

The gleaming gold coin swung slowly back and forth. Back and forth. 

“Clear... clear... clear your minds,” Buddy chanted. 

He is hypnotizing them! I realized. 

Buddy is hypnotizing all the counselors. And he’s been hypnotized, too! 

I took a step forward. I couldn’t believe what I was seeing and hearing! 

“Clear your minds to serve the master!” Buddy declared. “For that is why 
we are here. To serve the master in all his glory!” 

“To serve the master!” the counselors all chanted back together. 

Who is the master? I asked myself. 

What are they talking about? 

Buddy continued chanting out slogans to the crowd of counselors. His eyes 
were wide. He never blinked. 

“We do not think!” he shouted. “We do not feel! We give ourselves up to 
serve the master!” 

And suddenly I had an answer to some of my questions. 

Now I knew why Buddy hadn’t cried out, hadn’t collapsed to the ground 
when I swung the bat into his chest. 

He had hypnotized away all feeling. 

He was in some kind of trance. He couldn’t feel the bat. He couldn’t feel 
anything. 

“Only The Best!” Buddy cried, raising both fists into the air. 

“Only The Best!” the counselors all repeated. Their unblinking faces 
appeared strange, frozen in the flickering orange light. 

“Only The Best! Only The Best!” 

They all chanted the slogan over and over. Their voices echoed loudly off 
the walls. Only their mouths moved. Like puppets. 

“Only The Best can serve the master!” Buddy shouted. 

“Only The Best!” the counselors chanted one more time. 

Buddy had been swinging the gold coin over his head during the entire 
performance. Now he lowered it back into the pocket of his shorts. 

The room grew silent. 

A heavy silence. An eerie silence. 

And then I sneezed. 



24 


I cupped my hand over my mouth. 

Too late. 

I sneezed again. 

Buddy’s mouth opened wide in surprise. He jabbed a finger in the air, 
pointing at me. 

Several counselors jumped to their feet and spun around. 

I turned to the door. Could I escape through it before one of them caught 

me? 

No. 

No way I could get over there. 

My legs were shaking. But I forced myself to move. I backed against the 

wall. 

Why had I stepped so far into the room? Why hadn’t I stayed in the safety 
of the doorway? 

“Who’s there?” I heard Buddy call. “It’s so dark. Who is it?” 

Good! I thought. He didn’t know it was me. 

But in seconds, they’d grab me and drag me into the light. 

I took another step back. Another. 

Darkness fell over me. 

I spun around. “Ohh!” I cried out when I saw that I had nearly toppled 
down a steep stairway. 

It wasn’t a closet after all. 

Black stone steps curved sharply down. Where did they lead? 

I couldn’t guess. But I had no choice. The steps were my only chance of 
escape. 

I leaned against the wall and plunged down the stairs. My shoes slid on the 
smooth stones. 

I nearly tripped and went sailing head first. But I grabbed the wall and 
steadied myself as I started to fall. 

The stairs curved down. Down. 

The air grew hot and sour. I held my breath. The air smelled like sour milk. 



A strange, deep moan rumbled up from down below. 

I stopped to catch my breath. 

Listened hard. 

The low moan rolled up the stairway again. A whiff of sour air invaded my 
nostrils. 

I turned back. Was I being followed? Had the counselors seen me escape 
through the open door? 

No. It had been too dark. I didn’t hear anyone on the stairs. They weren’t 
following me. 

What smelled so bad down below? 

I wanted to stop right there. I didn’t want to climb down any farther. 

But what choice did I have? I knew they’d be searching for me upstairs. 

Leaning a hand against the stone wall, I made my way down. 

The stairway led into a long, narrow tunnel. I could see pale light at the end 
of it. Another deep moan rumbled in the distance. The floor shook. 

I took a long breath and passed quickly through the tunnel. The air grew hot 
and damp. My shoes splashed through puddles on the tunnel floor. 

Where does this lead? I wondered. Will it take me back outside? 

As I neared the end of the tunnel, a whiff of sour air made me choke. I 
coughed and struggled to stop my stomach from heaving. 

What a disgusting smell! 

Like decayed meat and rotten eggs. Like garbage left out in the sun for days 
and days. 

I pressed both hands over my mouth. The odor was so strong, I could taste 
it! 

I gagged. Once. Twice. 

Don’t think about the smell! I ordered myself. Think about something else. 
Think about fresh flowers. Think about sweet-smelling perfume. 

Somehow, I calmed my stomach. 

Then, pinching two fingers over my nose to keep the odor out, I stumbled to 
the end of the tunnel. 

I stopped as the tunnel gave way to a huge, brightly lit chamber. 

I stopped and stared—at the ugliest, most frightening thing I had ever seen 
in my life! 



25 


Squinting into the bright light, I saw dozens of kids with mops, and buckets, and 
water hoses. 

At first, I thought they were cleaning off a giant, purple balloon. Bigger 
than any balloon in the Thanksgiving Day parade! 

But as the water sprayed over it and the mops soaped its sides, the balloon 
let out a loud groan. 

And I realized I wasn’t staring at a balloon. It was a creature. And the 
creature was alive. I was staring at a monster. 

I was staring at King Jellyjam. 

Not a cute little mascot. But a fat, gross, purple mound of slime, nearly as 
big as a house. Wearing a gold crown. 

Two enormous, watery yellow eyes rolled around in his head. He smacked 
his fat purple lips and groaned again. Hunks of thick, white goo dripped from his 
huge, hairy nostrils. 

The disgusting odor rolled off his body. Even holding my nose couldn’t 
keep out the sour stench. 

He smelled like dead fish, rotting garbage, sour milk, and burning rubber— 
all at once! 

The gold crown bounced on top of his slimy, wet head. His purple stomach 
heaved, as if an ocean wave was breaking inside him. And he let out a putrid 
burp that shook the walls. 

The kids—dozens of them—worked frantically. They circled the ugly 
monster. They hosed him down. Scrubbed his body with mops and sponges and 
brushes. 

And as they worked, little round objects rained down on them. Click. Click. 
Click. The little round things clattered to the floor. 

Snails! 

Snails popping out through King Jellyjam’s skin. 

I started to gag again when I realized the hideous creature was sweating 
snails ! 

I staggered back into the tunnel, pressing my hands over my mouth. 

How could those kids stand the horrible, sour stench? 



Why were they washing him? Why were they working so hard? 

I gasped when I recognized some of the kids. 

Alicia! 

She held a hose with both hands and sprayed King Jellyjam’s bulging, 
heaving stomach. Her red hair was soaked and matted to her forehead. She cried 
as she worked, bawling loudly. 

I saw Jeff. Rubbing a mop up and down on the monster’s side. 

I opened my mouth to call to Alicia and Jeff. But my breath caught in my 
throat, and no sound came out. 

And then someone came running toward me. Stumbling and staggering. 
Into the tunnel. Out of the bright light. 

Dierdre! 

A dripping sponge in one fist. Her streaky blond hair drenched. Her clothes 
wrinkled and soaked. 

“Dierdre!” I managed to choke out. 

“Get away from here!” she cried. “Wendy—run!” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “What is happening? Why are you doing this?” 

Dierdre uttered a sob. “Only The Best!” she whispered. “Only The Best get 
to be King Jellyjam’s slaves!” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her as she trembled in front of me, shivering from the 
cold water that had drenched her. 

“Don’t you see?” Dierdre cried. “These are all winners. All six-coin 
winners. He gets the strongest kids. The best workers.” 

“But—why?” I demanded. 

Snails popped through the creature’s skin and clicked as they hit the hard 
floor. A wave of sour stench blew over us as another rumbling burp escaped his 
swollen lips. 

“Why are you all washing him?” I asked Dierdre. 

“He—he has to be washed all the time!” Dierdre exclaimed with a sob. “He 
has to be kept wet. And he can’t stand his own smell. So he gets the strongest 
kids down here. And makes us wash him night and day.” 

“But, Dierdre—” I started. 

“If we stop washing,” she continued. “If we try to take a rest, he—he’ll eat 
us!” Her entire body shook. “He—he ate three kids today!” 

“No!” I cried, gasping in horror. 

“He’s so disgusting!” Dierdre wailed. “Those horrible snails popping out of 



his body... that putrid smell.” 

She grabbed my arm. Her hand was wet and cold. “The counselors are all 
hypnotized,” she whispered. “King Jellyjam has total control over them.” 

“I—I know,” I told her. 

“Get out of here! Hurry!” Dierdre pleaded, squeezing my arm. “Get help, 
Wendy. Please—” 

An angry roar made us both jump. 

“Oh, no!” Dierdre wailed. “He’s seen us! It’s too late!” 



26 


The monster let out another roar. 

Dierdre loosened her grip on my arm. We both turned toward him, shaking 
with fright. 

He was bellowing at the ceiling, roaring just to keep everyone terrified. His 
watery yellow eyes were shut. He hadn’t seen Dierdre and me—yet. 

“Get help!” Dierdre whispered to me. Then she raised the sponge and ran 
back to her place at King Jellyjam’s side. 

I froze for a moment. Froze in horror. In disbelief. 

Another rumbling burp jolted me from my thoughts and sent me scurrying 
through the tunnel. At least now I knew why the camp ground shook so often! 

The sour stench followed me through the tunnel and back up the curving, 
stone steps. I wondered if I could ever get rid of it. I wondered if I could ever 
breathe freely again. 

How can I help those kids? I asked myself. What can I do? 

I was too terrified to think clearly. 

As I ran through the darkness, I could picture King Jellyjam smacking his 
gross purple lips. I could see him rolling his yellow eyes. And the ugly black 
snails squeezing out through his skin. 

I felt sick as I reached the top of the stairs. But I knew I didn’t have time to 
worry about myself. I had to save the kids who had been forced to be the 
monster’s slaves. And I had to save the rest of the kids in camp—before they 
became slaves, too. 

I poked my head out of the closet door. The four torches still burned at the 
front of the small theater. But the room was empty. 

Where were the counselors? Out searching for me? 

Probably. 

Where can I go? I asked myself. I can’t spend the night in this closet. I have 
to breathe some fresh air. I have to go somewhere where I can think. 

Carefully, I made my way out of the low igloo. Into the starless night. 
Hiding behind a wide tree trunk, my eyes searched the woods. 

Narrow beams of white light from flashlights darted through the trees, over 
the ground. 



Yes, I told myself. The counselors are searching for me. 

I backed up, away from the crisscrossing lights. Trying not to make a 
sound, I crept between the trees and tall weeds, toward the path that led to the 
lodge. 

Can I get to the dorms and warn everyone? I wondered. Will anyone believe 
me? Will there be counselors guarding the dorms? Waiting for me to show up? 

I heard voices on the path. I ducked behind a tree and let two counselors 
pass. Their flashlights made wide circles over the sloping hill. 

As soon as they were out of sight, I darted out from the trees. I ran down 
the hill. Keeping in deep shadows, I made my way past the swimming pool. Past 
the tennis courts. All dark and silent now. 

A clump of tall hedges beside the track would hide me from all sides, I 
realized. I ducked behind the hedges, gasping for breath. Dropping to my knees, 
I crawled into their shelter. 

I settled myself on the prickly pine needles beneath the hedges. And peered 
out. Only darkness now. 

I took a deep breath. Then another. Such sweet-smelling air. 

I’ve got to think, I told myself. Got to think... 

Shouting voices startled me awake. 

When had I fallen asleep? Where was I? 

I blinked several times. Sat up and stretched. 

My body felt stiff. My back ached. Every muscle ached. 

I gazed around. Discovered I was still hidden inside the hedges. A gray, 
cloudy morning. The sun trying to burn through the high clouds. 

And the voices? 

Cheers? 

I raised myself up and peered through the hedges. 

The track competition! It had just begun. I saw six boys in shorts and T- 
shirts, leaning forward as they ran around the track. A crowd of kids and 
counselors cheering them on. 

And in the lead? 

Elliot! 

“No!” I cried hoarsely, my voice still choked with sleep. 

I stepped out from the hedges. Made my way across the grass toward the 
track. 



I knew I had to stop him. I couldn’t let him win the race. I couldn’t let him 
win his sixth coin. If he did, they’d make Elliot a slave, too! 

He ran hard. He pulled far out in front of the other five. 

What could I do? What? 

In my panic, I remembered our signal. 

My two-fingered whistle. My signal for Elliot to take it easy. 

He’ll hear the whistle and slow down, I told myself. 

I raised two fingers to my mouth. I blew. 

No sound came out. My mouth was too dry. My heart thudded in my chest. 
I tried again. No. No whistle. 

Elliot turned into the last lap. There was no way to stop him from winning 

now. 



27 


No way to stop him—unless I beat him there! 

With a desperate cry, I plunged forward and started to run to the track. 

My shoes pounded the grass. I kept my eyes on Elliot and the finishing line 
as I ran. Faster. Faster. 

If only I could fly! 

Foud cheers rang out as Elliot neared the finish. The other five boys were 
miles behind! 

My shoes thudded onto the asphalt track. My chest felt about to burst. It 
hurt to breathe. My breath came in loud wheezes. 

Faster. Faster. 

I heard cries of surprise as I raced over the track. I plunged up behind 
Elliot, reached out both hands—and tackled him from behind. 

We both toppled in a heap, rolling over the hard track, onto the grass. The 
other boys raced past us to the finish line. 

“Wendy, you jerk!” Elliot screamed, jumping to his feet. 

“I—can’t explain now!” I shouted back, struggling to breathe, struggling to 
stop the aching in my chest. 

I scrambled to my feet and pulled Elliot up. He angrily tried to jerk free. 
“Why’d you do that, Wendy? Why?” 

I saw three counselors running toward me. 

“Hurry—!” I ordered my brother. I pulled him away. “Just hurry!” 

I think he saw the terror in my eyes. I think he realized that tackling him 
was a desperate act. I think he saw how serious I was. 

Elliot stopped protesting and started to run. 

I led him over the grass. Up the sloping hill by the lodge. Into the woods. 

“Where are we going?” he called breathlessly. “Tell me what’s happening!” 

“You’ll see in a minute!” I called back. “Get ready for a really bad smell!” 

“Huh? Wendy—have you totally lost it?” 

I didn’t answer. I kept running. I led the way into the woods. To the igloo¬ 
shaped building. 

At the low entrance, I turned back to see if we were being followed. I didn’t 



see anyone. 

Elliot followed me into the theater. The torches weren’t lit. It was pitch- 
black inside. 

Feeling my way along the back wall, I found the closet door. I pulled it 
open and led the way down the curving stairs. 

Halfway down, the sour odor floated up to greet us. Elliot cried out and 
cupped both hands over his nose and mouth. “It stinks!” His cry was muffled by 
his hands. 

“It gets worse,” I told him. “Try not to think about it.” 

We jogged side by side through the long tunnel. I wished I had time to warn 
Elliot. I wished I could tell him what he was about to see. 

But I was desperate to save Dierdre, Alicia, and the others. 

Gasping from the smell, I burst into King Jellyjam’s brightly lit chamber. 
Water from a dozen hoses splashed over the monster’s purple body. Kids 
scrubbed furiously as he sighed and groaned. 

I saw the startled horror on my brother’s face. But I couldn’t worry about 
Elliot now. 

“Hit the floor! ” I screamed at the top of my lungs, cupping my hands into a 
megaphone. “EVERYBODY—HIT THE FLOOR! NOW!” 

I had a plan. 

Would it work? 



28 


The monster’s watery yellow eyes grew wide with surprise. His bloated lips 
parted. I could see two pink tongues dart and coil inside his mouth. 

A few of the kids dropped their hoses and mops and flattened themselves on 
the floor. Others turned to stare at me. 

“Stop washing him!” I cried. “Put down your hoses and brushes! Stop 
working! And hit the floor!” 

Beside me, Elliot uttered gasping sounds. I glimpsed him struggling to keep 
the sick smell from overpowering him. 

King Jellyjam let out a furious roar as the rest of the kids obeyed my 
instructions. Thick, white slime dripped from his nose. His two tongues flicked 
out between his purple lips. 

“Get flat!” I screamed to the kids. “Stay down!” 

And then I saw the monster raise a fat purple arm. With a disgusting groan, 
he leaned over. His slimy flesh rippled all over his body as he reached out. 

Reached out to grab Alicia! 

“Help! He’s going to eat me!” Alicia shrieked. She started to get up. 

“No!” I shrieked. “Stay down! Stay flat!” 

With a terrified cry, Alicia dropped back to the floor. 

King Jellyjam swung his fat hand down. Fumbled it over her. Tried to lift 
the little girl up. Tried again. Again. 

But I had figured right! The monster’s fingers were too big, too clumsy to 
pick up anyone who lay flat on the floor. 

King Jellyjam tilted his head back and uttered a roar of disgust. 

I cupped my hand over my nose as the disgusting odor grew more intense. 
Snails pop-pop-popped out of his skin. Rolled down his slimy body. Bounced 
noisily onto the floor. 

The monster flailed his arms. He leaned down again and struggled to pick 
up some other kids. 

But they pressed themselves flat on the floor. He couldn’t lift them. 

He roared again, weaker this time. His eyes rolled wildly in his enormous 
head. 

The smell burned my eyes. It swirled around me, surrounded me in its sour 



stench. 

King Jellyjam grabbed for a hose. Couldn’t pick it up. He slammed his hand 
into a bucket. Struggled frantically to splash water on himself. 

I stood trembling. Watching every move. 

My plan was working. I knew it would work. It had to work! 

The stench grew even stronger. I could taste it. I could smell it on my skin. 

King Jellyjam flailed both arms. Frantically, he struggled to wash himself. 

His roars became groans. His body began to shake. 

I gasped as he narrowed his eyes at me. He raised a swollen purple finger 
and pointed. Accusing me! 

He leaned forward. Reached out. 

Swiped out his enormous hand. 

I couldn’t move. I was too stunned. 

I shuddered. 

His hand slid over me. And before I could struggle, he began to tighten his 
slimy, stinking fingers around my body. 



29 


“Ohhh.” I uttered a horrified moan. 

The fat, wet fingers tightened. Waves of odor rose up around me. 

I held my breath. But the smell was everywhere. 

The fingers wrapped themselves tighter. 

The monster began to lift me off the ground. Raise me toward his gaping 
mouth. The two tongues darted and flicked. 

And then the tongues drooped over his purple lips. 

The fingers loosened their grip. 

I slid free as King Jellyjam groaned and fell forward. Kids rolled quickly 
out of the way. King Jellyjam toppled over headfirst. 

The gold crown bounced away. The monster’s body made a loud splat as it 
spread over the floor. 

“Yes!” I choked out happily. I was still shaking, still trying to forget the 
slimy feel of his fingers against my skin. “Yes!” 

My plan had worked perfectly. 

The kids stopped washing—and King Jellyjam suffocated from his own 
foul smell! 

“Are you okay?” Elliot asked in a trembling voice. 

I nodded. “Yes. I think I’m going to be fine.” 

Elliot held his nose. “I’ll never complain about Dad’s garden fertilizer 
again!” he declared. 

Cheering and shouting, the other kids climbed to their feet. 

“Thank you!” Alicia cried, wrapping me in a hug. The others rushed 
forward to thank me, too. 

There were lots of hugs, lots of tears as we made our way up to the theater 
and then out into the woods. 

“We are out of here!” I cried happily to Elliot. 

But we all stopped at the edge of the woods when we saw the counselors. 

They all stood in front of us, dozens of them, side by side in their white 
shirts and shorts. They had formed a line along the path. 

And I could see from the hard expressions set on their faces that they had 



not come to welcome everyone back. 

As I stared from face to face, Buddy stepped forward. He gave a signal to 
the other counselors. “Don’t let them get away!” he cried. 



30 


The counselors stepped forward, moving in a line. Their expressions remained 
hard and threatening. They kept their arms at their sides. 

They moved stiffly. Like robots. In a trance. 

They took two more steps. 

Then a shrill whistle broke the silence. 

“Stop right there! Everybody freeze!” a man’s voice boomed. 

I heard another shrill whistle. 

I turned to see several blue-uniformed police officers running up the hill. 
The counselors shook their heads, blinked, uttered soft cries. They made no 
attempt to run. 

“Where are we?” I heard Holly mutter. 

“What’s happening?” another counselor asked. 

They all appeared dazed and confused. The police whistles seemed to have 
broken the trance that held them. 

The other kids and I all cheered happily as the officers swarmed up the hill. 
“How did you know we needed help?” I called. 

“We didn’t,” an officer replied. “A horrible smell floated into town. We 
wanted to find out what was causing it. We followed it here!” 

I had to laugh. The same smell that had killed the monster had actually 
saved us kids. 

“We didn’t know there was a problem at this camp,” an officer announced. 
“We’ll contact your parents as soon as we can.” 

Elliot and I led the way down the hill. We were so eager to see Mom and 

Dad! 

The counselors muttered to themselves, gazing around, trying to figure out 
what had happened. 

I turned to Buddy as Elliot and I walked past him. “Are you feeling better?” 
I asked. 

He narrowed his blue eyes at me and squinted hard. He didn’t seem to be 
able to focus. “Only The Best,” he murmured. “Only The Best.” 



Elliot and I were never so glad to be home! 

“What took you so long to find us?” Elliot demanded. 

Mom and Dad shook their heads. “The police checked everywhere, trying 
to find you two,” Dad replied. “They called the camp several times. The 
counselor who answered the phone told the police that you weren’t there.” 

“We were so worried,” Mom said, biting her bottom lip. “So terribly 
worried. When we found the trailer empty, we didn’t know what to think!” 

“Well, we’re home safe and sound now,” I replied with a grin. 

“Maybe you two would like to go away to a real camp next summer,” Dad 

said. 

“Uh... no way!” Elliot and I answered together. 

Two weeks later, we had a surprise visitor. 

I opened the door to find Buddy on the front stoop. His blond hair was 
neatly brushed. He wore chinos, a blue-and-white-striped sportshirt, and a dark 
blue tie. 

“I’m so sorry about what happened at camp,” Buddy said. 

I was still too shocked at seeing him to reply. I just held on to the door and 
gaped at him. 

“Is Elliot home?” Buddy asked. 

“Hi.” Elliot stepped up beside me. “Buddy! What’s up?” 

“I brought you this,” Buddy replied. He reached into his pants pocket and 
pulled out a gold coin. 

“It’s a King Coin,” he told Elliot. “You earned it, remember? You actually 
won the race.” 

Elliot reached out for it. Then stopped. His hand hung in midair. 

I knew what my brother was thinking. This would be his sixth King Coin. 
Should he take it? 

Finally, he grabbed it. “Thanks, Buddy,” Elliot said. 

Buddy said good-bye and gave us a wave. Elliot and I watched him get into 
a car and drive away. Then we closed the door behind us. 

“Are you sure you should’ve taken that?” I asked Elliot. 

“Why not?” he replied. “That purple monster is dead—right? What could 
happen?” 

Five minutes later, we both smelled the horrible odor at the same time. 
“Yuck!” Elliot groaned. He swallowed hard. “Wendy, wh-what’s that 



smell?” he stammered. 

“I—I don’t know,” I replied in a shaky voice. 

I heard Mom laugh behind us. We turned to see her standing in the doorway 
to the kitchen. “What’s wrong?” she asked. “I have a pot of brussels sprouts 
boiling on the stove!” 





REVENGE OF THE 
LAWN GNOMES 

Goosebumps - 34 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Clack, Clack, Clack. 

The Ping-Pong ball clattered over the basement floor. “Yes!” I cried as I 
watched Mindy chase after it. 

It was a hot, sticky June afternoon. The first Monday of summer vacation. 
And Joe Burton had just made another excellent shot. 

That’s me. Joe Burton. I’m twelve. And there is nothing I love better than 
slamming the ball in my older sister’s face and making her chase after it. 

I’m not a bad sport. I just like to show Mindy that she’s not as great as she 
thinks she is. 

You might guess that Mindy and I do not always agree on things. The fact 
is, I’m really not like anyone else in my family. 

Mindy, Mom, and Dad are all blond, skinny, and tall. I have brown hair. 
And I’m kind of pudgy and short. Mom says I haven’t had my growth spurt yet. 

So I’m a shrimp. And it’s hard for me to see over the Ping-Pong net. But I 
can still beat Mindy with one hand tied behind my back. 

As much as I love to win, Mindy hates to lose. And she doesn’t play fair at 
all. Every time I make a great move, she says it doesn’t count. 

“Joe, kicking the ball over the net is not legal,” she whined as she scooped 
out the ball from under the couch. 

“Give me a break!” I cried. “All the Ping-Pong champions do it. They call it 
the Soccer Slam.” 

Mindy rolled her huge green eyes. “Oh, puh-lease!” she muttered. “My 
serve.” 

Mindy is weird. She’s probably the weirdest fourteen-year-old in town. 

Why? I’ll tell you why. 

Take her room. Mindy arranges all her books in alphabetical order—by 
author. Do you believe it? 

And she fills out a card for each one. She files them in the top drawer of her 
desk. Her own private card catalog. 

If she could, she’d probably cut the tops off the books so they’d be all the 
same size. 

She is so organized. Her closet is organized by color. All the reds come 



first. Then the oranges. Then the yellows. Then come the greens, blues, and 
purples. She hangs her clothes in the same order as the rainbow. 

And at dinner, she eats around her plate clockwise. Really! I’ve watched 
her. First her mashed potatoes. Then all her peas. And then her meat loaf. If she 
finds one pea in her mashed potatoes, she totally loses it! 

Weird. Really weird. 

Me? I’m not organized. I’m cool. I’m not serious like my sister. I can be 
pretty funny. My friends think I’m a riot. Everyone does. Except Mindy. 

“Come on, serve already,” I called out. “Before the end of the century.” 

Mindy stood on her side of the table, carefully lining up her shot. She 
stands in exactly the same place every time. With her feet exactly the same space 
apart. Her footprints are worn into the carpet. 

“Ten-eight and serving,” Mindy finally called out. She always calls out the 
score before she serves. Then she swung her arm back. 

I held the paddle up to my mouth like a microphone. “She pulls her arm 
back,” I announced. “The crowd is hushed. It’s a tense moment.” 

“Joe, stop acting like a jerk,” she snapped. “I have to concentrate.” 

I love pretending I’m a sports announcer. It drives Mindy nuts. 

Mindy pulled her arm back again. She tossed the Ping-Pong ball up into the 
air. And... 

“A spider!” I screamed. “On your shoulder!” 

“Yaaaiiii!” Mindy dropped the paddle and began slapping her shoulder 
furiously. The ball clattered onto the table. 

“Gotcha!” I cried. “My point.” 

“No way!” Mindy shouted angrily. “You’re just a cheater, Joe.” She 
smoothed the shoulders of her pink T-shirt carefully. She picked up the ball and 
swatted it over the net. 

“At least I’m a funny cheater!” I replied. I twirled around in a complete 
circle and belted the ball. It bounced once on my side before sailing over the net. 

“Foul,” Mindy announced. “You’re always fouling.” 

I waved my paddle at her. “Get a life,” I said. “It’s a game. It’s supposed to 
be fun.” 

“I’m beating you,” Mindy replied. “That’s fun.” 

I shrugged. “Who cares? Winning isn’t everything.” 

“Where did you read that?” she asked. “In a bubble gum comic?” Then she 
rolled her eyes again. I think someday her eyes are going to roll right out of her 



head! 

I rolled my eyes, too—back into my head until only the whites showed. 
“Neat trick, huh?” 

“Cute, Joe,” Mindy muttered. “Really cute. You’d better watch out. One 
day your eyes might not come back down. Which would be an improvement!” 

“Lame joke,” I replied. “Very lame.” 

Mindy lined up her feet carefully again. 

“She’s in her serve position,” I spoke into my paddle. “She’s nervous. 
She’s...” 

“Joe!” Mindy whined. “Quit it!” 

She tossed the Ping-Pong ball into the air. She swung the paddle, and— 

“Gross!” I shouted. “What’s that big green glob hanging out of your nose?” 

Mindy ignored me this time. She tapped the ball over the net. 

I dove forward and whacked it with the tip of my paddle. It spun high over 
the net and landed in the corner of the basement. Between the washing machine 
and the dryer. 

Mindy jogged after the ball on her long, thin legs. “Hey, where’s Buster?” 
she called out. “Wasn’t he sleeping next to the dryer?” 

Buster is our dog. A giant black Rottweiler with a head the size of a 
basketball. He loves snoozing on the old sleeping bag we keep in the corner of 
the basement. Especially when we’re down here playing Ping-Pong. 

Everyone is afraid of Buster. For about three seconds. Then he starts licking 
them with his long, wet tongue. Or rolls onto his back and begs to have his belly 
scratched. 

“Where is he, Joe?” Mindy bit her lip. 

“He’s around here somewhere,” I replied. “Why are you always worrying 
about Buster? He weighs over a hundred pounds. He can take care of himself.” 

Mindy frowned. “Not if Mr. McCall catches him. Remember what he said 
the last time Buster chomped on his tomato plants?” 

Mr. McCall is our next-door neighbor. Buster loves the McCalls’ yard. He 
likes to nap under their huge, shady elm tree. 

And dig little holes all over their lawn. And sometimes big holes. 

And snack in their vegetable garden. 

Last year, Buster dug up every head of Mr. McCall’s lettuce. And ate his 
biggest zucchini plant for dessert. 

I guess that’s why Mr. McCall hates Buster. He said the next time he 



catches him in his garden, he’s going to turn him into fertilizer. 

My dad and Mr. McCall are the two best gardeners in town. They’re nuts 
about gardening. Totally nuts. 

I think working in a garden is kind of fun, too. But I don’t let that get 
around. My friends think gardening is for nerds. 

Dad and Mr. McCall are always battling it out at the annual garden show. 
Mr. McCall usually takes first place. But last year, Dad and I won the blue 
ribbon for our tomatoes. 

That drove Mr. McCall crazy. When Dad’s name was announced, Mr. 
McCall’s face turned as red as our tomatoes. 

So Mr. McCall is desperate to win this year. He started stocking up on plant 
food and bug spray months ago. 

And he planted something that nobody else in North Bay grows. Strange 
orange-green melons called casabas. 

Dad says that Mr. McCall has made a big mistake. He says the casabas will 
never grow any bigger than tennis balls. The growing season in Minnesota is too 
short. 

“McCall’s garden loses,” I declared. “Our tomatoes are definitely going to 
win again this year. And thanks to my special soil, they’ll grow as big as beach 
balls!” 

“So will your head,” Mindy shot back. 

I stuck out my tongue and crossed my eyes. It seemed like a good reply. 

“Whose serve is it?” I asked. Mindy was taking so long, I lost track. 

“It’s still my serve,” she replied, carefully placing her feet. 

We were interrupted by footsteps. Heavy, booming footsteps on the stairs 
behind Mindy. 

“Who is that?” Mindy cried. 

And then he appeared behind her. And my eyes nearly bulged right out of 
my head. 

“Oh, no!” I screamed. “It’s... McCall!” 



2 


“Joe!” he roared. The floor shook as he stomped toward Mindy. 

All the color drained from Mindy’s face. Her hand grasped her paddle so 
tightly that her knuckles turned white. She tried to swing around to look behind 
her, but she couldn’t. Her feet were frozen in her Ping-Pong-ball footprints. 

McCall’s hands balled into two huge fists, and he looked really, really 
angry. 

“I’m going to get you. And this time I’m going to win. Throw me a 
paddle.” 

“You jerk!” Mindy sputtered. “I-I knew it wasn’t Mr. McCall. I knew it was 
Moose.” 

Moose is Mr. McCall’s son and my best friend. His real name is Michael, 
but everyone calls him Moose. Even his parents. 

Moose is the biggest kid in the whole sixth grade. And the strongest. His 
legs are as thick as tree trunks. And so is his neck. And he’s very, very loud. Just 
like his dad. 

Mindy can’t stand Moose. She says he’s a gross slob. 

I think he’s cool. 

“Yo, Joe!” Moose bellowed. “Where’s my paddle?” His big arm muscles 
bulged as he reached out to grab mine. 

I pulled my hand back. But his beefy hand slapped my shoulder so hard that 
my head nearly rolled off. 

“Whoaaa!” I yelped. 

Moose let out a deep laugh that shook the basement walls. And then he 
ended it with a burp. 

“Moose, you’re disgusting,” Mindy groaned. 

Moose scratched his dark brown crew cut. “Gee, thanks, Mindy.” 

“Thanks for what?” she demanded. 

“For this.” He reached out and snatched the paddle right out of her hand. 

Moose swung Mindy’s paddle around wildly in the air. He missed a 
hanging lamp by an inch. “Ready for a real game, Joe?” 

He threw the Ping-Pong ball into the air and drew his powerful arm back. 
Wham! The ball rocketed across the room. It bounced off two walls and flew 



back over the net toward me. 

“Foul!” Mindy cried. “That’s not allowed.” 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. I dove for the ball and missed. Moose has an amazing 
serve. 

Moose slammed the ball again. It shot over the net and whacked me in the 
chest. 

Thwock! 

“Hey!” I cried. I rubbed the stinging spot. 

“Good shot, huh?” He grinned. 

“Yeah. But you’re supposed to hit the table,” I told him. 

Moose pumped his fat fists into the air. “Super Moose!” he bellowed. 
“Strong as a superhero!” 

My friend Moose is a pretty wild guy. Mindy says he’s a total animal. I 
think he’s just got a lot of enthusiasm. 

I served while he was still throwing his arms around. 

“Hey! No fair!” he declared. Moose charged the table and clobbered the 
ball. And flattened it into a tiny white pancake. 

I groaned. “That’s ball number fifteen for this month,” I announced. 

I grabbed the little pancake and tossed it into a blue plastic milk crate on the 
floor. The crate was piled high with dozens of flattened Ping-Pong balls. 

“Hey! I think you broke your record!” I declared. 

“All right!” Moose exclaimed. He leaped on top of the Ping-Pong table and 
began jumping up and down. “Super Moose!” he yelled. 

“Stop it, you jerk!” Mindy screamed. “You’re going to break the table.” She 
covered her face with her hands. 

“Super Moose! Super Moose!” he chanted. 

The Ping-Pong table swayed. Then it sagged under his weight. He was even 
starting to get on my nerves now. “Moose, get off! Get off!” I wailed. 

“Who’s going to make me?” he demanded. 

Then we all heard a loud, sharp craaaaack. 

“You’re breaking it!” Mindy shrieked. “Get off!” 

Moose scrambled off the table. He lurched toward me, holding his hands 
straight out like the zombie monster we’d seen in Killer Zombie from Planet 
Zero on TV. “Now I’m going to destroy you!” 

Then he hurled himself at me. 

As he smashed into me, I staggered back and fell onto the dusty cement 



floor. 

Moose jumped onto my stomach and pinned me down. “Say ‘Moose’s 
tomatoes are the best!’ ” he ordered. He bounced up and down on my chest. 

“Moo... Moose’s,” I wheezed. “Tomat... I can’t... breathe... really... 
help.” 

“Say it!” Moose insisted. He placed his powerful hands around my neck. 
And squeezed. 

“Ugggggh,” I gagged. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move. 

My head rolled to the side. 

“Moose!” I heard Mindy shriek. “Let him go! Let him go! What have you 
done to him?” 



3 


“M-Miiindy,” I moaned. 

Moose pulled his hands from my throat and lifted his powerful body off my 
chest. 

“What did you do to him—you big monster?” Mindy shrieked. She knelt 
down by my side and bent over me. She brushed my hair from my eyes. 

“Y-you’re a... a...” I stopped and coughed weakly. 

“What, Joe? What is it?” Mindy demanded softly. 

“You’re a SUCKER!” I exclaimed. And burst out laughing. 

Mindy jerked her head back. “You little weasel!” 

“Tricked you! Tricked you!” I cheered. 

“Way to go, dude!” Moose grinned. 

I scrambled to my feet and slapped Moose a high five. “Suc-ker! Suc-ker!” 
we chanted over and over. 

Mindy folded her skinny arms in front of her and glared at us. “Not funny,” 
she snapped. “I’m never going to believe another word you say! Never!” 

“Oh, I’m sooooo scared!” I said. I knocked my knees together. “See? My 
knees are trembling.” 

“I’m shaking, too,” Moose joined in, wiggling his whole body. 

“You guys are totally juvenile,” she announced. “I’m out of here.” 

She slid her hands into the pockets of her white shorts and stomped away. 
But then she suddenly stopped a few feet from the stairs. 

In front of the high basement window. 

The window that looked out onto Mr. McCall’s front yard. 

She stared up through the window’s sheer white curtain for a second. She 
squinted her eyes. Then she cried out, “No! Oh, no!” 

“Nice try,” I replied, flicking a dust ball from the carpet in her direction. 
“There’s nothing out there. I’m not falling for your lame trick!” 

“No! It’s Buster!” Mindy cried. “He’s next door again!” 

“Huh?” I sprinted to the window. And jumped onto a chair. I yanked the 
filmy curtain aside. 

Yes. There sat Buster. In the middle of the vegetable patch that covered Mr. 



McCall’s front yard. “Oh, wow. He’s in the garden again,” I murmured. 

“My garden! He’d better not be!” Moose declared, stomping up behind me. 
He shoved me off the chair to take a look. “If my dad catches Buster in his 
vegetables, he’ll turn that big mutt into mulch!” 

“Come on! Hurry!” Mindy pleaded, tugging on my arm. “We have to get 
Buster out of there. Right away. Before Moose’s dad catches him!” 

Moose, Mindy, and I raced upstairs and out the front door. We charged 
across our front lawn, toward the McCalls’ house. 

At the edge of our lawn, we leaped across the line of yellow and white 
petunias that Dad had planted. It separates our yard from the McCalls’ garden. 

Mindy squeezed her fingernails deep into my arm. “Buster’s digging!” she 
cried. “He’s going to destroy—the melons!” 

Buster’s powerful front paws worked hard. He scraped at the dirt and green 
plants. Mud and leaves flew everywhere. 

“Stop that, Buster!” Mindy pleaded. “Stop that—now!” 

Buster kept digging. 

Moose glanced at his plastic wristwatch. “You’d better get that dog out of 
there fast,” he warned. “It’s almost six o’clock. My dad comes out to water the 
garden at six sharp.” 

I’m terrified of Mr. McCall. I admit it. He’s so big, he makes Moose look 
like a shrimp! And he’s mean. 

“Buster, get over here!” I begged. Mindy and I both shouted to the dog. 

But Buster ignored our cries. 

“Don’t just stand there. Why don’t you pull that dumb mutt out of there?” 
Moose demanded. 

I shook my head. “We can’t! He’s too big. And stubborn. He won’t budge.” 

I reached under my T-shirt and searched for the shiny metal dog whistle I 
wear on a cord around my neck. I wear it day and night. Even under my 
pajamas. It’s the only thing Buster will obey. 

“It’s two minutes to six,” Moose warned, checking his watch. “Dad will be 
out here any second!” 

“Blow the whistle, Joe!” Mindy cried. 

I brought the whistle up to my mouth. And gave a long, hard blow. 

Moose snickered. “That whistle’s broken,” he said. “It didn’t make a 
sound.” 

“It’s a dog whistle,” Mindy replied in a superior tone. “It makes a really 



high-pitched sound. Dogs can hear them, but people can’t. See?” 

She pointed to Buster. He had lifted his nose out of the dirt and pricked up 
his ears. 

I blew the whistle again. Buster shook the dirt from his fur. 

“Thirty seconds and counting,” Moose told us. 

I blew the silent dog whistle one more time. 

Yes! 

Buster came trotting slowly toward us, wagging his stumpy tail. 

“Hurry, Buster!” I pleaded. “Hurry!” I held my arms open wide. 

“Buster—run—don’t trot!” Mindy begged. 

Too late. 

We heard a loud slam. 

Moose’s front door flew open. 

And Mr. McCall stepped out. 



4 


“Joe! Come over here. Now!” Moose’s dad barked at me. 

He lumbered toward his garden, his big belly bouncing in front of him 
under his blue T-shirt. “Get over here, boy—on the double!” 

Mr. McCall is retired from the army. He’s used to barking out orders. And 
having them obeyed. 

I obeyed. Buster trotted by my side. 

“Was that dog in my garden again?” Mr. McCall demanded, eyeing me 
coldly. His cold stare could make your blood freeze. 

“No, s-sir! ” I stammered. Buster settled down beside me with a loud yawn. 

I usually don’t tell lies. Except to Mindy. But Buster’s life was on the line. I 
had to save Buster. Didn’t I? 

Mr. McCall bounced up to his vegetable patch. He circled his tomatoes, his 
corn, his zucchini, his casaba melons. He examined each stalk and leaf carefully. 

Oh, wow, I thought. We’re in major trouble now. 

Finally, he gazed up at us. His eyes narrowed. “If that mutt wasn’t in here, 
why is the dirt all pawed up?” 

“Maybe it was the wind?” I replied softly. It was worth a try. Maybe he’d 
believe it. 

Moose stood silently next to me. The only time he’s quiet is when his dad is 
around. 

“Um, Mr. McCall,” Mindy began. “We’ll make sure Buster stays out of 
your yard. We promise!” Then she smiled her sweetest smile. 

Mr. McCall scowled. “All right. But if I catch him even sniffing at my 
melons, I’m calling the police and having that dog hauled off to the pound. And I 
mean it.” 

I gulped. I knew he meant it. Mr. McCall doesn’t kid around. 

“Moose!” Mr. McCall snapped. “Bring the hose out here and water these 
casabas! I told you they need to be watered at least five times a day.” 

“See you later,” Moose muttered. He ducked his head and ran toward the 
back of his house for the hose. 

Mr. McCall shot one more dark glance at us. Then he lumbered up his front 
steps and slammed the door. 



“Maybe it was the wind?” Mindy rolled her eyes again. “Wow, that was fast 
thinking, Joe!” She laughed. 

“Oh, yeah? Well, at least I had an answer,” I replied. “And remember, it 
was my whistle that saved Buster. All you did was smile that phony smile.” 

Mindy and I headed toward our house, arguing all the way. But we stopped 
when we heard a low moan. A frightening sound. Buster cocked his ears. 

“Who’s that?” I whispered. 

A second later, we found out. Dad lurched around the side of the house, 
carrying a big watering can. 

He was wearing his favorite gardening outfit—sneakers with holes in both 
toes, baggy plaid shorts, and a red T-shirt that said “I’m All Thumbs in the 
Garden.” 

And he was moaning and groaning. Which was really weird. Because Dad 
is always in an excellent mood when he’s gardening. Whistling. Smiling. 
Cracking lame jokes. 

But not today. 

Today something was wrong. Really wrong. 

“Kids... kids,” he moaned, staggering toward us. “I’ve been looking for 
you.” 

“Dad—what is it? What’s wrong?” Mindy demanded. 

Dad clutched his head and swayed from side to side. He took a deep breath. 
“I-I have something terrible to tell you.” 



5 


“What, Dad?” I cried. “Tell us.” 

Dad spoke in a hoarse whisper. “I found a... a fruit fly on our tomatoes! On 
our biggest tomato. The Red Queen!” 

He wiped his sweaty forehead. “How could this happen? I misted. I 
sprayed. I pruned. Twice this week alone.” 

Dad shook his head in sorrow. “My poor tomatoes. If that fruit fly ruins my 
Red Queen, I-IT1 have to pull out of the garden show!” 

Mindy and I glanced at each other. I knew we were thinking the same thing. 
The adults around here were getting a little weird. 

“Dad, it’s only one fruit fly,” I pointed out. 

“It only takes one, Joe. Just one fruit fly. And our chances for a blue ribbon 
—destroyed. We have to do something. Right away.” 

“What about that new bug spray?” I reminded him. “The stuff that came 
last week from the Green Thumb catalog.” 

Dad’s eyes lit up. He ran a hand through his flat, rumpled hair. “The Bug Be 
Gone!” he exclaimed. 

He jogged up the driveway to the garage. “Come on, kids!” he sang out. 
“Let’s give it a try!” Dad was cheering up. 

Mindy and I raced after him. 

Dad pulled out three spray cans from a carton in the back of the garage. The 
words “Wave Bye-Bye to Bugs with Bug Be Gone!” were printed on the labels. 
A drawing showed a tearful bug carrying a suitcase. Waving bye-bye. 

Dad handed one can to Mindy and one to me. “Let’s get that fruit fly!” he 
cried, as we headed back to our garden. 

We ripped the caps off the cans of Bug Be Gone. “One, two, three... spray!” 
Dad commanded. 

Dad and I showered the two dozen tomato plants tied to wooden stakes in 
the middle of the garden. 

Mindy hadn’t started yet. She was probably reading the ingredients on the 

can. 

“What’s all the fuss about?” my mother called, stepping out the back door. 
Mom was wearing one of her around-the-house outfits. A pair of Dad’s old 



baggy plaid shorts. And an old blue T-shirt he gave her when he came back from 
a business trip a few years ago. The T-shirt said “I Mist You!” One of Dad’s 
lame garden jokes. 

“Hi, honey,” Dad called. “We’re about to destroy a fruit fly. Want to 
watch?” 

Mom laughed, crinkling up the corners of her green eyes. “Pretty tempting. 
But I have to finish a greeting card design.” 

Mom is a graphic artist. She has an office on the second floor of our house. 
She can draw the most incredible pictures on her computer. Amazing sunsets, 
mountains, and flowers. 

“Dinner at seven-thirty, everybody. Okay?” 

“Sounds good,” Dad called as Mom disappeared into the house. “Okay, 
kids. Let’s finish spraying!” 

Dad and I showered the tomato plants one more time. We even sprayed the 
yellow squash plants nearby. Mindy squinted. Aimed the nozzle of her can 
directly at the Red Queen. And let out a single neat drizzle. 

One tiny fruit fly flapped its wings weakly and fell to the ground. Mindy 
smiled in satisfaction. 

“Good work!” Dad exclaimed. 

He clapped us both on the back. “I think this calls for a celebration!” he 
declared. “I have the perfect idea! A quick visit to Lawn Lovely!” 

“Oh, nooooo,” Mindy and I groaned together. 

Lawn Lovely is a store two blocks from our house. It’s the place where Dad 
buys his lawn ornaments. A lot of lawn ornaments. 

Dad is as nuts about lawn ornaments as he is about gardening. We have so 
many lawn ornaments in our front yard, it’s impossible to mow the lawn! 

What a crowd scene! We have two pink plastic flamingos. A cement angel 
with huge white wings. A chrome ball on a silver platform. A whole family of 
plaster skunks. A fountain with two kissing swans. A seal that balances a beach 
ball on its nose. And a chipped plaster deer. 

Weird, huh? 

But Dad really loves them. He thinks they’re art or something. 

And do you know what he does? He dresses them up on holidays. Pilgrim 
hats for the skunks on Thanksgiving. Pirate costumes for the flamingos on 
Halloween. Stove-pipe hats and little black beards for the swans on Lincoln’s 
birthday. 



Of course, neat and tidy Mindy can’t stand the lawn ornaments. Neither can 
Mom. Every time Dad brings a new one home, Mom threatens to toss it into the 
garbage. 

“Dad, these lawn ornaments are totally embarrassing!” Mindy complained. 
“People gawk from their cars and take pictures of our front yard. We’re a tourist 
attraction!” 

“Oh, please,” Dad groaned. “One person took a picture.” 

That was last Christmas. When Dad dressed all the ornaments as Santa’s 
helpers. 

“Yeah. And that picture ended up in the newspaper!” Mindy moaned. “It 
was soooo embarrassing.” 

“Well, I think the ornaments are cool,” I replied. Someone had to defend 
poor Dad. 

Mindy just wrinkled her nose in disgust. 

I know what really bugs Mindy about the ornaments. It’s the way Dad 
sticks them in the yard. Without any order. If Mindy had her way, they would be 
lined up like her shoes. In nice neat rows. 

“Come on, guys,” Dad urged, starting down the driveway. “Let’s go see if a 
new shipment of ornaments has come in.” 

We had no choice. 

Mindy and I trudged down the sidewalk after Dad. As we followed him, we 
thought—no big deal. It’s almost dinnertime. We’ll just glance over the 
ornaments at the store. Then we’ll go home. 

We had no idea we were about to start the most horrifying adventure of our 
lives. 



6 


“Can’t we drive, Dad?” Mindy complained as the three of us hiked up the steep 
Summit Avenue hill toward Lawn Lovely. “It’s too hot to walk.” 

“Oh, come on, Mindy. It’s only a couple of blocks. And it’s good exercise,” 
Dad replied, taking long, brisk strides. 

“But it’s sooooo hot,” Mindy whined. She brushed her bangs away from her 
face and blotted her forehead with her hand. 

Mindy was right. It was hot. But get serious. It was only a two-block walk. 

“I’m hotter than you are,” I teased. Then I leaned into Mindy and shook my 
sweaty head at her. “See?” 

A few small beads of sweat flew onto Mindy’s T-shirt. 

“You are so gross!” she shrieked, drawing back. “Dad! Tell him to stop 
being so disgusting.” 

“We’re almost there,” Dad replied. His voice sounded as if he were a 
million miles away. He was probably dreaming about buying his next lawn 
ornament. 

Just up the block, I spotted the tall, pointy roof of Lawn Lovely. It jutted 
into the sky, towering over all the houses around it. 

What a weird place, I thought. Lawn Lovely is in an old, raggedy three- 
story house, set back from the street. The whole building is painted pink. Bright 
pink. The windows are covered with brightly colored shutters. But none of the 
colors match. 

I think that’s another reason why Mindy hates this place. 

The old house is not in good shape. The wooden floorboards on the front 
porch are all sagging. And there is a hole in the porch where Mr. McCall fell 
through last summer. 

As we marched past the flagpole in the front yard, I spotted Mrs. Anderson 
in the driveway. She owns Lawn Lovely. She lives there, too. On the second and 
third floors. 

Mrs. Anderson kneeled over a flock of pink plastic flamingos. She was 
ripping off their plastic wrap and setting them in crooked rows on her lawn. 

Mrs. Anderson reminds me of a flamingo. She’s real skinny and wears pink 
all the time. Even her hair is sort of pink. Like cotton candy. 



Lawn ornaments are the only things Mrs. Anderson sells. Plaster squirrels. 
Kissing angels. Pink rabbits with wire whiskers. Long green worms wearing 
little black hats. A whole flock of white geese. She has hundreds of ornaments. 
Scattered all over her yard. Up the front steps to the porch. And right through the 
door into the entire first floor of the house. 

Mrs. Anderson carefully unwrapped another flamingo and set it down next 
to a deer. She studied this arrangement, then moved the deer about an inch to the 
left. 

“Hello, Lilah!” my dad called out. 

Mrs. Anderson didn’t answer. She’s a little hard of hearing. 

“Hello, Lilah!” Dad repeated, cupping his hands around his mouth like a 
megaphone. 

Mrs. Anderson raised her head from the flamingos. And beamed at my dad. 
“Jeffrey!” she cried. “How nice to see you.” 

Mrs. Anderson is always friendly to Dad. Mom says he’s her best customer. 

Maybe her only customer! 

“It’s nice to see you, too,” Dad replied. He rubbed his hands together 
eagerly and gazed around the lawn. 

Mrs. Anderson stuck one last flamingo into the ground. She made her way 
over to us, wiping her hands on her pink T-shirt. 

“Do you have something special in mind today?” she asked my father. 

“Our deer is a little lonesome,” he explained, shouting so that she could 
hear him. “I think it needs company.” 

“Really, Dad. We don’t need any more lawn ornaments,” Mindy begged. 
“Mom will be furious.” 

Mrs. Anderson smiled. “Oh, a Lawn Lovely lawn always has room for one 
more! Right, Jeffrey?” 

“Right!” Dad declared. 

Mindy pressed her lips together tightly. She rolled her eyes for the 
hundredth time that day. 

Dad hurried over to a herd of wide-eyed plaster deer, standing in the corner 
of the yard. We followed him. 

The deer stood about four feet tall. White spots dotted their reddish-brown 
bodies. 

Very lifelike. Very boring. 

He studied the deer for a few seconds. Then something caught his eye. 



Two squat gnomes standing in the middle of the lawn. 

“Well, well, what have we here?” Dad murmured, smiling. I could see his 
eyes light up. He bent down to examine the gnomes. 

Mrs. Anderson clapped her hands together. “Jeffrey, you have a wonderful 
eye for lawn ornaments!” she exclaimed. “I knew you’d appreciate the gnomes! 
They were carved in Europe. Very fine work.” 

I stared at the gnomes. They looked like little old men. They were about 
three feet tall and very chubby. With piercing red eyes and large pointy ears. 

Their mouths curved up in wide, silly grins. And coarse brown hair 
sprouted from their heads. 

Each gnome wore a bright green short-sleeved shirt, brown leggings, and a 
tall, pointy orange hat. Both wore black belts tied tightly around their chubby 
waists. 

“They’re terrific!” Dad gushed. “Oh, kids. Aren’t they wonderful?” 

“They’re okay, Dad,” I said. 

“Okay?” Mindy shouted. “They’re horrible ! They’re so gross! They look 
so... so evil. I hate them!” 

“Hey, you’re right, Mindy,” I said. “They are pretty gross. They look just 
like you!” 

“Joe, you are the biggest—” Mindy started. But Dad interrupted her. 

“We’ll take them!” he cried. 

“Dad—no!” Mindy howled. “They’re hideous! Buy a deer. Buy another 
flamingo. But not these ugly old gnomes. Look at the awful colors. Look at 
those evil grins. They’re too creepy!” 

“Oh, Mindy. Don’t be silly. They’re perfect!” Dad exclaimed. “We’ll have 
so much fun with them. We’ll dress them as ghosts for Halloween. In Santa suits 
at Christmas. They look just like Santa’s elves.” 

Dad pulled out his credit card. He and Mrs. Anderson started toward the 
pink house to complete the sale. “I’ll be back in a minute,” he called. 

“These are the ugliest yet,” Mindy groaned, turning to me. “They’re 
completely embarrassing. I’ll never be able to bring any of my friends over 
again.” 

Then she stomped off toward the sidewalk. 

I couldn’t take my eyes away from the gnomes. They were kind of ugly. 
And even though they were smiling, there was something unfriendly about their 
smiles. Something cold about their glassy red eyes. 



“Whoa! Mindy! Look!” I cried. “One of the gnomes just moved!” 

Mindy slowly turned to face me. 

My wrist was held tightly in the chubby hand. I twisted and squirmed. Tried 
to tug free. 

“Let go!” I squealed. “Let go of me! Mindy—hurry!” 

“I—I’m coming!” she cried. 



7 


Mindy came racing across the yard. 

She leaped over the flamingos and sprinted around the deer. 

“Hurry!” I moaned, stretching my left arm out toward her. “He’s hurting 

me!” 

But as my sister came near, her face twisted in fright, I couldn’t keep a 
straight face any longer. I burst out laughing. 

“Gotcha! Gotcha!” I shrieked. I danced away from the plaster gnome. 

Mindy swung around to slug me. Swung and missed. 

“Did you really believe that gnome grabbed me?” I cried. “Are you totally 
losing it?” 

She didn’t have time to reply. Dad came jogging down the pink porch steps. 
“Time to bring our little guys home,” he announced, grinning. 

He stopped and stared down happily at the ugly gnomes. “But let’s name 
them first.” Dad names all of our lawn ornaments. 

Mindy let out a loud groan. Dad ignored her. 

He patted one of the gnomes on the head. “Let’s call this one Hap. Because 
he looks so happy! I’ll carry Hap. You kids take...” 

He stopped and squinted at the other gnome. There was a small chip on the 
gnome’s front tooth. “Chip. Yep, we’ll call this one Chip.” 

Dad hoisted Hap into his arms. “Whoaaa. He’s an armful!” He made his 
way toward the driveway, staggering under the gnome’s weight. 

Mindy studied Chip. “You take the feet. I’ll grab the top,” she ordered. 
“Come on. One, two, three... lift!” 

I stooped down and grabbed the gnome by its legs. Its heavy red boot 
scraped my arm. I let out a cry. 

“Quit complaining,” Mindy ordered. “At least you don’t have this stupid 
pointy hat sticking in your face.” 

We struggled down the hill, following Dad. 

Mindy and I inched forward, struggling side by side. “Everyone in the 
neighborhood is gawking at us,” Mindy moaned. 

They were. Two girls from Mindy’s school, wheeling their bikes up the hill, 
stopped and stared. Then they burst out laughing. 



Mindy’s pale face grew as red as one of Dad’s tomatoes. “I’ll never live this 
down,” she grumbled. “Come on, Joe. Walk faster.” 

I jiggled Chip’s legs to make Mindy lose her grip. But the only thing she 
lost was her temper. “Quit it, Joe,” she snapped. “And hold your end up higher.” 

As we neared our house, Mr. McCall spotted us trudging up the block. He 
stopped pruning his shrubs to admire our little parade. 

“More lawn ornaments, Jeffrey?” he called out to Dad. I could hear him 
chuckling. 

Mr. McCall is mean to Mindy and me. But he and Dad get along fine. 
They’re always kidding each other about their gardens. 

Mrs. McCall poked her head out the front door. “Cute!” she called out, 
smiling at us from under her white baseball cap. “Come on in, Bill. Your brother 
is on the phone.” 

Mr. McCall set his pruning sheers down and went inside. 

We lugged Chip past the McCall driveway and followed Dad into our front 

yard. 

“Over here!” Dad instructed as he set Hap down in the far corner of the 
yard. Next to Deer-lilah. Deer-lilah is the deer. Dad named her after Lilah from 
Lawn Lovely. 

With our last bit of strength, we dragged Chip over to Dad. These gnomes 
were heavy. They weighed a lot more than our other ornaments. 

Mindy and I plopped the gnome down on the grass and collapsed in the dirt 
next to him. 

Whistling happily, Dad set Chip on one side of the deer. And Hap on the 
other. 

He stepped back to study them. “What cheerful little guys!” he declared. 
“I’ve got to show your mom. She won’t be able to resist them! They’re too cute 
to hate!” 

He hurried across the lawn and into the house. 

“Yo!” I heard a familiar cry from next door. Moose jogged across his 
driveway. “I hear you have some ugly new lawn things.” 

He charged up to the gnomes and stared. “Way ugly,” he boomed. 

Moose leaned down and stuck his tongue out at Hap. “You want to fight, 
shrimp?” he asked the little statue. “Take that!” He pretended to punch Hap in 
his chubby chest. 

“Wreck the runt!” I cried. 



Moose grabbed the gnome around his waist and gave him a dozen quick 
punches. 

I scrambled to my feet. “I’ll wipe that ugly grin off your face!” I yelled at 
Chip. I closed my hands around the gnome’s neck and pretended to choke him. 

“Watch this!” Moose shot out a thick leg and karate-kicked Hap in his small 
pointy hat. The squat figure wobbled. 

“Careful! Stop messing around!” Mindy warned. “You’re going to break 
them.” 

“Okay,” I said. “Let’s tickle them!” 

“Tickle, tickle!” Moose squeaked as he tickled Hap under the armpits. 

“You’re a riot, Moose,” Mindy declared. “Areal—” 

Moose and I waited for Mindy to finish insulting us. But instead, she 
pointed to the McCalls’ garden and screamed, “Oh, no! Buster!” 

Moose and I spun around and spied Buster. In the middle of Mr. McCall’s 
garden, pawing away at the green stalks. 

“Buster! No!” I screamed. 

I grabbed the dog whistle and raised it to my mouth. But before I could 
blow, Mr. McCall exploded out of his front door! 

“That stupid mutt again!” he shouted, waving his arms wildly. “Get out of 
here! Shoo!” 

Buster whimpered, turned, and trotted back to our yard, head down, stumpy 
tail between his legs. 

Uh-oh, I thought, studying Mr. McCall’s angry face. We’re in for trouble 

now. 

But before Mr. McCall could start lecturing us, Dad pushed the front door 
open. “Kids, your mother says that dinner is almost ready.” 

“Jeffrey, are you deliberately sending that mutt over to ruin my melons?” 
Mr. McCall called. 

Dad grinned. “Buster can’t help it,” he replied. “He keeps mistaking your 
melons for golf balls! ” 

“Are those tomatoes you’re growing?” Moose’s dad shot back. “Or are they 
olives?” 

“Didn’t you see the tomato I rolled into the house yesterday?” Dad replied. 
“I had to use a wheelbarrow!” 

Buster danced around the yard. I think somehow he knew he had escaped 
big trouble. 



We started for the house. But I stopped when I heard a heavy thud. 

I whirled around to discover Hap lying face down in the grass. 

Buster busily licked his face. 

“Bad dog,” Dad scolded. I don’t think Dad likes Buster any more than Mr. 
McCall does. “Did you knock that gnome over? Get away from there!” 

“Buster—come here, boy!” I called. But he ignored me and licked at the 
face more furiously than ever. 

I brought my dog whistle to my lips and gave one quick short blow. Buster 
raised his head, alert to the sound. He forgot about the plaster gnome and trotted 
over to me. 

“Joe, pick Hap up, will you?” Dad demanded, annoyed. 

Mindy held onto Buster. I grabbed the gnome by his shoulders and slowly 
heaved him to his feet. Then I checked for damage. 

Legs. Arms. Neck. Everything seemed okay. 

I raised my eyes to Hap’s face. 

And jumped back in surprise. 

I blinked a few times. And stared at the gnome again. 

“I—I don’t believe it!” I murmured. 



8 


The gnome’s smile had vanished. 

Its mouth stood open wide, as if trying to scream. 

“Hey—!” I choked out. 

“What’s wrong?” Dad called. “Is it broken?” 

“Its smile!” I cried. “Its smile is gone! It looks scared or something!” 

Dad jumped down the steps and ran over. Moose and Mr. McCall joined 

him. 

Mindy walked slowly in my direction, with a suspicious scowl on her face. 
She probably thought I was playing another joke. 

“See?” I cried as everyone gathered around me. “It’s unbelievable!” 

“Ha-ha! Good one, Joe!” Moose burst out. He punched me in the shoulder. 
“Pretty funny.” 

“Huh?” I lowered my eyes to the little figure. 

Hap’s lips were curved up in a grin. The same silly grin he always wore. 
The terrified expression had disappeared. 

Dad let out a hearty laugh. “Good acting job, Joe,” he said. “You really 
fooled us all.” 

“Maybe your son should be an actor,” Mr. McCall said, scratching his head. 
“He didn’t fool me,” Mindy bragged. “That one was lame. Really lame.” 
What had happened? Had I imagined that open mouth? 

Mr. McCall turned to Buster. “Listen, Jeffrey,” he started. “I’m serious 
about that dog of yours. If he comes into my garden again...” 

“If Buster goes over there again, I promise we’ll tie him up,” Dad replied. 
“Aw, Dad,” I said. “You know Buster hates to be tied up. He hates it!” 
“Sorry, kids,” Dad said, turning to go inside. “That’s it. Buster gets one 
more chance.” 

I bent down to pet Buster’s head. “Only one more chance, boy,” I 
whispered in his ear. “Did you hear that? You only get one more chance.” 

I woke up the next morning and squinted at the clock radio on my night table. 
Eight A.M. Tuesday. The second day of summer vacation. Excellent! 



I threw on my purple-and-white Vikings jersey and my gym shorts and ran 
downstairs. Time to mow the lawn. 

Dad and I had an agreement. If I mowed the lawn once a week all summer, 
Dad would buy me a new bike. 

I knew exactly which model I wanted, too. Twenty-one gears and really fat 
tires. The coolest mountain bike ever. I’d be able to fly over boulders! 

I let myself out the front door and raised my face to the warm morning sun. 
It felt pretty good. The grass shimmered, still covered with dew. 

“Joe!” I heard a loud bellow. 

Mr. McCall’s bellow. “Get over here!” 

Mr. McCall leaned over his vegetable patch. An angry red vein throbbed in 
his forehead. 

Oh, no, I thought as I edged toward him. What now? 

“I’ve had it,” he roared. “If you don’t tie that dog up, I’m calling the police! 
I mean it!” 

Mr. McCall pointed to the ground. One of his casaba melons lay in the dirt, 
broken into jagged pieces. Melon seeds were scattered everywhere. And most of 
the orange fruit had been eaten away. 

I opened my mouth, but no sound came out. I didn’t know what to say. 
Lucky for me, Dad showed up just in time. He was on his way to work. 

“Is my son giving you some gardening advice, Bill?” he asked. 

“No jokes today!” Mr. McCall snapped. He scooped up the broken pieces of 
melon and shoved them in my dad’s face. “See what your wild dog has done! 
Now I have only four melons left!” 

Dad turned to me. His expression grew stern. “I warned you, Joe! I told you 
to keep the dog in our yard.” 

“But Buster didn’t do this,” I protested. “He doesn’t even like melons!” 

Buster skulked around behind the flamingos. His ears drooped flat against 
his head. His tail hung low between his legs. He looked really guilty. 

“Well, who else could have done it?” Mr. McCall demanded. 

Dad shook his head. “Joe, I want you to tie Buster up in the back. Now!” 

I saw that I had no choice. No way I could argue. 

“Okay, Dad,” I mumbled. I shuffled across the lawn and grabbed Buster’s 
collar. I hauled him to the corner of the back yard and sat him next to his red 
cedar doghouse. “Stay!” I commanded. 

I rummaged through the garage until I found a long piece of rope. Then I 



tied Buster to the tall oak tree next to his doghouse. 

Buster whimpered. He really hates being tied up. 

“I’m sorry, boy,” I whispered. “I know you didn’t eat that melon.” 

Buster pricked up his ears as Dad came around back to make sure I had tied 
the dog up. “It’s just as well that Buster is tied up today,” he said. “The painters 
are starting on the house this afternoon. Buster would only be in their way.” 

“Painters?” I asked in surprise. Nobody told me that painters were coming. 
I hate the smell of paint! 

Dad nodded. “They’re going to paint over that faded yellow,” he said, 
pointing to the house. “We’re having the house painted white with black trim.” 

“Dad, about Buster...” I started. 

Dad held up a hand to silence me. “I have to get to work. Keep him tied up. 
We’ll talk later.” I watched him make his way to the garage. 

This is all Mr. McCall’s fault, I thought. All of it! After Dad drove away, I 
stamped angrily into the garage and grabbed the lawn mower. I pushed the 
mower around the side of the house and into the front yard. Mindy sat on the 
front steps, reading. I rammed the mower forward. 

“I hate Mr. McCall!” I exclaimed. I shoved the mower around a flamingo. I 
felt like slicing off its skinny legs. “He is such a jerk. I’d like to smash the other 
four stupid melons!” I cried. “I’d love to wreck them all so Mr. McCall will 
leave us alone!” 

“Joe, get a grip,” Mindy called, peering up from her book. 

After I finished mowing, I ran into the house and grabbed a large plastic 
bag for the grass clippings. When I came back out, Moose was sprawled on our 
lawn. Several brightly colored plastic rings lay scattered on the grass around 
him. 

“Think fast!” he cried. He hurled a blue plastic ring at me. I dropped the 
bag and leaped for it. 

“Nice catch!” he said, scrambling to his feet. “How about a game of ring 
toss? We’ll use the gnomes’ pointy hats.” 

“How about using Mindy’s pointy head?” I replied. 

“You are so immature,” Mindy said. She stood and walked to the door. “I’m 
going to find some place quiet to read.” 

Moose handed me a few rings. He flung a purple one toward Hap. The ring 
slid neatly around the gnome’s hat. 

“What a throw!” he exclaimed. 



I took a ring and spun around like a discus thrower. I tossed two yellow 
rings at Chip. They slapped against the gnome’s fat face and slipped to the grass. 

Moose chuckled. “You throw like Mindy. Watch me!” He leaned forward 
and hurled two rings. They settled neatly around Chip’s pointy hat. 

“Yes!” Moose cried. He flexed his bulging muscles. “Super Moose rules 
again!” 

We tossed the rest of the rings. Moose beat me. But only by two points— 
ten to eight. 

“Rematch!” I cried. “Let’s play again!” 

I dashed over to the gnomes and gathered up the rings. As I pulled a 
handful from Chip’s hat, I stared into his face. 

And gasped. 

What was that? 

A seed. 

An orange seed about half an inch long. 

Stuck between the gnome’s fat lips. 



9 


“Is that a melon seed?” I asked, my voice trembling. 

“A what?” Moose stomped up behind me. 

“A melon seed,” I repeated. 

Moose shook his head. He clapped a big hand against my shoulder. “You’re 
seeing things,” he declared. “Come on, let’s play!” 

I pointed to Chip’s mouth. “I’m not seeing things. There! Right there! Don’t 
you see it?” 

Moose’s gaze followed my finger. “Yeah. I see a seed. So what?” 

“It’s a casaba melon seed, Moose. Like the ones scattered on the ground.” 

How could a casaba seed find its way into Chip’s mouth? 

There had to be an explanation. A simple explanation. 

I thought hard. I couldn’t think of one. 

I brushed the seed from the gnome’s lips and watched it flutter to the grass. 

Then I stared at the gnome’s grinning face. Into those cold, flat eyes. 

And the gnome stared back at me. I shivered in the heat. 

How did that seed get there? I wondered. How? 

I dreamed about melons that night. I dreamed that a casaba melon grew in our 
front yard. Grew and grew and grew. Bigger than our house. 

Something startled me out of my melon dream. I fumbled for my alarm 
clock. One A.M. 

Then I heard a howl. Alow, mournful howl. Outside the house. 

I jumped out of bed and hurried to the window. I peered into the shadowy 
front yard. The lawn ornaments stood in silence. 

I heard the howl again. Louder. Longer. 

It was Buster. My poor dog. Tied up in the back yard. 

I crept out of my room and down the dark hall. The house was quiet. I 
started down the carpeted stairs. 

A step squeaked under my foot. I jumped, startled. 

A second later, I heard another creak. 

My legs were shaking. 



Cool it, Joe, I told myself. It’s only the steps. 

I tiptoed through the darkened living room and into the kitchen. I heard 
low, rustling sound behind me. My heart started to pound. 

I whirled around. 

Nothing there. 

You’re hearing things, I told myself. 

I stumbled forward in the dark. Closed my hand around the doorknob. 

And two powerful hands grabbed me from behind! 



10 


“Where do you think you’re going?” 

Mindy! 

I breathed a sigh of relief. And yanked myself away from her grasp. 

“I’m going for a midnight snack,” I whispered, rubbing my neck. “I’m 
going to eat the rest of Mr. McCall’s stupid melons.” 

I pretended to cram my mouth full and chew. “Yum! Casabas. I need more 
casabas!” 

“Joe! You’d better not!” Mindy whispered in alarm. 

“Hey, I’m kidding,” I said. “Buster is howling like crazy. I’m going out to 
calm him down.” 

Mindy yawned. “If Mom and Dad catch you sneaking out in the middle of 
the night...” 

“It’ll just take a few minutes.” I stepped outside. The damp night air sent a 
small chill down my back. I gazed up at the starless night sky. 

Buster’s pitiful howls rose from the back. 

“I’m coming,” I called in a loud whisper. “It’s okay, boy.” 

Buster’s howls dropped to quiet whimpers. 

I took a step forward. Something rustled through the grass. I froze in place. 
And squinted into the darkness. Two small figures scampered by the side of the 
house. They scraped across the yard and disappeared into the night. 

Probably raccoons. 

Raccoons? 

That’s the answer! The raccoons must have eaten Mr. McCall’s melon. I 
wanted to wake up Dad and tell him. But I decided to wait till morning. 

I felt much better. That meant that Buster could be set free. I made my way 
over to Buster and sat next to him on the dew-wet grass. 

“Buster,” I whispered. “I’m here.” 

His big brown eyes drooped sadly. I threw my arms around his furry neck. 
“You won’t be tied up for long, Buster,” I promised. “You’ll see. I’ll tell Dad 
about the raccoons first thing in the morning.” 

Buster licked my hand gratefully. “And tomorrow I’ll take you for a long 
walk,” I whispered. “How’s that, boy? Now go to sleep.” 



I slipped back inside the house and jumped into bed. I felt good. I had 
solved the mystery of the melon. Our troubles with Mr. McCall were over, I 
thought. 

But I thought wrong. 

Our troubles were just beginning. 

“I don’t believe it! I don’t believe it!” Mr. McCall’s cries cut through the quiet 
morning, waking me from my heavy sleep. 

I rubbed my eyes and glanced at the clock radio. Six-thirty A.M. 

What’s all the screaming about? 

I hopped out of bed and hurried downstairs, yawning and stretching. Mom, 
Dad, and Mindy were at the front door, still in pajamas and robes. 

“What’s happening?” I asked. 

“It’s Bill!” Dad cried. “Come on!” 

We piled outside and stared into our neighbors’ garden. 

Mr. McCall hung over his vegetable patch in a tattered blue-and-white- 
checkered robe. He grabbed frantically at his casaba melons, screaming. 

Moose and his mother stood behind Mr. McCall in their robes, wide-eyed 
and silent. Instead of her usual friendly smile, Moose’s mom wore a grim frown. 

Mr. McCall lifted his head from the garden. “Ruined!” he roared. “They’re 
totally ruined!” 

“Oh, boy,” Dad muttered. “We’d better get over there, Marion.” He started 
across our front lawn. Mom, Mindy, and I followed. 

“Take it easy, Bill,” my dad said calmly as he stepped into the McCalls’ 
front yard. “Nothing is worth getting so upset about.” 

“Easy? Take it easy?” Mr. McCall shrieked. The vein in his forehead 
throbbed. 

The raccoons, I thought. They attacked the casabas again. I’ve got to tell 
Dad. Now. Before Buster gets blamed for this, too. 

Mr. McCall cradled his four casaba melons in his hands. They were still 
attached to the vine. 

“I came out to water my casabas and I found this... this...” He was too 
upset to finish. He held the melons out to us. 

“Whoa!” I cried in amazement. 

No raccoon could have done this. 

No way. 



Someone had taken a black marker and drawn big, sloppy smiley faces on 
each melon! 

My sister shoved me aside to get a good look. 

“Joe!” she shrieked. “That’s horrible. How could you!” 



11 


“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall demanded. 

“Yes, Mindy, what are you talking about?” Mom asked. 

“I caught Joe sneaking outside last night,” Mindy replied. “In the middle of 
the night. He told me he wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.” 

Everyone turned to stare at me in horror. Even Moose, my best friend. Mr. 
McCall’s face was as red as a tomato again. I saw him clenching and 
unclenching his fists. 

Everyone stared at me in shocked silence. The smiley faces on the melons 
stared at me, too. 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

Before I could explain, Dad exploded. “Joe, I think you owe us an 
explanation. What were you doing outside in the middle of the night?” 

I felt my face grow red-hot with anger. “I went out to calm Buster down,” I 
insisted. “He was howling. I didn’t touch the melons. I would never do anything 
like that. I was only joking when I told Mindy I wanted to wreck them!” 

“Well, this is no joke!” Dad exclaimed angrily. “You are grounded for the 
week!” 

“But, Dad—!” I pleaded. “I didn’t draw on those melons!” 

“Make that two weeks!” he snapped. “And I think you should mow Mr. 
McCall’s grass and water his garden all month. As an apology.” 

“Whoa, Jeffrey,” Mr. McCall interrupted. “I don’t want your son—or your 
dog—in my garden again. Ever.” 

He rubbed the casaba melons with his huge fingers, trying to erase the ugly 
black stains. “I hope this comes off,” he muttered. “Because if it doesn’t, Jeffrey, 
I’ll sue. Believe me, I will!” 

Two hours after the melon disaster, I sprawled on the floor of my room. 
Grounded. With nothing to do. 

I couldn’t play with Buster in the yard. Because the painters were outside. 

So I stayed in my room and reread all of my Super Gamma Man comic 
books. 

I ordered a glob of rubber vomit from the Joker’s Wild catalog for five 



dollars. That’s most of my weekly allowance. Then I sneaked into Mindy’s room 
and mixed up all the clothes in her closet. No more colors in rainbow order. 

When I had finished, it still wasn’t even noon. 

What a totally boring day, I thought, as I wandered downstairs. 

“Hand me the yellow, please,” Mindy’s voice rang out from the den. 

I crept toward the door and peeked in. Mindy and her best friend, Heidi, sat 
cross-legged on the floor. They were decorating T-shirts with fabric paint. 

Heidi is almost as annoying as Mindy. Something is always bothering her. 
She’s too cold. Or too hot. Or her stomach hurts. Or her shoelaces are too tight. 

I watched silently as the two girls worked. Heidi drew a silver collar on a 
large purple cat. 

Mindy hunched over in concentration and slowly outlined a large yellow 
flower. 

I leaped into the den. “Boo!” I screamed. 

“Yaii!” Heidi shrieked. 

Mindy jumped up, smearing a big yellow blotch on her red shorts. “You 
jerk!” she cried. “See what you made me do!” 

She scraped at the paint with her fingernails. “Beat it, Joe,” she ordered. 
“We’re busy.” 

“Well, I’m not,” I replied. “Thanks to you, Miss Snitch.” 

“It was your bright idea to draw faces on those melons,” she snarled. “Not 
mine.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” I insisted. 

Mindy counted off the evidence on her fingers. 

“You were up in the middle of the night. You went out in the yard. And you 
told me you wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.” 

“I was joking!” I exclaimed. “Don’t you know what a joke is? You should 
try making one sometime.” 

Heidi stretched out her arms. “I’m hot,” she said. “Why don’t we go to the 
pool? We can finish our shirts later.” 

Mindy fixed her eyes on me. “Joe, do you want to go with us?” she asked in 
a sweet voice. “Whoops. I forgot. You’re grounded.” Then she burst out 
laughing. 

I turned and left the two girls in the den. I have to get out of this house, I 
thought. 

I headed for the kitchen. Mom and the painter huddled together at the 



counter, checking paint swatches. 

“We want the onyx black for the trim. Not the pitch black,” she instructed, 
tapping the swatches. “I think you brought the wrong paint.” 

I tugged on her sleeve. “Mom. Buster’s really bored. Can I take him for a 
walk?” 

“Of course not,” she replied quickly. “You’re grounded.” 

“Please,” I begged. “Buster needs a walk. And that paint smell is making 
me sick.” I held my stomach and made gagging sounds. 

The painter shifted impatiently from foot to foot. “Okay, okay,” Mom said. 
“Take the dog.” 

“Excellent! Thanks, Mom!” I cried. I darted through the kitchen and into 
the back yard. “Good news, Buster,” I exclaimed. “We’re free!” 

Buster wagged his stumpy tail. I untied the long rope and clipped a short 
leash to his collar. 

We walked about two miles. All the way down to Buttermilk Pond. That’s 
our favorite stick-chasing spot. 

I tossed a fat stick into the water. Buster plunged into the cold pond and 
fetched it. We did that over and over until it was three o’clock. Time to go home. 

On the way back to the house, we stopped at the Creamy Cow. They have 
the best ice cream in town. 

I used the last bit of my allowance to treat us both to double-dip chocolate- 
chip cookie dough cones. Buster liked the cookie dough, but he left all the 
chocolate chips on the ground. 

After we finished our ice cream, we continued home. Buster pulled at his 
leash excitedly as we strolled up the driveway. He seemed really happy to be 
back. 

He dragged me into the front yard and sniffed everything. The evergreen 
bushes. The flamingos. The deer. The gnomes. 

The gnomes. 

Was something different about the gnomes? 

I dropped Buster’s leash and bent down for a closer look. 

I studied their fat little hands. What were those dark smudges on their 
fingertips. Dirt? 

I rubbed their chubby fingers. But the smudges remained. 

No. Not dirt. 

I leaned in closer. 



Paint. Black paint. 



12 


Black paint. The same color as the smiley faces on Mr. McCall’s casabas! 

I swallowed hard. What’s going on here? I wondered. How could the 
gnomes’ hands be covered in paint? 

I’ve got to show someone, I decided. 

Mom! She’s in the house. She’ll help me figure this out. 

As I reached our front door, I heard a scraping sound coming from the 
McCalls’ yard. 

“Buster! No!” I shouted. 

Buster circled Mr. McCall’s vegetable patch, his leash dragging behind him. 

I quickly shoved my hand under my T-shirt and yanked out my dog whistle. 
I blew it hard. 

Buster trotted right back to me. 

“Good boy!” I cried in relief. I shook my finger in his face. I tried to be 
stern. “Buster, if you don’t want to be tied up, you have to stay out of that 
garden!” 

Buster licked my finger with his long, sticky tongue. Then he turned to lick 
the gnomes. 

I watched Buster slobber all over them. 

“Oh, no!” I cried. “Not again!” 

Chip’s and Hap’s mouths gaped wide open. In the same terrified 
expressions I had seen before. As if they were trying to scream. 

I slammed my eyes shut. I opened one slowly. 

The terrified expressions remained. 

What was going on here? Were the gnomes afraid of Buster? Was I going 
crazy? 

My hands trembled as I quickly tied Buster to the tree. Then I ran into the 
house to search for Mom. 

“Mom! Mom!” I panted breathlessly. I found her upstairs, working in her 
office. “You’ve got to come outside! Now!” 

Mom whirled around from her computer. “What’s wrong?” she demanded. 

“It’s the gnomes!” I cried. “There’s black paint on their hands. And they’re 



not grinning anymore. Come out. You’ll see!” 

Mom slowly shoved her chair away from the computer. “Joe, if this is 
another joke...” 

“Please, Mom. It will just take a second. It’s not a joke. Really!” 

Mom led the way downstairs. She gazed at the gnomes from the front door. 

“See?” I cried, standing behind her. “I told you! Look at their faces. They 
look like they’re screaming!” 

Mom narrowed her eyes. “Joe, give me a break. Why did you get me away 
from my work? They have the same dumb grins they always have.” 

“What?” I gasped. I ran outside. I stared at the gnomes. 

They stared back at me. Grinning. 

“Joe, I really wish you’d stop the dumb gnome jokes,” Mom said sharply. 
“They’re not funny. Not funny at all.” 

“But look at the paint on their fingers!” 

“That’s just dirt,” she said impatiently. “Please, go read a book. Or clean 
your room. Find something to do. You’re driving me crazy!” 

I sat down on the grass. Alone. To think. 

I thought about the casaba seed on one of the gnome’s lips. I remembered 
the first time their mouths had twisted in horror. That was the first time Buster 
had licked them. 

And now they had paint on their fingers. 

It all added up. 

The gnomes are alive, I decided. 

And they’re doing horrible things in the McCalls’ garden. 

The gnomes? Doing horrible things? I must be losing my mind! 

Suddenly, I didn’t feel too well. Nothing made any sense. 

I stood up to go inside. 

And heard whispers. 

Gruff whispers. Down at my feet. 

“Not funny, Joe,” Hap whispered. 

“Not funny at all,” Chip rasped. 



13 


Should I tell Mom and Dad what I heard? I wondered as we ate dinner that 
night. 

“How was everyone’s day?” Dad asked cheerfully. He spooned some peas 
onto his dinner plate. 

They’ll never believe me. 

“Heidi and I rode our bikes to the pool,” Mindy piped up. She arranged a 
mound of tuna casserole on her plate into a neat square. Then she flicked a stray 
pea away. “But she got a cramp in her leg, so we mostly sunbathed.” 

I have to tell. 

“I heard something really weird this afternoon,” I burst out. “Really, really 
weird.” 

“You interrupted me!” Mindy said sharply. She blotted her mouth carefully 
with her napkin. 

“But this is important!” I exclaimed. I started shredding my napkin 
nervously. “I was in the front yard. All alone. And I heard whispers.” 

I made my voice low and gruff. “The voices said, ‘Not funny, Joe. Not 
funny.’ I don’t know who it was. Nobody was there. I... uh... think it was the 
gnomes.” 

Mom banged her glass of lemonade down on the table. “Enough with these 
gnome jokes!” she declared. “No one thinks they’re funny, Joe.” 

“But it’s true!” I cried, crushing my shredded napkin into a ball. “I heard 
the voices!” 

Mindy uttered a scornful laugh. “You are so lame,” she said. “Please pass 
the bread, Dad.” 

“Sure, honey,” Dad replied, handing her the wooden tray of dinner rolls. 

And that was the end of that. 

After dinner, Dad suggested that we water the tomatoes. 

“Okay,” I replied with a shrug. Anything to get out of the house. 

“Want me to get the Bug Be Gone?” I asked as we stepped outside. 

“No! No!” he gasped. His face turned ghostly pale. 

“What’s wrong, Dad? What is it?” 



He pointed silently at the tomato patch. 

“Ohhh,” I moaned. “Oh, no!” 

Our beautiful red tomatoes had been crushed, mangled, and maimed—seeds 
and pulpy red tomato flesh everywhere. 

Dad stared openmouthed, his hands balled into fists. “Who would do such a 
terrible thing?” he sighed. 

My heart began to throb. My pulse raced. 

I knew the truth. And now everyone would have to believe me. 

“The gnomes did it, Dad!” I grabbed the sleeve of his shirt and began 
tugging him to the front yard. “You’ll see. I’ll prove it!” 

“Joe, let go of me. This is no time for jokes. Don’t you realize that we’re 
out of the garden show? We’ve lost our chance for a blue ribbon! Or any ribbon, 
for that matter.” 

“You have to believe me, Dad. Come on.” I held tightly onto Dad’s sleeve. 
And I wouldn’t let go. 

As I dragged him out front, I wondered what we would find. 

Blood-red tomato juice smeared all over their ugly faces? 

Squishy pulp hanging from their tiny fat fingers? 

Hundreds of seeds stuck to their creepy little feet? 

We approached the gnomes. 

My eyes narrowed on the hideous creatures. 

And finally we stood right before them. 

And I couldn’t believe what we found. 



14 


Nothing. 

No juice. 

No pulp. 

Not a single seed. Not one. 

I searched their bodies. Frantically. From their ugly, grinning faces to their 
creepy, stubby toes. 

No clues. Nothing. 

How could I have been wrong? My stomach lurched as I turned to face my 

dad. 

“Dad...” I started in a shaky voice. 

Dad cut me off with an angry wave of his hand. “There’s nothing to see 
here, Joe,” he muttered. “I don’t want to hear another word about the gnomes. 
Understand? Not one!” 

His brown eyes flashed with fury. “I know who’s responsible for this!” he 
said bitterly. “And he’s not going to get away with it!” 

He whirled around and trotted into the back yard. He scooped up a handful 
of smashed tomato. 

The juice oozed between his fingers as he circled the house and charged 
next door. 

I watched Dad march up the McCalls’ steps and jab at the doorbell. He 
began howling before anyone answered the ring. “Bill! Come out here. Now!” 

I crouched behind Dad. I’d never seen him this angry before. 

I heard the lock turn. The door swung open. And there stood Mr. McCall. In 
a white jogging outfit. Holding a half-eaten pork chop in one hand. 

“Jeffrey, what are you yelling about? It’s difficult to digest with all this 
noise.” He chuckled. 

“Well, digest this!” Dad screamed. Then he brought his hand up and hurled 
the smashed tomatoes. 

They splattered against Mr. McCall’s white T-shirt and dribbled down his 
white sweatpants. Some of the mushy pulp landed on his clean white sneakers. 

Mr. McCall stared down at his clothes in total disbelief. “Are you nuts?” he 
bellowed. 



“No. You are!” my father shrieked. “How could you do this? For a stupid 
blue ribbon!” 

“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall shouted. 

“Oh, I see. Now you’re going to play innocent. You’re going to pretend you 
don’t know anything. Well, you’re not going to get away with this.” 

Mr. McCall stomped down the steps and planted himself about an inch 
away from my dad. He puffed out his broad chest and hung over my father 
menacingly. 

“I didn’t touch your lousy tomatoes!” he roared. “You wimp! You probably 
bought your blue-ribbon tomatoes last year.” 

Dad shook an angry fist in Mr. McCall’s glaring face. “My tomatoes were 
the best at the show! Yours looked like raisins next to mine! And whoever heard 
of growing casabas in Minnesota, anyway? You’re going to be the joke of the 
garden show!” 

My whole body shuddered. They’re going to get into a fist fight, I realized. 
And Mr. McCall will squash my dad. 

“Joke?” Mr. McCall growled. “You’re the joke. You and your sour 
tomatoes. And those stupid lawn ornaments! Now leave before I really lose 
control!” 

Mr. McCall stomped up to his front door. Then he spun around and said, “I 
don’t want my son hanging around with Joe anymore! Your son probably 
wrecked your tomatoes. Just as he wrecked my melons!” 

He disappeared into the house, slamming the door so hard, the porch shook. 

That night I tossed and turned in bed for hours. Faces painted on melons. 
Crushed tomatoes. 

Whispering lawn gnomes. I couldn’t think of anything else. 

It was way after midnight, but I couldn’t sleep. The gnomes with their 
leering smiles danced before my closed eyes. 

Those grinning faces. Laughing. Laughing at me. 

Suddenly the room felt hot and stuffy. I kicked off the thin sheet that 
covered my legs. Still too hot. 

I jumped out of bed and headed for my window. I threw it wide open. 
Warm, wet air rushed in. 

I rested my arms on the windowsill and peered out into the darkness. It was 
a foggy night. A thick gray mist swirled over the front yard. Despite the heat, I 



felt a chill down my back. I had never seen it this foggy before. 

The fog shifted slightly. The angel slowly came into view as the fog moved 
away. Then the seal. The skunks. The swans. A flash of pink—the flamingos. 
And there stood the deer. 

Alone. 

All alone. 

The gnomes were gone. 



15 


“Mom! Dad!” I cried. Racing to their bedroom. “Wake up! Wake up! The 
gnomes are gone!” 

Mom bolted straight up. “What? What’s wrong?” 

Dad didn’t budge. 

“It’s the gnomes!” I shouted, shaking Dad’s shoulder. “Wake up!” 

My father opened one eye and squinted up at me. “What time is it?” he 
mumbled. 

“Get up, Dad!” I pleaded. 

Mom groaned as she snapped on the light next to her bed. “Joe. It’s so late. 
Why did you wake us up?” 

“They’re—they’re gone!” I stammered. “They disappeared. I’m not 
kidding. I’m really not.” 

My parents glanced at each other. Then they glared at me. “Enough!” Mom 
cried. “We’re tired of your jokes. And it’s the middle of the night! Get to bed!” 

“Right now!” Dad added sternly. “We’ve had just about enough of this 
nonsense. We’re going to have a serious talk about this. In the morning.” 

“But—but—but—” I stammered. 

“Go!” Dad shouted. 

I backed out of the room slowly, stumbling over someone’s slipper. 

I should have realized that they wouldn’t believe me. But someone had to 
believe me. Someone had to. 

I raced down the dark hall to Mindy’s room. As I neared her bed, I could 
hear the whistling sounds she always makes when she lies on her back. She was 
fast asleep. 

I stared down at her for a moment. Should I wake her? Would she believe 

me? 

I patted her on the cheek. “Mindy. Wake up,” I whispered. 

Nothing. 

I called her name again. A little louder. 

Her eyes fluttered open. “Joe?” she asked drowsily. 

“Get up. Quick!” I whispered. “You have to see this!” 



“Have to see what?” she groaned. 

“The gnomes. The gnomes have disappeared!” I exclaimed. “I think they 
ran away! Please, get up. Please.” 

“The gnomes?” she mumbled. 

“Come on, Mindy. Get up,” I pleaded. “It’s an emergency!” 

Mindy’s eyes shot wide open. “Emergency? What? What emergency?” 

“It’s the gnomes. They’ve really disappeared. You have to come outside 
with me.” 

“That’s the emergency?” she screeched. “Are you crazy? I’m not going 
anywhere with you. You’ve totally lost it, Joe. Totally.” 

“But, Mindy—” 

“Quit bugging me. I’m going back to sleep.” 

Then she closed her eyes and pulled the sheet over her head. 

I stood in her dark, silent room. 

No one would believe me. No one would come with me. What should I do 
now? What? 

I imagined the gnomes ripping up every last vegetable in our garden. 
Yanking out the yams and smashing the squash. And for dessert, chomping on 
the rest of Mr. McCall’s casabas! 

I knew I had to do something. Fast! 

I ran from Mindy’s room and raced down the stairs. I jerked the front door 
open and sprinted outside. 

Outside into the murky fog. 

Swallowed up inside the thick blanket of mist. 

So dark and foggy. I could barely see. I felt as if I were moving through a 
dark dream. A nightmare of grays and blacks. All shadows. Nothing but 
shadows. 

I inched forward slowly, moving as if I were underwater. The grass felt so 
wet against my bare feet. But I couldn’t even see my own feet through the thick 
carpet of fog. 

Like a dream. Like a heavy, dark dream. So many shifting shadows. So 
silent. Eerily silent. 

I pushed on into the haze. I had lost all sense of direction. Was I heading 
toward the street? 

“Ohhh!” I cried out when something grabbed my ankle. 

Frantically, I shook my leg. Tried to break free. 



But it held on. 

And pulled me down. 

Down into the whirling darkness. 

A snake. 

No. Not a snake. The garden hose. The garden hose that I had forgotten to 
roll up after watering the lawn that night. 

Get a grip, Joe. I told myself. You have to calm down. 

I pulled myself up and staggered forward. Squinting hard. Trying to see my 
way. Shadowy figures seemed to reach for me, bend toward me. 

I wanted to turn back. And go inside. And climb into my nice, dry bed. 

Yes. That’s what I should do, I decided. 

I turned slowly. 

And heard a shuffling sound. The soft thud of footsteps. Nearby. 

I listened closely. 

And heard the sounds again. Footsteps as light as the mist. 

I was breathing hard now. My heart pounding. My bare feet chilled and wet. 
The dampness creeping up my legs. My entire body shuddered. 

I heard a raspy cackle. A gnome? 

I tried to turn. Tried to see it in the billowing blackness. 

But it grabbed me from behind. Hard around the waist. 

And with a dry, evil laugh, it threw me to the ground! 



16 


As I hit the wet ground, I heard the low, evil laugh again. 

And recognized it. 

“Moose?” 

“Scared you big time!” he muttered. He helped me to my feet. Even in the 
fog, I could see the big grin on his face. 

“Moose—what are you doing out here?” I managed to cry. 

“I couldn’t sleep. I kept hearing weird sounds. I was staring out into the fog 
—and I saw you. What are you doing out here, Joe? Causing more trouble?” 

I wiped wet blades of grass from my hands. “I haven’t been causing the 
trouble,” I told him. “You’ve got to believe me. Look—the two lawn gnomes— 
they’re gone.” 

I pointed to the deer. Moose could see that the gnomes weren’t standing in 
their spots. 

He stared for a long time. “This is a trick—right?” 

“No. It’s for real. I’ve got to find them.” 

Moose frowned at me. “What did you do, hide the ugly little creeps? Where 
are they? Come on, tell me!” 

“I didn’t hide them,” I insisted. 

“Tell me,” he repeated, leaning over me, bringing his face an inch from 
mine. “Or suffer the Ten Tortures!” 

Moose shoved his huge hands hard against my chest. I fell back and landed 
in the wet grass again. He thumped down on my stomach and pinned my arms to 
the ground. 

“Tell me!” Moose insisted. “Tell me where they are!” Then he bounced up 
and down on top of me. 

“Stop!” I gasped. “Stop!” 

He stopped because lights flashed on in both of our houses. 

“Oh, wow,” I whispered. “We’re in major trouble now.” 

I heard my front door bang open. A second later, Moose’s door opened, too. 

We froze. “Keep quiet,” I whispered. “Maybe they won’t see us.” 

“Who’s out here?” my father called. 



“What’s going on, Jeffrey?” I heard Mr. McCall shout. “What’s all the noise 
out here?” 

“I don’t know,” my dad replied. “I thought maybe Joe...” His voice trailed 
off. 

We’re safe, I thought. We’re hidden by the fog. 

Then I heard a low click. The long, thin beam of a flashlight swept across 
the yard. It settled on Moose and me. 

“Joe!” Dad screamed. “What are you doing out there? Why didn’t you 
answer me?” 

“Moose!” Mr. McCall shouted in a deep, angry voice. “Get in here. Move 
it!” 

Moose climbed up and raced into his house. 

I hoisted myself up from the grass for the second time that night and slowly 
made my way inside. 

Dad crossed his arms tightly across his chest. “You woke us up twice 
tonight! And you’re outside in the middle of the night again! What’s wrong with 
you?” 

“Listen, Dad, I only went outside because the gnomes are missing! Check,” 
I begged. “You’ll see!” 

My father glared at me with narrowed eyes. “These gnome stories are 
getting out of hand!” he snapped. “I’ve had it! Now go upstairs. Before I ground 
you for the entire summer!” 

“Dad, I’m begging you. I’ve never been so serious in my life. Please look,” 
I pleaded. “Please. Please. Please!” And then I added, “I’ll never ask you for 
anything else again.” 

I guess that’s what convinced him. 

“Okay,” he said, sighing wearily. “But if this is another joke...” 

My father stepped over to the living room window and peered out into the 
swirling fog. 

“Please let the gnomes still be gone! ” I prayed silently. “Please let Dad see 
that I’m telling the truth. Please...” 



17 


“Joe, you’re right!” my father declared. “The gnomes aren’t out there.” 

He believed me! Finally! I jumped up and shot a fist into the air. “Yes!” I 
cheered. 

Dad wiped at the moist glass pane with his pajama sleeve and squinted out 
the window again. 

“See, Dad! See!” I cried happily. “I was telling the truth. I wasn’t joking.” 

“Hmmm. Deer-lilah’s not there, either,” he said softly. 

“What?” I gasped, feeling my stomach churn. “No. The deer is there! I saw 
it!” 

“Hold on a minute,” Dad murmured. “Ahhh. There she is. She was hidden 
in the fog. And the gnomes! There they are! They’re right there, too. They were 
hidden in the fog. See?” 

I stared out the window. Two pointy hats broke through the mist. The two 
gnomes stood dark and still, in their places beside the deer. 

“Noooooo!” I moaned. “I know they weren’t there. I’m not playing tricks, 
Dad. I’m not!” 

“Fog can do funny things,” Dad said. “One time I was driving through a 
real pea soup of a fog. I spotted something strange through the windshield. It 
was shiny and round and it sort of hovered in the air. Oh, boy, I thought. A UFO! 
A flying saucer! I couldn’t believe it!” 

Dad patted me on the back. “Well, my UFO turned out to be a silver balloon 
tied to a parking meter. Now, Joe. Back to this gnome problem.” Dad’s face 
turned stern. “I don’t want to hear any more crazy stories. They’re only lawn 
ornaments. Nothing more. Okay? Not another word. Promise?” 

What choice did I have? “Promise,” I muttered. 

Then I dragged myself up the stairs to bed. 

What a horrible day—and night. My father thinks I’m a liar. Our tomatoes 
are ruined. And Moose isn’t allowed to hang out with me anymore. 

What else could possibly go wrong? 

I woke up the following morning with a heavy feeling in my stomach. As if I 
had swallowed a bowl of cement. 



All I could think about were the gnomes. 

Those horrible gnomes. They were destroying my summer. They were 
destroying my life! 

Forget about them, Joe, I told myself. Just forget about them. 

Anyway, today had to be better than yesterday. It sure couldn’t be worse. 

I peered out my bedroom window. All traces of the fog had been burned 
away by a bright yellow sun. Buster slept peacefully in the grass, his long white 
rope snaking through the garden. 

I glanced over at the McCalls’ house. Maybe Moose is outside helping his 
dad in the garden, I thought. 

I leaned farther out the window to get a better look. 

“Oh, noooo!” I moaned. “No!” 



18 


Globs of white paint splattered over Mr. McCall’s red Jeep! 

The roof. The hood. The windows. The whole Jeep covered in paint. 

This meant major trouble, I knew. 

I pulled on a pair of jeans and yesterday’s T-shirt and hurried outside. I 
found Moose in his driveway, his jaw clenched, shaking his head as he circled 
the Jeep. 

“Unbelievable, huh?” he said, turning to me. “When my dad saw this, he 
had a cow!” 

“Why didn’t he park in the garage?” I asked. Mr. McCall always parks the 
Jeep in their two-car garage. 

Moose shrugged. “Mom’s been cleaning out the basement and attic for a 
yard sale. She stuck about a million boxes of junk in the garage. So Dad had to 
park in the driveway last night.” 

Moose patted the roof of the Jeep. “The paint is still sticky. Touch it.” 

I touched it. Sticky. 

“My dad is steaming!” Moose declared. “At first he thought your dad did it. 
You know. Because of the tomatoes. But Mom told him that that was ridiculous. 
So he called the police. He said he won’t rest until whoever did it is thrown in 
jail!” 

“He said that?” I asked. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. “Moose, 
once the police start to check things out, they’re going to blame you and me!” 

“Blame us? Are you nuts? Why would they blame us?” he demanded. 

“Because we were both outside last night!” I said. “And everybody knows 
it.” 

Moose’s dark brown eyes flickered with fear. “You’re right,” he said. “What 
are we going to do?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied sadly. I paced back and forth in the McCalls’ 
driveway, thinking hard. The asphalt felt warm and sticky on my bare feet. 

I moved to the grass. And noticed a line of small white paint spots. 

“Hey, what’s this?” I cried. 

I followed the paint trail across the grass. 

Over the petunias. 



To the corner of my yard. 

The paint drips ended where the gnomes stood, grinning at me. 

“I knew it! I knew it!” I cried out. “Moose, come look at this trail. The 
gnomes splashed your car! And did all the other bad things around here.” 

“Lawn gnomes?” Moose sputtered. “Joe, give up. No one will believe that. 
Why don’t you give it a rest?” 

“Check out the evidence!” I demanded. “The melon seed on the gnome’s 
lips. This trail of white paint. I even found black paint on their fingers. Right 
after your dad found the smiley faces on his casabas!” 

“Weird,” Moose muttered. “Very weird. But lawn gnomes are lawn gnomes, 
Joe. They don’t run around doing mischief.” 

“What if we prove they’re guilty?” I suggested. 

“Excuse me? How would we do that?” 

“Catch them in the act,” I replied. 

“Huh? This is nuts, Joe.” 

“Come on, Moose. We’ll do it tonight. We’ll sneak out, hide around the side 
of the house, and watch them.” 

Moose shook his head. “No way,” he answered. “I’m in big trouble after 
last night.” 

“And after the police finish, what kind of trouble will you be in then?” 

“Okay. Okay. I’ll do it,” he muttered. “But I think this whole thing is a big 
waste of time.” 

“We’re going to trap these gnomes, Moose,” I told him. “If it’s the last thing 
we do.” 

Ahhh! 

My alarm clock! It didn’t go off! 

And now it was nearly midnight. And I was late. I’d promised to meet 
Moose outside at eleven-thirty. 

I leaped out of bed, still dressed in my jeans and T-shirt. I grabbed my 
sneakers and ran outside. 

No moon. No stars. The front lawn lay blanketed in darkness. 

The yard was silent. Too silent. 

I glanced around for Moose. No sign of him. He probably went back inside 
when I didn’t show. 

What should I do now? Stay out by myself? Or go back to bed? 



Something rustled in the bushes. I gasped. 

“Joe. Joe. Over here,” Moose whispered loudly. 

He popped his head out from behind the evergreen shrubs in front of my 
house. And waved me over. 

I slid down next to him. 

Moose punched me hard on the arm. “I thought you chickened out.” 

“No way!” I whispered back. “This was my idea!” 

“Yeah, your crazy idea,” Moose replied. “I can’t believe I’m hiding behind 
a bush. In the middle of the night. Spying on lawn ornaments.” 

“I know it sounds crazy, but—” 

“Shhh. Did you hear something?” Moose interrupted. 

I heard it. A scraping sound. 

I reached into the shrub and parted the thick green branches. The needles 
clawed at my hands and arms. I jerked my arms out quickly. Too quickly. Blood 
dripped from my fingers where two needles had pierced right through my skin. 

The scraping sound came closer. 

My heart pounded in my chest. 

Closer. 

Moose and I sat there. We exchanged frightened glances. 

I had to look. I had to see what was making those sounds. 

I parted the needles once again. And stared through the mass of needled 
branches. Two small, glowing eyes met mine! 

“Get it, Moose! Get it!” I cried. 

Moose jumped up from behind the bush. Just in time—to see it scamper 
away. 

“A raccoon! It was only a raccoon!” 

I let out a long sigh. “Sorry, Moose.” 

We sat there a while longer. We parted the branches every few minutes to 
check on the gnomes. My arms were scratched raw from the rough needles. 

But the gnomes hadn’t budged. They stood grinning into the night in their 
silly suits and caps. 

I groaned. My legs felt stiff and cramped. 

Moose checked his watch. “We’ve been out here for over two hours,” he 
whispered. “Those gnomes aren’t going anywhere. I’m going home.” 

“Wait a little longer,” I begged him. “We’ll catch them. I know we will.” 

“You’re a pretty good guy,” Moose said as he parted the bushes for the 



millionth time. “So I hate to tell you this, Joe. But you’re as crazy as—” 

He didn’t finish his sentence. His mouth dropped open, and his eyes nearly 
popped out of his pudgy head. 

I peered into the shrubs—in time to see the gnomes come to life. They 
stretched their arms over their heads. And stroked their chins. 

They shook out their legs. And smoothed out their shirts. 

“They—they’re moving !” Moose cried. 

Too loudly. 

And then I lost my balance and fell. Right into the bush. 

They’ve seen us, I realized. 

Now what? 



19 


“No. Oh, man. No!” Moose whispered. He tugged me to my feet. “They’re 
moving. They’re really moving!” 

Squinting through the branches, we both stared in horror at Hap and Chip. 

The gnomes bent their knees, limbering up. Then they each took one stiff 
step. Then another. 

I was right. They are alive, I thought. Very alive. 

And they’re coming for Moose and me. 

We have to run, I told myself. We have to get out of here. 

But neither of us could take our eyes off the living lawn gnomes! 

The full moon suddenly appeared low over the trees. The front lawn lit as if 
someone had turned on a spotlight. The stocky figures swung their short, fat 
arms and began to run. Their pointed hats cut through the air like sharks’ fins. 

They scrambled toward us on their stumpy legs. 

Moose and I dropped to our knees and tried to hide. My whole body was 
trembling so hard, I was making the bush shake! 

The gnomes ran closer. So close that I could see the dark red of their evil 
eyes and the white gleam of their grins. 

I clenched my fists so tightly, my hands ached. 

What were they going to do to us? 

I shut my eyes—and heard them run past. I heard thudding footsteps. 
Whistling breaths. 

I opened my eyes to see them racing across the cement walk and around the 
side of the house. 

“Moose—they didn’t see us!” I whispered happily. 

We helped each other to our feet. I felt dizzy. The dark ground tilted. My 
legs felt soft and rubbery like Jell-O. 

Moose wiped his sweaty brow. “Where are they going?” he whispered. 

I shook my head. “I don’t know. But we have to follow them. Come on.” 

We gave each other a quick thumbs-up and stepped out from our hiding 
place. I led the way. We moved across the cement walk and past the front porch. 
Toward the side of the house. 



I stopped when I heard their raspy voices, talking low. Just up ahead. 

Moose grabbed my shoulder, his eyes wide open in alarm. “I’m getting out 
of here. Now!” 

I turned around. “No!” I pleaded. “You’ve got to stay and help me catch 
them. We have to show our parents what’s been going on here.” 

He heaved a long sigh. It made me feel a little better to know that a big, 
tough guy like Moose was as frightened as I was. Finally, he nodded. “Okay. 
Let’s go get them.” 

Keeping in the dark shadow of the house, we made our way around to the 
back. I saw Buster, sound asleep beside his dog house in the center of the yard. 

And then I saw the two lawn gnomes. They were bent over the pile of paint 
and brushes and drop cloths the painters had left beside the garage. 

Moose and I hung back as Hap and Chip picked up two cans of black paint. 
They pried the cans open with their thick fingers. 

Giggling, the two gnomes swung back the open cans, then hurled the black 
paint at the side of my house. The black paint spattered the fresh white paint, 
then dripped down in long, thick streaks. 

I clapped a hand over my mouth to keep from screaming. 

I knew it. I’d know it all along. But no one would believe me. The gnomes 
were behind all the trouble around here. 

The gnomes returned to the pile for more paint. “We’ve got to stop them,” I 
whispered to Moose. “But how?” 

“Let’s just tackle them,” Moose suggested. “Tackle them from behind and 
pin them down.” 

It sounded simple enough. They were little, after all. Smaller than us. 
“Okay,” I whispered, my stomach fluttering. “Then we’ll drag them into the 
house and show my parents.” 

I took a deep breath and held it. Moose and I started to inch forward. 

Closer. Closer. 

If only my legs weren’t wobbling like rubber bands! 

Closer. 

And then I saw Moose go down. 

He toppled forward—and hit the ground hard, letting out a loud “Oooof! ” 

It took me a second to see that he had tripped over Buster’s rope. 

He struggled to get to his feet. But the rope had tangled around his ankle. 

He reached down with both hands. Gave it a hard tug. 



And woke up Buster! 

“Rrrrrrowwwwwf! Rrrrrrowwwwwf!” Buster must have seen the gnomes 
because he started barking his head off. 

The gnomes spun around. 

And fixed their eyes on us. In the bright moonlight, their faces turned hard 
and angry. 

“Get them!” Chip growled. “Don’t let them escape!” 



20 


“Run!” I screamed. 

Moose and I bolted toward the front of the house. 

Buster was still barking his head off. 

And over the barking, I heard shrill giggles. The gnomes giggled as they 
chased after us. 

Their feet slapped sharply on the grass. I glanced back, saw their stubby 
legs moving fast, a blur of motion. 

I pumped my legs, gasping for breath, and rounded the side of the house. 

I could hear the high-pitched giggles of the two gnomes close behind us. 
“Help!” Moose cried. “Somebody—help us!” 

My mouth hung open. I struggled to breathe. They were gaining on us. 

I knew I had to run faster. But my legs suddenly felt as heavy as bricks. 
“Hellllp!” Moose called. 

I glanced at the house. Why wasn’t anyone waking up in there? 

We ran around the house and kept running. 

Why were Hap and Chip giggling like that? 

Because they knew they were going to catch us? 

I felt a stab of pain in my side. “Oh, no!” A cramp. 

I felt Moose tugging me. “Don’t slow down, Joe. Keep going!” 

The pain sharpened, like a knife in my side. “Can’t run...” I choked out. 
“Joe—keep going! Don’t stop!” Moose cried, frantically pulling my arm. 
But I doubled over, holding my side. 

It’s all over, I thought. They’ve got me. 

And then the front door swung open. The porch light flashed on. 

“What’s going on out here?” a familiar voice called. 

Mindy! 

She stepped out, pulling at the belt of her pink bathrobe. I saw her squint 
into the darkness. 

“Mindy!” I called. “Mindy—watch out!” 

Too late. 

The gnomes grabbed her. 



Giggling loudly, they pinned her arms back. Dragged her down the porch 
steps. Carried her to the street. 



21 


Mindy thrashed her arms and kicked her legs. But the giggling gnomes had 
surprising strength. 

“Help me!” Mindy called back to Moose and me. “Don’t just stand there— 
help me! ” 

I swallowed hard. The pain in my side faded. 

Moose and I didn’t say a word. We just started chasing after them. 

They had already carried Mindy to the street. Their feet slapped on the 
pavement. In the light from the street lamp, I saw Mindy struggling to free 
herself. 

Moose and I hurtled down the driveway. “Put her down!” I shouted 
breathlessly. “Put my sister down—now!” 

More giggles. They scurried past the McCalls’ house. Past the next two 
houses. 

Moose and I ran after them, shouting, begging them to stop. 

And then—to our shock—they did stop. 

In the shadow of a tall hedge, they set Mindy down. And turned to us. “We 
mean you no harm,” Chip said. 

The gnomes’ expressions were serious now. Their eyes peered at us through 
the darkness. 

“I don’t believe this!” Mindy cried, straightening her robe. “This is crazy! 
Crazy!” 

“Tell me about it,” I muttered. 

“Please listen to us,” Hap rasped. 

“We mean you no harm,” Chip repeated. 

“No harm!” Mindy shrieked. “No harm! You just dragged me from my 
home! You—you—” 

“We only wanted to get your attention,” Hap said softly. 

“Well, you’ve got it!” Mindy exclaimed. 

“We mean you no harm,” Chip said once again. “Please believe us.” 

“How can we believe you?” I demanded, finally finding my voice. “Look at 
all the trouble you’ve caused. You’ve ruined the gardens! You splashed paint 
everywhere! You—” 



“We can’t help it,” Hap interrupted. 

“We really can’t,” Chip echoed. “You see, we’re Mischief Elves.” 

“You’re what?” Mindy cried. 

“We’re Mischief Elves. We do mischief. That’s our mission in life,” Hap 
explained. 

“Wherever there is mischief in the world, we’re there,” Chip added. 
“Mischief is our job. We can’t help ourselves.” 

He bent down and broke off a chunk of the concrete curb. Then he pulled 
open the mailbox across from us and shoved the piece of concrete inside. 

“See? I can’t help myself. I have to do mischief wherever I go.” 

Hap giggled. “Without us, the world would be a pretty dull place— 
wouldn’t it?” 

“It would be a much better place,” Mindy insisted, crossing her arms in 
front of her. 

Moose still hadn’t said a word. He just stood and stared at the two talking 
lawn gnomes. 

Hap and Chip made pouty faces. “Please don’t hurt our feelings,” Chip 
rasped. “Our life isn’t easy.” 

“We need your help,” Hap added. 

“You want us to help you do mischief?” I cried. “No way! You’ve already 
gotten me into major trouble.” 

“No. We need you to help get us our freedom,” Chip said solemnly. “Please 
—listen and believe.” 

“Listen and believe,” Hap echoed. 

“We lived in a land far from here,” Chip began. “In a forest deep and green. 
We guarded the mines and protected the trees. We performed our mischief 
innocently. But we also did a lot of good.” 

“We were hard-working people,” Hap told us, scratching his head. “And we 
were happy in our forest home.” 

“But then the mines were closed and the forests were cut down,” Chip 
continued. “We were captured. Kidnapped. And taken far from home. We were 
shipped to your country and forced to work as lawn ornaments.” 

“Slaves,” Hap said, shaking his head sadly. “Forced to stand all day and 
night.” 

“That’s impossible!” Mindy cried. “Don’t you get bored? How do you stand 
so still?” 



“We go into a trance,” Chip explained. “Time passes without our realizing 
it. We come out of the trance at night and go about doing our job.” 

“You mean mischief!” I declared. 

They both nodded. 

“But we want to be free,” Hap continued. “To go where we want. To live 
where we choose. We want to find another forest where we can live in freedom.” 
Two tiny gnome tears rolled down his fat cheeks. 

Chip sighed and raised his eyes to me. “Will you help us?” 

“Help you do what?” I demanded. 

“Help our friends and us escape?” Chip replied. 

“There are six others,” Hap explained. “They’re locked in the basement. At 
the store where you bought us. We need your help to set them free.” 

“We can climb into the basement window,” his friend continued. “But we 
are too short to climb back out. And too short to reach the doorknob to let 
ourselves out through the door.” 

“Will you help us escape?” Hap pleaded, tugging the bottom of my T-shirt. 
“You just have to climb down into the basement. Then help our six friends out 
the basement door.” 

“Please help us,” Chip begged, tears in his eyes. “Then we’ll be gone. To a 
deep forest. And we will never cause you any more mischief.” 

“That sounds good to me!” Mindy exclaimed. 

“So you’ll do it?” Hap squealed. 

They both began tugging at us, chirping, “Please? Please? Please? Please? 
Please?” 

Moose, Mindy, and I exchanged troubled glances. 

What should we do? 



22 


“Please? Please? Please? Please?” 

“Let’s help them,” Moose said, finally finding his voice. 

I turned to Mindy. I didn’t usually ask her advice. But she was the oldest. 
“What do you think?” 

Mindy bit her lower lip. “Well, look how much Buster hates to be tied up,” 
she said. “He only wants to be free. I guess everything deserves to be free. Even 
lawn gnomes.” 

I turned back to the gnomes. “We’ll do it!” I declared. “We’ll help you.” 

“Thank you! Thank you!” Chip cried happily. He threw his arms around 
Hap. “You don’t know what this means to us!” 

“Thank you! Thank you! Thank you!” Hap squealed. He leaped into the air 
and clicked the heels of his boots together. “Hurry! Let’s go!” 

“Now?” Mindy cried. “It’s the middle of the night! Can’t we wait until 
tomorrow?” 

“No. Please. Now,” Hap insisted. 

“In the darkness,” Chip added. “While the store is closed. Please. Let’s 
hurry.” 

“I’m not dressed,” Mindy replied. “I really don’t think we can go now. I 
think—” 

“If we stay here longer, we’ll have to do more mischief,” Chip said with a 
wink. 

I sure didn’t want that to happen. “Let’s do it now!” I agreed. 

And so the five of us crept along the dark street and up the steep hill toward 
Lawn Lovely. Wow, did I feel weird! Here we were, walking around in the 
middle of the night with a couple of lawn ornaments! About to break into the 
store and set six more lawn ornaments free! 

The old pink house was a strange enough place during the day. But at night, 
it was totally creepy. All those lawn animals—deer and seals and flamingos— 
stared at us through the darkness, with blank, lifeless eyes. 

Were they alive, too? I wondered. 

Hap seemed to read my mind. “They’re only for decoration,” he sneered. 
“Nothing more.” 



The two excited gnomes made their way quickly across the wide lawn and 
around the side of Mrs. Anderson’s house. Moose, Mindy, and I followed 
behind. 

Mindy clutched my arm with an ice-cold hand. My legs still felt wobbly. 
But my heart was pounding with excitement—not fear. 

Hap and Chip pointed to the long, low window that led down to the 
basement. I knelt down and peered inside. Total darkness. 

“You’re sure the other gnomes are down there?” I asked. 

“Oh, yes,” Chip declared eagerly. “All six. They’re waiting for you to 
rescue them.” 

“Please hurry,” Hap pleaded, shoving me gently to the window. “Before the 
old woman hears us and wakes up.” 

I lowered myself to the edge of the open window. And turned back to my 
sister and Moose. 

“We’re coming right behind you,” Moose whispered. 

“Let’s rescue them and get out of here,” Mindy urged. 

“Here goes,” I said softly. 

I crossed my fingers and slid down into the darkness. 



23 


I bumped over the window frame and landed on my feet. A few seconds later, I 
heard Moose and Mindy slide in after me. 

I squinted into the blackness that surrounded us. I couldn’t see a thing. I 
licked my dry lips and sniffed the air. A sharp smell, like vinegar, filled the hot, 
damp basement. Sweat, I thought. Gnome sweat. 

I heard a low giggle from outside. Chip and Hap hurtled over the window 
ledge and thudded to the floor. 

“Hey, guys—” I whispered. 

But they scampered off into the darkness. 

“What’s going on here?” Moose demanded. 

“We’ve got to find the light switch,” Mindy whispered. 

But before we could move, the ceiling lights all flashed on. I blinked in the 
sudden blaze of brightness. 

And then gasped as I stared across the vast basement—at a sea of lawn 
gnomes! 

Not six! Six hundred ! Row after row of them, jammed against each other, 
staring at the three of us. 

“Whoa!” Moose cried. “It’s a mob!” 

“Hap and Chip lied to us!” I cried. 

Their shirts were different colors. But the lawn gnomes all looked exactly 
alike. They all wore pointed caps and black belts. They all had staring red eyes, 
wide noses, grinning lips, and large pointy ears. 

I was so startled to see so many of the ugly creatures, it took me a while to 
spot Hap and Chip. Finally, I saw them at the side of the room. 

Hap clapped his hands three times. 

And three more times. Short, sharp claps that echoed off the basement 
walls. 

And then the crowd of gnomes came to life, stretching and bending, 
grinning and giggling, chattering in shrill, excited voices. 

Mindy grabbed my arm. “We’ve got to get out of here.” 

I could barely hear her over the chattering, giggling mob of gnomes. I 
glanced up at the basement window. It suddenly seemed so high, so far away. 



When I turned back, Hap and Chip had moved in front of us. They clapped 
their hands for attention. 

The hundreds of gnomes instantly fell silent. 

“We have brought the young humans!” Hap announced, grinning happily. 

“We have kept our promise!” Chip declared. 

Giggles and cheering. 

And then, to my horror, the gnomes began moving forward. Their eyes 
flashed excitedly. They reached out their stubby arms toward us. The pointed 
hats bobbed and slid forward, like sharks on the attack. 

Mindy, Moose, and I backed up. Backed up to the wall. 

The gnomes crowded up against us. Their little hands plucked at my 
clothes, slapped my face, pulled my hair. 

“Stop!” I shrieked. “Get back! Get back!” 

“We came to help you!” I heard Mindy scream. “Please—we came to help 
you escape!” 

Loud giggling. 

“But we don’t want to escape!” a grinning gnome declared. “Now that 
you’re here, it’s going to be so much fun!” 



24 


Fun? 

What did he mean by fun ? 

Hap and Chip pushed their way back to the front and stepped up beside us. 
They clapped their hands together to silence the giggling, chattering crowd. 

The basement instantly turned silent. 

“You tricked us!” Mindy screamed at the two gnomes. “You lied to us!” 
They giggled in reply and slapped each other’s shoulders gleefully. 

“I can’t believe you fell for our sad story,” Hap said, shaking his head. 

“We told you we’re Mischief Gnomes,” Chip sneered. “You should have 
known we were playing mischief!” 

“Great joke, guys,” I said, forcing a hoarse laugh. “You fooled us. Way to 
go. So now let us go home, okay?” 

“Yeah. Let us go home!” Moose insisted. 

The whole room erupted in laughter. 

Hap shook his head. “But the mischief has just begun!” he declared. 

Cheers and giggles. 

Chip turned to the crowd of excited gnomes. “So what shall we do with our 
lovely prisoners? Any ideas?” 

“Let’s see if they bounce!” a gnome called from near the back of the room. 
“Yeah! Dribble them!” 

“A dribbling contest!” 

“No—bounce them against the wall. Bounce and catch!” 

More cheers. 

“No! Fold them into tiny squares! I love it when we fold humans into 
squares!” 

“Yes! A folding contest!” another gnome cried. 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” several gnomes began to chant. 

“Tickle them!” a gnome in front suggested. 

“Tickle them for hours!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

The room rang out with their excited chants. 



“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!” 

I turned to Moose. He stared out at the crowd of chanting gnomes, dazed 
and frightened. His eyes bulged and his chin quivered. 

Mindy had her back pressed up against the basement wall. Her blond hair 
was matted to her forehead. Her hands were jammed into the pockets of her 
bathrobe. 

“What are we going to do?” she asked me, shouting over the excited chants. 

Suddenly I had an idea. 

I raised my arms high over my head. “Quiet! ” I screamed. 

The room instantly grew silent. Hundreds of red eyes glared at me. 

“Let us go!” I demanded. “Or the three of us will scream at the top of our 
lungs. We will wake up Mrs. Anderson. And she will be down here in a second 
to rescue us!” 

Silence. 

Had I frightened them? 

No. The gnomes burst into loud, scornful laughter. They slapped each 
other’s shoulders, hooted, and giggled. 

“You’ll have to do better than that!” Hap grinned up at me. “We all know 
that Mrs. Anderson can’t hear a thing.” 

“Go ahead and shout,” Chip urged. “Shout all you want. We like it when 
humans shout.” He turned to Hap, and the two of them slapped each other’s 
shoulders and fell on the floor, giggling gleefully, kicking their feet in the air. 

Over the vast basement, the chants started up again. 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!” 

With a long sigh, I turned to my frightened sister and friend. “We’re 
doomed,” I muttered. “We don’t have a chance.” 



25 


“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

A new chant started in the back of the room and swept up toward the front. 

“Yes!” Hap and Chip declared happily. 

“Excellent mischief!” Hap cried. 

“A Tug of War! We’ll tug them till they stretch!” Chip shouted. 

“Stretch them! Stretch them!” 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

“Joe—what are we going to do?” I heard Mindy’s frightened voice over the 
enthusiastic chants. 

Think, Joe, I urged myself. Think! There has to be a way out of this 
basement. 

But I felt so dazed. The chants rang in my ears. The grinning faces leered 
up at us. My thoughts were a jumbled mess. 

“Stretch them! Stretch them!” 

“Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

Suddenly, over the shrill gnome voices, I heard a familiar sound. 

A dog’s bark. 

Buster’s bark. 

“Buster!” Mindy cried. “I hear him!” 

“I—I did too!” I exclaimed, turning and raising my eyes to the window 
above our heads. “He followed us! He must be right outside!” 

I desperately wished Buster could talk. Could run home and tell Mom and 
Dad that we were in terrible trouble. 

But he could only bark. Or... could he do more? 

I suddenly remembered how frightened Hap and Chip appeared whenever 
Buster came around. The terrified expressions on their faces. 

My heart fluttered with hope. Maybe the gnomes are afraid of dogs. Maybe 
Buster can scare them into letting us go. Maybe he can even frighten them back 
into their trance. 

I edged closer to my sister, my back pressed against the wall. “Mindy, I 



think the gnomes are afraid of Buster. If we get him down here, I think he can 
save us.” 

We didn’t hesitate. All three of us started shouting up to the window. 
“Buster! Buster! Come here, boy!” 

Could he hear us over the chanting gnomes? 

Yes! 

His big head peered down at us through the window. 

“Good boy!” I cried. “Now, come here. Come down here, Buster!” 

Buster’s mouth opened. His pink tongue drooped from his mouth, and he 
started to pant. 

“Good doggie!” I crooned. “Good doggie—come down here. Fast! Come, 
boy! Come, Buster!” 

Buster poked his head into the window. And yawned. 

“Down, Buster!” Mindy ordered. “Come down here, boy!” 

He pulled his head out of the window. And settled down on the ground 
outside. I could see his head resting on his paws. 

“No, Buster!” I shrieked, shouting over the chants. “Come, boy! Don’t lie 
down! Come! Buster, come!” 

“Rowf?” He pushed his head back into the window. Farther. Farther. 

“That a boy! Come on!” I pleaded. “A little more... a little more. If you 
come down here, I’ll feed you doggie treats five times a day.” 

Buster cocked his head to the side and sniffed at the damp, sweaty air of the 
basement. 

I held my arms out to the dog. “Please, Buster. You’re our last chance. 
Please—hurry! Come down here.” 

To my dismay, Buster pulled his head out of the window. 

Turned. 

And trotted away. 



26 


Mindy and Moose let out long, disappointed sighs. “Buster deserted us,” Mindy 
said softly. Her shoulders sagged. Moose dropped to his knees on the floor, 
shaking his head. 

“Trampoline! Trampoline!” 

The chant had changed. 

Hap grinned up at us. “Maybe we’ll use you for trampolines! That would be 
fun!” 

“It’s almost time for a vote!” Chip added, rubbing his hands together 
eagerly. 

“Trampoline! Trampoline!” 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

I held my hands over my ears, trying to block out the sound of their shrill 
voices. 

Silence. Please let me have silence, I thought. 

Silence. 

The word gave me an idea. 

Silence. Buster’s dog whistle was silent! 

Suddenly, I knew how to bring Buster back! 

“Mindy!” I cried “The dog whistle! Buster always comes when I blow the 
dog whistle!” 

Mindy raised her head and brightened. “That’s right!” she cried. “Hurry, 
Joe!” 

I grabbed for the shiny metal whistle under my T-shirt. It felt slippery with 
sweat. This has to work, I thought to myself. It has to bring Buster back. 

I pulled the whistle out. 

“The whistle!” several gnomes shrieked. 

The room instantly grew silent. 

I raised the whistle to my lips. 

“Quick—blow it!” Mindy screeched. 

To my surprise, Hap and Chip both dove at me. 

They leaped up and slapped at the whistle. 



The whistle spun out of my hands. 

“Noooo!” I cried in despair. 

I grabbed frantically for it. 

But it rolled and tumbled away, sliding across the basement floor. 



27 


Mindy, Moose, and I all dove for it. 

But the gnomes were quicker. 

A gnome in a bright blue shirt raised the whistle, clutched tightly in his 
little fist. “I’ve got it!” 

“No, you don’t!” Moose cried. He leaped at the gnome. Tackled him around 
the knees. 

The gnome let out a yelp as he went toppling to the floor. 

The dog whistle fell from his hand. 

And bounced across the hard floor toward me. 

I scooped it up. Started to raise it to my lips. 

Three gnomes leaped onto my shoulders, giggling and grunting. 

“Noooo!” I uttered a cry as they batted the whistle from my hand. I dropped 
to the floor, three gnomes on top of me. 

I finally shook them off and jumped to my feet. My eyes searched for the 
whistle. 

I saw a bunch of gnomes diving for the floor, scrambling for it. A few feet 
away, Moose struggled against four or five gnomes who had formed a line to 
block him. Mindy was battling another group of gnomes, who held her back, 
their tiny hands around her legs and waist. 

And then I saw Hap raise the whistle high. 

The gnomes stepped back, clearing a circle around him. 

Hap set the whistle in front of him on the floor. Then he raised his foot 

high. 

He was about to crush it! 

“Noooooo!” Another long cry escaped my throat. I scrambled over the 
floor, half-crawling, half-flying. 

As Hap’s heavy plaster foot came down, I stretched out my hand. 

Fumbled for the whistle. 

Grabbed it. 

Rolled away as the gnome’s foot tromped down heavily. It thudded inches 
from my head. 



I sat up. Raised the whistle to my lips. 
And blew as hard as I could. 

Now what? 

Would the whistle work? 

Would Buster come running to rescue us? 



28 


I blew the silent whistle again. 

And turned to the window. Buster, where are you? 

The gnomes must have been asking the same question. Because they froze 
in place, too. The excited chattering, giggling, and chanting stopped. 

The only sound I could hear was my own shallow breathing. 

I stared up at the window. A rectangle of blackness. No sign of Buster. 

“Hey—!” Moose’s cry made me turn around. 

“Look at them!” Moose’s voice echoed through the silence. 

“Look—they all froze!” Mindy declared. She placed both hands on the red 
cap of a gnome—and pushed the gnome over. 

It clattered to the floor. And didn’t move. A hunk of plaster. 

“I don’t get it!” Moose scratched his crew cut. 

Still gripping the dog whistle tightly, I moved around the room, examining 
the frozen gnomes, pushing them over. Enjoying the silence. 

“Back in their trance state,” Mindy murmured. 

“But how?” Moose demanded. “Buster never showed up. If they weren’t 
terrified of the dog, why did they all freeze up again?” 

I suddenly knew the answer. I raised the whistle and blew it again. “It was 
the whistle,” I explained. “It wasn’t Buster. I had it wrong. They were afraid of 
the whistle. Not the dog.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” Mindy said softly. “I never want to see another lawn 
gnome as long as I live.” 

“Wait till I tell my parents about this!” Moose declared. 

“Whoa!” I cried, grabbing his shoulder. “We can’t tell anyone about this. 
No way!” 

“Why not?” he demanded. 

“Because no one will believe it,” I replied. 

Moose stared at me for a long moment. “You’re right,” he agreed finally. 
“You’re definitely right.” 

Mindy moved to the wall and stared up at the window. “How do we get out 
of here?” 



“I know how,” I told her. I picked up Hap and Chip and stood them beneath 
the window. Then I climbed onto their caps, lifted my hands to the window, and 
pulled myself up. “Thanks for the boost, guys!” I called down. 

They didn’t reply. 

I hoped they were frozen for good. 

Mindy and Moose followed me out. Of course, Buster was waiting for us in 
the yard. His stubby tail began to wag as soon as I appeared. He came running 
over and licked my face till I was sopping wet and sticky. 

“Sorry, fella. You’re a little late,” I told him. “You weren’t much help— 
were you!” 

He licked me some more. Then he greeted Mindy and Moose. 

“Yaaaay! We’re out! We’re out!” Moose cried. He slapped me so hard on 
the back, I thought my teeth were going to fly out! 

I turned to my sister. “Tickle! Tickle! Tickle! ” I chanted. 

“Give me a break!” Mindy cried, rolling her eyes for the thousandth time 
that day. 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” I made tickling motions with my hands and started 
to chase her down the street. 

“Joe—stop it! Don’t tickle me! I’m warning you!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

I knew I’d never forget those high-pitched chants. I knew I’d hear them in 
my dreams for a long, long time. 

The next evening, Mindy and I were watching MTV in the den when Dad came 
home. “Be nice to your dad,” Mom had warned us earlier. “He’s very upset that 
somebody stole his two lawn gnomes.” 

Yes, the two gnomes were missing when he woke up. 

Big surprise. 

Mindy and I were so happy, we didn’t have a single argument all day. 

And now we were happy to see Dad—except that he had a strange 
expression on his face. “Uh... I’ve brought home a little surprise,” he 
announced, glancing guiltily at Mom. 

“Now what?” she demanded. 

“Come and see.” Dad led us out to the front lawn. 

The sun was disappearing behind the trees, and the sky was gray. But I 
could still see clearly what Dad had purchased at Lawn Lovely this time. 



An enormous, brown plaster gorilla! 

At least eight feet tall, with gigantic black eyes and a bright purple chest. 
The gorilla had paws the size of baseball mitts and a head as big as a basketball. 

“It’s the ugliest thing I ever saw!” Mom cried, both hands pressed to her 
face. “You’re not really going to put that horrible monster on our front lawn— 
are you, dear?” 

Anything is better than those lawn gnomes, I thought. Anything is better 
than lawn gnomes who come alive and do terrible mischief. 

I glanced at Mindy. I had a feeling she was thinking the same thing. 

“I think it’s a beauty, Dad,” I said. “It’s the best-looking lawn gorilla I ever 
saw!” 

“It’s great, Dad,” Mindy agreed. 

Dad smiled. 

Mom turned and hurried back to the house, shaking her head. 

I glanced up at the gorilla’s enormous purple-and-brown painted face. “Be a 
good gorilla,” I murmured. “Don’t be like those awful gnomes.” 

Then, as I started to turn away, the gorilla winked at me. 



A SHOCKER ON 
SHOCK STREET 

Goosebumps - 35 
R.L. Stine 



1 


“This is creepy, Erin.” My friend Marty grabbed my sleeve. 

“Let go!” I whispered. “You’re hurting me!” 

Marty didn’t seem to hear. He stared straight ahead into the darkness, 
gripping my arm. 

“Marty, please—” I whispered. I shook my arm free. I was scared, too. But 
I didn’t want to admit it. 

It was darker than the darkest night. I squinted hard, trying to see. And then 
a gray light glowed dimly in front of us. 

Marty ducked low. Even in the foggy light, I could see the fear in his eyes. 

He grabbed my arm again. His mouth dropped open. I could hear him 
breathing hard and fast. 

Even though I was frightened, a smile crossed my face. I liked seeing Marty 
scared. 

I really enjoyed it. 

I know, I know. That’s terrible. I admit it. Erin Wright is a bad person. What 
kind of a friend am I? 

But Marty always brags that he is braver than me. And he is usually right. 
He usually is the brave one, and I’m the wimp. 

But not today. 

That’s why seeing Marty gasp in fright and grab my arm made me smile. 

The gray light ahead of us slowly grew brighter. I heard crunching sounds 
on both sides of us. Close behind me, someone coughed. But Marty and I didn’t 
turn around. We kept our eyes straight ahead. 

Waiting. Watching.... 

As I squinted into the gray light, a fence came into view. A long wooden 
fence, its paint faded and peeling. A hand-lettered sign appeared on the fence: 
DANGER. KEEP OUT. THIS MEANS YOU. 

Marty and I both gasped when we heard the scraping sounds. Soft at first. 
Then louder. Like giant claws scraping against the other side of the fence. 

I tried to swallow, but my mouth suddenly felt dry. I had the urge to run. 
Just turn and run as fast as I could. 

But I couldn’t leave Marty there all alone. And besides, if I ran away now, 



he would never let me forget it. He’d tease me about it forever. 

So I stayed beside him, listening as the scraping, clawing sounds turned into 
banging. Loud crashes. 

Was someone trying to break through the fence? 

We moved quickly along the fence. Faster, faster—until the tall, peeling 
fence pickets became a gray blur. 

But the sound followed us. Heavy footsteps on the other side of the fence. 

We stared straight ahead. We were on an empty street. A familiar street. 

Yes, we had been here before. 

The pavement was puddled with rainwater. The puddles glowed in the pale 
light from the streetlamps. 

I took a deep breath. Marty gripped my arm harder. Our mouths gaped 
open. 

To our horror, the fence began to shake. The whole street shook. The rain 
puddles splashed against the curb. 

The footsteps thundered closer. 

“Marty—!” I gasped in a choked whisper. 

Before I could say another word, the fence crumbled to the ground, and the 
monster came bursting out. 

It had a head like a wolf—snapping jaws of gleaming white teeth—and a 
body like a giant crab. It swung four huge claws in front of it, clicking them at us 
as its snout pulled open in a throaty growl. 

“NOOOOOOO!” Marty and I both let out howls of terror. 

We jumped to our feet. 

But there was nowhere to run. 



2 


We stood and stared as the wolf-crab crawled toward us. 

“Please sit down, kids,” a voice called out behind us. “I can’t see the 
screen.” 

“Ssshhhh!” someone else whispered. 

Marty and I glanced at each other. I guess we both felt like jerks. I know I 
did. We dropped back into our seats. 

And watched the wolf-crab scamper across the street, chasing after a little 
boy on a tricycle. 

“What’s your problem, Erin?” Marty whispered, shaking his head. “It’s 
only a movie. Why did you scream like that?” 

“You screamed too!” I replied sharply. 

“I only screamed because you screamed!” he insisted. 

“Sssshhh!” someone pleaded. I sank low in the seat. I heard crunching 
sounds all around me. People eating popcorn. Someone behind me coughed. 

On the screen, the wolf-crab reached out his big, red claws and grabbed the 
kid on the trike. SNAP. SNAP. Good-bye, kid. 

Some people in the theater laughed. It was pretty funny. 

That’s the great thing about the Shocker on Shock Street movies. They make 
you scream and laugh at the same time. 

Marty and I sat back and enjoyed the rest of the movie. We love scary 
movies, but the Shock Street films are our favorites. 

In the end, the police caught the wolf-crab. They boiled him in a big pot of 
water. Then they served steamed crab to the whole town. Everyone sat around 
dipping him in butter sauce. They all said he was delicious. 

It was the perfect ending. Marty and I clapped and cheered. Marty put two 
fingers in his mouth and whistled through his teeth the way he always does. 

We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI, and it was definitely the best 
one of the series. 

The theater lights came on. We turned up the aisle and started to make our 
way through the crowd. 

“Great special effects,” a man told his friend. 

“Special effects?” the friend replied. “I thought it was all real!” 



They both laughed. 

Marty bumped me hard from behind. He thinks it’s funny to try and knock 
me over. “Pretty good movie,” he said. 

I turned back to him. “Huh? Pretty good?” 

“Well, it wasn’t scary enough,” he replied. “Actually, it was kind of 
babyish. Shocker V was a lot scarier.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Marty, you screamed your head off—remember? You 
jumped out of your seat. You grabbed my arm and—” 

“I only did that because I saw how scared you were,” he said, grinning. 
What a liar! Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared? 

He stuck his sneaker out and tried to trip me. 

I dodged to the left, stumbled—and bumped hard into a young woman. 

“Hey—look out!” she cried. “You twins should be more careful.” 

“We’re not twins!” Marty and I cried in unison. 

We’re not even brother and sister. We’re not related in any way. But people 
always think that Marty and I are twins. 

I guess we do look a lot alike. We’re both twelve years old. And we’re both 
pretty short and kind of chubby. We both have round faces, short black hair, and 
blue eyes. And we both have little noses that sort of turn up. 

But we’re not twins! We’re only friends. 

I apologized to the woman. When I turned back to Marty, he stuck out his 
shoe and tried to trip me again. 

I stumbled, but quickly caught my balance. Then I stuck out my shoe—and 
tripped him. 

We kept tripping each other through the long lobby. People were staring at 
us, but we didn’t care. We were laughing too hard. 

“Do you know the coolest thing about this movie?” I asked. 

“No. What?” 

“That we’re the first kids in the world to see it!” I exclaimed. 

“Yeah!” Marty and I slapped each other a high five. 

We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI at a special sneak preview. My 
dad works with a lot of movie people, and he got us tickets for it. The others in 
the theater were all adults. Marty and I were the only kids. 

“Know what else was really cool?” I asked. “The monsters. All of them. 
They looked so incredibly real. It didn’t look like special effects at all.” 

Marty frowned. “Well, I thought the Electric Eel Woman was pretty phony- 



looking. She didn’t look like an eel—she looked like a big worm!” 

I laughed. “Then why did you jump out of your seat when she shot a bolt of 
electricity and fried that gang of teenagers?” 

“I didn’t jump,” Marty insisted. “You did!” 

“Did not! You jumped because it looked so real,” I insisted. “And I heard 
you choke when the Toxic Creep leaped out of the nuclear waste pit.” 

“I choked on a Milk Dud, that’s all.” 

“You were scared, Marty, because it was so real.” 

“Hey—what if they are real?!” Marty exclaimed. “What if it isn’t special 
effects? What if they’re all real monsters ?” 

“Don’t be dumb,” I said. 

We turned the corner into another hall. 

The wolf-crab stood waiting for me there. 

I didn’t even have time to scream. 

He opened his toothy jaws in a long wolf howl—and wrapped two giant red 
claws around my waist. 



3 


I opened my mouth to scream, but only a squeak came out. 

I heard people laughing. 

The big claws slid off my waist. Plastic claws. 

I saw two dark eyes staring out at me from behind the wolf mask. I should 
have known that it was a man in a costume. But I didn’t expect him to be 
standing there. 

I was surprised, that’s all. 

I blinked at a white flash of light. A man had just taken a picture of the 
creature. I saw a big red and yellow sign against the wall: SEE THE MOVIE— 
THEN PLAY THE GAME ON CD-ROM. 

“Sorry if I scared you,” the man inside the wolf-crab costume said softly. 

“She scares easily!” Marty declared. 

I gave Marty a hard shove, and we hurried away. I turned back to see the 
creature waving a claw at me. “We’ve got to go upstairs and see my dad,” I told 
Marty. 

“Tell me something I don’t know.” 

He thinks he’s so funny. 

Dad’s office is upstairs from the theater, on the twenty-ninth floor. We 
jogged to the elevators at the end of the hall and took one up. 

Dad has a really cool job. He builds theme parks. And he designs all kinds 
of rides. 

Dad was one of the designers of Prehistoric Park. That’s the big theme park 
where you go back to prehistoric times. It has all kinds of neat rides and shows 
—and dozens of huge dinosaur robots wandering around. 

And Dad worked on the Fantasy Films Studio Tour. Everyone who comes 
to Hollywood goes on that tour. 

Dad’s idea was the part where you walk through a huge movie screen and 
find yourself in a world of movie characters. You can star in any kind of movie 
you want to be in! 

I know it sounds as if I’m bragging, but Dad is really smart, and he’s an 
engineering genius! I think he is the world expert on robots. He can build robots 
that will do anything! And he uses them in all his parks and studio tours. 



Marty and I stepped off the elevator on the twenty-ninth floor. We waved to 
the woman at the front desk. Then we hurried to Dad’s office at the end of the 
hall. 

It looks more like a playroom than an office. It’s a big room. Huge, really. 
Filled with toys, and stuffed cartoon characters, movie posters, and models of 
monsters. 

Marty and I love to roam around the office, staring at all the neat stuff. On 
the walls, Dad has great posters from a dozen different movies. On a long table, 
he has a model of The Tumbler, the upside-down roller coaster he designed. The 
model has little cars that really screech around the tracks. 

And he has a lot of cool stuff from Shock Street —like one of the original 
furry paws that Wolf Girl wore in Nightmare on Shock Street. He keeps it in a 
glass case on the windowsill. 

He has models of tramcars and little trains and planes and rockets. Even a 
big, silver plastic blimp. It’s radio-controlled, and he can make it float round and 
around his office. 

What a great place! I always think of Dad’s office as the happiest place in 
the world. 

But today, as Marty and I stepped inside, Dad didn’t look too happy. He 
hunched over his desk with the telephone to his ear. His head was lowered, his 
eyes down. He kept a hand pressed against his forehead as he mumbled into the 
phone. 

Dad and I don’t look at all alike. I’m short and dark. He’s tall and thin. And 
he has blond hair, although there’s not much left of it. He’s pretty bald. 

He has the kind of skin that turns red easily. 

His cheeks get real pink when he talks. And he wears big, round glasses 
with dark frames that hide his brown eyes. 

Marty and I stopped at the doorway. I don’t think Dad saw us. He stared 
down at the desk. He had his tie pulled down and his shirt collar open. 

He muttered for a short while longer. Marty and I crept into the office. 

Finally, Dad set down the phone. He raised his eyes and saw us. “Oh, hi, 
you two,” he said softly. His cheeks turned bright pink. 

“Dad—what’s wrong?” I asked. 

He sighed. Then he pulled off his glasses and pinched the bridge of his 
nose. “I have very bad news, Erin. Very bad news.” 



4 


“Dad—what is it? What?” I cried. 

Then I saw the grin slowly spread across his face. I knew I’d been tricked 
again. 

“Gotcha!” he declared. His brown eyes flashed gleefully. His cheeks were 
bright pink. “Gotcha again. You fall for that gag every time.” 

“Dad—!” I let out an angry cry. Then I rushed up to the desk, wrapped my 
hands around his neck, and pretended to strangle him. 

We both collapsed against each other, laughing. Marty still stood in the 
doorway, shaking his head. “Mr. Wright, that is so lame,” he muttered. 

Dad struggled to slip his glasses back on. “I’m sorry. You kids are just too 
easy to fool. I couldn’t resist.” He smiled at me. “Actually, I’ve got good news.” 

“Good news? Is this another joke?” I demanded suspiciously. 

He shook his head. He picked up something from his desk. “Check this out, 
guys. Do you know what this is?” He held it in his palm. 

Marty and I came closer to examine it. It was a little, white plastic vehicle 
with four wheels. “Some kind of train car?” I guessed. 

“It’s a tramcar,” Dad explained. “See? People sit on long benches inside it. 
Here. It’s motor-driven.” He pointed to the front of the model to show where the 
engine went. “But do you know where this tramcar will be used?” 

“Dad, we give up. Just tell us,” I insisted impatiently. “Stop keeping us in 
suspense.” 

“Okay, okay.” His cheeks reddened. His smile grew wider. “This is a model 
of the tram that will be used at the Shocker Studio Tour.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Do you mean the tour is finally going to open?” 
I knew that Dad had been working on it for years. 

Dad nodded. “Yes. We’re finally about to open it to the public. But before 
we do, I want you two to test it out.” 

“Huh? You mean it?” I shrieked. I was so excited, I felt as if I’d burst out of 
my skin! 

I turned to Marty. He was leaping up and down, shooting both fists into the 
air. “Yes! Yes! Yes!” 

“I built this whole tour,” Dad said, “and I want you two to be the first kids 



in the world to go on it. I want to know your opinion. What you like and what 
you don’t like.” 

“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty kept leaping into the air. I thought I might have to 
tie a rope around his waist and hold onto it to keep him from floating away! 

“Dad—the Shock Street movies are the bestl” I cried. “This is awesome!” 
And then I added, “Is the tour very scary?” 

Dad rested a hand on my shoulder. “I hope so,” he replied. “I tried to make 
it as scary and real as I could. You get on the tram and you ride through the 
whole movie studio. You get to meet all of the characters from the horror 
movies. And then the tram takes you on a slow ride down Shock Street.” 

“The real Shock Street?” Marty cried. “Do you mean it? You get to ride 
down the real street where they make the movies?” 

Dad nodded. “Yes. The real Shock Street.” 

“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty started pumping his fists in the air again, shouting 
like a maniac. 

“Awesome!” I cried. “Totally awesome!” I was as excited as Marty. 

Suddenly Marty stopped leaping. His expression turned serious. “Maybe 
Erin shouldn’t go,” he told my dad. “She gets too scared.” 

“Huh?” I cried. 

“She was so scared during the movie sneak preview, I had to hold her 
hand,” Marty told Dad. 

What a liar! 

“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. “If anyone was a scaredy-cat wimp, it 
was you, Marty!” 

Dad raised both hands to signal halt. “Calm down, guys,” he said softly. 
“No arguing. You have to keep together. You know, you two will be the only 
ones on the tour tomorrow. The only ones.” 

“Yes!” Marty cheered happily. “Yes! Yes!” 

“Wow! That’s great!” I cried. “It’s totally great. It’s going to be the best!” 
Then I had an idea. “Can Mom come too? I bet she would really enjoy it.” 

“Excuse me?” Dad squinted at me through his glasses. His whole face 
turned bright red. “What did you say?” 

“I asked if Mom could come too,” I repeated. 

Dad kept staring at me for a long time, studying me. “Are you feeling okay, 
Erin?” he asked finally. 

“Yes. Fine,” I replied meekly. 



I suddenly felt very confused and upset. What had I done wrong? 
Was something wrong with Mom? 

Why was Dad staring at me like that? 



5 


Dad came around the desk and put an arm around my shoulder. “I think you and 
Marty will have a better time if you go by yourselves,” he said softly. “Don’t you 
agree?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” 

I still wondered why he was staring at me so suspiciously. But I decided not 
to ask him. I didn’t want him to get angry or something and change his mind 
about us going on the tour. 

“Do you mean you’re not coming with us?” Marty asked Dad. “We’re 
really going by ourselves?” 

“I want you to go by yourselves,” Dad replied. “I think that will make it 
more exciting for you.” 

Marty grinned at me. “I hope it’s really scary!” he declared. 

“Don’t worry,” Dad replied. A strange smile spread over his face. “You 
won’t be disappointed.” 

The next afternoon, a gray haze hung in the air as Dad drove Marty and me 
to Shocker Studios. 

I sat up front with Dad, peering out the car window at the smog. “It’s so 
gloomy out,” I murmured. 

“Perfect for a horror movie tour,” Marty chimed in from the backseat. He 
was so excited, he could barely sit still. He kept bouncing his legs up and down 
and tapping his hands on the leather seat. 

I had never seen Marty so crazed. If he didn’t have his seat belt to hold him 
down, he’d probably bounce right out of the car! 

The car climbed up the Hollywood hills. The narrow road curved past 
redwood houses and tree-filled yards cut into the sides of the hills. 

As we climbed, the sky turned even darker. We’re driving up into a cloud of 
fog, I thought. Far in the distance, I could see the HOLLYWOOD sign, 
stretching in the haze across a dark peak. 

“Hope it doesn’t rain,” I muttered, watching the fog roll over the sign. 

Dad chuckled. “You know it never rains in Los Angeles!” 

“Which monsters are we going to see?” Marty asked, bouncing in the 
backseat. “Is Shockro on the tour? Do we really get to walk on Shock Street?” 



Dad squinted hard through his glasses, turning the wheel as the road curved 
and twisted. “I’m not telling,” he replied. “I don’t want to spoil it for you. I want 
it all to be a surprise.” 

“I just wanted to know so I could warn Erin,” Marty said. “I don’t want her 
to get too scared. She might faint or something.” He laughed. 

I let out an angry growl. Then I turned around and tried to punch him. But I 
couldn’t reach. 

Marty leaned forward and messed up my hair with both hands. “Get off 
me!” I screamed. “I’m warning you—!” 

“Take it easy, guys,” Dad said softly. “We’re here.” 

I turned and stared out the windshield. The road had flattened out. Up 
ahead, an enormous sign proclaimed SHOCKER STUDIOS in scary, blood-red 
letters. 

We drove slowly up to the huge iron gates in the front. The gates were 
closed. A guard in a small black booth sat reading a newspaper. I glimpsed gold 
script letters above the gate. They spelled out one word: BEWARE. 

Dad pulled right up to the gate, and the guard peered up. He gave Dad a big 
smile. Then he pressed a button, and the gates slowly swung open. Dad drove 
the car into the tall white parking garage beside the studio. He parked in the first 
space next to the entrance. The garage seemed to stretch on forever. But I could 
see only three or four other cars inside. 

“When we open next week, this garage will be jammed!” Dad said. “There 
will be thousands of people here. I hope.” 

“And today, we’re the only ones!” Marty cried excitedly, jumping out of the 
car. 

“We’re so lucky!” I agreed. 

A few minutes later, we were standing on the platform outside the main 
building, facing a wide street, waiting for the tram to take us on the tour. The 
street led to dozens of white studio buildings, spread out all the way down the 
hill. 

Dad pointed to two enormous buildings as big as airplane hangars. “Those 
are the soundstages,” he explained. “They film a lot of movie scenes inside those 
buildings.” 

“Does the tour go inside them?” Marty demanded. “Where is Shock Street? 
Where are the monsters? Are they making a movie now? Can we watch them 
making it?” 



“Whoa!” Dad cried. He placed his hands on Marty’s shoulders as if to keep 
him from flying off the ground. I had never seen Marty so totally wired! “Take it 
easy, fella,” Dad warned. “You’ll blow a fuse! You won’t survive the tour!” 

I shook my head. “Maybe we should put him on a leash,” I told Dad. 

“Arf, arf!” Marty barked. Then he snapped his teeth at me, trying to bite 
me. 

I shivered. The fog rolled in from the hills. The air felt damp and cold. The 
sky darkened. 

Two men in business suits came zooming along the street in a golf cart. 
They were both talking at once. One of them waved to Dad. 

“Can we ride in one of those carts?” Marty asked. “Can Erin and I each 
have our own cart?” 

“No way,” Dad told him. “You have to take the automated tram. And 
remember—stay in the tramcar. No matter what.” 

“You mean we can’t walk on Shock Street?” Marty whined. 

Dad shook his head. “Not allowed. You have to stay on the tram.” 

He turned to me. “I’ll be waiting for you here on the platform when you get 
back. I want a full report. I want to know what you like and what you don’t like. 
And don’t worry if things don’t work exactly right. There are still a few bugs to 
work out.” 

“Hey—here comes the tram!” Marty cried, hopping up and down and 
pointing. 

The tram came rolling silently around the corner. I counted six tramcars in 
all. They were shaped like roller-coaster cars, open on top—only much longer 
and wider. The cars were black. A grinning white skull was painted on the front 
of the first car. 

A young, red-haired woman wearing a black uniform was seated on the first 
bench in the front car. She waved to us as the tram rolled up to the platform. She 
was the only passenger. 

She hopped out as the tram stopped. “Hi, I’m Linda. I’m your tour guide.” 
She smiled at my dad. Her red hair fluttered in the wind. 

“Hello, Linda,” Dad said, smiling back at her. He gently shoved Marty and 
me forward. “Here are your first two victims.” 

Linda laughed and asked us our names. We told her. 

“Can we ride in front?” Marty asked eagerly. 

“Yes, of course,” Linda replied. “You can sit anywhere you want. This 



whole ride is just for you.” 

“All right!” Marty cried. He slapped me a high five. 

Dad laughed. “I think Marty is ready to begin,” he told Linda. 

Linda pushed her red hair out of her face. “You can start right away, guys. 
But first, there’s something I have to do.” 

She leaned over the tramcar and tugged out a black canvas bag. “This will 
only take a second, guys.” She pulled a red plastic gun from the bag. “This is a 
Shocker Stun Ray Blaster.” 

She gripped the plastic pistol tightly. It looked like something in a Star Trek 
movie. Her smile faded. Her green eyes narrowed. “Be careful with these 
blasters, guys. They can freeze a monster in its tracks from twenty feet.” 

She handed the blaster to me. Then she reached into her bag to get one for 
Marty. “Don’t fire them unless you have to.” She swallowed hard and bit her 
lower lip. “I sure hope you don’t have to.” 

I laughed. “You’re kidding—right? These are just toys—right?” 

She didn’t answer. She pulled another blaster from her bag and started to 
bring it to Marty. 

But she stumbled over a cord on the platform. “Ohh!” She let out a startled 
cry as the blaster went off in her hand. 

A loud buzz. A bright ray of yellow light. 

And Linda stood frozen on the platform. 



6 


“Linda! Linda!” I screamed. 

Marty’s mouth dropped open. He let out a choked gurgle. 

I turned to Dad. To my surprise, he was laughing. 

“Dad—she’s—she’s frozen!” I cried. But when I turned back to Linda, she 
had a big smile on her face, too. 

It took us both a while, but we soon realized the whole thing was a joke. 

“That’s the first shock on the Shocker tour,” Linda announced, lowering the 
red blaster. She put a hand on Marty’s shoulder. “I think I really shocked you, 
Marty!” 

“No way!” Marty insisted. “I knew it was a joke. I just played along.” 

“Come on, Marty!” I cried, rolling my eyes. “You nearly dropped your 
teeth!” 

“Erin, I wasn’t scared,” Marty insisted sharply. “Really. I just went along 
with the joke. Do you really think I’d fall for a dumb plastic blaster gun?” 

Marty is such a jerk. Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared? 

“Climb in, you two,” Dad urged. “Let’s get this show on the road.” 

Marty and I climbed into the front seat of the tram. I looked for a seat belt 
or a safety bar, but there wasn’t one. “Are you coming with us?” I asked Linda. 

She shook her head. “No. You’re on your own. The tram moves 
automatically.” She handed Marty his Stun Blaster. “Hope you don’t need it.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Marty muttered, rolling his eyes. “This gun is so babyish.” 

“Remember—I’ll meet you back here at the end of the ride,” Dad said. He 
waved. “Enjoy it. I want a full report.” 

“Don’t get out of the tram,” Linda reminded us. “Keep your head and arms 
inside. And don’t stand up while the tram is moving.” 

She stepped on a blue button on the platform. The tram started up with a 
jolt. Marty and I were thrown back against the seat. Then the tram rolled 
smoothly forward. 

“First stop is The Haunted House of Horror!” Linda called after us. “Good 
luck!” 

I turned back to see her waving to us, her long red hair fluttering in the 
wind. A strong breeze blew against us as the tram made its way down the hill. 



The sky was nearly as dark as night. Some of the white studio buildings were 
hidden by the fog. 

“Stupid gun,” Marty muttered, rolling it around in his hands. “Why do we 
need this plastic gun? I hope the whole tour isn’t this babyish.” 

“I hope you don’t complain all afternoon,” I told him, frowning. “Do you 
realize how awesome this is? We’re going to see all the great creatures from the 
Shocker movies.” 

“Think we’ll see Shockro?” he asked. Shockro is his favorite. I guess 
because he’s so totally gross. 

“Probably,” I replied, my eyes on the low buildings we were passing. They 
all stood dark and empty. 

“I want to see Wolf Boy and Wolf Girl,” Marty said, counting the monsters 
off on his fingers. “And... the Piranha People, and Captain Sick, The Great 
Gopher Mutant, and—” 

“Wow! Look!” I cried, pounding his shoulder and pointing. 

As the tram turned a sharp corner, The Haunted House of Horror loomed 
darkly in front of us. The roof and its tall stone turrets were hidden by the fog. 
The rest of the mansion stood gray against the dusky sky. 

The tram took us nearer. Tall weeds choked the front lawn. The weeds bent 
and swayed in the wind. The gray shingles on the house were chipped and 
peeling. Pale green light, dim, eerie light, floated out from the tall window in 
front. 

As we rode closer, I could see a rusty iron porch swing—swinging by itself! 
—on a broken, rotting porch. 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. 

“It looks a lot smaller than in the movie,” Marty grumbled. 

“It’s exactly the same house!” I cried. 

“Then why does it look so much smaller?” he demanded. 

What a complainer. 

I turned away from him and studied The Haunted House. An iron fence 
surrounded the place. As we moved around to the side, the rusty gate swung 
open, squeaking and creaking. 

“Look!” I pointed to the dark windows on the second floor. The shutters all 
flew open at once, then banged shut again. 

Lights came on in the windows. Through the window shades, I could see 
the silhouettes of skeletons hanging, swinging slowly back and forth. 



“That’s kind of cool,” Marty said. “But not too scary.” He raised his plastic 
gun and pretended to shoot at the skeletons. 

We circled The Haunted House of Horrors once. We could hear screams of 
terror from inside. The shutters banged again and again. The porch swing 
continued to creak back and forth, back and forth, as if taken by a ghost. 

“Are we going inside or not?” Marty demanded impatiently. 

“Sit back and stop complaining,” I said sharply. “The ride just started. 
Don’t spoil it for me, okay?” 

He stuck his tongue out at me. But he settled back against the seat. We 
heard a long howl, and then a shrill scream of horror. 

The tram made its way silently to the back of the house. A gate swung open 
and we rolled through it. We moved quickly through the overgrown, weed- 
choked backyard. 

The tram picked up speed. We bounced over the lawn. Up to the back door. 
A wooden sign above the door read: ABANDON ALL HOPE. 

We’re going to crash right into the door! I thought. I ducked and raised my 
hands to shield myself. 

But the door creaked open, and we burst inside. 

The tram slowed. I lowered my hands and sat up. We were in a dark, dust- 
covered kitchen. An invisible ghost cackled, an evil laugh. Battered pots and 
pans covered the wall. As we passed, they clattered to the floor. 

The oven door opened and closed by itself. The teapot on the stove started 
to whistle. Dishes on the shelves rattled. The cackling grew louder. 

“This is pretty creepy,” I whispered. 

“Ooh. Thrills and chills!” Marty replied sarcastically. He crossed his arms 
in front of him. “Bor-ring!” 

“Marty—give me a break.” I shoved him away. “You can be a bad sport if 
you want. But don’t ruin it for me.” 

That seemed to get to him. He muttered, “Sorry,” and scooted back next to 
me. 

The tram moved out of the dark kitchen, into an even darker hallway. 
Paintings of goblins and ugly creatures hung on the hallway walls. 

As we approached a closet door, it sprang open—and a shrieking skeleton 
popped out in front of us, its jaws open, its arms jutting out to grab us. 

I screamed. Marty laughed. 

The skeleton snapped back into the closet. The tram turned a corner. I saw 



flickering light up ahead. 

We rode into a large, round room. “It’s the living room,” I whispered to 
Marty. I raised my eyes to the flickering light and saw a chandelier above our 
heads, with a dozen burning candles. 

The tram stopped beneath it. The chandelier began to shake. Then, with a 
hiss, the candles ah flickered out at once. 

The room plunged into darkness. 

Then a deep laugh echoed all around us. 

I gasped. 

“Welcome to my humble home!” a deep voice suddenly boomed. 

“Who is that?” I whispered to Marty. “Where is it coming from?” No reply. 
“Hey—Marty?” I turned to him. “Marty—?” He was gone. 



7 


“Marty?” 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze, staring into the darkness. 

Where did he go? I asked myself. He knows we aren’t supposed to leave the 
tramcar. Did he climb out? 

No. 

If he had, I would have heard him. 

“Marty?” 

Someone grabbed my arm. 

I heard a soft laugh. Marty’s laugh. 

“Hey—where are you? I can’t see you!” I cried. 

“I can’t see you, either,” he replied. “But I didn’t move. I’m still sitting 
right next to you.” 

“Huh?” I reached out and felt the sleeve of his shirt. 

“This is cool!” Marty declared. “I’m waving my arms, but I can’t see a 
thing. You really can’t see me?” 

“No,” I replied. “I thought—” 

“It’s some kind of trick with the lights,” he said. “Black light or something. 
Some kind of neat movie special effect.” 

“Well, it creeped me out,” I confessed. “I really thought you disappeared.” 

“Sucker,” he sneered. 

And then we both jumped. 

A fire suddenly blazed in the big brick fireplace. Bright orange light filled 
the room. A big black armchair spun around to reveal a grinning skeleton. 

The skeleton raised its bony yellowed head. The jaws moved. “I hope you 
like my house,” its voice boomed. “Becauseyou will never leave!” 

It tossed back its head and let out an evil cackle. 

The tram jolted to a start. We rumbled out of the living room. Into a long, 
dark hallway. The skeleton’s laugh followed us into the hall. 

I fell back against the seat as we picked up speed. 

We whirred around a corner. Down another long hall, so dark I couldn’t see 
the walls. 



Faster. Faster. 

We whipped around another corner. Made another sharp turn. 

We were climbing now. And then we took a sharp dip that made both of us 
throw up our hands and scream. 

Around another sharp turn. Up, up, up. And then we came crashing down. 

A wild roller-coaster ride in total darkness. 

It was awesome. Even better because we didn’t expect it. Marty and I 
screamed our heads off. We bumped hard against each other as the tram whirled 
around in the black halls of The Haunted House of Horrors. Up, up, again—then 
we tilted sharply down. 

I hung on to the front of the car for dear life. I gripped it so hard, both hands 
ached. There was no seat belt, no safety bar. 

What if we tumbled out? I wondered. 

The car tilted sharply sideways, as if reading my frightened thoughts. I let 
out a shriek and lost my grip. I slid against the side of the car. Marty fell on top 
of me. 

I frantically reached out for something to hold on to. 

The car tilted back rightside up. I took a deep breath, slid back into place on 
the long seat. 

“Whoa! That was excellent !” Marty cried, laughing. “Excellent!” 

Gripping the front of the car, I took another deep breath and held it. I was 
trying to slow my racing heart. 

A door swung open in front of us, and we burst through it. 

The car bounced hard. I saw trees. The gray-fogged sky. 

We were back outside. Racing through the backyard. Both of us were tossed 
from side to side as we roared over the weeds, zigzagging through the dark trees. 

“Whoa! Stop!” I choked out. I couldn’t catch my breath. The wind blew 
hard against my face. The tram clattered and squealed as we bumped over the 
rough ground. 

We were out of control. Something had definitely gone wrong with the 

tram. 

Bouncing hard on the plastic seat, holding on tightly, I searched for 
someone who could help us. 

No one in sight. 

We bumped onto the road. The tram started to slow. I turned to Marty. His 
hair was blown over his face. His mouth hung open. His eyes rolled around in 



his head. He was totally dazed. 

The tram slowed, slowed, slowed, until we were creeping smoothly along. 

“That was great]” Marty declared. He smoothed back his hair with both 
hands and grinned at me. I knew he had been scared, too. But he was pretending 
that he enjoyed the crazy, wild ride. 

“Yeah. Great.” I tried to pretend, too. But my voice came out weak and 
shaky. 

“I’m going to tell your dad that the roller-coaster ride through the halls was 
the best]” Marty declared. 

“It was kind of fun,” I agreed. “And kind of scary.” 

Marty turned away from me. “Hey. Where are we?” 

The tram had come to a stop. I pulled myself up and peered around. We had 
parked between two rows of tall evergreen bushes. The bushes were slender, 
shaped like spears reaching up to the sky. 

Above us, the afternoon sun was trying to break through the fog. Rays of 
pale light beamed down from the gray sky. The tall, thin shadows of the bushes 
fell over our tramcar. 

Marty stood up and turned to the back of the tram. “There’s nothing around 
here,” he said. “We’re in the middle of nowhere. Why did we stop?” 

“Do you think—?” I started. But I stopped talking when I saw the bush 
move. 

It wiggled. Then the bush next to it wiggled, too. 

“Marty—” I whispered, tugging his sleeve. I saw two glowing red circles 
behind the bush. Two glowing red eyes] 

“Marty—there’s someone there.” 

Another pair of eyes. And then another pair of eyes. Staring out at us from 
behind the evergreen bushes. 

And then two dark claws. 

And then rustling sounds. The bush tilted as a dark figure leaped out. 
Followed by another. 

Snarling, growling. 

I gasped. Too late to run. 

We were surrounded by the ugly creatures. Snuffling, wheezing creatures, 
who staggered out from the bushes. Reaching out, reaching out for us, they 
began to climb into the tram. 



8 


Marty and I jumped to our feet. 

“Ohhhhhh.” I heard Marty let out a frightened moan. 

I started to back away. I thought maybe I could scramble out the other side 
of the car. 

But the snarling, growling monsters came at us from both sides. 

“L-leave us alone!” I stammered. 

A monster covered in tangled brown fur opened his jaws to reveal long, 
jagged rows of yellow teeth. His hot breath exploded in my face. He stepped 
closer. Then he swiped at me with a fat paw and uttered a menacing roar. “Would 
you like an autograph?” he growled. 

I gaped at him, my mouth hanging down to my knees. “Huh?” 

“Autographed photo?” he asked. He raised his furry paw again. He held a 
black-and-white snapshot in it. 

“Hey—you’re Ape Face!” Marty cried, pointing. 

The hairy creature nodded his head. He raised the photo to Marty. “Want a 
photo? This is the autographing part of the tour.” 

“Yeah! Okay,” Marty replied. 

The big ape pulled a marker from behind his ear and bent to sign the photo 
for Marty. 

Now that my heartbeat was returning to normal, I began to recognize some 
of the other creatures. The guy covered in purple slime was The Toxic Wild 
Man. And I recognized Sweet Sue, the walking-talking baby doll with real hair 
you can brush. Sweet Sue was really a mutant murderer from Mars. 

The frog-faced guy covered from head to toe with purple and brown warts 
was The Fabulous Frog, also known as The Toadinator. He starred in Pond Scum 
and Pond Scum II, two of the scariest movies ever made. 

“Frog—can I have your autograph?” I asked. 

“Grrrbbit. Grrbit.” He croaked and slipped a pen into his wart-covered 
hand. I leaned forward eagerly and watched him sign his photo. It was hard for 
him to write. The pen kept slipping in his slimy frog hands. 

Marty and I collected a bunch of autographs. Then the creatures went 
snarling and wheezing back into the bushes. 



When they were gone, we both burst out laughing. “That was so dumb!” I 
cried. “When I saw them creeping out from behind the bushes, I thought I’d have 
a cow!” I glanced down at the photos. “But it’s kind of cool to get their 
autographs.” 

Marty made a disgusted face. “It’s just a bunch of actors in costumes,” he 
sneered. “It’s for babies.” 

“But—but—they looked so real,” I stammered. “It didn’t look as if they 
were wearing costumes—did it? I mean, The Toadinator’s hands were really 
slimy. And Ape Face’s fur was so real. The masks were awesome. I couldn’t tell 
they were masks.” 

I brushed the hair out of my eyes. “How do they get into those costumes? I 
didn’t see any buttons or zippers, or anything!” 

“That’s because they’re movie costumes,” Marty explained. “They’re better 
than regular costumes.” 

Mr. Know-It-All. 

The tram started to back out. I settled down into the seat. I watched the two 
rows of evergreen bushes fade into the distance. 

Down the long, sloping hill, I could see the white studio buildings. I 
wondered if they were making a movie on one of the soundstages. I wondered if 
the tram would take us to watch them shoot. 

I could see two golf carts moving along the road. 

They were carrying people down to the sound-stage buildings. 

The sun still struggled to shine through the fog. The tram bounced over the 
grass, up the hill. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as we turned sharply and headed back toward the trees. 

“Please remain in the car at all times.” A woman’s voice burst from a 
speaker in the tram car. “Your next stop will be The Cave of The Living Creeps.” 

“The Cave of The Living Creeps? Wow! That sounds scary!” Marty 
exclaimed. 

“Sure does!” I agreed. 

We had no idea just how scary it would turn out to be. 



9 


The tram zigzagged its way through the trees. Their shadows rolled over us like 
dark ghosts. 

We moved so silently. I tried to imagine what the ride would be like if the 
tram was packed with excited kids and adults. I decided it would be a lot less 
scary with a crowd. 

But I wasn’t complaining. Marty and I were really lucky to be the first kids 
ever to try out this ride. 

“Wow!” Marty grabbed my arm as The Cave of The Living Creeps loomed 
in front of us. The mouth of the cave was a huge dark hole, cut into the side of 
the hill. I could see pale, silvery light flickering past the entrance. 

The tram slowed down as we approached the dark opening. A sign above 
the entrance had one word carved roughly into it: FAREWELL. 

The tramcar lurched forward. “Hey—!” I cried out and ducked my head. 
What a tight squeeze! 

Into the dim, flickering light. 

The air instantly grew colder. And damp. A sour, earthy smell rose to my 
nostrils, making me gasp. 

“Bats!” Marty whispered. “What do you think, Erin? Think there are bats in 
here?” He leaned close and let out an evil laugh in my ear. 

Marty knows that I hate bats! 

I know, I know. Bats aren’t really evil creatures. And they aren’t dangerous. 
Bats eat mosquitoes and other insects. And they don’t attack people or get 
tangled in your hair or try to suck your blood. That’s only in movies. 

I know all that. But I don’t care. 

Bats are ugly and creepy and disgusting. And I hate them. 

One day, I told Marty how much I hate bats. And so he’s been teasing me 
about them ever since. 

The tram moved deeper into the cave. The air grew colder. The sour aroma 
nearly choked me. 

“Look—over there!” Marty screamed. “A vampire bat!” 

“Huh? Where?” I couldn’t help myself. I cried out in alarm. 

Of course it was one of Marty’s dumb jokes. He laughed like a maniac. 



I growled at him and punched him hard on the shoulder. “You’re not funny. 
You’re just dumb.” 

That made him giggle even harder. “I’ll bet there are bats in this cave,” he 
insisted. “You can’t go into a deep, dark cave like this one without seeing bats.” 

I turned away from his grinning face and listened hard. I was listening for 
fluttering bat wings. I didn’t hear any. 

The cave narrowed. The walls seemed to close in on us. The side of the car 
scraped against the dirt wall. I could feel that we were heading down. 

In the dim, silvery light, I saw a long row of pointy icicle-type things 
hanging down from the cave ceiling. I know they have a name, but I can never 
remember which one it is—stalagmites or stalactites. 

I ducked my head again as the tram shot under them. Up close, they looked 
like pointed elephant tusks. 

“We’re getting closer to the bats!” Marty teased. 

I ignored him. I kept my eyes straight ahead. The cave grew wide again. 
Dark shadows shifted and danced over the walls as we rolled past. 

“Ohhh.” I uttered a groan as I felt something cold and slimy drop onto the 
back of my neck. 

I jerked away and turned sharply to Marty. “Cut it out!” I snapped. “Get 
your cold hands off me!” 

“Who—me?” 

He wasn’t touching me. Both of his hands gripped the front of the car. 

Then what was on the back of my neck? So cold and wet. Icy wet. I 
shuddered. My whole body shook. 

“M-Marty!” I stammered. “H-help!” 

Marty stared at me, confused. “Erin—what’s your problem?” 

“The back of my neck—” I choked out. 

I could feel the cold, wet thing start to move. I decided not to wait for 
Marty to help me. 

I reached back and pulled it off. It felt sticky and cold between my fingers. 
It slithered and wriggled, and I dropped it on the seat. 

A worm! 

A huge, long white worm. So cold, so wet and cold. 

“Weird!” Marty exclaimed. He leaned close to examine it. “I’ve never seen 
a worm that big! And it’s white.” 

“It—it dropped from the ceiling,” I said, watching it wiggle next to me. 



“It’s ice-cold.” 

“Huh? Let me touch it,” Marty said. He raised his hand and slowly lowered 
his pointer finger to the worm. 

His finger poked the worm in its middle. 

And then Marty opened his mouth in a scream of horror that echoed 
through the cave. 



10 


“What is it? Marty—what’s wrong?” I shrieked. 

“I—I—I—” He couldn’t speak. He could only utter, “I—I—I—!” His eyes 
bulged. His tongue flopped out. 

He reached up and pulled a white worm off the top of his head. “I—I—I got 
one too!” 

“Yuck!” I cried. His worm was nearly as long as a shoelace! 

We both tossed our worms out of the tram. 

But then I felt a soft, damp plop on my shoulder. And then a cold plop on 
top of my head. Another on my forehead, like a cold slap. 

“Ohhh—help!” I moaned. I started thrashing my arms, grabbing at the 
worms, struggling to pull them off me. 

“Marty—please!” I turned to him for help. 

But he was battling them, too. Twisting and ducking. Trying to dodge, as 
more and more white worms fell from the ceiling. 

I saw one fall on his shoulder. I saw another one begin to wrap itself around 
his ear. 

As fast as I could, I pulled the sticky, wet creatures off me and tossed them 
over the side of the slow-rolling tram. 

Where are they coming from? I wondered. 

I glanced up—and a fat, wet one fell over my eyes. 

“Yeowwww!” I let out a shriek, grabbed it, flung it away. 

The tram turned sharply, sending us both sliding over the seat. The cave 
narrowed again as we entered a different tunnel. The silvery light glowed dimly 
around us as we bounced forward. 

Two white worms, each at least a foot long, wriggled across my lap. I 
tugged them off and heaved them over the tram. 

Breathing hard, I searched for more. My whole body itched. The back of 
my neck tingled. I couldn’t stop shaking. 

“They stopped falling,” Marty announced in a shaky voice. 

Then why did I still itch? 

I rubbed the back of my neck. Stood up and searched the seat, then the 
floor. I found one last worm, climbing over my shoe. I kicked it away, then 



dropped back onto the seat with a loud sigh. 

“That was totally gross!” I wailed. 

Marty scratched his chest, then rubbed his face with both hands. “I guess 
that’s why they call it The Cave of The Living Creeps,” he said. He swept a hand 
back through his black hair. 

I shivered. I couldn’t stop itching. I knew the worms were gone, but I could 
still feel them. “Those disgusting white worms—do you think they were alive?” 

Marty shook his head. “Of course not. They were fakes.” He snickered. “I 
guess they fooled you, huh?” 

“They sure felt real,” I replied. “And the way they wriggled around—” 

“They were robots or something,” Marty said, scratching his knees. 
“Everything here is fake. It has to be.” 

“I’m not so sure,” I said, my whole body still itchy and tingling. 

“Well, just ask your father,” Marty replied grumpily. 

I had to laugh. I knew why Marty was suddenly so grouchy. Whether the 
worms were real or fake, they had scared him. And he knew that I knew that he 
had been frightened. 

“I don’t think little kids will like the worms,” Marty said. “I think they’ll 
get too scared. I’m going to tell that to your dad.” 

I started to reply—and felt something drop over me. Something scratchy 
and dry. 

It covered my face, my shoulders—my entire body. 

I shot both hands up and tried to push it away. It’s some kind of a net, I 
thought. 

I grabbed at it, desperate to get it off my face. As I struggled, I turned and 
saw Marty squirming and batting his arms, caught under the same net. 

The tram bounced through the dim cave tunnel. The sticky net felt like 
cotton candy on my skin. 

Marty let out a yelp. “It—it’s a big spider-web!” he stammered. 

I tugged and grabbed and pulled. But the sticky threads clung to my face, 
my arms, and my clothes. “Yuck! This is so gross!” I choked out. 

And then I saw the black dots scurrying through the net. It took me a few 
seconds to realize what they were. Spiders! Hundreds of them! 

“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat. 

I batted the spiderweb with both hands. I rubbed my cheeks frantically, 
trying to scrape away the sticky threads. I pulled a spider off my forehead. 



Another one off the shoulder of my T-shirt. 

“The spiders—they’re in my hair!” Marty wailed. 

He suddenly forgot about acting cool. He began raking his hair with both 
hands, slapping himself in the head, pinching and swiping at the spiders. 

As the tram rolled silently on, we both twisted and squirmed, struggling to 
flick away the black spiders. I pulled three of them out of my hair. Then I felt 
one climb into my nose! 

I opened my mouth in a horrified scream—and sneezed it out. 

Marty plucked a spider off my neck and sent it soaring through the air. The 
last spider. I couldn’t see—or feel—any more. 

We both dropped down in the seat, breathing hard. My heart pounded in my 
chest. “Still think everything is a fake?” I asked Marty, my voice weak and 
small. 

“I—I don’t know,” he replied softly. “The spiders could be puppets maybe. 
You know. Radio-controlled.” 

“They were realV I cried sharply. “Face it, Marty—they were real! This is 
The Cave of The Living Creeps—and they were living !” 

Marty’s eyes grew wide. “You really think so?” 

I nodded. “They had to be real spiders.” 

A smile spread over Marty’s face. “That’s so coo/!” he declared. “Real 
spiders! That is totally cool!” 

I let out a long sigh and slumped lower in the seat. I didn’t think it was cool 
at all. I thought it was creepy and disgusting. 

These rides are supposed to be fake. That’s what makes them fun. I decided 
to tell my dad that the worms and spiders were too scary. He should get rid of 
them before the studio tour opens to the public. 

I crossed my arms in front of me and kept my eyes straight ahead. I 
wondered what we would mn into next. I hoped there weren’t any other 
disgusting insects waiting to fall on us and climb all over our faces and bodies. 

“I think I hear the bats!” Marty teased. He leaned close to me, grinning. 
“Hear those fluttering sounds? Giant vampire bats!” 

I shoved him back to his side of the seat. I wasn’t in any mood for his 
joking around. 

“When do we get out of this cave?” I asked impatiently. “This isn’t any 

fun.” 

“I think it’s cool,” Marty repeated. “I like exploring caves.” 



The narrow tunnel opened into a wide cavern. The ceiling appeared to be a 
mile high. There were giant rocks scattered over the cavern floor. Rocks piled on 
rocks. Rocks everywhere. 

Somewhere ahead of us, I heard water dripping. Plunk plunk plunk. 

Eerie green light glowed from the cave walls. The tram pulled up to the 
back wall—and then stopped. 

“Now what?” I whispered. 

Marty and I turned in our seat, letting our eyes explore the huge cavern. All 
I could see were rocks. Smooth rocks, some round, some square. 

Plunk plunk plunk. Water dripped somewhere to our right. The air felt cold 
and damp. 

“This is kind of boring,” Marty murmured. “When do we get going?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know. Why did we stop here? It’s just a big empty 
cave.” 

We waited for the tram to back up and take us out of there. 

And waited. 

A minute went by. Then another few minutes. 

We both turned around and got up on our knees, peering to the back of the 
tram. Nothing moved. We listened to the steady drip of water, echoing off the 
high stone walls. No other sound. 

Leaning forward against the seatback, I cupped my hands around my mouth 
and shouted. “Hey—can anybody hear us?” 

I waited, listening. No reply. 

“Can anybody hear us?” I tried again. “I think we’re stuck here!” 

No reply. Just the steady drip drip drip. 

I waited, squinting hard into the glow of green light. 

Why wouldn’t the tram get moving? Had it broken down? Were we really 
stuck here? 

I turned to Marty. “What’s up with this tram? Do you think we’re—HEY!” 

I gasped as I stared at the empty seat beside me. 

I reached both hands out. I grabbed for Marty. 

Another lighting trick? Another optical illusion? 

“Marty? Hey—Marty?” I croaked. 

A cold shiver rolled down my back. 

This time Marty was really gone. 



11 


“Marty—?” 

A scraping sound beside the tram made me jump. 

I spun around and saw Marty grinning at me from the cave floor. “Gotcha.” 

“You creep!” I shouted. I swung my fist, but he dodged away, laughing. 
“You’re The Living Creep!” I cried. “You deliberately tried to scare me.” 

“It isn’t too hard a job!” he shot back. His smile faded. “I climbed down to 
check things out.” 

“But the tram might start up any second!” I told him. “You know what that 
tour guide told us. She said we should never leave the tram.” 

Marty squatted down and studied the tires. “I think the tram is stuck or 
something. Maybe it came off its tracks.” He raised his eyes to me and shook his 
head fretfully. “But there aren’t any tracks.” 

“Marty—get back in,” I pleaded. “If it starts up and leaves you standing 
there—” 

He grabbed the side of the car with both hands and shook it. The tramcar 
bounced on its tires. But it didn’t move. 

“I think it broke down,” Marty said softly. “Your father said that some 
things might not work.” 

I felt a stab of fear in my chest. “You mean we’re stranded here? All by 
ourselves in this creepy cave?” 

He stepped to the front of the car and squeezed between the tram and the 
cave wall. Then he tried to push the tram back, shoving with both hands as hard 
as he could. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

“Oh, wow,” I muttered, shaking my head. “This is horrible. This isn’t any 
fun at all.” 

I got back up on my knees on the seat and tried shouting again, as loud as I 
could: “Is anybody in here? Does anybody work here? The tram is stuck!” 

Plunk plunk plunk. The dripping water was my only reply. 

“Can somebody help us?” I shouted. “Please—can somebody help?” 

No answer. 

“Now what?” I cried. 



Marty was still shoving with all his might against the front of the tram. He 
gave one last hard push, then gave up with a sigh. “You’d better climb down,” he 
said. “We have to walk.” 

“Huh? Walk? In this creepy dark cave? No way, Marty!” 

He came around to my side of the car. “You’re not afraid —are you, Erin?” 

“Yes, I am,” I confessed. “A little.” I glanced around the huge cavern. “I 
don’t see any exits. We’d have to walk back through those tunnels. With all the 
spiders and worms and everything.” 

“We can find a way out,” Marty insisted. “There’s got to be a door 
somewhere. They always build emergency exits in these theme park rides.” 

“I think we should stay in the tram,” I said uncertainly. “If we stay here and 
wait, someone will come and find us.” 

“It could take days,” Marty declared. “Come on, Erin. I’m going to walk. 
Are you coming with me?” 

I shook my head, my arms crossed tightly in front of me. “No way,” I 
insisted. “I’m staying here.” 

I knew he wouldn’t go off by himself. I knew he wouldn’t go unless I 
joined him. 

“Well. ’Bye then,” he said. He turned and started walking quickly across the 
cave floor. 

“Hey, Marty—?” 

“’Bye. I’m not waiting here all day. See you later.” 

He was really leaving. Leaving me alone in the stalled tram, in the scary 
cave. “But, Marty—wait!” 

He turned back to me. “Are you coming or not, Erin?” he called back 
impatiently. 

“Okay, okay,” I murmured. I saw that I had no choice. I climbed over the 
side of the tram and dropped to the cave floor. 

The dirt was smooth and damp. I started walking slowly toward Marty. 

“Hurry it up,” he called. “Let’s get out of here.” He was walking backward 
now, motioning for me to catch up to him. 

But I stopped and my mouth dropped open in horror. 

“Don’t look at me like that!” he shouted. “Don’t stare at me as if I’m doing 
something wrong!” 

But I wasn’t staring at Marty. 

I was staring at the thing creeping up behind Marty. 



12 


“Uh... uh... uh...” I struggled to warn Marty, but only frightened grunts escaped 
my throat. 

He kept backing up, backing right into the enormous creature. 

“Erin, get a move on. What’s your problem ?” he demanded. 

“Uh... uh... uh...” I finally managed to point. 

“Huh?” Marty spun around—and saw it, too. “Whoa!” he screamed. His 
sneakers slid on the soft cave floor as he came running back to me. “What is that 
thing?” 

At first, I thought it was some kind of machine. It looked like one of those 
tall steel cranes you see on construction sites. All silvery and metallic. 

But as it rose up on its wire-thin back legs, I saw that it was alive ! 

It had round black eyes the size of billiard balls. They spun wildly in its 
skinny silver skull. Two slender antennae bobbed at the top of the head. Its 
mouth appeared soft, mushy. A gray tongue darted out between long, bristly 
whiskers. 

Its long body stretched back like a folded-up leaf. As it stood, it waved its 
front legs, short white sticks. 

The whole creature looked like some kind of gross stick figure. Its long 
back legs bent and sprang forward, bent then sprang forward. The thick tongue 
swung from side to side. The black eyes stopped whirling and focused on me. 

“Is it—is it a grasshopper ?” I choked out. 

Marty and I had both backed up to the tram. 

Waving its stick arms, the creature sprang closer, its antennae circling 
slowly on top of its head. 

Marty and I pressed our backs against the cold cave wall. We couldn’t move 
back any farther. 

“I think it’s a praying mantis,” Marty replied, staring up at it. The insect had 
to be at least three times as tall as us. As it moved forward, its head nearly 
scraped the cave ceiling. 

The tongue licked its soft, mushy mouth. The mouth puckered and made 
loud sucking sounds. My stomach lurched. The sound was so sick\ 

The round black eyes stared down at Marty and me. The giant praying 



mantis, its body shining like aluminum, took another hopping step toward us. It 
started to lower its head. 

“Wh-what’s it going to do?” I stammered, pressing my back hard against 
the cave wall. 

To my surprise, Marty suddenly started to laugh. 

I turned to him and grabbed his shoulder. Was he totally losing it? 

“Marty—are you okay?” 

“Of course!” he replied. He pulled away from me and took a step toward 
the towering insect. “Why should we be scared, Erin? It’s a big robot. It’s 
programmed to walk up to the tram.” 

“Huh? But, Marty—” 

“It’s all on a computer,” he continued, staring up as the big head bobbed 
lower on its stick body. “It isn’t real. It’s part of the ride.” 

I stared up at the creature. Big drops of saliva rolled off its fat tongue and 
hit the cave floor with a splat. 

“It’s... uh... really lifelike,” I murmured. 

“Your dad is a genius at this stuff!” Marty declared. “We’ll have to tell him 
what a good job he did on the praying mantis.” He laughed. “Your dad said there 
were still some bugs, remember? This must be one of them!” 

The insect rubbed its front legs together. It made a shrill whistling sound. 

I covered my ears. The high-pitched note made my ears ache! 

I was still holding my ears as a second giant praying mantis hopped out 
from behind a tall rock. 

“Look—another one!” Marty cried, pointing. He tugged my arm. “Wow. 
They move so smoothly. You can’t even tell that they’re machines.” 

The two silvery insects chittered at each other, a sharp shrill, metallic 
sound. Their black eyes twirled. Their antennae rotated rapidly, excitedly. 

Gobs of saliva rolled off their tongues and splattered to the floor. The 
second one flashed silvery wings on its back, then quickly closed them up again. 

“Great-looking robots!” Marty declared. He turned to me. “We’d better get 
back in the tram. It’ll probably start up again now that we’ve seen these giant 
bugs.” 

The two insects chittered to each other. They hopped closer, their sticklike 
legs springing hard, bouncing off the smooth cave floor. 

“I hope you’re right,” I told Marty. “Those insects are too real. I want to get 
out of here!” 



I started to follow him to the tramcar. 

The first mantis leaped forward quickly. It hopped between us and the tram, 
blocking our path. 

“Hey—!” I cried. 

We tried to step around it. But it took a big hop to stay in front of us. 

“It—it won’t let us pass!” I stammered. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out as the big creature suddenly swung down and slammed 
its head against my chest. The powerful head-butt sent me sprawling backward. 

“Hey—stop that!” I heard Marty shout. “That machine must be broken!” 

Its black eyes glowing, the mantis lowered its head again—and gave me 
another hard push toward the center of the cave. 

Its partner moved quickly to trap Marty. It lowered its body and prepared to 
head-butt Marty. But Marty quickly backed away, raising his hands in front of 
him like a shield. He hurried to join me. 

I heard scraping sounds. Shrill chirps and chittering. 

I spun around to discover two more huge, ugly mantises climbing out from 
behind rocks. Then two more, their antennae twisting excitedly. Their fat gray 
tongues rolling around their open mouths. 

Marty and I huddled together in the middle of the cavern as the creatures 
hopped and scraped around us. Then they rose up high on their hind legs, their 
black eyes gleaming, their short stick arms waving. 

“We—we’re surrounded!” I cried. 



13 


The giant insects all began chittering at once. They scraped their front legs 
together excitedly. The shrill whistle rose through the cave, echoing off the stone 
walls. 

They formed a circle around us, leaning back on their spindly hind legs. 
Moving closer. Tightening the circle. Their tongues whipped back and forth. 
Thick gobs of mantis saliva hit the floor. 

“They’re out of control!” Marty shrieked. 

“What are they going to do to us?” I cried, covering my ears against their 
excited chirps and the deafening whistle. 

“Maybe they are voice-controlled,” Marty shouted. He tilted back his head 
and shouted up at them: “Stop! Stop!” 

They didn’t stop. 

One of them tilted its silvery head, opened its ugly mouth wide, and spit out 
a black gob. It splattered onto Marty’s sneaker. 

He jumped back. His sneaker stuck to the floor. 

He struggled to tug it free. “Yuck! Watch out! That black stuff—it’s like 
glue!” he cried. 

THOOOM. 

Another mantis opened its mouth wide and spit out a big black gob of 
sticky goo. It splotched the shoulder of my T-shirt. 

“Oww!” I wailed. It was so hot—it burned me right through my shirt. 

The others chittered shrilly and scraped their hairy stick arms. Their 
tongues darting back and forth, they began to lower their heads to us. 

“The stun guns!” I cried, grabbing Marty’s arm. “Maybe the guns will work 
against these bugs!” 

“Those guns are only toys!” he wailed. 

THUPPP. 

Another black gob missed Marty’s foot by inches. 

“Besides, the guns are in the tram,” Marty continued, staring up at the ugly 
creatures. “No way they’ll let us get to the tram.” 

“Then what are we going to do?” I cried. 

As I asked the question, an idea flashed into my mind. 



“Marty—” I whispered. “How do you normally get rid of bugs?” 

“Huh? Erin—what are you talking about?” 

“You step on them—right? Don’t you usually step on them?” 

“But, Erin—” he protested. “These bugs are big enough to step on us!” 

“It’s worth a try!” I cried. 

I raised my sneaker—and tromped as hard as I could on the foot of the 
nearest mantis. 

The giant insect let out a shrill hiss and hopped backward. 

Beside me, Marty stomped on another insect, bringing the heel of his 
sneaker down hard on its spindly foot. That creature fell back, too, raising its 
head in a shrill hiss of pain. Its eyes spun wildly. Its antennae shot straight up. 

I stomped down hard again. With a hoarse choking sound, the big mantis 
fell onto its side. All four stick legs thrashed the air. 

“Let’s go!” I shouted. 

I turned and burst through the circle of insects. I didn’t know where to run. I 
only knew I had to get away. 

The cave erupted in hisses and shrill whistles, angry cluttering and croaks. I 
glimpsed Marty lurching after me. 

I ignored the echoing, ringing sounds and ran. 

Ran to the tram. 

Leaned over the side and grabbed both plastic stun guns into my arms. 

Then I pushed away from the tram and hurtled along the stone cave wall. 

Where could I go? 

How could I escape? 

The cluttering and hissing grew louder, more frantic. The tall shadows of 
the giant insects danced on the wall as I ran. I had the feeling that the shadows 
could reach out and grab me. 

I glanced back. 

Marty came running behind me at full speed. 

The mantises were hopping, scrabbling, limping across the dirt floor after 
us. 

Where to run? Where? 

And then I saw the narrow opening in the cave wall. Just a crack, really. 

But I dove for it. Slipped into it. Squeezed myself into the dark hole 
between the stone. 

And burst out the other side. Into the misty daylight. 



Outside! 

I could see trees tilting down the hill. The road that led down to the studio 
buildings. 

Yes! Outside! I made it! 

I felt so happy. So safe. 

But I didn’t have long to enjoy the feeling. 

As I started to catch my breath, I heard Marty’s terrified cry: “Erin—help! 
Help! They got me! They’re eating me!” 



14 


With a gasp, I spun around. 

How could I help Marty? How could I get him out of the cave? 

To my surprise, he was leaning against the cave wall, one elbow against the 
rock, his legs crossed. A big grin on his round face. 

“April Fools,” he said. 

“YAAAIIIII!” I let out an angry scream. Then I dropped the two plastic 
pistols and rushed at him, ready to pound him with my fists. “You jerk! You 
scared me to death!” 

He laughed and dodged to the side as I came at him. I swung my fist and hit 
air. 

“Don’t play any more dumb jokes like that!” I cried breathlessly. “This 
place is too scary! Those big insects—” 

“Yeah. They were scary,” he agreed, his smile fading. “They were so real! 
How do you think they made them spit like that?” 

I shook my head. “I don’t know,” I muttered. 

I had a heavy feeling in my stomach. I knew it was a crazy idea. But I was 
beginning to think these creatures we were seeing were real. 

Maybe I’ve seen too many scary movies. But the big praying mantises and 
the white worms and all the other creatures and monsters really seemed to be 
alive. 

They didn’t move like mechanical creatures. They appeared to breathe. And 
their eyes focused on Marty and me as if they could really see us. 

I wanted to tell Marty what I was thinking. But I knew he would only laugh 
at me. 

He was so sure that they were all robots and that we were seeing some 
awesome movie special effects. Of course, that made sense. We were on a movie 
studio tour, after all. 

I hoped Marty was right. I hoped it was all tricks. Movie magic. 

My dad was a genius when it came to designing mechanical creatures and 
building theme park rides. And maybe that’s all we were seeing. Maybe Dad had 
really outdone himself this time. 

But the heavy feeling in my stomach wouldn’t go away. I had the feeling 



that we were in danger. Real danger. 

I had the feeling that something had gone wrong here. That something was 
out of control. 

I suddenly wished we weren’t the first two kids to try out the tour. I knew it 
was supposed to be a thrill to be the only ones here. But it was too quiet. Too 
empty. Too scary. It would be so much more fun if hundreds of other people 
were along with us. 

I wanted to tell Marty all this. But how could I? 

He was so eager to prove that he was braver than me. So eager to prove that 
he wasn’t afraid of anything. 

I couldn’t tell him what I was really thinking. 

I picked up the two plastic stun guns and handed him one. I didn’t want to 
carry them both. 

He tucked the barrel of his gun into his jeans pocket. “Hey, Erin—look 
where we are!” he cried. He jogged past me, his eyes straight ahead. “Check it 
out!” 

He started running across the grass. I turned and started to follow him. I 
didn’t want him to get too far ahead. 

The sky had darkened. The sun had disappeared behind a heavy blanket of 
clouds. Wisps of gray fog hung low in the cool air. It was nearly evening. 

We crossed the road and stepped into a town. I mean, it was a movie set of a 
town. A small town with low, one- and two-story buildings, small shops, a 
country-looking general store. Big, old houses in the block beyond the stores. 

“Do you think this is a set they really use in the movies?” I asked, hurrying 
to catch up to Marty. 

He turned to me, his dark eyes flashing with excitement. “Don’t you 
recognize it? Don’t you know where you are?” 

And then my eyes fell on the crumbling, old mansion half-hidden by the 
twisted trees. And across from it, I saw the crooked picket fence that ran around 
the old cemetery. 

And I knew we were on Shock Street. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed, spinning around, trying to take it all in at once. “This 
really is Shock Street. This is where they filmed all of the movies!” 

“It doesn’t look the way I imagined it,” Marty said. “It looks even scarier!” 

He was right. As the sky darkened to evening, long shadows fell over the 
empty buildings. The wind made a moaning sound as it swept around the corner. 



Marty and I made our way down the street, trying to see everything. We 
kept crossing from side to side, peering into a dark, dust-covered shop window 
—then running to examine the front yard of a rundown, old mansion. 

“Check out that empty lot,” I said, pointing. “That’s where The Mad 
Mangier hung out. Remember? In Shocker III? Remember—he mangled 
everyone who walked by?” 

“Of course I remember,” Marty snapped. He stepped into the empty lot. Tall 
weeds bent low, blown by the moaning wind. Shadows moved against the fence 
at the back. 

I stayed on the sidewalk and squinted hard, trying to see what cast the 
shadows. 

Did The Mad Mangier still lurk back there? 

The lot was totally empty. So how could there be tall, shifting shadows on 
the fence? 

“Marty—come back,” I pleaded. “It’s getting dark.” 

He turned back. “Scared, Erin?” 

“It’s just an empty lot,” I told him. “Let’s keep walking.” 

“People always thought it was just an empty lot,” Marty replied in a low, 
scary voice. “Until The Mad Mangier jumped out and mangled them!” He let out 
a long, evil laugh. 

“Marty—you’re losing it,” I murmured, shaking my head. 

He came trotting out of the lot, and we crossed the street. “I wish I had a 
camera,” he said. “I’d really like a picture of me standing in The Mangler’s lot.” 
His eyes lit up. “Or even better—!” 

He didn’t finish his sentence. Instead, he took off, running full speed. 

“Hey—wait up!” I cried. 

A few seconds later, I saw where he was headed. The old cemetery. 

He ran up to the cracked and peeling wooden gate and turned back to me. 
“Even better, I’d like a photo of me standing in the cemetery. The actual set 
where they filmed Cemetery on Shock Street.” 

“We don’t have a camera,” I called from the street. “Get away from there.” 

He ignored me and started to open the gate. The bottom was stuck in the 
grass. Marty tugged hard. Finally, the gate started to pull open, creaking and 
groaning as it moved. 

“Marty—let’s go,” I insisted. “It’s getting late. Dad is probably waiting for 
us, wondering what happened to us.” 



“But this is part of the tour!” he insisted. He tugged the heavy gate open 
just wide enough to squeeze inside the cemetery. 

“Marty—please! Don’t go in!” I begged. I ran up beside him. 

“Erin, it’s just a movie set,” he replied. “You didn’t used to be such a total 
wimp!” 

“I—I just have a bad feeling about this cemetery,” I stammered. “A very 
bad feeling.” 

“It’s part of the tour,” he repeated. 

“But this gate was c/osed!” I cried. “It was closed so that people don’t go 
in.” I raised my eyes to the cemetery. I saw the old graves tilting up from the 
ground like crooked teeth. “I have such a bad feeling...” 

Marty ignored me. He tugged the gate open a little wider and slipped into 
the cemetery. 

“Marty—please—!” I gripped the low fence tightly with both hands and 
watched him. 

He took three steps toward the old graves. Then his hands shot straight up 
in the air—and he dropped out of sight. 



15 


I stared into the darkness, blinking hard. 

I swallowed. Once. Twice. 

I couldn’t believe that he was gone, that he had vanished so quickly. 

The wind moaned between the jagged, tilting gravestones. 

“Marty—?” My voice came out in a choked whisper. “Marty?” 

I gripped the picket fence so hard, my hands ached. I knew I had no choice. 
I had to go in there and see what had happened to him. 

I took a deep breath and pushed myself through the opening. The ground 
was soft. My sneakers sank into the tall grass. 

I took one step. 

Then another. 

I stopped when I heard Marty’s voice. “Hey—be careful.” 

“Huh?” I gazed around. “Where are you?” 

“Down here.” 

I peered down—into a deep, dark hole. An open grave. Marty stared up at 
me. He had dirt on his cheeks and down the front of his T-shirt. He raised both 
hands. “Help me out. I fell!” 

I had to laugh. He looked ridiculous, standing in that hole, covered in dirt. 

“It’s not funny. Help me out,” he repeated impatiently. 

“I warned you,” I said. “I had a bad feeling.” 

“It smells down here,” Marty complained. 

I leaned down. “What does it smell like?” 

“Like dirt. Get me out!” 

“Okay, okay.” I grabbed his hands and tugged. He kicked his feet, digging 
his toes of his sneakers into the soft dirt. 

A few seconds later, he was back on the ground, frantically brushing 
himself off. “That was cool!” he declared. “Now I can tell people I was in a 
grave in The Shock Street Cemetery.” 

A chill ran down my back as the wind picked up. “Let’s get out of here,” I 
pleaded. 

Something gray floated silently between two old gravestones. A wisp of 



fog? A gray cat? 

“Check out these graves,” Marty said, still brushing dirt off his jeans. 
“They’re all cracked and faded. I can barely read the names. That’s so cool. And 
look how they sprayed cobwebs over that row of stones. Creepy, huh?” 

“Marty—can we go?” I begged again. “Dad is probably worried by now. 
Maybe the tram started up again. Maybe we can find it.” 

He ignored me. I watched him lean over a tombstone to read the words cut 
into it. “Jim Socks,” he read. “Eighteen forty to eighteen eighty-seven.” He 
laughed. “Jim Socks. Get it? And look at the ones next to it. Ben Dover. Sid 
Upp. These are all funny!” 

I laughed. Ben Dover and Sid Upp were pretty funny. 

My laugh was cut short when I heard a soft cry from the back of the 
graveyard. I saw another gray wisp dart behind a tombstone. 

I held my breath and listened hard. The wind whistled through the tall 
grass. 

Rising above the wind came another shrill cry. 

A cat? I wondered. Is the cemetery filled with cats? Or is it a child? 

Marty heard it, too. He moved down the row of stones until he stood beside 
me. His dark eyes glowed excitedly. “This is so cool. Did you hear the sound 
effects? There must be a speaker hidden in the ground.” 

Another shrill cry. 

Definitely human. A girl? 

I shivered. “Marty, I really think we should try to get back to my dad. 
We’ve been here all afternoon. And—” 

“But what about the rest of the tour?” he argued. “We have to see 
everything!” 

I heard another cry. Louder. Closer. A cry of terror. 

I tried to ignore it. Marty was probably right. The cries had to be coming 
from a loudspeaker somewhere. 

“How can we finish the tour?” I demanded. “We were supposed to stay on 
the tram—remember? But the tram—OHH!” 

I cried out as a hand shot up from the ground in front of us. A green hand. 
Its long fingers unfolded, as if reaching for us. 

“Whoa!” Marty cried, stumbling back. 

Another green hand shot up from the dirt. Then two more. 

Hands reaching up from graves. 



I let out a frightened gasp. Hands were bursting up through the grass. Hands 
all around us. Their fingers twisting and arching, reaching out. 

Marty started to laugh. “This is totally awesome! Just like in the movie!” 

He stopped laughing as a hand poked up beside him and grabbed his ankle. 
“Erin—help!” he cried. 

But I couldn’t help. 

Two green hands had wrapped around my ankles and were pulling me 
down, down into the grave. 



16 


“Come dowwwwwnnnnn, ” a soft voice moaned. “Come dowwwwwnnnn with 
us.” 

“Nooo!” I shrieked. 

My arms thrashed the air. I tried to kick, but the hands gripped me so 
tightly, so firmly. 

My whole body frantically jerked and tilted back and forth, as I struggled 
not to fall. If I fell, I knew they would grab my hands, too. And pull me 
facedown into the earth. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us. ” 

This isn’t a joke, I thought. These hands are real. They are really trying to 
pull me underground. 

“Help! Oh, help!” I heard Marty’s cry. Then I saw him fall. He toppled to 
the grass, onto his knees. 

Two hands gripped his ankles. Two more green hands poked up from the 
dirt to grab his wrists. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the sad 
voice moaned. 

“Noooo!” I shrieked, tugging wildly, desperately. 

To my surprise, I pulled free. 

One foot sank into the soft grass. I glanced down. My sneaker had slid off. 
The hand still gripped the sneaker—but my foot was free. 

With a happy cry, I bent down. Pulled off the other sneaker. 

I was free now. Free! 

Breathing hard, I bent and quickly pulled off my socks. I knew it would be 
easier to run barefoot. I tossed the socks away. Then I hurried over to Marty. 

He was flat on his stomach. Six hands held him down, tugging at him, 
tugging hard. His whole body twisted and shook. 

He raised his head when he saw me. “Erin—help me!” he gasped. 

I dropped to my knees. Reached for his sneakers. Tugged them off. 

The green hands gripped the sneakers tightly. Marty kicked his feet free and 
tried to climb to his knees. 

I grabbed a green hand and pulled if off his wrist. The hand slapped at me. 



A cold, hard slap that made my hand ring with pain. 

Ignoring it, I grabbed for another green hand. 

Marty rolled over. Rolled free. Jumped to his feet, gasping, trembling, his 
mouth hanging open, his dark eyes bulging. 

“Your socks—” I cried breathlessly. “Pull them off! Hurry!” 

He clumsily tore them off his feet. 

The hands grabbed wildly for us. Dozens of hands stretching up from the 
dirt. Hundreds of hands reaching up for us from the tall graveyard grass. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the voice 
moaned. 

“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnrm. Come dowwwwwnnnn, ” a dozen other soft 
voices called from beneath the ground. 

Marty and I froze. The soft, sad voices seemed to hypnotize me. My legs 
suddenly felt as if they were made of stone. 

“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnrm. Come dowwwwwnnnn. ” 

And then I saw a green head pop up from the dirt. And then another head. 
Another. Bald green heads with empty eye sockets and open, toothless mouths. 

I saw shoulders, then arms. More heads poking up. Bright-green bodies 
pulling up from beneath the ground. 

“M-Marty—” I choked out. “They’re coming up after us!” 



17 


The cemetery rang out with grunts and groans as the ugly green figures pulled 
themselves up from the ground. 

I took one last glance at their tattered, shredded clothing, at their blackened 
eye sockets, their toothless, grinning mouths. 

And then I started to run. 

Marty and I both ran without saying a word. Side by side, we darted across 
the tall grass between the rows of crooked tombstones. 

My heart thudded in my chest. My head throbbed. My bare feet sank into 
the cold dirt, slipped on the tall, damp grass. 

Marty reached the wooden gate first. He was running so hard, he banged 
into the fence. He let out a cry—then slipped through the gate onto Shock Street. 

I could hear moans and groans and eerie calls of the disgusting green 
people behind me. But I didn’t look back. I dove for the gate. Squeezed through. 
Then I shoved it shut behind me. 

Running into the street, I stopped to catch my breath. I bent over and 
pressed my hands against my knees. My side ached. I sucked in breath after 
breath. 

“Don’t stop!” Marty cried frantically. “Erin—keep going!” 

I took a deep breath and followed him down the street. Our bare feet 
slapped the pavement. 

I could still hear the moans and calls behind us. But I was too scared to 
glance back. 

“Marty—where is everybody?” I called breathlessly. 

Shock Street was empty, the houses and shops all dark. 

Shouldn’t there be people around? I wondered. This is a big movie studio. 
Where are the people who work for Shocker Studios? Where are the people who 
work on the studio tour? 

Why isn’t anyone around to help us? 

“Something is wrong!” Marty choked out, running at full speed. We passed 
The Horror Hardware Store and Shock City Electronics. “The robots are out of 
control or something!” 

At last! Marty agreed with me. He finally agreed that something was 



terribly wrong. 

“We’ve got to find your dad,” Marty said, running across the street to the 
next block of dark houses. “We’ve got to tell him there’s a problem.” 

“We have to find the tram,” I called, struggling to keep up with him. “Ow!” 

My bare foot came down on something hard. A rock or something. Pain 
shot up my leg. But I hobbled on. 

“If we can get back on the tram, it will take us back to Dad,” I called. 

“There has to be a way out of Shock Street,” Marty said. “It’s only a movie 

set.” 

We ran past a tall mansion with two turrets. It looked like an evil castle. I 
didn’t remember it from any of the Shocker movies. 

Beyond the mansion stretched a big, empty dirt lot. At the back of the lot 
stood a low brick wall, just a foot or two taller than Marty and me. 

“Cut through here!” I told Marty. “If we can climb up on that wall, we can 
probably see the studio road.” 

I was just guessing. But it was worth a try. 

We both turned into the empty lot. 

My bare feet thudded over the soft dirt. 

The dirt felt cold and wet. As we crossed the field, our feet tossed up big 
clumps of mud. 

I pumped my legs harder as the mud grew softer. My bare feet were sinking 
into it. As I ran, the cold mud rose up over my ankles. 

Marty and I were nearly to the brick wall when we ran into the sinkhole. 

“Yaaaaaiiii!” We both uttered hoarse cries as the ground gave way beneath 
us. 

The mud made a sick splussssh as we sank. 

I tossed up both hands. Tried to grab onto something. 

But there was nothing to grab. 

The mud oozed around me. Over my ankles. My legs. Up over my knees. 

It’s sucking me down, I thought. I tried to cry out again—but panic choked 
my throat. 

I glimpsed Marty beside me. His arms were waving wildly. His whole body 
twisted and squirmed as he sank. The mud was up over his waist—and he was 
still sinking fast. 

I kicked hard. Tried to raise my knees. 

But I was trapped. Trapped and dropping down, down into the dark, wet 



ooze. 

My mud-covered arms slapped against the surface. 

I couldn’t stop myself. 

The mud bubbled up over my neck. And I was sinking fast. 



18 


I held my breath. The mud rose up to my chin. 

In a second, it will be over my head, I thought. 

A sob escaped my throat. 

The mud crept higher, up over my chin. I started to spit as it reached my 
mouth. 

And then I felt something grab my arm. Strong hands slipped under my 
arms. I felt the hands slide in the mud. 

They gripped me harder. 

I felt myself being tugged up, tugged by someone very strong. 

The mud made a loud plop as I rose up. I felt the mud roll down my chest, 
my legs, my knees. 

And then I was standing on the surface, still held by the two powerful 
hands. 

“Marty—!” I called, tasting the sour mud on my lips. “Are you—?” 

“I’m up!” I heard his hoarse reply. “Erin, I’m okay!” 

The strong hands finally let go. My legs trembled. I wobbled but remained 
standing. 

I turned to see who had rescued me. 

And stared into the glowing red eyes of a wolf. 

A human with the face of a wolf. Clawed hands covered in black fur. A 
long, brown snout curved in an open, toothy grin. Sharp, pointed ears above a 
thick tuft of black wolf fur. 

A female. She wore a silvery catsuit. Sleek and tight-fitting. As I stared in 
shock, she opened her mouth in a throaty growl. 

I recognized her at once. Wolf Girl! 

I turned to see her companion—Wolf Boy. He had pulled Marty out of the 
mud hole. Marty’s whole body was caked in mud. He tried to wipe his face, but 
only managed to smear more mud over his cheeks. 

“You—saved us! Thank you!” I cried, finally finding my voice. 

The two werewolves uttered low growls in reply. 

“We—we lost the tram,” I explained to Wolf Girl. “We need to get back. 



You know. Back to where the ride began.” 

She let out a sharp growl. Then she snapped her toothy jaw hard. 

“Please—” I begged. “Can you help us get back to the tram? Or can you 
take us to the main building? My dad is waiting for me there.” 

Wolf Girl’s red eyes flashed. She growled again. 

“We know you’re just actors!” Marty blurted out shrilly. “But we don’t 
want to be scared anymore. We’ve had enough scares for today. Okay?” 

The two werewolves growled. A long white string of saliva drooled over 
Wolf Boy’s black lips. 

Something inside me snapped. I totally lost it. “Stop it!” I screamed. “Just 
stop it! Marty is right! We don’t want to be scared now. So stop the werewolf act 
—and help us!” 

The werewolves growled again. Wolf Girl snapped her jaws. A long pink 
tongue slid out, and she licked her jagged teeth hungrily. 

“That’s enough !” I shrieked. “Stop the act! Stop it! Stop it!” 

I was so angry, so furious —I reached up with both hands. I grabbed the fur 
on the sides of Wolf Girl’s mask. 

And I tugged the mask with all my strength. 

Tugged. Tugged with both hands as hard as I could. 

And felt real fur. And warm skin. 

It wasn’t a mask. 



19 


“Ohh.” I let out a gasp, and jerked my hands away. 

The werewolf’s red eyes glowed. Her black lips parted. Once again, her 
tongue flicked hungrily over her yellow, pointed teeth. 

My whole body trembled as I backed up against the brick wall. “M-Marty 
—” I stammered. “It’s not an act.” 

“Huh?” Marty stood stiffly in front of Wolf Boy, his dark eyes wide in his 
mud-caked face. 

“They’re not actors,” I whispered. “Something is wrong here. Something is 
terribly wrong.” 

Marty’s mouth dropped open. He took a step back. 

Both werewolves uttered low growls. They lowered their heads as if 
preparing to attack. 

“Do you believe me?” I cried. “Do you finally believe me?” 

Marty nodded. He didn’t say a word. I think he was too terrified to talk. 

Saliva poured from the werewolves’ mouths. Their eyes glowed like fire in 
the darkness. Their furry chests began to heave in and out. Their breaths came 
loud and hoarse. 

I jumped back against the wall as both werewolves raised their heads and 
let out long, frightening howls. 

What were they going to do to us? 

I grabbed Marty and tugged him to the wall. “Up!” I cried. “Get up! Maybe 
they can’t reach us up there!” 

Marty leaped high, stretching up his arms. His hands slapped the top of the 
wall, then slid back down. He tried again. He bent his knees. Jumped. Grabbed 
for the top of the wall. Slipped back down. 

“I can’t!” he wailed. “It’s too high.” 

“We’ve got to!” I shrieked. 

I turned back and saw the two werewolves lean back on their hind legs and 
then spring up. They were snarling and growling now, thick gobs of saliva 
running over their snapping teeth. 

“Up!” I cried. 

As Marty leaped for the wall again, I reached down and grabbed his muddy 



foot. “Up!” I gave him a hard boost. 

His hands thrashed the air. Caught the top of the brick wall. Held on. 

His bare feet kicked the air. But he held on and tugged himself up. 

On his knees on top of the wall, he turned and grabbed my hands. He pulled 
and I jumped. I struggled to scramble up beside him. 

But I couldn’t get my knees up. Couldn’t get them onto the wall. 

My bare feet thrashed wildly. My knees scraped against the wall as Marty 
tugged. 

“I can’t do it! I can’t!” I gasped. 

The werewolves howled again. 

“Keep trying!” Marty choked out. He tugged my arms. Tugged with all his 
strength. 

I was still struggling as the two werewolves leaped. 



20 


I heard the snap of jaws. 

I felt hot breath on the bottom of my foot. 

The two werewolves thudded against the wall. 

With a desperate cry, I sprang to the top. Gasping for air, I pressed myself 
flat against the bricks. 

I raised my head in time to see the two snarling werewolves leap again. 
Jaws snapped in front of my face. Red eyes gleamed hungrily at me. 

“No!” With a cry, I scrambled to my feet. 

The werewolves raised their heads in angry howls and prepared to attack 
again. 

Marty and I stood pressed close together, staring down at them. 

They jumped. 

Their claws scraped against the bricks. The shrill screech sent chills down 
my back. Their teeth snapped. 

They dropped down. Prepared another leap, snarling excitedly. 

“We can’t stay up here forever!” Marty cried. “What do we do?” 

I squinted into the darkness. Was that the studio road on the other side of 
the wall? 

Too dark to tell. 

The werewolves leaped again. Jagged teeth scraped against my ankle. 

I jumped back. Nearly toppled off the wall. 

Marty and I bumped into each other, our eyes on the two growling creatures 
preparing another leap. 

The gun! The plastic stun gun! 

Mine had fallen from my hand. It was probably buried in that mud hole. But 
my eyes fell on Marty’s gun. Its handle poked out from his jeans pocket. 

Without saying a word, I grabbed the handle and tugged the plastic pistol 
from Marty’s jeans. 

“Hey—!” he cried. “Erin—what are you doing?” 

“They gave us the guns for a reason,” I explained, shouting over the 
frightening howls of the two werewolves. “Maybe this will stop them.” 



“It—it’s only a toy!” Marty stammered. 

I didn’t care. It was worth a try. 

Maybe it would frighten them. Maybe it would hurt them. Maybe it would 
chase them away. 

I raised the plastic gun. Aimed it as the two werewolves made another leap 
of attack. “One—two—three—FIRE!” I squeezed the trigger. Again. Again. 
Again! 



21 


The gun made a loud buzzing sound. It shot out a beam of yellow light. 

Yes! I thought. Yes! I prayed. 

The light will stop them. 

It’s a stun gun—right? The buzzing sound and the bright light will stun 
them. It will freeze them in place so Marty and I can make our escape. 

I squeezed the trigger hard. Again. Again. 

It didn’t stop the werewolves. It didn’t even seem to surprise them. 

They leaped higher. I felt sharp claws scrape my leg. I cried out in pain. 

And the plastic gun flew out of my hand. 

It clattered against the top of the wall, then slid to the ground. 

Just a toy. Marty was right. It wasn’t a real weapon. It was just a stupid toy. 

“Look out!” Marty opened his mouth in a shrill shriek as the snarling 
creatures made another high leap at the wall. 

Claws scraped the brick—and held on. Red eyes glared up at me. Hot wolf 
breath tingled my skin. 

“Ohhh.” My arms flew up as I lost my balance. I struggled to stay up. But 
my knees bent. My feet slipped. 

I grabbed for Marty. Missed. 

And toppled off. Landed hard on my back on the other side of the wall. 

Gazing up in horror, I saw Marty leap down beside me. 

The two werewolves were on the top of the wall now. They glared down at 
us, red eyes glowing, tongues out, breathing hard. 

Preparing to pounce. 

Marty dragged me to my feet. “Run!” he cried hoarsely, his eyes wide with 
panic. 

The werewolves growled above us. 

The ground tilted. I still felt dizzy, a little dazed from my fall. “We—we 
can’t outrun them!” I moaned. 

I heard a rumbling sound. A clatter. 

Marty and I both turned. And saw two yellow eyes, glowing against the 
dark sky. 



Yellow eyes of a creature roaring toward us. 

No. Not a creature. 

As it drew nearer, I could make out its long, sleek shape. 

The tram! 

The tram bouncing over the road behind yellow headlights. Coming closer. 
Closer. 

Yes! 

I turned to Marty. Did he see it, too? He did. 

Without saying a word, we both began running to the road. The tram was 
rolling fast. Somehow we had to climb on it. We had to! 

Behind us, I heard the werewolves howl. I heard a hard thump, then another 
as they dropped off the wall. 

The twin yellow headlights of the tram swept over us. 

The werewolves snarled and howled angrily as they chased after us. 

A few feet ahead of me, Marty was hurtling forward, his head down, his 
legs pumping furiously. 

The tram bumped closer. Closer. 

The howling werewolves were inches behind us. I could almost feel their 
hot breath on the back of my neck. 

A few more seconds. A few more seconds—and Marty and I would make 
our jump. 

I watched the tram speed around a curve, the yellow headlights washing 
over the dark road. I kept my eyes on the front car. Took a deep breath. Prepared 
to jump. 

And then Marty fell. 

I saw his hands shoot out. Saw his mouth open wide in surprise. In horror. 

He stumbled over his own bare feet and dropped to the ground, landing 
hard on his stomach. 

I couldn’t stop in time. 

I ran right into him. Stumbled over him. 

Fell heavily on top of him. 

And watched the tram speed past us. 



22 


“Owoooooooo!” 

The two werewolves uttered long howls of triumph. 

My heart pounding, I scrambled to my feet. “Get up!” I frantically pulled 
Marty up by both arms. 

We took off after the tram, our bare feet pounding the hard road. The last 
car bounced a few feet ahead of us. 

I reached it first. Shot out my right hand. Grabbed the back of the car. 

With a desperate leap, I hoisted myself up. Up. And into the last seat. 

Struggling to catch my breath, I turned back to find Marty running behind 
the tram. His hands reached for the back of the tramcar. “I—I can’t make it!” he 
gasped. 

“Run! You’ve got to!” I screamed. 

Behind him, I could see the werewolves scampering close behind. 

Marty put on a burst of speed. He grabbed the back of the car with both 
hands. It dragged him for several feet—until he swung himself around and 
dropped into the seat beside me. 

Yes! I thought happily. We made it! We got away from those howling 
werewolves. 

Or did we? 

Would they jump into the tram after us? 

I spun around, my whole body trembling. And I watched the werewolves 
fade into the distance. They ran for a while, then gave up. They both stood in the 
road, hunched over in defeat, watching us escape. 

Escape. 

What a wonderful word. 

Marty and I grinned at each other. I slapped him a high five. 

We were both breathing hard, covered in mud. My legs ached from running. 
My bare feet throbbed. My heart still thudded from the frightening chase. 

But we had escaped. And now we were safe in the tram, on our way back to 
the starting platform. Back to my dad. 

“We’ve got to tell your dad that this place is messed up,” Marty said 
breathlessly. 



“Something is horribly wrong here,” I agreed. 

“Those werewolves—they weren’t kidding around,” Marty continued. 
“They—they were real, Erin. They weren’t actors.” 

I nodded. I felt so glad that Marty finally agreed with me. And he wasn’t 
pretending to be brave anymore. He wasn’t pretending that it was all robots and 
special effects. 

We both knew that we had faced real dangers. Real monsters. 

Something was terribly wrong at Shocker Studios. Dad had told us he 
wanted a full report. Well, he was going to get one! 

I settled back in the seat, trying to calm down. 

But I shot straight up again when I realized we weren’t alone. “Marty— 
look!” I pointed to the front of the tram. “We aren’t the only passengers.” 

In fact, every tramcar appeared to be filled with people. 

“What’s going on?” Marty murmured. “Your dad said we were the only 
ones on the tour. And now the tram is—OH!—” 

Marty never finished his sentence. His mouth fell open in a gasp. His eyes 
bulged open wide. 

I gasped, too. 

The other passengers on the tram all turned around at the same time. And I 
saw their grinning jaws, their dark, empty eye sockets, the gray bones of their 
skulls. 

Skeletons. 

The other passengers were all grinning skeletons. 

Their jaws opened in dry laughter. Cruel laughter that sounded like the 
wind screeching through bare trees. Bones rattled and clattered as they raised 
their yellowed, skeletal hands to point at us. 

Their skulls bobbed and bounced as the tram carried us, faster, faster, 
through the darkness. 

Marty and I slumped low in the seat, trembling, staring at the grinning 
skulls, the pointing fingers. 

Who were they? 

How did they get on this tram? 

Where were they taking us? 



23 


The skeletons laughed their wheezing laugh. Their bones clanked and rattled. 
Their yellowed skulls bounced loosely on their clattering shoulder bones. 

The tram picked up speed. We were flying through the darkness. 

I forced myself to turn away from the grinning skulls and peered out. 
Beyond the trees, I could see the low buildings of the movie studio. As I stared, 
they grew smaller, faded into the blackness of the night. 

“Marty—we’re not going back to the main platform,” I whispered. “We’re 
heading the wrong way. We’re going away from all the buildings.” 

He swallowed hard. I could see the panic in his eyes. “What can we do?” he 
choked out. 

“We’ve got to get off!” I replied. “We’ve got to jump.” 

Marty had slumped all the way down in the seat, as low as he could get. I 
think he was trying to hide from the skeletons. 

Now he raised his head and peeked over the side of the tram. “Erin—we 
can’t jump!” he cried. “We’re going too fast.” 

He was right. 

We were rocketing along the road. And the tram kept picking up speed. The 
trees and shrubs whirred past in a dark blur. 

And then as we squealed into a sharp curve, a tall building seemed to jump 
into our path. 

A castle, bathed in swirling spotlights. All gray and silver. Twin towers 
reached up to the sky. A solid stone wall rose up from the road. 

The road. 

It curved straight into the castle wall. The road ended at the wall. 

And we were roaring down the road, still picking up speed. 

Roaring toward the castle. 

The skeletons rattled and clattered and laughed their dry, screeching laugh. 
They bounced in their seats, bones cracking, jumping in excitement as we 
zoomed at the castle. 

Closer. Closer. 

Right up to it now. Up to the solid stone wall. 

About to smash right into it. 



24 


My legs trembled. My heart pounded. But somehow I managed to stand up on 
the seat. 

I took a deep breath. Held it. Closed my eyes—and jumped. 

I landed hard on my side, and rolled. 

I saw Marty hesitate. The tram bounced. Marty dove over the side. 

He hit the ground on his stomach. Rolled onto his back. And kept rolling. 

I came to a stop under a tree. And turned to the castle—in time to see the 
tram plunge into the stone wall. 

Without a sound. 

The first tramcar hit the castle wall and flew through it. 

Silently. 

I could see the skeletons bobbing and bouncing. 

And I saw the next car and the next and the next—all shoot into the castle 
wall and disappear through it without making a sound. 

A few seconds later, the tram disappeared. 

A heavy silence fell over the road. 

The spotlights on the castle wall dimmed. 

“Erin—are you okay?” Marty called weakly. 

I turned to find him on his hands and knees on the other side of the road. I 
scrambled to my feet. I had scraped my side, but it didn’t hurt too badly. 

“I’m okay,” I told him. I pointed to the castle. “Did you see that?” 

“I saw it,” Marty replied, standing up slowly. “But I don’t believe it.” He 
stretched. “How did the tram go through the wall? Do you think the castle isn’t 
really there? That it’s an optical illusion? Some kind of trick?” 

“There’s an easy way to find out,” I said. 

We walked side by side on the road. The wind rustled the trees, making 
them whisper all around us. The pavement felt cold under my bare feet. 

“We’ve got to find my dad,” I said quietly. “I’m sure he can explain 
everything to us.” 

“I hope so,” Marty murmured. 

We stepped up to the castle wall. I stuck out both hands, expecting them to 



go right through. 

But my hands slapped solid stone. 

Marty lowered his shoulder and shoved it against the castle wall. His 
shoulder hit the wall with a thud. 

“It’s solid,” Marty said, shaking his head. “It’s a real wall. So how did the 
tram go through it?” 

“It’s a ghost tram,” I whispered, rubbing my hand against the cold stone. “A 
ghost tram filled with skeletons.” 

“But we rode in it!” Marty cried. 

I slapped the wall with both hands and spun away from it. “I’m sick of 
mysteries!” I wailed. “I’m sick of being scared! I’m sick of werewolves and 
monsters! I’m never going to another scary movie as long as I live!” 

“Your father can explain it all,” Marty said softly, shaking his head. “I’m 
sure he can.” 

“I don’t want him to explain it!” I cried. “I just want to get away from 
here!” 

Keeping close together, we made our way around to the side of the castle. I 
could hear strange, animal howls behind us. And a frightening cackle cut 
through the air somewhere above our heads. 

I ignored all the sounds. I didn’t want to think about whether they were 
being made by real monsters or fakes. I didn’t want to think about the 
frightening creatures we had run into—or the close calls Marty and I had had. 

I didn’t want to think. 

At the back of the castle, the road appeared again. “I hope we’re going in 
the right direction,” I murmured, following it as it curved into the hill. 

“Me, too,” Marty replied in a tiny voice. 

We picked up our pace, walking quickly in the middle of the road. We tried 
not to pay attention to the sharp animal calls, the shrill cries, the howls and 
moans that seemed to follow us everywhere. 

The road sloped uphill. Marty and I leaned forward as we climbed. The 
frightening cries and howls followed us up the hill. 

As we neared the top, I saw several low buildings. 

“Yes!” I cried. “Marty—look! We must be heading back to the main 
platform.” I started jogging toward the buildings. Marty trotted close behind. 

We both stopped when we realized where we were. 

Back on Shock Street. 



Somehow we had made a circle. 

Past the old houses and small shops, The Shock Street Cemetery came into 
view. Staring at the fence, I remembered the green hands poking up from the 
ground. The green shoulders. The green faces. The hands pulling us, pulling us 
down. 

My whole body shuddered. 

I didn’t want to be back here. I never wanted to see this terrifying street 
again. 

But I couldn’t turn away from the cemetery. As I stared at the old 
gravestones from across the street, I saw something move. 

A wisp of gray. Like a tiny cloud. 

It rose up between two crooked, old stones. Floated silently into the air. 

And then another puff of gray lifted off the ground. And another. 

I glimpsed Marty. He stood beside me, hands pressed against his waist, 
staring hard. He saw them, too. 

The gray puffs rose silently, like snowballs or cotton. Dozens of them, 
floating up from the graves. 

Floating over the cemetery and out over the street. 

Floating above Marty and me. Hovering so low. 

And then as we stared up at them, they started to grow. To inflate, like gray 
balloons. 

And I saw faces inside them. Dark faces, etched in shadow like the Man in 
the Moon. The faces scowled at us. Old faces, lined and creased. Eyes narrowed 
to dark slits. Frowning faces. Sneering faces inside the billowing, white puffs. 

I grabbed Marty’s shoulder. I wanted to run, to get away, to get out from 
under them. 

But, like smoke, the wisps of mist with their evil faces, swirled down, 
swirled around us. Trapped us. Trapped us inside. 

The faces, the ugly, scowling faces, spinning around us. Spinning faster, 
faster, holding us in the swirling, choking mist. 



25 


I pressed my hands over my eyes, trying to shut them out. 

I froze in total panic. I couldn’t think. I couldn’t breathe. 

I could hear the shrill rush of wind as the ghostly clouds swirled around us. 

And then I heard a man’s voice, shouting over the wind: “Cut! Print that 
one! Good scene, everyone!” 

I lowered my hands slowly and opened my eyes. I let out my breath in a 
long whoosh. 

A man came striding up to Marty and me. He wore jeans and a gray 
sweatshirt under a brown leather jacket. He had a blue-and-white Dodgers cap 
sideways on his head. A blond ponytail tumbled out from under it. 

He carried a clipboard in one hand. He had a silver whistle around his neck. 
He smiled at Marty and me and flashed us a thumbs-up. 

“Hey, what’s up, guys? I’m Russ Denver. Good job! You looked really 
scared.” 

“Huh?” I cried, my mouth dropping open. “We were really scared!” 

“I’m so glad to see a real live human!” Marty cried. 

“This tour—it’s totally messed up!” I shrieked. “The creatures—they’re 
alive! They tried to hurt us! They really did! It wasn’t any fun! It wasn’t like a 
ride!” The words spilled out of me in a rush. 

“It was really gross! The werewolves snapped at us and chased us up a 
wall!” Marty exclaimed. 

The two of us started talking at once, telling this guy Denver all of the 
frightening things that had happened to us on the tour. 

“Whoa! Whoa!” A smile crossed his handsome face. He raised his 
clipboard as if to shield himself from us. “It’s all special effects, guys. Didn’t 
they explain to you that we’re making a movie here? That we were filming your 
reactions?” 

“No. No one explained that, Mr. Denver!” I replied angrily. “My dad 
brought us here. He designed the studio tour. And he told us we were the first to 
try it out. But he didn’t tell us about any movie being filmed. I really think—” 

I felt Marty’s hand on my shoulder. I knew Marty was trying to calm me 
down. But I didn’t want to be calmed down. 



I was really angry. 

Mr. Denver turned back to a group of crew members behind him in the 
street. “Take thirty, guys. Let’s break for dinner.” 

They moved away, talking among themselves. Mr. Denver turned back to 
us. “Your father should have explained to you—” 

“It’s okay. Really,” Marty interrupted. “We just got a little scared. All of the 
creatures seemed so real. And we didn’t see any other people anywhere. You’re 
the first real person we’ve seen all afternoon.” 

“My dad must be really worried,” I told the movie director. “He said he’d 
be waiting for us on the main platform. Can you tell us how to get there?” 

“No problem,” Mr. Denver replied. “See that big house there with the open 
door?” He pointed with his clipboard. 

Marty and I stared at the house across the street. A narrow path led up to the 
house. A pale yellow light shone inside the open front door. 

“That’s Shockro’s House of Shocks,” the director explained. “Go right in 
that door and straight through the house.” 

“But won’t we get shocked in there?” Marty demanded. “In the movie, 
anyone who goes into Shockro’s house gets jolted with twenty million volts of 
electricity!” 

“That’s just in the movie,” Mr. Denver replied. 

“The house is just a set. It’s perfectly safe. Go through the house. Then out 
the back, and you will see the main building on the other side of the street. You 
can’t miss it.” 

“Thank you!” Marty and I called out at once. 

Marty turned and started running full speed toward the house. 

I turned back to Mr. Denver. “I’m sorry for yelling before,” I told him. “I 
was just so scared, and I thought—” 

I gasped. 

Mr. Denver had turned away. And I saw the long power cord—the power 
cord that was plugged into his back. 

He wasn’t a real human. He wasn’t a movie director. He was some kind of 
robot. 

He was fake like all the others. He was lying to us. Lying! 

I turned and cupped my hands around my mouth. I started to run, frantically 
calling after Marty: “Don’t go in there! Marty—stop! Don’t go in that house!” 

Too late. 



Marty was already running through the door. 



26 


“Marty—wait! Stop!” I shouted as I ran. 

I had to stop him. 

The director was a fake. I knew he wasn’t telling the truth. 

“Marty— please\” 

My bare feet pounded the hard pavement. I plunged up the path as Marty 
trotted into the doorway. 

“Stop!” 

I flew to the doorway. Reached out both hands. Made a wild dive to tackle 

him. 

And missed. 

I skidded across the walk on my stomach. 

As soon as Marty entered the house, I saw the flash of white light. I heard a 
loud buzz. Then the sharp crackle of electricity. 

The room exploded in a flash of lightning. So bright I had to shield my 

eyes. 

When I opened them, I saw Marty sprawled facedown on the floor. 
“Nooooo!” I let out a terrified wail. 

Scrambling to my feet, I dove into the house. 

Would I get shocked, too? 

I didn’t care. I had to get to Marty. I had to help him out of there. 

“Marty! Marty!” I screamed his name again and again. 

He didn’t move. 

“Marty—please!” I grabbed his shoulders and started to shake him. “Wake 
up, Marty! Snap out of it! Marty!” 

He didn’t open his eyes. 

I suddenly felt a chill. A dark shadow slid over me. 

And I realized I wasn’t alone in the house. 



27 


I spun around with a gasp. 

Was it Shockro? Some other scary creature? 

A tall figure leaned over me. I squinted into the darkness, struggling to see 
his face. 

“Dad!” I cried as he came into focus. “Dad! Oh, I’m so glad to see you!” 

“Erin, what are you doing here?” he asked in a low voice. 

“It—it’s Marty!” I stammered. “You’ve got to help him, Dad. He’s been 
shocked and he—he—” 

Dad leaned closer. Behind his eyeglasses, his brown eyes were cold. His 
face set in a troubled frown. 

“Do something, Dad!” I pleaded. “Marty is hurt. He isn’t moving. He won’t 
open his eyes. The studio tour was so awful, Dad! Something is wrong. 
Something is terribly wrong!” 

He didn’t reply. He leaned closer. 

And as his face came into the soft light, I saw that he wasn’t my father! 

“Who are you?” I shrieked. “You’re not my dad! Why aren’t you helping 
me? Why aren’t you helping Marty? Do something—please! Where’s my dad? 
Where is he? Who are you? Help me! Somebody? Help me 
AAAAAARRRRRRRRR. Help MRRRRRRRRRRRR. Dad— 
MARRRRRRRRRRRRRR. DRRRMMMMMMMMmmmmm.” 



28 


Mr. Wright stood staring down at Erin and Marty. He shook his head unhappily. 
He shut his eyes and let out a long sigh. 

Jared Curtis, one of the studio engineers, came running into The House of 
Shocks. “Mr. Wright, what happened to your two kid robots?” he demanded. 

Mr. Wright sighed again. “Programming problems,” he muttered. 

He pointed to the Erin robot, frozen in place on her knees beside the Marty 
robot. “I had to shut the girl off. Her memory chip must be bad. The Erin robot 
was supposed to think of me as her father. But just now, she didn’t recognize 
me.” 

“And what about the Marty robot?” Jared asked. 

“It’s totally down,” Mr. Wright replied. “I think the electrical system 
shorted out.” 

“What a shame,” Jared said, bending to roll the Marty robot over. He pulled 
up the T-shirt and fiddled with some dials on the back. “Hey, Mr. Wright, it was 
a great idea to make robot kids to test the park. I think we can fix them.” 

Jared opened up a panel on Marty’s back and squinted at the red and green 
wires. “All the other creatures, and monsters, and robots worked perfectly. Not a 
single bug.” 

“I should have known there was a problem yesterday,” Mr. Wright said. 
“We were in my office. The Erin robot asked about her mother. I built her. She 
doesn’t have a mother.” 

Mr. Wright tossed up his hands. “Oh, well. No problem. We’ll reprogram 
these two. Put in new chips. They’ll be good as new in no time. Then we’ll try 
them out once again on the Shocker Studio Tour, before we open the park to real 
kids.” 

He took the Marty robot from Jared and slung it over his shoulder. Then he 
picked up the Erin robot. He tossed it over his other shoulder. Then, humming to 
himself, he carried them to the engineering building. 




THE HAUNTED 
MASK II 

Goosebumps - 36 
R.L. Stine 



1 


I don’t know if you have ever spent any time with first graders. But there is only 
one word to describe them. And that word is ANIMALS. 

First graders are animals. 

You can quote me. 

My name is Steve Boswell, and I am in the sixth grade. I may not be the 
smartest guy at Walnut Avenue Middle School. But I know one thing for sure: 
First graders are animals. 

How do I know this fact? I learned it the hard way. I learned it by coaching 
the first-grade soccer team after school every day. 

You might want to know why I chose to coach their soccer team. Well, I 
didn’t choose it. It was a punishment. 

Someone set a squirrel loose in the girls’ locker room. That someone was 
me. But it wasn’t my idea. 

My best friend, Chuck Green, caught the squirrel. And he asked me where I 
thought he should set it free. 

I said, “How about the girls’ locker room before their basketball game on 
Thursday?” 

So maybe it was partly my idea. But Chuck was just as much to blame as I 

was. 

Of course, I was the one who got caught. 

Miss Curdy, the gym teacher, grabbed me as I was letting the squirrel out of 
its box. The squirrel ran across the gym to the bleachers. The kids in the 
bleachers all jumped up and started running and screaming and acting crazy. 

It was just a dumb squirrel. But all the teachers started chasing after it. It 
took hours to catch it and get everyone calmed down. 

So Miss Curdy said I had to be punished. 

She gave me a choice of punishments. One: I could come into the gym after 
school every day and inflate basketballs—by mouth—until my head exploded. 
Or two: I could coach the first-grade soccer team. 

I chose number two. 

The wrong choice. 

My friend Chuck was supposed to help me coach the team. But he told 



Miss Curdy he had an after-school job. 

Do you know what his after-school job is? Going home and watching TV. 

A lot of people think that Chuck and I are best friends because we look so 
much alike. We’re both tall and thin. We both have straight brown hair and dark 
brown eyes. We both wear baseball caps most of the time. Sometimes people 
think we’re brothers! 

But that’s not why I like Chuck and Chuck likes me. We’re best friends 
because we make each other laugh. 

I laughed really hard when Chuck told me what his after-school job was. 
But I’m not laughing now. 

I’m praying. Every day I pray for rain. If it rains, the first graders don’t 
have soccer practice. 

Today, unfortunately, is a bright, clear, beautiful October day. Standing on 
the playground behind school, I searched the sky for a cloud—any cloud—but 
saw only blue. 

“Okay, listen up, Hogs!” I shouted. I wasn’t making fun of them. That’s the 
name they voted for their team. Do you believe it? The Walnut Avenue Hogs. 

Does that give you an idea of what these kids are like? 

I cupped my hands around my mouth and shouted again. “Line up, Hogs!” 

Andrew Foster grabbed the whistle I wear around my neck and blew it in 
my face. Then Duck Benton tromped down hard on my new sneakers. Everyone 
calls him Duck because he quacks all the time. He and Andrew thought that was 
a riot. 

Then Marnie Rosen jumped up behind me, threw her arms around my neck, 
and climbed on my back. Marnie has curly red hair, freckles all over her face, 
and the most evil grin I ever saw on a kid. “Give me a ride, Steve!” she shouted. 
“I want a ride!” 

“Marnie—get off me!” I cried. I tried to loosen her grip on my neck. She 
was choking me. The Hogs were all laughing now. 

“Marnie—I... can’t... breathe!” I gasped. 

I bent down and tried to throw her off my back. But she hung on even 
tighter. 

Then I felt her lips press against my ear. 

“What are you doing?” I cried. Was she trying to kiss me or something? 

Yuck! She spit her bubble gum into my ear. 

Then, laughing like a crazed fiend, she hopped off me and went running 



across the grass, her curly red hair bouncing behind her. 

“Give me a break! ” I cried angrily. The purple gum stuck in my ear. It took 
me a while to scrape it all out. 

By the time I finished, they had started a practice game. 

Have you ever watched six-year-olds play soccer? It’s chase and kick, chase 
and kick. Everybody chase the ball. Everybody try to kick it. 

I try to teach them positions. I try to teach them how to pass the ball to each 
other. I try to teach them teamwork. But all they want to do is chase and kick, 
chase and kick. 

Which is fine with me. As long as they leave me alone. 

I blow my whistle and act as umpire. And try to keep the game going. 

Andrew Foster kicked a big clump of dirt on my jeans as he ran by. He 
acted as if it were an accident. But I knew it was deliberate. 

Then Duck Benton got into a shoving fight with Johnny Myers. Duck 
watches hockey games on TV with his dad, and he thinks you’re supposed to 
fight. Some days Duck doesn’t chase after the ball at all. He just fights. 

I let them chase-and-kick, chase-and-kick for an hour. Then I blew the 
whistle to call practice to an end. 

Not a bad practice. Only one bloody nose. And that was a win because it 
wasn’t mine! 

“Okay, Hogs—see you tomorrow!” I shouted. I started to trot off the 
playground. Their parents or baby-sitters would be waiting for them in front of 
the school. 

Then I saw that a bunch of the kids had formed a tight circle in the middle 
of the field. They all wore grins on their faces, so I decided I’d better see what 
they were up to. 

“What’s going on, guys?” I asked, trotting back to them. 

Some kids stepped back, and I spotted a soccer ball on the grass. Marnie 
Rosen smiled at me through her freckles. “Hey, Steve, can you kick a goal from 
here?” 

The other kids stepped away from the ball. I glanced to the goal. It was 
really far away, at least half the field. 

“What’s the joke?” I demanded. 

Mamie’s grin faded. “No joke. Can you kick a goal from here?” 

“No way!” Duck Benton called. 

“Steve can do it,” I heard Johnny Myers say. “Steve can kick it farther than 



that.” 

“No way!” Duck insisted. “It’s too far even for a sixth grader.” 

“Hey—that’s an easy goal,” I bragged. “Why don’t you give me something 
hard to do?” 

Every once in a while I have to do something to impress them. Just to prove 
that I’m better than they are. 

So I moved up behind the ball. I stopped about eight or ten steps back. 
Gave myself plenty of running room. 

“Okay, guys, watch how a pro does it!” I cried. 

I ran up to the ball. Got plenty of leg behind it. 

Gave a tremendous kick. 

Froze for a second. 

And then let out a long, high wail of horror. 



2 


On my way home a few minutes later, I passed my friend Chuck’s house. Chuck 
came running down the gravel driveway to greet me. 

I didn’t really feel like talking to anyone. Not even my friend. 

But there he was. So what could I do? 

“Yo—Steve!” He stopped halfway down the driveway. “What happened? 
Why are you limping?” 

“Concrete,” I groaned. 

He pulled off his black-and-red Cubs cap and scratched his thick brown 
hair. “Huh?” 

“Concrete,” I repeated weakly. “The kids had a concrete soccer ball.” 

Chuck squinted at me. I could see he still didn’t understand. 

“One of the kids lives across the street. He had his friends help roll a ball of 
concrete to the school,” I explained. “Painted white and black to look like a 
soccer ball. Solid concrete. They had it there on the field. They asked me to kick 
a goal and—and—” My voice caught in my throat. I couldn’t finish. 

I hobbled over to the big beech tree beside Chuck’s driveway and leaned 
back against its cold, white trunk. 

“Wow. That’s not a very funny joke,” Chuck said, replacing his cap on his 
head. 

“Tell me about it,” I groaned. “I think I broke every bone in my foot. Even 
some bones I don’t have.” 

“Those kids are animals /” Chuck declared. 

I groaned and mbbed my aching foot. It wasn’t really broken. But it hurt. A 
lot. I shifted my backpack on my shoulders and leaned back against the tree. 

“Know what I’d like to do?” I told Chuck. 

“Pay them back?” 

“You’re right!” I replied. “How did you know?” 

“Lucky guess.” He stepped up beside me. I could see that he was thinking 
hard. Chuck always scrunches up his face when he’s trying to think. 

“It’s almost Halloween,” he said finally. “Maybe we could think of some 
way to scare them. I mean, really scare them.” His dark eyes lit up with 
excitement. 



“Well... maybe.” I hesitated. “They’re just little kids. I don’t want to do 
anything mean.” 

My backpack felt weird—too full. I pulled it off my shoulder and lowered it 
to the ground. 

I leaned over and unzipped it. 

And about ten million feathers came floating out. 

“Those kids—!” Chuck exclaimed. 

I pulled open the backpack. All of my notebooks, all of my textbooks— 
covered in sticky feathers. Those animals had glued feathers to my books. 

I tossed down the backpack and turned to Chuck. “Maybe I do want to do 
something mean!” I growled. 

A few days later, Chuck and I were walking home from the playground. It was a 
cold, windy afternoon. Dark storm clouds rose up in the distance. 

The storm clouds were too late to help me. I had just finished afternoon 
practice with the Hogs. 

It hadn’t been a bad practice. It hadn’t been a good practice, either. 

Just as we started, Andrew Foster lowered his head and came at me full 
speed. He weighs about a thousand pounds, and he has a very hard head. He 
plowed into my stomach and knocked the wind out of me. 

I rolled around on the ground for a few minutes, groaning and choking and 
gasping. The kids thought it was pretty funny. Andrew claimed it was an 
accident. 

I’m going to get you guys back, I vowed to myself. I don’t know how. But 
I’m going to get you guys. 

Then Marnie Rosen jumped on my back and tore the collar off my new 
winter coat. 

Chuck met me after practice. He’d started doing that now. He knew that 
after one hour with the first graders, I usually needed help getting home. 

“I hate them,” I muttered. “Do you know how to spell hate? H-O-G-S.” My 
torn coat collar flapped in the swirling wind. 

“Why don’t you make all of them practice with a concrete ball?” Chuck 
suggested. He adjusted his Cubs cap over his hair. “No. Wait. I’ve got it. Let 
them take turns being the ball!” 

“No. No good,” I replied, shaking my head. The sky darkened. The trees 
shook, sending a shower of dead leaves down around us. 



My sneakers crunched over the leaves. “I don’t want to hurt them,” I told 
Chuck. “I just want to scare them. I just want to scare them to death.” 

The wind blew colder. I felt a cold drop of rain on my forehead. 

As we crossed the street, I noticed two girls from our class walking on the 
other side. I recognized Sabrina Mason’s black ponytail swinging behind her as 
she hurried along the sidewalk. And next to her, I recognized her friend Carly 
Beth Caldwell. 

“Hey—!” I started to call out to them, but I stopped. 

An idea flashed into my mind. 

Seeing Carly Beth, I knew how to scare those first graders. 

Seeing Carly Beth, I knew exactly what I wanted to do. 



3 


I started to call to the girls. But Chuck clamped his hand over my mouth and 
dragged me behind a wide tree. 

“Hey—get your clammy paws off me. What’s the big idea?” I cried when 
he finally pulled his hand away. 

He pushed me against the rough bark of the tree trunk. “Ssshhh. They 
haven’t seen us.” He motioned with his eyes toward the two girls. 

“So?” 

“So we can sneak up and scare them,” Chuck whispered, his dark eyes 
practically glowing with evil excitement. “Let’s make Carly Beth scream.” 

“You mean for old times’ sake?” 

Chuck nodded, grinning. 

For many years, making Carly Beth scream had been our hobby. That’s 
because she was a really good screamer, and she would scream at just about 
anything. 

One day in the lunchroom last year, Chuck tucked a worm inside his turkey 
sandwich. Then he gave the sandwich to Carly Beth. 

She took one bite and knew that something tasted a little weird. When 
Chuck showed her the big bite she had taken out of the worm, Carly Beth 
screamed for a week. 

Chuck and I took bets on who could scare Carly Beth the most and who 
could make her scream. I guess it was kind of mean. But it was funny too. 

And sometimes when you know that people are real easy to scare, you have 
no choice. You have to scare them as often as you can. 

Anyway, that all changed last Halloween. 

Last Halloween Chuck and I had a horrible scare. Carly Beth wore the most 
frightening mask I had ever seen. It wasn’t a mask. It was like a living face. 

It was so ugly, so real. It glared at us with evil, living eyes. Its mouth 
sneered at us with real lips. The skin glowed a sick green. And Carly Beth’s 
normally soft voice burst out in a terrifying animal growl. 

Chuck and I ran for our lives. 

No joke. We were terrified. 

We ran for blocks, screaming the whole way. It was the worst night of my 



life. 


Everything changed after that. 

Nearly a whole year has gone by, and we haven’t tried to scare Carly Beth 
once. I don’t think Carly Beth can be scared. Not anymore. 

After last Halloween, I don’t think anything scares her. 

She is totally fearless. I haven’t heard her shriek or scream once the entire 

year. 

So I didn’t want to try to scare her now. I needed to talk to her. About that 
scary mask of hers. 

But Chuck kept pressing me back against the tree trunk. “Come on, Steve,” 
he whispered. “They don’t see us. We’ll duck down behind the hedges and get 
ahead of them. Then when they come by, we’ll jump out and grab them.” 

“I don’t really—” I started. But I could see that Chuck had his heart set on 
scaring Carly Beth and Sabrina. So I let him pull me down out of sight. 

A light rain had started to fall. The gusting wind blew the raindrops into my 
face. I crept along the hedge, bent low, following Chuck. 

We passed by the girls and kept moving. I could hear Sabrina’s laugh 
behind us. I heard Carly Beth say something else. Then Sabrina laughed again. 

I wondered what they were talking about. I stopped to glance through the 
hedge. Carly Beth had a weird expression on her face. Her dark eyes stared 
straight ahead. She was moving stiffly. She had the collar of her blue down 
jacket pulled up high around her face. 

I ducked down low again as the girls came closer. I turned and saw that 
Chuck and I were standing on the wide front lawn of the old Carpenter mansion. 

I felt a chill as I stared across the weed-choked lawn at the gloomy old 
house, covered in a deep darkness. Everyone said that the house was haunted— 
haunted by people who had been murdered inside it a hundred years ago. 

I don’t believe in ghosts. But I don’t like standing so close to the creepy old 
Carpenter mansion, either. 

I pulled Chuck into the empty lot next door. Rain pattered the ground. I 
wiped raindrops off my eyebrows. 

Carly Beth and Sabrina were only a few yards away. I could hear Sabrina 
talking excitedly about something. But I couldn’t make out her words. 

Chuck turned to me, an evil grin spreading across his face. “Ready?” he 
whispered. “Let’s get ’em!” 

We leaped to our feet. Then we both jumped out, screaming at the top of 



our lungs. 

Sabrina gasped in shock. Her mouth dropped to her knees. Her hands flew 
up in the air. 

Carly Beth stared at me. 

Then her head tilted against the blue jacket collar—tilted and fell. 

Her head fell off her shoulders. 

It dropped to the ground and bounced onto the grass. 

Sabrina lowered her eyes to the ground. She gaped at Carly Beth’s fallen 
head in disbelief. 

Then Sabrina’s hands began to flail the air crazily. She opened her mouth in 
a scream of horror. And screamed and screamed and screamed. 



4 


I swallowed hard. My knees started to buckle. 

Carly Beth’s head stared up at me from the grass. Sabrina’s shrieks rang in 
my ears. 

And then I heard soft laughter. Laughter from inside Carly Beth’s jacket. 

I saw a clump of brown hair poke up through the raised collar. And then 
Carly Beth’s laughing face shot up from under the jacket. 

Sabrina stopped her wild cries and started to laugh. 

“Gotcha!” Carly Beth cried. She and Sabrina fell all over each other, 
laughing like lunatics. 

“Oh, wow,” Chuck groaned. 

My knees were still shaking. I don’t think I had taken a breath the whole 

time. 

I bent down and picked up Carly Beth’s head. Some kind of dummy head. 
A sculpture, I guess. I rolled it around between my hands. It was amazing. It 
looked just like her. 

“It’s plaster of Paris,” Carly Beth explained, grabbing it away from me. 
“My mom made it.” 

“But—it’s so real-looking!” I choked out. 

She grinned. “Mom is getting pretty good. She keeps doing my head over 
and over. This is one of her best.” 

“It’s okay. But it didn’t fool us,” Chuck said. 

“Yeah. We knew it was a fake,” I quickly agreed. But my voice cracked 
when I said it. I was still kind of in shock. 

Sabrina shook her head. Her black ponytail waved behind her. Sabrina is 
very tall, taller than Chuck and me. Carly Beth is a shrimp. She only comes up to 
Sabrina’s shoulder. 

“You should have seen the looks on your faces!” Sabrina exclaimed. “I 
thought your heads were going to fall off!” 

The two girls hugged each other again and had another good laugh. 

“We saw you a mile away,” Carly Beth said, twirling the head in her hands. 
“Luckily, I brought this head in to show off in art class today. So I pulled my 
jacket over my head, and Sabrina tucked the plaster head into the collar.” 



“You guys scare pretty easy,” Sabrina smirked. 

“We weren’t scared. Really,” Chuck insisted. “We were just playing along.” 

I wanted to change the subject. The girls would talk all day and night about 
how dumb Chuck and I were. If we let them. I didn’t want to let them. 

The rain kept pattering down, blown by the gusting wind. I shivered. We 
were all getting pretty wet. 

“Carly Beth, you know that mask you wore last Halloween? Where did you 
get it?” I asked. I tried to sound casual. I didn’t want her to think it was any big 
deal. 

She hugged her plaster head against the front of her jacket. “Huh? What 
mask?” 

I groaned. She is such a jerk sometimes! 

“Remember that really scary mask you had last Halloween? Where did you 
get it?” 

She and Sabrina exchanged glances. Then Carly Beth said, “I don’t 
remember.” 

“Give me a break!” I groaned. 

“No. Really—” she insisted. 

“You remember,” Chuck told her. “You just don’t want to tell.” 

I knew why Carly Beth didn’t want to tell. She was probably planning to 
get another truly terrifying mask at the same store for this Halloween. She 
wanted to be the scariest kid in town. She didn’t want me to be scary too. 

I turned to Sabrina. “Do you know where she bought that mask?” 

Sabrina made a zipper motion over her lips. “I’m not telling, Steve.” 

“You don’t want to know,” Carly Beth declared, still hugging the head. 
“That mask was too frightening.” 

“You just want to be scarier than me,” I replied angrily. “But I need a really 
scary mask this year, Carly Beth. There are some kids I want to scare and—” 

“I’m serious, Steve,” Carly Beth interrupted. “There was something totally 
weird about the mask. It wasn’t just a mask. It came alive. It clamped onto my 
head, and I couldn’t get it off. The mask was haunted or something.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

“She’s telling the truth!” Sabrina cried, narrowing her dark eyes at me. 

“The mask was evil,” Carly Beth continued. “It started giving me orders. It 
started talking all by itself, in a horrible, harsh growl. I couldn’t control it. And I 
couldn’t get it off. It was attached to my head! I—I was so scared!” 



“Oh, wow,” Chuck murmured, shaking his head. “You’ve got a good 
imagination, Carly Beth.” 

“Good story,” I agreed. “Save it for English class.” 

“But it’s the truth!” Carly Beth cried. 

“You just don’t want me to be scary,” I grumbled. “But I need a good, scary 
mask like that one. Come on,” I begged. “Tell.” 

“Tell us,” Chuck insisted. 

“Tell,” I repeated, trying to sound tough. 

“No way,” Carly Beth replied, shaking her fake round, little head. “Let’s get 
home. It’s really raining hard.” 

“Not till you tell!” I cried. I stepped in front of her to block her path. 

“Grab the head!” Chuck cried. 

I grabbed the plaster head from Carly Beth’s hands. 

“Give it back!” she shrieked. She swiped at it, but I swung it out of her 
reach. Then I tossed it to Chuck. 

He backed away. Sabrina chased after him. “Give that back to her!” 

“We’ll give it back when you tell us where you bought that mask!” I told 
Carly Beth. 

“No way!” she cried. 

Chuck tossed the head to me. Carly Beth made a wild grab for it. But I 
caught it and heaved it back to Chuck. 

“Give it back! Come on!” Carly Beth cried, running after Chuck. “My mom 
made that. If it gets messed up, she’ll kill me!” 

“Then tell me where you bought the mask!” I insisted. 

Chuck tossed the head to me. Sabrina jumped up and batted it down. She 
made a wild dive for it, but I got there first. I picked it up off the grass and 
heaved it back to Chuck. 

“Stop it! Give it back!” 

Both girls were screaming angrily. But Chuck and I kept up our game of 
keep-away. 

Carly Beth made a frantic leap for the head and fell on her stomach onto the 
grass. When she stood up, the front of her jacket and her jeans were soaked, and 
she had grass stains on her forehead. 

“Tell!” I insisted, holding the head high in the air. “Tell, and you can have 
the head back!” 

She growled at me. 



“Okay,” I warned her. “I guess I have to drop-kick it onto that roof.” 

I turned toward the house at the top of the lawn. Then I held the head in 
front of me in both hands and pretended I was going to punt it onto the roof. 

“Okay, okay!” Carly Beth cried. “Don’t kick it, Steve.” 

I kept the head in front of me. “Where did you get the mask?” 

“You know that weird little party store a couple of blocks from school?” 

I nodded. I had seen the store, but I had never gone in. 

“That’s where I bought it. There’s a back room. It was filled with weird, 
ugly masks. That’s where I got mine.” 

“All right!” I cried happily. I handed Carly Beth back her head. 

“You guys are creeps,” Sabrina muttered, pulling her collar up against the 
rain. She pushed me out of the way and wiped the grass stain off Carly Beth’s 
forehead. 

“I really didn’t want to tell you,” Carly Beth moaned. “I wasn’t making that 
story up about the mask. It was so terrifying.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes again. 

“Please, don’t go there!” Carly Beth begged. She grabbed my arm tightly. 
“Please, Steve. Please, don’t go to that party store!” 

I pulled my arm away. I narrowed my eyes at her. And I laughed. 

Too bad I didn’t take her seriously. 

Too bad I didn’t listen to her. 

It might have saved me from a night of endless horror. 



5 


“Get off me! Get off me, Mamie! I mean it!” I shouted. 

The little redheaded pest hung onto my back, laughing and digging her 
pudgy fingers into my neck. Why did she think I was some kind of thrill ride? 

“Get off! This is my good sweater!” I cried. “If you wreck it—” 

She laughed even harder. 

It had rained all night and all morning. But the clouds had parted at 
lunchtime. Now the sky was blue and clear. I had no choice. I had to hold soccer 
practice for the Hogs. 

Across the playground, I saw Duck Benton fighting with Andrew Foster. 
Andrew picked up the soccer ball and heaved it with all his might into Duck’s 
stomach. 

Duck’s mouth shot open. He let out a whoosh of breath, and a huge wad of 
bubblegum went flying into the air. 

“Get off!” I pleaded with Marnie. I tried spinning and twirling as fast as I 
could, trying to throw her off my back. I knew if anything happened to this 
sweater, Mom would have a fit. 

You might ask why I was wearing my best, blue wool sweater to soccer 
practice. Good question. 

The answer is: It was Class Photo Day. And Mom wanted me to take a 
really good picture to send to all my aunts and uncles. She made me wear the 
sweater. And she made me shampoo my hair before school and not wear my 
Orlando Magic cap over it. 

So I looked like a jerk all day. And now, here was soccer practice. And I 
had forgotten to bring a sweatshirt or something to replace my good sweater. 

“Whoooooa!” Marnie gave me a final kick in the side as she hopped off my 

back. 

I pulled down my sweater, hoping it wasn’t stretched too badly. I heard 
angry shouts and glanced up to find Andrew and Duck swinging their fists at 
each other and butting heads across the field. 

I reached for my whistle. 

And grabbed air. 

Marnie had swiped it. She held it high above her head and ran, laughing, 



over the grass. 

“Hey, you—!” I screamed, chasing after the little thief. 

I took three steps—and my sneakers slid in the mud. My feet flew out from 
under me. With an angry cry, I fell forward. And landed on my stomach in deep, 
wet mud. 

“Noooooo!” I let out a howl of dread. “Please. Nooooo!” 

But when I pulled myself up, the mud came with me. My entire body was 
caked in thick, wet mud. My beautiful blue sweater? It was now an ugly brown 
sweater. 

With a sad groan, I sank back onto the ground. I just wanted to disappear, to 
sink from sight into the big mud hole. 

My faithful team, the Horrible Hogs, were laughing and hooting. They 
thought it was a riot. Nice kids, huh? 

At least my mud dive had stopped Andrew and Duck from fighting. 

The mud weighed me down as I climbed slowly to my feet. I felt like 
Andrew. I felt as if I weighed a thousand pounds. Maybe I did! 

I wiped mud off my eyes with both hands—and saw Chuck standing over 
me. He tsk-tsked a few times. “You look really bad, man.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered. 

“Why did you do that?” he asked. 

I squinted through two inches of mud at him. “Excuse me?” 

“You look like a Mud Monster or something.” Chuck snickered. 

“Ha-ha,” I said glumly. 

“You told me to meet you here, Steve. You said we were going straight to 
that party store to buy the you-know-what.” 

He glanced back at my team of first graders. They weren’t listening to our 
conversation. They were too busy flinging mud balls at each other. 

I scooped my hand along the front of my sweater and scraped off about ten 
pounds of glop. “I... uh... I think I’d better go home after practice and get 
changed first,” I told Chuck. 

Talk about your long afternoons! 

I had to break up the mud ball fight. Then I had to hand over all of the little 
angels to their parents and baby-sitters. 

Then I had to explain to their angry parents and baby-sitters why they had 
practiced mud ball fighting instead of soccer. 



I crept home. Chuck waited for me outside. I hid my mud-caked clothes in 
the back of my closet. I didn’t have time to explain to my mom. 

Then I changed into a clean pair of jeans and a gray-and-red Georgetown 
Hoyas sweatshirt one of my uncles had sent me. I don’t know anything about the 
Hoyas. I don’t even know what a Hoya is. But it is a cool sweatshirt. 

I pulled my cap down over my mud-drenched hair. Then I hurried to meet 
Chuck. 

“Steve—is that you?” Mom called from the den. 

“No, it isn’t!” I called back. I closed the front door behind me and ran down 
the driveway before she could stop me from going out again. 

I was really eager to find that party store and check out the weird masks. So 
eager, I forgot to bring any money with me. 

Chuck and I walked two blocks before I reached into my jeans pocket and 
realized it was empty. We jogged back to my house, and I crept up to my room 
once again. 

“This just isn’t my day,” I muttered to myself. 

But I knew that buying a really gross and frightening mask would instantly 
cheer me up. Then I could go ahead with my plan to terrify the Hogs, to get my 
revenge. 

Revenge! 

What a beautiful word. 

When I’m older and have my own car, that’s what I want it to say on my 
license plate. 

I pulled all of my allowance money out of the dresser drawer where I hide 
it. I counted it quickly—about twenty-five dollars. Then I jammed the bills into 
my jeans pocket and hurried back downstairs. 

“Steve—are you going out again?” Mom called from the den. 

“Be right back!” I shouted. I slammed the front door and ran down the 
driveway to meet Chuck. 

Our sneakers slid over fat, wet leaves as we walked. A pale full moon hung 
low over the trees. 

The streets and sidewalks still glistened from all the rain. 

Chuck had his hands stuffed into the pockets of his hooded sweatshirt. He 
leaned into the wind as we walked. “I’m going to be late for dinner,” he 
grumbled. “I’m probably going to get into major trouble.” 

“It’ll be worth it,” I told him, feeling a little more cheerful. We crossed the 



street that led to the party store. A small grocery stood on the corner. Other small 
shops came into view. 

“I can’t wait to see these masks!” I exclaimed. “If I find one just half as 
scary as Carly Beth’s...” 

There it stood! In the darkness above a small, square store, I could make out 
the sign: THE PARTY PLACE. 

“Let’s check it out!” I cried. 

I leaped over a fire hydrant. 

Flew over the sidewalk. Up to the big front window. 

And peered in the window. 



6 


“Oh, wow!” Chuck cried breathlessly, stepping up beside me. 

We both pressed our faces against the window glass and stared in. 

Stared into total darkness. 

“Is it closed?” Chuck asked softly. “Maybe it’s just closed for the night.” 

I uttered an unhappy sigh. “No way. It’s closed for good. The store is gone.” 

Peering through the dust-smeared glass, I could see empty shelves and 
display racks inside. A tall metal shelf lay on its side across the center aisle. A 
trash basket, overflowing with paper and empty soda cans, stood on top of the 
counter. 

“There’s no 'Out of Business’ sign on the door,” Chuck said. He’s a good 
friend. He saw how disappointed I looked. He was trying to stay hopeful. 

“It’s empty.” I sighed. “Totally cleaned out. It isn’t going to open up again 
tomorrow morning.” 

“Yeah. Guess you’re right,” Chuck murmured. 

He slapped my shoulder. “Yo—snap out of it. You’ll find a scary mask at 
some other store.” 

I pushed myself away from the window. “I wanted one like Carly Beth’s,” I 
complained. “You remember that mask. You remember those glowing eyes, 
right? And the way the mouth moved. The way it growled at us with those long, 
dripping fangs. It was so gross. And it looked totally real. Like a real monster!” 

“They probably have masks like that at K-Mart,” Chuck said. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. I kicked at a candy wrapper that blew across 
the sidewalk. 

A car rumbled past slowly. Its headlights rolled over the front of the store, 
lighting up the bare shelves, the empty counters inside. 

“We’d better get home,” Chuck warned, pulling me away from the store. 
“I’m not allowed to wander around town after dark.” 

He said something else, but I didn’t hear him. I was still picturing Carly 
Beth’s mask, still unable to get over my disappointment. 

“You don’t understand how important this is to me,” I told Chuck. “Those 
first graders are ruining my life. I have to pay them back this Halloween. I have 
to.” 



“They’re just first graders,” he replied. 

“No, they’re not. They’re monsters. Vicious, man-eating monsters.” 

“Maybe we can make a scary mask,” Chuck suggested. “You know. Out of 
papier-mache and stuff.” 

I didn’t even bother to answer him. Chuck is a good guy, but sometimes he 
has the dumbest ideas ever thought up by a human. 

I could just see Marnie Rosen and Duck Benton when I popped out on 
Halloween. “Ooh, we’re scared! We’re scared! Papier-mache!” 

“I’m hungry,” Chuck grumbled. “Come on, Steve. Let’s get out of here.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” I agreed. I started to follow him down the sidewalk—then 
stopped. 

Another car had turned onto the street. Its headlights rolled over a narrow 
alley beside the party store. 

“Whoa, Chuck! Check it out!” I grabbed the shoulder of his sweatshirt and 
spun him around. “Look!” I pointed into the alley. “That door is open!” 

“Huh? What door?” 

I dragged Chuck into the alley. A large black trapdoor in the sidewalk had 
been left up. It caught the light from a streetlamp on the sidewalk. 

Chuck and I peered in through the door. Steep concrete steps led down to a 
basement. 

The basement of the party store! 

Chuck turned to me, a confused expression on his face. “So? They left the 
basement door open. So what?” 

I grabbed the open trapdoor and leaned over the steps, squinting into the 
dim light from the streetlamp. “There are boxes down there. A whole bunch of 
cartons.” 

He still didn’t understand. 

“Maybe all the masks and costumes and party things are packed up in those 
cartons. Maybe the stuff hasn’t been shipped away yet.” 

“Whoa. What are you thinking about?” Chuck demanded. “You’re not 
going down there—are you? You’re not going to sneak down to that dark 
basement and try to steal a mask —are you ? ” 

I didn’t answer him. 

I was already halfway down the stairs. 



7 


My heart began to pound as I made my way down. The steps were narrow and 
slippery. Slick from all the rain. 

“Ohh!” I let out a cry as one foot slid over the concrete step and I felt 
myself start to fall. I shot out both hands in search of a railing—but there wasn’t 
one. 

I landed on the hard basement floor with a loud thud —luckily, on both feet. 
Feeling shaken, I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I turned back to the trapdoor and called up to Chuck. “I’m okay. Get 
down here.” 

In the light from the streetlamp, I could see his unhappy face peering down 
at me. “I—I really don’t want to,” he called softly. 

“Chuck—hurry,” I insisted. “Get out of the alley. If someone drives by and 
sees you, they’ll get suspicious.” 

“But it’s so late, Steve,” he whined. “And it isn’t right to break into 
basements and—” 

“We’re not breaking in,” I called up to him impatiently. “The door was open 
—right? Hurry up. If the two of us search the boxes, we can do it in five 
minutes.” 

He leaned down over the opening. “It’s too dark,” he complained. “We 
don’t have a flashlight or anything.” 

“I can see fine,” I replied. “Get down here. You’re wasting time.” 

“But it’s against the law...” he started. Then I saw his expression change. 
His mouth dropped open as car headlights washed over him. With a low gasp, 
Chuck ducked through the opening, and bolted down the stairs. 

He stepped up close beside me, breathing hard. “I don’t think they saw me.” 
His eyes darted around the large basement. “It’s too dark, Steve. Let’s go home.” 

“Give your eyes a chance to adjust,” I instructed him. “I can see okay.” 

I gazed slowly around the basement. It was bigger than I’d thought. I 
couldn’t really see the walls. They were hidden in darkness. 

The ceiling was low, only a foot or two over our heads. Even in the dim 
light, I could see the thick cobwebs in the rafters. 

The cartons had been stacked in two rows near the steps. Somewhere way 



across the room, I could hear the steady drip drip drip of water. 

“Oh!” I jumped when I heard a clattering sound. 

It took me a few seconds to figure out that it was the wind blowing against 
the metal trapdoor up in the alley. 

I made my way over to the nearest carton and bent over to examine it. The 
flaps were folded over each other. But the carton wasn’t sealed. 

“Let’s have a look,” I murmured, reaching for the flaps. 

Chuck had his arms crossed tightly in front of his chest. “This isn’t right,” 
he protested. “It’s stealing.” 

“We haven’t taken anything,” I protested. “And even if we do find a good, 
scary mask and take it, we’ll just borrow it. We’ll return it after Halloween.” 

“Aren’t you... a little scared?” Chuck asked softly, his eyes moving all 
around the dark room. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m a little scared,” I admitted. “It’s cold and creepy down 
here.” The wind clattered the trapdoor above us again. I heard the faint drip of 
water against the concrete floor. 

“Let’s hurry,” I urged. “Help me.” 

Chuck stepped beside me, but he just stared down at the box and didn’t try 
to help. 

I pulled open the first carton, pushed back the cardboard flaps, and peered 
inside. “What is this stuff?” I reached in and pulled out a cone-shaped party hat. 
The box was stuffed with party hats. 

“This is great!” I whispered happily to Chuck. 

I dropped the hat back in the box. “I was right. All the stuff from the store is 
packed up down here. We’re going to find the scary masks. I know we will!” 

Cartons were stacked on top of cartons. I pulled down another one and 
started to pull it open. “Chuck, you take the bottom one,” I instructed. 

He hesitantly reached for the box. “I have a bad feeling about this, Steve,” 
he murmured. 

“Just find the masks,” I replied. My heart was thudding. My hands were 
shaking as I pulled open the second carton. I was really excited. 

“This one is filled with candles,” Chuck reported. 

My carton had piles of party place mats, napkins, and paper cups. “Keep 
going,” I urged. “The masks have got to be down here.” 

Above our heads, the wind shook the trapdoor. I hoped it wouldn’t suddenly 
slam shut on us. I didn’t want to be trapped down in this cold basement in the 



dark. 


Chuck and I slid two more cartons into the pale square of light from 
outside. My carton was taped shut. I struggled to pull off the tape. 

I stopped when I heard the creaking sound above my head. 

Creaking floorboards? 

I froze, my hands over the carton. “What was that?” I whispered. 

Chuck frowned at me. “What was what?” 

“Didn’t you hear that noise upstairs? It sounded like a footstep.” 

Chuck shook his head. “I didn’t hear anything.” 

I listened for a few more seconds. Silence now. So I went back to work on 
the carton. 

I pulled it open and peered eagerly inside. 

Greeting cards. Dozens of greeting cards. I sifted through them. Birthday 
cards. Valentines. A whole carton of cards. 

Disappointed, I shoved the carton to the side and turned to Chuck. “Any 
luck?” 

“Not yet. Let’s see what’s in this one.” 

He pulled open the carton with both hands. Then he leaned over it and 
peered inside. 

“Oh, yuck! ” he cried. 



8 


“It’s so gross!” Chuck groaned. 

“What is? What?” I demanded. I leaped over my carton to get to him. 

“Check it out.” A grin spread over Chuck’s face as he pulled something out 
of the carton. 

I gasped as I saw an ugly purple face with broken teeth and a long, fat 
worm poking out of a hole in its cheek. 

“You found them!” I shrieked. 

Chuck let out a gleeful laugh. “A whole carton of masks! And they’re all 
totally gross!” 

I grabbed the ugly mask from his hand and studied it. “Hey—it feels 
warm!” 

It was so cold down in that basement. Why did the mask feel warm? 

The worm bobbed out of the ugly face, as if it were alive. 

I dropped the mask, plunged my hand into the carton, and pulled out 
another one. A disgusting pig face with thick gobs of green stuff dripping from 
its snout. 

“That one looks like Carly Beth!” Chuck joked. 

“These are scarier than the mask Carly Beth had last year,” I said. 

I pulled another one from the box. A furry animal face, sort of like a gorilla, 
except that it had two long pointed fangs sliding down past its chin. 

I dropped it and grabbed up another mask. Then another. A hideous bald 
head with one eye hanging down by a thread and an arrow through the forehead. 

I tossed it to Chuck and pulled out another one. 

“This is amazing!” I cried happily. “These will terrify those kids. How will 
I ever choose the best one?” 

Chuck let out a disgusted groan and dropped the mask he was holding into 
the box. “They feel like real skin. They’re so warm.” 

I didn’t pay any attention to him. I was busy digging down to the bottom of 
the carton. I wanted to check out each mask before I made my choice. 

I wanted the scariest, grossest mask in the box. I wanted a mask that would 
give those first graders more nightmares than they had given me! 

I pulled out a mask of a girl’s face with a lizard’s head poking out from her 



mouth. 

No. Not scary enough. 

I pulled out a mask of a snarling wolf, its lips pulled back to show two 
jagged rows of pointed teeth. 

Too wimpy. 

I pulled out an ugly mask of a leering old man, his mouth twisted in an evil 
grin. One long, crooked tooth stuck down over his lower lip. 

The mask had long, stringy yellow hair that drooped down over the old 
man’s craggy forehead. I could see big black spiders climbing in the hair and in 
the ears. A chunk of forehead was missing, revealing a patch of gray skull 
underneath. 

Not bad, I thought. 

This one even smelled bad! 

I started to put it back when I heard a creaking sound again. 

Louder this time. 

The ceiling above my head groaned. 

I gasped. It really sounded like a footstep. Someone walking around up 
there. 

But the store had appeared dark and empty. Chuck and I had both stared 
into the window for a long time. If anyone was hiding there in the darkness, we 
would have seen them. 

Another creak made me suck in a mouthful of air. 

I froze, listening hard. I could hear the steady drip drip of water across the 
dark basement. I could hear the trapdoor rattling outside. 

And I could hear my own shallow breathing. 

The ceiling squeaked. I swallowed hard. 

It’s an old building, I told myself. All old buildings squeak and creak. 
Especially on a windy night. 

A scraping footstep made me gasp out loud. 

“Chuck—did you hear that?” 

Gripping the old-man mask, I listened hard. 

“Did you hear that?” I whispered. “Do you think someone else is in the 
building?” 

Silence. 

Another scraping footstep. 

“Chuck?” I whispered. “Hey—Chuck?” 



My heart pounding, I turned to him. 
“Chuck?” 

He was gone. 



9 


“Chuck?” 

A stab of fear made my breath catch in my throat. 

I heard the hard thud of sneakers against concrete, and turned to the stairs. 
In the dim light, I saw Chuck disappear out through the trapdoor. 

As soon as he reached the alley, he poked his head back in. “Steve—get 
out!” he called down in a loud whisper. “Hurry! Get out of there!” 

Too late. 

A ceiling light flashed on. 

As I blinked against the bright light, I saw a man move quickly across the 
basement. He swept along the wall, pulled a long, black cord—and the trapdoor 
slammed shut with a deafening clang. 

“Oh!” I uttered a weak cry as he turned angrily to me. 

I was trapped. 

Chuck got out. But I was trapped. Trapped in the basement with this guy. 

And what a weird-looking guy! To begin with, he wore a long black cape 
that swept behind him as he crossed the room to me. 

Is that a Halloween costume? I wondered. 

Does he wear a black cape all the time? 

Beneath the billowing cape, he wore a black suit, kind of old-fashioned 
looking. 

He had shiny black hair, parted in the middle and slicked down with some 
kind of hair grease, and a pencil-thin, black mustache that curled over his upper 
lip. 

As he stood over me, his black eyes glowed like two burning coals. 

Like vampire eyes! I thought. 

My whole body was shaking. I gripped the sides of the carton and tried to 
return his stare. 

Trapped, I thought, waiting for him to speak. Trapped with a vampire. 

“What are you doing here?” he asked finally. He pushed back his cape and 
crossed his arms in front of him. The glowing eyes glared down at me sternly. 

“Uh... just looking at masks,” I managed to choke out. I was still on my 



knees on the floor. I knew that my legs were shaking too hard to stand up. 

“The store is closed,” the man said through gritted teeth. 

“I know,” I admitted, lowering my eyes to the floor. “I—” 

“The store went out of business. We’re closed for good.” 

“I... I’m sorry,” I murmured. 

Was he going to let me go? What was he going to do with me? 

If I started to scream, no one would hear me. 

Would Chuck try to get help for me? Or was he halfway home by now? 

“I live upstairs,” the man explained, still glaring at me angrily. “I heard 
scraping sounds down here. Boxes being moved around. I was going to call the 
police.” 

“I’m not a burglar,” I blurted out. “Please don’t call the police. The trapdoor 
was open and my friend and I came down.” 

His eyes moved quickly around the room. “Your friend?” 

“He ran away when he heard you coming,” I told him. “I just wanted to see 
if there were any masks. You know. For Halloween. I wasn’t going to steal 
anything. I just—” 

“But the store is closed,” the man repeated. He glanced at the open carton in 
front of me. “Those masks are very special. They’re not for sale.” 

“N-not for sale?” I stammered. 

“You shouldn’t break into stores,” the man replied, shaking his head. His 
slicked-down hair gleamed under the low ceiling light. “How old are you?” 

I drew a blank. My mouth dropped open, but no answer came out. I was so 
terrified, I forgot how old I was! 

“Twelve,” I answered finally. I took a deep breath, trying to calm myself. 

“Twelve and you’re already breaking into stores,” the man said softly. 

“I don’t break into stores!” I protested. “I mean, I never did before. I came 
to buy a mask. Look. I brought money.” 

I jammed my trembling hand into my jeans pocket and pulled out the wad 
of bills. “Twenty-five dollars,” I said, holding up the money so he could see it. 
“Here. Is it enough for one of these masks?” 

He rubbed his chin. “I told you, young man. These masks are special. They 
cannot be sold. Believe me—you do not want one of these.” 

“But I do!” I cried. “They’re awesome! They’re the best masks I’ve ever 
seen. Halloween is only a few days away. I need one. I need one desperately. 
Please—!” 



“No!” the man shouted sharply. “Not for sale.” 

“But why not?” I wailed. 

He eyed me thoughtfully. “Too real,” he replied. “The masks are too real.” 

“But that’s why they’re so awesome!” I exclaimed. “Please? Please? Take 
my money. Here.” I pushed the wad of bills toward him. 

He didn’t reply. Instead, he turned away. His cape swirled behind him. 
“Come with me, young man.” 

“Huh? Where?” Cold fear ran down my back. I was still holding the money 
out in front of me. 

“Come upstairs with me. I’m going to call your parents.” 

“No!” I shrieked. “Please—!” 

If my mom and dad found out I got caught breaking into the basement of a 
store, they would go totally ballistic! They’d ground me for life! I’d miss this 
Halloween—and the next thirty Halloweens to come! 

The man eyed me coldly. “I don’t want to call the police,” he said softly. 
“I’d rather call your parents.” 

“Please...” I murmured again, climbing to my feet. 

I suddenly had an idea. 

I could make a run for it. 

I glanced quickly at the concrete stairs leading up to the trapdoor. If I took 
off—and really flew—I could get up those stairs before the man could reach me. 

The trapdoor was shut. But it probably wasn’t locked. I could push it open 
from underneath, and just keep running. 

I glanced again at the steps. It was worth a try, I decided. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I silently counted to three. 

One... two... THREE! 

On three, I took off. My heart thudded louder than my sneakers on the hard 
floor. But I made it to the stairs in about a second and a half! 

“Hey—stop!” I heard the caped man cry out in surprise. I could hear his 
heavy steps as he plunged after me. 

“Stop, young man! Where are you going?” 

I didn’t slow down or glance back. 

I took the stairs two at a time. 

Yes! Yes! Em getting away! I thought. 

As I reached the top, I shot out both hands—and pushed up on the trapdoor 



with all of my might. 
It didn’t budge. 



“Ohh!” I let out a terrified moan. 

The caped man had reached the bottom of the steps. I could practically feel 
his breath on the back of my neck. 

The door has got to open! I told myself. It’s got to! 

I took a deep breath. Then I heaved my shoulder against the door. I uttered 
a desperate groan as I pushed. 

Pushed. 

The caped man made a grab for me. 

I felt his hand brush my ankle. 

I kicked the hand away. Then I shoved my shoulder hard against the 
trapdoor. 

And it opened. 

“Yes!” A happy cry escaped my throat as I scrambled out into the alley. 

The cold air rushed against my hot face. I stumbled over something hard—a 
stone or a brick. I didn’t stop to look. I ran through the narrow alley, to the 
sidewalk in front of the store. 

My eyes swept back and forth. I searched for Chuck. No sign of him. 

Had the caped man followed me out the trapdoor? Was he chasing after me? 

I turned back to the alley. And saw only darkness. 

Then I took off, running fast, my feet practically flying over the pavement. I 
shot across the street. Bright lights washed over me. A car horn honked, making 
me jump about a mile! The car roared past. 

“Hey, Steve—!” 

Chuck stepped out from behind a tall evergreen shrub. “You made it!” 

“Yeah. I made it,” I replied, gasping for breath. 

“I—I didn’t know what to do!” he stammered. 

I shook my head. “So you just stood here?” 

“I waited for you,” he said. “I was kind of scared.” 

Big help. 

“Get going,” I urged, glancing back across the street. “He may be chasing 



We ran side by side, our breath steaming up into the cold night air. The 
houses and dark lawns whirred past in a gray-black blur. We didn’t say another 
word to each other. 

Three blocks later, I slowed down as we reached Chuck’s house. I leaned 
over and tried to shake away the sharp pain in my side. I always get a pain like 
that when I run more than a few blocks. 

“See you!” Chuck cried breathlessly. “Sorry you didn’t get your mask.” 

“Yeah. It’s too bad,” I murmured glumly. 

I watched him run along the side of his house until he disappeared around 
the back. Then I took a deep breath and took off again, jogging now, toward my 
house on the next block. 

My heart was still racing in my chest. But I was starting to feel calmer. The 
man in the black cape didn’t chase after us. In a few seconds, I would be safe in 
my own home. 

Halfway up our driveway, I slowed to a stop. The pain in my side had faded 
to a dull ache. 

I stepped into the yellow light from the front porch. I could hear my dog 
Sparky barking inside the house. Sparky knew I was home. 

As I climbed onto the front stoop, a smile crossed my face. 

Avery wide smile. 

I was pleased with myself. In fact, I was overjoyed. I felt like leaping in the 
air. Or maybe doing a wild, crazy dance. Or crowing like a rooster. Or tilting 
back my head and howling at the moon. 

The evening had been a total success. 

I didn’t tell Chuck. I didn’t want Chuck to know. 

But when the caped man clicked on the basement light—in that split second 
before he saw me and I saw him—I grabbed a mask from the carton. And I 
shoved it under my sweatshirt. 

I had a mask! 

It hadn’t been easy. In fact, being trapped in that eerie basement with that 
strange man had been the scariest time of my life. 

But I had a mask! Safely tucked under my sweatshirt. 

I could feel it against my chest as I ran. And I could feel it now, warm 
against my skin as I reached for the front door. 

I was so happy. So pleased with myself. 

And then I felt the mask start to move. 



And I screamed as something sharp bit into my chest. 



11 


I grabbed the front of my sweatshirt. I pressed both hands tight against the bulge 
of the mask. 

“Whoa,” I murmured, holding the mask in place under the sweatshirt. 

Stop imagining things, Steve, I scolded myself. 

Calm down. The mask started to slip down your chest. That’s all. It wasn’t 
moving. It didn’t bite you. 

Get in the house, I ordered myself. Hide the thing in a drawer in your room. 
And pull yourself together. 

Why was I so nervous? 

The scary part was over. I had escaped with one of the great masks. Now it 
was my turn to scare other people. Why was I standing there scaring myself? 

Still holding the front of my sweatshirt, I pushed open the front door and 
stepped into the house. “Down, boy! Get down, Sparky!” I cried as the little 
black terrier greeted me. He leaped high off the floor, bouncing off me, barking 
and whining as if he hadn’t seen me in twenty years. 

“Get down, Sparky! Down!” 

I wanted to sneak into the house, run up to my room, and stash the mask 
away before my parents heard me return. But Sparky ruined that plan. 

“Steve—is that you?” Mom stormed into the living room, a fretful frown on 
her face. She glared at me and angrily blew a curl of blond hair from in front of 
her eyes. “Where on earth were you? Your father and I went ahead and ate 
dinner. Yours is ice-cold by now!” 

“Sorry, Mom,” I said, still holding the front of my sweatshirt to keep the 
mask in place as I tried to push Sparky away. 

The lock of hair fell back over her forehead. She blew at it again. “Well? 
Where were you?” 

“I... well...” 

Think fast, Steve. 

You can’t tell her you sneaked out to steal a Halloween mask from the 
basement of a store. 

“I had to help Chuck with something,” I finally answered. 

Sure, it was a lie. But it wasn’t a serious lie. 



I’m usually a very honest guy. But right then, all I cared about was having 
the mask! I had it, and I was desperate to get it out from under my sweatshirt and 
hidden in a safe place in my room. 

“Well, you should have told me where you were going,” Mom scolded. 
“Your father went out to do the grocery shopping. But he’s very angry, too. You 
should have been home for dinner.” 

I lowered my head. “Sorry, Mom.” 

Sparky gazed up at me. Was he staring at the bulge in my sweatshirt? 

If the dog could see it, Mom could see it too. 

“I’ll take off my coat and come right down,” I told her. 

I didn’t give her a chance to reply. I spun around, leaped onto the stairs, and 
ran up two at a time. I flew down the hall, burst into my room, and slammed the 
door behind me. 

I took a few seconds to catch my breath. I listened hard, making sure that 
Mom hadn’t followed me upstairs. 

No. I could hear her banging around in the kitchen, getting my dinner ready. 

I couldn’t wait to check out the mask! 

Which one did I take? When the light came on in the store basement, I 
grabbed a mask without looking. I stuffed it under my sweatshirt before I could 
see it. 

Now I eagerly reached under the sweatshirt and pulled out my hard-won 
prize. 

“Wow!” I raised it in both hands and admired it. 

The old-man mask. I took the mask of the creepy old man. 

I smoothed out its long strings of yellow-white hair. Holding it by the big, 
pointy ears, I lifted it in front of my face and examined it closely. 

A single white tooth hung down over the bottom lip. A brown wormhole 
poked through the center of the tooth. 

Outside on the front stoop, the big tooth had scraped my chest, I realized. 
That’s what made me think the mask was biting me. 

The mouth was twisted in an evil sneer. The lips curled like two brown 
worms. 

The long nose had gobs of green dripping from each nostril. A square patch 
of skin was missing just above the forehead. I could see gray skull bone in the 
hole. 

The whole face was creased and lined. The flesh was a sickly green. The 



skin appeared to be peeling off the face. Dark scabs bulged from the sunken 
cheeks. 

Black spiders appeared to crawl through the stringy, yellow hair. Spiders 
poked out of the two ears. 

“Yuck!” I cried. 

Was I holding the scariest Halloween mask in the world? 

No. In the universe! 

I began to feel a little queasy just holding it. I rubbed the scabby cheek with 
one finger. The skin felt warm, like real skin. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced laughing like an old man. “Heh-heh-heh.” I 
tried a dry cackle. 

Look out, Hogs! I told myself. When I come leaping out at you on 
Halloween night in this mask, you will jump out of your skins! 

“Heh-heh-heh.” 

I raked the ugly, long hair back over the head. My fingers bumped over the 
spiders tangled in the hair. The spiders didn’t feel rubbery. They felt soft and 
warm like the skin. 

I gazed down happily at the disgusting, old face. It sneered back at me. The 
brown worm lips quivered. 

Should I try it on? 

I carried it over to the mirror on my closet door. I was dying to see what I’d 
look like. 

I’ll slip it on for just a second, I decided. Long enough to see how ugly and 
frightening I’d look. 

Holding it in both hands, I raised the mask over my head. 

Then slowly, carefully... very carefully... I began to pull the mask down, 
down, down over my face. 



12 


“Steve—!” 

Mom’s loud cry from downstairs startled me. 

“Steve—where are you? Get down here for your dinner!” 

“Coming!” I shouted back. I lowered the mask. I’d try it on later, I decided. 

I walked quickly to the dresser and pulled open my sock drawer. Smoothing 
the long, spidery hair over the ugly face, I set the mask down carefully in the 
drawer. Then I hid it under several pairs of socks and closed the drawer. 

I hurried down to the kitchen. Mom had a salad on the table and a plate of 
warmed-up macaroni-and-cheese. 

My stomach growled. I suddenly realized that I was starved! I sat down, 
pushed the salad aside, and started forking up the macaroni as fast as I could. 

I glanced down to see Sparky staring up at me with his big, black, soulful 
eyes. He saw me looking at him and tilted his head. 

“Sparky,” I said, “you don’t like macaroni—remember?” 

He tilted his head the other way, as if trying to understand. I slipped him a 
couple of noodles. He sniffed them and left them on the floor. 

Behind me, Mom busily cleaned out the refrigerator, making room for the 
groceries Dad was out buying. I was dying to tell her about the scary mask. I 
wanted to show it to her. Maybe put it on and make her scream. 

But I knew she’d ask too many questions about where I bought it, and how 
much it cost, and how much of my allowance I used up to pay for it. 

All questions I couldn’t answer. 

So I bit my tongue and forced myself not to blurt out the exciting news that 
I wouldn’t have to be a hobo again this Halloween. 

That was my costume for the past five years. A hobo. Actually, it wasn’t 
much of a costume. I wore one of Dad’s baggy old suits with patches on the 
pants. Mom rubbed charcoal on my face to make me look dirty. And I carried a 
knapsack on a fishing pole over my shoulder. 

Bor-ring! 

This Halloween will be different, I promised myself. This Halloween will 
not be boring. 

I was so happy. As I sat gobbling down macaroni-and-cheese, I couldn’t get 



that creepy mask out of my mind. 

I’m not going to tell anyone about it, I decided. I’m going to scare everyone 
I know. 

I’m not even going to tell Chuck. After all, he ran away and left me down in 
that dark basement. 

Look out, Chuckie Boy! I told myself, grinning so hard some noodles 
slipped out of my mouth. I’m going to get you too! 



13 


I had soccer practice for my first graders after school the next day. It was a 
sunny, cold October afternoon. The sunlight made the yellow and brown falling 
leaves glitter like gold. Puffs of white cloud floated like soft cotton across the 
blue sky. 

Everything looked beautiful to me. Because Halloween was only one day 
away. 

I was staring up at the clouds when Marnie Rosen drop-kicked the soccer 
ball into my stomach. 

I grabbed my stomach and doubled over in pain. Duck Benton and two 
other kids jumped on my back and drove me facedown into the mud. 

I didn’t care. 

In fact, I laughed. 

Because I knew that I had only one day to wait. 

I tried to show them how to pass. As I ran along the sidelines, Andrew 
Foster stuck out his foot. I tripped and went sailing into the bike rack. A 
handlebar caught me under the chin as I fell, and I actually saw stars. 

But I didn’t care. 

I picked myself up with a grin on my face. 

Because I knew a secret. I knew an evil secret that the kids didn’t know. I 
knew that trick-or-treat night was going to be a special treat for me! 

At four o’clock, I called an end to practice. I was too weak to blow the 
whistle. My clothes were soaked with mud, I walked with a limp, and I had cuts 
and bruises in twenty different places. 

A typical practice with the Horrible Hogs. 

But did I care? 

You know the answer. 

I gathered them in a circle around me. They were shoving each other, and 
pulling hair, and calling each other horrible names. I told you—they’re total 
animals. 

I raised my hands to quiet them down. “Let’s have a special Hogs’ 
Halloween party tomorrow,” I suggested. 

“YAAAY!” they cheered. 



“We’ll meet in our costumes after practice,” I continued. “The whole team. 
And we’ll all go trick-or-treating together. I’ll take you.” 

“YAAY!” they cheered again. 

“So tell your parents to drop you off,” I told them. “This is going to be our 
special party. We’ll meet in front of the old Carpenter mansion.” 

Silence. This time they didn’t cheer. 

“Why do we have to meet there?” Andrew asked. 

“Isn’t that old house supposed to be haunted?” Marnie asked softly. 

“That place is too creepy,” Duck added. 

I narrowed my eyes at them, challenging them. “You guys aren’t scared — 
are you?” I demanded. 

Silence. They exchanged nervous glances. 

“Well? Are you all too wimpy to meet me there?” I asked. 

“No way!” Marnie insisted. 

“No way! We’re not scared of a stupid old house!” 

They all began to tell me how brave they were. They all said they would 
meet me there. 

“I saw a ghost once,” Johnny Myers bragged. “Behind my garage. I shouted 
‘Boo!’ and it floated away.” 

These kids are animals, but they have great imaginations. 

The other kids all started teasing Johnny. He stuck to his story. He insisted 
he saw a ghost. So they pushed him to the ground and got his jacket all muddy. 

“Hey, Steve—what are you going to be for Halloween?” Marnie asked. 

“Yeah. What’s your costume?” Andrew demanded. 

“He’s going to be a pile of toxic waste!” someone joked. 

“No. He’s going to be a ballerina!” someone else declared. 

They all hooted and jeered. 

Go ahead and laugh, guys, I thought. Have a good laugh now. Because 
when you see me on Halloween, I’ll be the only one laughing. 

“Uh... I’m going to be a hobo,” I told them. “You’ll recognize me. I’ll be 
wearing a tattered old suit. And my face will be all dirty. I’ll be dressed like a 
bum.” 

“You are a bum!” one of my loyal team members shouted. 

More wild laughing and hooting. More shoving and hair-pulling and 
wrestling on the ground. 

Luckily, their parents and baby-sitters showed up to take them home. I 



watched them go with a big smile on my face. A big, evil smile. 

Then I grabbed up my backpack and hurried home. I ran all the way. I was 
eager to take another look at my mask. 

Chuck stepped out as I jogged past his house. “Hey, Steve... what’s up?” he 
called. 

“Not much!” I called back. “Later, man!” 

I kept running. I didn’t want to hang out with Chuck. I needed to check out 
that mask. I needed to remind myself of how awesome it was. How totally 
terrifying. 

I burst through the front door. Then I ran straight up the stairs to my room, 
taking the stairs three at a time. 

I raced down the long hall. I turned into my room and tossed my backpack 
onto the bed. Then I hurried across the room to my dresser and eagerly jerked 
open my sock drawer. 

“Huh?” 

I peered inside. With a trembling hand, I shoved away several balled-up 
pairs of socks. 

The mask was gone. 



14 


“No!” 

I began pawing frantically through the drawer, tossing all the socks onto the 
floor. 

No mask. Gone. 

The balled-up socks bounced all over the room. My heart was bouncing too. 

Then I remembered that I had moved the mask. Before school that morning. 
I was worried that my mom might do laundry. And open my sock drawer. And 
see it there. 

So I had shoved it to the back of my closet, behind my rolled-up sleeping 

bag. 

Letting out a long whoosh of air, I dropped to my hands and knees. I 
quickly collected all the socks and stuffed them back into the drawer. Then I 
opened the closet door and pulled down the mask from the top shelf. 

Steve, you’ve got to calm down, man, I told myself. It’s just a Halloween 
mask, after all. You’ve got to stop scaring yourself like that. 

Sometimes it helps to scold yourself, to give yourself advice. 

I started to feel a little calmer. I smoothed back the stringy yellow hair and 
mbbed my hand over the craggy, scab-covered skin of the mask. 

The brown lips sneered at me. I poked my little finger through the 
disgusting wormhole in the tooth. I squeezed the spiders hiding inside the ears. 

“This is so cool! ” I declared out loud. 

I couldn’t wait a whole day till Halloween. I had to show it to someone. 

No. I had to scare someone with it. 

Chuck’s face popped instantly into my mind. My old friend Chuck was the 
perfect victim. I knew that he was home. I had seen him there a few minutes ago. 

Wow. Will he be shocked! I told myself. Chuck thought that I ran out of that 
store basement empty-handed. When I sneak into his house and creep up on him 
wearing this disgusting mask, he’ll faint! 

I glanced at the clock. I had an hour before dinnertime. Mom and Dad 
weren’t even home yet. 

Yes, I’ll do it! I decided. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced my old-man cackle. “Heh-heh-heh.” The 



scariest, most evil cackle I could do. 

Then I grasped the wrinkled neck of the mask in both hands. Stepping in 
front of the mirror, I raised the mask over my head. 

And tugged it down. 

It slid easily over my hair. It felt soft and warm as I pulled it over my face. 

Down over my ears. Over my cheeks. 

Down, down. 

Until I felt the top of the mask settle onto my hair. I twisted it until I could 
see out of the narrow eyeholes. 

Then I lowered my hands to my sides and stepped closer to the mirror to 
check myself out. 

So warm. 

I suddenly felt too warm. 

The rubbery mask pressed tightly against my cheeks and forehead. 

Warmer. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as my face began to burn. 

So hot... 

So hard to breathe. 

“Hey... what is happening to me?” 



15 


I could feel the skin of the mask tightening around my face. 

My cheeks burned. A sour odor swept over me, choked me. 

I gagged. I sucked in a deep breath through my mouth. But the mask was so 
tight, I could hardly breathe. 

I grabbed the ears with both hands. The outside of the mask felt normal. But 
inside, I was burning up! 

I tried to tug the mask off. But it wouldn’t slide up. The hot rubber stuck to 
my face. 

I groaned as the putrid odor washed over me again. 

I tugged harder. The mask didn’t budge. 

I gasped for breath. 

I grabbed the stringy hair—and pulled. I slid my hands under the chin—and 
pushed. 

“Ohhh.” A sick groan escaped my throat. My hands dropped limply to my 
sides. 

I suddenly felt so tired. So weak. 

So totally weak. 

Every breath was a struggle. I bent over. My body began to tremble. 

I felt so weak. And old. 

Old. 

Was this how an old man felt? 

Calm down, Steve, I scolded myself. It’s just a rubber mask. It fits a little 
too snug, that’s all. 

It’s stuck to your face. But you’ll pull it off, and you’ll be fine. 

Calm down. Count to ten. Then examine the mask in the mirror. Grab it 
from the bottom, and you’ll be able to pull it up. No problem. 

I counted to ten. Then I stepped up close to the mirror. 

I nearly cried out when I saw my reflection. The mask really was awesome! 
So real. So gross. 

With my eyes staring out of it, the face seemed to come alive. The brown 
lips sneered back at me. When I moved my lips, they appeared to move too. The 



green gobs of goo trembled inside the big nostrils. The spiders appeared to be 
crawling through the tangled, yellow hair. 

It’s only a mask. A really cool mask, I said to myself. 

I started to feel a little calmer. 

But then a cackle escaped my throat. “Heh-heh-heh.” 

Not my cackle! 

Not in my voice! An old man’s cackle. 

How did that happen? How did I utter such a strange sound? 

I clamped my lips shut. I didn’t want to make that sound again. 
“Heh-heh-heh.” 

Another frightening cackle! In a shrill, high-pitched voice. More like a dry 
croak than a laugh. 

I tightened my jaw. Clenched my teeth. Held my breath so I wouldn’t 
cackle again. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” 

I wasn’t doing it! 

Who was cackling like that? 

Where was the shrill, dry laugh coming from? 

I gaped at the old face in the mirror, suddenly frozen in fear. 

And then I felt a strong hand grab my leg. 



16 


With a choked gasp, I whirled around. 

And peered down through the tight eyeholes of the mask. 

I instantly saw that it wasn’t a hand on my leg. It was teeth. 

Dog teeth. 

“Sparky—it’s you!” I cried. But my voice came out in a dry whisper. 

Sparky backed away. 

I cleared my throat and tried again. “Don’t be afraid, Sparky. It’s only me.” 
My voice! It sounded more like a dry cough. 

It sounded like my grandpa! 

I had an old man’s face—and an old man’s voice. 

And I felt so tired. So totally weak and tired. 

As I reached to pet Sparky, my arms drooped as if they weighed a thousand 
pounds. Both of my knees cracked as I bent down. 

The dog gazed up at me and tilted his head. His short stub of a tail wagged 
furiously. 

“Don’t be scared, Sparky,” I croaked. “I was just trying out this mask. 
Pretty scary, huh?” 

I lowered my face and tried to pick Sparky up. 

But as I leaned forward, I could see the dog’s eyes go wide with terror. 
Sparky let out a shrill yip —jumped out of my hands, and went tearing across the 
room, barking at the top of his lungs. Barking in total fright. 

“Sparky—it’s me!” I cried. “I know I sound different. But it’s me—Steve!” 

I wanted to chase after him. But my legs felt so weak, and my knees refused 
to bend. 

It took me three tries to pull myself up to a standing position. My head 
ached. I was too out-of-breath to run after Sparky. 

Too late, anyway. I could hear him barking his head off, already downstairs. 
“Weird,” I muttered, rubbing my aching back. I hobbled back to the mirror. 
Sparky has seen masks before. He knew it was me. Why was he so scared? Was 
it my weird voice? 

How had the mask dried up my voice? And why did I suddenly feel one 



hundred and ten? 

At least, my face no longer felt on fire. But the skin of the mask still 
pressed so tightly against my face, I could barely move my lips. 

I have to get out of this thing, I decided. Chuck will have to wait until 
Halloween night to be scared out of his skull. 

I raised both hands to my neck and searched for the bottom of the mask. My 
neck felt craggy and wrinkled. The skin was dry. 

Where was the bottom of the mask? 

I leaned close to the mirror on my closet door and narrowed my eyes at my 
reflection. I stared hard at the neck of the mask. 

Wrinkled skin flecked with ugly brown patches. 

But where was the bottom? Where did the mask end and my neck begin? 

My hands began to tremble as they fumbled up and down my throat. I could 
feel my heart begin to race. 

I moved my hands slowly, carefully, up and down my neck. 

Again. And again. 

Finally, I let my hands drop to my side and uttered a weary, frightened sigh. 

There was no mask bottom. No line at all between the mask and my neck. 

The wrinkled, spotted mask skin had become my skin. 

“Nooooo! Nooooo!” I wailed in my old man’s voice. I had to get the thing 
off me! There had to be a way! 

I squeezed the cheeks of the mask and tugged with all my might. 

“Ow!” Sharp pain ran down my face. 

I pulled the hair. That sent a wave of pain shooting down my scalp. 
Frantically, I grabbed at the mask, slapped at it, pulled it, tore at it. 

I felt each move. Each slap and tug made my skin hurt. Every touch hurt me 
as if it were my own skin. 

“The eyeholes!” I croaked. 

I reached for the eyeholes. Maybe I could slip my fingers inside the 
eyeholes and lift the mask off. 

My hands fumbled around my eyes. My trembling fingers searched, poking 
and rubbing. 

No eyeholes. There were no eyeholes. 

The rutted, scab-covered skin had melted onto me. It had become my skin. 

The ugly, disgusting mask had become my face! 

I looked like a horrifying, spider-infested, decaying old man. And I felt as 



old and weird as I looked! 

My throat tightened in terror. I sank against the mirror, pressing my ugly, 
craggy forehead against the glass. 

I shut my eyes. What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated like 
an unhappy chant in my mind. 

And then I heard the front door slam. And I heard Mom’s voice at the 
bottom of the stairway. “Steve—are you home? Steve?” 

What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated and repeated. 

“Steve?” Mom called. “Come down here. I want to show you something.” 

No! I thought, swallowing hard, my dry throat making a sick clicking 
sound. No! I can’t come down! I can’t! I don’t want you to see me like this! 

“Oh, never mind!” Mom called. “I’m coming up there!” 



17 


I heard her footsteps on the stairs. 

A shock of panic made me lurch toward the door. I nearly fell over. My old 
legs were stiff, too stiff to move quickly. 

I hobbled to the door and closed it just as Mom reached the second floor. 
Then I leaned against the door, my hand on my throbbing chest, trying to catch 
my breath. 

Trying to think. Trying to decide what to say. 

I couldn’t let her see me like this. I couldn’t let her see the mask. She’d start 
asking questions. And I couldn’t let her see how the mask had changed me. 

A few seconds later, she knocked gently on the door. “Steve, are you in 
there? What are you doing?” 

“Uh... nothing, Mom.” 

“Well, may I come in? I brought you something.” 

“Not right now,” I croaked. 

Please don’t open the door! I begged silently. Please don’t come into my 
room! 

“Steve, why do you sound so strange?” Mom demanded. “What’s wrong 
with your voice?” 

“Uh...” Think fast, Steve. Think fast. 

“Uh... sore throat, Mom. A really bad sore throat.” 

“Let me take a look at you. Are you sick?” Glancing down, I saw the 
doorknob turn. 

“No!” I screamed, pressing my back against the door. 

“You’re not sick?” 

“I mean, yes,” I croaked in my shaky, old-man voice. “I’m not feeling well, 
Mom. I’m going to lie down for a while. I’ll come down later, okay?” 

I stared at the doorknob, listening to her breathing on the other side of the 
door. “Steve, I bought you those black-and-white cookies that you love. Your 
favorites. Do you want one? Maybe it’ll make you feel better.” 

My stomach growled. Those cookies are my favorites. Dripping with 
chocolate icing on one side and vanilla icing on the other. “Maybe later,” I 
moaned. 



“But I drove two miles out of my way to buy them for you,” Mom said. 

“Later. I’m really not feeling well.” I was telling the truth. My temples 
throbbed. My whole body ached. I felt so weak, I could barely stand up. 

“I’ll call you for dinner,” Mom said. I listened to her make her way back 
down the stairs. Then I hobbled over to the bed and slumped my old man’s body 
down onto the edge. 

“Now what?” I asked myself. I pressed my hands against my scabby 
cheeks. “How do I get out of this thing?” 

I shut my tired, burning eyes and tried to think. After a few minutes, Carly 
Beth’s face floated into my mind. 

“Yes!” I croaked. “Carly Beth is the one person in the world who can help 

me.” 

Carly Beth wore a mask from the same store last Halloween. Maybe the 
same thing happened to her. Maybe her mask stuck to her face and changed her. 

She got her mask off. She will know how I can get my mask off too. 

The phone stood across the room beside the computer on my desk. 
Normally, I’d be over there in three seconds. But it took me three minutes of 
gmnting and straining to get my old body to stand up. Then it took another five 
minutes to drag myself across the room. 

By the time I dropped into my desk chair, I was exhausted. It took all of my 
strength to raise my hand and punch in Carly Beth’s number on the phone. 

I can’t go on like this, I told myself. She’s got to help me. She’s got to know 
how to get this mask off. 

After the third ring, Carly Beth’s father answered. “Hello?” 

“Hi... uh... could I speak to Carly Beth?” I choked out. 

A silence. Then: “Who is this?” Mr. Caldwell sounded confused. 

“It’s me,” I answered. “Is Carly Beth there?” 

“Is this one of her teachers?” he demanded. 

“No. It’s Steve. I—” 

“I’m sorry, sir. I can’t hear you very well. Can you speak up? Why did you 
wish to speak to my daughter? Perhaps I can help you?” 

“No... I—” 

I heard Mr. Caldwell speak softly to someone else at his house. “It’s an old 
man, asking for Carly Beth. I can barely hear him. He won’t say who he is.” 

He came back on the phone. “Are you one of her teachers, sir? Where do 
you know my daughter from?” 



“She’s my friend,” I croaked. 

I heard him turn again to someone else in the room, probably Carly Beth’s 
mom. He muffled the phone with his hand, but I heard what he said: “I think it’s 
a nut. Some kind of crank call.” 

He returned to me. “Sorry, sir. My daughter can’t come to the phone.” He 
hung up. 

I sat there listening to the buzz in my spider-filled ear. 

Now what? I asked myself. 

Now what? 



18 


I must have fallen asleep in the desk chair. I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened by Dad pounding on my bedroom door. “Steve— 
dinnertime!” he called in. 

I sat up with a start. My back ached from sleeping sitting up. I rubbed my 
wrinkled neck, trying to rub away the stiffness. 

“Steve—are you coming down to dinner?” Dad asked. 

“I—I’m not very hungry,” I croaked. “I’m going to take a nap, Dad. I think 
I’m getting sick.” 

“Hey, don’t get sick the night before Halloween,” he replied. “You don’t 
want to miss out on trick-or-treating.” 

“I—I’ll be okay,” I stammered in my hoarse voice. “If I get a good night’s 
sleep, I’ll be fine.” 

Yeah. Right. 

I’ll be one hundred and fifty. But I’ll be fine. 

I let out an unhappy sigh. 

“We’ll bring you up some soup or something later,” Dad called in. Then he 
disappeared downstairs. 

I stared at the phone. Should I try Carly Beth again? 

No, I decided. She won’t believe it’s me. She’ll hang up the way her father 
did. 

I scratched my ears. I could feel the spiders crackling around in them. I 
touched the bare spot on top of my head where the skin was ripped apart. The 
skin was soft and wet. I could feel the patch of hard skull that showed through. 

“Ohhhh.” Another long sigh. 

I’ve got to think, I told myself. I’ve got to think of a way out of this. 

But I felt so weary, so sleepy. 

I pulled myself up and slumped to the bed. A few seconds later, I fell sound 
asleep. 

I awoke to bright sunlight streaming through my bedroom window. 

I blinked several times, startled by the bright morning light. Morning. 
Halloween morning. 



It should have been a happy day. An exciting day. But instead... 

I reached up with both hands and touched the sides of my face. 

Smooth! 

My cheeks felt smooth. Soft and smooth. 

I rubbed my ears. Small ears. My ears. No spiders! 

I raised both hands to my hair. And touched my hair. Not the stringy, old 
man’s hair. 

Hesitantly, carefully, I touched the torn spot on top of my head where the 
skull showed through. 

Not there! 

“I’m me again!” I cried out loud. I let out a long whoop of joy. 

No old man’s mask. No old man’s voice. No old man’s body. 

It had all been a dream. A horrible nightmare. 

Still blinking in the light, I gazed happily around my room. 

“I dreamed it all!” I cried. 

Going down to that dark store basement. Pawing through the carton of 
masks. The man in the cape. The mask of the old man. Sneaking it home and 
trying it on. 

The mask sticking to my skin. Refusing to come off. 

All a dream! 

All a horrifying nightmare that was over now. 

I was so happy! This had to be the happiest moment of my life. 

I started to jump out of bed. I wanted to leap around my room, to dance for 

joy- 

But then my eyes blinked open. And I woke up for real... 



19 


...I woke up for real. 

And knew that I had only dreamed that it was all a dream! 

I grabbed my face—and felt the craggy wrinkles, the heavy scabs. I rubbed 
my nose and brushed the green gobs stuck in my nostrils. 

I had dreamed that the mask didn’t exist. 

I had dreamed that I had my own face back. My own voice and body. 

All a dream. A wonderful dream. 

But now I was really awake—and really in trouble. 

I pulled myself up and brushed the stringy, yellow hair out of my eyes. “I 
have to tell Mom and Dad,” I decided. “I can’t spend another day like this.” 

I had slept in my clothes. I staggered to my feet and dragged my old body 
to the door. I tugged open the door—and saw a note taped on the other side. 

Dear Steve, 

Hope you’re feeling better. Mom and I had to go visit your Aunt Helen this 
morning. We left early to beat the traffic. We’ll be home in time to help you with 
your hobo costume. Love, Dad 

My hobo costume? 

Not this year. Besides, since I was now at least one hundred and fifty, I was 
a little old to go trick-or-treating! 

Crinkling the note in my hand, I made the long trip down to the kitchen, 
holding on to the banister, taking one step at a time. I had a sudden craving for a 
steaming bowl of oatmeal and a cup of hot milk. 

“Oh, no!” I croaked. I was starting to think like an old man! 

I made myself a breakfast of orange juice and corn flakes. I carried it to the 
table and sat down to eat. The juice glass felt strange against my fat, brown lips. 
And it was almost impossible to chew the cornflakes with just one long, crooked 
tooth. 

“What am I going to do?” I moaned out loud. 

Then, suddenly, I had an answer. 

I decided to go ahead with my plan to terrify the first graders. Why 



shouldn’t I pay back those bratty kids for all the trouble they gave me day after 
day on the soccer field? 

Yes! I decided. When Mom and Dad get home, I’ll greet them and show off 
my old-man costume. They won’t know it isn’t a costume. They’ll think it’s 
really cool. 

Then, later, I’ll go to the spooky old Carpenter mansion to meet the kids. 
And I’ll scare the first graders out of their masks! 

And then what? 

Then I’ll find Carly Beth. It won’t be hard to find her. She’s having a 
Halloween party at her house after trick-or-treating. 

I’ll find Carly Beth and get her to tell me the secret. I’ll get her to show me 
how to remove this horrible mask. 

Then I will be a very happy guy. 

Sitting there alone in the kitchen, struggling to choke down my cornflakes, 
it seemed like a really good plan. 

Too bad it didn’t work out the way I hoped. 



20 


When Mom and Dad returned home that evening, I hobbled downstairs to greet 
them. They both gasped when they saw my ugly, scabby face. 

Mom dropped the bag she was carrying. Her mouth fell open to her knees. 

Dad’s eyes bulged. He stared at me for a long time. Then he burst out 
laughing. “Steve—that is the best costume!” he exclaimed. “Where did you get 
that?” 

“It’s disgusting,” Mom said. “Ohh. I can’t stand that open patch on top of 
the head. And that horrible hole in your tooth.” 

Dad walked in a circle around me, admiring my new look. 

I had put on the patched, black suit that I wore as my hobo costume. And I 
had found one of my grandpa’s old canes in the closet, which I leaned on now. 

“It’s great!” Dad declared, squeezing my shoulder. 

“I bought the mask at a party store,” I croaked. It was almost the truth. 

Mom and Dad exchanged glances. “The old man’s voice is very good,” 
Mom said. “Have you been practicing?” 

“Yes. All day,” I replied. 

“Do you feel better?” Dad asked. “We didn’t want to disturb you this 
morning since you weren’t feeling good. Your mom and I had to leave so 
early...” 

“I’m feeling much better,” I lied. Actually, my legs were trembling and my 
whole body was drenched in a cold sweat. 

Feeling weak, I leaned harder on the cane. 

“Yuck! What’s that in your hair?” Mom cried. 

“Spiders,” I told her. I shuddered. I could feel them crawling over my head 
and in my ears. 

“They’re so real-looking,” Mom declared, raising a hand to her cheek. She 
shook her head. “Are you sure you don’t want to be a hobo? That mask must be 
so hot and uncomfortable.” 

If she only knew how uncomfortable it was! 

“Leave him be,” Dad scolded her. “He looks great. He’s going to terrify 
everyone on the street tonight.” 

I hope so, I thought. I glanced at my watch. Time to get going. 



“Well, he’s terrifying me!” Mom exclaimed. She shut her eyes. “I can’t 
stand to look at you, Steve. Why did you buy something so... so ugly?” 

“I think it’s funny,” Dad told her. He poked a finger at my long tooth. 
“Great mask. Is it rubber?” 

“Yeah. I guess,” I muttered in my quivering, old voice. 

Mom made a disgusted face. “Are you trick-or-treating with Chuck?” 

I yawned. I suddenly felt sleepy. “I promised my soccer players I’d meet 
them,” I croaked. “Then I’m going over to Carly Beth’s house.” 

“Well, don’t stay out too late,” Mom said. “And if that heavy mask gets too 
hot, take it off for a while—okay?” 

I wish! I thought bitterly. 

“See you later,” I said. Leaning on the cane, I began dragging myself to the 
front door. 

Mom and Dad laughed at my funny walk. 

I wasn’t laughing. I wanted to cry. 

Only one thing kept me from breaking down and telling them the truth. 
Only one thing kept me from telling Mom and Dad that I was trapped inside this 
horrible mask, that it had turned me into a weak, ancient creature. 

Revenge. 

I could see the terrified expressions on the faces of my soccer team. And I 
could hear their howls of horror as they went running for their lives. 

That cheered me up and kept me going. 

I grabbed the doorknob and struggled to pull open the front door. 

“Steve—wait!” Dad cried. “My camera. Wait. I want to take a picture.” He 
disappeared in search of the camera. 

“Your trick-or-treat bag!” Mom cried. “You forgot your trick-or-treat bag.” 
She rummaged around in the front closet until she found the shopping bag with 
little pumpkins all over both sides. 

I knew I couldn’t manage the cane and the shopping bag. But I took it from 
her anyway. I’ll throw the bag away when I get outside, I decided. I didn’t plan 
to trick-or-treat. I knew it would take me half an hour just to walk up someone’s 
driveway! 

Dad burst back into the living room. “Say cheese!” he cried, raising his 
little camera. 

I tried to twist my wormy lips into a smile. 

Dad flashed the camera once. Then three more times. 



Blinded by flashbulb lights, I said good-bye and made my way out the door. 
The white circles followed me into the night. I nearly fell off the front stoop. 

I grabbed the railing and waited for my heart to stop pounding. Slowly the 
flashes of light faded from my eyes, and I began to pull myself down the 
driveway. 

It was a clear, cold night. No wind at all. The nearly bare trees stood as still 
as statues. 

I limped onto the sidewalk and started in the direction of the Carpenter 
mansion. There was no moon. But the street appeared brighter than usual. Most 
houses had all of their front lights on to welcome trick-or-treaters. 

I stuffed the shopping bag into a trash can at the foot of our neighbors’ 
driveway. Then I continued down the block, my cane tap-tapping on the 
sidewalk. 

My back began to ache. My old legs trembled. I leaned over the cane, 
breathing hard. 

After half a block, I had to take a rest against a lamppost. Luckily, the 
Carpenter mansion was on the next block. 

As I started on my way, two little girls came hurrying down the sidewalk, 
followed by their father. One girl wore colorful butterfly wings. The other wore 
lots of makeup, a gold crown, and a long fancy dress. 

“Ooh, he’s ugly,” the butterfly whispered to her friend as they came near. 

“Yuck!” I heard the princess reply. “Look at the green stuff in his nose.” 

I leaned close to them, opened my lips in a snarl, and rasped, “Get out of 
my way! ” 

The little girls both let out frightened squeals and took off down the 
sidewalk. Their father flashed me an angry stare and hurried after them. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” An evil cackle escaped my lips. 

Seeing their frightened faces gave me new energy. Leaning on my cane, I 
tap-tapped my way across the street. 

A few minutes later, the Carpenter mansion came into view. The huge old 
house stood dark and empty. Its stone turrets rose up to the purple night sky like 
castle towers. 

Huddled under a streetlamp at the bottom of the weed-choked front yard 
stood my soccer team. My Hogs. My first graders. 

My victims. 

They were all in costumes. I saw Power Rangers and Ninja Turtles. 



Mummies and monsters. Two ghosts, a Beauty, and a Beast. 

But I recognized them anyway. I recognized them because they were 
shoving each other, grabbing at trick-or-treat bags, shouting and fighting. 

I leaned against my cane, watching them from halfway down the block. My 
heart started to pound. My whole body trembled. 

This was it. My big moment. 

“Okay, guys,” I murmured softly to myself. “It’s show time! ” 



21 


I was trembling with excitement as I dragged myself up to them. I stepped into 
the light, my wormy lips twisted in a frightening sneer. 

I stared from one to another, giving them a chance to see my terrifying face. 
Giving them a chance to see the spiders crawling through my hair. The 
wormhole in my tooth. The patch of skull poking up through my rutted scalp. 
They grew quiet. I could feel their eyes on me. I could sense their instant 

fear. 

I opened my mouth to let out a frightening growl that would send them 
running for their mommies. 

But Marnie Rosen, wearing a white bride’s dress and veil, stepped up to me 
before I could get it out. “Can we help you, sir?” she asked. 

“Are you lost?” one of the Power Rangers asked. 

“Do you need directions?” 

“Can we help you get somewhere?” 

No. No! 

This wasn’t going right. This wasn’t going the way I’d planned—the way 
I’d dreamed! 

Marnie took my arm. “Which way were you headed, sir? We’ll walk with 
you. It’s kind of a scary night to be walking around a strange neighborhood.” 

The others pushed in closer, trying to be helpful. 

Trying to be helpful to an old man. An old man they weren’t the least bit 
scared of. 

“Nooooo!” I howled in protest. “I’m the ghost of the Carpenter mansion! 
I’ve come to pay you back for trespassing on my front yard!” 

I tried to shriek—but my voice came out in a weak whisper. I don’t think 
they heard a word I uttered. 

I’ve got to scare them, I told myself. I’ve got to! 

I raised both hands together in the air as if I planned to strangle them all. 

My cane flew out of my grasp. I lost my balance and tottered over 
backward. 

“Ohhhh!” I let out a groan as I hit the sidewalk sitting up. 

They all cried out. But not in fear. They cried out because they were 



worried about me. 

Helping hands reached down to pull me to my feet. 

“Are you okay? Here’s your cane.” I recognized Duck Benton’s scratchy 
voice. 

I heard murmurs of sympathy. “Poor old guy,” someone whispered. 

“Are you hurt?” 

“Can we get you some help?” 

No. No. No. No. No. 

They weren’t terrified. The weren’t the tiniest bit afraid. 

I sank onto the cane. I suddenly felt so weary. So totally exhausted I could 
barely keep my head up. 

Forget about scaring them, Steve, I told myself. You’ve got to get to Carly 
Beth’s house before you collapse. You’ve got to find out from Carly Beth how to 
get the mask off. How to get your old face—and strength—back. 

Marnie was still holding on to my trembling arm. “Where are you trying to 
go?” she asked, her freckled face filled with concern. 

“Uh... do you know where Carly Beth Caldwell’s house is?” I asked in a 
weak croak. 

“It’s on the next block. Across the street. I know her brother,” I heard 
Andrew Foster say. 

“We’ll take you there,” Marnie offered. 

She gripped my arm tighter. A mummy stepped up and took my other arm. 
They began to walk me slowly, gently down the sidewalk. 

I don’t believe this! I thought bitterly. They’re supposed to be scared out of 
their costumes! They should be shrieking and crying by now. 

But instead, they’re helping me walk. 

I sighed. The sad thing was, I felt so tired and weak, I couldn’t have made it 
to Carly Beth’s without their help. 

They led me halfway up her driveway. Then I thanked them and told them I 
could make it the rest of the way. 

I watched them scurry away to go trick-or-treating. “I guess Steve isn’t 
going to show up,” Duck said. 

“He was probably too big a wimp to go out on Halloween night!” Marnie 
joked. 

They all laughed. 

Leaning heavily on the cane, I turned toward Carly Beth’s house. The lights 



were all on. But I couldn’t see anyone in the windows. 

She probably isn’t back from trick-or-treating yet, I decided. 

I heard chattering voices. Footsteps on the gravel drive. 

I wheeled around to see Carly Beth and her friend Sabrina Mason hurrying 
across the lawn, heading toward the house. 

I recognized Carly Beth’s duck costume. She wore it every year. Except for 
last Halloween, when she wore that terrifying mask. 

Sabrina was some kind of superhero. She wore silvery tights and a long 
silvery cape. She had a silvery mask pulled over her face, but I recognized her 
long, black hair. 

“Carly Beth—!” I tried to shout. But her name came out in a choked 
whisper. 

She and Sabrina kept chattering excitedly as they hurried across the lawn. 

“Carly Beth—! Please!” I cried. 

Halfway to the house, they both turned. They saw me. 

Yes! 

“Carly Beth—” I cried. 

She pulled off her duck mask and took a few steps toward the driveway. 
She squinted hard at me. “Who are you?” 

“It’s me!” I cried weakly. “I—” 

“Are you the man who tried to call me earlier?” she demanded coldly. 

“Well... yes,” I croaked. “You see, I need—” 

“Well, leave me alone!” Carly Beth screamed. “Why are you following me? 
Leave me alone, or I’ll get my father!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered helplessly. 

The two girls spun away and began jogging to the house. 

Leaving me standing there in the driveway. 

Leaving me all alone. 

Leaving me doomed. 



22 


I let out a bitter wail. “Carly Beth—it’s me! It’s me! Steve!” I cried. “Steve 
Boswell!” 

Did she hear me? 

Yes. 

She and Sabrina had stepped onto the stone walk that led to the front porch. 
In the square of yellow light from the porch, I saw them both turn around. 

“It’s Steve! It’s Steve!” I repeated, my throat aching from my desperate 
cries. 

Slowly, cautiously, both girls made their way back to me. 

“Steve?” Carly Beth stared hard at me, her mouth falling open. 

“Is that a mask?” Sabrina demanded, keeping close to Carly Beth. 

“Yes, it’s a mask,” I croaked. 

“Yuck. It’s disgusting!” Sabrina declared. She pulled off her silver mask to 
see better. “Are those spiders? Yuck!” 

“I need help,” I confessed. “This mask—” 

“You went to the party store!” Carly Beth cried. The duck mask fell to the 
ground. She raised both hands to the sides of her face. “Oh, no! No! Steve, I 
warned you!” 

“Yes. That’s where I got it,” I said, pointing to my hideous face. “I didn’t 
listen to you. I didn’t know.” 

“Steve, I told you not to go there,” Carly Beth said, her expression still tight 
with horror. Hands still pressed against her cheeks. 

“Now the mask won’t come off,” I wailed. “It’s stuck to me. It’s part of me. 
And it’s—it’s turning me into an old, old man. A feeble old man.” 

Carly Beth shook her head sadly. She stared at my ugly face, but didn’t say 
a word. 

“You’ve got to help me,” I pleaded. “You’ve got to help me get this mask 

off.” 

Carly Beth let out a frightened sigh. “Steve—I don’t think I can.” 



23 


I grabbed her duck feathers and held on. “You’ve got to help me, Carly Beth,” I 
begged. “Why won’t you help me?” 

“I want to help you,” she explained. “But I’m not sure I can.” 

“But you had a mask from the same store last Halloween,” I protested. 
“You pulled the mask off. You escaped from it—right?” 

“It can’t be pulled off,” Carly Beth said. “There’s no way to pull it off.” 

Over her shoulder, I saw three kids in costumes at the next house. A woman 
appeared in the doorway. I saw her dropping candy bars into the three trick-or- 
treat bags. 

Some kids are having fun tonight, I thought bitterly. 

I am not having fun tonight. 

I may never have fun again. 

“Come into the house,” Carly Beth suggested. “It’s cold out here. I’ll try to 
explain.” 

I tried to follow them up the driveway. But my legs wobbled like rubber. 
Carly Beth and Sabrina practically had to carry me into her house. They dropped 
me down on the green leather couch in the living room. 

On a table across the room, a carved jack-o’-lantern grinned at me. The 
pumpkin had more teeth than I did! 

Carly Beth dropped down on the couch arm. Sabrina sat on the edge of the 
armchair beside it. She leaned over and sifted through her trick-or-treat bag. 
How could she think of candy at a time like this? 

I turned to Carly Beth. “How do I get the mask off?” I croaked. 

Carly Beth chewed her bottom lip. She raised her eyes to me, her 
expression grim. “It isn’t a mask,” she said softly. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“It isn’t a mask,” she explained. “It’s a real face. A living face. Did you 
meet the man in the black cape?” 

I nodded. 

“He’s some kind of weird scientist, I think. He made the faces. In his lab.” 

“He—he made them?” I stammered. 

Carly Beth nodded solemnly. “They are real, living faces. The man in the 



cape tried to make them good-looking. But something went wrong. They all 
came out ugly. As ugly as the one you’re wearing.” 

“But, Carly Beth—” I started. 

She raised a hand to hush me. “The caped man calls the faces The Unloved. 
No one wants them because they turned out so ugly. They are The Unloved. 
They’re alive. And they attach themselves to anyone who comes near enough.” 

“But how do I get it off?” I cried impatiently. I raised my hands and tugged 
at my rutted, scabby cheeks. “I can’t spend the rest of my life like this. What can 
I do?” 

Carly Beth jumped up and began pacing back and forth in front of Sabrina 
and me. Sabrina unwrapped a Milky Way bar and began chewing it, watching 
Carly Beth pace. 

“The same thing happened to me last Halloween,” Carly Beth said. “I had 
chosen a really ugly mask. It was so scary. It attached itself to my head. And 
then it turned me evil.” 

“And what did you do?” I cried, leaning forward on my cane. 

“I went back to the party store. I found the man in the cape. He told me 
there was only one way to get rid of the mask. It could only be done with a 
symbol of love.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her. I didn’t understand. 

“I had to find a symbol of love,” Carly Beth continued. “At first, I didn’t 
know what the man meant. I didn’t know what to do. But then I remembered 
something my mom had made for me.” 

“What?” I demanded eagerly. “What was it?” 

“It was that head,” Sabrina chimed in, her mouth bulging with chocolate. 

“My mom had sculpted a head of me,” Carly Beth said. “It looked just like 
me. You’ve seen it. Mom sculpted it because she loves me. It was a symbol of 
love.” 

Carly Beth dropped back down beside me. “I placed Mom’s sculpted head 
over The Unloved face. And The Unloved disappeared. The ugly face slipped 
right off.” 

“Great!” I cried happily. “Go get it. Hurry!” 

“Huh?” Carly Beth stared at me, confused. 

“Go get the sculpted head,” I begged. “I’ve got to get this thing off me!” 

Carly Beth shook her head. “You don’t get it, Steve. You can’t use my 
symbol of love. It will only work for me. You have to find your own symbol of 



love.” 

“But maybe it won’t work for Steve’s mask,” Sabrina interrupted. “Maybe 
each mask is different.” 

“Give me a break, Sabrina,” I muttered angrily. “It’s got to work! Don’t you 
understand? It’s got to!” 

“You have to find your own symbol of love,” Carly Beth repeated. “Can 
you think of one, Steve?” 

I stared back at her, thinking hard. I thought. And thought. Symbol of 
love... symbol of love... No. I couldn’t think of anything. Not a single thing. 
And then an idea popped into my mind. 



24 


I leaned on the cane and tried to pull myself up from the couch. But my feeble 
arms gave way, and I fell back into the cushion. 

“You’ve got to help me get home,” I told Carly Beth. “I thought of a 
symbol of love. It’s at my house.” 

“Okay. Let’s go!” she replied. 

“But what about the kids coming over here?” Sabrina asked, swallowing a 
chunk of Milky Way. “What about the party?” 

“You stay here and greet them,” Carly Beth told her. “If Steve really can 
find a symbol of love at his house—and if it works—we’ll be right back.” 

“It’ll work,” I said. “I know it will.” 

But I had my fingers crossed. Which made it even harder to climb up from 
the couch. 

Carly Beth saw me struggling. She took both my hands and pulled me to 
my feet. “Yuck! What are those things moving around in your ears?” she cried, 
making a disgusted face. 

“Spiders,” I said quietly. 

She swallowed hard. “I sure hope you find something that works.” 

“Me too,” I murmured as she guided me to the door. 

Carly Beth turned back into the living room. “Don’t eat all the chocolate 
while we’re gone,” she called to Sabrina. 

“It’s only my second piece!” Sabrina protested with her mouth full. 

We stepped into the darkness. Some kids in costumes were coming up the 
driveway, all carrying bulging trick-or-treat bags. “Hey, Carly Beth—where are 
you going?” a girl called. 

“I’m doing a good deed!” Carly Beth replied. “See you guys later!” She 
turned back to me. “I can’t believe you didn’t listen to me, Steve. You really 
look disgusting.” 

“I can’t even wipe the green gobs out of my nose!” I wailed. 

Holding me by the shoulder, she guided me toward my house. We crossed 
the street onto my block. I heard kids laughing and loud music inside the house 
on the corner. A Halloween party. 

As we passed the house, I stumbled over a moving shadow. Carly Beth 



caught me before I fell. “What was that?” I cried. 

Then I saw it scamper silently across the street. A black cat. 

I laughed. What else could I do? I had to laugh. 

Go ahead, cat, I thought bitterly. Go ahead and cross my path. I couldn’t 
have any worse luck—could I? 

My house came into view past a row of tall evergreen shrubs. Through the 
shrubs, I could see that nearly all the downstairs lights were on. 

“Are your parents home?” Carly Beth asked, helping me across the grass. 

I nodded. “Yeah. They’re home.” 

“Do they know about the... uh...” 

“No,” I replied. “They think it’s a costume.” 

As we stepped onto the front stoop, I could hear Sparky start to bark inside 
the house. I pushed open the door, and the little dog let out an excited yip and 
leaped up at me. 

His paws landed on my waist and pushed me back hard. I toppled against 
the wall. 

“Down, Sparky! Please! Get down!” I pleaded in my old man’s croak. 

I knew Sparky was glad to see me. But I was too feeble for his usual 
greeting. 

“Down, boy! Please!” 

Carly Beth finally managed to pull the dog off me so that I could stand up. 
Then she held onto Sparky until I regained my balance. 

“Steve—is that you?” I heard Mom call from the den. “You’re back so 
early!” 

Mom stepped into the living room. She had changed into the gray flannel 
housedress she usually relaxes in at night, and she had her blond hair in curlers. 

“Oh, hi, Carly Beth!” she cried in surprise. “I wasn’t expecting visitors. I 

“That’s okay, Mom,” I croaked. “We’re only staying a minute. We came 
back to get something.” 

“Don’t you love Steve’s costume?” Mom asked Carly Beth. “Isn’t that the 
most horrible mask you ever saw?” 

“You mean he’s wearing a mask?” Carly Beth joked. She and Mom enjoyed 
a good laugh. 

Sparky sniffed my shoes. 

“What did you come back here for?” Mom asked me. 



“Those black-and-white cookies,” I replied eagerly. “You know. The ones 
you bought me yesterday.” 

Those cookies were a symbol of love. 

Mom had told me how she drove two miles out of her way to buy them for 
me. She knew they were my favorite cookies in the whole world. And she drove 
out of her way to buy them because she loves me. 

So the cookies were the perfect symbol of love. 

I couldn’t wait to bite into one. One bite, I knew—and I’d be able to pull 
off this horrible mask. 

Mom’s face twisted in surprise. She narrowed her eyes, studying me. “You 
came back here for those cookies? Why? What about all your trick-or-treat 
candy?” 

“Uh... well...” I stammered. My brain stalled. I couldn’t think of a good 
reason. 

“He had a strong craving,” Carly Beth chimed in. “He told me he’s been 
thinking about those cookies all night.” 

“That’s right. I had a craving,” I repeated. “Candy bars can’t compare, 
Mom. Those cookies are the best.” 

“I love them, too,” Carly Beth added. “So I came back with Steve. We want 
to bring them to my Halloween party.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. “What a shame,” she said. 

“Huh?” I cried, feeling my heart skip a beat. “What do you mean? What’s 
wrong?” 

Mom shook her head. “The cookies are gone,” she replied softly. “The dog 
found the box this morning and broke into it. I’m sorry, guys. But Sparky ate 
them all.” 



25 


Mom’s words sent a cold shiver down my back. I let out a weak moan. And 
stared down at Sparky. 

The dog gazed up at me and began wagging his stubby tail. As if he were 
pleased with himself! 

“You’ve ruined my life, Sparky!” That’s what I felt like screaming. “You 
greedy pig! Couldn’t you save me just one cookie? Now I’m doomed. Doomed 
to live with this gross, frightening face forever.” 

And all because Sparky loved black-and-white cookies as much as I did. 

Still wagging his tail, Sparky ran over to me and brushed his furry, black 
body against my leg. He wanted to be petted. 

Forget it, I thought. No way I’m petting you—you traitor. 

I heard Dad calling Mom from the den. “Have fun, guys,” Mom said. She 
waved to Carly Beth and me and hurried off to see what Dad wanted. 

Have fun, guys? 

I’m never going to have fun again, I realized. 

Feeling weak and defeated, I turned to Carly Beth. “Now what do we do?” I 
whispered. 

“Quick—pick up Sparky,” she whispered back, motioning to the dog with 
both hands. 

“Huh? Do what? I’m never touching this dog again!” I croaked miserably. 

Panting hard, his tongue hanging to the floor, Sparky brushed my ankle 
again. 

“Pick him up!” Carly Beth insisted. 

“Why?” 

“Sparky is your symbol of love!” Carly Beth declared. “Look at him, Steve. 
Look how much that dog loves you.” 

“He loves me so much, he ate all my cookies!” I wailed. 

Carly Beth frowned at me. “Forget about the cookies. Pick up the dog. 
Sparky is your symbol of love. Pick him up and hold him against you. And I’ll 
bet the mask will come right off.” 

“I guess it’s worth a try,” I said softly. I started to pick up the little black 
terrier. My back creaked as I bent down. My aching knees cracked. 



Please work! I pleaded silently. Please let this work! 

I reached for Sparky—and he darted through my hands and ran across the 
carpet toward the den. 

“Sparky—come back! Sparky!” I cried, still bent over, still reaching out 
both hands. 

The dog stopped halfway across the living room and turned back. 

“Come back, Sparky!” I called in my old man’s quivering voice. “Come 
back, boy! Come back to Steve!” 

His stubby tail started wagging again. He stared at me, head tilted, and 
didn’t move. 

“He’s playing games with me,” I told Carly Beth. “He wants me to chase 
him.” 

I got down on my knees and motioned to Sparky with both hands. “Come, 
boy! Come! I’m too old to chase you! Come, Sparky!” 

To my surprise, the dog let out a yip, ran back across the room, and jumped 
into my arms. 

“Hug him tight, Steve,” Carly Beth urged. “Hug him tight. It’s going to 
work. I know it will!” 

The little dog felt so heavy in my weak, aching arms. But I held him against 
my chest. Held him tight. 

Held him as tight as I could. 

Held him for a long, long time. 

And nothing happened. 



26 


After about a minute, the dog got tired of being squeezed. He jumped out of my 
arms, bounced over the carpet, and disappeared into the den. 

I tugged at the mask with both hands. 

But I knew I was wasting my strength. It didn’t feel any different. Nothing 
had changed. The hideous face was still tightly attached to my head. 

Carly Beth put a hand gently on my shoulder. “Sorry,” she murmured. “I 
guess each mask is different.” 

“You mean I need something else to get it off,” I said, shaking my old, 
spider-infested head sadly. 

Carly Beth nodded. “Yes. Something else. But we don’t know what it is.” 

I uttered a helpless cry. “I’m doomed!” I wailed. “I can’t even climb up off 
my knees!” 

Carly Beth slid both of her hands under my shoulders and lifted me to my 
feet. I steadied myself, leaning on the cane. 

And then I had an idea. 

“The man in the cape,” I croaked. “He’ll know what I can do.” 

“You’re right!” Carly Beth’s face brightened. “Yes, you’re right, Steve. He 
helped me last Halloween. If we go back to the party store, I know he’ll help 
you!” 

She started to pull me to the front door. But I held back. “There’s just one 
little problem,” I told her. 

She turned back to me. “Problem?” 

“Yeah,” I replied. “I forgot to tell you. The party store is closed. It went out 
of business.” 

We walked there anyway. Well, I didn’t exactly walk. I limped and hobbled, 
feeling weaker and more feeble every second. Carly Beth practically had to carry 
me. 

The streets stood empty, glimmering dimly under the rows of streetlamps. 
Lights were going out in all the houses. It was pretty late. All of the trick-or- 
treaters had gone home. 

Two dogs followed us down the street. Big German shepherds. Maybe they 



thought we’d share our Halloween candy with them. Of course, I didn’t have any 
Halloween candy. 

“Go away,” I snarled at them. “I don’t like dogs anymore. Dogs are 
useless!” 

To my surprise, they seemed to understand. They turned and went loping 
across a dark front lawn, disappearing around the side of the house. 

A few minutes later, we passed the row of small shops and stepped up in 
front of the party store. Dark. Empty. 

“Out of business,” I murmured. 

Carly Beth pounded on the front door. I peered into the blue shadows 
beyond the dusty front window. Nothing moved. No one in there. 

“Open up! We need help!” Carly Beth shouted. She banged on the wooden 
door with both fists. 

Silence inside. No one stirred. 

A cold wind swept down the street. I shivered. I tried to bury my ugly head 
in my shoulders. “Let’s go,” I mumbled. Defeated. 

Doomed. 

Carly Beth refused to give up. She pounded the door with both fists. 

I turned away from the window—and gazed at the alley beside the store. 
“Whoa. Wait,” I called to her. “Come over here.” 

I dragged myself to the alley. Carly Beth followed. She rubbed her 
knuckles. I guess they were sore from pounding so hard on the door. 

I could see from the sidewalk that the trapdoor was shut. But I led Carly 
Beth into the alley. We stopped beside the trapdoor. 

“It leads into the basement of the party store,” I explained. “All the masks 
and other stuff are down there.” 

“If we can get down there,” Carly Beth whispered, “maybe we can find a 
way to help you.” 

“Maybe,” I whispered back. 

Carly Beth bent down and grabbed the wire handle to the trapdoor. She 
tugged it up hard. 

The door didn’t budge. 

“I think it’s locked,” she groaned. 

“Try again,” I urged. “It sticks. It’s very hard to open.” 

She bent down, grasped the handle in both hands, and pulled again. 

This time the door swung up, revealing the concrete stairs that led down to 



the basement. 

“Come on. Hurry, Steve.” Carly Beth tugged my arm. 
My last chance, I thought. My last chance. 

Trembling, I followed her down into the heavy darkness. 



27 


We huddled close together as we made our way across the basement floor. Pale 
light from a streetlamp floated in through the open trapdoor. 

Across the room, I heard the steady drip drip drip I’d heard before. The 
large cartons stood just where Chuck and I had left them. Three or four of them 
were still open. 

“Well. Here we are,” Carly Beth murmured. Her words sounded hollow, 
echoing softly against the stone basement walls. Her eyes darted around the 
room, then stopped on me. “Now what?” 

I shrugged. “Search through the cartons, maybe?” 

I stepped over to the nearest one and peered inside. “This one has all the 
masks,” I told her. I picked up a monster mask covered in bristly fur. 

“Yuck,” Carly Beth groaned. “Put it down. We don’t need another mask.” 

I dropped the mask back into the carton. It made a soft plop as it landed on 
the other masks. 

“I don’t know what we need,” I said. “But maybe we can find 
something...” 

“Look at these!” Carly Beth cried. She had pulled open another carton. She 
held up some kind of jumpsuit. It had a long, pointy tail on the back. 

“What’s that?” I demanded, stepping around two cartons to get to her. 

“A costume,” she replied. She leaned into the carton and pulled out another 
one. A pair of furry tights covered with leopard spots. “The box is filled with 
costumes.” 

“Big deal,” I grumbled. “That’s not going to help me.” 

I sighed. “Nothing is going to help me.” 

Carly Beth didn’t seem to hear me. She leaned over the edge of the box and 
pulled out another costume. She held it up in front of her. A shiny black suit. 
Very fancy. Like a tuxedo. 

As I stared at it, my face began to tingle. 

“Put it down,” I said glumly. “We need to find—” 

“Oh, yuck!” Carly Beth cried. “This suit—it’s crawling with spiders!” 

“Huh?” I gasped. My face tingled harder. I heard a loud buzzing in my ears. 
The tingle became an itch. 



“Hey, I’ll bet this is the costume that goes with your mask!” Carly Beth 
declared. She carried it over to me. “See? Spiders and more spiders!” 

I scratched my itching cheeks. The itch was quickly becoming painful. I 
scratched harder. 

“Get it away from me! It’s making me itch!” I cried. 

Carly Beth ignored my plea. She held the shiny black suit up in front of me, 
beneath my itching, burning face. 

“See? You have the head—and this is the body that goes with it,” she said, 
holding it against me. Admiring it. 

“Put it away!” I shrieked. “My face—it’s burning! Ow!” 

I slapped frantically at my cheeks. My forehead. My chin. 

“Owwwwww!” I howled. “I feel so weird! What is happening to me?” 



28 


“It’s burning hot!” I shrieked. “Owwwwww/ What is happening ?” 

I grabbed the sides of my face, trying to soothe away the burning pain. 

As I gripped my cheeks, the face began to slide under my hands. 

I felt it begin to rise. Up, up. 

I pulled my hands away—as the old man’s head slid over my head. Lifted 
off. Floated up. 

Cool air greeted my cheeks. I took a deep breath of the cold, fresh air. 

The craggy old head hovered above me for a moment. Then it floated 
toward the shiny black suit in Carly Beth’s hand. 

The head floated down onto the collar of the suit. 

Carly Beth let out a startled cry as the suit’s arms thrashed out. The trouser 
legs kicked. The suit twitched and squirmed as if trying to break free. 

Carly Beth let go of it and jumped back. 

A smile spread over the ugly old face. The suit legs lowered themselves to 
the floor. The old man performed a little dance, arms flapping, trouser legs 
hopping. 

And then he turned away from us. The head attached to the suit. The trouser 
legs bent at the knees, he shuffled toward the steps. 

Carly Beth and I both cried out in shock as the old man climbed up the 
steps and disappeared out the trapdoor. 

We stood there, eyes bulging, mouths wide-open. We stared at the opening 
at the top of the stairs. Stared in silence. Stared in amazement. 

And then we both began to laugh. 

We fell on each other, laughing, laughing till tears rolled down our cheeks. 

I laughed louder and harder than I had ever laughed. Because I was 
laughing in my voice. Laughing with my face. My real face. 

The old-man face found its body—and escaped. 

And now I was me again! 

This had to be the best Halloween ever! I had never been so happy in all my 
life just to have things normal. 

Carly Beth and I danced down the street as we made our way home. We 



sang at the top of our lungs. Sang and twirled each other around. 

And danced and strutted down the middle of the street. 

We were both so happy! 

We were half a block from my house—when the creature leaped out from 
behind a hedge. 

It opened its jaws in a broken-toothed roar. 

Carly Beth and I grabbed each other and uttered shrill cries of terror. 

The creature had bright purple skin that glowed in the light from the 
streetlamp. Fiery red eyes. A mouth full of broken, rotting teeth. And a fat, 
brown worm poking out from the middle of its cheek. 

“Huh?” I stared at the worm as it bobbed from the creature’s skin. Stared at 
the frightening purple face. 

And recognized it. 

“Chuck!” I cried. 

He let out a hoarse laugh from behind the mask. “I gotcha!” he bellowed. “I 
got both of you! You should have seen the looks on your faces!” 

“Chuck—” 

“I’ve been waiting here. Waiting to surprise you,” he rasped. The disgusting 
worm bobbed up and down in his cheek as he talked. 

“You didn’t see me grab this mask when I ran out of that store basement,” 
he growled. “I kept it a secret. I wanted to give you a good scare.” 

“You scared me to death!” Carly Beth admitted, giving him a playful shove. 
“Now take off the mask and let’s go to my house.” 

“Uh... I have a problem,” Chuck replied, lowering his voice. 

“Problem?” 

Chuck nodded. “I’m having a little trouble getting this mask off. Think you 
guys could help me?” 



THE HEADLESS GHOST 

Goosebumps - 37 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Stephanie Alpert and I haunt our neighborhood. 

We got the idea last Halloween. 

There are a lot of kids in our neighborhood, and we like to haunt them and 
give them a little scare. 

Sometimes we sneak out late at night in masks and stare into kids’ 
windows. Sometimes we leave rubber hands and rubber fingers on windowsills. 
Sometimes we hide disgusting things in mailboxes. 

Sometimes Stephanie and I duck down behind bushes or trees and make the 
most frightening sounds—animal howls and ghostly moans. Stephanie can do a 
terrifying werewolf howl. And I can toss back my head and shriek loud enough 
to shake the leaves on the trees. 

We keep almost all the kids on our block pretty frightened. 

In the mornings, we catch them peeking out their doors, seeing if it’s safe to 
come out. And at night, most of them are afraid to leave their houses alone. 

Stephanie and I are really proud of that. 

During the day we are just Stephanie Alpert and Duane Comack, two 
normal twelve-year-olds. But at night, we become the Twin Terrors of Wheeler 
Falls. 

No one knows. No one. 

Look at us, and you see two sixth graders at Wheeler Middle School. Both 
of us have brown eyes and brown hair. Both of us are tall and thin. Stephanie is a 
few inches taller because she has higher hair. 

Some people see us hanging out together and think we’re brother and sister. 
But we’re not. We don’t have any brothers and sisters, and we don’t mind one 
bit. 

We live across the street from one another. We walk to school together in 
the morning. We usually trade lunches, even though our parents both pack us 
peanut-butter-and-jelly sandwiches. 

We’re normal. Totally normal. 

Except for our secret late-night hobby. 

How did we become the Twin Terrors? Well, it’s sort of a long story.... 



Last Halloween was a cool, clear night. A full moon floated over the bare trees. 

I was standing outside Stephanie’s front window in my scary Grim Reaper 
costume. I stood up on tiptoes, trying to peek inside to check out her costume. 

“Hey—beat it, Duane! No looking!” she shouted through the closed 
window. Then she pulled down the shade. 

“I wasn’t looking. I was just stretching!” I shouted back. 

I was eager to see what Stephanie was going to be. Every Halloween, she 
comes up with something awesome. The year before, she came waddling out 
inside a huge ball of green toilet paper. You guessed it. She was an iceberg 
lettuce. 

But this year I thought maybe I had her beat. 

I’d worked really hard on my Grim Reaper costume. I wore high platform 
shoes—so high that I’d tower over Stephanie. My black, hooded cape swung 
along the ground. I hid my curly brown hair under a tight rubber skullcap. And I 
smeared my face with sick-looking makeup, the color you see on moldy bread. 

My dad didn’t want to look at me. He said I turned his stomach. 

A success! 

I couldn’t wait to make Stephanie sick! I banged my Grim Reaper sickle on 
Stephanie’s window. “Hey, Steph—hurry up!” I called. “I’m getting hungry. I 
want candy!” 

I waited and waited. I started pacing back and forth across her front lawn, 
my long cape sweeping over the grass and dead leaves. 

“Hey! Where are you?” I called again. 

No Stephanie. 

With an impatient groan, I turned back to the house. 

And a huge, hairy animal jumped me from behind and chewed off my head. 



2 


Well, it didn’t really chew off my head. 

But it tried to. 

It growled and tried to sink its gleaming fangs into my throat. 

I staggered back. The creature looked like an enormous black cat, covered 
in thick, black bristles. Gobs of yellow goo poured from its hairy ears and black 
nose. Its long, pointed fangs glowed in the dark. 

The creature snarled again and shot out a hairy paw. “Candy... give me all 
your candy!” 

“Stephanie—?” I choked out. It was Stephanie. Wasn’t it? 

The creature jabbed its claws into my stomach in reply. That’s when I 
recognized Stephanie’s Mickey Mouse watch on its hairy wrist. 

“Wow. Stephanie, you look awesome! You really—” I didn’t finish. 
Stephanie ducked behind the hedge and yanked me down beside her. 

My knees hit the sidewalk hard. “Ow! Are you crazy?” I shrieked. “What’s 
the big idea?” 

A group of little kids in costumes paraded by. Stephanie leapt out of the 
hedge. “Arrrggghhh!” she growled. 

The little kids totally freaked. They turned and started to run. Three of them 
dropped their trick-or-treat bags. Stephanie scooped up the bags. “Yummmm!” 

“Whoa! You really scared them,” I said, watching the little kids run up the 
street. “That was cool.” 

Stephanie started to laugh. She has a high, silly laugh that always starts me 
laughing, too. It sounds like a chicken being tickled. “That was kind of fun,” she 
replied. “More fun than trick-or-treating.” 

So we spent the rest of the night scaring kids. 

We didn’t get much candy. But we had a great time. 

“I wish we could do this every night!” I exclaimed as we walked home. 

“We can,” Stephanie said, grinning. “It doesn’t have to be Halloween to 
scare kids, Duane. Get my meaning?” 

I got her meaning. 

She tossed back her bristly head and let out her chicken laugh. And I 
laughed, too. 



And that’s how Stephanie and I started haunting our neighborhood. Late at 
night, the Twin Terrors strike, up and down our neighborhood. We’re 
everywhere! 

Well... almost everywhere. 

There’s one place in our neighborhood that even Stephanie and I are afraid 
of. 

It’s an old stone house on the next block. It’s called Hill House. I guess 
that’s because it sits up on a high hill on Hill Street. 

I know. I know. A lot of towns have a haunted house. 

But Hill House really is haunted. 

Stephanie and I know that for sure. 

Because that’s where we met the Headless Ghost. 



3 


Hill House is the biggest tourist attraction in Wheeler Falls. Actually, it’s the 
only one. 

Maybe you’ve heard of Hill House. It’s written up in a lot of books. 

Tour guides in creepy black uniforms give the Hill House tour every hour. 
The guides will act real scary and tell frightening stories about the house. Some 
of the ghost stories give me cold shivers. 

Stephanie and I love to take the tour—especially with Otto. Otto is our 
favorite guide. 

Otto is big and bald and scary-looking. He has tiny black eyes that seem to 
stare right through you. And he has a booming voice that comes from deep 
inside his huge chest. 

Sometimes when Otto leads us from room to room in the old house, he 
lowers his voice to a whisper. He talks so low, we can barely hear him. Then his 
tiny eyes will bulge. He’ll point—and scream: “There’s the ghost! There!” 

Stephanie and I always scream. 

Even Otto’s smile is scary. 

Stephanie and I have taken the Hill House tour so often, we could probably 
be tour guides. We know all the creepy old rooms. All the places where ghosts 
have been spotted. 

Real ghosts! 

It’s the kind of place we love. 

Do you want to know the story of Hill House? Well, here’s the story that 
Otto, Edna, and the other guides tell: 

Hill House is two hundred years old. And it’s been haunted practically from the 
day the stones were gathered to build it. 

A young sea captain built the house for his new bride. But the day the big 
house was finished, the captain was called out to sea. 

His young wife moved into the huge house all alone. It was cold and dark, 
and the rooms and hallways seemed to stretch on forever. 

For months and months, she stared out of their bedroom window. The 
window that faced the river. Waiting patiently for the captain’s return. 



Winter passed. Then spring, then summer. 

But he never came back. 

The captain was lost at sea. 

One year after the sea captain disappeared, a ghost appeared in the halls of 
Hill House. The ghost of the young sea captain. He had come back from the 
dead, back to find his wife. 

Every night he floated through the long, twisting halls. He carried a lantern 
and called out his wife’s name. “Annabel! Annabel!” 

But Annabel never answered. 

In her grief, she had fled from the old house. She never wanted to see it 
again. 

Another family had moved in. As the years passed, many people heard the 
ghost’s nightly calls. “Annabel! Annabel!” Through the twisting halls and cold 
rooms of the house. 

“Annabel! Annabel!” 

People heard the sad, frightening calls. But no one ever saw the ghost. 

Then, one hundred years ago, a family named Craw bought the house. The 
Craws had a thirteen-year-old boy named Andrew. 

Andrew was a nasty, mean-natured boy. He delighted in playing cruel tricks 
on the servants. He scared them out of their wits. 

He once threw a cat out of a window. He was disappointed when it 
survived. 

Even Andrew’s own parents couldn’t stand to spend time with the mean- 
tempered boy. He spent his days on his own, exploring the old mansion, looking 
for trouble he could get into. 

One day he discovered a room he had never explored before. He pushed 
open the heavy wooden door. It let out a loud creak. 

Then he stepped inside. 

A lantern glowed dimly on a small table. The boy saw no other furniture in 
the large room. No one at the table. 

“How strange,” he thought. “Why should I find a burning lantern in an 
empty room?” 

Andrew approached the lantern. As he leaned down to lower the wick, the 
ghost appeared. 

The sea captain! 

Over the years, the ghost had grown into an old and terrifying creature. He 



had long, white fingernails that curled in spirals. Cracked, black teeth poked out 
from between swollen, dry lips. And a scraggly white beard hid the ghost’s face 
from view. 

The boy stared in horror. “Who—who are you?” he stammered. 

The ghost didn’t utter a word. He floated in the yellow lantern light, glaring 
hard at the boy. 

“Who are you? What do you want? Why are you here?” the boy demanded. 

When the ghost still didn’t reply, Andrew turned—and tried to run. 

But before he moved two steps, he felt the ghost’s cold breath on his neck. 

Andrew grabbed for the door. But the old ghost swirled around him, swirled 
darkly, a swirl of black smoke in the dim yellow fight. 

“No! Stop!” the boy screamed. “Let me go!” 

The ghost’s mouth gaped open, revealing a bottomless black hole. Finally, it 
spoke—in a whisper that sounded like the scratch of dead leaves. “Now that you 
have seen me, you cannot leave.” 

“No!” The boy shrieked. “Let me go! Let me go!” 

The ghost ignored the boy’s cries. He repeated his dry, cold words: “Now 
that you have seen me, you cannot leave.” 

The old ghost raised his hands to the boy’s head. His icy fingers spread over 
Andrew’s face. The hands tightened. Tightened. 

Do you know what happened next? 



4 


The ghost pulled off the boy’s head—and hid it somewhere in the house! 

After hiding the head, hiding it away in the huge, dark mansion, the ghost 
of the sea captain let out a final howl that made the heavy stone walls tremble. 

The terrifying howl ended with the cry, “Annabel! Annabel!” 

Then the old ghost disappeared forever. 

But Hill House was not freed from ghosts. A new ghost now haunted the 
endless, twisting halls. 

From then on, Andrew haunted Hill House. Every night the ghost of the 
poor boy searched the halls and rooms, looking for his missing head. 

All through the house, say Otto and the other tour guides, you can hear the 
footsteps of the Headless Ghost, searching, always searching. 

And each room of the house now has a terrifying story of its own. 

Are the stories true? 

Well, Stephanie and I believe them. That’s why we take the tour so often. 

We must have explored the old place at least a hundred times. 

Hill House is such awesome fun. 

At least it was fun—until Stephanie had another one of her bright ideas. 

After Stephanie’s bright idea, Hill House wasn’t fun anymore. 

Hill House became a truly scary place. 



5 


The trouble started a few weeks ago when Stephanie suddenly got bored. 

It was about ten o’clock at night. We were out haunting the neighborhood. 
We did our terrifying wolf howl outside Geena Jeffers’ window. Then we went 
next door to Terri Abel’s house. We put some chicken bones in her mailbox— 
just because it’s creepy to reach in your mailbox and feel bones. 

Then we crept across the street to Ben Fuller’s house. 

Ben was our last stop for the night. Ben is a kid in our class, and we have a 
special scare for him. 

You see, he’s afraid of bugs, which makes him really easy to scare. 

Even though it’s pretty cold out, he sleeps with his bedroom window open. 
So Stephanie and I like to step up to his window and toss rubber spiders onto 
Ben as he sleeps. 

The rubber spiders tickle his face. He wakes up. And starts to scream. 

Every time. 

He always thinks the spiders are real. 

He screams and tries to scramble out of bed. He gets all tangled in his 
covers and thuds onto the floor. 

Then Stephanie and I congratulate each other on a job well done. And we 
go home to bed. 

But tonight, as we tossed the rubber spiders at Ben’s sleeping face, 
Stephanie turned to me and whispered, “I just had a great idea.” 

“Huh?” I started to reply. But Ben’s scream interrupted me. 

We listened to him scream, then thud to the floor. 

Stephanie and I slapped each other a high five. Then we took off, running 
across the dark backyards, our sneakers thumping the hard, nearly-frozen 
ground. 

We stopped in front of the split oak tree in my front yard. The tree trunk is 
completely split in two. But Dad doesn’t have the heart to have the tree taken 
away. 

“What is your great idea?” I asked Stephanie breathlessly. 

Her dark eyes flashed. “I’ve been thinking. Every time we go out to haunt 
the neighborhood, we scare the same old kids. It’s starting to get boring.” 



I wasn’t bored. But I knew that once Stephanie gets an idea, there’s no 
stopping her. “So, do you want to find some new kids to scare?” I asked. 

“No. Not new kids. Something else.” She began to walk around the tree. 
Circling it. “We need a new challenge.” 

“Like what?” I asked. 

“Our scares are all kid stuff,” she complained. “We make some spooky 
sounds, toss a few things inside an open window—and everyone is frightened to 
death. It’s too easy.” 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “But it’s funny.” 

She ignored me. She stuck her head through the split in the tree trunk. 
“Duane, what’s the scariest place in Wheeler Falls?” 

That was easy. “Hill House, of course,” I answered. 

“Right. And what makes it so scary?” 

“All the ghost stories. But especially the one about the boy searching for his 
head.” 

“Yes!” Stephanie cried. All I could see now was her head, poking through 
the split oak tree. “The Headless Ghost!” she cried in a deep voice, and let out a 
long, scary laugh. 

“What’s your problem?” I demanded. “Are you trying to haunt me now?” 

Her head seemed to float in the darkness. “We need to haunt Hill House,” 
she declared in a whisper. 



6 


“Excuse me?” I cried. “Stephanie, what are you talking about?” 

“We’ll take the Hill House tour and sneak off on our own,” Stephanie 
replied thoughtfully. 

I shook my head. “Give me a break. Why would we do that?” 

Stephanie’s face seemed to glow, floating by itself in the tree trunk. “We’ll 
sneak off on our own—to search for the ghost’s head.” 

I stared back at her. “You’re kidding, right?” 

I walked behind the tree and tugged her away from it. The floating head 
trick was starting to give me the creeps. 

“No, Duane, I’m not kidding,” she replied, shoving me away. “We need a 
challenge. We need something new. Prowling around the neighborhood, 
terrifying everyone we know—that’s just kid stuff. Bor-ring.” 

“But you don’t believe the story about the missing head—do you?” I 
protested. “It’s just a ghost story. We can search and search. But there is no head. 
It’s all a story they made up for the tourists.” 

Stephanie narrowed her eyes at me. “I think you’re scared, Duane.” 

“Huh? Me?” My voice got pretty shrill. 

A cloud rolled over the moon, making my front yard even darker. A chill 
ran down my back. I pulled my jacket around me tighter. 

“I’m not afraid to sneak off from the tour and search Hill House on our 
own,” I told Stephanie. “I just think it’s a big waste of time.” 

“Duane, you’re shivering,” she teased. “Shivering with fright.” 

“I am not!” I screamed. “Come on. Let’s go to Hill House. Right now. I’ll 
show you.” 

A grin spread over Stephanie’s face. She tossed back her head and let out a 
long howl. A victory howl. “This is going to be the coolest thing the Twin 
Terrors have ever done!” she cried, slapping me a high five that made my hand 
sting. 

She dragged me up Hill Street. The whole way there, I didn’t say one word. 
Was I afraid? 

Maybe a little. 

We climbed the steep, weed-choked hill and stood before the front steps of 



Hill House. The old house looked even bigger at night. Three stories tall. With 
turrets and balconies and dozens of windows, all dark and shuttered. 

All the houses in our neighborhood are brick or clapboard. Hill House is the 
only one made out of stone slabs. Dark gray slabs. 

I always have to hold my breath when I stand close to Hill House. The 
stone is covered with a blanket of thick green moss. Two hundred years of it. 
Putrid, moldy moss that doesn’t exactly smell like a flower garden. 

I peered up. Up at the round turret that stretched to the purple sky. A 
gargoyle, carved in stone, perched at the very top. It grinned down at us, as if 
challenging us to go inside. 

My knees suddenly felt weak. 

The house stood in total darkness, except for a single candle over the front 
doorway. But the tours were still going on. The last tour left at ten-thirty every 
night. The guides said the late tours were the best—the best time to see a ghost. 

I read the sign etched in stone beside the door. ENTER HILL HOUSE— 
AND YOUR LIFE WILL BE CHANGED. FOREVER. 

I’d read that sign a hundred times. I always thought it was funny—in a 
corny sort of way. 

But tonight it gave me the creeps. 

Tonight was going to be different. 

“Come on,” Stephanie said, pulling me by the hand. “We’re just in time for 
the next tour.” 

The candle flickered. The heavy wooden door swung open. By itself. I 
don’t know how, but it always does that. 

“Well, are you coming or not?” Stephanie demanded, stepping into the dark 
entryway. 

“Coming,” I gulped. 



7 


Otto met us as we stepped inside the door. Otto always reminds me of an 
enormous dolphin. He has a big, smooth bald head. And he’s sort of shaped like 
a dolphin. He must weigh about three hundred pounds! 

Otto was dressed entirely in black, as always. Black shirt. Black pants. 
Black socks. Black shoes. And gloves—you guessed it—black. It’s the uniform 
that all the tour guides wear. 

“Look who’s here!” he called. “Stephanie and Duane!” He broke out into a 
wide grin. His tiny eyes flashed in the candlelight. 

“Our favorite guide!” Stephanie greeted him. “Are we in time for the next 
tour?” 

We pushed through the turnstile without paying. We’re such regulars at Hill 
House that they don’t even charge us anymore. 

“About five minutes, guys,” Otto told us. “You two are out late tonight, 
huh?” 

“Yeah... well,” Stephanie hesitated. “It’s more fun to take the tour at night. 
Isn’t it, Duane?” She jabbed my side. 

“You can say that again,” I mumbled. 

We moved into the front hall with some others who were waiting for the 
tour to begin. Teenagers mostly, out on dates. 

The front hall is bigger than my living room and dining room put together. 
And except for the winding staircase in the center, it’s completely bare. No 
furniture at all. 

Shadows tossed across the floor. I gazed around the room. No electric 
lights. Small torches were hung from the peeling, cracked walls. The orange 
torchlight flickered and bent. 

In the dancing light, I counted the people around me. Nine of them. 
Stephanie and I were the only kids. 

Otto lighted a lantern and crossed to the front of the hall. He held it up high 
and cleared his throat. 

Stephanie and I grinned at each other. Otto always starts the tour the same 
way. He thinks the lantern adds atmosphere. 

“Ladies and gentlemen,” he boomed. “Welcome to Hill House. We hope 



you will survive your tour tonight.” Then he gave a low, evil laugh. 

Stephanie and I mouthed Otto’s next words along with him: 

“In 1795, a prosperous sea captain, William P. Bell, built himself a home on 
the highest hill in Wheeler Falls. It was the finest home ever built here at the 
time—three stories high, nine fireplaces, and over thirty rooms. 

“Captain Bell spared no expense. Why? Because he hoped to retire here and 
finish his days in splendor with his young and beautiful wife. But it was not to 
be.” 

Otto cackled, and so did Stephanie and I. We knew every move Otto had. 

Otto went on. “Captain Bell died at sea in a terrible shipwreck—before he 
ever had a chance to live in his beautiful house. His young bride, Annabel, fled 
the house in horror and sorrow.” 

Now Otto’s voice dropped. “But soon after Annabel left, strange things 
began to happen in Hill House.” 

This was Otto’s cue to start walking toward the winding stairs. The old, 
wooden staircase is narrow and creaky. When Otto starts to climb, the stairs 
groan and grumble beneath him as if in pain. 

Keeping silent, we followed Otto up the stairs to the first floor. Stephanie 
and I love this part, because Otto doesn’t say a word the whole time. He just 
huffs along in the darkness while everyone tries to keep up with him. 

He starts talking again when he reaches Captain Bell’s bedroom. A big, 
wood-paneled room with a fireplace and a view of the river. 

“Soon after Captain Bell’s widow ran away,” Otto reported, “people in 
Wheeler Falls began reporting strange sightings. Sightings of a man who 
resembled Captain Bell. He was always seen here, standing by his window, 
holding his lantern aloft.” 

Otto moved to the window and raised his lantern. “On a windless night, if 
you listened carefully, you could sometimes hear him calling out her name in a 
low, mournful voice.” 

Otto took a deep breath, then called softly: “Annabel. Annabel. Annabel...” 

Otto swung the lantern back and forth for effect. By now, he had everyone’s 
complete attention. 

“But of course, there’s more,” he whispered. 



8 


As we followed him through the upstairs rooms, Otto told us how Captain Bell 
haunted the house for about a hundred years. “People who moved into Hill 
House tried all kinds of ways to get rid of the ghost. But it was determined to 
stay.” 

Then Otto told everyone about the boy finding the ghost and getting his 
head pulled off. “The ghost of the sea captain vanished. The headless ghost of 
the boy continued to haunt the house. But that wasn’t the end of it.” 

Into the long, dark hallway now. Torches darting and flickering along the 
walls. “Tragedy continued to haunt Hill House,” Otto continued. “Shortly after 
young Andrew Craw’s death, his twelve-year-old sister Hannah went mad. Let’s 
go to her room next.” 

He led us down the hall to Hannah’s room. 

Stephanie loves Hannah’s room. Hannah collected porcelain dolls. And she 
had hundreds of them. All with the same long yellow hair, painted rosy cheeks, 
and blue-tinted eyelids. 

“After her brother was killed, Hannah went crazy,” Otto told us all in a 
hushed voice. “All day long, for eighty years, she sat in her rocking chair over 
there in the corner. And she played with her dolls. She never left her room. 
Ever.” 

He pointed to a worn rocking chair. “Hannah died there. An old lady 
surrounded by her dolls.” 

The floorboards creaked under him as Otto crossed the room. Setting the 
lantern down, he lowered his big body into the rocking chair. 

The chair made a cracking sound. I always think Otto is going to crush it! 
He started to rock. Slowly. The chair groaned with each move. We all watched 
him in silence. 

“Some people swear that poor Hannah is still here,” he said softly. “They 
say they’ve seen a young girl sitting in this chair, combing a doll’s hair.” 

He rocked slowly, letting the idea sink in. “And—then we come to the story 
of Hannah’s mother.” 

With a grunt, Otto pulled himself to his feet. He grabbed up the lantern and 
made his way to the top of the long, dark stairway at the end of the hall. 



“Soon after her son’s tragedy, the mother met her own terrible fate. She was 
on her way down these stairs one night when she tripped and fell to her death.” 

Otto gazed down the stairs and shook his head sadly. 

He does this every time. As I said, Stephanie and I know his every move. 

But we hadn’t come here tonight to watch Otto perform. I knew that sooner 
or later, Stephanie would want to get going. So I started glancing around. To see 
if it was a good time for us to sneak away from the others. 

And that’s when I saw the strange kid. Watching us. 

I didn’t see him when we first came in. In fact, I’m sure he wasn’t there 
when the tour started. I had counted nine people. No kids. 

The boy was about our age, with wavy blond hair and pale skin. Very pale 
skin. He was wearing black jeans and a black turtleneck that made his face look 
even whiter. 

I edged over to Stephanie. She was hanging back from the group. 

“You ready?” she whispered. 

Otto had started back down the stairs. If we were going to sneak away from 
the tour, now was the time. 

But I could see that weird kid still staring at us. 

Staring hard. 

He was giving me the creeps. 

“We can’t go. Someone’s watching us,” I whispered to Stephanie. 

“Who?” 

“That weird kid over there.” I motioned with my eyes. 

He was still staring at us. He didn’t even try to be polite and turn away 
when we caught him. 

Why was he watching us like that? What was his problem ? 

Something told me we should wait. Something told me not to hide from the 
others just yet. 

But Stephanie had other ideas. “Forget him,” she said. “He’s nobody.” She 
grabbed my arm—and tugged. “Let’s go!” 

We pressed against the cold wall of the hallway and watched the others 
follow Otto down the stairs. 

I held my breath until I heard the last footsteps leave the stairway. We were 
alone now. Alone in the long, dark hall. 

I turned to Stephanie. I could barely see her face. “Now what?” I asked. 



9 


“Now we do some exploring on our own!” Stephanie declared, rubbing her 
hands together. “This is so exciting!” 

I gazed down the long hallway. I didn’t feel real excited. I felt kind of 
scared. 

I heard a low groan from a room across the hall. The ceiling creaked above 
our heads. The wind rattled the windows in the room we had just come from. 

“Steph—are you sure—?” I started. 

But she was already hurrying down the hall, walking on tiptoes to keep the 
floors from squeaking. “Come on, Duane. Let’s search for the ghost’s head,” she 
whispered back to me, her dark hair flying behind her. “Who knows? We might 
find it.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes. 

I didn’t think the chances were too good. How do you find a hundred-year- 
old head? And what if you do find it? 

Yuck! 

What would it look like? Just a skull? 

I followed Stephanie down the hall. But I really didn’t want to be there. I 
like haunting the neighborhood and scaring other people. 

I don’t like scaring myself! 

Stephanie led the way into a bedroom we had seen on other tours. It was 
called the Green Room. Because the wallpaper was decorated with green vines. 
Tangle after tangle of green vines. Up and down the walls and across the ceiling, 
too. 

How could anyone sleep in here? I wondered. It was like being trapped in a 
thick jungle. 

We both stopped inside the doorway and stared at the tangles of vines on all 
sides of us. Stephanie and I call the Green Room by another name. The 
Scratching Room. 

Otto once told us that something terrible happened here sixty years ago. 
The two guests who stayed in the room woke up with a disgusting purple rash. 

The rash started on their hands and arms. It spread to their faces. Then it 
spread over their entire bodies. 



Big purple sores that itched like crazy. 

Doctors from all around the world were called to study the rash. They 
couldn’t figure out what it was. And they couldn’t figure out how to cure it. 

Something in the Green Room caused the rash. 

But no one ever figured out what it was. 

That’s the story Otto and the other guides tell. It might be true. All the 
weird, scary stories Otto tells might be true. Who knows? 

“Come on, Duane!” Stephanie prodded. “Let’s look for the head. We don’t 
have much time before Otto sees that we’re missing.” 

She trotted across the room and dove under the bed. 

“Steph—please!” I started. I stepped carefully over to the low, wooden 
dresser in the corner. 

“We’re not going to find a ghost’s head in here. Let’s go,” I pleaded. 

She couldn’t hear me. She had climbed under the bed. 

“Steph—?” 

After a few seconds, she backed out. As she turned toward me, I saw that 
her face was bright red. 

“Duane!” she cried. “I... I...” 

Her dark eyes bulged. Her mouth dropped open in horror. She grabbed the 
sides of her face. 

“What is it? What’s wrong?” I cried, stumbling across the room toward her. 

“Ohhh, it itches! It itches so badly!” Stephanie wailed. 

I started to cry out. But my voice got caught in my throat. 

Stephanie began to rub her face. She frantically rubbed her cheeks, her 
forehead, her chin. 

“Owwww. It itches! It really itches!” She started to scratch her scalp with 
both hands. 

I grabbed her arm and tried to pull her up from the floor. “The rash! Let’s 
get you home!” I cried. “Come on! Your parents will get the doctor! And... 
and...” 

I stopped when I saw that she was laughing. 

I dropped her arm and stepped back. 

She stood up, straightening her hair. “Duane, you jerk,” she muttered. “Are 
you going to fall for every dumb joke tonight?” 

“No way!” I replied angrily. “I just thought—” 

She gave me a shove. “You’re too easy to scare. How could you fall for 



such a stupid joke?” 

I shoved her back. “Just don’t pull any more dumb jokes, okay?” I snarled. 
“I mean it, Stephanie. I don’t think it’s funny. I really don’t. I’m not going to fall 
for any more stupid jokes. So don’t even try.” 

She wasn’t listening to me. She was staring over my shoulder. Staring in 
open-mouthed shock. 

“Oh, I d-don’t believe it!” she stammered. “There it is! There’s the head!” 



10 


I fell for it again. 

I couldn’t help myself. 

I let out a shrill scream. 

I spun around so hard, I nearly knocked myself over. I followed Stephanie’s 
finger. I squinted hard in the direction she pointed. 

She was pointing to a gray clump of dust. 

“Sucker! Sucker!” She slapped me on the back and started to giggle. 

I uttered a low growl and balled my hands into tight fists. But I didn’t say 
anything. I could feel my face burning. I knew that I was blushing. 

“You’re too easy to scare, Duane,” Stephanie teased again. “Admit it.” 

“Let’s just get back to the tour,” I grumbled. 

“No way, Duane. This is fun. Let’s try the next room. Come on.” 

When she saw that I wasn’t following her, she said, “I won’t scare you like 
that anymore. Promise.” 

I saw that her fingers were crossed. But I followed her anyway. 

What choice did I have? 

We crept through the narrow hall that connected us to the next room. And 
found ourselves in Andrew’s room. Poor, headless Andrew. 

It still had all his old stuff in it. Games and toys from a hundred years ago. 
An old-fashioned wooden bicycle leaning against one wall. 

Everything just the way it was. Before Andrew met up with the sea 
captain’s ghost. 

A lantern on the dresser cast blue shadows on the walls. I didn’t know if I 
believed the ghost story or not. But something told me that if Andrew’s head 
were anywhere, we’d find it here. In his room. 

Under his old-fashioned-looking canopy bed. Or hidden under his dusty, 
faded toys. 

Stephanie tiptoed over to the toys. She bent down and started to move 
things aside. Little wooden bowling pins. An old-fashioned board game, the 
colors all faded to brown. A set of metal toy soldiers. 

“Check around the bed, Duane,” she whispered. 



I started across the room. “Steph, we shouldn’t be touching this stuff. You 
know the tour guides never let us touch anything.” 

Stephanie set down an old wooden top. “Do you want to find the head or 
not?” 

“You really think there’s a ghost’s head hidden in this house?” 

“Duane, that’s what we’re here to find out—right?” 

I sighed and stepped over to the bed. I could see there was no use arguing 
with Stephanie tonight. 

I ducked my head under the purple canopy and studied the bed. A boy 
actually slept in this bed, I told myself. 

Andrew actually slept under this quilt. A hundred years ago. 

The thought gave me a chill. 

I tried to picture a boy about my age sleeping in this heavy, old bed. 

“Go ahead. Check out the bed,” Stephanie instructed from across the room. 

I leaned over and patted the gray and brown patchwork quilt. It felt cold 
and smooth. 

I punched the pillows. They felt soft and feathery. Nothing hidden inside 
the pillow cases. 

I was about to test the mattress when the quilt began to move. 

It rustled over the sheets. A soft, scratchy sound. 

Then, as I stared in horror, the gray and brown quilt began to slide down the 

bed. 

There was no one in the bed. No one! 

But someone was pushing the quilt down, down to the bottom of the bed. 



11 


I swallowed a scream. 

“You’ve got to move faster, Duane,” Stephanie said. 

I turned and saw her standing at the end of the bed. Holding the bottom of 
the quilt in both hands. 

“We don’t have all night!” she declared. She pulled the quilt down farther. 
“Nothing in the bed. Come on. Let’s move on.” 

A sigh escaped my lips. Stephanie had tugged down the quilt and scared me 
again. 

No ghost in the bed. No ghost pushing down the covers to climb out and 
grab me. 

Only Stephanie. 

At least this time she hadn’t seen how frightened I was. 

We worked together to pull the quilt back into place. She smiled at me. 
“This is kind of fun,” she said. 

“For sure,” I agreed. I hoped she couldn’t see that I was still shaking. “It’s a 
lot more fun than tossing rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s bedroom window.” 

“I like being in this house so late at night. I like sneaking off from the 
group. I can feel a ghost lurking nearby,” Stephanie whispered. 

“You c-can?” I stammered, glancing quickly around the room. 

My eyes stopped at the bottom of the door to the hallway. 

There it sat. On the floor. Wedged between the door and the wall. Half- 
hidden in deep shadow. 

The head. 

This time, I saw the head. 

Not a joke. Not a cruel trick. 

Through the gray-black shadows, I saw the round skull. And I saw the two 
black eye sockets. Empty eye sockets. Two dark holes in the skull. 

Staring up at me. 

Staring. 

I grabbed Stephanie’s arm. I started to point. 

But there was no need. 



Stephanie saw it, too. 



12 


I was the first to move. I took a step toward the door. Then another. 

I heard sharp gasps. Someone breathing hard. Close behind me. 

It took me a few seconds to realize it was Stephanie. 

Keeping my eyes on the head, I made my way into the dark corner. My 
heart started to pound as I bent down and reached for it with both hands. 

The black eye sockets stared up at me. Round, sad eyes. 

My hands trembled. 

I started to scoop it up. 

But it slipped out of my hands. And started to roll away. 

Stephanie let out a cry as the head rolled over the floor toward her. 

In the orange light from the lantern, I saw her frightened expression. I saw 
that she was frozen there. 

The head rolled over the floor and bumped against her sneaker. It came to a 
stop inches in front of her. 

The empty black eye sockets stared up at her. 

“Duane—” she called, staring down at it, hands pressed against her cheeks. 
“I didn’t think—I didn’t really think we’d find it. I—I—” 

I hurried back across the room. It’s my turn to be the brave one, I decided. 
My turn to show Stephanie that I’m not a wimp who’s afraid of every shadow. 
My turn to show Stephanie. 

I scooped up the ghost’s head in both hands. I raised it in front of Stephanie. 
Then I moved toward the lantern on the dressertop. 

The head felt hard. Smoother than I thought. 

The eye sockets were deep. 

Stephanie stayed close by my side. Together we made our way into the 
orange lantern light. 

I let out a groan when I realized I wasn’t carrying a ghost’s head. 

Stephanie groaned too when she saw what I held in my hands. 



13 


A bowling ball. 

I was carrying an old wooden bowling ball, the pale wood cracked and 
chipped. 

“I don’t believe it,” Stephanie murmured, slapping her forehead. 

My eyes went to the wooden bowling pins, lying among Andrew’s old toys. 
“This must be the ball that went with those pins,” I said softly. 

Stephanie grabbed it from me and turned it between her hands. “But it only 
has two holes.” 

I nodded. “Yeah. In those days, bowling balls only had two holes. My dad 
told me about it one day when we went bowling. Dad never could figure out 
what they did with their thumb.” 

Stephanie stuck her fingers into the two holes. The “eye sockets”. She 
shook her head. I could see she was really disappointed. 

We could hear Otto’s voice, booming from somewhere downstairs. 

Stephanie sighed. “Maybe we should go down and rejoin the tour,” she 
suggested. She rolled the ball back to the pile of toys. 

“No way!” I exclaimed. 

I liked being the brave one for a change. I didn’t want to quit while I was 
ahead. 

“It’s getting kind of late,” Stephanie said. “And we’re not going to find any 
ghost head up here.” 

“That’s because we’ve already explored these rooms a hundred times,” I 
told her. “I think we should find a room we’ve never explored before.” 

She scrunched up her face, thinking hard. “Duane, do you mean—?” 

“I mean, the ghost head is probably hidden in a room the tour doesn’t go 
through. Maybe upstairs. You know. On the top floor.” 

Stephanie’s eyes grew wide. “You want to sneak up to the top floor?” 

I nodded. “Why not? That’s probably where all the ghosts hang out— 
right?” 

She studied me, her eyes searching mine. I knew she was surprised by my 
brave idea. 

Of course, I didn’t feel very brave at all. I just wanted to impress her. I just 



wanted to be the brave one for a change. 

I was hoping that she’d say no. I was hoping she’d say, “Let’s go back 
downstairs, Duane.” 

But instead, an excited grin spread over her face. And she said, “Okay. Let’s 
do it!” 



14 


So I was stuck being the brave one. 

We both had to be brave now. The Twin Terrors, on their way up the dark, 
creaking stairway that led to the third floor. 

A sign beside the stairs read: NO VISITORS. 

We stepped right past it and began climbing the narrow staircase. Side by 

side. 

I couldn’t hear Otto’s voice anymore. Now I could only hear the creak and 
squeak of the steps beneath our sneakers. And the steady thud thud thud of my 
heart. 

The air grew hot and damp as we reached the top. I squinted down a long, 
dark hallway. There were no lanterns. No candles. 

The only light came from the window at the end of the hall. Pale light from 
outside that cast everything in an eerie, ghostly blue. 

“Let’s start in the first room,” Stephanie suggested, whispering. She 
brushed her dark hair off her face. 

It was so hot up here, I had sweat running down my forehead. I mopped it 
up with my jacket sleeve and followed Stephanie to the first room on the right. 

The heavy wooden door was half open. We slid in through the opening. 
Pale blue light washed in through the dust-caked windows. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust. Then I squinted around the large room. 

Empty. Completely empty. No furniture. No sign of life. 

Or ghosts. 

“Steph—look.” I pointed to a narrow door against the far wall. “Let’s check 
it out.” 

We crept across the bare floor. Through the dusty window, I glimpsed the 
full moon, high over the bare trees now. 

The doorway led to another room. Smaller and even warmer. A steam 
radiator clanked against one wall. Two old-fashioned-looking couches stood 
facing each other in the center of the room. No other furniture. 

“Let’s keep moving,” Stephanie whispered. 

Another narrow door led to another dark room. “The rooms up here are all 
connected,” I murmured. I sneezed. Sneezed again. 



“Ssshhh. Quiet, Duane,” Stephanie scolded. “The ghosts will hear us 
coming.” 

“I can’t help it,” I protested. “It’s so dusty up here.” 

We were in some kind of sewing room. An old sewing machine stood on a 
table in front of the window. A carton at my feet was filled with balls of black 
yarn. 

I bent down and pawed quickly through the balls of yarn. No head hidden 
in there. 

We stepped into the next room before we realized it was completely dark. 

The window was partly shuttered. Only a tiny square of gray light crept 
through from outside. 

“I-I can’t see anything,” Stephanie declared. I felt her hand grasp my arm. 
“It’s too dark. Let’s get out of here, Duane.” 

I started to reply. But a loud thump made my breath catch in my throat. 

Stephanie’s hand squeezed my hand. “Duane, did you make that thump?” 

Another thump. Closer to us. 

“No. Not m-me,” I stammered. 

Another thump on the floor. 

“We’re not alone in here,” Stephanie whispered. 

I took a deep breath. “Who is it?” I called. “Who’s there?” 



15 


“Who’s there?” I choked out. 

Stephanie squeezed my arm so hard, it hurt. But I made no attempt to move 
away from her. 

I heard soft footsteps. Ghostly footsteps. 

A cold chill froze the back of my neck. I clamped my jaw shut to keep my 
teeth from chattering. 

And then yellow eyes floated toward us through the thick darkness. 

Four yellow eyes. 

The creature had four eyes! 

A gurgling sound escaped my throat. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move. 

I stared straight ahead. Listening. 

Watching. 

The eyes floated apart in pairs. Two eyes moved to the right, two to the left. 

“Noooo!” I cried out when I saw more eyes. 

Yellow eyes in the corners of the room. Evil eyes glinting at us from against 
the wall. 

Yellow eyes all along the floor. 

Yellow eyes all around us. 

Catlike yellow eyes glaring in silence at Stephanie and me as we huddled 
together in the center of the room. 

Catlike eyes. 

Cat’s eyes. 

Because the room was filled with cats. 

A shrill yowl gave them away. A long meeeeyoww from the windowsill 
made Stephanie and me both sigh in relief. 

A cat brushed against my leg. Startled, I jumped aside, bumping into 
Stephanie. 

She bumped me back. 

More cats meowed. Another cat brushed the back of my jeans leg. 

“I-I think these cats are lonely,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you think 
anyone ever comes up here?” 



“I don’t care,” I snapped. “All these yellow eyes floating around. I 
thought... I thought... well... I don’t know what I thought! It’s creepy. Let’s get 
out of here.” 

For once, Stephanie didn’t argue. 

She led the way to the door at the back of the room. All around us, cats 
were howling and yowling. 

Another one brushed my leg. 

Stephanie tripped over a cat. In the darkness, I saw her fall. She landed on 
her knees with a hard thud. 

The cats all began to screech. 

“Are you okay?” I cried, hurrying to help pull her up. 

The cats were howling so loud, I couldn’t hear her reply. 

We jogged to the door, pulled it open, and escaped. 

I closed the door behind us. Silence now. “Where are we?” I whispered. 

“I-I don’t know,” Stephanie stammered, keeping close to the wall. 

I moved to a tall, narrow window and peered through the dusty glass. The 
window led out to a small balcony. The balcony jutted out from the gray 
shingled roof. 

Pale white moonlight washed in through the window. 

I turned back to Stephanie. “We’re in some kind of back hallway,” I 
guessed. The long, narrow hallway seemed to stretch on forever. “Maybe these 
rooms are used by the workers. You know. Manny, the night watchman. The 
house cleaners. And the tour guides.” 

Stephanie sighed. She stared down the long hallway. “Let’s go downstairs 
and find Otto and the tour group. I think we’ve done enough exploring for 
tonight.” 

I agreed. “There must be stairs at the end of this hall. Let’s go.” 

I took four or five steps. Then I felt the ghostly hands. 

They brushed over my face. My neck. My body. 

Sticky, dry, invisible hands. 

The hands pushed me back as they clung to my skin. 

“Ohhhh, help!” Stephanie moaned. 

The ghosts had her in their grasp, too. 



16 


The ghost’s filmy hands brushed over me. I could feel the soft fingers—dry and 
soft as air—tighten around my skin. 

Stephanie’s hands thrashed wildly. Beside me in the dark hall, she struggled 
to free herself. 

“It-it’s like a net!” she choked out. 

I swiped at my face. My hair. 

I spun away. But the dry fingers clung to me. Tightening. Tightening. 

And I realized we hadn’t walked into a ghost’s grasp. 

Tugging and tearing frantically with both hands, I realized we had walked 
into cobwebs. 

A thick curtain of cobwebs. 

The blanket of sticky threads had fallen over us like a fisherman’s net. The 
more we struggled, the tighter it wrapped itself around us. 

“Stephanie—it’s cobwebs !” I cried. I tugged a thick, stringy wad of them 
off my face. 

“Of course it’s cobwebs!” she shot back, squirming and thrashing. “What 
did you think it was?” 

“Uh... a ghost,” I muttered. 

Stephanie snickered. “Duane, I know you have a good imagination. But if 
you start seeing ghosts everywhere, we’ll never get out of here.” 

“I... I... I...” I didn’t know what to say. 

Stephanie thought the same thing I did. She thought she’d been grabbed by 
a ghost. But now she was pretending she knew all along. 

We stood there in the darkness, tearing the sticky threads off our faces and 
arms and bodies. I let out an angry groan. I couldn’t brush the stuff from my 
hair! 

“I’m going to itch forever !” I wailed. 

“I’ve got more bad news for you,” Stephanie murmured. 

I pulled a thick wad off my ear. “Huh?” 

“Who do you think made these cobwebs?” 

I didn’t have to think about it. “Spiders?” 



My arms and legs started to tingle. My back began to itch. I felt a light 
tingling on the back of my neck. 

Were there spiders crawling up and down my body? Hundreds and 
hundreds of them? 

Forgetting the wispy strings of cobweb, I started to run. Stephanie had the 
same idea. We both ran down the long hall, scratching and slapping at ourselves. 

“Steph—the next time you have a great idea, don’t have a great idea!” I 
warned her. 

“Let’s just get out of here!” she groaned. 

We reached the end of the hall, still scratching as we ran. 

No stairway. 

How do we get back downstairs? 

Another hall twisted to the left. Low candles over the doorways flickered 
and danced. Shadows darted over the worn carpet like slithering animals. 

“Come on.” I pulled Stephanie’s arm. We had no choice. We had to follow 
this hallway, too. 

We jogged side by side. The rooms were ah dark and silent. 

The candle flames dipped as we ran past. Our long shadows ran ahead of 
us, as if eager to get downstairs first. 

I stopped when I heard someone laughing. 

“Whoa,” Stephanie murmured, breathing hard. Her dark eyes grew wide. 

We both listened hard. 

I heard voices. Inside the room at the end of the hall. 

The door was closed. I couldn’t make out the words. I heard a man say 
something. A woman laughed. Other people laughed. 

“We caught up to the tour,” I whispered. 

Stephanie scrunched up her face. “But the tour never comes up here to the 
top floor,” she protested. 

We stepped up close to the door and listened again. 

More laughter on the other side. A lot of people talking cheerfully, all at the 
same time. It sounded like a party. 

I pressed my ear against the door. “I think the tour ended, and everyone is 
just chatting,” I whispered. 

Stephanie scratched the back of her neck. She pulled a stringy gob of 
cobweb from her hair. “Well, hurry, Duane. Open the door. Let’s join them,” she 
urged. 



“I hope Otto doesn’t ask us where we’ve been,” I replied. 
I grabbed the doorknob and pushed open the door. 
Stephanie and I took a step inside. 

And gasped in shock at what we saw. 



17 


The room stood empty. 

Empty, silent, and dark. 

“What happened? Where is everyone?” Stephanie cried. 

We took another step into the dark room. The floor creaked beneath us. The 
only sound. 

“I don’t get it,” Stephanie whispered. “Didn’t we just hear voices in here?” 
“Lots,” I said. “They were laughing and talking. It really sounded like a 
party.” 

“A big party,” Stephanie added, her eyes darting around the empty room. 
“Tons of people.” 

A cold chill ran down the back of my neck. “I don’t think we heard people,” 
I whispered. 

Stephanie turned to me. “Huh?” 

“They weren’t people,” I croaked. “They were ghosts.” 

Her mouth dropped open. “And they all disappeared when we opened the 
door?” 

I nodded. “I—I think I can still feel them in here. I can feel their presence.” 
Stephanie let out a frightened squeak. “Feel them? What do you mean?” 

At that moment, a cold wind came whooshing through the room. It rushed 
over me, cold and dry. And it chilled me down to my toes. 

Stephanie must have felt it, too. She wrapped her arms around her chest. 
“Brrr! Do you feel that breeze? Is the window open? How come it got so cold in 
here all of a sudden?” she asked. 

She shivered again. Her voice became tiny. “We’re not alone in here, are 

we?” 

“I don’t think so,” I whispered. “I think we just crashed someone’s party.” 
Stephanie and I stood there, feeling the cold of the room. I didn’t dare 
move. Maybe a ghost stood right beside me. Maybe the ghosts we heard were all 
around us, staring at us, preparing to swoop over us. 

“Stephanie,” I whispered. “What if we really have crashed their party? 
What if we’ve invaded the ghosts’ quarters?” 

Stephanie swallowed hard. She didn’t reply. 



Hadn’t Andrew, the ghost boy, lost his head when he stumbled into the 
ghost’s living quarters? Were we standing in the same living quarters? The same 
room where Andrew found the ghost of the old sea captain? 

“Stephanie, I think we should get out of here,” I said softly. “Now.” 

I wanted to run. I wanted to fly down the stairs. Fly out of Hill House. Fly 
to my safe, warm home where there were no ghosts. 

No ghosts. 

We spun around and bolted for the door. 

Were the ghosts going to try to stop us? 

No. We made it back into the flickering orange light of the hallway. I pulled 
the door shut behind us. 

“The stairs. Where are the stairs?” Stephanie cried. 

We stood at the end of the hall. Facing a solid wall. The flowers on the 
wallpaper appeared to open and close, moving in the darting candlelight. 

I banged both fists against the wall. “How do we get out of here? How?” 

Stephanie had already pulled open a door across the hall. I followed her 
inside. 

“Oh, no!” Ghostly figures filled the room. It took me a few seconds to 
realize that I was staring at sheets pulled over furniture. Chairs and couches 
covered with sheets. 

“M-maybe this is the ghosts’ living room,” I stammered. 

Stephanie didn’t hear me. She had already burst through the open door 
against the far wall. 

I followed her into another room, cluttered with large crates. The crates 
were piled nearly to the ceiling. 

Another room. Then another. 

My heart began to pound. My throat ached. 

I felt so discouraged. Were we ever going to find our way to the stairs? 

Another door. Another dark, empty room. 

“Hey, Steph—” I whispered. “I think we’re going in circles.” 

Out into a long, twisting hallway. More candles. More flowers flickering 
darkly on the wallpaper. 

We ran side by side down the hall. Until we came to a door I hadn’t seen 
before. A door with a horseshoe nailed onto it. 

Maybe it meant that our luck was about to change. I sure hoped so! 

I grabbed the knob with a trembling hand. I pulled open the door. 



A staircase! 

“Yes!” I cried. 

“Finally!” Stephanie gasped. 

“This must be the servants’ staircase,” I guessed. “Maybe we’ve been in the 
servants’ quarters all this time.” 

The stairway was blanketed in darkness. The stairs looked steep. 

I took a step down, holding onto the wall. Then another step. 

Stephanie had one hand on my shoulder. When I stepped down, she stepped 
down, too. 

Another step. Another. The soft thuds of our sneakers echoed in the deep 
stairwell. 

We had taken about ten steps when I heard footsteps. 

Someone coming up the stairs. 



18 


Stephanie bumped me hard. I shot out both hands. Grabbed the wall to keep 
from falling down the stairs. 

No time to turn and run. 

The footsteps grew louder. And heavier. Light from a flashlight swept over 
Stephanie, then me. 

Squinting against the light, I saw a dark figure climbing up to us. “So there 
you are!” his voice boomed, echoing in the stairwell. 

A familiar voice. 

“Otto!” Stephanie and I both cried. 

He bounced up in front of us, moving the flashlight from her face to mine. 
“What are you two doing up here?” he demanded breathlessly. 

“Uh... we got lost,” I answered quickly. 

“We got separated from the tour,” Stephanie added. “We tried to find you.” 

“Yes. We tried,” I chimed in. “We were searching everywhere. But we 
couldn’t catch up to the group.” 

Otto lowered the flashlight. I could see his tiny dark eyes narrowing at us. I 
don’t think he believed our story. 

“I thought you two knew my tour by heart,” he said, rubbing his chin. 

“We do,” Stephanie insisted. “We just got turned around. We got lost. And 
we—” 

“But how did you get up here on the top floor?” Otto demanded. 

“Well...” I started. But I couldn’t think of a good answer. I turned back to 
Stephanie on the step above me. 

“We heard voices up here. We thought it was you,” she told Otto. 

It wasn’t exactly a lie. We did hear voices. 

Otto lowered the beam of light to the stairs. “Well, let’s get back 
downstairs. No one is allowed on this floor. It’s private.” 

“Sorry,” Stephanie and I murmured. 

“Watch your step, kids,” Otto warned. “These back stairs are very steep and 
rickety. I’ll lead you back to the group. Edna took over for me while I went to 
find you.” 



Edna was our second-favorite tour guide. She was old and white-haired. 
Very pale and frail-looking, especially in her black tour-guide outfit. 

But she was a great storyteller. With her quivering, old voice, she really 
made you believe every frightening story she told. 

Stephanie and I eagerly clumped down the stairs, following Otto. His 
flashlight swept in front of us as he led us out onto the second floor. We followed 
a long hallway. A hallway I knew very well. 

We stopped outside Joseph Craw’s study. Joseph was Andrew’s father. I 
peeked inside. A bright fire blazed in the fireplace. 

Edna stood beside the fireplace, telling the tragic story of Joseph Craw to 
the tour group. 

Stephanie and I had heard the sad story a hundred times. A year after 
Andrew had his head cut off, Joseph came home late one winter night. He took 
off his coat, then moved to the fireplace to warm himself. 

No one knows how Joseph was burned up. At least, that’s how Otto, Edna, 
and the other guides tell the story. Was he pushed into the fireplace? Did he fall 
in? 

One guess is as good as another. 

But when the maid came into the study the next morning, she found a 
horrifying sight. 

She found two charred, blackened hands gripping the mantel. 

Two hands, holding on tightly to the marble mantelpiece. 

All that was left of Joseph Craw. 

It’s a yucky story—isn’t it? 

It gives me a chill every time I hear it. 

As Otto led us to the study, Edna was just getting to the sickening part. The 
ending. “Do you want to rejoin the group?” Otto whispered. 

“It’s pretty late. I think we’d better get home,” Stephanie told him. 

I quickly agreed. “Thanks for rescuing us. We’ll catch the tour again soon.” 

“Good night,” Otto said, clicking off his flashlight. “You know the way 
out.” He hurried into the study. 

I started to leave. But stopped when I saw the boy again, the pale boy with 
the wavy blond hair. The boy in the black jeans and black turtleneck. 

He stood away from the tour group. Close to the door. And he was staring 
at Stephanie and me again. Staring hard at us, a cold expression on his face. 

“Come on,” I whispered, grabbing Stephanie’s arm. I tugged her away from 



the study door. 

We quickly found the front stairway. A few seconds later, we pushed open 
the front door and stepped outside. A cold wind greeted us as we started down 
the hill. Wisps of black cloud floated like snakes over the moon. 

“Well, that was fun!” Stephanie declared. She zipped her coat to her chin. 

“Fun?” I wasn’t so sure. “It was kind of scary.” 

Stephanie grinned at me. “But we weren’t afraid—right?” 

I shivered. “Right.” 

“I’d like to go back and explore some more,” she said. “You know. Maybe 
go back to that room with all the voices. Find some real ghosts.” 

“Yeah. Great,” I agreed. I didn’t feel like arguing with her. I felt pretty tired. 

She pulled a wool muffler from her coat pocket. As she swung it around her 
neck, one end caught in a low pine bush. 

“Hey—!” she cried out. 

I moved to the bush and started to pull the muffler free. 

And that’s when I heard the voice. 

Just a whisper. A whisper from the other side of the bush. 

But I heard it very clearly. 

“Did you find my head ? ” 

That’s what I heard. 

“Did you find my head? Did you find it for me?” 



19 


I uttered a startled gasp and stared into the bush. “Stephanie—did you hear 
that?” I choked out. 

No reply. 

“Stephanie? Steph?” 

I spun around. She was staring at me, her mouth open in surprise. 

“Did you hear that whisper?” I asked again. 

Then I realized she wasn’t staring at me. She was staring past me. 

I turned—and saw the strange, blond boy standing there beside the pine 
bush. “Hey—did you just whisper to us?” I demanded sharply. 

He narrowed his pale gray eyes at me. “Huh? Me?” 

“Yeah. You,” I snapped. “Were you trying to scare us?” 

He shook his head. “No way.” 

“You didn’t whisper from behind this bush?” I asked again. 

“I just got out here,” the boy insisted. 

We saw him in Joseph Craw’s study less than a minute ago, I told myself. 
How did he get out here so fast? 

“Why did you follow us?” Stephanie demanded, shoving her muffler 
around her coat collar. 

The boy shrugged. 

“Why were you staring at us?” I asked, stepping up close to Stephanie. 

The wind howled over the hilltop. The row of pine bushes shook in the 
gusty wind, as if shivering. Thin black clouds continued to snake their way over 
the pale moon. 

The boy wore no coat. Only the black turtleneck and black jeans. The wind 
fluttered his long, wavy hair. 

“We saw you staring at us,” Stephanie repeated. “How come?” 

He shrugged again. He kept his strange, gray eyes down at the ground. “I 
saw you sneak away,” he said. “I wondered if... if you saw anything 
interesting.” 

“We got lost,” I told him, glancing at Stephanie. “We didn’t see much.” 

“What’s your name?” Stephanie asked. 



“Seth,” he replied. 

We told him our names. 

“Do you live in Wheeler Falls?” Stephanie asked. 

He shook his head. He kept his eyes down at his shoes. “No. I’m just 
visiting.” 

Why wouldn’t he look us in the eye? Was he just shy? 

“Are you sure you didn’t whisper something from behind that bush?” I 
asked again. 

He shook his head. “No way. Maybe someone was playing a joke on you.” 

“Maybe,” I said. I stepped closer and kicked the bush. I don’t know what I 
expected. 

But nothing happened. 

“You and Stephanie went exploring on your own?” Seth asked. 

“Yeah. A little,” I confessed. “We’re kind of into ghosts.” 

When I said that, he jerked his head up. He raised his gray eyes and gazed 
hard at Stephanie, then at me. 

His face had been a blank. No life to it. No expression at all. 

But now I could see that he was really excited. 

“Do you want to see some real ghosts?” he asked us, staring hard. “Do 


you?” 



20 


Seth stared at us as if challenging us. “Do you two want to see some real 
ghosts?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Stephanie replied, returning his stare. 

“What do you mean, Seth?” I demanded. “Have you ever seen a ghost?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. In there.” He pointed with his head, back to the big 
stone house. 

“Huh?” I cried. “You saw a real ghost in Hill House? When?” 

“Duane and I have taken the tour a hundred times,” Stephanie told him. 
“We’ve never seen any ghost in there.” 

He snickered. “Of course not. Do you think the ghosts come out when the 
tour groups are in there? They wait till the house closes. They wait until all the 
tourists go home.” 

“How do you know?” I asked. 

“I sneaked in,” Seth replied. “Late one night.” 

“You what?” I cried. “How?” 

“I found a door around back. It was unlocked. I guess everyone forgot about 
it,” Seth explained. “I sneaked in after the house was closed. And I—” 

He stopped suddenly. His eyes were on the house. 

I turned and saw the front door open. People stepped out, fastening their 
coats. The last tour had ended. People were heading for home. 

“Over here!” Seth whispered. 

We followed him behind the pine bushes and ducked down low. The people 
walked past us. They were laughing and talking about the house and all the ghost 
stories. 

When they were down the hill, we stood up again. Seth brushed his long 
hair off his forehead. But the wind blew it right back. 

“I sneaked in late at night, when the house was dark,” he repeated. 

“Your parents let you go out so late at night?” I asked. 

A strange smile crossed his lips. “They didn’t know,” he said softly. The 
smile faded. “Your parents let you two out?” 

Stephanie laughed. “Our parents don’t know, either.” 



“Good,” Seth replied. 

“And you really saw a ghost?” I asked. 

He nodded. Brushed his hair back again. “I crept past Manny, the night 
watchman. He was sound asleep. Snoring away. I made my way to the front of 
the house. I was standing at the bottom of the big staircase—when I heard a 
laugh.” 

I gulped. “A laugh?” 

“From the top of the stairs. I backed up against the wall. And I saw the 
ghost. A very old lady. In a long dress and a black bonnet. She wore a heavy 
black veil over the front of her face. But I could see her eyes through the veil. I 
could see them because they glowed bright red—like fire!” 

“Wow!” Stephanie cried. “What did she do?” 

Seth turned to the house. The front door had closed. The lantern over the 
door had been put out. The house stood in total darkness. 

“The old ghost came sliding down the banister,” he reported. “She tossed 
back her head—and screamed all the way down. And as she slid, her red eyes 
left a bright trail, like the tail of a comet.” 

“Weren’t you scared?” I asked Seth. “Didn’t you try to run away?” 

“There was no time,” he replied. “She came sliding down the banister, right 
toward me. Eyes blazing. Screaming like some kind of crazed animal. I was 
pressed against the wall. I couldn’t move. And when she reached the bottom, I 
thought she’d grab me. But she vanished. Disappeared into the darkness. And all 
that was left was the faint red glow, floating in the air. The glow of her eyes.” 

“Oh, wow!” Stephanie cried. 

“That’s awesomel” I agreed. 

“I want to sneak back in again,” Seth declared, watching the house. “I’ll bet 
there are more ghosts in there. I really want to see them.” 

“Me, too!” Stephanie cried eagerly. 

Seth smiled at her. “So you’ll come with me? Tomorrow night? I don’t want 
to go back alone. It’ll be so much more fun if you come, too.” 

The wind swirled sharply. The black clouds rolled over the moon, covering 
it, shutting out its light. The old house appeared to grow darker on its hilltop 
perch. 

“So you’ll come with me tomorrow night?” Seth asked again. 

“Yeah. Great!” Stephanie told him. “I can’t wait. How about you, Duane?” 
She turned to me. “You’ll come, too—won’t you, Duane? Won’t you?” 



21 


I said yes. 

I said I couldn’t wait to see a real ghost. 

I said I was shivering because of the cold wind. Not because I was scared. 

We made a plan to meet at midnight tomorrow at the back of Hill House. 
Then Seth hurried away. And Stephanie and I walked home. 

The street was dark and empty. Most of the house lights were out. Far in the 
distance, a dog howled. 

Stephanie and I walked quickly, leaning into the wind. We usually didn’t 
stay out this late. 

Tomorrow night, we’d be even later. 

“I don’t trust that guy,” I told Stephanie as we reached her front yard. “He’s 
too weird.” 

I expected her to agree. But she said, “You’re just jealous, Duane.” 

“Huh? Me? Jealous?” I couldn’t believe she said that. “Why would I be 
jealous?” 

“Because Seth is so brave. Because he saw a ghost and we didn’t.” 

I shook my head. “Do you believe that crazy story about a ghost sliding 
down the banister? I think he made it up.” 

“Well,” Stephanie replied thoughtfully, “we’ll find out tomorrow night— 
won’t we!” 

Tomorrow night came too quickly. 

I had a math test in the afternoon. I don’t think I did too well on it. I 
couldn’t stop thinking about Seth, and Hill House, and ghosts. 

After dinner, Mom cornered me in the living room. She brushed back my 
hair and studied my face. “Why do you look so tired?” she asked. “You have 
dark circles around your eyes.” 

“Maybe I’m part raccoon,” I replied. That’s what I always say when she 
tells me I have circles around my eyes. 

“I think you should go to bed early tonight,” Dad chimed in. Dad always 
thinks that everyone should go to bed early. 

So I went to my room at nine-thirty. But of course I didn’t go to sleep. 



I read a book and listened to a tape on my Walkman. And waited for Mom 
and Dad to go to bed. And watched the clock. 

Mom and Dad are very heavy sleepers. You can pound and pound on their 
bedroom door, and they don’t wake up. They once slept through a hurricane. 
That’s the truth. They didn’t hear the tree that fell onto our house! 

Stephanie’s parents are heavy sleepers, too. That’s why it’s so easy for the 
two of us to sneak out of our bedroom windows. That’s why it’s so easy for us to 
haunt our neighborhood at night. 

As the clock neared midnight, I wished we were going out on one of our 
usual haunting trips. I wished we were going to hide under Chrissy Jacob’s 
window and howl like wolves. And then toss rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s 
bed. 

But Stephanie had decided that was too boring. 

We needed excitement. We needed to go ghost hunting. With a strange kid 
we’d never seen before. 

At ten to twelve, I pulled on my down coat and crept out of my bedroom 
window. Another cold, windy night. I felt sprinkles of frozen rain on my 
forehead. Sol pulled up my hood. 

Stephanie was waiting for me at the bottom of her driveway. She had pulled 
her brown hair back in a ponytail. Her coat was open. She wore a heavy ski 
sweater underneath, pulled down over her jeans. 

She raised her head and let out a ghostly howl. “Owooooooo!” 

I clapped my hand over her open mouth. “You’ll wake up the whole block!” 

She laughed and backed away from me. “I’m a little excited. Aren’t you?” 
She opened her mouth in another howl. 

The frozen rain pattered the ground. We hurried toward Hill House. The 
swirling wind scattered twigs and dead leaves as we walked. Most of the house 
lights had been turned off. 

A car rolled by slowly as we turned onto Hill Street. Stephanie and I ducked 
behind a hedge. The driver might wonder why two kids were wandering around 
Wheeler Falls at midnight. 

I wondered, too. 

We waited for the car to disappear. Then we continued our journey. 

Our sneakers crunched over the hard ground as we climbed the hill that led 
to the old haunted house. Hill House rose above us, like a silent monster waiting 
to swallow us up. 



The last tour had ended. The lights were all off. Otto and Edna and the other 
tour guides were probably all home by now. 

“Come on, Duane. Hurry,” Stephanie urged. She started to run around the 
side of the house. “Seth is probably waiting.” 

“Wait up!” I cried. We followed a narrow dirt path around to the back. 

Squinting into the darkness, I searched for Seth. No sign of him. 

The backyard was cluttered with equipment of all kinds. A row of rusted 
metal trashcans formed a fence along one wall. A long wooden ladder lay on its 
side in the tall weeds. Wooden cartons and barrels and cardboard boxes were 
strewn everywhere. A hand lawnmower tilted against the house. 

“It—it’s so much darker back here,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you see 
Seth?” 

“I can’t see anything ,” I replied in a whisper. “Maybe he changed his mind. 
Maybe he isn’t coming.” 

Stephanie started to reply. But a choked cry from the side of the house made 
us both jump. 

I turned to see Seth stagger into view. 

His blond hair was wild, flying around his face. His eyes bulged. His hands 
gripped his throat. 

“The ghost!” he cried, stumbling clumsily. “The ghost—he—he got me!” 

Then Seth collapsed at our feet and didn’t move. 



22 


“Nice try, Seth,” I said calmly. 

“Nice fall,” Stephanie added. 

He raised his head slowly, staring up at us. “I didn’t fool you?” 

“No way,” I replied. 

Stephanie rolled her eyes. “That’s Joke Number One,” she told Seth. 
“Duane and I have pulled that one a thousand times.” 

Seth climbed to his feet and brushed off the front of his black turtleneck. He 
scowled, disappointed. “Just trying to give you a little scare.” 

“You’ll have to do better than that,” I told him. 

“Duane and I are experts at giving scares,” Stephanie added. “It’s sort of 
our hobby.” 

Seth straightened his hair with both hands. “You two are weird,” he 
murmured. 

I brushed cold raindrops off my eyebrows. “Can we get inside?” I asked 
impatiently. 

Seth led the way to the narrow door at the far side of the house. “Did you 
two have any trouble sneaking out?” he asked, whispering. 

“No. No trouble,” Stephanie told him. 

“Neither did I,” he replied. He stepped up to the door and lifted the wooden 
latch. “I took the tour again tonight,” he whispered. “Otto showed me some new 
things. Some new rooms we can explore.” 

“Great!” Stephanie exclaimed. “Do you promise we’ll see a real ghost?” 
Seth turned back to her. A strange smile spread over his face. “Promise,” he 

said. 



23 


Seth gave the door a tug, and it creaked open. 

We slipped inside. Into total blackness. Too dark to see where we were. 

I took a few steps into the room—and bumped into Seth. 

“Ssshhh,” he warned. “Manny the night watchman is posted in the front 
room. He’s probably asleep already. But we’d better stay in back.” 

“Where are we?” I whispered. 

“In one of the back rooms,” Seth whispered. “Wait a few seconds. Our eyes 
will adjust.” 

“Can’t we turn on a light?” I asked. 

“Ghosts won’t come out in the light,” Seth replied. 

We had closed the door behind us. But a cold wind still blew at my back. 

I shivered. 

A soft rattling sound made my breath catch in my throat. 

Was I starting to hear things? 

I pulled off my hood to hear better. 

Silence now. 

“I think I know where I can find some candles,” Seth whispered. “You two 
wait here. Don’t move.” 

“D-don’t worry,” I stammered. I didn’t plan to go anywhere until I could 

see! 

I heard Seth move away, making soft, scraping footsteps over the floor, 
keeping as quiet as he could. His footsteps faded into silence. 

Then I felt another rush of cold wind against the back of my neck. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I heard the rattling again. 

A gentle rattling. Like the rattling of bones. 

Another cold gust of wind swept over me. A ghost’s cold breath, I thought. 
My whole body shook as a chill ran down my back. 

I heard the rattling bones again. Louder. A clattering sound. So close. 

I reached out in the thick blackness. Tried to grab onto a wall. Or a table. Or 
anything. 

But my hands grabbed only air. 



I swallowed hard. Calm down, Duane, I ordered myself. Seth will be back 
in a moment with some candles. Then you’ll see that everything is okay. 

But another jangle and clatter of bones made me gasp. 

“Steph—did you hear that?” I whispered. 

No reply. 

A cold wind tingled my neck. 

The bones rattled again. 

“Steph? Do you hear that noise, too? Steph?” 

No reply. 

“Stephanie? Steph?” I called. 

She was gone. 



24 


Panic time. 

My breaths came short and fast. My heart clattered louder than the skeleton 
bones. My whole body began to shake. 

“Stephanie? Steph? Where are you?” I choked out weakly. 

Then I saw the two yellow eyes moving toward me. Two glowing eyes, 
floating silently, gleaming with evil. Coming nearer. Nearer. 

I froze. 

I couldn’t move. I couldn’t see anything but those two gleaming, yellow 

eyes. 

“Ohh!” I uttered a moan as they floated closer. And I could see them more 
clearly. See that they were candle flames. 

Two candle flames, moving side by side. 

In the soft yellow light, I saw Seth’s face. And Stephanie’s. They each 
carried a lighted candle in front of them. 

“Stephanie—where were you?” I cried in a choked whisper. “I—I thought 

55 

“I went with Seth,” she replied calmly. 

The orange glow from her candle washed over me. I guess Stephanie could 
see how panicked I was. “I’m sorry, Duane,” she said softly. “I said I was going 
with Seth. I thought you heard me.” 

“S-something is rattling,” I stammered. “Bones, I think. I keep feeling a 
cold wind, and I keep hearing—” 

Seth handed me a candle. “Light it,” he instructed. “We’ll look around. See 
what’s rattling.” 

I took the candle and raised it to his. But my hand was shaking so badly, it 
took me five tries to light the wick. Finally, the candle flamed to life. 

I gazed around in the flickering orange light. 

“Hey—we’re in the kitchen,” Stephanie whispered. 

A gust of cold wind blew past me. “Did you feel that?” I cried. 

Seth pointed his candle flame toward the kitchen window. “Look, Duane— 
that window-pane. It’s missing. The cold air is blowing in through the hole.” 

“Oh. Right.” 



Another blast of air. And then the rattling. 

“Did you hear it?” I demanded. 

Stephanie giggled. She pointed to the kitchen wall. In the dim light, I saw 
big pots and pans hanging on the wall. “The wind is making them rattle,” 
Stephanie explained. 

“Ha-ha.” I uttered a feeble laugh. “I knew that. I was just trying to scare 
you,” I lied. “You know. Give you a thrill.” 

I felt like a total jerk. But why should I admit that a bunch of pots on the 
wall nearly had me scared out of my skin? 

“Okay. No more jokes,” Stephanie insisted, turning to Seth. “We want to 
see a real ghost.” 

“Follow me. HI show you something that Otto told me about,” Seth 
whispered. 

Holding his candle in front of him, he led the way across the kitchen to the 
wall beside the stove. He lowered his candle in front of a cabinet door. Then he 
pulled open the cabinet door and moved the candle closer so we could see inside. 

“Why are you showing us a kitchen cabinet?” I demanded. “What’s scary 
about that?” 

“It’s not a cabinet,” Seth replied. “It’s a dumbwaiter. Watch.” He reached 
inside and pulled a rope beside the cabinet shelf. The shelf began to slide up. 

He raised the shelf, then lowered it. “See? This dumbwaiter is like a little 
elevator. It was used to send food from the kitchen to the master bedroom 
upstairs.” 

“You mean for midnight snacks?” I joked. 

Seth nodded. “The cook would put the food on the shelf. Then he would 
pull the rope, and the shelf would carry it upstairs.” 

“Thrills and chills,” I said sarcastically. 

“Yeah. Why are you showing it to us?” Stephanie demanded. 

Seth brought the candle up close to his face. “Otto told me that this 
dumbwaiter is haunted. A hundred and twenty years ago, things suddenly started 
to go wrong with it.” 

Stephanie and I moved closer. I lowered my candle and examined the 
dumbwaiter cabinet. “What went wrong?” I asked. 

“Well,” Seth began softly, “the cook would put food on the shelf and send it 
upstairs. But when the shelf reached the bedroom up there, the food was gone.” 

Stephanie narrowed her eyes at Seth. “It disappeared between the first and 



second floor?” 

Seth nodded solemnly. His gray eyes glowed in the soft candlelight. “This 
happened several times. When the shelf reached the second floor, it was empty. 
The food had vanished.” 

“Wow,” I murmured. 

“The cook became very frightened,” Seth continued. “He was afraid that 
the dumbwaiter had become haunted. He decided to stop using it. And he 
ordered everyone on his staff never to use the dumbwaiter again.” 

“And that’s the end of the story?” I asked. 

Seth shook his head. “And then something horrible happened.” 

Stephanie’s mouth dropped open. “What? What happened?” 

“Some kids were visiting the house. One of them was a boy named Jeremy. 
Jeremy was a real show-off, and very athletic. When he saw the dumbwaiter, he 
decided it would be fun to ride it to the second floor.” 

“Oh, wow,” Stephanie murmured. 

I felt a chill. I thought I could guess what was coming. 

“So Jeremy squeezed onto the shelf. And one of the other kids pulled the 
rope. Suddenly the rope caught. The kid couldn’t get it to move up or down. 
Jeremy was stuck somewhere between the floors. 

“The other kids called up to him, ‘Are you okay?’ But Jeremy didn’t reply. 
They started to get very worried. They tugged and tugged, but they couldn’t 
move the rope. 

“Then suddenly, the shelf came crashing back down.” 

“And was Jeremy on it?” I asked eagerly. 

Seth shook his head. “There were three covered bowls on the shelf. The 
kids lifted the lid off the first bowl. Inside was Jeremy’s heart, still beating. 

“They opened the second bowl. Inside were Jeremy’s eyes, still staring in 
horror. And they opened the third bowl. And saw Jeremy’s teeth, still 
chattering.” 

The three of us stood silent in the orange glow of candlelight. We stared at 
the dumbwaiter shelf. 

I shivered. The pots rattled against the wall. But I was no longer frightened 
by them. I raised my eyes to Seth. “Do you think that story is true?” 

Stephanie laughed. Nervous laughter. “It can’t be true,” she said. 

Seth’s face remained solemn. “Do you believe any of Otto’s stories?” he 
asked me quietly. 



“Well. Yes. No. Some.” I couldn’t decide. 

“Otto swears the story is true,” Seth insisted. “But of course, he may just be 
doing his job. His job is to make this house as scary as possible.” 

“Otto is a great storyteller,” Stephanie murmured. “But enough stories. I 
want to see a real ghost.” 

“Follow me,” Seth replied. His candle flame dipped low as he spun around. 
He led us back through the kitchen, into a long, narrow room at the back. 
“This is the old butler’s pantry,” he announced. “All of the food for the house 
was stored in here.” 

Stephanie and I stepped past him, raising our candles to see the room better. 
When I turned around, Seth was closing the pantry door behind us. 

Then I saw him turn the lock. 

“Hey—what are you doing?” I cried. 

“Why are you locking us in here?” Stephanie demanded. 



25 


I dropped my candle. It bounced on the hard floor, and the flame went out. The 
candle rolled under a shelf. 

When I glanced back up, Stephanie was storming toward Seth. “Seth—what 
are you doing?” she demanded angrily. “Unlock that door. This isn’t funny!” 

I gazed around the long, narrow room. Shelves from floor to ceiling on 
three walls. No windows. No other door to escape through. 

With a sharp cry, Stephanie grabbed for the door handle. But Seth moved 
quickly to block her way. 

“Hey—!” I cried, my heart pounding. I stepped up beside Stephanie. 
“What’s the big idea, Seth?” 

His silvery eyes glowed with excitement behind his candle flame. He stared 
back at us without speaking. The same cold stare I had seen on his face the night 
before. 

Stephanie and I took a step back, huddling close together. 

“Sorry, guys. But I played a little trick on you,” he said finally. 

“Excuse me?” Stephanie cried, more angry than frightened. 

“What kind of trick?” I asked. 

He pushed back his long, blond hair with his free hand. The flickering 
candle sent shadows dancing across his face. “My name isn’t Seth,” he said 
softly, so softly I could barely hear him. 

“But—but—” I stammered. 

“My name is Andrew,” he said. 

Stephanie and I both cried out in surprise. 

“But Andrew is the name of the ghost,” Stephanie protested. “The ghost 
who lost his head.” 

“I am the ghost,” he said softly. A dry laugh escaped his lips. More like a 
cough than a laugh. “I promised you a real ghost tonight. Well... here I am.” 

He blew out the candle. He appeared to vanish with the light. 

“But, Seth—” Stephanie started. 

“Andrew,” he corrected her. “My name is Andrew. My name has been 
Andrew for more than a hundred years.” 

“Let us out of here,” I pleaded. “We won’t tell anyone we saw you. We 



won’t—” 

“I can’t let you go,” he replied in a whisper. 

I remembered the story of the sea captain’s ghost. When Andrew stumbled 
into the sea captain’s room and saw the old ghost, the sea captain had said the 
same thing to him. “Now that you have seen me, I can never let you go. ” 

“You—you lost your head!” I blurted out. 

“So you can’t be Andrew!” Stephanie cried. “You have a head!” 

In the dim light from Stephanie’s candle, I could see the sneer spread over 
Andrew’s face. “No,” he said softly. “No, no, no. I do not have my head. This is 
one that I borrowed.” 

He raised both hands to the sides of his face. “Here. Let me show you,” he 

said. 

Then he pressed his hands against his cheeks and started to tug the head up 
from the black turtleneck. 



26 


“No! Stop!” Stephanie screeched. 

I shut my eyes. I didn’t really want to see him pull off his head. 

When I opened my eyes, Andrew had lowered his hands. 

I gazed once again around the narrow pantry. How could we escape? How 
could we get out of there? The ghost was blocking the only exit. 

“Why did you trick us?” Stephanie asked Andrew. “Why did you bring us 
here? Why did you lie to us?” 

Andrew sighed. “I told you. I borrowed this head.” He ran one hand 
through the hair, then down over the cheek, as if petting it. “I borrowed it. But I 
have to return it.” 

Stephanie and I stared back at him in silence, waiting for him to continue. 
Waiting for him to explain. 

“I saw you last night in the tour group,” he said finally, his eyes locked on 
me. “The others couldn’t see me. But I made myself visible to you.” 

“Why?” I asked in a trembling voice. 

“Because of your head,” he replied. “I liked your head.” 

“Huh?” A frightened gasp escaped my throat. 

He gripped the blond hair again. “I have to return this head, Duane,” he said 
calmly, coldly. “So I’m going to take yours.” 



27 


A frightened giggle escaped my throat. 

Why do people suddenly start laughing when they’re terrified? I guess it’s 
because if you don’t laugh, you’ll scream. Or explode or something. 

Trapped in that small, dark room with a hundred-year-old ghost that wanted 
my head, I felt like laughing, screaming, and exploding all at once! 

I stared hard at Andrew, squinting in the dim light. “You’re kidding, right?” 

He shook his head. His silvery eyes narrowed, hard and cold. “I need your 
head, Duane,” he said softly. He shrugged, as if apologizing. “I’ll pull it off 
quickly. It won’t hurt a bit.” 

“But—but I need it, too!” I sputtered. 

“I’m only going to borrow it,” Andrew said. He took a step toward us. “I’ll 
return it when I find my own head. Promise.” 

“You’re not cheering me up,” I replied. 

He took another step toward us. 

Stephanie and I backed up a step. 

He took a step. We backed up a step. 

We didn’t have much more room to back up. We were nearly to the back 
wall of pantry shelves. 

Suddenly Stephanie spoke up. “Andrew, we’ll find your head!” she offered. 
Her voice shook. 

I turned to her. I’d never seen her scared before. Knowing that Stephanie 
was scared made me even more scared! 

“For sure!” I croaked. “We’ll find your real head. We’ll search all night. We 
know this house really well. I’m sure we can find it if you give us a chance.” 

He stared back at us without replying. 

I wanted to get down on my knees and beg him to give us a chance. 

But I was afraid that if I got down on my knees, he’d pull off my head. 

“We’ll find it, Andrew. I know we will,” Stephanie insisted. 

He shook his head. His borrowed head. “There’s no way,” he murmured 
sadly. “How long have I been searching this house? For more than a hundred 
years. For more than a hundred years, I’ve searched every hallway, every room, 
every closet.” 



He took another step closer. His eyes were locked on my head. I knew he 
was studying it, thinking about how it would look on his shoulders. 

“In all these years, I haven’t found my head,” Andrew continued. “So what 
makes you think you can find it tonight?” 

“Well... uh...” Stephanie turned to me. 

“Uh... maybe we’ll get lucky!” I declared. 

Lame. How lame can you get? 

“Sorry,” Andrew murmured. “I need your head, Duane. We’re wasting 
time.” 

“Give us a chance!” I cried. 

He took a step closer. He was studying my hair now. Probably deciding if 
he should let it grow longer. 

“Andrew—please!” I begged. 

It was no use. His eyes were glassy now. He reached out both hands and 
took another step. 

Stephanie and I backed up. 

“Give me your head, Duane,” the ghost whispered. 

My back bumped a shelf on the wall behind me. 

“I need your head, Duane.” 

Stephanie and I huddled close and pressed our backs against the shelves. 

The ghost floated closer, hands outstretched. 

We pressed ourselves tighter against the shelves. My elbow bumped 
something hard. I heard some heavy objects fall from the shelf. 

“I need your head, Duane.” 

He clenched and unclenched his hands. Two more steps and he’d be close 
enough to grab me. 

“Your head. Give me your head.” 

I jammed my back against the shelves. 

I heard a creaking sound—and the shelf started to slide. 

I stumbled back. And realized that the whole wall was sliding. 

“Wh-what’s happening?” I stammered. 

The ghost reached for my head. “Gotcha!” 



28 


The ghost leaped at me, hands outstretched. 

I ducked—and stumbled back as the wall slid away. 

The wall made a loud grinding sound as it slowly spun around. 

Stephanie fell to the hard floor. 

I pulled her up quickly as Andrew made another wild grab for my head. 

“A tunnel!” I shouted over the grinding of the wall. 

As the wall spun away, it revealed a dark opening. Just big enough to 
squeeze through. 

I pulled Stephanie to the opening—and we squeezed inside. 

We found ourselves in a long, low passageway. Some kind of tunnel. 
Hidden behind the sliding wall. 

I’d always heard about old houses that had secret halls and hidden rooms 
built in them. I never thought I’d be so glad to find one! 

Stephanie and I started to run. Our footsteps echoed loudly on the concrete 

floor. 

We ran past bare, concrete walls, cracked and pitted by time. We had to 
stoop as we ran. The ceiling wasn’t as tall as we were! 

Stephanie slowed down to glance back. “Is he following us?” 

“Just keep running!” I cried. “This tunnel has got to lead out of here! Out of 
this house! It’s got to!” 

“I can’t see where it leads!” she replied breathlessly. 

The low tunnel stretched out in a straight line. I could see only darkness at 
the end. 

Did it stretch on forever? 

If it did, I’d keep running forever. I didn’t plan to stop running until I was 
safely outside. 

And once I was outside, I planned never to visit Hill House again. And I 
planned to stay away from ghosts and to keep my head on my shoulders where it 
belonged. 

Big plans. 

But plans don’t always work out. 



“Ohh!” Stephanie and I both cried out as we nearly crashed into a solid 
concrete wall. 

The tunnel ended. It just ended. 

“It—it doesn’t go anywhere !” I gasped. Breathing hard, I pounded both fists 
against the wall. “Who would build a secret tunnel that leads nowhere?” 

“Push on the wall,” Stephanie cried. “Let’s both push. Maybe this wall will 
slide open, too.” 

We turned and leaned our shoulders into the wall. And pushed. Groaning 
and gasping, I pushed with all my strength. 

I was still pushing when I heard the scraping footsteps moving toward us 
down the tunnel. 

Andrew! 

“Push!” Stephanie cried. 

We shoved ourselves against the wall. 

“Come on—slide! Slide!” I ordered it. 

I glanced back and saw Andrew, jogging slowly, steadily toward us. 

“We’re trapped,” Stephanie moaned. She collapsed against the wall with a 

sigh. 

Andrew came trotting closer. 

“Duane—I want your head!” he called, his voice echoing against the 
concrete walls. 

“Trapped,” Stephanie murmured. 

“Maybe not,” I choked out. I pointed into the dark corner. “Look. A ladder.” 

“Huh?” Stephanie leaped to her feet. She squinted at the ladder. A metal 
ladder, the rungs blanketed with dust. It led straight up the wall, through a small, 
square opening in the low ceiling. 

To where? 

“Give me your head!” the ghost called. 

I grabbed the sides of the metal ladder. I raised a foot onto the first rung and 
peered straight up. 

Into thick blackness. I couldn’t see a thing up there. 

“Duane—” Stephanie whispered. “We don’t know where it leads!” 

“It doesn’t matter,” I replied, starting to climb. “We don’t have a choice— 
do we?” 



29 


“Where are you going, Duane? I need your head!” 

I ignored the ghost’s shout and scrambled up the ladder. Stephanie kept 
bumping me from behind. 

My sneakers slipped on the thick dust. My hands slid over the cold, metal 
railings. 

“Duane—you can’t get away!” Andrew called from down below. 

Straight up. Straight up the ladder. Stephanie and I, breathing hard, 
climbing frantically, as fast as we could climb. 

Straight up. 

Until the ladder started to tilt. 

“Noooo!” I uttered a scream as it spilled forward. 

A crumbling, cracking noise drowned out my scream. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that the wall was breaking apart. 
Crumbling into powdery chunks. 

And we were falling. 

I heard Stephanie scream. 

I grabbed the metal railings with both hands—and held on tight. 

But the ladder was sailing down now. Tumbling over the cracking, 
crumbling old wall. 

“Oww!” I landed hard. Bounced once. Twice. 

My hands flew up and I was tossed off the ladder. I rolled onto my stomach, 
rolled in the chunks of dirt and concrete of the broken wall. 

Stephanie landed on her knees. She shook her head, dazed. 

Chunks of wall spilled all around us. Stephanie’s hair was covered in dust. 

I shielded my eyes and waited for the wall to stop crumbling down. 

When I opened my eyes, Andrew stood above me. His hands were balled 
into fists. His mouth hung open. And he was staring... staring past me. 

I struggled to my feet. Turned to see what he was staring at. 

“A hidden room!” Stephanie cried, moving beside me. “A room behind the 
old wall.” 

Slipping over the chunks of broken concrete, I took a few steps closer to the 



room. 

And saw what Andrew was staring at. 

A head. 

A boy’s head lying on the floor of the hidden room. 

“I don’t believe it!” Stephanie gasped. “We found it! We actually found it!” 

I swallowed hard. And took a careful step forward. 

The head was pale, shimmering white, even in the dim light. 

I could see clearly that it was a boy’s head. But the long, wavy hair had 
turned to white. The round eyes glowed green, sparkling like emeralds in the 
shimmering, pale face. 

“The ghost head,” I murmured. 

I turned back to Andrew. “Your head—we found it for you.” 

I expected to see a smile on his face. I expected him to shout or jump for 

joy- 

For a hundred years, he had waited for this happy moment. And now his 
long search was over. 

But to my shock, Andrew’s face was twisted in horror. 

He wasn’t even looking at his long lost head. He stared above it. And as he 
stared, his entire body began to quiver. Frightened cries escaped his lips. 
“Andrew—what is your problem?” I demanded. 

But I don’t think he even heard me. 

He stared up at the ceiling, trembling. Hands balled into tight fists at his 
sides. Then, slowly, he raised one hand and pointed. “Nooooo,” he moaned. 
“Ohhhh, nooooooo.” 

I turned to see what had frightened him. 

Turned in time to see a filmy figure float down from the ceiling. 

At first I thought it was a thin window curtain, falling from above. 

But as it curled slowly, softly to the floor, I saw that it had arms. And legs. 

I could see right through it! 

The air around us suddenly grew cold. 

“It—it’s a ghost\” Stephanie cried, grabbing my arm. 



30 


The ghost landed softly, silently on the floor of the hidden room, raising its arms 
like bird wings. 

Stephanie and I both gasped as it raised its arms and stood upright. 

It was short and very thin. It wore baggy, old-fashioned-looking pants and a 
long-sleeved shirt with a high collar. 

A high collar. 

A collar. 

And no head. 

The ghost had no head! 

I felt a burst of cold air as it bent down, shimmering, bending, as if made of 
soft gauze. It reached down. Lifted the head off the floor. 

Lifted the head to the stiff, tall collar. 

Gently pressed the head into place. 

And as the head touched the ghostly, gauzy neck, the green eyes flashed. 

The cheeks twitched. The pale white eyebrows arched up and down. 

And then the mouth moved. 

The ghost turned to us—to Stephanie and me. And the lips moved in a 
silent “Thank you.” 

And then the arms rose into the air. Its green eyes still on us, the ghost 
floated up into the air. Lighter than air, it floated silently up. 

I watched in amazement, my heart pounding, until the ghostly figure 
vanished in the darkness. 

And then Stephanie and I both turned to Andrew at the same time. We had 
just seen the headless ghost. We had just seen Andrew, the boy from a hundred 
years ago. We had just watched him collect his head. 

But the boy who claimed to be Andrew was still there. He stood behind us, 
still trembling, his eyes wide, staring into the hidden room, making soft 
swallowing sounds. 

I narrowed my eyes at him. “If you aren’t Andrew,” I started—“if you 
aren’t the headless ghost—then who are you?” 



31 


Stephanie turned on the boy, too. “Yeah. Who are you?” she asked angrily. 

“If you’re not the headless ghost, why did you chase us?” I demanded. 

“Well. I... uh...” The boy raised both hands as if surrendering. Then he 
started to back away. 

He had only gone three or four steps when we heard footsteps coming down 
the long tunnel. 

I turned to Stephanie. Another ghost? 

“Who’s in here?” a deep voice boomed. 

I saw a circle of light from a flashlight sweeping over the tunnel floor. 

“Who is here?” the voice repeated. 

I recognized the deep voice. Otto! 

“Uh... back here,” the boy called softly. 

“Seth—is that you?” The circle of light floated closer. Otto appeared behind 
it, squinting at us. “What’s going on? What are you doing back here? This part 
of the house is dangerous. It’s all falling apart.” 

“Well... we were exploring,” Seth started. “And we got lost. It really wasn’t 
our fault.” 

Otto gazed at Seth sternly. Then his face filled with surprise as his flashlight 
washed over Stephanie and me. “You two! How did you get in? What are you 
doing here?” 

“He... well... he let us in,” I answered. I pointed at Seth. 

Otto turned back to Seth and shook his head unhappily. “More of your 
tricks? Were you scaring these kids?” 

“Not really, Uncle Otto,” Seth replied, keeping his eyes on the ground. 

Uncle Otto? So Seth was Otto’s nephew! 

No wonder he knew so much about Hill House. 

“Tell the truth, Seth,” Otto insisted. “Were you pretending to be a ghost 
again? Haven’t you played that trick on enough kids? Haven’t you scared 
enough kids to death?” 

Seth stood silent. 

Otto rubbed a hand back over his smooth, bald head. Then he let out a 



weary sigh. “We have a business to run here,” he told Seth. “Do you want to 
scare my customers away? Do you want to get the whole neighborhood upset?” 

Seth lowered his head and still didn’t reply. 

I could see that he was in major trouble. So I decided to jump in. “It’s okay, 
Otto,” I said. “He didn’t scare us.” 

“That’s right,” Stephanie chimed in. “We didn’t believe he was a ghost. Did 
we, Duane?” 

“Of course not,” I replied. “He didn’t fool us for a minute.” 

“Especially when we saw the real ghost,” Stephanie added. 

Otto turned to her, studying her in the light from the flashlight. “The what?” 

“The real ghost!” Stephanie insisted. 

“We saw the real ghost, Uncle Otto!” Seth exclaimed. “It was awesomel” 

Otto rolled his eyes. “Save the jokes, Seth. It’s too late at night. You’re just 
trying to get out of trouble.” 

“No. Really!” I insisted. 

“Really!” Seth and Stephanie cried. 

“We saw the headless ghost, Uncle Otto. You’ve got to believe us!” Seth 
pleaded. 

“Sure, sure,” Otto muttered. He turned and motioned with his flashlight. 
“Come on. Everyone out.” 



32 


After our scary night at Hill House, Stephanie and I gave up haunting the 
neighborhood. 

It just wasn’t that exciting anymore. Especially since we’d seen a real 
ghost. 

We stopped sneaking out at night. We stopped peeking into kids’ windows 
in scary masks. We stopped hiding behind bushes and howling like werewolves 
in the middle of the night. 

We gave up all the scary stuff. And we never even talked about ghosts. 

Stephanie and I found other things to be interested in. I tried out for the 
basketball team at school, and I became a starting forward. 

Stephanie joined the Theater Arts Club. This spring, she’s going to be 
Dorothy in The Wizard of Oz. Either Dorothy or a Munchkin. 

We had a good winter. Lots of snow. Lots of unscary fun. 

Then late one evening we were heading home from a birthday party. It was 
the first warm night of spring. Tulips were blooming in some of the front yards 
we passed. The air smelled fresh and sweet. 

I stopped in front of Hill House and gazed up at the old mansion. Stephanie 
stopped beside me. She read my mind. “You want to go in, don’t you, Duane?” 

I nodded. “How about taking the tour? We haven’t been in there since...” 
My voice trailed off. 

“Hey, why not?” Stephanie replied. 

We climbed the steep hill. Tall weeds brushed the legs of my jeans as I 
made my way to the front door. The huge old house stood as dark and as creepy 
as ever. 

As Stephanie and I climbed onto the front stoop, the door creaked open. As 
it always had. 

We stepped into the small front entryway. A few seconds later, Otto 
bounced into view. Dressed all in black. A friendly smile on his round, bald 
head. 

“You two!” he exclaimed happily. “Welcome back.” He called into the front 
room. “Edna, come see who is here.” 

Edna came tottering into the room. “Oh, my!” she cried, pressing a hand 



against her pale, wrinkled face. “We were wondering if we would see you two 
again.” 

I gazed into the front room. No other customers. 

“Could you take us on the tour?” I asked Otto. 

He smiled his toothy smile. “Of course. Wait. I’ll get my lantern.” 

Otto took us around Hill House. He gave us the complete tour. 

It was great to see the house again. But it no longer held any secrets for 
Stephanie and me. 

After the tour, we thanked Otto and said good night. 

We were halfway down the hill when a police car pulled up to the curb. A 
dark-uniformed officer stuck his head out of the passenger window. “What were 
you kids doing up there?” he called. 

Stephanie and I made our way down to the police car. The two officers eyed 
us suspiciously. 

“We just took the tour,” I explained, pointing up to Hill House. 

“Tour? What tour?” the officer demanded gruffly. 

“You know. The haunted house tour,” Stephanie replied impatiently. 

The police officer stuck his head farther out the window. He had blue eyes, 
and freckles all over his face. “What were you really doing up there?” he asked 
softly. 

“We told you,” I said shrilly. “Taking the tour. That’s all.” 

Behind the wheel, the other policeman chuckled. “Maybe a ghost gave 
them the tour,” he told his partner. 

“There are no tours,” the freckle-faced officer said, frowning. “There 
haven’t been any tours in that house for months.” 

Stephanie and I both uttered cries of surprise. 

“The house is empty,” the police officer continued. “Shut down. There 
hasn’t been anyone in there all winter. Hill House went out of business three 
months ago.” 

“Huh?” Stephanie and I exchanged startled glances. Then we both turned to 
gaze up at the house. 

The gray stone turrets rose up into the purple-black sky. Nothing but 
darkness all around. 

And then I saw a trail of soft light across the front window. Lantern light. 
Orange and soft as smoke. 

In the soft light, I saw Otto and Edna. They floated in front of the window. I 



could see right through them, as if they were made of gauze. 

They’re ghosts, too, I realized, staring into the soft, smoky light. 
I blinked. And the light faded out. 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats







THE ABOMINABLE 
SNOWMAN OF PASADENA 

Goosebumps - 38 
R.L. Stine 





1 


All my life, I’ve wanted to see snow. 

My name is Jordan Blake. My life has been twelve years of sun, sand, and 
chlorine. I’d never felt cold, ever —unless you count air-conditioned 
supermarkets. And I don’t. It doesn’t snow in the supermarket. 

I’d never felt cold, that is, until the adventure. 

Some people think I’m a lucky guy to live in Pasadena, California, where 
it’s always sunny and warm. It’s okay, I guess. But if you’ve never seen snow, it 
seems like something out of a science-fiction movie. 

Fluffy white frozen water that falls out of the sky? It piles up on the ground, 
and you can make forts and snowmen and snowballs out of it? You have to admit 
it sounds weird. 

One day, my wish came true. I got to see snow at last. And it turned out to 
be weirder than I thought. 

Way weirder. 

“Pay attention, kids. This is going to be cool.” 

Dad’s face glowed under the red darkroom light. My sister, Nicole, and I 
watched him developing film. With a pair of tongs, he dipped a sheet of special 
paper in a chemical bath. 

I’ve watched Dad develop film all my life. He’s a professional 
photographer. But I’d never seen him so excited about photos before—and that’s 
saying a lot. 

Dad takes nature photos. Well, actually, he takes pictures of everything! 

He never stops taking pictures. My mom says that once when I was a baby I 
saw Dad and screamed. I didn’t recognize him without a camera in front of his 
face. I used to think he had a zoom lens for a nose! 

Our house is filled with embarrassing pictures of me—me as a baby in 
baggy diapers, me with food all over my face, me crying after scraping my knee, 
me hitting my sister... 

Anyway, Dad had just returned from a trip to the Grand Tetons. That’s a 
mountain range in Wyoming—part of the Rocky Mountains. He was all worked 
up about the pictures he took there. 

“I wish you kids had seen those bears,” Dad said. “A whole family of them. 



The cubs reminded me of you two—always teasing each other.” 

Teasing. Ha. Dad thinks Nicole and I tease each other. That’s putting it 
mildly. Nicole—Miss Know-it-all—drives me crazy. 

Sometimes I wish she’d never been born. I’ve made it my mission to make 
her feel the same way. I mean, I try to make her wish she’d never been born. 

“You should have taken us with you to the Grand Tetons, Dad,” I 
complained. 

“It’s very cold in Wyoming this time of year,” Nicole said. 

“How do you know, Brainiac?” I jabbed her in the ribs. “You’ve never been 
to Wyoming.” 

“I read up on it while Dad was away,” she explained. Of course. “There’s a 
picture book about it in the library if you want to know more, Jordan. It’s just 
right for you—it’s for first graders.” 

I couldn’t think of anything to say back. That’s my problem. I’m too slow 
with the comebacks. So I jabbed her again. 

“Hey, hey,” Dad murmured. “No jabbing. I’m working here.” 

Dumb Nicole. Not that she’s dumb—she’s really smart. But in a dumb way 
—that’s my opinion. She’s so smart she skipped fifth grade—and landed in my 
class. She’s a year younger than I am and she’s in my class —and she gets 
straight A’s. 

Dad’s pictures floated in the chemical bath, slowly becoming clear. “Did it 
snow in the mountains while you were there, Dad?” I asked. 

“Sure, it snowed,” Dad replied. He was concentrating on his work. 

“Did you go skiing?” I asked. 

Dad shook his head. “I was too busy working.” 

“How about ice-skating?” Nicole asked. 

Nicole acts as if she knows everything. But like me, she’d never seen snow, 
either. We’d never left Southern California—and you could tell by looking at us. 

We’re both tan all year round. Nicole’s hair is greenish-blond from the 
chlorine in the community pool, and mine is brown with blond streaks. We’re on 
the school swim team. 

“I’ll bet it’s snowing at Mom’s house right now,” Nicole said. 

“Could be,” Dad replied. 

Mom and Dad are divorced. Mom just moved to Pennsylvania. We’re going 
to spend the summer with her. But we stayed in California with Dad to finish out 
the school year. 



Mom sent us some pictures of her new house. It was covered with snow. I 
stared at the pictures, trying to imagine the cold. 

“I wish we stayed at Mom’s house while you were gone,” I said. 

“Jordan, we’ve been over this.” Dad sounded a little impatient. “You can 
visit your mother when she’s settled. She hasn’t even bought furniture yet. 
Where would you sleep?” 

“I’d rather sleep on a bare floor than listen to Mrs. Witchens snoring on the 
couch,” I grumbled. 

Mrs. Witchens stayed with Nicole and me while Dad was away. She was a 
nightmare. Every morning we had to clean our rooms—she actually inspected 
them for dust. Every single night she served us liver, brussels sprouts, and fish- 
head soup with a tall glass of soy milk. 

“Her name’s not Witchens ,” Nicole corrected me. “It’s Hitchens .” 

“I know that, Sicole,” I retorted. 

Under the red light in the darkroom, the photos grew clearer. I heard 
excitement in Dad’s voice. 

“If these shots come out well, I can publish them in a book,” he said. “I will 
call it The Brown Bears of Wyoming, by Garrison Blake. Yes, that has a nice ring 
to it.” 

He stopped to pull a photo out of the liquid. It dripped as he stared at it. 

“That’s weird,” he murmured. 

“What’s weird?” Nicole asked. 

He set the picture down without saying anything. Nicole and I glanced at it. 

“Dad—” Nicole said. “I hate to break it to you, but that looks like a teddy 
bear.” 

It was a picture of a teddy bear. A stuffed brown toy bear with a lopsided 
grin, sitting in the grass. Not the kind of creature you usually find in the Grand 
Tetons. 

“There must be some mistake,” Dad said. “Wait until the rest of the photos 
develop. You’ll see. They’re amazing.” 

He pulled up another picture. He studied it. “Huh?” 

I grabbed the photo. Another teddy bear. 

Dad picked up a third picture. Then a fourth. He moved faster and faster. 

“More teddy bears!” he cried. He was frantic. Even in the darkroom, I could 
see the panic on his face. 

“What’s going on?” he shouted. “Where are the photos I took?” 



2 


“Dad—” Nicole began. “Are you sure those bears you saw were real?” 

“Of course I’m sure!” Dad boomed at her. “I know the difference between a 
brown bear and a teddy bear!” 

He began to pace back and forth across the darkroom floor. “Did I lose the 
film somehow?” he murmured, clutching his head with one hand. “Could 
someone have switched it?” 

“The weird part is that you were taking pictures of bears,” Nicole noted. 
“And you ended up with teddy bears. That’s just so strange.” 

Dad furiously tapped his hands on the developing table. He muttered to 
himself. He was starting to lose it. 

“Did I lose the film on the plane somehow? Switch carry-on bags with 
someone else, maybe?” 

I turned my back to Dad, my shoulders shaking. 

“Jordan? What’s the matter?” Dad grabbed my shoulders. “Are you all 
right?” 

He spun me around. “Jordan!” Dad cried. “You’re—laughing!” 

Nicole crossed her arms. She narrowed her eyes at me. “What did you do to 
Dad’s pictures?” 

Dad frowned. His voice was calmer now. “All right, Jordan. What’s the big 
joke?” 

I gasped for breath, trying to stop laughing. “Don’t worry, Dad. Your 
pictures are okay.” 

He shoved one of the teddy bear shots in my face. “Okay! You call this 
okay?!” 

“I borrowed your camera before you left for Wyoming,” I explained. “I 
took a bunch of shots of my old teddy bear, for a joke. The rest of the film 
should have your real bears on it.” 

I can’t resist a good practical joke. 

Nicole said, “I had nothing to do with it, Dad. I swear.” 

Little Miss Goody-Goody. 

Dad shook his head. “A joke?” He turned back to the photos and developed 
a few more. The next shot showed a real bear cub fishing in a stream. Dad 



laughed. 

“You know,” he said, putting the picture of the real bear next to one of the 
teddy bear shots, “they don’t look as different as you’d think.” 

I knew Dad wouldn’t stay angry. He never does. That’s one reason I like to 
play tricks on him. He likes to play practical jokes, too. 

“Did I ever tell you about the trick I pulled on Joe Morrison?” he asked. Joe 
Morrison is a photographer friend of Dad’s. 

“Joe had just gotten back from Africa, where he had spent months 
photographing gorillas. He was all excited about these fabulous gorilla shots 
he’d taken. I saw the pictures, and they were really spectacular. 

“Joe had a big meeting set up with the editor of a nature magazine. He was 
going to go in and show the editor these photos. He was sure the magazine 
would snap them up in a second. 

“Joe didn’t know that the editor and I had gone to college together. So I 
called her up and asked her to help me play a little joke on Joe. 

“When Joe went to see her, he showed her the pictures. She looked at them 
without saying a word. 

“Finally he couldn’t stand the suspense any longer. He blurted out, ‘Well? 
Do you like them or not?’ He’s an impatient guy, Joe.” 

“What did she say?” I asked. 

“She frowned and said, ‘You’re a good photographer, Mr. Morrison. But 
I’m afraid you’ve been tricked. The creatures you photographed aren’t gorillas at 
all.’ 

“Joe’s jaw practically fell off his face. He said, ‘What do you mean, they’re 
not gorillas?’ 

“She said, with a perfectly straight face, ‘They’re people in gorilla suits. 
Can’t you tell the difference between a real gorilla and a man in a gorilla suit, 
Mr. Morrison?”’ 

I chuckled. Nicole asked, “Then what happened?” 

“Joe practically had a nervous breakdown. He snatched up the photos and 
stared at them. He shouted, ‘I don’t get it! How could that happen? I spent six 
months of my life studying people in gorilla suits?’ 

“Finally the editor burst out laughing and told him it was a joke. She loved 
the photos and wanted to publish them. Joe wouldn’t believe her at first—it took 
her fifteen minutes to get him to calm down.” 

Dad and I both laughed. 



“I think that’s really mean, Dad,” Nicole scolded. 

I get my joker streak from Dad. Nicole takes after Mom. She’s more 
practical. 

“Joe thought it was funny once he got over the shock,” Dad assured her. 
“He’s played his share of tricks on me, believe me.” 

Dad swished another photo through the chemical bath. Then he held it up 
with his tongs. It showed two bear cubs wrestling. He smiled with satisfaction. 

“This roll came out great,” he said. “But I’ve got a lot more work to do in 
here, kids. Go on outside for a while, okay?” 

He turned the red light off and flipped on the normal light. Nicole opened 
the door. 

“Don’t get all messed up and dirty, though,” Dad added. “We’re all going 
out to dinner tonight. I want to celebrate my luck with the brown bears.” 

“We’ll be careful,” Nicole promised. 

“Speak for yourself,” I said. 

“I mean it, Jordan,” Dad warned. 

“Just kidding, Dad.” 

A wave of heat blasted us when we opened the darkroom door. Nicole and I 
stepped out into the backyard, blinking in the afternoon sun. It always takes my 
eyes a long time to adjust after I’ve been in the darkroom. 

“What do you want to do?” Nicole asked. 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “It’s so hot. It’s too hot to do much of anything.” 

Nicole closed her eyes and zoned out for a minute. 

“Nicole?” I nudged her. “Nicole? What are you doing?” 

“I’m thinking about the snow in Dad’s pictures of the Grand Tetons. I 
thought it would make me feel cooler.” 

She stood perfectly still with her eyes closed. A bead of sweat dripped 
down her forehead. 

“Well?” I asked. “Is it working?” 

She opened her eyes and shook her head. “No. How can I imagine snow if 
I’ve never felt it?” 

“Good point.” I sighed and gazed around me. 

We live in a subdivision in the suburbs of Pasadena. There are only three 
different kinds of houses in our neighborhood. The same three house styles are 
repeated for miles around. 

It’s so boring to look at, it makes me feel even hotter, somehow. Each block 



has a couple of palm trees, not enough to give much shade. There’s a vacant lot 
across the street from us, next door to the Millers’. The most exciting feature of 
our backyard—maybe the whole block—is Dad’s disgusting compost heap. 

I squinted and stared some more. Everything appeared bleached in the 
sunlight. Even the grass looked almost white. 

“I’m so bored I could scream,” I complained. 

“Let’s ride our bikes,” Nicole suggested. “Maybe the breeze will cool us 

off.” 

“Maybe Lauren will want to go with us,” I added. 

Lauren Sax lives next door to us. She’s in our class at school. I see her so 
often, she might as well be my sister. 

We rolled out our bikes from the garage and walked them over to Lauren’s. 
We left our bikes at the side of her house. Then we went around back. 

We found Lauren sitting on a towel under a palm tree in her backyard. 
Nicole sat beside Lauren on the towel. I leaned against the tree. 

“It’s so hot!” Lauren whined. She tugged on her yellow shorts. She’s tall 
and muscular, with long brown hair and bangs. 

She has a nasal voice, good for complaining. “This is supposed to be winter. 
It’s winter everywhere else. A normal winter has snow and ice and sleet and 
freezing rain and cold, cold air. What do we get? Nothing but sun! Why do we 
have to be so hot?” 

Suddenly I felt a pain in my back. 

“Ow!” I jerked forward. Something stabbed me. Something stinging sharp 
—and ice cold! My face twisted in pain. 

“Jordan!” Nicole gasped. “What’s wrong? What’s wrong?” 



3 


I clutched the icy spot on my back. “What is it?” I cried. “It’s so cold!” 

Nicole jumped to her feet and examined my back. “Jordan, you’ve been 
stabbed!” she announced. “With a purple Popsicle!” 

As I turned around I heard mean laughter. The Miller twins jumped out 
from behind the tree. 

I should’ve known. The Miller twins—Kyle and Kara. The twin pug noses, 
the beady little eyes, the matching short-cropped red hair. Yuck. They carried 
twin Super Soakers, red ones. 

The Miller twins love practical jokes. They’re worse than I am. And much 
meaner. 

Everyone in the neighborhood is afraid of them. They pounce on little kids 
waiting at the bus stop and rob them of their lunch money. Once they blew up 
the Saxes’ mailbox with a stink bomb. Last year, Kyle sucker-punched me 
during a basketball game. He thought it was funny to watch me turn purple. 

The Millers like to pick on me more than anyone, for some reason. 

Kara is just as scary as her brother Kyle. I hate to admit it, but Kara can 
take me out with one punch. I know that for a fact. She gave me a black eye last 
summer. 

“‘Oh, it’s so hot. It’s so hot!”’ Kara sneered, making fun of Lauren’s whiny 
voice. 

Kyle flipped his Super Soaker from one hand to the other behind his back. 
He tried to make it look like a really complicated move. 

“Arnold taught me how to do that,” he bragged. 

Kyle wanted me to think he was talking about Arnold Schwarzenegger. He 
claims he knows Arnold. I have my doubts. 

Nicole tugged on the back of my shirt. “Dad’s going to kill you, Jordan,” 
she said. 

“Why?” 

I craned my neck backwards. The back of my white polo shirt was stained 
dark purple. 

“Oh, great,” I muttered. 

“Dad said not to get messed up,” Nicole reminded me. As if I needed to be 



reminded. 

“Don’t worry, Jordan,” Kyle said. “We’ll clean it off for you.” 

“Uh—that’s okay,” I murmured, backing away. Whatever Kyle meant by 
“clean it off”, I knew I wouldn’t like it. 

I was right. 

He and Kara raised their Super Soakers and squirted me, Nicole, and 
Lauren. 

“Stop it!” Lauren screamed. “You’re getting us all wet!” 

Kyle and Kara laughed their maniac laughs. “You said you were hot!” 

They drenched us. My shirt was so wet I could wring a glass of water out of 
it. I glared at them. 

Kyle shrugged. “We were only trying to help.” 

Yeah. Sure they were. 

I should’ve been grateful that all they did was soak us. We got off easy. 

I can’t stand the Miller twins. Neither can Nicole and Lauren. They think 
they’re so hot. Just because they’re thirteen and they have a swimming pool in 
their backyard. 

Their father works at a movie studio. They’re always bragging about how 
they go to sneak previews and hang out with movie stars. 

I haven’t seen a movie star show up at their house yet. Not once. 

“Aw, you’re all wet,” Kara said, sneering. “Why don’t you take a bike ride 
to dry off?” 

Nicole and I exchanged glances. When we’re alone, we don’t get along so 
well. But when the Millers are around, we have to stick together. 

We knew the Millers too well. They wouldn’t mention our bikes without a 
reason. A bad reason. 

“What did you do to our bikes?” Nicole demanded. 

The Millers faked wide-eyed innocence. “Who—us? We didn’t do anything 
to your precious bikes. Go see for yourself.” 

Nicole and I glanced around the side of Lauren’s house, where we’d left our 
bikes. 

“They look okay from here,” Nicole whispered. 

“There’s something wrong with them,” I said. “They look weird.” 

We approached our bikes. They looked weird all right. The handlebars had 
been unscrewed and twisted backwards. 

“Hope you have reverse gear,” Kyle snickered. 



Normally, I’m not the kind of guy who goes around getting into fights. But 
something in me snapped. This time Kyle and Kara had gone too far. 

I jumped on Kyle. We tumbled to the ground. We wrestled. I tried to pin 
him with my knee, but he pushed me over onto my side. 

“Stop it!” Nicole screamed. “Stop it!” 

Kyle rolled me onto my back. “You thought you could jump me, Jordan? 
You’re too big a wimp!” 

I kicked him. He pinned my shoulder to the ground with one knee. 

Nicole shouted hysterically, “Jordan! Look out!” 

I glanced up. Kara stood over me, clutching a rock the size of her head. A 
mean grin spread across her face. 

“Drop it, Kara!” Kyle ordered. 

I tried to roll out of the way, but I couldn’t move. Kyle had me pinned. 

Kara heaved the rock. Then she let it drop—right onto my head. 



4 


I squeezed my eyes shut. 

The rock landed on my forehead—and bounced off. 

I opened my eyes. Kara laughed like a hyena. She picked up the rock and 
dropped it on my face again. It bounced off, just like the first time. 

Lauren grabbed it. “It’s made of sponge,” she announced. She squeezed it 
in her hand. “It’s a fake.” 

Kyle laughed. “It’s a movie prop, moron.” 

“You should’ve seen your face,” Kara added. “What a chicken!” 

I kicked Kyle off me and pounced on him again. This time I was so mad I 
had the strength of two Kyles. I wrestled him to the ground. I had him pinned! 

“What’s going on, guys?” 

Uh-oh. Dad. 

I leaped to my feet. “Hi, Dad. We were just kidding around.” 

Kyle sat up, rubbing his elbow. 

Dad didn’t even seem to notice that we’d been fighting. He was excited 
about something. 

“Listen, kids—I have great news. Wilderness magazine just called. They 
want to fly me to Alaska!” 

“Great, Dad,” I said sarcastically. “You get to go on another exciting trip 
while we stay here and die of boredom.” 

“And heat,” Nicole added. 

Dad laughed. “I called Mrs. Hitchens to see if she could come stay with you 
again—” he began. 

“Not Mrs. Hitchens again!” I cried. “Dad, she’s horrible! I can’t stand her 
cooking. I’ll starve to death if she stays with us!” 

“You will not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “Even if you ate only bread and water, 
you could survive a week easily.” 

“Nicole? Jordan? Hello?” Dad said, knocking lightly on our heads. “Will 
you please listen to me? I haven’t finished yet.” 

“Sorry, Dad.” 

“Anyway, Mrs. Hitchens can’t come. So, I guess you two will just have to 



come along with me.” 

“To Alaska?” I cried. I was too excited to believe it. 

“Hurray!” Nicole yelled. We jumped up and down. 

“You guys are so lucky!” Lauren said. Kara and Kyle stood by. Saying 
nothing. 

“We’re going to Alaska!” I shouted. “We’ll get to see snow! Tons of snow! 
Alaskan snow!” 

I was thrilled. And Dad hadn’t even told us the interesting part yet. 

“It’s a strange project,” Dad continued. “They want me to track down some 
kind of snow creature—an Abominable Snowman.” 

“Wow!” I gasped. 

Kyle and Kara snorted. 

Nicole shook her head. “An Abominable Snowman? Has anybody really 
seen him?” 

Dad nodded. “Some kind of snow creature has been spotted. Who knows 
what it really is. Whatever it is, the magazine wants me to shoot photos of it. I’m 
sure it’s a wild-goose chase. There’s no such thing as an Abominable 
Snowman.” 

“So why are you going?” Nicole asked. 

I poked her in the ribs. “Who cares? We’re going to Alaska!” 

“The magazine is paying a big fee,” Dad explained. “And even if we don’t 
find a snow creature, I’ll still get some great shots of the tundra.” 

Lauren asked, “What’s a tundra?” 

Dad began to reply, but Nicole stepped forward. “I’ll handle this one, Dad,” 
she interrupted. I felt like screaming. She does that in school all the time, too. 

“A tundra is a huge frozen plain. It exists in the Arctic, in Alaska, and in 
Russia. The word tundra comes from the Russian, meaning—” 

I clapped my hand over her big mouth. “Any other questions, Lauren?” 

Lauren shook her head. “That’s all I needed to know.” 

“Egghead here goes on forever if you don’t stop her.” I let go of Nicole’s 
mouth. She stuck her tongue out at me. 

“This trip is going to be great,” I cried happily. “We’ll see ice and snow for 
real! We’re going hunting for an Abominable Snowman! Awesome!” 

An hour earlier we’d been bored out of our minds. Now suddenly 
everything had changed. 

Dad smiled. “I’ve got to go back to the darkroom for a while. Don’t forget 



—we’re going out to dinner tonight.” He wandered back across the lawn and 
into the house. 

As soon as Dad was gone, Kara started laughing. “An Abominable 
Snowman! What a joke!” 

Typical Kara—she was too chicken to say a word while Dad was around. 

Kyle made fun of me, jumping up and down and squealing, “Alaska! 
Alaska! I’ll get to see snow!” 

“You both will probably turn blue and freeze,” Kara sneered. 

“We’ll be fine,” Nicole said. “It’s your turn to freeze!” She grabbed Kara’s 
Super Soaker and sent a spray of water into Kara’s face. 

“Stop it!” Kyle shouted. He dove at Nicole. Nicole laughed and ran away, 
turning around to soak them every few feet. 

“Give that back!” Kara yelled. 

The Millers chased Nicole. Kyle raised his Super Soaker and let Nicole 
have it in the back. 

Lauren and I ran after them. Nicole raced into our backyard. She turned 
around and squirted the Millers again. 

“You can’t catch me!” she cried, shooting and walking backward. 

She was backing right into Dad’s compost heap. 

Should I warn her? I thought. 

No way. 

“Take that!” she shouted, blasting the Millers with water. 

Then she slipped and fell backward—into the compost heap. 

“Yuck,” Lauren groaned. 

Nicole stood up slowly. Greenish-brown slime oozed in her hair and 
dripped down her back, her arms, and her legs. “Ugh!” she screamed, frantically 
wiping the glop off her hands. “Uggghhh!” 

We all stood and stared. She looked like some kind of Abominable 
Snowman herself. All covered in glop. 

We were still staring when Dad popped his head out the back door. “You 
kids ready to go to dinner?” he called. 



5 


“There it is!” Dad shouted over the roar of the small plane’s engine. “Iknek. 
That’s the airstrip.” 

I stared out the window at the tiny brown patch where we’d be landing. For 
the last half hour I’d seen nothing but miles and miles of snow. Wow. It was so 
white ! 

It was cool the way the snow sparkled in the sunlight. It made me think of 
Christmas carols. I couldn’t get “Winter Wonderland” out of my head—and it 
was driving me crazy! 

I watched for giant footprints as we flew. How big would an Abominable 
Snowman’s footsteps be? Big enough to see from a low-flying plane? 

“I hope there’s a restaurant down there,” Nicole said. “I’m starving.” 

Dad patted her shoulder. “We’ll have a big, hot meal before we set out. But 
after that, it’s camping food.” 

“How are we going to build a fire in the snow?” Nicole asked. 

“We’ll be staying in a little cabin,” Dad replied. “It’s a long way out in the 
tundra, but it’s better than sleeping in tents. There should be a stove in the cabin. 
I hope so, anyway.” 

“Can we build an igloo and sleep in that?” I asked. “Or dig out an ice 
cave?” 

“You can’t build an igloo just like that, Jordan,” Nicole snapped. “It’s not 
like a snow fort or something. Right, Dad?” 

Dad took the lens cap off his camera and started taking pictures through the 
plane window. “Sure,” he said absently. “Uh-huh.” 

Nicole turned to the window, too. I mimicked her behind her back. You 
can’t build an igloo just like that, I mouthed. She acts like she’s my teacher or 
something. It’s really embarrassing when she does it in front of everybody at 
school. 

“How are we going to find the cabin?” Nicole asked. “Everything looks the 
same in all this snow.” 

Dad turned and snapped a picture of her. “Did you say something, Nicole?” 

“I was wondering how we’re going to find the cabin,” Nicole repeated. “Do 
you know how to use a compass, Dad?” 



“A compass? No, but that doesn’t matter. A man named Arthur Maxwell is 
supposed to meet us at the airport. He’ll be our guide through the tundra.” 

“I know Arthur,” the pilot shouted back to us. “He’s an old musher from 
way back. Knows everything about dogs and sleds. He knows this part of Alaska 
better than anybody, I guess.” 

“Maybe he’s seen the Abominable Snowman,” I suggested. 

“How do you know there is such a thing?” Nicole taunted. “We haven’t 
seen any sign of him yet.” 

“Nicole, people have seen him with their own eyes,” I replied. “And if 
there’s no such thing, what are we doing here?” 

“Some people say they’ve seen him,” Nicole said. “Or maybe they think 
they’ve seen one. I won’t believe it until I get more facts.” 

The plane circled the small town. I played with the zipper on my new 
Arctic jacket. I’d been hungry a few minutes earlier, but now I was too excited to 
think about food. 

There really is an Abominable Snowman down there, I thought. I know 
there is. I felt a chill, despite a blast of hot air from the plane’s heater. 

What if we find him? What will happen then? 

What will happen if the Abominable Snowman doesn’t like to be 
photographed? 

The plane flew very low now, getting ready to land. We touched down with 
a bump and taxied along the runway. The plane lurched as the pilot put on the 
brakes. 

Something big loomed at the end of the runway. Something huge, white, 
and monstrous. 

“Dad, look!” I cried. “I see him! The Abominable Snowman!” 



6 


The plane squealed to a stop right in front of the big monster. 

Dad, Nicole, and the pilot all laughed—at me. 

I hate that. But I couldn’t blame them. The big white monster was a polar 

bear. 

A statue of a polar bear. 

“The polar bear is the symbol of the town,” the pilot explained. 

“Oh,” I murmured. I knew I was blushing. I turned away. 

“Jordan knew that,” Dad said. “He was just playing one of his practical 
jokes.” 

“Uh—yeah.” I went along with it. “I knew it was a statue all along.” 

“You did not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “You were really scared!” 

I punched Nicole in the arm. “I was not! It was a joke.” 

Dad put an arm around each of us. “Isn’t it great the way these two kid each 
other?” he said to the pilot. 

“If you say so,” the pilot replied. 

We hopped out of the plane. The pilot opened the cargo hold. Nicole and I 
grabbed our backpacks. 

Dad had brought a huge, airtight trunk for film, cameras, food, sleeping 
bags, and other supplies. The pilot helped him carry it off the airstrip. 

The trunk was so big, Dad could fit inside it. It reminded me of a red plastic 
coffin. 

Iknek Airport was like a tiny wooden house, just two rooms. Two pilots in 
leather jackets sat at a table playing cards. 

A tall, brawny man with dark hair, a thick beard, and leathery skin stood up 
and crossed the room to greet us. His gray parka hung open over a flannel shirt 
and deerskin pants. 

This must be our guide, I realized. 

“Mr. Blake?” the man said to Dad. His voice was low and hoarse. “I’m 
Arthur Maxwell. Need some help there?” He grabbed one end of the trunk from 
the pilot. 

“This is an awfully big trunk you brought,” Arthur added. “Do you really 
need all this stuff?” 



Dad reddened. “I’ve got a lot of cameras, tripods and things.... Well, maybe 
I overpacked.” 

Arthur frowned at me and Nicole. “I’d say so.” 

“Call me Garry,” Dad said. “These are my kids, Jordan and Nicole.” He 
nodded toward us. 

Nicole said “Hi,” and I added, “Nice to meet you.” I can be polite when I 
have to be. 

Arthur stared at us. Then he grunted. 

“You didn’t mention kids,” he mumbled to Dad after a minute. 

“I’m sure I did,” Dad protested. 

“I don’t remember it,” Arthur replied, frowning. 

Everyone was silent. We pushed through the airport door and started down 
the muddy road. 

“I’m hungry,” I said. “Let’s go into town and get some food.” 

“How far is it to town, Arthur?” Dad asked. 

“How far?” Arthur echoed. “You’re looking at it.” 

I stared around in surprise. There was only one road. It began at the airport 
and ended in a pile of snow about two blocks away. A few wooden buildings 
were sprinkled along it. 

“This is it?” I cried. 

“It’s not Pasadena,” Arthur grumbled. “But we call it home.” 

He led us down the muddy road to a diner called Betty’s. 

“I guess you’re hungry,” he grumbled. “Might as well eat a hot meal before 
we set out.” 

We settled into a booth by a window. Nicole and I ordered hamburgers, 
french fries, and Cokes. Dad and Arthur ordered coffee and beef stew. 

“I’ve got a sled and four dogs ready to go,” Arthur announced. “The dogs 
can pull this trunk of yours and the other supplies. We’ll walk beside the sled.” 

“That sounds fine,” Dad said. 

“Whoa!!” I protested. “We’re walking? How far?” 

“Ten miles or so,” Arthur replied. 

“Ten miles!” I’d never walked that far before. “Why do we have to walk? 
Why can’t we take a helicopter or something?” 

“Because I want to take photos along the way, Jordan,” Dad explained. 
“The landscape is fascinating. You never know what we’ll come across.” 

Maybe we’ll come across the Abominable Snowman, I thought. That would 



be cool. 

Our food arrived. We all ate in silence. Arthur wouldn’t look me in the eye. 
He wouldn’t look any of us in the eye. He stared out the window while he ate. 
Outside on the street, a Jeep drove by. 

“Have you ever seen this snow creature we’re looking for?” Dad asked 
Arthur. 

Arthur speared a piece of meat with his fork and popped it into his mouth. 
He chewed. He chewed some more. Dad, Nicole, and I all watched him, waiting 
for his answer. 

Finally he swallowed. “Never seen it,” he said. “Heard about it, though. 
Lots of stories.” 

I waited to hear one of the stories. But Arthur kept on eating. 

I couldn’t stand waiting any longer. “What kind of stories?” 

He swabbed at some gravy with his bread. He stuffed it into his mouth. 
Chewed. Swallowed. 

“A couple of people in town,” he said. “They’ve seen the monster.” 
“Where?” Dad asked. 

“Out by the big snow ridge,” Arthur said. “Beyond the musher’s cabin. 
Where we’re staying.” 

“What does he look like?” I asked. 

“They say he’s big,” Arthur said. “Big and covered with brown fur. You 
might think he’s a bear. But he’s not. He walks on two feet like a man.” 

I shuddered. The Abominable Snowman sounded a lot like a vicious cave 
monster I saw in a horror movie once. 

Arthur shook his head. “Personally, I hope we never find him.” 

Dad’s jaw dropped. “But that’s what we’re here for. It’s my job to find him 
—if he exists.” 

“He exists all right,” Arthur declared. “Friend of mine—another musher— 
he was out in a blizzard one day. Ran smack into the snow monster.” 

“What happened?” I asked. 

“You don’t want to know.” Arthur stuffed more bread into his mouth. 

“We certainly do want to know,” Dad persisted. 

Arthur stroked his beard. “The monster picked up one of the dogs and made 
off with him. My friend chased after him, trying to get the dog back. Never 
found him. But he could hear the dog whining. Pitiful howls. Whatever 
happened to that dog—it sounded pretty bad.” 



“He’s probably a carnivore,” Nicole said. “A meat-eater. Most animals 
around here are. There’s so little vegetation—” 

I jabbed Nicole. “I want to hear about the snowman—not your stupid nature 
facts.” 

Arthur flashed Nicole an annoyed glance. I figured he was thinking, What 
planet is she from? That’s what I’m usually thinking, anyway. 

He cleared his throat and continued. “My friend came back to town. He and 
another guy went out to try and capture the snow monster. Darn foolish, if you 
ask me.” 

“What happened to them?” I asked. 

“Don’t know,” Arthur said. “They never came back.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at the big guide. I swallowed hard. “Excuse me? Did you 
say they never came back?” 

Arthur nodded solemnly. “They never came back.” 



7 


“Maybe they got lost in the tundra,” Dad suggested. 

“Doubt it,” Arthur said. “Those two knew what they were doing. The 
monster killed them. That’s what happened.” 

He paused to butter another slice of bread. 

“Close your mouth, Jordan,” Nicole said. “I don’t want to look at your 
chewed-up french fries.” 

I guess my mouth had been hanging open. I shut it and swallowed. 

Arthur seems like a weird guy, I thought. But he’s not lying to us. He 
definitely believes in the Abominable Snowman. 

Nicole asked him, “Has anyone else seen the snow monster?” 

“Yep. A couple of TV people from New York. They heard about what 
happened to my friend and came to town to investigate. They set out into the 
tundra. Never came back, either. We found one of them, frozen to death in a 
block of ice. Who knows what became of the other. 

“Then Mrs. Carter—she lives at the end of Main Street—she saw the snow 
monster a few days later,” Arthur continued in a low voice. “She was looking 
through her telescope and spied him out in the tundra. He was chewing on bones, 
she said. Don’t believe me, go ask her yourself.” 

Dad made a noise. I glanced at him. He was trying to keep from laughing. 

I didn’t see what was so funny. This snow monster sounded pretty scary to 
me. 

Arthur glared at Dad. “You don’t have to believe me if you don’t want to, 
Mr. Blake,” he said. 

“Call me Garry,” Dad repeated. 

“I’ll call you what I please, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said sharply. “What I’m 
telling you is true. That monster is real—and he’s a killer! You’re taking a big 
risk, chasing after him. No one has ever caught him. Anyone who goes out after 
him... doesn’t return.” 

“We’ll take our chances,” Dad said. “I’ve heard stories like this before, in 
other parts of the world. Stories about monsters in the jungle or weird creatures 
in the ocean. So far the stories have never turned out to be true. I have a feeling 
the Abominable Snowman will be no different.” 



Part of me really wanted to see the snow creature. But part of me hoped 
Dad was right. I don’t deserve to die, I thought—just because I want to see 
snow! 

“Well,” Dad said, wiping his mouth. “Let’s get going. Everybody ready?” 

“I’m ready,” Nicole piped up. 

“Me too,” I said. I couldn’t wait to get out in the snow. 

Arthur said nothing. Dad paid the lunch check. 

We waited for change. “Dad,” I asked, “what if the Abominable Snowman 
is real? What if we run into him? What will we do?” 

He pulled something small and black out of his coat pocket. 

“This is a radio transmitter,” he explained. “If we get into any kind of 
trouble out in the wilderness, I can radio the ranger station in town. They’ll send 
a helicopter to rescue us.” 

“What kind of trouble, Dad?” Nicole asked. 

“I’m sure there won’t be any trouble,” Dad assured us. “But it’s good to be 
prepared for emergencies. Right, Arthur?” 

Arthur smacked his lips and cleared his throat. But he didn’t reply. I figured 
he was angry because Dad didn’t believe his stories about the snow monster. 

Dad returned the radio transmitter to his coat pocket. He left a tip for the 
waitress. Then we spilled outside into the cold Alaskan air, ready to head out for 
the frozen tundra. 

Was an Abominable Snowman waiting for us somewhere out there? 

We would soon find out. 



8 


Smack! 

Bulls-eye. I hit Nicole in the middle of her backpack with a snowball. 

“Dad!” Nicole cried. “Jordan hit me with a snowball!” 

Dad had his camera in front of his face, clicking away, as usual. “Good for 
you, Nicole,” he said absently. Nicole rolled her eyes. 

Then she ripped off my ski cap. She stuffed it with snow and smushed it on 
top of my head. 

Snow trickled down my face. The cold burned my skin. 

At first I thought snow was cool. I could mush it up in my hand to make 
snowballs. Fall down in it without getting hurt. Put it on my tongue and let it 
melt into water. 

But I was beginning to feel the cold. My toes and fingers were getting 
numb. We had already walked two miles out of town. When I looked back, I 
couldn’t see it. I could only see snow and sky. 

Only eight more miles to the cabin, I thought, wiggling my fingers inside 
my mittens. Eight more miles! It was going to take forever. And all around us, 
nothing but snow—miles and miles of it. 

Dad and Arthur trudged beside the dogsled. Arthur had brought along four 
Alaskan huskies—Binko, Rocky, Tin-tin, and Nicole’s favorite, Lars. They 
pulled Dad’s big trunk and the other supplies in a long, narrow sled. 

Nicole and I each carried a backpack filled with emergency food and other 
supplies. Just in case, Dad said. 

In case of what? I wondered. In case we get lost? In case the dogs run away 
with the sled? In case the Abominable Snowman captures us? 

Dad snapped pictures of the dogs, of us, of Arthur, of the snow. 

Nicole threw herself backwards into a snowdrift. “Look—an angel!” she 
cried, waving her arms up and down. 

She jumped up and we checked out the snow angel. “Cool,” I admitted. I 
lay on my back to make one, too. When Nicole came closer to inspect it, I 
whopped her with a snowball. 

“Hey!” she cried. “I’m going to get you for that!” 

I leaped up and darted away. The deep snow crunched under my shoes. 



Nicole ran after me. We raced ahead of the dogsled. 

“Be careful, kids!” Dad called after us. “Stay out of trouble!” 

I stumbled in the snow. Nicole pounced on me. I wriggled free and bolted 
away. 

What kind of trouble could we get into? I thought as my feet crunched 
along. There’s nothing but snow for miles around. We couldn’t even get lost out 
here! 

I turned around and ran backwards, waving at Nicole. “Try and catch me, 
Miss Factoid!” I teased. 

“Name-calling is so immature!” she yelled, chasing after me. 

Then she stopped and pointed behind me. “Jordan! Look out!” 

“Hey—I’m not falling for that old trick,” I called back. I skipped backwards 
through the snow. I didn’t want to take my eyes off her, in case she planned to 
pelt me with snowballs. 

“Jordan, I mean it!” she screamed. “Stop!” 



9 


Thud! 

I landed hard on my back in a pile of snow. “Unh!” I grunted, stunned. 

I struggled to catch my breath. Then I stared around me. 

I had fallen down some kind of deep crevasse. I sat shivering in the pile of 
snow, surrounded by narrow cliffs of bluish ice and rock. 

I stood and looked up. The opening of the crevasse was at least twenty feet 
above me. Frantically, I clutched at the icy walls. I grabbed onto a jutting rock 
and fumbled for a foothold, hoping to climb out. 

I hoisted myself up a couple of feet. Then my hand slipped and I slid back 
to the bottom. I tried again. The ice was too slick. 

How would I ever get out of here? 

Where were Dad and Nicole? I tried to warm my cheeks with my mittens. 
Why don’t they come to get me? I’m going to freeze down here! 

Nicole’s face appeared at the top of the crevasse. I’d never been so happy to 
see her in my life. 

“Jordan? Are you all right?” 

“Get me out of here!” I shouted. 

“Don’t worry,” Nicole assured me. “Dad’s coming.” 

I leaned against the pit wall. The sunlight didn’t reach the bottom. My toes 
felt ready to break off. They were so cold! I jumped up and down to keep warm. 

A few minutes later, I heard Dad’s voice. “Jordan? Are you hurt?” 

“No, Dad!” I called up to him. He, Nicole, and Arthur all stared down at me 
from above. 

“Arthur is going to lower a rope down to you,” Dad instructed. “Hold on to 
it, and we’ll hoist you out of there.” 

I stepped aside as Arthur tossed one end of a knotted rope into the crevasse. 
I clutched the rope with my mittened hands. 

Arthur shouted, “Heave! ” 

Dad and Arthur tugged on the rope. I planted my feet in footholds in the 
ice, bracing myself against the side of the crevasse. The rope slipped out of my 
hands. I clutched it tighter. 

“Hold on, Jordan!” Dad called. 



They pulled again. My arms felt as if they were going to be yanked out of 
their sockets. “Ow!” I cried. “Careful!” 

Slowly they hoisted me to the top of the crevasse. I wasn’t much help—my 
feet kept slipping on the icy walls. Dad and Arthur each took one of my hands 
and dragged me out of the pit. 

I lay on the snow, trying to catch my breath. 

Dad tested my arms and legs for sprains and breaks. “You sure you’re all 
right?” he asked. 

I nodded. 

“It was a mistake to haul kids along,” Arthur grumbled. “The snow is not as 
solid as it looks, you know. If we hadn’t seen you fall, we never would have 
found you.” 

“We’ve got to be more careful,” Dad agreed. “I want you both to stick close 
to the sled.” He leaned over the side of the crevasse and snapped a picture. 

I stood up and brushed the snow from the seat of my pants. “I’ll be careful 
from now on,” I promised. 

“Good,” Dad said. 

“We’d better push on,” Arthur said. 

We started walking again across the snow. I gave Nicole a shove once in a 
while, and she shoved me back. But we were quieter now. Neither of us wanted 
to end up frozen to death at the bottom of a snow hole. 

Dad snapped away as we walked. “How much farther to the cabin?” he 
asked Arthur. 

“Another couple of miles,” Arthur replied. He pointed to a steep mountain 
of snow in the distance. “See that snow rise, about ten miles off? That’s where 
the monster was last spotted.” 

The Abominable Snowman had been seen by that snow rise, I thought. 
Where was he now? 

Could he see us coming? Was he hiding somewhere, watching us? 

I kept my eyes on the snow rise as we walked. It seemed to grow bigger as we 
came closer to it. The snow rise was dotted with pine trees and boulders. 

After about an hour, a tiny brown speck appeared a mile or so away. 

“That’s the abandoned musher’s cabin where we’ll stop for the night,” Dad 
explained. He rubbed his gloves together and added, “It sure will be nice to sit 
by a roaring fire.” 



I clapped my mittens together to keep the blood flowing through my hands. 
“I can’t wait,” I agreed. “It must be minus two thousand degrees out here!” 

“Actually, it’s about minus ten,” Nicole stated. “At least, that’s the average 
temperature for this area at this time of year.” 

“Thank you, Weather Girl,” I joked. “And now for sports. Arthur?” 

Arthur frowned into his beard. I guess he didn’t get the joke. 

He fell behind us a little to check the back of the sled. Dad turned around to 
snap Arthur’s picture. 

“When we get to the musher’s cabin I’ll take a few more scenery photos,” 
Dad said, as he changed his film. “Maybe I’ll photograph the cabin, too. Then 
we’ll all turn in. We have a big day tomorrow.” 

By the time we reached the cabin it was almost eight o’clock at night. 

“Took us too long to get here,” Arthur grumbled. “We left town after lunch. 
It should’ve taken us about five hours. The kids having accidents and all is 
slowing us down.” 

Dad stood a few feet away from him, shooting a portrait of Arthur while he 
talked. 

“Mr. Blake, did you hear me?” Arthur growled. “Stop taking my picture!” 

“What?” Dad said, letting his camera drop to his chest. “Oh, yeah—the 
kids. Bet they’re hungry.” 

I explored the musher’s cabin. It didn’t take long. The tiny wooden shack 
was empty except for an old wood-burning stove and a couple of broken-down 
cots. 

“Why is the cabin so empty?” Nicole asked. 

“Mushers don’t stop here anymore,” Arthur explained. “They’re afraid of 
the monster.” 

I didn’t like the sound of that. I glanced at Nicole. She rolled her eyes. 

Arthur bedded the dogs in a lean-to outside the cabin. The lean-to was a 
shed built against the back cabin wall. It was filled with straw for the dogs to 
sleep on. I spotted a rusty old dogsled propped in a corner. 

Then Arthur lit a fire and began to fix some supper. 

“Tomorrow we’ll search for this so-called monster,” Dad announced. 
“Everybody get a good night’s sleep.” 

After supper we crawled into our sleeping bags. I lay awake for a long time, 
listening to the howling wind outside. Listening for the thudding footsteps of an 
Abominable Snowman. 



“Nicole, get off me!” She rolled over in her sleeping bag and jabbed her elbow 
into my ribs. I knocked her arm away and snuggled deeper inside my own toasty 
warm sleeping bag. 

Nicole opened her eyes. Bright morning sunshine streamed into the cabin. 

“I’ll be back in a minute to fix breakfast, kids,” Dad said. He sat in a chair, 
lacing up his snow boots. “First I’m going out to check on the dogs. Arthur went 
out to feed them a few minutes ago.” 

He bundled up and stepped outside. I rubbed my nose—it was cold. The 
fire in the stove had gone out during the night. No one had relit it yet. 

I forced myself to climb out of my sleeping bag and start pulling on clothes. 
Nicole began dressing, too. 

“Do you think there’s a hot shower in this dump?” I wondered aloud. 

Nicole smirked at me. “You know perfectly well there’s no hot shower, 
Jordan.” 

“Oh, wow! This is incredible!” I heard Dad’s shout from outside. 

I jammed my feet into my boots and raced out the door. Nicole pushed right 
behind me. 

Dad stood at the side of the musher’s cabin, pointing in shock at the ground. 

I gazed down—and saw deep footprints in the snow. Huge footprints. 
Enormous footprints. 

So big that only a monster could have made them. 



10 


“Unbelievable,” Dad murmured, staring at the snow. 

Arthur hurried over from the lean-to. He stopped when he saw the prints. 

“No!” he cried. “He was here!” 

His ruddy face grew pale. His jaw trembled with terror. 

“We’ve got to get away from here—now!” he said to Dad in a low, 
frightened voice. 

Dad tried to calm him down. “Hold on a minute. Let’s not jump to 
conclusions.” 

“We’re in terrible danger!” Arthur insisted. “The monster is nearby! He’ll 
rip us all to shreds!” 

Nicole knelt in the snow, studying the footprints. “Do you think they’re 
real?” she asked. “Real Abominable Snowman footprints?” 

She thinks they’re real, I thought. She believes. 

Dad knelt beside her. “They look pretty real to me.” 

Then I saw a light glimmer in his eyes. He lifted his head and squinted at 
me suspiciously. 

I backed away. 

“Jordan!” Nicole cried in an accusing voice. 

I couldn’t help it. I started laughing. 

Dad shook his head. “Jordan. I should’ve known.” 

“What?” Arthur looked confused—and then angry. “You mean the kid 
made these prints? It’s a joke?” 

“I’m afraid so, Arthur,” Dad sighed. 

Arthur scowled at me. Beneath his beard, his face reddened to the color of a 
slab of raw steak. 

I cowered. I couldn’t help it. Arthur scared me. He sure didn’t like kids— 
especially not kids who play jokes. 

“I’ve got work to do,” Arthur muttered. He turned and stomped away 
through the snow. 

“Jordan, you crumb,” Nicole said. “When did you do it?” 

“I woke up early this morning and sneaked out,” I admitted. “You were all 



sleeping. I carved the footprints over my own prints, with my mittens. Then I 
stepped in the prints on my way back, to cover my tracks. 

“You believed,” I added, jabbing a finger at Nicole. “For a minute there, 
you believed in the snow monster.” 

“I did not!” Nicole protested. 

“Yes, you did. I got you to believe!” 

I glanced from Nicole’s peevish face to Dad’s stern one. “Don’t you think 
it’s funny?” I asked. “It’s just a joke!” 

Usually Dad liked my jokes. 

Not this time. 

“Jordan, we’re not at home in Pasadena now. We’re out in the middle of 
nowhere. The wilds of Alaska. Things could get very dangerous. You saw that 
yesterday when you fell down the crevasse.” 

I nodded and hung my head. 

“I’m serious, Jordan,” Dad warned me. “No more practical jokes. I’m here 
to work. And I don’t want anything to happen to you, or Nicole, or any of us. 
Understood?” 

“Yes, Dad.” 

No one said anything for a minute. Then Dad patted me on the back. “Okay, 
then. Let’s go inside and get some breakfast.” 

Arthur returned to the cabin a few minutes later. He stamped the snow off 
his boots, glaring at me. 

“You think you’re funny,” he muttered. “But wait till you see the snowman. 
Will you be laughing then?” 

I swallowed hard. 

The answer to his question was no. Definitely no. 



11 


After breakfast we hitched the dogs to the sled and set off for the snow rise. 
Arthur wouldn’t talk to me and would hardly look at me. I guess he was angry 
about my joke. 

Everybody else has forgiven me, I thought. Why won’t he? 

Nicole and I walked at the front of the sled with the dogs. Behind me I 
heard Dad’s camera clicking furiously. I knew that meant he’d found something 
good to photograph. I turned around. 

A large herd of elk moved toward us, toward the snow rise. We stopped to 
watch them. 

“Look at them,” Dad whispered. “Amazing.” He quickly loaded new film 
into his camera and started snapping away again. 

The elk calmly picked their way across the snow, antlers high. They 
stopped to eat at a stand of bushes. Arthur pulled back the rein on the lead sled 
dog to keep him from barking. 

Suddenly, one elk lifted its head. It seemed to sense something. 

The other elk tensed up, too. Then they turned and began to gallop away 
across the tundra. Their hooves thundered over the snow. 

Dad let his camera fall against his chest. “That’s strange,” he said. “I 
wonder what happened.” 

“Something scared them,” Arthur said grimly. “It wasn’t us. And it wasn’t 
the dogs.” 

Dad scanned the horizon. “What was it, then?” 

We all waited for Arthur’s answer. But he only said, “We ought to turn 
around and head back to town right now.” 

“We’re not going back,” Dad insisted. “Not after coming all this way.” 

Arthur stared at him. “Are you going to take my advice or not?” 

“No,” Dad replied. “I’ve got a job to do here. And I’ve hired you to do a 
job. We’re not going back without a good reason.” 

“We’ve got a good reason,” Arthur insisted. “Only you won’t see it that 
way.” 

“Push ahead,” Dad ordered. 

Arthur frowned and shouted “Mush!” to the dogs. The sled began to move. 



We followed it, on toward the snow rise. 

Nicole walked a few feet ahead of me. I picked up a pile of snow and patted 
it into a ball. But then I thought I’d better not throw it. No one seemed to be in 
the mood for snowball fights. 

We marched through the snow for a couple of hours. I slipped off my 
mittens and wiggled my fingers. Frost kept collecting on my upper lip. I wiped it 
away. 

We reached a stand of pine trees at the base of the snow rise. Suddenly the 
dogs stopped short. They began to bark. 

“Mush!” Arthur shouted. 

The dogs refused to go farther. 

Nicole ran up to her favorite dog, Lars. “What is it, Lars? What’s the 
matter?” 

Lars howled. 

“What’s wrong with them?” Dad asked Arthur. 

Arthur’s face paled again. His hands shook. He stared intently into the trees, 
squinting into the brightness. 

“Something’s frightened the dogs,” he said. “Look how their fur stands on 
end.” 

I patted Lars. It was true. His fur stood straight up. The dog growled. 

“Not much scares these dogs,” Arthur said. “Whatever it is, it’s scaring 
them bad.” 

The dogs all howled. 

Nicole huddled close to Dad. 

“There’s something dangerous on that snow rise,” Arthur said. “Something 
dangerous—and very near.” 



12 


“I’m warning you, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said. “We’ve got to go back.” 

“No way,” Dad protested. “We’re not going back. I mean it.” 

The dogs barked and skittered nervously. Arthur shook his head. “I won’t 
go any farther. The dogs won’t, either.” 

Dad shouted, “Mush!” to the dogs. They howled and started backing up. 

“Mush!” he cried again. Instead of going forward, the dogs tried to turn 
around in the snow. 

“You’re upsetting them,” Arthur said. “They won’t go any farther—I told 
you that. 

“If we turn around now,” Arthur added, “we can make it back to the cabin 
before it gets too late.” 

“What are we going to do, Dad?” I asked. 

Dad frowned. “Maybe Arthur’s right. Something is definitely frightening 
the dogs. There could be a bear or something nearby.” 

“Not a bear, Mr. Blake,” Arthur insisted. “These dogs are spooked. And so 
am I.” 

He marched away across the snow, heading back toward the musher’s 
cabin. 

“Arthur!” Dad called. “Come back here!” 

Arthur didn’t turn around. He didn’t say a word. He just kept walking. 

He must be really scared, I thought. And that sent a chill of fear down my 
back. 

Still barking excitedly, the dogs pulled the sled around and started 
following Arthur. 

Dad peered into the woods. “I wish I could see what’s out there.” 

“Let’s go check it out,” I urged. “Whatever it is, it’ll probably make a great 
photo.” That usually gets Dad. 

He glanced back at Arthur, the dogs, and the sled, rushing toward the cabin. 
“No—it’s too dangerous. We have no choice. Let’s go, kids.” 

We trudged back to the cabin. “Maybe I can persuade Arthur to push on 
tomorrow,” Dad muttered. 

I didn’t say anything. But I had a feeling it wouldn’t be easy to get Arthur 



to climb that snow rise. 

And maybe Arthur was right, I thought. Those dogs really were scared. It 
was definitely creepy. 

Arthur was unhitching the dogs from the sled when we reached the cabin. 
The dogs had calmed down a lot. 

I yanked off my backpack and collapsed on top of my sleeping bag. 

“We might as well eat supper,” Dad grumbled. I could tell he was in a 
terrible mood. “Jordan—why don’t you and Nicole go gather some firewood. 
But be careful.” 

“We will, Dad,” Nicole promised. 

I stood up and started out of the cabin. 

“Jordan!” Dad scolded. “Put your knapsack back on. I don’t want you going 
anywhere without it. Understood?” 

“We’re just going for firewood,” I protested. “I’m tired of carrying it. We’ll 
only be gone for a few minutes—and anyway, Nicole is wearing hers.” 

“No arguments,” Dad snapped. “If you get lost, that food could keep you 
alive until we find you. You leave this cabin, you wear that backpack. Is that 
clear?” 

Boy, was he in a bad mood. “It’s clear,” I said, strapping on my pack. 

Nicole and I crunched across the snow to the nearest trees. They lined a 
snow ridge about half a mile away. 

We climbed the snow ridge. I made it to the top first. 

“Nicole—look!” 

On the other side of the snow ridge, I saw a frozen stream. The first water 
we’d seen since we’d set out. 

Nicole and I skittered down the ridge and stared into the icy stream. I tested 
the ice with my foot. 

“Don’t step on it, Jordan!” Nicole cried. “You might fall in.” 

I tapped the ice with the tip of my boot. “It’s solid,” I told her. 

“Still,” Nicole said. “Don’t take any chances. Dad will kill you if you have 
another accident.” 

“I wonder if there are fish swimming under there,” I said, staring into the 
ice. 

“We should tell Dad about this,” Nicole said. “He might want to photograph 
it.” 

We left the stream to gather dead branches under the trees. We lugged them 



over the snow ridge and back across the snow to the cabin. 

“Thanks, kids,” Dad said when we burst into the cabin. He took the wood 
from us and started a fire in the stove. “How about pancakes for supper tonight?” 

He’s in a better mood now, I thought with relief. 

Nicole told Dad about the frozen stream. 

“Interesting,” Dad said. “I’ll go take a look at it after supper. I’ve got to find 
something to photograph besides all this ice and snow.” 

The pancakes cheered all of us up—except for Arthur. 

He ate a lot, but he didn’t say much. He appeared jittery. He dropped his 
fork on the floor. Muttering to himself, he picked it up and started eating without 
wiping it off. 

When supper was over, Nicole and I helped Dad clean up. 

We were gathering up the supplies when the dogs started to bark. 

I saw Arthur freeze. 

“What’s that?” I cried. “What’s upset the dogs?” 



13 


The dogs yelped and barked. 

Was someone out there? 

An animal? A monster? 

“I’ll go check,” Arthur said solemnly. He pulled on his coat and wool cap 
and hurried out of the cabin. 

Dad grabbed his coat. “Stay here,” he instructed Nicole and me. He 
followed Arthur. 

We stared at each other, listening to the yelping dogs. A few seconds later, 
the barking stopped. 

Dad poked his head back into the cabin. “Nothing out there. We don’t know 
what got them upset. But Arthur is calming them down.” 

Dad grabbed his camera. “You two get some sleep, okay? I’m going to 
check out that stream. I won’t be gone long.” 

He draped the camera over his fur coat collar. The cabin door slammed 
behind him. 

We heard Dad’s footsteps crunching over the snow. Then silence. Nicole 
and I climbed into our sleeping bags. 

I rolled onto my side, trying to get comfortable. It was after eight o’clock, 
but still light outside. The sun filtered through the window of the cabin. 

The light reminded me of when I was little. Mom used to try to make me 
take a nap in the afternoon. I never could sleep in the daytime. 

I closed my eyes. I opened them. I wasn’t sleepy. 

I turned my head and glanced at Nicole. She lay on her back, her eyes wide 
open. 

“I can’t sleep,” I announced. 

“Me either,” she replied. 

I squirmed in my sleeping bag. 

“Where’s Arthur?” Nicole asked. “I wonder what’s taking him so long?” 

“I guess he’s hanging out with the dogs,” I said. “I think he likes them 
better than he likes us.” 

“That’s for sure,” Nicole agreed. 



We tossed and turned some more. The sky stayed bright. The light poured 
in through the cabin window. 

“I give up,” I groaned. “Let’s go outside and build a snowman or 
something.” 

“Dad said to stay put.” 

“We won’t go anywhere. We’ll stay by the cabin,” I assured her. 

I crawled out of my sleeping bag and started getting dressed. Nicole sat up. 
“We shouldn’t,” she warned. 

“Come on. What could happen?” 

She stood up and pulled on her sweater. “If I don’t do something, I’ll go 
stir-crazy,” she admitted. 

We bundled up. I pulled open the cabin door. 

“Jordan—wait!” Nicole cried. “You forgot your backpack.” 

“We’re just going out the door,” I complained. 

“Come on. Dad said we have to. He’ll be furious if he finds us outside. And 
he’ll be even more furious if you’re not wearing your pack.” 

“Oh, all right,” I grumbled. I hoisted the pack over my shoulders. “Like 
something’s really going to happen to us.” 

We stepped out into the cold. I kicked at the snow. 

Nicole grabbed my coat sleeve. “Listen!” she whispered. 

We heard the crunch of footsteps behind the cabin. “It’s Arthur,” I told her. 
We crept around to the back. It was Arthur. 

He crouched beside the dogsled, hitching up one of the dogs. Two others 
were already tied to the sled. 

“Arthur!” I cried. “What’s up?” 

Startled, he turned to us. He didn’t reply. Instead, he jumped on the back of 
the sled. 

“Mush!” he commanded the dogs at the top of his lungs. 

The dogs leaned forward, tugging hard. The sled began to slide away. 
“Arthur! Where are you going?” I screamed. “Come back!” 

The sled picked up speed. 

“Arthur! Arthur!” Nicole and I ran after him, shouting his name. 

But the sled raced farther and farther away from us. 

Arthur never turned back. 



14 


Nicole and I chased after the sled, watching it grow tinier and tinier. 

“Arthur! Come back!” 

“He’s got our food!” I cried. 

We couldn’t let him get away. We ran as fast as we could, our boots falling 
deep into the snow. 

The sled climbed over a tall ridge of snow. 

“Stop! Stop!” Nicole screamed. “Please!” 

“We can’t keep up with the dogs,” I gasped. 

“We have to try,” Nicole cried frantically. “We can’t let Arthur leave us 
here!” 

The sled disappeared over the top of the ridge. We clawed our way up. The 
snow slid under our feet. 

By the time we reached the top, Arthur and the dogs were far ahead of us. 
We watched in horror as they quickly disappeared across the tundra. 

Exhausted, I collapsed in the snow. “They’re getting away,” I choked out. 

“Jordan, get up!” Nicole pleaded. 

“We can’t catch him,” I moaned. 

Then Nicole said in a small voice, “Where are we?” 

I stood up and gazed around. Snow, snow, snow. All around us, nothing but 
snow. No landmarks. No sign of the cabin. 

Clouds had covered the sun. The wind picked up. Snow began to fall. 

I had no idea where we were. 

“Which way is the cabin?” I asked in a shrill voice. “Which way did we 
come?” 

We scanned the horizon through the falling snow. I didn’t see the cabin 
anywhere. 

Nicole tugged on my arm. “The cabin is that way. Let’s go!” 

“No!” The snow came down harder and faster, stinging my eyes. I shouted 
into the wind. “The cabin’s the other way! That’s not the way we came.” 

“Look!” Nicole yelled, pointing down. “Our tracks! We’ll just follow them 
home.” 



We started down the ridge, following the ruts we’d made in the snow. The 
wind howled, growing stronger. 

We followed our own footprints for a short while. It was so hard to see in 
the falling snow. All white and gray. The whole world. White and gray. 

Nicole peered at me through the thick curtain of snow. “I can hardly see 
you!” she shouted. 

We crouched low, searching for our footprints. 

“They’re gone!” I cried. The snow had already covered them up. 

Nicole clutched my arm. “Jordan, I’m getting scared.” 

I was getting scared, too. But I didn’t tell Nicole. 

“We’ll find the cabin,” I assured her. “Don’t worry. I bet Dad’s looking for 
us right now.” 

I wished I believed it myself. The wind pelted us with hard, icy snow. I 
squinted into the wind. Nothing but white. White on white. White on gray. 

“Don’t let go of me!” I shouted to Nicole. 

“What?” 

“I said, don’t let go of me! We could easily lose each other in the storm!” 

She tightened her grip on my arm to show she understood. 

“I’m so cold,” she shouted. “Let’s run!” 

We tried to run through the snow, stumbling against the wind. “Dad!” we 
called out. “Dad!” 

I had no idea where we were going—but I knew we had to go somewhere. 

“Look!” Nicole cried, pointing through the thick snow. “I think I see 
something!” 

I stared as hard as I could, but I didn’t see anything. 

Nicole pulled me along. “Come on!” she shouted. 

We ran blindly. Suddenly, the ground gave way under our feet. 

Still holding onto Nicole, I felt myself being sucked down under the snow. 



15 


Down we fell. Down into the freezing white. 

The snow rushed up, swirled around us. 

And buried us. 

Another crevasse, I thought. Another deep pit in the snow. 

Much deeper than the first. 

We both cried out as we landed. Tangled up in each other. 

“Get off!” Nicole shrieked. “Where are we? Get off!” 

Feeling dazed, I struggled to my feet. Then I grabbed both of her hands and 
tugged her up. 

“Oh no,” Nicole groaned. 

We both stared up to the top. I could barely make out the gray of the sky, 
high above our heads. 

And all around us, high walls of snow. Powdery snow that blew down on 
us. I peered up to the top of the pit. Chunks of snow broke off the icy walls. 
They made soft thuds as they landed beside us on the snowy pit floor. 

“We’re trapped down here!” Nicole wailed. “Dad will never find us. 
Never!” 

I grabbed the shoulders of her coat. A chunk of snow fell off the pit wall 
and landed on top of my boots. “Try to stay calm,” I told her. But my voice 
trembled as I said it. 

“Calm? How can I stay calm?” she demanded shrilly. 

“Dad will find us,” I said. I wasn’t sure I believed it. I swallowed hard, 
trying to fight down my panic. 

“Daaaaaad!” Nicole screamed. She cupped her hands around her mouth, 
raised her head toward the sky, and screamed at the top of her lungs. 
“Daaaaaaad! Daaaaaaaaad!” 

I clapped a mitten over her mouth. 

Too late. 

I heard a low rumbling. 

The rumbling became a roar as the snow walls began to crack and crumble. 

Crumble down. Down on us. 



Trembling in horror, I knew what was happening. 
Nicole had started an avalanche. 



16 


As sheets of snow tumbled down on us, I grabbed Nicole. 

I pushed her against the pit wall. Then I flattened myself against the wall, 

too. 

The snow roared down. 

I pressed myself tight against the wall—and to my shock, the wall gave 

way! 

“Ooooh!” I let out a startled cry. Nicole and I tumbled through the side of 
the pit. 

We stumbled forward into total darkness. 

I heard a crash behind us. My heart pounding, I turned in time to see the pit 
fill up. Snow piled over the opening in the wall. 

Nicole and I were sealed in. Shut in this dark hole. 

Our way out was gone. The pit was gone. 

We crouched in the dark tunnel-like opening, trembling, gasping in fright. 
“Where are we?” Nicole choked out. “What do we do now?” 

“I don’t know.” I grabbed the wall. We seemed to be in a narrow 
passageway. The walls around us were made of rock instead of snow. 

My eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see a dim light at the end of the 
passageway. 

“Let’s see what’s down there,” I urged Nicole. 

We crawled on our hands and knees through the passage toward the light. 
The passage ended. We stood up. 

We found ourselves in a big cave. The top of the cave towered high above 
our heads. Water trickled slowly down one of the walls. A dim glow came from 
somewhere near the back. 

“The light must be coming from outside,” Nicole said. “That means there’s 
a way out of here.” 

We crept slowly through the cave. The only sound I could hear was the 
drip, drip, drip of melting icicles. 

Soon we’ll be out of here, I thought. “Jordan,” she whispered. “Look!” 

On the floor of the cave I could make out a footprint. A gigantic footprint. 
Bigger than the fake one I’d made in the snow that morning. 



Five of my shoes could fit inside that footprint. 

I took a few steps—and saw another footprint. 

Nicole grabbed my arm. 

“Do you think it’s...?” She stopped. 

I knew what she was thinking. 

We traced the giant footprints across the cave floor. They led us straight to a 
shadowy corner in the back—and stopped. 

I glanced up. 

Nicole gasped. 

We both saw it at the same time. 

The creature. 

The Abominable Snowman! 

He loomed over us. 

He stood upright like a human, covered in brown fur. Black eyes stared out 
of an ugly face, half-human, half-gorilla. 

He wasn’t that tall—about a head taller than me—but he seemed huge. His 
body was thick and powerful, with gigantic feet and fur-covered hands—as big 
as baseball gloves. 

“We’re t-trapped!” Nicole stammered. 

She was right. 

The entrance behind us had been blocked by the avalanche. There was no 
way we could slip past this giant creature. 

No way. 

The Abominable Snowman glared down at us. Then it started to move. 



17 


My teeth began to chatter. 

I squeezed my eyes shut and trembled, waiting for the monster to grab us. 

A second passed. Then another. 

Nothing happened. 

I opened my eyes. The snowman hadn’t moved. 

Nicole took a step forward. “He’s frozen!” she cried. 

I blinked in the dim light. “Huh?” It was true. The snowman stood frozen in 
a huge block of clear ice. 

I touched the ice. The monster stood inside it like a statue. 

“If he’s frozen in ice,” I wondered, “then what made those giant 
footprints?” 

Nicole bent down to study the prints. She shuddered again at their huge 

size. 

“They lead right to the block of ice,” she declared. “The snowman must 
have made them somehow.” 

“Maybe he walked back here and accidently froze,” I suggested. I touched 
the back wall of the cave, where icy water dripped from above. 

“Or maybe he goes into the ice to rest,” I added. “Like Dracula going to 
sleep in his coffin at dawn.” 

I backed away. It was too frightening, being this close to him. But the 
monster stayed perfectly still under the thick ice. 

Nicole leaned close to the ice. “Look at his hands!” she cried. “Or paws, or 
whatever.” 

Like the rest of his body, his hands were covered with brown fur. He had 
thick fingers, like a man’s. Jutting out of them were long, sharp claws. 

A chill ran down my spine at the sight of those claws. What did he use them 
for? Ripping wild animals to pieces? Tearing up people who got in his way? 

He had powerful legs, with shorter claws on his toes. I studied his face. Fur 
covered his whole head, except for a circle of hairless skin around his eyes, nose, 
and mouth. The skin was a pinkish red. His lips were thick and white and set in a 
mean-looking grimace. 

“He’s definitely a mammal,” Nicole declared. “The fur is a dead giveaway.” 



I rolled my eyes. “This is no time for biology lessons, Nicole. Wait until 
Dad sees this. He’ll go crazy! If he can get a picture of this, he’ll be famous!” 

“Yeah,” Nicole sighed. “If we can find Dad. If we ever get out of here.” 

“There’s got to be a way out,” I said. I moved to a side wall and pressed it 
with my hands, searching for a hole, a chink in the rock, anything. 

After a few minutes I found a tiny crack. “Nicole!” I cried. “I found 
something!” 

She raced to my side. I pointed out the crack in the cave wall. She frowned 
with disappointment. 

“That’s just a crack,” she said. 

“You don’t know everything,” I protested. “Maybe there’s a secret door 
here. A hidden passage. Or something.” 

She sighed. “I guess it’s worth a shot.” 

We pressed on the crack. We stuck our fingers into it. We kicked it. I even 
tried karate-chopping it. 

Nothing. 

“I hate to break this to you, Jordan,” she said. “But I was right. As always. 
All you found was a crack in the wall.” 

“Well, keep looking,” I snarled. “We’ve got to get out of here!” 

I kept searching. I ran my hands along the wall, my back to the monster. 

Suddenly I heard a noise. A loud crack! 

“Nicole!” I cried. “Did you find something?” 

I whirled around. I realized Nicole hadn’t made that sound. She stared at the 
monster in horror. 

“What?” I asked her. “What’s wrong?” 

I heard another crack! 

“The ice is cracking!” Nicole screamed. “The monster—he’s breaking out!” 



18 


Crack! 

The block of ice splintered apart. Nicole and I pressed ourselves against a 
wall, watching in horror. 

The Abominable Snowman burst from the ice. Chunks of ice smashed on 
the floor and shattered like glass. The snowman shook himself, growling like a 
wolf. 

“Run!” I screamed. 

Nicole and I took off. But there was nowhere to go. We scrambled to the 
other side of the cave—as far away from the monster as we could get. 

“The passageway!” I cried. I ducked down and started to crawl through the 
passage. 

Nicole grabbed me. 

“Wait! It’s blocked! The avalanche—remember?” 

Yes. Of course. The way out of the cave was blocked by tons of snow. 

Across the cave, the monster uttered a ferocious roar that shook the walls. 

Nicole and I cowered in a corner of the cave. I felt her trembling next to 
me. 

“Maybe he didn’t see us,” I whispered. 

“Then why is he roaring?” Nicole whispered back. 

The monster twitched his gorilla nose in the air, sniffing. 

Oh, no! I thought. Can he smell us from across the cave? 

He turned his huge, furry head one way and then the other. 

He’s searching for us, I realized. He smells us. 

“Unh!” he grunted. He stared into a corner of the cave—our corner of the 

cave. 

“Unh!” he grunted again. 

“Oh, no!” Nicole moaned. “He sees us!” 

The big creature staggered toward us, grunting with each heavy step. 

I pressed myself against the cave wall, wishing the cave would swallow us 
up. 

Anything would be better than having him swallow us! 



The monster kept coming. His footsteps shook the floor of the cave. Boom, 
boom, boom. 

We huddled on the floor. We tried to make ourselves as small as we could. 
He stopped inches in front of us and roared again. A deafening roar. 

“His teeth!” Nicole cried. 

I saw them, too. Two rows of huge, razor-sharp teeth. 

The monster growled. 

And reached for us. His sharp claws flashed. 

He swiped at me. I tried to duck away. 

The monster snarled in frustration. He reached out again.... 

He clamped a powerful paw on Nicole’s head. 

“Help!” Nicole screamed. “He’s crushing me!” 



19 


“Let go of her!” I shrieked. 

But I knew I was helpless. 

The Abominable Snowman growled and turned Nicole around roughly. 

Then he reached behind her and grabbed her backpack. He ripped it off her 
shoulder with a sharp, hard tug. 

“Hey!” I cried in horror. 

With one claw he sliced open the canvas backpack. He reached inside. And 
pulled something out. 

A bag. A bag of trail mix. 

Nicole and I stared in amazement as he poured the trail mix into his mouth. 

“Weird,” I choked out. “He likes trail mix.” 

The monster crumpled up the bag and shifted through Nicole’s pack, 
searching for more. 

“That’s all there is,” Nicole whispered to me. 

With an angry growl, the monster tossed Nicole’s pack away. 

“Now what?” Nicole whispered. 

I reached into my own backpack, and with a trembling hand I yanked out 
my bag of trail mix. I heaved it at the monster. 

The bag hit the floor and slid to the monster’s feet. He bent down. Grabbed 
it. Tore it open. And hungrily gulped down the trail mix. 

When he finished, I shoved my pack toward him. 

He grunted. Then he dumped out my stuff. 

No more trail mix. 

Uh-oh. 

The monster stretched and roared. Then he reached down. With two 
gigantic arms, he grabbed Nicole and me. 

He lifted us up. 

He raised us toward his face. 

Toward his mouth. 

Preparing to eat us. 



20 


I struggled, but he was too strong. I pounded my fists on his chest. I kicked as 
hard as I could. He didn’t seem to feel it. 

He clutched Nicole and me like a couple of dolls. 

“Please don’t eat us!” I begged. “Please!” 

The monster grunted. He draped us both over the crook of one arm. Then he 
staggered back across the cave, gripping us tightly. 

I kicked him in the side. No reaction. Nothing. 

“Let go!” I shrieked. “Let us down!” 

“Where’s he taking us?” Nicole cried, bouncing as the creature tromped 
across the cave. 

Maybe he wants to roast us, I thought grimly. Maybe he doesn’t like his 
kids raw. 

He lugged us to the back of the cave. With one powerful swipe of the paw, 
he knocked a boulder aside. A narrow passage appeared behind it. 

Nicole moaned. “Why didn’t we see that before? Maybe we could have 
escaped!” 

“Too late now,” I groaned. 

The snowman pulled us through the passage. We came out into a smaller 
cave, flooded with light. I glanced up. 

Above us I could see the gray sky. 

Away out! 

Balancing us in one arm, the monster scaled the wall of the cave. With big, 
lurching steps, he climbed out of the hole. 

Cold air blasted me in the face. But the monster’s body pulsed with heat. 

The blizzard had stopped. Fresh snow covered the tundra. 

The monster stumbled through the snow, grunting as he walked. 

His gigantic feet sank deep into the snow. But with each huge step he 
covered a lot of ground. 

Where was he taking us? Where? 

Maybe he has another cave, I thought with a shudder. A cave with more 
monsters in it. His friends. They’ll all feast on us! 



I tried again to break out of the snowman’s grip. I kicked and squirmed as 
hard as I could. 

The monster growled. He dug his claws into my side. 

“Ow!” I yelped. But I stopped squirming. If I moved, his claws dug deeper. 
Poor Dad, I thought sadly. He’ll never know what happened to us. 

Unless he finds our bones buried in the snow. 

Suddenly, I heard barking. A dog! 

The Abominable Snowman stopped. He growled and sniffed the air. Then 
he gently dropped Nicole and me in the snow. 

We landed unsteadily on our feet. 

Nicole stared at me in surprise. 

We started to run, stumbling through the deep snow. I glanced back. 

“Is he chasing us?” Nicole asked. 

I couldn’t be sure. I couldn’t see him now. I only saw white. 

“Keep running!” I shouted. 

Then I saw something familiar in the distance. A brown speck. 

I bumped Nicole. “The cabin!” 

We ran even faster. If we could just get to the cabin... 

From the cabin we heard furious barking—the dog Arthur had left behind. 
“Dad! Dad!” we shrieked. We burst through the door. “We found him! We 
found the Abominable Snowman!” 

“Dad?” 

The cabin stood empty. Empty and bare. 

Dad was gone. 



21 


My eyes darted around the empty cabin. 

“Dad? Dad?” 

My heart skipped a beat. My throat went dry. 

Where did he go? 

Was he out searching for Nicole and me? Did he get lost in the snow? 

“We—we’re all alone,” I murmured. 

Nicole and I ran to the window. A thin layer of snow frosted the pane. We 
peered out into the bright sunlight. 

No sign of Dad. 

“At least the snowman didn’t follow us,” I said. 

“Jordan, why did he drop us?” Nicole asked softly. 

“I think the barking dog scared him,” I replied. 

If that dog hadn’t barked, what would the monster have done to us? 

As the question pushed into my mind, I heard the dog start to bark again. 
Nicole and I both gasped. 

“The snowman—!” I cried. “He’s back! Hide!” 

We glanced around, frantically searching for a good hiding place. The cabin 
was so bare—it wouldn’t take the monster long to find us. 

“Behind the stove!” Nicole urged. 

We dashed to the small, square stove and crouched behind it. 

Outside the cabin we heard the slow, heavy footsteps of the monster. 

Crunch, crunch, crunch. Footsteps over the snow. 

Nicole grabbed my hand. We froze, waiting. Listening. 

Crunch, crunch. 

Please don’t come into the cabin, I prayed. Please don’t capture us again. 
The footsteps stopped outside the door. I squeezed my eyes shut. 

The door burst open. A blast of cold air blew into the room. 

“Jordan? Nicole?” 

Dad! 

We jumped out from behind the stove. There stood Dad, with his camera 
around his neck. 



We both ran to him and hugged him. “Dad! I’m so glad it’s you!” 

“Hi!” he replied. “What’s going on, guys? I expected you to be asleep.” He 
glanced around the cabin. “Hey—where’s Arthur?” 

“He took off!” I cried breathlessly. “He took the sled. He took all the food 
and three of the dogs.” 

“We chased after him,” Nicole added. “But he got away.” 

Dad’s face filled with surprise, then horror. “I’d better radio for help. We 
won’t last long without food.” 

“Dad—listen.” I blocked his way to the radio. “Nicole and I—found the 
Abominable Snowman!” 

He sidestepped around me. “This is no time for jokes, Jordan. If we don’t 
get help, we could starve to death out here!” 

“He’s not joking, Dad,” Nicole insisted, tugging Dad’s arm. “We really 
found the snowman. He lives in a cave under the snow.” 

Dad stopped and studied Nicole. He always believes her. But this time he 
wasn’t sure. 

“It’s true!” I cried. “Come on—we’ll show you!” 

Nicole and I tugged him out the door. 

“Jordan, if this is one of your tricks, you are going to be in major trouble,” 
he warned. “We’re in a serious situation here and—” 

“Dad, he’s not kidding!” Nicole cried impatiently. “Come on!” 

We led him out into the snow to the spot where the snowman had dropped 
us. We pointed out his huge footprints. 

“Why should I believe this?” Dad said. “You faked the snowman’s 
footprints this morning, Jordan. These just look a little bigger.” 

“Dad, I swear—I didn’t make these prints!” 

“We’ll show you the cave, Dad,” Nicole promised. “Follow the footprints. 
You’ll see. It’s unbelievable!” 

I knew Dad went along with us only because Nicole insisted. He trusted 
her. She never played jokes on him. 

Leaning into the wind, we traced the giant prints across the snow. Dad 
couldn’t resist snapping pictures of them—just in case. 

The footsteps led us back to the cave. They stopped at an opening in the 
ground. 

“The cave is down that hole,” I told Dad, pointing. 

I think Dad believed us now. “Let’s go. Check it out,” he said. 



“Huh?” I cried. “Back down there? To the monster?” 

Dad was already sliding down to the cave opening. He reached up to help 
Nicole climb down. 

I hesitated. “Dad—wait. You don’t understand. There’s a monster down 
there!” 

“Come on, Jordan,” Dad urged. “I want to see this for myself.” 

I had no choice. Dad was going in there no matter what I said. And I didn’t 
want to wait outside alone. I scrambled down to the opening of the cave. 

The three of us felt our way along the narrow passage until we reached the 
mouth of the big cave. 

Keeping close together, Dad and Nicole walked in. But I stopped at the 
entrance and stared into the cave. 

“Jordan! Come on!” Dad whispered. 

There’s a monster in there, I thought with a shudder. A huge monster with 
long claws and sharp teeth. 

We managed to escape from him once. Why are we going back? What’s 
going to happen to us in there? 

I had a bad feeling. A very bad feeling. 



22 


Dad grabbed me by the hand and pulled me into the cave. I heard the drip of icy 
water against the back wall. I blinked in the darkness. 

Where was he? Where was the Abominable Snowman? 

I heard Dad’s camera clicking away. I tried to stay close to Dad. I cried out 
when I spotted the snowman. I expected him to roar and lumber after us. 

But he stood stiffly, staring straight ahead. 

Refrozen again. Inside a huge block of ice. 

Nicole stepped closer to the block of ice. “How does he do that?” 

“This is amazing !” Dad cried, snapping picture after picture. “ Incredible /” 

I stared up at the monster’s face. He glared out at us from inside the ice. His 
black eyes glittered, his mouth set in a toothy snarl. 

“This is the most amazing discovery in history!” 

Dad exclaimed. “Do you realize how famous we are going to be?” 

He stopped shooting for a second and peered up at the brown-furred 
monster. 

“Why stop here?” he murmured. “Why go home with nothing but photos? 
Why not take the snowman himself back to California? Do you know what a 
sensation that will create?” 

“But—how?” Nicole asked. 

“He’s alive, you know, Dad,” I warned. “I mean, he can crack out of that 
ice. And when he does, it’s really scary. I don’t think you could control him.” 

Dad knocked gently on the ice, testing it. “We won’t let him out of the ice,” 
he said. “At least not until we’ve got him under control.” 

Dad walked all the way around the block of ice, rubbing his chin. “If we cut 
the ice a bit, it might fit into the supply trunk,” he said. “Then we could carry the 
snowman back to California in the block of ice, locked in the trunk. It’s airtight, 
so the ice won’t melt.” 

He stepped up close to the ice and snapped a few more shots of the 
snowman’s snarling face. “Let’s go get the trunk, kids.” 

“Dad—wait.” I didn’t like this idea. “You don’t understand. The snowman 
could rush us! He let us go once. But why take another chance?” 

“Look at his teeth, Dad,” Nicole pleaded. “He’s so strong, he picked us both 



up at once!” 

“It’s worth the risk,” Dad insisted. “Neither of you is hurt, right?” 

Nicole and I nodded. “Yes, but—” 

“Let’s go.” Dad had made his mind up. He wasn’t going to listen to our 
warnings. 

I’d never seen him so excited. As we hurried from the cave, he called to the 
snowman, “Don’t go away—we’ll be right back!” 

We rushed over the snow to the cabin. Dad pulled the supply trunk outside. 
It was about six feet long and three feet wide. 

“The snowman will fit,” he said. “But with him inside the trunk, it will be 
very heavy.” 

“We need the dogsled to pull it,” Nicole said. 

“But Arthur took the sled,” I reminded them. “So I guess the deal is off. 
We’ll just have to go home without an Abominable Snowman. Too bad!” 

“Maybe there’s another sled around somewhere,” Dad suggested. “This is 
an old musher’s cabin, after all.” 

I remembered the old sled I’d seen in the dog shed. Nicole had seen it, too. 
She led Dad to it. 

“Fantastic!” Dad cried. “Now let’s go get that snowman before he escapes.” 

We hitched Lars, our only dog, to the old sled and towed the supply trunk to 
the cave. 

Then we crept silently into the cave, pulling the trunk behind us. “Careful, 
Dad,” I warned. “He might have broken out of the ice by now.” 

But the Abominable Snowman stood where we’d left him, frozen in his 
block of ice. 

Dad began to cut the ice down to size with a hacksaw. 

I paced nervously. “Hurry!” I whispered. “He could burst out any minute!” 

“This isn’t easy,” Dad snapped. “I’m working as fast as I can.” He hacked 
away. 

Each second felt like an hour to me. I watched the snowman carefully for 
any signs of movement. 

“Dad, do you have to saw so loudly?” I complained. “The noise could wake 
him up!” 

“Relax, Jordan,” Dad said. But his voice was tight and shrill, too. 

Then I heard a crack. 

“Look out!” I cried. “He’s breaking out!” 



Dad straightened up. “I cracked the ice a bit, Jordan.” 

I studied the monster. He hadn’t moved. 

“Okay, kids,” Dad said. “We’re ready.” Dad had cut the ice into a six-foot- 
long rectangle. “Help me slide this into the trunk.” 

I opened the lid of the trunk. Nicole and I helped Dad tip the ice over and 
gently drop it into the trunk. It just barely fit. 

We slid the trunk along the ground to the opening of the cave. Dad tied a 
rope around it and climbed out of the hole. “I’ll tie the rope to the sled,” Dad 
called from above. “That way Lars can help me hoist it out.” 

“Hey,” I whispered to Nicole, “let’s sneak some snowballs into the trunk— 
just for fun. We can throw them at Kyle and Kara when we get home. Snow 
from the cave of the Abominable Snowman—they’ll never top that!” 

“No—please. Don’t open the trunk,” Nicole begged. “We just barely got the 
snowman inside.” 

“We can squeeze a few snowballs in,” I insisted. I quickly made a bunch of 
snowballs, packing them tight. Then I cracked open the trunk and slipped them 
inside, next to the block of ice. 

I checked the monster one last time for signs of life. The ice was solid. We 
were safe. 

“They won’t melt in there,” I said sealing the lid of the trunk shut. We 
locked it with the bolt and tightened the rope around it. I felt pretty sure the 
snowman wouldn’t be able to break out of there; even if he did crack through the 
ice. 

“Ready?” Dad shouted from up above. “One, two, three—heave!” 

Dad and Lars tugged on the rope until the chest lifted off the ground. Nicole 
and I squatted beneath it to help push it up. 

“Again!” Dad yelled. “Heave!” 

We pushed as hard as we could. “It’s so heavy!” Nicole complained. 

“Come on, kids!” Dad called. “Push!” 

We gave the trunk a shove. Dad and Lars tugged it over the lip of the cave 
opening. 

Dad collapsed in the snow. “Whew,” he muttered, wiping his brow. “Well, 
the hardest part is over.” 

He helped Nicole and me scramble out. 

We all rested a few minutes. Then we dragged the trunk onto the sled. Dad 
secured it with the rope. Lars pulled the sled back to the cabin. 



Once inside, Dad hugged us both. “What a day! What a great day!” 

He turned to me. “See, Jordan? Nothing terrible happened.” 

“We’re lucky,” I said. 

“I’m so sleepy,” Nicole complained, sinking onto her sleeping bag. 

I glanced out the window. The sun sat high in the sky, as usual. But I knew 
it had to be very late. 

Dad glanced at his watch. “It’s almost midnight. You two should get some 
sleep.” He frowned. “I’d hate to wake up here in the morning with no food, 
though. I’m going to radio for help. You guys can sleep when we get back to 
town.” 

“Can we stay in a hotel?” I asked Dad. “In a bed?” 

“If we can find one,” he promised. He opened his pack, searching for the 
radio. 

He shuffled stuff around in his pack. Then he pulled things out, one by one. 
A compass. An extra camera. Cans of film. A pair of socks, balled up. 

I didn’t like the look on his face. He turned the pack over and dumped 
everything on the floor. He sifted through it, again, getting frantic. 

“Dad? What’s the matter?” 

When he turned to me, he had a terrified expression on his face. “The 
radio,” he murmured. “It’s gone.” 



23 


“No!” Nicole and I both shrieked. 

“I don’t believe it!” Dad cried, pounding his fist against his empty pack. 
“Arthur must have taken the radio so we wouldn’t report him.” 

I stomped around the room, frightened and furious. Our dogs, our sled, our 
food—Arthur had taken them all. 

And now the radio. 

Did Arthur leave us here to freeze? To starve? 

“Calm down, Jordan,” Dad said. 

“But, Dad—” Nicole interrupted. 

Dad shushed her. “Just a second, Nicole. I’ve got to think of a way out of 
this.” Dad searched the cabin. “Don’t panic. Don’t panic. Don’t panic,” he 
instructed himself. 

“But Dad—” Nicole said, tugging at his sleeve. 

“Nicole!” I snapped. “We’re in huge trouble. We could die out here!” 

“Dad!” she insisted. “Listen to me! You wrapped up the radio last night so 
it wouldn’t freeze. It’s in your sleeping bag!” 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. “You’re right!” he cried. He hurried to his 
sleeping bag and reached inside. He dug into his sleeping bag—and pulled out 
the radio, wrapped in a wool scarf. 

He switched on the radio and fiddled with the dials. “Iknek, Iknek. Come 
in, Iknek.” 

Dad asked the Iknek airport to send us a helicopter. He tried to describe 
where we were. 

Nicole and I smiled sleepily at each other. 

“We’re going home!” she said happily. “Home to sunny, hot Pasadena.” 

“I’m going to kiss a palm tree!” I declared. “I never want to see snow 
again.” 

I had no idea that our snowy adventure was just beginning! 



24 


“Ahhhh,” I sighed. “Feel that sun? Nice and hot.” 

“The radio said it’s a hundred degrees today,” Nicole reported. 

“I love it!” I beamed. “Love it!” 

I slapped more tanning lotion on my chest. 

Our Alaska trip all seemed unreal, now that we were home in Pasadena. 
The cold, the snow, the wind blowing over the rolling white tundra. The snarling, 
brown-furred Abominable Snowman. It all seemed like a dream. 

But I knew it was no dream. 

Dad had hidden the trunk with the Abominable Snowman inside the 
darkroom in the backyard. Every time I passed it, I remembered the trip... 
remembered the creature lying frozen in there—and shivered. 

In our swimsuits, Nicole and I caught some rays in the backyard. Good old 
sunny Pasadena. Where it never, never snowed. 

Thank goodness. 

Lauren came over to hear about our trip. I wanted to tell her the whole story. 
But Dad told us to keep quiet about it—at least until the snowman was safely 
settled somewhere. 

“I don’t believe you two!” Lauren snorted. “A week ago you wouldn’t shut 
up about snow. Now you’re letting the sun burn you to a crisp!” 

“Well, we did the cold thing and now we’re doing the hot thing,” I told her. 
“Anyway, I’ve seen enough snow to last me the rest of my life.” 

“Tell me about the trip,” Lauren insisted. “Tell me everything!” 

“It’s a big secret,” Nicole told her. She and I exchanged glances. 

“Secret? What kind of secret?” Lauren demanded. 

Before we could reply, Dad emerged from the darkroom. He squinted in the 
sunlight. He wore a down jacket, a ski cap, and gloves. He had turned the air- 
conditioning way up in the darkroom and covered the trunk with ice packs, to 
keep the snowman cold. 

“I’m going into the city now,” he announced, removing his coat. Dad had a 
meeting with some scientists and wildlife experts in Los Angeles. 

He wanted to turn the Abominable Snowman over to the right people. He 
wanted to be sure the snowman would be treated well. 



“Are you kids going to be all right while I’m gone?” he asked. 

“Of course,” Nicole replied. “We survived the Alaskan tundra. I think we 
can live through one afternoon in our own backyard.” 

“My mom is home,” Lauren said. “She’ll be around if we need anything.” 
“Good.” Dad nodded. “Okay, I’m off. But remember—Jordan and Nicole, 
are you listening? Don’t touch the supply trunk. Stay away from it— 
understood?” 

“Gotcha, Dad,” I promised. 

“All right. I’ll bring a pizza home for dinner.” 

“Good luck, Dad!” Nicole called. I watched him jump into the car and drive 
off. 

“So what’s the big secret?” Lauren asked as soon as Dad was gone. “What’s 
in the supply trunk?” 

Nicole and I glanced at each other. 

“Come on. Spill,” Lauren urged. “I won’t leave you alone until you tell 

me.” 

I couldn’t resist. I had to tell someone. “We found him. We found him and 
we brought him back.” 

“Found who?” 

“The snowman!” Nicole exclaimed. “The Abominable Snowman!” 

Lauren rolled her eyes. “For sure. And did you find the Tooth Fairy up 
there, too?” 

“Yes, we did,” I joked. 

“He’s lying in the darkroom right now,” Nicole told Lauren. 

Lauren’s face twisted in confusion. “Who—the Tooth Fairy?” 

“No. The Abominable Snowman. Areal one,” I said. “Trapped in a block of 

ice.” 

Along with four or five snowballs, I thought to myself. 

Snowballs I could throw at Lauren. For a nice little surprise. 

“Prove it,” Lauren challenged us. “You’re making it all up. You think 
you’re really funny.” 

Nicole and I exchanged glances. I knew what she was thinking. Dad had 
just told us to stay away from the trunk. 

“You two are as bad as the Miller twins,” Lauren complained. 

That did it. “Come on,” I said. “We’ll show you.” 

“We’d better not, Jordan,” Nicole argued. 



“We won’t hurt anything,” I promised. “We’ll just pull open the lid a tiny 
bit so Lauren can see him. Then we’ll slam it shut. No harm done.” 

I climbed off my lounge chair and started across the lawn to the darkroom. 
Nicole and Lauren followed me. 

I knew they would. 

I opened the darkroom door and switched on the light. A blast of cold air 
swept over me, making my bare chest tingle. 

Nicole hesitated in the doorway. “Jordan, maybe we shouldn’t.” 

“Oh, come on, Nicole,” Lauren chided. “There’s no Abominable Snowman. 
You two are ridiculous!” 

“We’re not ridiculous!” Nicole protested. 

“We might as well show her, Nicole,” I said. 

Nicole didn’t reply. She stepped into the darkroom and shut the door. 

In my bathing suit, I was shivering from the cold. It was almost like being 
back in Alaska. 

I knelt beside the huge trunk. I unhooked the latches. 

Slowly, carefully, I lifted the heavy lid. 

Peered inside. 

And let out a chilling, bloodcurdling scream of horror. 



25 


Nicole and Lauren shrieked and leaped back. 

Nicole backed into the wall with a crash. 

Lauren ducked under the developing table. 

I couldn’t keep a straight face. I started to laugh. “Gotcha!” I cried 
gleefully. I was so pleased with myself. 

I had scared them to death. They were both stiffer than the Abominable 
Snowman. He lay frozen and still inside his block of ice. 

“Jordan—you creep!” Nicole declared angrily. She punched me in the back. 

Lauren punched me too. Then she peered into the open trunk. 

And let out another scream. “He’s real! You—you weren’t kidding!” I could 
see that she was breathing hard. 

“It’s okay, Lauren,” I assured her. “He can’t hurt you. He’s frozen.” 

She stepped closer and stared down at him. 

“He’s huge!” she cried in amazement. “His—his eyes are open. They’re so 
mean-looking!” 

“Close the lid, Jordan,” Nicole insisted. “Quick. We’ve seen enough.” 

“Now do you believe us?” I asked Lauren. 

She nodded. “It’s... awesome!” She shook her head, stunned at the amazing 
sight. 

Before I shut the lid, I sneaked two snowballs out of the bottom of the 
trunk. Snickering, I passed one to Nicole. 

“What’s so funny?” Lauren asked suspiciously. 

“Nothing,” I said. I sealed the lid shut and latched the trunk. That’ll hold 
him, I thought. We’re safe. Dad will never know we sneaked a peek at the 
monster. 

We left the darkroom, closing the door carefully behind us. 

“That creature is just so awesome!” Lauren exclaimed. “What is your dad 
going to do with him?” 

“We’re not sure yet,” Nicole replied. “Dad’s trying to figure that out.” 

She held her hands behind her back, hiding the snowball from Lauren. 
Suddenly she shouted, “Hey, Lauren! Think fast!” 



She threw the snowball at Lauren. It missed. 

Splat! It hit a tree. 

“Nice shot, ace!” I cried sarcastically. 

But then I gaped at the tree in shock. 

The snowball—it didn’t crumble to the ground. 

It started to growl 

Thick white snow spread quickly up the tree trunk—and over the branches. 
Within seconds, the entire tree was covered with snow! 

“Wow!” Lauren gasped. “Nicole—how did you do that?” 

Nicole and I stared open-mouthed at the snow-covered tree. 

I was so stunned, the snowball fell out of my hand. 

I jumped back as it hit the ground—and spread! 

“Oh, wow!” I shrieked. I watched snow spread over the lawn like a white 
blanket. 

It spread under our bare feet. Over the driveway. Out to the street. 

“Ooooh! It’s cold!” Nicole wailed, hopping from foot to foot. 

“This is too weird!” I cried. “It’s a hundred degrees out—and the snow isn’t 
melting! It’s spreading—and growing deeper!” 

I turned to see Lauren hopping and dancing, whirling around wildly. 
“Snow! Snow!” she sang. “It’s wonderful! Snow in Pasadena!” 

“Jordan—” Nicole said quietly. “This isn’t right. We should have left this 
snow in the cave. It isn’t normal snow.” 

Of course she was right. Any cave where an Abominable Snowman lives 
has got to be a weird place. But how could we have guessed—? 

“Let’s build a snowman!” Lauren cried gleefully. 

“No!” Nicole warned. “Don’t touch it. Don’t do anything, Lauren. Not until 
we’ve figured this out.” 

I don’t think Lauren heard my sister. She was too excited. She kicked a 
spray of snow at an evergreen bush. The bush froze over with snow. 

“What are we going to do?” I asked Nicole. “What’s going to happen when 
Dad comes home? He’ll kill us!” 

Nicole shrugged. “Beats me.” 

“But—but—you’re supposed to be the brain ]” I sputtered. 

“This is so cool!” Lauren squealed. “Snow in Pasadena!” She picked up a 
chunk of snow and started balling it up between her hands. 

“Snowball fight!” she shouted. 



“Stop it, Lauren!” I cried. “We’re in big trouble here. Don’t you understand 

_ ?” 

Lauren fired the snowball at Nicole. 

Instantly, thick white snow spread all over Nicole’s body. Covering her. 
Covering her until she looked like a snowman! 

“Nicole!” I cried, running over the snowy ground to her. “Nicole—are you 
okay?” 

I grabbed her arm. Stiff as an icicle. She was frozen solid! 

“Nicole?” I stared into her snow-covered eyes. “Can you hear me, Nicole? 
Can you breathe in there? Nicole? Nicole?” 



26 


“Oh, no!” Lauren shrieked. “What have I done?” 

My sister was a statue. A frozen, snow-covered statue. 

“Nicole, I’m so sorry,” Lauren cried. “Can you hear me? I’m so sorry!” 

“Let’s take her inside,” I suggested frantically. “If we get her in the warm 
house, maybe we can warm her up.” 

Lauren grabbed one of Nicole’s arms. I grabbed the other. We carefully 
dragged her stiff body to the house. Her bare toes, hard as ice, left a long trail in 
the snow. 

“She’s so freezing!” Lauren cried. “How can we melt the snow?” 

“Let’s put her next to the oven,” I said. “Maybe if we turn it up full blast, 
the snow will melt.” 

We stood her in front of the oven. For good measure, I turned on all the 
burners on top of the stove. 

“That ought to do it,” I said. A bead of sweat trickled down my face. From 
the heat—or from worry? 

Lauren and I watched and waited. 

Watched and waited. 

I didn’t move. I didn’t breathe. 

The snow didn’t melt. 

“It’s not working,” Lauren groaned. “Nothing’s happening.” 

I tapped Nicole’s arm. Solid ice. 

I tried to stay calm. But I felt as if a hundred butterflies were tap dancing in 
my stomach. “All right, it’s not working. We’ll have to try something else. 
Something else...” 

Tears rolled down Lauren’s cheeks. “Like what?” Lauren demanded in a 
trembling voice. 

“Well...” I racked my brain for the hottest place I could think of. “The 
furnace! We’ll hold her in front of the furnace.” 

We dragged Nicole into the furnace shed behind the garage. The snow 
seemed to weigh a ton. It took all our strength to drag her. 

I turned the furnace on full blast. Lauren stood Nicole in front of the open 
furnace door. 



A blast of hot air sent Lauren and me staggering back. “If this doesn’t work, 
nothing will,” Lauren sobbed. 

The heat roared out of the furnace. I saw reflections of the red flames on 
Nicole’s icy face. 

My heart pounding, I watched to see the ice start to drip and the snow slide 
off her. 

But the ice didn’t melt. My sister remained a human snow cone. 

“Jordan—what are we going to do?” Lauren wailed. 

I shook my head, thinking hard. “The furnace isn’t working. What else is 
hot?” I was too scared to think clearly. 

“Don’t worry, Nicole,” Lauren told my frozen sister. “We’ll get you out of 
this—somehow.” 

I suddenly remembered how warm the Abominable Snowman had felt 
when he carried us across the Alaskan tundra. There we were, ten degrees below 
zero, surrounded by deep snow, and heat had poured off the creature’s body. 

“Come on, Lauren,” I ordered. “We’re taking her to the darkroom.” 

Struggling and straining, we dragged Nicole back outside and across the 
backyard to the darkroom. 

“Stay here,” I told Lauren. “I’ll be right back.” 

I raced into the kitchen. I pulled open all the cupboards and drawers, 
desperately searching for one thing—trail mix. 

Please, please let there be trail mix somewhere in this house! I prayed. 

“Yes!” I found a plastic bag of trail mix behind an old box of spaghetti. I 
grabbed it and flew back to the darkroom. 

Lauren stared at the bag in my hand. “What’s that?” 

“Trail mix.” 

“Trail mix? Jordan, can’t you wait to eat later?” 

“It’s not for me—it’s for him” I motioned at the trunk. 

“What?” 

I unlatched the trunk and pulled it open. The Abominable Snowman lay 
inside as before, frozen in the block of ice. 

I grabbed a handful of trail mix and waved it above the snowman’s face. 
“Wake up!” I begged. “Please wake up! Look—I brought you some trail mix!” 

“Jordan—have you totally lost it?” Lauren screeched. “What on earth are 
you doing?” 

“I can’t think of any other way to save Nicole!” I cried. 



My hand trembled as I frantically waved the trail mix over the snowman. 
“Come on! You know you love trail mix. Wake up! Please wake up! Come out 
and help us.” 

I leaned over, staring hard at the monster’s eyes. Watching for him to blink. 
Watching for any signs of life. 

But the eyes didn’t move. The creature stared lifelessly up through the 
block of ice. 

I refused to give up. 

“Yum, yum!” I shouted, my voice high and wild. 

“Trail mix! Boy, is that good!” I popped a few raisins into my mouth and 
chewed. “Mmm-mm! Delicious trail mix. So good! So tasty! Come on—wake 
up and try some!” 

“He’s not moving!” Lauren sobbed. “Give up, Jordan. It isn’t going to 
work.” 



27 


I jumped when I heard a soft sound. A faint crick. 

I stared down at the block of ice. 

Did the monster move? 

No. Silence now. The Abominable Snowman’s black eyes glittered up at 
me, lifeless and blank. 

Was it my imagination? 

Lauren is right, I thought sadly. My plan isn’t working. 

Nothing is working. 

I gently touched my sister’s stiff, frozen arm. Maybe when Dad gets home, 
I hoped. Maybe he’ll think of some way to save her. 

“What are we going to dooooo?” Lauren sobbed. She was no help at all. 
Crack. 

I heard it again—louder this time. 

And then: Crrraaaaaccckkkk! 

A long crack ripped across the ice. 

The Abominable Snowman groaned. 

Lauren leaped back with a wild scream. “It’s alive!” 

The ice broke up. The furry snowman slowly pulled himself up, moaning. 
Lauren cried out in fear. She pressed herself against the darkroom wall. 
“What’s he going to do?” 

“Shhh!” 

The monster shook shards of broken ice from his shoulders. He lifted 
himself out of the trunk. He uttered a low growl. 

“Jordan, look out!” Lauren cried. 

The monster lurched toward me. My heart jumped. I wanted to back away 
—or run away. But I couldn’t. I had to stay and help Nicole. 

“Unh!” the snowman grunted. He swiped a giant paw at me. 

Lauren let out another shrill scream. 

I leaped back. What would the monster do? 

“Unh!” the monster cried again. He took another swipe. 

“Let’s get out of here!” Lauren shouted. “He’s going to hurt you!” 



I wanted to run. But Nicole... 

The monster swiped at me again—and snatched the bag of trail mix out of 
my hands. 

I suddenly realized that was all he wanted. He had been grabbing for the 
trail mix. 

He poured the trail mix into his mouth, gulping it down, swallowing it 
noisily. Then he tossed the bag away. 

Lauren pressed her back against the corner of the darkroom. “Make him go 
back into the trunk!” she cried. 

“Are you crazy? How can I do that?” 

The snowman growled and staggered across the floor. 

His heavy footsteps shook the floor. He stopped in front of Nicole. 

He reached his powerful arms around her snow-covered body—and 
squeezed. 

“Stop him!” Lauren screamed. “He’s crushing her!” 



28 


I couldn’t move. I stared in horror. 

The big creature hugged Nicole hard—so hard that he lifted her off the 
ground. 

“Stop!” I finally choked out. “You’re hurting her!” 

Without thinking of the danger, I dove forward. I grabbed his furry arms 
with both hands—and struggled to pull him off my sister. 

With an angry grunt, he brushed me away. 

I stumbled back—and fell into Lauren. 

I turned to see the monster squeezing Nicole. 

Lauren pointed down at the floor. “Jordan—look!” 

Gazing down, I saw a small puddle under Nicole’s feet. Water dripped off 
her and onto the floor. As it hit the floor, it evaporated. Vanished from sight. 

Did I see Nicole’s toes wiggle? 

Yes! 

I stepped closer. Caught a glimpse of her face. 

A dot of pink appeared on her cheeks. 

Yes! 

Chunks of snow dropped off her body. They thudded to the floor, melted, 
and disappeared. 

I turned to Lauren. “It’s working!” I cried happily. “He’s defrosting her!” 

A trembling smile crossed Lauren’s worried face. 

A few seconds later, the snowman let Nicole go. The ice and snow had all 
melted and disappeared. The snowman gave a satisfied grunt and stepped back. 

Nicole moved her arms stiffly. She rubbed her face, as if she were waking 
up. 

“Nicole!” I cried, grabbing her by the shoulders. Warm. Her shoulders were 
warm. “Are you okay?” 

She shook her head, dazed. “What happened?” 

Lauren ran up to Nicole and threw her arms around her. “You were frozen!” 
she said. “Frozen like a snowman! But thank goodness—you’re all right!” 

I turned to see the snowman watching us. 



“Thank you,” I called to him. 

I don’t know if he understood me. He grunted. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Lauren urged. “I’m freezing!” 

“Maybe the sun will warm you up,” I told her. 

We opened the darkroom door and stepped outside. The sun still beamed 
down. The air felt sweltering hot. But the whole yard was covered in snow. 

“Oh, yeah,” Lauren murmured. “I forgot about that.” 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I saw the Abominable Snowman leap out of the 
darkroom. “He’s escaping!” I shrieked. 

“Dad will kill us!” Nicole cried. 

All three of us started shouting at the creature. 

He ignored our cries and thudded heavily across the snow. His black eyes 
narrowed on the snow-covered tree. He stepped up to the tree. Threw his arms 
around it. And hugged it tightly, just like when he had hugged Nicole. 

I watched as the snow began to melt. The blanket of white slipped down, 
down, shrinking away—until the tree stood green and golden again under the 
sunlight. 

“Wow!” I uttered, hands pressed against my face. 

But the big, furry creature had more surprises in store. 

With a loud grunt, he dropped to the snowy ground. As we stared in 
surprise, he began to roll in the snow. 

The snow appeared to stick to his fur. As he rolled, the snow vanished 
beneath him. 

Before long, the big creature was rolling on green grass. The last of the 
snow had vanished. 

He jumped to his feet. His eyes went wide, and he uttered a pained cry. 

“What’s the matter with him?” Lauren demanded. 

The Abominable Snowman gazed around, stunned, at the green grass, the 
palm trees. Then he raised his eyes to the blazing sun. 

He clutched his fur-covered head and let out a scream of terror. 

He seemed confused for a moment. Frightened. Then he let out a deep grunt 
—and took off down the street. His big paws thudded heavily over the pavement. 

I ran after him. “Wait! Come back!” 

He tore through someone’s yard and kept running. 

I gave up. No way I could catch him. 

Nicole and Lauren caught up to me. “Where’s he going?” Nicole 



demanded. 

“How should I know?” I snapped, struggling to catch my breath. 

“I think he’s looking for someplace cold,” Lauren said. 

Nicole agreed. “You’re probably right. He must be so hot. Pasadena is no 
place for an Abominable Snowman.” 

“He’ll probably find a cave in the mountains,” I said. “It’s a lot colder up 
there. I only hope he finds a way to get trail mix.” 

We trudged back to our yard. Green again. And hot. I knew that Nicole and 
I had one word in our minds—D-A-D. 

He had instructed us not to touch the trunk. We had ignored his warning. 

Now the snowman was gone. Dad’s big discovery. Dad’s big chance for 
fame. 

Gone. Gone forever. 

It was all our fault. 

“At least Dad has his photos,” I said softly. “The photos will amaze 
everyone all by themselves.” 

“I guess so,” Nicole replied, biting her bottom lip tensely. 

We walked back to the darkroom to close up the supply trunk. I glanced 
inside the trunk. Two magic snowballs were left. 

“Those things are dangerous. We’d better get rid of them,” Nicole warned. 

“I’m not touching them.” Lauren backed away. 

“You’re right,” I told my sister. “We should hide them somewhere. They’re 
too dangerous to keep around.” 

Nicole ran into the house and returned with a heavy-duty garbage bag. 
“Quick—stuff them in here.” 

I carefully scooped up each snowball and dropped it in the trash bag. Then I 
twisted the bag closed and knotted it tightly. 

“Now what?” Lauren asked. 

“We should blast them into outer space,” Nicole said. “If anyone gets hold 
of them and starts spreading snow around, we’ll be in big trouble. We need the 
Abominable Snowman to get rid of the snow—and he’s gone.” 

“Pasadena could turn into a ski resort!” I joked. “We could ice skate on 
Kyle and Kara’s swimming pool.” 

I shivered. I didn’t want to think about Kyle and Kara. And I didn’t want to 
think about snow. “We should bury the snowballs,” I told them. “But where?” 

“Not in my yard!” Lauren protested. 



I didn’t want to bury them in our yard, either. What would happen to them 
down there? Would they spread snow underground? Would snow spring up 
through the grass? 

We left the darkroom and scanned the area for good burial spots. 

“What about the empty lot?” Nicole suggested. 

Across the street, right next to Kyle and Kara Miller’s house, stood a vacant 
lot. There was nothing in it but piles of sand and a few empty bottles. 

“Perfect,” I declared. “No one will ever find the snowballs there.” 

Nicole hurried to the garage and grabbed a shovel. We crossed the street, 
glancing around to make sure no one saw us. 

“The coast is clear,” I said. 

I grabbed the shovel and dug a deep hole in the sand. It took longer than I 
thought. Sand kept falling back into the hole. 

Finally, the hole was deep enough. 

Nicole dropped the trash bag into the hole. “Good-bye, snowballs,” she 
said. “Good-bye, Alaska.” 

I covered the hole with sand. Lauren smoothed it out so you couldn’t tell 
the sand had been dug up. 

“Whew,” I groaned, wiping the sweat from my face. “I’m glad that’s over. 
Let’s go inside and cool off.” 

I put away the shovel. Then Nicole, Lauren, and I got ourselves some cold 
apple juice and collapsed in front of the TV. 

A short while later, we heard Dad’s car pull into the driveway. 

“Uh-oh,” Lauren gasped. “I think I’d better go home now. See you guys 
later.” She hurried out the back door. “Good luck!” she called. The door 
slammed behind her. 

I gave Nicole a nervous glance. “How angry will Dad be? He finds an 
amazing, rare creature, brings it home—we let it loose, and it runs away. That’s 
not so bad —is it?” 

Nicole shuddered. “Maybe if we tell him the whole story, he’ll be so glad 
we’re not hurt that he won’t be angry.” 

“Uh-huh. Yeah. Maybe.” 

The front door swung open. “Hey, kids!” Dad called. “I’m home! How’s 
our snowman doing?” 



29 


We ate supper early that evening. Things were pretty quiet around the dinner 
table. 

Tm glad you kids are safe and sound,” Dad said for the fifth time. “That’s 
what counts.” 

“Yeah,” Nicole said, chewing her pizza. 

“Uh-huh,” I added quietly. I usually had three slices. Tonight I could barely 
manage one. And I left the crust on the plate. 

Poor Dad. He was trying so hard not to get upset about losing the 
Abominable Snowman. But Nicole and I knew how bad he felt. 

Dad dropped his half-eaten slice of pizza on his plate. “I’ll tell the Museum 
of Natural History that they’ll have to make do with the photographs.” 

“Photographs are better than nothing,” I said. 

“Better than nothing? Are you crazy?” Nicole cried. “Those pictures are 
going to amaze the whole world!” 

Dad perked up. “That’s true. I mentioned them to some TV producers. They 
went wild.” 

He stood and carried his plate to the sink. “I think I’ll go out to the 
darkroom and develop that film right now. These pictures are going to cheer me 
up. I mean, they’re historic. Historic!” 

I was glad to see Dad snap out of his disappointment. Nicole and I followed 
him, eager to see the photos. 

We sat quietly under the red light while Dad developed the negatives. At 
last he pulled the first set of contact sheets out of the chemical baths. 

Nicole and I leaned close to see the pictures. 

“Huh?” Dad uttered an astonished cry. 

Snow. Nothing but snow. Ten pictures of snow. 

“That’s strange,” Dad choked out. “I don’t remember taking those shots.” 

Nicole flashed me an evil stare. I knew what she was thinking. 

I held my hands up innocently. “I’m not playing any tricks. I swear!” 

“You’d better not be, Jordan,” Dad warned sternly. “I’m in no mood for 
kidding around.” 

Dad turned back to the chemical trays and developed another set of photos. 



As he pulled them up, dripping wet, we all squinted at them. 

More snow. Nothing but snow. 

“This can’t be happening!” Dad screamed. “The Abominable Snowman— 
he should be standing right there!” He pointed. 

His hands shook as he grabbed the rest of the negatives and held them up to 
the red light. “The tundra shots came out fine,” he declared. “The dogs, the sled, 
the elk herd—all there. All perfect. All of them. But the shots in the monster’s 
cave—” 

His voice trailed off. He shook his head sadly. “I don’t get it. I just don’t get 
it. How could this be? Not a single shot of the creature. Not one.” 

I sighed. I felt so bad for Dad. I felt so bad for all three of us. 

No Abominable Snowman. No photos of the Abominable Snowman. 

It was almost as if he never existed. As if the whole thing never happened. 

Nicole and I left Dad in the darkroom to finish his work. 

We trudged around the house to the front. Nicole groaned and grabbed my 
arm. “Oh, no! Look!” 

Across the street in the vacant lot, I saw the Miller twins kneeling down, 
digging in the sand. 

“They’re digging up the snowballs!” I gasped. 

“Those creeps!” Nicole growled. “They must have been spying on us while 
we buried them.” 

“We’ve got to stop them!” I cried. 

We hurried across the street, running full speed. 

I saw Kyle rip open the garbage bag—and pull out one of the snowballs. 

He swung back his arm and aimed at Kara. 

“No—Kyle! Stop!” I screamed. “Don’t throw it! Stop! Don’t throw it, 
Kyle!” 

THWOCK. 



HOW I GOT MY 
SHRUNKEN HEAD 


Goosebumps - 39 
R.L. Stine 





1 


Have you ever played Jungle King? It’s a computer game, and it’s really cool. 
Unless you sink into a quicksand pit or get squeezed to death by the Living 
Vines. 

You’ve got to be fast to swing from vine to vine without letting them curl 
around your body. And to grab the shmnken heads that are hidden under trees 
and bushes. 

If you collect ten shrunken heads, you get an extra life. You need a lot of 
extra lives in this game. It’s not for beginners. 

My friends Eric and Joel play Jungle King with me. They are twelve, like 
me. My sister Jessica is eight. She hangs around, but we don’t let her play. That’s 
because she always dives into the quicksand pits. She likes the thwuck thwuck 
thwuck sound it makes when your body is being sucked under. 

Jessica just doesn’t get it. 

“Mark, why can’t we play a different game?” Joel asked me. 

I knew why he wanted to quit. He had just been trampled by a red rhino, the 
meanest kind. 

Joel, Eric, and I were up in my room during our winter break from school, 
huddled around my computer. Jessica was on the window seat, reading a book. 
Sunlight poured over her, making her red hair sparkle. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted as I picked up my eighth shrunken head. Kah-lee- 
ah is my jungle cry. It’s a word that popped into my head one day. I guess I made 
it up. 

My face was two inches from the monitor screen. I ducked as spears came 
flying at me from behind a leafy fern. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I let out my battle cry as I picked up another shrunken head. 

“Come on, Mark,” Eric pleaded. “Don’t you have any other games?” 

“Yeah. Don’t you have any sports games?” Joel demanded. “How about 
March Madness Basketball? That’s a cool game!” 

“How about Mutant Football?” Eric asked. 

“I like this game,” I replied, keeping my eyes on the screen. 

Why do I like Jungle King so much? I think it’s because I love swinging 
from vine to vine across the sky. 



You see, I’m a little chubby. Actually, I’m short and chubby. I’m built sort 
of like the red rhinos. And so I guess I like being able to swing so lightly, to fly 
above the ground like a bird. 

Also, it’s an awesome game. 

Joel and Eric don’t like it because I always win. In our first game this 
afternoon, an alligator chewed Joel in half. I think that put him in a bad mood. 

“Do you know what game my dad bought me?” Joel asked. “Battle 
Solitaire. ” 

I leaned closer to the screen. I had to get past the biggest quicksand pit. One 
slip, and I’d be sucked into the sandy slime. 

“What kind of game is that?” Eric asked Joel. 

“It’s a card game,” Joel told him. “You know. Solitaire. Only the cards fight 
each other.” 

“Cool,” Eric replied. 

“Hey, guys—I’m in a tough spot here,” I said. “Give me a break, okay? I’ve 
got to concentrate. I’m right over the quicksand pit.” 

“But we don’t want to play anymore,” Eric complained. 

I grabbed a vine. Swung hard. Then reached for the next one. 

And someone bumped my shoulder. “Owww!” 

I saw a flash of red hair and knew it was Jessica. She bumped me again and 
giggled. 

I watched myself tumbling down on the screen. Sucked into the bottomless 
slime pit. 

Thwuck thwuck thwuck. I died. 

I spun around angrily. “Jessica—!” 

“My turn!” She grinned at me, her wide, toothy grin. 

“Now we have to start all over again!” I announced. 

“No way,” Eric protested. “I’m going home.” 

“Me, too,” Joel said, pulling his baseball cap lower on his forehead. 

“One more game!” I pleaded. 

“Come on, Mark. Let’s go outside,” Joel said, pointing to the bright 
sunshine pouring through the bedroom window. 

“Yeah. It’s a great day out. Let’s throw a Frisbee or something,” Eric 
suggested. “Or get our skateboards.” 

“One more game. Then we’ll go outside,” I insisted. 

I watched them head out the door. 



I really didn’t want to leave the jungle. I don’t know why I like jungles so 
much. But I’ve been really into jungles since I was a teeny kid. 

I like to watch all the old jungle movies on TV. And when we were little, I 
used to pretend I was Tarzan, King of the Jungle. Jessica always wanted to play, 
too. So I let her be Cheetah, my talking chimpanzee. 

She was very good at it. 

But after she was six or seven, Jessica refused to be a chimp anymore. She 
became a full-time pest instead. 

“I’ll play Jungle King with you, Mark,” she offered, after my two friends 

left. 

“No way,” I replied, shaking my head. “You just want to take a dive into the 
quicksand pit.” 

“No. I’ll play it right,” she promised. “I’ll try to win this time. Really.” 

I was about to let her play when the doorbell rang downstairs. 

“Is Mom home?” I asked, listening for her footsteps. 

“I think she’s in the backyard,” Jessica replied. 

So I hurried downstairs to answer the front door. Maybe Eric and Joel 
changed their minds, I thought. Maybe they’ve come back for another round of 
Jungle King. 

I pulled open the front door. 

And stared at the grossest thing I ever saw in my life. 



2 


I stared at a head. 

A human head, wrinkled and leathery. About the size of a tennis ball. 

The pale, dry lips were pulled back in a sneer. The neck was stitched closed 
with heavy black string. The eyes—solid black eyes—stared up at me. 

A shrunken head. A real shrunken head. 

I was so shocked, so totally amazed to find it at my front door, that it took 
me a long time to see the woman who was holding it. 

She was a tall woman, about my mom’s age, maybe a little older. She had 
short black hair with streaks of gray in it. She wore a long raincoat buttoned to 
the top even though it was a warm, sunny day. 

She smiled at me. I couldn’t see her eyes. They were hidden behind large 
black-framed sunglasses. 

She held the shrunken head by the hair—thick black hair. Her other hand 
held a small canvas suitcase. 

“Are you Mark?” she asked. She had a soft, smooth voice, like someone in 
a TV commercial. 

“Uh... yeah,” I replied, staring at the shrunken head. They never looked so 
ugly in photos I’d seen. So wrinkled and dry. 

“I hope I didn’t startle you with this thing,” the woman said, smiling. “I was 
so eager to give it to you, I took it out of my bag.” 

“Uh... give it to me?” I asked, not taking my eyes off it. The head stared 
back at me with those glassy black eyes. They looked more like teddy-bear eyes 
than human eyes. 

“Your aunt Benna sent it for you,” the woman said. “As a present.” 

She held out the head to me. But I didn’t take it. I had spent all day 
collecting shrunken heads in the game. But I wasn’t sure I wanted to touch this 
one. 

“Mark—who is here?” My mom stepped up behind me. “Oh. Hello.” 

“Hello,” the woman replied pleasantly. “Did Benna write and tell you I was 
coming? I’m Carolyn Hawlings. I work with her. On the island.” 

“Oh, my goodness,” Mom exclaimed. “Benna’s letter must have gotten lost. 
Come in. Come in.” She pulled me back so that Carolyn could enter the house. 



“Look what she brought for me, Mom,” I said. 

I pointed to the small green head dangling by the hair from Carolyn’s hand. 

“Yuck!” Mom cried, raising a hand to her cheek. “That isn’t real —is it?” 

“Of course it’s real!” I cried. “Aunt Benna wouldn’t send a fake —would 
she?” 

Carolyn stepped into the living room and set down her small suitcase. I took 
a deep breath. Worked up my courage. And reached for the shrunken head. 

But before I could take it, Jessica swooped in—and grabbed it out of 
Carolyn’s hand. 

“Hey—!” I shouted, reaching for her. 

She darted away, giggling, her red hair flying behind her. Holding the head 
in both hands. 

But then she stopped. 

Her smile faded. And she stared down at the head in horror. 

“It bit me!” Jessica cried. “It bit me!” 



3 


I gasped. Mom squeezed my shoulder. 

Jessica started to giggle. 

One of her dumb jokes. 

She tossed the head from hand to hand. And grinned at me. “You’re dumb, 
Mark. You’ll believe anything.” 

“Just give me back my head!” I cried angrily. I dove across the living room 
and grabbed for it. 

She started to pull it away—but I held on tightly. 

“Hey—you scratched it!” I shrieked. 

She did. I held the head up close to my face to examine it. Jessica had 
scratched a long white line on the right earlobe. 

“Jessica—please,” Mom begged, crossing her arms and lowering her voice. 
That’s what Mom does when she’s about to get steamed. “Shape up. We have a 
guest.” 

Jessica crossed her arms and pouted back at Mom. 

Mom turned to Carolyn. “How is my sister Benna doing?” 

Carolyn pulled off her sunglasses and tucked them into a raincoat pocket. 
She had silvery-gray eyes. She looked older without the dark glasses on. I could 
see hundreds of tiny wrinkles at the corners of her eyes. 

“Benna is fine,” she replied. “Working hard. Too hard. Sometimes she 
disappears into the jungle for days.” 

Carolyn sighed and started to unbutton her raincoat. “I’m sure you know 
Benna’s work is her life,” she continued. “She spends every minute exploring the 
jungles of Baladora. She wanted to come visit. But she couldn’t leave the island. 
So she sent me instead.” 

“Well, it’s very nice to meet you, Carolyn,” Mom said warmly. “I’m sorry 
we didn’t know you were coming. But any friend of Benna’s is more than 
welcome.” 

She took Carolyn’s raincoat. Carolyn wore khaki pants and a short-sleeved 
khaki shirt. It looked like a real jungle-exploring suit. 

“Come sit down,” Mom told her. “What can I offer you?” 

“A cup of coffee would be nice,” Carolyn replied. She started to follow 



Mom to the kitchen. But she stopped and smiled at me. “Do you like your 
present?” 

I gazed down at the wrinkled, leathery head in my hands. “It’s beautiful!” I 
declared. 

That night before going to bed, I placed the head on my dresser. I brushed its 
thick black hair straight back. The forehead was dark green and wrinkled like a 
pmne. The glassy black eyes stared straight ahead. 

Carolyn told me that the head was over one hundred years old. I leaned 
against the dresser and stared at it. It was so hard to believe that it had once 
belonged to a real person. 

Yuck. 

How had the guy lost his head? I wondered. 

And who decided to shrink it? And who kept it after it was shrunk? 

I wished Aunt Benna were here. She would explain everything to me. 

Carolyn was sleeping in the guest room down the hall. We had sat in the 
living room, talking about Aunt Benna all night. Carolyn described the work 
Aunt Benna was doing on the jungle island. And the amazing things she was 
finding there on Baladora. 

My aunt Benna is a pretty famous scientist. She has been on Baladora for 
nearly ten years. She studies the animals in the jungle. And the plant life, too. 

I loved listening to Carolyn’s stories. It was as if my Jungle King computer 
game had come to life. 

Jessica kept wanting to play with my shrunken head. But I wouldn’t let her. 
She had already put a scratch on its ear. 

“It’s not a toy. It’s a human head,” I told my sister. 

“I’ll trade you two of my Koosh balls for it,” Jessica offered. 

Was she crazy? 

Why would I trade a valuable treasure like this for two Koosh balls? 

Sometimes I worried about Jessica. 

At ten o’clock, Mom sent me up to my room. “Carolyn and I have some 
things to talk about,” she announced. I said good night and made my way 
upstairs. 

I placed the shrunken head on my dresser and changed into my pajamas. 
The dark eyes in the head appeared to flash for a second when I turned out the 
lights. 



I climbed into bed and pulled up the covers. Silvery moonlight washed into 
the room from the bedroom window. In the bright moonlight, I could see the 
head clearly, staring at me from the dresser top, bathed in shadows. 

What a horrible sneer on its face, I thought with a shiver. Why is it locked 
in such a frightening expression? 

I answered my own question: You wouldn’t smile either, Mark, if someone 
shrunk your head! 

I fell asleep staring at the ugly little head. 

I slept heavily, without any dreams. 

I don’t know how long I slept. But sometime in the middle of the night, I 
was awakened by a terrifying whisper. 

“Mark... Mark...” 



4 


“Mark... Mark...” 

The eerie whisper grew louder. 

I sat straight up, and my eyes shot open. And in the heavy darkness, I saw 
Jessica, standing beside the bed. 

“Mark... Mark... ” she whispered, tugging my pajama sleeve. 

I swallowed hard. My heart pounded. “Huh? You? What’s your problem?” 

“I-I had a bad dream,” she stammered. “And I fell out of bed.” 

Jessica falls out of bed at least once a week. Mom says she’s going to build 
a tall fence around Jessica’s bed to keep her in. Or else buy her a king-size bed. 

But I think Jessica would just roll around even harder in a big bed and still 
fall out. My sister is a pest even in her sleep! 

“I need a drink of water,” she whispered, still tugging my sleeve. 

I groaned and pulled my arm away. “Well, go downstairs and get it. You’re 
not a baby,” I growled. 

“I’m scared.” She grabbed my hand and pulled. “You have to come with 

me.” 

“Jessica—!” I started to protest. But why bother? Whenever Jessica has a 
scary dream, I end up taking her downstairs for a glass of water. 

I climbed out of bed and led the way to the door. We both stopped in front 
of the dresser. The shrunken head stared out at us in the darkness. 

“I think that head gave me bad dreams,” Jessica whispered softly. 

“Don’t blame the head,” I replied, yawning. “You have bad dreams just 
about every night—remember? It’s because you have a sick mind.” 

“Do not!” she cried angrily. She punched my shoulder. Hard. 

“If you hit me, I won’t get you a drink,” I told her. 

She reached out a finger and poked the shrunken head on one of its 
wrinkled cheeks. “Yuck. It feels like leather. It doesn’t feel like skin.” 

“I guess heads get hard when you shrink them,” I said, straightening the 
thick tuft of black hair. 

“Why did Aunt Benna send you a shrunken head and not send me one?” 
Jessica asked. 



I shrugged. “Beats me.” We tiptoed out into the hall and turned toward the 
stairs. “Maybe it’s because Aunt Benna doesn’t remember you. The last time she 
visited us, you were just a baby. I was only four.” 

“Aunt Benna remembers me,” Jessica replied. She loves to argue. 

“Well, maybe she thinks that girls don’t like shrunken heads,” I said. We 
made our way down to the kitchen. The stairs squeaked under our bare feet. 

“Girls like shrunken heads,” Jessica argued. “I know I do. They’re cool.” 

I filled a glass with water and handed it to her. She made gulping sounds as 
she drank. “You’ll share your head with me—right?” she asked. 

“No way,” I told her. 

How do you share a head? 

We made our way back upstairs in the darkness. I took her to her room and 
tucked her in. Then I crept back to my room and slipped into bed. 

I yawned and pulled the covers up to my chin. 

I shut my eyes, but opened them again quickly. What was that yellow light 
across the room? 

At first, I thought someone had turned the hall light on. 

But, squinting across the room, I saw that it wasn’t a light. The head. The 
shrunken head—it was glowing! 

As if bright flames surrounded it. A shimmering yellow glow. 

And in the glow, I saw the dark eyes gleam and sparkle. 

And then the lips—the thin, dry lips that had been set in a hard scowl—the 
lips began to twitch. And the mouth pulled up in a horrifying smile. 



5 


“Nooooooo!” 

I let out a terrified wail. 

Glowing brightly, surrounded by eerie yellow light, the head grinned at me, 
its dark eyes flashing. 

My hands thrashed at the covers. I struggled to pull myself out of bed. But 
my legs tangled in the blanket, and I fell with a hard thud to the floor. 

“Nooooooo!” I cried. My body trembled so hard, I could barely scramble to 
my feet. 

Gazing up, I saw the grinning head float over the dresser. Float into the air. 
Float toward me like a glowing comet. 

No! 

I covered my face to shield myself. 

When I glanced back up, the shrunken head glowed on the dresser top. 

Had I imagined it floating up? 

I didn’t care. I ran out of the bedroom. “The head! The head!” I shrieked. 
“It’s glowing. The head is glowing!” 

Jessica jumped out as I ran past her bedroom. “Mark—what’s going on?” 
she called. 

I didn’t stop to answer. I kept on running, down the hall to Mom and Dad’s 
room. “The head!” I wailed. “The head!” I was so terrified, I didn’t know what I 
was doing! 

The door was closed. But I shoved it open without knocking. Mom was 
lying on her back on her side of the bed. My dad was away this week on a 
business trip. But Mom still slept on her side of the bed. 

As I burst in, she sat up and uttered a startled cry. “Mark?” 

I ran up beside her. “Mom—the shrunken head—it started to glow!” I cried, 
my voice high and shrill. “It’s glowing, and it—it grinned at me!” 

Mom stood up and wrapped me in a hug. She felt so warm and soft. I was 
shaking all over. I suddenly felt as if I were a little boy again. 

“Mark, you had a nightmare,” Mom said softly. She ran her hand over the 
back of my hair, the way she used to do when I was little. 

“But, Mom—” 



“That’s all it was. A nightmare. Take a deep breath. Look how you’re 
shaking.” 

I pulled away from her. I knew it wasn’t a nightmare. I’d been wide awake. 
“Come and see,” I insisted. “Hurry.” 

I pulled her out into the hall. A light clicked on in Carolyn’s room, and her 
door swung open. “What’s happening?” she asked sleepily. She was wearing a 
long black nightshirt. 

“Mark says his shrunken head glowed,” Mom reported. “I think he had a 
bad dream.” 

“No, I didn’t!” I shouted angrily. “Come on. I’ll show you!” 

I started to pull Mom down the hall. But I stopped when I saw the intense 
expression on Carolyn’s face. She had been sleepy a second ago. But now her 
eyes were wide, and she was staring at me hard. Staring at my face, studying me. 

I turned away from her and nearly bumped into Jessica. “Why did you wake 
me up?” Jessica demanded. 

I pushed past her and led everyone down the hall to my room. “The head 
glowed!” I cried. “And it smiled at me. Look. You’ll see!” 

I burst into my room and strode up to the dresser. 

The head was gone. 



6 


I stared in shock at the bare dresser top. 

Behind me, someone clicked on the bedroom light. I blinked in the bright 
light, expecting the shrunken head to appear. 

Where was it? 

My eyes searched the floor. Had it fallen and rolled away? Had it floated 
out of the room? 

“Mark—is this some kind of joke?” Mom asked. She suddenly sounded 
very tired. 

“No—” I started. “Really, Mom. The head—” 

And then I saw the sly grin on Jessica’s face. And I saw that my sister had 
both hands behind her back. 

“Jessica—what are you hiding?” I demanded. 

Her grin grew wider. She never could keep a straight face. “Nothing,” she 

lied. 

“Let me see your hands,” I said sharply. 

“No way!” she replied. But she burst out laughing and brought her hands in 
front of her. And of course she had the shrunken head gripped tightly in her right 
hand. 

“Jessica—!” I let out an angry cry and snatched it away from her. “It’s not a 
toy,” I scolded her angrily. “You keep your paws off it. Hear?” 

“Well, it wasn’t glowing,” she sneered. “And it wasn’t smiling, either. You 
made that all up, Mark.” 

“Did not!” I cried. 

I examined the head. Its dry lips were pulled back in the toothless snarl it 
always had. The skin was green and leathery, not glowing at all. 

“Mark, you had a bad dream,” Mom insisted, covering her mouth as she 
yawned. “Put the head down, and let’s all get some sleep.” 

“Okay, okay,” I muttered. I flashed Jessica another angry look. Then I set 
the shrunken head down on the dresser. 

Mom and Jessica walked out of my room. “Mark is such a jerk,” I heard 
Jessica say, just loud enough for me to hear. “I asked him to share the shrunken 
head, and he said he wouldn’t.” 



“We’ll talk about it in the morning,” Mom replied, yawning again. 

I started to turn off the light. But I stopped when I saw Carolyn, still 
standing in the hah. Still staring hard at me, a really intense expression on her 
face. 

She narrowed her silvery eyes at me. “Did you really see it glow, Mark?” 
she asked softly. 

I glanced at the head. Dark and still. “Yeah. I did,” I replied. 

Carolyn nodded. She seemed to be thinking hard about something. “Good 
night,” she murmured. Then she turned and padded silently back to the guest 
room. 

The next morning, Mom and Carolyn greeted me with the biggest surprise 
of my life. 



7 


“Your aunt Benna wants you to come visit her in the jungle,” Mom announced at 
breakfast. 

I dropped the spoon into my Froot Loops. My mouth fell open to my knees. 
“Excuse me?” 

Mom and Carolyn grinned at me. I guess they enjoyed shocking me. 
“That’s why Carolyn came,” Mom explained. “To take you back with her to 
Baladora.” 

“Wh-why didn’t you tell me?” I shrieked. 

“We didn’t want to tell you until we worked out all the details,” Mom 
replied. “Are you excited? You get to visit a real jungle!” 

“Excited isn’t the word!” I exclaimed. “I’m... I’m... I’m... I don’t know 
what I am!” 

They both laughed. 

“I get to go, too!” Jessica declared, bouncing into the kitchen. 

I let out a groan. 

“No, Jessica. You can’t go this time,” Mom said, putting a hand on my 
sister’s shoulder. “This is Mark’s turn.” 

“That isn’t fair!” Jessica wailed, shoving Mom’s hand away. 

“Yes, it is,” I replied happily. “Kah-lee-ah!” I cheered. Then I leaped to my 
feet and did a celebration dance around the kitchen table. 

“Not fair! Not fair!” Jessica chanted. 

“Jessica, you don’t like jungles,” I reminded her. 

“Yes, I do!” she insisted. 

“Next time will be your turn,” Carolyn said, taking a long sip of coffee. 
“I’m sure your aunt would love to show you the jungle, Jessica.” 

“Yeah. When you’re older,” I sneered. “You know, the jungle is too 
dangerous for a kid.” 

Of course, when I said that to my sister, I had no idea of just how dangerous 
the jungle could be. No idea that I was heading toward dangers I couldn’t even 
imagine. 

After breakfast, Mom helped me pack my suitcase. I wanted to bring shorts and 



T-shirts. I knew it was hot in the jungle. 

But Carolyn insisted that I pack long-sleeved shirts and jeans, because of 
the scratchy weeds and vines we’d be walking through. And because of all the 
jungle insects. 

“You have to protect yourself from the sun,” Carolyn instructed. “Baladora 
is so close to the equator. The sun is very strong. And the temperature stays in 
the nineties all day.” 

Of course I carefully packed the shrunken head. I didn’t want Jessica to get 
her paws on it while I was away. 

I know, I know. Sometimes I’m pretty mean to my sister. 

As we drove to the airport, I thought about poor Jessica, staying home 
while I went off to exciting adventures with Aunt Benna. 

I decided to bring her back a really cool souvenir from the jungle. Some 
poison ivy, maybe. Or some kind of poisonous snake. Ha-ha! 

At the airport, Mom kept hugging me and telling me to be careful. Then she 
hugged me some more. It was really pretty embarrassing. 

Finally, it came time for Carolyn and me to board the plane. I felt scared 
and excited and glad and worried—all at once! 

“Be sure to send postcards!” Mom called as I followed Carolyn to the gate. 

“If I can find a mailbox!” I called back. 

I didn’t think they had mailboxes in the jungle. 

The flight was very long. So long, they showed three movies in a row! 

Carolyn spent a lot of time reading through her notebooks and papers. But 
when the flight attendants served dinner, she took a break. And she told me 
about the work Aunt Benna had been doing in the jungle. 

Carolyn said that Aunt Benna had made many exciting discoveries. She had 
discovered two kinds of plants that no one had ever seen before. One is a kind of 
crawling vine that she named after herself. Benna-lepticus. Or something like 
that. 

Carolyn said that Aunt Benna was exploring parts of the jungle where no 
one had ever gone. And that she was turning up all kinds of jungle secrets. 
Secrets that will make Aunt Benna famous when she decides to announce them. 

“When was the last time your aunt visited you?” Carolyn asked. She 
struggled to pull open the plastic wrapping around her silverware. 

“A long time ago,” I told her. “I can hardly remember what Aunt Benna 



looks like. I was only four or five.” 

Carolyn nodded. “Did she give you any special presents?” she asked. She 
pulled out the plastic knife and started to spread butter on her dinner roll. 

I scrunched up my face, thinking hard. “Special presents?” 

“Did she bring you anything from the jungle when she visited you?” 
Carolyn asked. She lowered the dinner roll to the tray and turned to me. 

She had her dark glasses on again, so I couldn’t see her eyes. But I had the 
feeling she was staring at me, studying me. 

“I don’t remember,” I replied. “I know she didn’t bring me anything as cool 
as a shrunken head. That head is really awesome!” 

Carolyn didn’t smile. She turned back to her food tray. I could tell she was 
thinking hard about something. 

I fell asleep after dinner. We flew all night and landed in Southeast Asia. 

We arrived just after dawn. The sky outside the airplane window was a deep 
purple. A beautiful color I’d never seen before. A big red sun rose slowly 
through the purple. 

“We change planes here,” Carolyn announced. “A huge jet like this could 
never land in Baladora. We have to take a tiny plane from here.” 

The plane was tiny, for sure. It looked like a toy. It was painted a dull red. It 
had two red propellers on the slender wings. I searched for the rubber bands that 
made the propellers spin! 

Carolyn introduced me to the pilot. He was a young man in a red-and- 
yellow Hawaiian shirt and khaki shorts. He had slicked-down black hair and a 
black mustache. His name was Ernesto. 

“Can this thing fly?” I asked him. 

He grinned at me from beneath the mustache. “I hope so,” he replied, 
chuckling. 

He helped us up metal steps into the cabin. Then he hoisted himself into the 
cockpit. Carolyn and I filled the cabin. There was only room for the two of us 
back there! 

When Ernesto started the engine, it chugged and sputtered like a power 
mower starting up. 

The propellers began to twirl. The engine roared. So loud I couldn’t hear 
what Ernesto was shouting to us. 

Finally I figured out that he was telling us to fasten our seat belts. 

I swallowed hard and stared out the tiny window. Ernesto backed the plane 



out of the hangar. The roar was so loud, I wanted to cover my ears. 

This is going to be exciting, I thought. It’s kind of like flying inside a kite! 

A few minutes later, we were in the air, flying low over the blue-green 
ocean. The bright morning sunlight made the water sparkle. 

The plane bumped and jerked. I could feel the wind blowing it, making us 
bounce. 

After a while, Carolyn pointed out the islands down below. They were 
mostly green, with ribbons of yellow sand around them. 

“Those are all jungle islands,” Carolyn told me. “See that one?” She 
pointed to a large, egg-shaped island. “Some people found buried pirate’s 
treasure on that island. Gold and jewels worth millions of dollars.” 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. 

Ernesto leaned over the throttle and brought the plane lower. So low I could 
clearly make out trees and shrubs. The trees all seemed tangled together. I 
couldn’t see any roads or paths. 

The ocean water darkened to a deep green. The engine roared as the plane 
bounced against strong winds. 

“That’s Baladora up ahead!” Carolyn announced. She pointed out the 
window as another island came into view. Baladora was larger than the other 
islands, and very jagged. It curved around like a crescent moon. 

“I can’t believe that Aunt Benna is down there somewhere!” I exclaimed. 

Carolyn smiled beneath her dark glasses. “She’s there, okay.” 

I glanced to the front as Ernesto turned in his seat to face us. I saw instantly 
that he had a troubled expression on his face. 

“We have a little problem,” he said, shouting over the roar of the engine. 

“Problem?” Carolyn asked. 

Ernesto nodded grimly. “Yes. A problem. You see... I don’t know how to 
land this thing. You two will have to jump.” 

Panic made me gasp. “But—but—but—” I sputtered. “We don’t have 
parachutes!” 

Ernesto shrugged. “Try to land on something soft,” he said. 



8 


My mouth dropped open. My breath caught in my chest. Both hands gripped the 
arms of the seat. 

Then I saw the smile on Carolyn’s face. She shook her head, her eyes on 
Ernesto. “Mark is too smart for you,” she told him. “He’s not going to fall for a 
dumb joke like that.” 

Ernesto laughed. He narrowed his dark eyes at me. “You believed me— 
right?” 

“Ha-ha. No way!” I choked out. My knees were still shaking. “I knew you 
were kidding,” I lied. “Kind of.” 

Carolyn and Ernesto both laughed. “You’re mean,” she told Ernesto. 

Ernesto’s eyes flashed. His smile faded. “You’ve got to get used to thinking 
fast in the jungle,” he warned. 

He turned back to the controls. I kept my eyes out the window, watching the 
island of Baladora sweep beneath us. Broad-winged white birds swooped over 
the tangled green trees. 

A short strip of land had been cleared near the south shore of the island. 
Beyond it, I could see ocean waves smacking against dark rocks. 

The little plane hit hard as we landed—hard enough to make my knees 
bounce up in the air. We bounced again on the bumpy, dirt landing strip. Then 
we rolled to a stop. 

Ernesto cut the engine. He pushed open the cabin door. Then he helped us 
out of the plane. We had to duck our heads. 

Ernesto carried our suitcases out. Carolyn had her small canvas bag. My 
suitcase was a little larger. He set them down on the landing strip and gave us a 
short, two-fingered salute. Then he climbed back into the little red plane and 
pulled the door closed behind him. 

I shut my eyes as the propellers whirred, showering sand over me. A few 
seconds later, Ernesto took off. The plane nosed up steeply, just barely making it 
over the trees at the end of the landing strip. 

The plane turned sharply and headed back over the water. Carolyn and I 
picked up our bags. “Where do we go now?” I asked, squinting in the bright 
sunlight. 



Carolyn pointed. A clearing of tall grass stretched beyond the narrow, dirt 
airstrip. At the edge of the clearing where the trees started, I could see a row of 
low gray buildings. 

“That’s our headquarters,” Carolyn told me. “We built the airstrip right next 
to it. The rest of the island is jungle. No roads. No other houses. Just 
wilderness.” 

“Do you get cable?” I asked. 

She stopped short. Then laughed. I don’t think she expected me to make a 

joke. 

We carried our suitcases toward the low gray buildings. The morning sun 
was still low in the sky. But the air was already hot and wet. Hundreds of tiny 
white insects—some kind of gnat—hovered over the tall grass, darting one way 
then the other. 

I heard shrill buzzing. And somewhere in the distance, the high cry of a 
bird, followed by a long, sad reply. 

Carolyn walked quickly, taking long strides over the tall grass, ignoring the 
darting white gnats. I jogged to keep up with her. 

Sweat ran down my forehead. The back of my neck started to itch. 

Why was Carolyn in such a hurry? 

“We’re kind of trapped here, right?” I said, studying the low, twisted trees 
beyond the small headquarters buildings. “I mean, how do we get off the island 
when we’re finished?” 

“We radio for Ernesto,” Carolyn replied, not slowing her pace. “It takes him 
about an hour to get here from the mainland.” 

That made me feel a little better. I scurried over the tall grass, struggling to 
keep up with Carolyn. 

My suitcase began to feel heavy. I wiped sweat from my eyes with my free 
hand. 

We were nearing the headquarters. I expected Aunt Benna to come running 
out to greet me. But I couldn’t see any sign of anyone. 

A radio antenna was perched off to the side. The low buildings were 
perfectly square. Flat-roofed. They looked like upside-down cartons. Square 
windows had been cut in each wall. 

“What is that stretched over all the windows?” I asked Carolyn. 

“Mosquito netting,” she replied. She turned back to me. “Have you ever 
seen a mosquito as big as your head?” 



I laughed. “No.” 

“Well, you will.” 

I laughed again. She was joking—right? 

We stepped up to the first building, the largest in the row. I set down my 
suitcase, pulled off my baseball cap, and mopped my forehead with my 
shirtsleeve. Wow. It was hot. 

A screen door led into the building. Carolyn held it open for me. 

“Aunt Benna—!” I cried eagerly. Leaving the suitcase on the ground, I ran 
inside. “Aunt Benna?” 

Sunlight filtered through the netting over the window. It took a few seconds 
for my eyes to adjust to the darker light. 

I saw a table cluttered with test tubes and other equipment. I saw a 
bookshelf filled with notebooks and books. 

“Aunt Benna?” 

Then I saw her. Wearing a white lab coat. Standing with her back to me, at a 
sink against the wall. 

She turned, wiping her hands on a towel. 

No. 

Not Aunt Benna. 

A man. A white-haired man in a white lab coat. 

His hair was thick and brushed straight back. Even in the dim light, I could 
see the pale blue of his eyes, blue as the sky. Such strange eyes. They looked like 
blue glass. Like marbles. 

He smiled. Not at me. 

He was smiling at Carolyn. 

He motioned to me by tilting his head. “Does he have it?” he asked 
Carolyn. He had a scratchy, hoarse voice. 

Carolyn nodded. “Yes. He has it.” I could see that she was breathing hard. 
Short, shallow breaths. 

Was she excited? Nervous? 

A smile crossed the man’s face. His blue eyes appeared to twinkle. 

“Hi,” I said awkwardly. I felt really confused. What did that question mean? 
What did I have? 

“Where is my aunt Benna?” I asked. 

Before he could answer, a girl appeared from the back room. She had 
straight blond hair and the same pale blue eyes. She was dressed in a white T- 



shirt and white tennis shorts. She appeared to be about my age. 

“This is my daughter Kareen,” the man said in his hoarse voice, more like a 
whisper. “I am Dr. Richard Hawlings.” He turned to Kareen. “This is Benna’s 
nephew. Mark.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” Kareen replied sharply, rolling her eyes. 
She turned to me. “Hey, Mark.” 

“Hi,” I replied. Still confused. 

Kareen flipped her blond hair back over the shoulders of her T-shirt. “What 
grade are you in?” 

“Sixth,” I told her. 

“Me, too. Except I’m not in school this term. I’m in this dump.” She 
frowned at her father. 

“Where is my aunt?” I asked Dr. Hawlings. “Is she working or something? I 
thought she’d be here. You know. When I arrived.” 

Dr. Hawlings stared at me with those strange blue eyes. It took him a long 
time to reply. Finally, he said, “Benna isn’t here.” 

“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I’d heard him correctly. It was hard to 
understand his raspy voice. “Is she... uh... working?” 

“We don’t know,” he replied. 

Kareen played with a strand of her hair. She twisted it around her finger, 
staring at me. 

Carolyn stepped behind the lab table and leaned her elbows on it. She rested 
her head in her hands. “Your aunt Benna is missing,” she said. 

Her words made my head spin. 

They were so unexpected. And she said them so flatly. Without any feeling 
at all. 

“She’s... missing !” 

“She’s been missing for a few weeks,” Kareen said, glancing at her father. 
“The three of us—we’ve been trying really hard to find her.” 

“I-I don’t understand,” I stammered. I shoved my hands into my jeans 
pockets. 

“Your aunt is lost in the jungle,” Dr. Hawlings explained. 

“But—Carolyn said—” I started. 

Dr. Hawlings raised a hand to silence me. “Your aunt is lost in the jungle, 
Mark.” 

“But-but why didn’t you tell my mom?” I asked, confused. 



“We didn’t want to worry her,” Dr. Hawlings replied. “Benna’s your mom’s 
sister, after all. So Carolyn brought you here because you can help us find her.” 

“Huh?” My mouth dropped open in shock. “Me? How can I help?” 

Dr. Hawlings stepped across the small room toward me. His eyes locked on 
mine. “You can help us, Mark,” he said in his hoarse whisper. “You can help us 
find Benna—because you have Jungle Magic.” 



9 


“I have what?” 

I stared at Dr. Hawlings. I didn’t know what he was talking about. 

Was Jungle Magic some kind of computer game? Was it like Jungle King? 

Why did he think I had it? 

“You have Jungle Magic,” he repeated, staring back at me with those 
amazing blue eyes. “Let me explain.” 

“Daddy, give Mark a break,” Kareen interrupted. “He’s been flying for a 
hundred hours. He must be wrecked!” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. I’m a little tired.” 

“Come sit down,” Carolyn said. She led me over to a tall stool beside the 
lab table. Then she turned to Kareen. “Do we have any Cokes left?” 

Kareen pulled open a small refrigerator against the back wall. “A few,” she 
replied, bending down to get to the bottom shelf. “Ernesto is supposed to bring 
another carton on his next flight.” 

Kareen brought me a can of Coke. I popped it open and tilted the can to my 
mouth. The cold liquid felt so good on my hot, dry throat. 

Kareen leaned against the table, close to me. “Have you ever been to a 
jungle before?” 

I swallowed more Coke. “No. Not really. But I’ve seen a lot of jungle 
movies.” 

Kareen laughed. “It’s not like in the movies. I mean, there aren’t herds of 
gazelles and elephants gathering at the water hole. At least, not on Baladora.” 

“What animals are on the island?” I asked. 

“Mosquitoes, mostly,” Kareen answered. 

“There are some beautiful red birds,” Carolyn said. “Called scarlet ibises. 
You won’t believe their color. Kind of like flamingos, only much brighter.” 

Dr. Hawlings had been studying me the whole while. He walked over to the 
table and dropped down onto a stool across from me. 

I held the cold soda can against my hot forehead. Then I lowered it to the 
table. “Tell me about my aunt Benna,” I said to him. 

“Not much to tell,” Dr. Hawlings replied, frowning. “She was studying a 
new kind of tree snail. Somewhere on this end of the jungle. But one night she 



didn’t return.” 

“We’re very worried about her,” Carolyn said, twisting a strand of hair. She 
bit her lower lip. “Very worried. We searched and searched. Then we decided 
you could help us.” 

“But how can I help?” I demanded. “I told you—I’ve never been to a 
jungle.” 

“But you have Jungle Magic,” Carolyn replied. “Benna gave it to you. The 
last time she visited you. We read about it. It’s in Benna’s notebooks over there.” 

Carolyn pointed to a stack of black notebooks on the bookshelf against the 
wall. I gazed at them, thinking hard. I still didn’t understand. 

“Aunt Benna gave me some kind of magic?” I asked. 

Dr. Hawlings nodded. “Yes, she did. She was afraid the secret might fall 
into the wrong hands. So she gave it to you.” 

“Don’t you remember?” Carolyn asked. 

“I was so little,” I told them. “I was only four. I don’t remember. I don’t 
think she gave me anything.” 

“But she did,” Carolyn insisted. “We know you have Jungle Magic. We 
know that you—” 

“How?” I interrupted. “How do you know I have it?” 

“Because you saw the shrunken head glow,” Carolyn replied. “The head 
will only glow for people who have the magic. We read that in Benna’s 
notebooks.” 

I swallowed hard. My throat suddenly felt dry again. My heart began to 

race. 

“You’re telling me I have some special kind of magic powers?” I asked in a 
tiny voice. “But I don’t feel strange or anything. I’ve never done anything 
magic!” 

“You have the magic,” Dr. Hawlings said softly. “The magic is hundreds of 
years old. It belonged to the Oloyan people. They used to live on this island.” 

“They were headshrinkers,” Carolyn added. “Hundreds of years ago. That 
head I brought you—it was Oloyan. We have uncovered many others.” 

“But your aunt uncovered the secret of their ancient magic,” Dr. Hawlings 
said. “And she gave it to you.” 

“You’ve got to help us find her!” Kareen declared. “You’ve got to use the 
magic. We’ve got to find poor Benna—before it’s too late.” 

“I-I’ll try,” I told them. 



But secretly, I thought: They’ve made a big mistake. 
Maybe they mixed me up with someone else. 

I don’t have any Jungle Magic. None at all. 

What am I going to do? 



10 


I spent the day exploring the edge of the jungle with Kareen. We uncovered 
some amazing yellow spiders that were nearly as big as my fist. And Kareen 
showed me a plant that can snap its leaves closed around an insect and keep it 
trapped for days until the plant has digested it all. 

Pretty cool. 

We climbed low, smooth-barked trees. We sat in the tree limbs and talked. 

Kareen is okay, I think. She’s very serious. She doesn’t laugh a whole lot. 
And she doesn’t like the jungle at all. 

Kareen’s mom died when she was a little kid. She wants to go back to New 
Jersey and live with her grandmother. But her father won’t let her. 

As I talked with her, I kept thinking about Jungle Magic. And I kept 
thinking about how—whatever it was—I didn’t have it. 

Sure, I always liked jungle movies. And jungle books and jungle games. I 
always thought jungles were really awesome. But that doesn’t mean I have any 
special powers or anything. 

And now Aunt Benna was missing. And her friends on Baladora were so 
desperate to find her, they had brought me here. 

But what could I do? 

What? 

As I lay in bed that night, the questions didn’t go away. 

I stared up at the low ceiling of the small wooden shack, wide awake. There 
were six or seven flat-roofed shacks in a row, behind the main building. We each 
had our own little shack to sleep in. 

My little cabin had a narrow bed with a flat, lumpy mattress. A low bedside 
table where I placed my shrunken head. A small dresser with all the drawers 
stuck except the bottom one. A narrow closet, just big enough for the clothes I’d 
brought. And a tiny bathroom in the back. 

Through the netting over the open window, I could hear the chirp of insects. 
And in the distance, I heard a caww caww cawww. Some sort of animal cry. 

How can I help find Aunt Benna? I wondered as I stared up at the dark 
ceiling and listened to the strange sounds. 

What can I do? 



I tried to remember her. I tried to remember her visit to my house when I 
was four. 

I pictured a short, dark-haired woman. Chubby like me. A round pink face. 
Intense dark eyes. 

I remembered that she talked very fast. She had sort of a chirpy voice, and 
she always seemed excited. Very enthusiastic. 

And I remembered... 

Nothing else. 

That’s all I could remember about my aunt. 

Did she give me Jungle Magic? No. I didn’t remember anything about that. 

I mean, how do you give someone magic? 

I kept thinking about it and thinking about it. I struggled to remember more 
about her visit. 

But I couldn’t. 

I knew that Carolyn and Dr. Hawlings had made a terrible mistake. I’ll tell 
them in the morning, I decided. I’ll tell them they got the wrong kid. 

A terrible mistake... terrible mistake. The words repeated in my mind. 

I sat up. No way I could get to sleep. My brain wouldn’t let me. I was wide 
awake. 

I decided to take a walk around the headquarters building. Maybe explore 
back where the trees grew thick and the jungle started. 

I crept to the screen door and peered out. My little cabin stood at the end of 
the row. I could see the other cabins from my door. All dark. Kareen, Carolyn, 
and Dr. Hawlings had gone to sleep. 

Cawwww cawwwww. The strange cry repeated in the distance. A soft wind 
made the tall grass bend and shift. Tree leaves rustled, making a whispering 
sound. 

I was wearing a long, baggy T-shirt pulled down over boxers. No need to 
get dressed, I decided. No one else is awake. Besides, I’ll just take a very short 
walk. 

I slipped into my sandals. Pushed open the screen door. And stepped 
outside. 

Cawwww cawwwww. The cry sounded a little closer. 

The night air felt hot and wet, nearly as hot as during the day. A heavy dew 
had fallen, and my sandals slid over the damp, tall grass. The wet grass tickled 
my feet through the sandals. 



I made my way past the silent, dark shacks. To my right, the trees bent and 
swayed. Black shadows against a purple sky. No moon. No stars tonight. 

Maybe taking a walk is a bad idea, I told myself. Maybe it’s too dark. 

I need a flashlight, I realized. I remembered Carolyn’s warning earlier when 
she showed me where I would sleep. “Never go out at night without a flashlight. 
At night,” she had warned me, “we are not in charge here. At night, this is the 
creatures’ world.” 

The back of the headquarters building loomed ahead of me. I decided to 
turn around. 

But before I could turn, I realized I wasn’t alone. 

In the darkness, I caught a pair of eyes, staring back at me. 

I gasped. A chill ran down my back. 

Staring hard through the purple night, I saw another pair of eyes. 

And then another and another. 

Dark eyes, staring at me without moving, without blinking. 

Dark eyes, on top of each other. 

I froze. I couldn’t move. 

I knew that I was trapped. There were too many of them. Too many. 



11 


My legs trembled. Chill after chill rolled down the back of my neck. 

And as I stared at the eyes, the dark eyes in pairs, eyes on top of eyes—as I 
stared at them, they began to glow. 

Brighter. Brighter. 

And in the golden light, I saw that these were not creature eyes. 

These were not animal eyes. 

These were human eyes. 

I stared at the glowing eyes of a hundred shrunken heads! 

A pile of shrunken heads. A11 heaped together. Eyes on top of eyes. Heads 
like tight fists, mouths curled into snarls, or open in toothless horror. 

Heads on heads. Dark and wrinkled and leathery. 

So terrifying in the cold golden glow from their eyes. 

I uttered a choked cry—and took off. 

My legs felt rubbery and weak. My heart pounded in my chest. I ran around 
the headquarters building, the yellow glow fading slowly from my eyes. I ran as 
fast as I could. To the front of the dark building. To the screen door. 

Gasping for breath, I pulled open the door. And leaped inside. 

I pressed my back against the wall and waited. Waited for the eerie glow to 
fade completely. Waited for my heart to stop racing, for my breathing to slow. 

After a minute or two, I began to feel a little calmer. 

Those heads, I wondered. Why are they piled back there like that? 

I shook my head hard, trying to shake away the ugly picture of them. They 
were all people once, I realized. Hundreds of years ago, they were people. 

And now... 

I swallowed hard. My throat felt tight and dry. 

I started across the room to the refrigerator. I need something cold to drink, 
I told myself. I bumped the edge of the lab table. 

My hands shot out, and I knocked something over. I grabbed it before it 
rolled off the table. 

A flashlight. 

“Hey—!” I cried out happily. 



I’m going to listen to Carolyn’s advice from now on, I promised myself. 
I’m never going out again without a flashlight. 

I pushed the button, and a white beam of light swept over the floor. As I 
raised the flashlight, the light settled on the bookshelf against the wall. 

Aunt Benna’s black notebooks flashed into view. A tall stack of them nearly 
filled the shelf. 

I moved quickly to the bookshelf. With my free hand, I pulled down the top 
notebook. It was heavier than I thought, and I almost dropped it. 

Cradling it in my arms, I carried it over to the lab table. I climbed onto the 
tall stool and opened it up. 

Maybe I can find some answers in here, I thought. 

Maybe I can find the part where Aunt Benna talks about giving me Jungle 
Magic. Maybe I can find out why Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn think I have it. 

I leaned over the notebook and aimed the light onto the pages. Then I began 
flipping through, page after page, squinting in the light. 

Luckily, my aunt has big, bold handwriting. Very clean and easy to read. 

The pages seemed to be organized by year. I kept flipping pages, scanning 
each page quickly—until I came to the year of her visit. 

My eyes rolled down over a long section about lizards. Some kind of tree 
lizards that Aunt Benna was studying. 

Then she described a cave she had found, cut into the rocky shore at the 
other side of the island. The cave, she wrote, had been lived in by the Oloyans, 
maybe two hundred years ago. 

I skimmed over long lists of things Aunt Benna had found in the cave. Her 
handwriting got very jagged, very crooked here. I guess she was really excited 
by her discovery. 

I turned several more pages. And started a section marked “Summer”. 

As I read the words, my mouth dropped open. My eyes nearly bulged out of 
my head. 

The words started to blur. I lowered the flashlight to the page so that I could 
see better. I blinked several times. 

I didn’t want to believe what I was reading. 

I didn’t want to believe what Aunt Benna had written. 

But the words were there. 

And they were terrifying. 



12 


The flashlight shook in my hand. I steadied it between both hands. Then I leaned 
forward and read Aunt Benna’s words, moving my lips silently as I read. 

“Dr. Hawlings and his sister Carolyn will stop at nothing to destroy the 
jungle and all the creatures who live here,” my aunt wrote in her bold, clear 
handwriting. “They do not care who they hurt or who they kill. They care only 
about getting what they want.” 

I swallowed hard. Steadied the circle of light over the notebook page. And 
kept reading. 

“Finding the secret of Jungle Magic in that cave was my most amazing 
discovery,” Aunt Benna wrote. “But I know the secret is not safe as long as Dr. 
Hawlings and Carolyn are around. They will use the Jungle Magic to do evil. 
And so I have given the Jungle Magic and its secret to my nephew Mark. He 
lives four thousand miles away in the United States. And so I hope the secret 
will be safe. 

“If the Jungle Magic ever falls into Hawlings’ hands,” my aunt continued, 
“the jungle will be destroyed. The island of Baladora will be destroyed. And so 
will I.” 

I gasped and turned the page. I struggled to keep the flashlight steady so 
that I could read more. 

“If Hawlings gets the Jungle Magic,” Aunt Benna wrote, “he will shrink my 
head until there is no trace of me. I must keep my nephew four thousand miles 
away from Hawlings. Because he will shrink Mark’s head, too, to get at the 
magic I have hidden there.” 

“Ohhhh.” A terrified moan escaped my throat. 

Shrink my head? 

Dr. Hawlings will shrink my head? 

I read the last words again: “I must keep my nephew four thousand miles 
away...” 

But I’m not four thousand miles away! I told myself. 

I’m here. I’m right here! 

Carolyn brought me here to steal the magic. To take it from me. She and Dr. 
Hawlings planned to shrink my head! 



I slammed the notebook shut. I took a deep breath and held it. But it didn’t 
help to slow the thudding of my heart. 

What have they done to Aunt Benna? I wondered. 

Did they try to get the secret from her? Did they do something terrible to 

her? 

Or did she run away from them? Did she escape? 

Did they bring me here to track her down so that they could capture her 
again? Then when I find her, do they plan to shrink both of our heads? 

“Nooooo,” I murmured, trying to stop my body from trembling. 

I thought they were my friends. My friends... 

But I’m not safe here, I told myself. I’m in terrible danger. 

I have to get away. Get dressed and get away from these evil people. As fast 
as I can. 

I dropped off the stool, turned, and started toward the door. 

Got to get out. Got to get away. 

The words repeated in rhythm with my pounding heart. 

I reached for the screen door. Started to push it open. 

But someone was standing there. Standing there in the deep shadows, 
blocking my escape. 

“Where do you think you’re going?” a voice called. 



13 


Kareen pulled open the door and stepped into the room. She wore an oversized 
T-shirt, down past her knees. Her blond hair was wild about her face. “What are 
you doing in here?” she demanded. 

“Let me go!” I cried. I raised the flashlight like a weapon. 

She took a step back. “Hey—!” She let out a startled cry. 

“I have to go,” I insisted, pushing past her. 

“Mark—what’s your problem?” she asked. “Why are you acting so crazy?” 

I stopped with the screen door half open, my shoulder against the frame. “I 
saw Aunt Benna’s notebook,” I told Kareen, shining the flashlight beam on her 
face. “I read what Aunt Benna said. About your father. And about Carolyn.” 

“Oh.” Kareen let out a long sigh. 

I kept the harsh light on her face. She squinted at me, then covered her eyes 
with her arm. 

“Where is my aunt?” I demanded sharply. “Do you know where she is?” 

“No,” Kareen replied. “Lower the light—okay? You don’t have to blind 

me.” 

I lowered the light. “Did your father do something terrible to my aunt? Did 
he hurt Aunt Benna?” 

“No!” Kareen screamed. “How can you ask that, Mark? My father isn’t 
evil. He and Benna just don’t agree about some things.” 

“You’re sure you don’t know where my aunt is? Is she hiding somewhere? 
Hiding from your father? Is she still on the island?” The questions leaped out of 
me. I wanted to grab Kareen and force her to tell me the truth. 

She tugged at both sides of her blond hair. “We don’t know where your aunt 
is. We really don’t,” she insisted. “That’s why Carolyn brought you here. To help 
us find her. We’re worried about Benna. We really are.” 

“That’s a lie!” I cried angrily. “I read my aunt’s notebook. Your father isn’t 
worried about my aunt.” 

“Well, I am,” Kareen insisted. “I like your aunt a lot. She’s been really nice 
to me. I don’t care about Daddy and Aunt Carolyn and their arguments with 
Benna. I’m worried about Benna. I really am.” 

I raised the flashlight again. I wanted to check out Kareen’s expression. I 



wanted to see if she was telling the truth. 

Her blue eyes flashed in the light. I saw a teardrop running down one cheek. 
I decided she was being honest with me. 

“Well, if you’re worried about my aunt, help me get away from here,” I 
said, lowering the light again. 

“Okay, I’ll help you,” she answered quickly, without having to think about 
it. 

I pushed open the screen door and crept outside. Kareen followed. She 
closed the door silently behind her. “Turn off the light,” she whispered. “We 
don’t want Daddy or Carolyn to see.” 

I clicked off the light and started over the wet grass toward my cabin, 
walking fast. Kareen hurried to keep at my side. 

“I’ll get dressed,” I whispered. “Then I’m going to try to find Aunt Benna.” 
A shudder swept down my back. “But how? Where should I go?” 

“Use the Jungle Magic,” Kareen whispered. “It’ll tell you where Benna is. 
It’ll tell you where to go.” 

“But I can’t!” I cried shrilly. “Up until today, I didn’t even know I had any 
kind of magic. I’m still not sure I believe it.” 

“Use the magic—” Kareen whispered, narrowing her eyes at me. 

“But I don’t know how!” I insisted. 

“The magic will guide you,” she replied. “I’m sure it will. I’m sure it will 
show you the way.” 

I wasn’t so sure. But I didn’t say anything. 

My mind was spinning. Aunt Benna’s written words kept weaving through 
my thoughts. 

I should be four thousand miles away, I told myself. I’m only safe if I’m 
four thousand miles away. 

Now, how will I escape from Carolyn and Dr. Hawlings? 

How? 

We were striding down the row of cabins. The air still felt hot and wet, 
heavy. The sky had darkened to black. There were still no stars, no moon. 

I’ll get dressed, and I’ll get away, I told myself. 

Get dressed. Get away. 

“Hurry, Mark,” Kareen whispered at my side. “Hurry. And don’t make a 
sound. Daddy is a very light sleeper.” 

My cabin came into view at the end of the row. 



But before I could reach it, I heard the soft thud of footsteps on the grass. 
Rapid footsteps. 

Kareen gasped and grabbed my arm. “Oh, no! It’s him!” 



14 


I think I jumped a foot in the air. 

Should I run? Try to hide? 

If this was a game of Jungle King, I’d know the right moves. I’d know how 
to escape from the Evil Scientist. I’d grab a vine and swing myself to safety. And 
pick up a few extra lives along the way. 

But, of course, this was no game. 

I pressed my back against the cabin wall and froze there, waiting to be 
caught. 

The rapid footsteps thudded closer. 

I held my breath, but my heart still pounded. 

I held my breath—and watched a funny-looking animal hop into view. 

Not Dr. Hawlings. But a weird-looking rabbit, with huge ears and big paws 
that thudded the ground as it hopped. 

I watched the weird creature dart away, disappearing between two of the 
low cabins. “Is it a rabbit?” 

Kareen raised a finger to her lips, reminding me to be quiet. “It’s a new 
species of giant rabbit your aunt discovered.” 

“Very educational,” I murmured. “But do I need a nature lesson now?” 

Kareen pushed me by the shoulders toward my cabin door. “Hurry, Mark. If 
my dad wakes up...” She didn’t finish her sentence. 

If he wakes up, he’ll shrink my head. I finished the sentence for her. 

My legs suddenly felt as if they were about to collapse. But I forced myself 
into my dark cabin. 

My hands were shaking so hard, I could barely get dressed. I pulled on the 
jeans I’d been wearing that day. And a long-sleeved T-shirt. 

“Hurry!” Kareen whispered from the door. “Hurry up!” 

I wished she’d stop saying that. I jumped every time. 

“Hurry, Mark!” 

I pulled open my suitcase and grabbed the flashlight I’d brought. Then I 
started to the door. 

“Hurry, Mark. Get going!” Kareen whispered. 



I stopped halfway across the cabin. Grabbed the shrunken head. Stuffed it 
into my T-shirt pocket. Then I pushed open the door and stepped back outside. 

Where should I go? What should I do? How could I find my aunt? 

A million questions rushed through my mind. My throat felt so dry, it 
ached. I thought about getting one of those cold Cokes in the lab. But I knew I 
couldn’t risk waking Kareen’s father. 

We started walking across the wet grass. “Don’t turn on the flashlight until 
you’re hidden by the trees,” Kareen instructed. 

“But where do I go? How do I find Aunt Benna?” I whispered, swallowing 

hard. 

“There’s only one path,” Kareen told me, pointing to the tangled dark trees 
at the edge of the clearing. “It will lead you part of the way.” 

“Then what?” I demanded, my voice shaking. 

Her eyes locked on mine. “The Jungle Magic will take you the rest of the 
way.” 

Yeah. Sure. 

And next week, I’ll flap my arms and fly to the moon. 

I had the sudden urge to turn around. Go back to my little shack. Go to bed 
and pretend I never read my aunt’s notebook. 

But then Kareen and I passed the big pile of shrunken heads. The dark eyes 
all seemed to stare up at me. Such sad, sad eyes. 

I don’t want my head to end up on that pile, I decided. No way! 

I started to jog toward the trees. 

Kareen hurried to keep up with me. “Good luck, Mark!” she called softly. 

“Th-thanks,” I stammered. Then I stopped and turned to her. “What are you 
going to tell your dad in the morning?” 

Kareen shrugged. The wind blew her blond hair around her face. “I won’t 
tell him anything,” she said. “I’ll tell him I slept all night. That I didn’t hear a 
thing.” 

“Thanks,” I repeated. Then gripping the flashlight tightly, I turned and ran 
into the trees. 

The path was soft and sandy. The sand felt wet through my sandals. Vines 
and big, flat leaves reached over the path. They slapped against my jeans legs as 
I trotted along. 

Tall weeds grew over the path. After a minute or so, it became too dark to 
see. Had I wandered off the path? 



I clicked on the flashlight and shone the light along the ground. 

The light swept over the tall weeds, strange ferns, tendrils of vines. The 
black-trunked trees appeared to lean toward me, reaching for me with their 
smooth limbs. 

No path. 

Here I am, I thought, squinting into the pale beam of light. Here I am, all 
alone in the jungle. 

Now what do I do? 



15 


“Ow!” 

I swatted a mosquito on my neck. Too late. I could feel the throb of its bite. 

Rubbing my neck, I took a few steps through the tall weeds. I kept the 
circle of light in front of my feet. 

Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah. 

A shrill cry—very close by—made me stop. 

Night in the jungle belongs to the creatures, I remembered with a shiver. 

Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah. 

What was it? 

Not a giant rabbit. It sounded really BIG. 

I spun the light in a circle, keeping it low over the grass and vines. The 
smooth tree trunks shone purple in the pale light. 

I didn’t see any animals. 

I lowered the light. 

My whole body was shaking. Despite the damp heat of the night, I couldn’t 
stop shivering. 

A wind made the leaves all flap, the trees bend and whisper. 

The jungle was alive, I realized. 

Insects chittered all around. Fat leaves scraped and cracked. I heard the soft 
crackle of animal footsteps, running over the ground.. 

Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah. 

What was that? 

Without realizing it, I had pressed myself against a low tree. I took a deep 
breath and held it, listening hard. 

Was the animal moving closer? 

Thick clumps of leaves hung down from the low branches, forming a kind 
of cave. I’m protected under here, I thought, gazing all around. I suddenly felt a 
little safer, hidden under the thick leaves, under the low branches. 

Through my leafy roof, I glimpsed a sliver of white moonlight. It made the 
leaves gleam like silver. 

I clicked off the flashlight and lowered myself to a sitting position on the 



ground. Leaning back against the smooth trunk, I gazed up at the moon, taking 
slow, steady breaths. 

As soon as I felt calmer, I realized how tired I was. The sleepiness swept 
over me like a heavy blanket. I yawned loudly. My eyelids seemed to weigh a 
hundred pounds. 

I tried to stay alert. But I couldn’t fight the drowsiness. 

With the chittering of insects for a lullaby, I leaned my head against the tree 
trunk and drifted into a deep sleep. 

I dreamed about shrunken heads. 

Dozens of shrunken heads, the leathery skin purple and green, the black 
eyes glowing like dark coals, the dry black lips pulled back in angry snarls. 

The heads floated and danced through my dream. They darted back and 
forth like tennis balls. They flew into me, bounced against my chest, bounced off 
my head. But I didn’t feel them. 

They bounced and floated. And then the dry lips opened, and they all began 
to sing. “Hurry, Mark. Hurry. ” That was their song. 

The words came out hoarse and raspy. The sound of air rattling through 
dead leaves. 

“Hurry, Mark. Hurry. ” An ugly, frightening chant. 

“Hurry, Mark. Hurry. ” 

The black lips twisted into a sneer as they sang. The coal eyes glowed. The 
heads—dozens of shriveled, wrinkled heads—bobbed and bounced. 

I woke up with the whispered words in my ear. 

I blinked. Gray morning light shimmered down through the tree leaves. My 
back ached. My clothes felt damp. 

It took me a few seconds to remember where I was. 

The frightening dream stayed in my mind. My hand slid up to my T-shirt 
pocket. I felt the shrunken head tucked tightly inside. 

My face itched. 

I reached up to scratch my cheek—and pulled something off it. A leaf? 

No. 

I squinted at the insect in my hand. A large red ant. Nearly the size of a 
grasshopper. 

“Yuck!” I tossed it away. 

My skin tingled. My back itched. Something moved up and down my legs. 

I jerked myself up straight. Alert. Wide awake now. 



Itching like crazy. My whole body tingling. 

I stared down at myself. Stared down at my jeans and T-shirt. 
And started to scream. 



16 


I jumped to my feet. I thrashed my arms in the air. I kicked my legs. 

My body was covered with giant red ants. 

Hundreds and hundreds of them. Crawling over my arms, my legs, my 
chest. 

Their prickly legs scratched over my throat and the back of my neck. I 
pulled a fat one off my forehead. Then another off my cheek. 

I reached up and felt them crawling in my hair. 

“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat as I slapped at my hair. Swept my 
hands through it. Watched the big red ants fall to the ground. 

I felt them crawl over the backs of my hands. Hot and prickly. So big. And 
so many of them. 

I dropped to my knees, slapping at my chest, pulling the insects off my 
neck. I began rolling frantically in the tall grass, dripping wet from the heavy 
morning dew. 

I rolled and slapped at myself. Rolled over and over, trying to flatten the 
insects, trying to kick them off me. I grabbed another handful out of my hair and 
heaved them into a leafy bush. 

I struggled back to my feet, twisting and squirming. Pulling at the big red 

ants. 

But there were too many of them. My skin itched and tingled. Their tiny 
feet prickled my arms, my legs, my chest. 

It itched so badly, I felt I couldn’t breathe. 

I’m suffocating, I realized. The ants—they’re going to smother me! 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed, squirming and slapping. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

To my surprise, ants started to drop off my body. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed again. 

Ants showered down to the ground. They leaped out of my hair, dropped 
off my forehead, off the front of my shirt. 

I stared in amazement as they fell to the ground. Then they scurried away, 
climbing over each other, stampeding over and under the tall grass. 

I rubbed my neck. I scratched my legs. My whole body still tingled. I still 
itched all over. 



But the big ants were gone. They had all jumped off when I shouted my 
special word. 

Special word. 

I glanced down over my shirt, trying to rub away the horrible tingling. 
Inside my pocket, the shrunken head’s eyes glowed. A bright yellow glow. 

“Whoa!” I grabbed the head and tugged it from the pocket. I held it up in 
front of me. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted. 

The eyes glowed brighter. 

My special word. 

Where did the word come from? I didn’t know. I thought I made it up. 

But I suddenly knew that the word was the secret behind the Jungle Magic. 

The word—and the shrunken head. 

Somehow the word brought the Jungle Magic to life. When I shouted it out, 
the ants jumped off me and hurried away. 

I gazed at the glowing little head with new excitement. My heart pounded 
in my chest. I concentrated on the head, thinking hard. 

I did have Jungle Magic. 

Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn were right. 

I had Jungle Magic and didn’t know it. And the word Kah-lee-ah was the 
key that unlocked it. 

It had helped me get rid of the gross red ants. Would it help lead me to Aunt 
Benna? 

“Yes!” I cried out loud. “Yes!” 

I knew that it would. I knew I could find her now. 

I was no longer afraid of the jungle and its creatures. No longer afraid of 
anything that might await me in this hot, tangled jungle. 

I had Jungle Magic. 

I had it—and I knew how to use it. 

And now, I had to find Aunt Benna. 

A red morning sun rose over the treetops. The air was already hot and 
damp. Birds chirped and twittered on the tree limbs above me. 

Holding the flashlight in one hand and the shrunken head in the other, I 
started to run toward the sun. 

I’m going east, I told myself. The sun comes up in the east. 

Was it the right direction to find my aunt? 



Yes. I was sure it was right. The Jungle Magic will lead me, I decided. I just 
need to follow it, and it will take me to Aunt Benna, wherever she is hiding on 
this island. 

I ran over fat, leafy vines and low shrubs. I ducked under smooth white tree 
branches. Broad leaves of huge green ferns slapped at me as I ran through them. 

The sun beamed down on my face as I made my way through a wide, sandy 
clearing. Sweat dripped down my forehead. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as my feet slipped on the soft sand. 

My feet slid. I lost my balance. My hands shot out. The flashlight and the 
shrunken head flew onto the sand. 

“Hey—!” 

I started to sink. 

Sand rolled up over my ankles. Up my legs. 

I kicked. I waved my arms wildly. 

I pulled up my knees. Tried to step out of the deep sand. But I was sinking, 
sinking faster now. Sand up to my waist. The more I struggled, the faster I sank. 
Deeper, deeper. Down into the pit of sand. 



17 


I couldn’t move my legs. I had sunk too deep in the hot, wet sand. 

The sand crept up over my waist. 

There’s no bottom, I thought. I’m going to keep sinking. I’m going to sink 
down, down until it covers my head. Until I disappear forever. 

My friends Eric and Joel once told me that there is no such thing as 
quicksand. I wished they were here right now. I could show them how wrong 
they were! 

I opened my mouth to shout for help. But I was too panicked to make a 
sound. Only a tiny squeak came out. 

What good is shouting? I asked myself. 

There’s no one around for miles. No one who will hear me. 

The sand felt thick and heavy as I slid down, down deeper into it. I 
stretched both hands up over my head, my hands grasping, as if trying to grab 
onto something. 

I tried moving my legs. Tried to pump them, like treading water or pedaling 
a bike. 

But the sand was too heavy. I was in too deep. 

My chest heaved with terror now. I gasped in breath after breath. 

I opened my mouth once again to call for help. 

And had an idea. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed, my voice high and frightened. 

“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!” 

Nothing happened. 



18 


“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!” 

I screeched the word at the top of my lungs. 

But I continued to sink deeper, deeper into the wet, marshy pit of sand. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” 

No. Nothing. 

I waved my arms over my head. And stared up at the pale blue sky. At the 
trees at the edge of the clearing. 

Nothing but trees as far as I could see. 

No one around. No one to help me. 

“Oh!” I suddenly realized why the magic word wasn’t working. I didn’t 
have the shrunken head. The head had flown from my hand when I fell into the 
sandpit. 

Where was it? Where? 

Did it sink into the sand? 

My eyes frantically searched the yellow-brown surface. The wet sand 
bubbled all around me, making a pock-pock-pock sound. Like a thick soup. 

I sank deeper. 

And saw the shrunken head. 

It lay on the surface. Its black eyes stared up at the sky. Its hair was tangled 
beneath it, spread over the sand. 

With an excited cry, I stretched out both hands and tried to grab it. 

No. Too far away. Just out of my reach. Inches out of my reach. 

“Unnnnh.” I uttered a low grunt as I struggled to grab it. Stretched out my 
hands. Stretched. Stretched. 

I leaned forward into the sand. Leaned and stretched. 

And grabbed for it. Grabbed for it, curling my fingers. Groaning and 
gmnting. Reaching. Reaching across the wet sand. 

But no. 

I couldn’t get it. The head lay a foot from my fingertips. 

A foot that seemed a mile. 

No way. No way. 



My fingers grabbed only air. I couldn’t reach it. 

I knew I was doomed. 

My hands dropped heavily onto the wet sand. I let out a defeated sigh. 



19 


My hands made a loud slapping sound as they hit the sand. 

And the head bounced. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry. My heart started to pound. 

I slapped the surface of the wet sand again with both palms. 

The head bounced. Closer. 

Another hard slap. Another bounce. 

The head lay only a few inches away now. 

I grabbed it, held it tightly—and joyfully shouted out the word. “Kah-lee- 
ah! Kah-lee-ah! ” 

At first, nothing happened. 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze. 

“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah! ” 

I expected to fly up. To be lifted out of the sandpit. To float magically over 
to hard ground. 

“Jungle Magic—please work! Please work!” I cried out loud. 

But I didn’t move. I sank a little deeper. The sand crept up over my chest. 

I stared at the shrunken head in my hand. The black eyes appeared to stare 
back at me. 

“Help me!” I cried. “Why aren’t you helping me?” 

And then I saw the vines. 

Yellow-green vines creeping over the sandpit. Moving like long snakes. A 
dozen twisting, crawling vines, slithering toward me from all directions. 

My heart pounded as I watched the vines slither closer. Closer. Until I 
reached out with my free hand and grabbed for the end of one. 

But the vine swept past my hand, moving quickly with surprising force. It 
wrapped itself around my chest—and started to tighten. 

“No!” I uttered a cry of protest. Was it going to strangle me? 

Another vine dipped into the sand. I felt it curl around my waist. 

“No—stop!” I wailed. 

The vines tightened around me. And then they began to pull. 

The wet sand made a thwock sound as I started to move through it. 



Holding the shrunken head in the air, I let the vines tug me through the 
sand. They pulled hard and fast. The sand flew at my sides. 

A few seconds later, the vines tugged me, on my knees, onto hard ground. I 
let out a happy cry. The vines instantly let go. I watched them pull back, curling 
quickly into the tall weeds. 

I hunched there, struggling to catch my breath, watching until the vines 
slithered out of sight. Then I pulled myself to my feet. 

My legs felt shaky and weak. My whole body trembled from my close call. 

But I didn’t care. I felt like jumping up and clapping and shouting for joy. 
The Jungle Magic had worked. The Jungle Magic had saved me once again! 

The wet sand clung to my jeans, my shirt, my arms—even my hair! I shook 
myself furiously. I tucked the shrunken head into my shirt pocket. Then I began 
slapping at my clothes, brushing off chunks of sand. 

Now what? I asked myself, glancing quickly around. The sun had risen high 
in the sky. The trees and ferns and tall grass gleamed, a shimmering blur of green 
and gold. The air had grown hot. My shirt clung wetly to my back. 

Now what? 

How do I find Aunt Benna? 

I pulled the shrunken head from my pocket and held it in front of me. “Lead 
the way,” I ordered it. 

Nothing happened. 

I brushed chunks of sand off its leathery skin. I pried sand from between its 
thin black lips. 

I turned toward the sun and took a few steps. Was I still walking east? 

To my surprise, the dark eyes on the shrunken head suddenly started to 
glow. 

What did that mean? Did that mean I was getting close to Aunt Benna? Did 
it mean I was walking in the right direction? 

I decided to test it. 

I spun around and started walking back toward the sandpit. 

The eyes on the head instantly dimmed back to black. 

I turned and started walking north. 

The eyes remained dark. 

I turned back in the direction of the sun. 

Yes! The eyes began, to glow again. “Kah-lee-ah!” I cried happily. The 
head was guiding me to my aunt. 



Animals howled and insects chittered loudly as I made my way through the 
trees and tall weeds. It all sounded like music to me now. 

“Aunt Benna, here I come!” I cheered. 

I found myself walking deeper into the jungle. I had to keep ducking my 
head to avoid low branches and thick vines that stretched from tree to tree. 

I heard weird bird calls overhead. As if the birds were talking to each other. 
As I ducked under a low limb, the whole tree seemed to shake. And a thousand 
black birds leaped off the branches, cawing angrily, so many of them they 
darkened the sky as they flapped away. 

I suddenly came to a small clearing that forked into two branches, one to 
the left, one to the right. Which way should I go? 

I held the shrunken head in front of me, watching it carefully. I started to 
the left. 

The eyes grew dark. Wrong way. 

I turned and started to the right, watching the eyes begin to glow again. 

Was Aunt Benna hiding somewhere in these trees? Was I getting close? 

The trees ended suddenly again, and I found myself in a grassy clearing. I 
squinted in the bright sunlight, my eyes sweeping over the shimmering green 
grass. 

Alow growl made me spin back toward the trees. 

“Oh—!” I let out a sharp cry as I saw the tiger. My legs nearly crumpled 
under me. 

The tiger raised its head in another growl. An angry growl. It pulled back its 
lips, baring enormous teeth. It arched its back, its yellow-brown fur standing 
straight on end. 

Then with a furious hiss, it came charging at me. 



20 


The tiger’s huge paws pounded over the grass. Its yellow eyes burned into mine. 

I glimpsed two little cubs behind it, nestled in the shade of a tree. 

“I’m not going to hurt your cubs!” I wanted to cry. 

But of course there was no time. 

The tiger let out a furious roar as it charged. 

The roar drowned out my cry as I raised the shrunken head in front of me in 
a trembling hand. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

My voice came out in a whimper. 

I nearly dropped the head. My knees collapsed. I sank to the grass. 

The tiger closed in for the kill. Its heavy paws thudded the dirt as it leaped 
toward me. 

The ground felt as if it were shaking. 

The ground was shaking! 

To my horror, I heard a deafening ripping sound. Like Velcro being torn 
apart. Only a thousand times louder. 

I let out a cry as the ground trembled. Shook. 

Split apart. 

The grass tore away. The dirt split in two. 

The earth opened up. 

And I started to fall. Down into an endless hole in the earth. 

Down, down. 

Screaming all the way. 



21 


“Owww!” 

I landed hard on my elbows and knees. Pain shot through my body. I 
actually saw stars! Hundreds of them, all red and yellow. 

Trying to blink them away, I raised myself to my knees. 

The shrunken head had bounced out of my hand. I spotted it a few feet 
away in the dirt. I dove for it, grabbed it up in my shaking hand, and held onto it 
tightly. 

I felt dizzy and shaken. I closed my eyes and waited for the dizziness to 

pass. 

When I opened them, I realized I had fallen into a deep pit. Walls of dirt 
surrounded me. The blue sky was a small square high above my head. 

Jungle Magic had saved me once again. The magic had caused the ground 
to split open so that I could fall to safety. So that I could escape the tiger. 

I heard a low growl above me. 

With a frightened cry, I gazed up to the top of the pit. And saw two yellow 
eyes glaring down at me. 

The tiger snarled, baring its teeth. 

I didn’t escape, I realized. 

I’m trapped down here. If the tiger leaps down into the pit, it will finish me 
off in seconds. 

I have nowhere to run. No way to escape. 

I fell back against the wall of dirt. I stared up at the snarling tiger. It eyed 
me hungrily, roaring again. Preparing to leap to the attack. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I cried. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

The tiger roared in reply. 

I pressed my back against the dirt. Tried to stop my whole body from 
shaking. 

Please don’t come down here! I begged silently. Please don’t jump down 
into this pit! 

The yellow eyes glowed in the sunlight. The silvery whiskers twitched as 
the tiger snarled its toothy warning. 

And then I saw a little yellow-and-black cat face appear at the top of the pit. 



One of the tiger cubs. It peered down at me over the edge of the grass. 

The other cub popped up beside it. It leaned over the pit edge. Leaned so 
far, it nearly fell in! 

The tiger moved quickly. She lowered her head—and bumped the cub away 
from the edge. Then she picked up the other cub in her teeth and carried it away. 

I swallowed hard. I didn’t move. My back pressed against the cool dirt, I 
stared up to the top. Watched the square of blue sky. And waited for the tiger to 
return. 

Waited. 

And waited. Holding my breath. 

Silence now. So silent I could hear the wind rushing through the tall grass. 

A chunk of dirt broke off the pit wall and toppled to the bottom, crumbling 
as it landed. I kept my gaze on the opening, listening hard, watching for the tiger. 

After what seemed like hours, I let out a long whoosh of air. I stepped away 
from the dirt wall and stretched. 

The tiger isn’t coming back, I decided. 

She only wanted to protect her cubs from me. By now, she has taken them 
away. Far away. 

I stretched again. My heart was still thumping hard in my chest. But I was 
starting to feel a little more normal. 

How do I get out of here? I wondered, gazing at the steep dirt walls. Can I 
climb out? 

I tucked the shrunken head back into my pocket. Then I dug both hands into 
the soft, cool dirt and tried to climb. 

I pulled myself up about a foot or two. But then the dirt broke off under my 
sneakers. It crumbled and fell, sending me sliding back to the bottom. 

No. No way. I can’t climb out, I realized. 

I reached for the shrunken head. I’ll have to use Jungle Magic, I decided. 

The magic got me down here. Now I can use it to get me out. 

I raised the head in front of me. But before I could call out the word, 
darkness fell over the pit. 

Is the sun setting already? I wondered. 

I gazed up to the top. 

No. It wasn’t evening. The square of sky that I could see was still bright 

blue. 

Someone stood up there, blocking the sunlight. 



The tiger? 

A human? 

I squinted hard, struggling to see. 
“Who-who’s there?” I called. 



22 


A face leaned over the edge, peering down at me. Squinting into the bright 
sunlight, I saw straight blond hair. Pale blue eyes. 

“Kareen!” I shouted. 

She cupped her hands around her mouth. “Mark—what are you doing down 
there?” 

“What are you doing here?” I cried. 

Her hair fell over her face. She brushed it back. “I—I followed you. I was 
so worried about you!” 

“Get me out of here!” I shouted up to her. I tried climbing again. But the 
dirt slid out from under my sneakers. 

“How?” she called down. 

“I guess you didn’t bring a ladder with you?” I shouted. 

“Uh—no, Mark,” Kareen sniped. 

I guess she doesn’t have much of a sense of humor. 

“Maybe I could drop a rope down or something,” she suggested. 

“Rope isn’t too easy to find in the middle of the jungle,” I reminded her. 

She shook her head. Her face tightened into a fretful frown. 

“How about a vine?” I called up. “See if you can find a long vine. I could 
climb up a vine.” 

Her expression brightened. She disappeared. I waited impatiently. And 
waited. “Please hurry,” I murmured out loud, my eyes on the square opening at 
the top. “Please hurry.” 

I heard the squawk of birds somewhere up above. Fluttering wings. More 
squawking and cawing. 

Are the birds frightened? I wondered. If they are, why? Has the tiger 
returned? 

I pressed against the dirt wall, watching the sky. 

Finally, Kareen reappeared. “I found a vine. But I don’t know if it’s long 
enough.” 

“Lower it over the side,” I instructed her. “Quick. I have to get out of here. I 
feel like a trapped animal.” 



“It was hard to pull it out of the ground,” she complained. She began 
lowering the vine. It looked like a long snake twining down the side of the pit. 

It stopped a few feet above my head. “I’m going to jump up and grab it,” I 
told Kareen. “Then I’ll try to climb while you pull. Wrap the other end around 
your waist, okay? Just don’t let go of it!” 

“Just don’t pull me down with you!” she called back. 

I waited for her to tie the vine around herself. Then I bent my knees and 
jumped. I missed the end of the vine by a few inches. 

This was one of those times I wished I were tall and thin instead of short 
and chubby. 

But I grabbed the vine on my third try. I wrapped both hands around it. 

Then I pressed the soles of my sneakers against the dirt wall. And started to 
pull myself up, like a mountain climber. 

The dirt kept crumbling out from under me. And the vine grew more and 
more slippery as my hands started to sweat. But with Kareen cheering me on, I 
scrambled to the top. 

I lay in the tall grass for a moment, breathing in the sweet fragrance. It felt 
so wonderful to be out of that deep hole. 

“How did you fall down there anyway?” Kareen asked, tossing her end of 
the vine to the ground. 

“It was easy,” I replied. I climbed to my feet and tried to brush the dirt off 
my clothes. 

“But didn’t you see that big pit there?” she demanded. 

“Not exactly,” I told her. I wanted to change the subject. “How did you find 
me? What are you doing here, Kareen?” 

Her blue eyes locked on mine. “I was worried about you. I—I didn’t think 
you should be all alone in the jungle. So I sneaked away. Daddy was working in 
his lab. I crept away from the headquarters, and I followed you.” 

I brushed clumps of dirt from my hair. “Well, I’m glad,” I confessed. “But 
aren’t you going to be in major trouble with your dad and Carolyn?” 

She bit her lower lip. “Probably. But it will be worth the risk—if we find 
your aunt.” 

Aunt Benna! 

Trying to survive the quicksand and the tiger, I had nearly forgotten about 
her. 

A shadow rolled over us. The air suddenly grew cooler. I glanced up at the 



sky. The sun was lowering itself behind the trees. 

“It’s almost night,” I said quietly. “I—I hope we can find Aunt Benna 
before it gets really dark.” 

I had already spent one night out in the jungle. I didn’t want to spend 
another. 

“Do you know which way to go?” Kareen asked. “Are you just wandering 
around, hoping to get lucky?” 

“No way,” I replied. I pulled the head from my shirt pocket. “This little guy 
is showing me the way.” 

“Excuse me?” Kareen’s face filled with surprise. 

“The eyes light up when I go the right direction,” I explained. “At least, I 
think that’s why they light up.” 

Kareen gasped. “You mean, you really do have Jungle Magic?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I have it. It’s so weird. There’s a word I’ve always said. 
‘Kah-lee-ah.’ Just a crazy word. I thought I made it up when I was a little kid. 
But it’s the word that makes the Jungle Magic work.” 

“Wow!” Kareen exclaimed. A grin spread across her face. “That’s awesome, 
Mark! That means we really will find Benna. That’s so great!” 

The shadows over the ground grew longer as the sun dipped lower. I 
shivered as a cold gust of wind blew over us. 

My stomach growled. I couldn’t remember when my last meal was. I tried 
not to think about food. I had to keep moving. 

“Let’s get going,” I said softly. I raised the head in front of me. Then I 
turned slowly—one direction, then the next—until the eyes began to glow. “This 
way!” I cried, pointing across the clearing to the trees. 

We started walking side by side. The tall grass swished, brushing our legs 
as we stepped through it. Insects chittered in the trees. 

Kareen stared in amazement at the glowing eyes on the leathery head. “Do 
you really think it’s guiding us to Benna?” 

“We’ll soon find out,” I said solemnly. 

We stepped into the shifting darkness beneath the tangled trees. 



23 


As the sunlight faded, the jungle sounds changed. The birds in the trees stopped 
chirping. The shrill sawing of the insects grew louder. We heard strange animal 
howls and cries in the distance, the sound bouncing between the smooth trees. 

I hoped the howls and cries stayed in the distance! 

Dark creatures slithered through the tall weeds and low, fat ferns and 
shrubs. The shrubs appeared to tremble as night creatures scurried through them. 

I heard the warning hiss of snakes. The eerie hoot of an owl. The soft flap 
of bat wings. 

I moved closer to Kareen as we walked. The sounds were all so much more 
realistic than in my Jungle King game! 

I’ll probably never play that game again after this, I thought. It will seem 
way too tame. 

We pushed our way through a clump of tall, stiff reeds. The eyes on the 
shrunken head dimmed to black. 

“Wrong way!” I whispered. 

Kareen and I turned until the eyes glowed again. Then we moved forward, 
making our own path. We stepped over thick vines and pushed through tangles 
of weeds and low shrubs. 

“Ow!” Kareen slapped at her forehead. “Stupid mosquito.” 

The shrill scratching of insects grew louder, drowning out the crunch of our 
sneakers over the leaves and vines on the jungle floor. 

As the darkness deepened, the eyes on the shrunken head appeared to glow 
brighter. Like twin flashlights, guiding us through the trees. 

“I’m getting kind of tired,” Kareen complained. She ducked her head to 
avoid a low branch. “I hope your aunt is nearby. I don’t know how much longer I 
can walk.” 

“I hope she’s nearby, too,” I murmured in reply. I’d had a pretty exhausting 
day myself! 

As we walked, I couldn’t help thinking about Aunt Benna and her 
notebook. I didn’t want to make Kareen feel bad. But I had to say something. 

“My aunt didn’t write very nice things about your dad and Carolyn in her 
notebook,” I said, keeping my eyes at my feet. “I was kind of surprised.” 



Kareen was silent for a long moment. “That’s so horrible,” she said finally. 
“They worked together for so long. I knew they had an argument.” 

“About what?” I asked. 

Kareen let out a sigh. “Daddy has some plans to develop the jungle. He 
thinks there are valuable minerals here. Benna thinks the jungle should be 
preserved.” 

She sighed again. “I think that’s what they fought about. I’m not sure.” 

“The notebook made it seem like your dad is evil or something,” I 
muttered, avoiding her eyes. 

“Evil? Daddy?” she cried. “No. No way. He’s very strong-minded. That’s 
all. He isn’t evil. And I know that Daddy still cares about Benna. He still 
respects her and cares about her. He’s really worried about her. He—” 

“Whoa.” I grabbed Kareen’s arm, interrupting her. “Look.” I pointed 
through the trees. 

I spotted a clearing up ahead. And against the gray sky, I could see the 
black outline of a small shack. 

Kareen gasped. “That little house. Do you think—?” 

We both crept to the edge of the clearing. Something scurried quickly over 
my sneakers, but I ignored it. 

My eyes were on the tiny, dark shack. 

As we moved closer, I could see that it was built of tree limbs and sticks. 
Clumps of fat leaves made the roof. It had no window. But there were narrow 
openings between the branches. 

“Hey—!” I whispered. I saw a pale light flicker in one of the openings. 

A flashlight? A candle? 

“Someone is in there,” Kareen whispered, narrowing her eyes at the shack. 

I heard a cough. 

A woman’s cough? Aunt Benna’s cough? I couldn’t tell. 

“Do you think it’s my aunt?” I whispered, huddling close to Kareen. 

“Only one way to find out,” she whispered back. 

The shrunken head glowed brightly in my hand. The eerie yellow-green 
light splashed over the ground as Kareen and I crept closer. 

Closer. 

“Aunt Benna?” I called in a tiny voice. I cleared my throat. My heart 
pounded. “Aunt Benna? Is that you?” 



24 


I called again and stepped close to the open doorway of the small shack. I heard 
a thump inside. Saw a flash of light. And heard a startled cry. 

A lantern appeared in the doorway. My eyes went to the pale yellow light. 
And then moved up to see the woman holding the lantern. 

She was short—very short. Only about a foot taller than me, and a little 
chubby. Her straight black hair was tied back. In the glow of lantern light, I saw 
that she wore khaki slacks and a khaki safari jacket. 

“Who’s there?” She raised the lantern in front of her. 

“Aunt Benna?” I cried, moving closer. “Is that you?” 

“Mark? I don’t believe it!” she exclaimed. She came running toward me, 
the lantern swinging at her side. The light bounced over the tall grass, making 
shadows dance. 

She wrapped me in a hug. “Mark—how did you find me? What are you 
doing here?” She had a high, chirpy voice, and she talked rapidly, without taking 
a breath. 

She pushed me away from her to study my face. “I don’t believe I even 
recognized you. I haven’t seen you since you were four!” 

“Aunt Benna—what are you doing out here?” I demanded breathlessly. 
“Everyone is so worried—” 

“How did you get to Baladora?” she asked, gripping my shoulder with her 
free hand, holding the lantern high with the other. “What are you doing in the 
jungle? How did you get here?” she cried again. 

“I—I used the Jungle Magic,” I stammered. 

Her eyes went wide. With surprise? With fear? 

I suddenly realized she wasn’t looking at me. “Hello. Who are you?” Aunt 
Benna asked quietly, stretching the lantern toward the trees. 

Kareen stepped out from the edge of the clearing. In all the excitement, I 
didn’t realize that she had lingered behind. 

“That’s Kareen,” I told my aunt. “Do you know Kareen? Dr. Hawlings’ 
daughter?” 

Aunt Benna gasped. She squeezed my shoulder. “Why did you bring her 
here? Don’t you realize—?” 



“It’s okay,” Kareen said quickly. “I was worried about you. That’s why I 
followed Mark.” 

“She helped me,” I explained to Aunt Benna. “Kareen helped me get away 
from them. From Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn. Kareen helped me get through the 
jungle.” 

“But—but—” Aunt Benna sputtered. “You told her about the Jungle 
Magic?” 

“I only came to help!” Kareen insisted. “My father is worried about you. He 

“Your father wants to kill me!” Aunt Benna cried angrily. “That’s why I had 
to mn away. That’s why I had to leave everything behind and hide in the jungle.” 
She glared at Kareen, her eyes squinting, her face pinched and hard in the yellow 
lantern light. 

“Kareen is okay,” I assured her. “She only wants to help, Aunt Benna. 
Really.” 

My aunt turned to me. “Carolyn and Hawlings brought you here?” 

I nodded. “Yes. To find you. Carolyn brought me this.” I pulled the 
shrunken head from my shirt pocket. It had stopped glowing. 

“They told me I had Jungle Magic,” I continued. “I didn’t know what they 
meant. I thought they were crazy. Then, when I went out to look for you in the 
jungle, I discovered that I did have it.” 

Aunt Benna nodded. “Yes. You have it, Mark. I gave it to you when I 
visited you. When you were four. I hypnotized you. And I transferred the Jungle 
Magic from me to you. To keep it safe.” 

“Yes. I read your notebook,” I told her. “I read about why you gave me the 
magic. But it didn’t say what Jungle Magic is. I only know—” 

“It’s a powerful force,” my aunt replied, lowering her voice. “It’s a 
powerful force that will do your will, carry out your wishes.” 

Her eyes filled with sadness. “But we cannot talk about it now,” she said in 
a whisper. “We are in danger here, Mark. Real danger.” 

I started to reply. But I heard rustling, cracking sounds from the trees. 
Footsteps? 

All three of us spun around toward the sound. 

To my surprise, Kareen started running across the grass. She cupped her 
hands around her mouth. “Over here, Daddy!” she shouted. “Over here! I found 
Benna, Daddy! Hurry!” 



25 


I gasped in shock. 

No time to run. 

A beam of light flickered out from the trees. Behind it came Dr. Hawlings, 
trotting over the tall grass. He carried a flashlight in one hand. The light swept 
into my eyes, then moved over Aunt Benna. 

Was Dr. Hawlings carrying a gun? Some kind of weapon? I couldn’t see. 
And I didn’t want to find out. 

I grabbed Aunt Benna’s arm and tugged. I wanted to run, to escape into the 
jungle. 

But my aunt refused to move. She seemed frozen in surprise. Or fear. 

Kareen’s father trotted up to us, breathing hard. Even in the dim light, I 
could see the pleased smile on his face. 

“Good work, Kareen.” He patted her shoulder. “I knew that if you helped 
Mark escape, he would lead us right to his aunt.” 

Still holding onto Aunt Benna’s arm, I stared at Kareen angrily. She had 
tricked me. She had pretended to be my friend. But the whole time, she was 
working to help her father. 

Kareen stared back at me for a moment. Then she lowered her eyes to the 
ground. 

“Why did you trick me?” I demanded. “Why did you do it, Kareen?” 

She raised her eyes to me. “Daddy needs the Jungle Magic,” she replied 
softly. 

“But you lied to me!” I cried. 

“I didn’t have a choice,” Kareen said. “If your father needed your help, 
what would you do?” 

“You did the right thing, Kareen,” Dr. Hawlings told her. 

He raised the light to Aunt Benna’s face. He forced her to cover her eyes. 
“Did you really think you could hide forever, Benna?” he demanded softly. 

“I—I’m sorry,” I told my aunt. “It’s my fault. I—” 

“No.” Aunt Benna put a hand on my shoulder. “It’s not your fault, Mark. 
It’s my fault. You didn’t know anything about any of this. And now I’m afraid 
I’ve gotten you into a lot of trouble.” 



Dr. Hawlings snickered. “A lot of trouble. That’s the truth.” He stepped up 
to Aunt Benna. “I want the secret of Jungle Magic. Tell me the secret, Benna. 
Let me know how it works. And I will allow you and your nephew to leave the 
island in one piece.” 

In one piece? 

I didn’t like the sound of that. 

As Dr. Hawlings stared at my aunt, I slipped the shrunken head from my 
pocket. I’ll use the Jungle Magic, I decided. I’ll use the magic to get us out of 
this jam. 

I raised the head slowly in front of me. I opened my mouth to call out the 
secret word. 

But I was stopped when I caught Aunt Benna’s glance. 

She was signaling me with her eyes. Telling me not to do it. 

“What’s going on?” Dr. Hawlings demanded, angrily turning to me. “What 
are you doing?” 

“Don’t give it away, Mark,” Aunt Benna pleaded. “Don’t let them know the 
secret word.” 

I lowered the shrunken head. “I won’t,” I whispered. 

“It’s okay, Daddy,” Kareen said, her eyes on me. “I know the word. Mark 
told it to me. I can tell you what it is. It’s—” 



26 


I clamped my hand over Kareen’s mouth. “Run!” I cried to Aunt Benna. “Run— 
now!” 

With an angry cry of attack, Aunt Benna lowered her shoulder and barreled 
into Dr. Hawlings. She roared into him like a football player—and sent him 
sprawling against the little shack. 

He uttered a startled yelp. The flashlight flew out of his hand and rolled 
across the ground. 

I spun away from Kareen and followed my aunt. Our shoes thudded over 
the tall grass as we ran for the trees. 

We were nearly to the edge of the clearing when Carolyn stepped in front of 
us. “What’s your hurry?” she demanded, moving to block our way. “The party is 
just starting.” 

Aunt Benna and I whirled around. Dr. Hawlings had moved up behind us. 
We were trapped. 

Carolyn raised her flashlight. Her silvery eyes narrowed at Aunt Benna. 
Carolyn smiled. A cold, unpleasant smile. “How are you, Benna? We missed 
you.” 

“Enough chitchat,” Dr. Hawlings muttered, gesturing with his flashlight. 
“It’s too dark to go back to the headquarters. We’ll have to spend the night here.” 

“How cozy,” Carolyn said, still smiling that cold smile at Aunt Benna. 

Aunt Benna scowled and looked away. “Carolyn, I thought you were my 
friend.” 

“We’re all good friends here,” Dr. Hawlings said. “And good friends like to 
share. That’s why you’re going to share the secret of Jungle Magic with us, 
Benna.” 

“Never!” my aunt declared, crossing her arms in front of her. 

“Never isn’t a word for friends,” Dr. Hawlings scolded. “In the morning, 
we will go back to the headquarters. Then you will share everything, Benna. You 
will share all of your secrets. And you will give the Jungle Magic to Carolyn and 
me.” 

“Like a good friend,” Carolyn added. 

“Let’s go,” Dr. Hawlings said. He put a heavy hand on my back and shoved 



me toward the little shack. Kareen was sitting on the ground, her collar pulled 
up, her back leaning against one wall. 

“You and Benna—in the shack,” Dr. Hawlings ordered, giving me another 
rough shove. “That way, we can keep an eye on you.” 

“You’re wasting your time, Richard,” Aunt Benna told him. She was trying 
to sound tough, but her voice trembled as she said it. 

Dr. Hawlings forced us into the dark shack. Aunt Benna and I stretched out 
on the floor. Through the cracks in the wall, I could see the darting light of their 
flashlights. 

“Are they going to guard us all night?” I whispered. 

Aunt Benna nodded. “We’re their prisoners now,” she whispered back. She 
sighed. “But we can’t let them have the Jungle Magic. We can’t!” 

I slid closer to my aunt. “If we don’t give it to them,” I said softly, “what 
will they do to us?” 

Aunt Benna didn’t reply. 

“What will they do to us?” I repeated. 

She stared down at the floor and didn’t answer. 



27 


A red ball of a sun was rising in the early morning sky when Dr. Hawlings poked 
his head into the shack and woke us up. 

I had slept only a few minutes. The shack had no floor, and the ground was 

hard. 

Whenever I closed my eyes, I dreamed about the shrunken head in my 
pocket. I dreamed that I held it in my hand. It blinked its eyes and its lips began 
to move. 

“You are doomed /” it exclaimed in a horrifying, hoarse whisper. “You are 
doomed. Doomed. Doomed! ” 

Aunt Benna and I scrambled out of the shack, stretching and yawning. Even 
though the sun was still low over the trees, the air already felt hot and wet. 

My whole body ached from lying on the hard ground. My shirt was damp 
and smelly. My stomach growled. I scratched my neck and discovered it was 
covered with mosquito bites. 

Not one of the great mornings. 

And it wasn’t going to get any better. 

We walked for hours through the sweltering jungle. Carolyn and Kareen led 
the way. Dr. Hawlings walked behind Aunt Benna and me, making sure we 
didn’t try to escape. 

No one said a word. The only sounds were the cries of animals, the chirping 
of birds overhead, and the swish of the tall weeds and grass as we pushed 
through. 

Swarms of white gnats flew up off the path, swirling together like small 
tornadoes. The sun beamed down through the trees, burning the back of my 
neck. 

When we finally made it back to the row of cabins, I was hot, sweaty, 
starving, and dying of thirst. 

Dr. Hawlings shoved Aunt Benna and me into an empty cabin. He slammed 
the door behind us and locked it. 

The cabin had two folding chairs and a small bed without sheets or 
blankets. I dropped down wearily onto the bare mattress. “What is he going to do 
to us?” 



Aunt Benna bit her lip. “Don’t worry,” she said softly. “I’ll figure 
something out.” She crossed the small room and tried the window. It was either 
stuck or bolted from the outside. 

“Maybe we can break the glass,” I suggested. 

“No, he’ll hear it,” Aunt Benna replied. 

I rubbed the back of my neck. The mosquito bites were itching like crazy. I 
wiped sweat off my forehead with the back of my hand. 

The door opened. Kareen entered, carrying two small bottles of water. She 
tossed one to me and one to my aunt. Then she turned quickly, closed the door 
hard behind her, and carefully locked it. 

I tilted the bottle to my mouth and gulped down the water without taking a 
breath. There were a few drops left at the bottom. I sprinkled them over the top 
of my head. Then I tossed the bottle to the floor. 

“What are we going to do?” I asked Aunt Benna. 

She was sitting in one of the folding chairs, her feet resting on the other. 
She raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhh.” 

Outside, I heard the rattle of machinery. A metallic clang. I heard the rush 
of water from a hose. 

I hurried to the window and peered out. But it faced the wrong way. I 
couldn’t see anything. 

“We’ve had one lucky break,” Aunt Benna murmured. 

I stared at her. “Excuse me?” 

“One lucky break,” she repeated. “Hawlings didn’t take away the shrunken 
head. It was so dark last night, I don’t think he saw it.” 

I pulled the head out from my pocket. The black hair had become tangled. I 
started to smooth it back. 

“Put it away, Mark,” Aunt Benna ordered sharply. “We don’t want 
Hawlings to see it. He doesn’t know that the head is needed for Jungle Magic.” 

“This particular head?” I asked, shoving it back in the pocket. “Only this 
head?” 

Aunt Benna nodded. “Yes. That head and the magic word. The word I gave 
you when I hypnotized you. When you were four.” 

The head’s black hair fell over my pocket. I carefully tucked it inside. 

Outside, I heard another metallic clank. I heard a splash. The roar of water 
grew louder. 

“We are in terrible danger,” Aunt Benna said softly. “You will have to use 



the Jungle Magic to save us, Mark.” 

I felt a chill of fear. But I muttered, “No problem.” 

“Wait till I give you the signal,” Aunt Benna instructed. “When I blink my 
eyes three times, pull the shrunken head out and shout the word. Keep watching 
me. Watch for the signal—okay?” 

Before I could reply, the door burst open. Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn hurried 
in, their faces grim. 

Dr. Hawlings carried a large silvery pistol. “Outside,” he ordered, waving 
the pistol at Aunt Benna and me. 

Carolyn led the way down the row of cabins. She turned and made us stop 
behind the main headquarters building. Kareen stood against the wall, a wide- 
brimmed straw hat pulled down over her eyes. 

The sun beamed down. The back of my neck prickled and itched. 

Huddling close to my aunt, I squinted into the bright sunlight. To my right, 
the big pile of shrunken heads came into focus. 

The dark eyes on the leathery, purple-and-brown heads seemed to stare at 
me. The mouths were all twisted in ugly expressions of anger and horror. 

I turned away from the terrifying pile of tiny heads—to see something even 
more terrifying. 

An enormous black pot stood behind the headquarters building. Water 
brimmed over the top, bubbling and boiling. 

The pot stood on some kind of electric burner. Like a stove burner. It glared 
red hot. The boiling water inside the pot bubbled and steamed. 

I turned to Aunt Benna and caught the fear on her face. “You can’t do this!” 
she screamed to Dr. Hawlings. “You know you can’t get away with this!” 

“I don’t want to hurt you,” Dr. Hawlings said calmly, without any emotion 
at all. A smile spread over his face. “I don’t want to harm you, Benna. I just want 
to own the Jungle Magic.” 

I kept my eyes locked on my aunt. Waiting for her signal. Waiting for the 
three blinks that meant I should go into action. 

“Give me the Jungle Magic,” Dr. Hawlings insisted. 

Carolyn stepped up beside him, hands on her waist. “Give it to us, Benna. 
We don’t want trouble. We really don’t.” 

“No!” The word shot out of my aunt’s mouth. “No! No! No! You both 
know that I will never give up the secret of Jungle Magic. Not to you. Not ever!” 

Carolyn sighed. “Please, Benna. Don’t make it difficult.” 



My aunt stared back at her. “Never,” she murmured. 

Aunt Benna blinked. 

I swallowed hard, watching for two more blinks. 

No. Not the signal. Not yet. 

Dr. Hawlings stepped forward. “Please, Benna. I’m giving you one last 
chance. Tell us the secret—now.” 

Aunt Benna shook her head. 

“Then I have no choice,” Dr. Hawlings said, shaking his head. “Since you 
two are the only ones in the world who know the secret, you are both too 
dangerous. The secret must die with you.” 

“Wh-what are you going to do to us?” I blurted out. 

“We’re going to shrink your heads,” Dr. Hawlings replied. 



28 


The pot hissed as water boiled over the side. I stared in horror at the billows of 
steam rising up over the pot. 

Was he really going to shrink our heads? 

Was I going to end up shriveled and leathery, with a head the size of a 
doorknob? 

I forced my legs to stop wobbling and stared at Aunt Benna. Stared at her. 
Stared hard. Watching her eyes. Waiting for the three blinks. 

Hurry! I pleaded silently. Hurry—before he tosses us into the boiling water! 

Kareen watched in silence. What was she thinking? I wondered. I couldn’t 
see her expression. Her face was hidden under the brim of the straw hat. 

“Benna, one last chance,” Dr. Hawlings said softly. “Because I like you. 
And I like your nephew. Don’t let me harm your nephew, Benna. Do it for him, 
okay? Tell me the secret—for Mark’s sake.” 

“It isn’t worth it, Benna,” Carolyn chimed in. “It will be so easy for you to 
give the Jungle Magic to us.” 

“I-I can’t,” Aunt Benna stammered. 

“Then we have no choice,” Dr. Hawlings said, almost sadly. “The boy goes 
in first.” 

He took a step toward me. 

Aunt Benna blinked. Once. Twice. Three times. 

Finally! 

With a trembling hand, I tugged the head from my pocket. 

I raised it in front of me. I opened my mouth to shout the secret word. 

But Dr. Hawlings swiped the head from my hand. 

He grabbed it away—and tossed it onto the big pile of heads. 

Then he dove for me, reaching out to grab me with both hands. 

I ducked out from under him. 

And threw myself onto the disgusting pile of heads. 

I began frantically sorting through them with both hands. Picking one up, 
tossing it aside. Grabbing the next one. The next one. The next one. 

They felt sticky and warm. Hard as baseballs. The hair brushed my hands. 



The dark eyes stared up at me blankly. They were so ugly, my stomach 
tightened. My breath came in wheezing gasps. 

Behind me, I could hear my aunt struggling with Dr. Hawlings. Wrestling 
with him. Trying to keep him away from me. 

I heard Carolyn’s shouts. Kareen’s cries of alarm. 

I had to find my shrunken head. 

I had to find it before Dr. Hawlings broke free of my aunt and grabbed me. 

I picked one up. Tossed it down. Picked up another. Tossed it down. 

How could I find mine? 

Which one was it? 

Which one? Which one? 



29 


I grabbed a head. Saw ants crawling over its cheeks. 

Picked up another. 

It stared at me with glassy green eyes. 

Picked up another. 

It had a long white scratch on its ear. 

I started to toss it back onto the pile. 

But stopped. 

A white scratch on its ear? 

Yes! Mine had a scratch! My sister Jessica—she scratched it back home! 

Yes! This head was mine! 

“Thank you, Jessica!” I cried at the top of my lungs. 

With an angry cry, Dr. Hawlings dove at me. He wrapped his arms around 
me and started to drag me off the pile of heads. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted, holding on tightly to the shrunken head. My 
shrunken head. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

Will it save Aunt Benna and me? I wondered. 

Will the Jungle Magic work this time? 

Dr. Hawlings still had his arms around my shoulders. He was still trying to 
pull me toward the boiling pot. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed. 

His hands slid away. 

They seemed to shrink. His arms seemed to shrink into his body. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry when I realized that he was shrinking. Dr. 
Hawlings’ entire body was shrinking, growing smaller and smaller! 

I raised my eyes to Kareen and Carolyn. They were shrinking, too. 
Shrinking down to the ground. 

Kareen disappeared under the straw hat. Then she came running out from 
under the brim. A tiny Kareen, about the size of a mouse. 

All three of them—Kareen, Carolyn, and Dr. Hawlings—scampered over 
the grass. Mouse-sized. Squeaking angrily in tiny mouse voices. 

I stood beside the pile of heads and watched them scurry over the ground. 



Squeaking and squealing. I watched them until they disappeared into the jungle. 

Then I turned back to Aunt Benna. “It worked!” I cried. “The Jungle Magic 
—it saved us!” 

She rushed forward and wrapped me in a hug. “You did it, Mark. You did 
it! The jungle is safe now! The whole world is safe!” 


* * * 


There were more hugs when Aunt Benna flew me home. Hugs from Mom—and 
even Jessica. 

They met us at the airport. Then Mom drove us home for a big welcome- 
home dinner. I had so many stories to tell, I started telling them in the car. And I 
didn’t stop talking until way past dinner. 

It was nearly bedtime when Aunt Benna led me into the den. She closed the 
door behind us. Then she sat me down on the couch. 

She sat down beside me. “Look into my eyes,” she said softly. “Look 
deeply, Mark. Very deeply.” 

I raised my eyes to hers. “What are you going to do?” I asked. 

I didn’t hear her reply. 

As I stared into her eyes, the room grew fuzzy. The colors all seemed to 
shift and blur. I thought I saw the posters on the den wall flipping over and over. 
I thought I saw the chairs and coffee table sliding across the floor. 

After a while, the room came back into focus. Aunt Benna smiled at me. 
“There,” she said, squeezing my hand. “You’re back to normal, Mark.” 

“Huh?” I squinted at her. “What do you mean?” 

“No more Jungle Magic,” she explained. “I took it back. You’re a normal 
boy again.” 

“You mean, if I shout ‘Kah-lee-ah’ nothing will happen?” I asked. 

“That’s right.” She smiled at me, still holding my hand. “I took back the 
magic. The shrunken head has no powers. And you have no powers. You never 
have to worry about it again.” 

She stood up, yawning. “It’s getting late. Bedtime, don’t you think?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” I was still thinking about how I didn’t have 
Jungle Magic anymore. “Aunt Benna?” 

“Yes?” 


“Can I keep the shrunken head?” 



“Of course,” she replied, tugging me to my feet. “Keep the shrunken head. 
As a souvenir. That way, you will always remember your jungle adventure.” 

“I don’t think I could forget it too easily,” I replied. Then I said good night 
and made my way to bed. 

The next morning, I woke up early and pulled on my clothes as fast as I could. I 
couldn’t wait to get to school and show off the shrunken head to Eric and Joel 
and all the other kids. 

I gulped down my cornflakes and chugged my orange juice. I strapped on 
my backpack. Called good-bye to Mom. Grabbed the shrunken head and headed 
out the door. 

Holding the head carefully in my hand, I started to jog along the sidewalk. 
It was a bright, sunny day. The air smelled warm and sweet. 

My school is only three blocks from my house. But as I jogged along, it 
seemed like miles. 

I couldn’t wait to get there and show off to everyone. 

I couldn’t wait to tell my friends about all my jungle adventures. 

I could see the school in the next block. And I could see a bunch of kids 
hanging out by the front door. 

As I ran across the street, I suddenly felt the head move in my hand. 

It twitched. 

“Huh?” I let out a gasp and stared down at it. 

The eyes blinked, then stared up at me. The lips closed, then opened again. 
“Hey, kid,” the head growled. “Let me tell the part about the tiger!” 



Search





NIGHT OF THE 
LIVING DUMMY III 


Goosebumps - 40 
R.L. Stine 





1 


The stairs up to my attic are narrow and steep. The fifth step is loose and 
wobbles when you stand on it. All the other stairs creak and groan. 

My whole house creaks and groans. It’s a big, old house. And it’s kind of 
falling apart. Mom and Dad don’t really have the money to repair it. 

“Trina—hurry!” my brother, Dan, whispered. His words echoed in the steep 
attic stairwell. Dan is ten, and he is always in a hurry. 

He’s short and very skinny. I think he looks like a mouse. He has short 
brown hair, dark eyes, and a pointy little chin. And he’s always scurrying around 
like a mouse searching for a place to hide. 

Sometimes I call him Mouse. You know. Like a nickname. Dan hates it. So 
I only call him Mouse when I want to make him mad. 

Dan and I don’t look at all like brother and sister. I’m tall and I have curly 
red hair and green eyes. I’m a little chubby, but Mom says not to worry about it. 
I’ll probably slim down by the time I’m thirteen, next August. 

Anyway, no one would ever call me Mouse! For one thing, I’m a lot braver 
than Dan. 

You have to be brave to go up to our attic. Not because of the creaking 
stairs. Or the way the wind whistles through the attic windows and makes the 
panes rattle. Not because of the dim light up there. Or the shadows. Or the low 
ceiling covered with cracks. 

You have to be brave because of the eyes. 

The dozens of eyes that stare at you through the darkness. 

The eyes that never blink. The eyes that stare with such eerie, heavy 
silence. 

Dan reached the attic ahead of me. I heard him take a few steps over the 
squeaking, wooden floorboards. Then I heard him stop. 

I knew why he stopped. He was staring back at the eyes, at the grinning 
faces. 

I crept up behind him, moving on tiptoe. I leaned my face close to his ear. 
And I shouted, “BOO!” 

He didn’t jump. 

“Trina, you’re about as funny as a wet sponge,” he said. He shoved me 



away. 

“I think wet sponges are funny,” I replied. I admit it. I like to annoy him. 

“Give me a break,” Dan muttered. 

I grabbed his arm. “Okay.” I pretended to break it in two. 

I know it’s dumb. But that’s the way my brother and I kid around all the 

time. 

Dad says we didn’t get our sense of humor from him. But I think we 
probably did. 

Dad owns a little camera store now. But before that he was a ventriloquist. 
You know. He did a comedy act with a dummy. 

Danny O’Dell and Wilbur. 

That was the name of the act. Wilbur was the dummy, in case you didn’t 
guess it. 

Danny O’Dell is my dad. My brother is Dan, Jr. But he hates the word 
junior, so no one ever calls him that. 

Except me. When I want to make him really mad! 

“Someone left the attic light on,” Dan said, pointing to the ceiling light. The 
only light in the whole attic. 

Our attic is one big room. There are windows at both ends. But they are 
both caked with dust, so not much light gets through. 

Dan and I made our way across the room. The dummies all stared at us, 
their eyes big and blank. Most of them had wide grins on their wooden faces. 
Some of their mouths hung open. Some of their heads tilted down so we couldn’t 
see their faces. 

Wilbur—Dad’s first dummy, the original Wilbur—was perched on an old 
armchair. His hands were draped over the chair arms. His head tilted against the 
chair back. 

Dan laughed. “Wilbur looks just like Dad taking a nap!” 

I laughed, too. With his short brown hair, his black eyeglasses, and his 
goofy grin, Wilbur looked a lot like Dad! 

The old dummy’s black-and-yellow checked sports jacket was worn and 
frayed. But Wilbur’s face was freshly painted. His black leather shoes were 
shiny. 

One wooden hand had part of the thumb chipped out. But Wilbur looked 
great for such an old dummy. 

Dad keeps all of the dummies in good shape. He calls the attic his Dummy 



Museum. Spread around the room are a dozen old ventriloquist’s dummies that 
he has collected. 

He spends all of his spare time fixing them up. Painting them. Giving them 
fresh wigs. Making new suits and pants for them. Working on their insides, 
making sure their eyes and mouths move correctly. 

These days, Dad doesn’t get to use his ventriloquist skills very often. 
Sometimes he’ll take one of the dummies to a kid’s birthday party and put on a 
show. Sometimes people in town will invite him to perform at a party to raise 
money for a school or library. 

But most of the time the dummies just sit up here, staring at each other. 

Some of them are propped against the attic wall. Some are sprawled out on 
the couch. Some of them sit in folding chairs, hands crossed in their laps. Wilbur 
is the only one lucky enough to have his own armchair. 

When Dan and I were little, we were afraid to come up to the attic. I didn’t 
like the way the dummies stared at me. I thought their grins were evil. 

Dan liked to stick his hand into their backs and move their mouths. He 
made the dummies say frightening things. 

“I’m going to get you, Trina!” he would make Rocky growl. Rocky is the 
mean-faced dummy that sneers instead of smiles. He’s dressed like a tough guy 
in a red-and-white striped T-shirt and black jeans. He’s really evil-looking, “I’m 
coming to your room tonight, Trina. And I’m going to GET you!” 

“Stop it, Dan! Stop it!” I would scream. Then I would go running 
downstairs and tell Mom that Dan was scaring me. 

I was only eight or nine. 

I’m a lot older now. And braver. But I still feel a little creeped out when I 
come up here. 

I know it’s dumb. But sometimes I imagine the dummies sitting around up 
here, talking to each other, giggling and laughing. 

Sometimes late at night when I’m lying in bed, the ceiling creaks over my 
head. Footsteps! I picture the dummies walking around in the attic, their heavy 
black shoes clonking over the floorboards. 

I picture them wrestling around on the old couch. Or playing a wild game 
of catch, their wooden hands snapping as they catch the ball. 

Dumb? Of course it’s dumb. 

But I can’t help it. 

They’re supposed to be funny little guys. But they scare me. 



I hate the way they stare at me without blinking. And I hate the red-lipped 
grins frozen on their faces. 

Dan and I come up to the attic because Dan likes to play with them. And 
because I like to see how Dad fixes them up. 

But I really don’t like to come up to the attic alone. 

Dan picked up Miss Lucy. That’s the only girl dummy in the group. She has 
curly blond hair and bright blue eyes. 

My brother stuck his hand into the dummy’s back and perched her on his 
knee. “Hi, Trina,” he made the dummy say in a high, shrill voice. 

Dan started to make her say something else. 

But he stopped suddenly. His mouth dropped open—like a dummy’s—and 
he pointed across the room. 

“Trina—1-look!” Dan stammered. “Over there!” 

I turned quickly. And I saw Rocky, the mean-looking dummy, blink his 

eyes. 

I gasped as the dummy leaned forward and sneered. “Trina, I’m going to 
GET you!” he growled. 



2 


I uttered a startled cry and jumped back. 

I swung around, ready to run to the attic steps—and I saw Dan laughing. 

“Hey—!” I cried out angrily. “What’s going on here?” 

I turned back to see Dad climb to his feet behind Rocky’s chair. He carried 
Rocky in one arm. Dad’s grin was as wide as a dummy’s! 

“Gotcha!” he cried in Rocky’s voice. 

I turned angrily on my brother. “Did you know Dad was back there? Did 
you know Dad was here the whole time?” 

Dan nodded. “Of course.” 

“You two are both dummies!” I cried. I flung my red hair back with both 
hands and let out an exasperated sigh. “That was so stupid!” 

“You fell for it,” Dan shot back, grinning at Dad. 

“Who’s the dummy here?” Dad made Rocky say. “Hey—who’s pulling 
your string? I’m not a dummy—knock on wood!” 

Dan laughed, but I just shook my head. 

Dad refused to give up. “Hey—come over here!” he made Rocky say. 
“Scratch my back. I think I’ve got termites!” 

I gave in and laughed. I’d heard that joke a million times. But I knew Dad 
wouldn’t stop trying until I laughed. 

He’s a really good ventriloquist. You can never see his lips move. But his 
jokes are totally lame. 

I guess that’s why he had to give up the act and open a camera store. I don’t 
know for sure. It all happened before I was born. 

Dad set Rocky back on his chair. The dummy sneered up at us. Such a bad- 
news dummy. Why couldn’t he smile like the others? 

Dad pushed his eyeglasses up on his nose. “Come over here,” he said. “I 
want to show you something.” 

He put one hand on my shoulder and one hand on Dan’s shoulder and led us 
to the other end of the big attic room. This is where Dad has his workshop—his 
worktable and all his tools and supplies for fixing up the dummies. 

Dad reached under the worktable and pulled up a large brown-paper 
shopping bag. I could tell by the smile on his face what he had in the bag. But I 



didn’t say anything to min his surprise. 

Slowly, carefully, Dad reached into the shopping bag. His smile grew wider 
as he lifted out a dummy. “Hey, guys—check this out!” Dad exclaimed. 

The dummy had been folded up inside the bag. Dad set it down flat on the 
worktable and carefully unfolded the arms and legs. He looked like a surgeon 
starting an operation. 

“I found this one in a trash can,” he told us. “Do you believe someone just 
threw it away?” 

He tilted the dummy up so we could see it. I followed Dan up to the 
worktable to get a better look. 

“The head was split in two,” Dad said, placing one hand at the back of the 
dummy’s neck. “But it took two seconds to repair it. Just a little glue.” 

I leaned close to check out Dad’s new treasure. It had wavy brown hair 
painted on top of its head. The face was kind of strange. Kind of intense. 

The eyes were bright blue. They shimmered. Sort of like real eyes. The 
dummy had bright red painted lips, curved up into a smile. 

An ugly smile, I thought. Kind of gross and nasty. 

His lower lip had a chip on one side so that it didn’t quite match the other 
lip. 

The dummy wore a gray double-breasted suit over a white shirt collar. The 
collar was stapled to his neck. 

He didn’t have a shirt. Instead, his wooden chest had been painted white. 
Big black leather shoes—very scuffed up—dangled from his skinny gray pants 
legs. 

“Can you believe someone just tossed him into the trash?” Dad repeated. 
“Isn’t he great?” 

“Yeah. Great,” I murmured. I didn’t like the new dummy at all. I didn’t like 
his face, the way his blue eyes gleamed, the crooked smile. 

Dan must have felt the same way. “He’s kind of tough-looking,” he said. He 
picked up one of the dummy’s wooden hands. It had deep scratches all over it. 
The knuckles appeared cut and bruised. As if the dummy had been in a fight. 

“Not as tough-looking as Rocky over there,” Dad replied. “But he does 
have a strange smile.” He picked at the small chip in the dummy’s lip. “I can fill 
that in with some liquid wood filler. Then I’ll give the whole face a fresh paint 
job.” 

“What’s the dummy’s name?” I asked. 



Dad shrugged. “Beats me. Maybe we’ll call him Smiley.” 

“Smiley?” I made a disgusted face. 

Dad started to reply. But the phone rang downstairs. One ring. Two. Three. 

“I guess your mom is still at that school meeting,” Dad said. He ran to the 
stairs. “I’d better answer it. Don’t touch Smiley till I get back.” He vanished 
down the stairs. 

I picked up the dummy’s head carefully in both hands. “Dad did a great 
gluing job,” I said. 

“He should do your head next!” Dan shot back. 

Typical. 

“I don’t think Smiley is a good name for him,” Dan said, slapping the 
dummy’s hands together. 

“How about Dan Junior?” I suggested. “Or Dan the Third?” 

He ignored me. “How many dummies does Dad have now?” He turned 
back toward the others across the attic and quickly counted them. 

I counted faster. “This new one makes thirteen,” I said. 

Dan’s eyes went wide. “Whoa. That’s an unlucky number.” 

“Well, if we count you, it’s fourteen!” I said. 

Gotcha, Danny Boy! 

Dan stuck out his tongue at me. He set the dummy’s hands down on its 
chest. “Hey—what’s that?” He reached into the pocket of the gray suit jacket and 
pulled out a folded-up slip of paper. 

“Maybe that has the dummy’s name on it,” I said. I grabbed the paper out of 
Dan’s hands and raised it to my face. I unfolded it and started to read. 

“Well?” Dan tried to grab it back. But I swung out of his reach. “What’s the 
name?” 

“It doesn’t say,” I told him. “There are just these weird words. Foreign, I 
guess.” 

I moved my lips silently as I struggled to read them. Then I read the words 
out loud: “Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano. ” 

Dan’s mouth dropped open. “Huh? What’s that supposed to mean?” he 
cried. 

He grabbed the paper from my hand. “I think you read it upside down!” 

“No way!” I protested. 

I glanced down at the dummy. 

The glassy blue eyes stared up at me. 



Then the right eye slowly closed. The dummy winked at me. 

And then his left hand shot straight up—and slapped me in the face. 



3 


“Hey—!” I shouted. I jerked back as pain shot through my jaw. 

“What’s your problem?” Dan demanded, glancing up from the slip of paper. 

“Didn’t you see?” I shrieked. “He—he slapped me!” I rubbed my cheek. 

Dan rolled his eyes. “Yeah. For sure.” 

“No—really!” I cried. “First he winked at me. Then he slapped me.” 

“Tell me another one,” Dan groaned. “You’re such a jerk, Trina. Just 
because you fall for Dad’s jokes doesn’t mean I’m going to fall for yours.” 

“But I’m telling the truth!” I insisted. 

I glanced up to see Dad poke his head up at the top of the stairs. “What’s 
going on, guys?” 

Dan folded up the slip of paper and tucked it back into the dummy’s jacket 
pocket. “Nothing much,” he told Dad. 

“Dad—the new dummy!” I cried, still rubbing my aching jaw. “He slapped 

me!” 

Dad laughed. “Sorry, Trina. You’ll have to do better than that. You can’t kid 
a kidder.” 

That’s one of Dad’s favorite expressions: “You can’t kid a kidder.” 

“But, Dad—” I stopped. I could see he wasn’t going to believe me. I wasn’t 
even sure I believed it myself. 

I glanced down at the dummy. He stared blankly up at the ceiling. Totally 
lifeless. 

“I have news, guys,” Dad said, sitting the new dummy up. “That was my 
brother—your uncle Cal—on the phone. He’s coming for a short visit while 
Aunt Susan’s away on business. And he’s bringing your cousin Zane with him. 
It’s Zane’s spring vacation from school, too.” 

Dan and I both groaned. Dan stuck his finger in his mouth and pretended to 
puke. 

Zane isn’t our favorite cousin. 

He’s our only cousin. 

He’s twelve, but you’d think he was five or six. He’s pretty nerdy. His nose 
mns a lot. And he’s kind of a wimp. 

Kind of a major wimp. 



“Hey, stop groaning,” Dad scolded. “Zane is your only cousin. He’s 
family.” 

Dan and I groaned again. We couldn’t help it. 

“He isn’t a bad kid,” Dad continued, narrowing his eyes at us behind his 
glasses. That meant he was being serious. “You two have to promise me 
something.” 

“What kind of promise?” I asked. 

“You have to promise me that you’ll be nicer to Zane this time.” 

“We were nice to him last time,” Dan insisted. “We talked to him, didn’t 

we?” 

“You scared him to death last time,” Dad said, frowning. “You made him 
believe that this old house is haunted. And you scared him so badly, he ran 
outside and refused to come back in.” 

“Dad, it was all a joke,” I protested. 

“Yeah. It was a scream!” Dan agreed. He poked me in the side with his 
elbow. “A scream. Get it?” 

“Not funny,” Dad said unhappily. “Not funny at all. Listen, guys—Zane 
can’t help it if he’s a little timid. He’ll outgrow it. You just have to be nice to 
him.” 

Dan snickered. “Zane is afraid of your dummies, Dad. Can you believe it?” 
“Then don’t drag him up here and scare the life out of him,” Dad ordered. 
“How about if we just play one or two little jokes on him?” Dan asked. 

“No tricks,” Dad replied firmly. “None.” 

Dan and I exchanged glances. 

“Promise me,” Dad insisted. “I mean it. Right now. Both of you. Promise 
me there will be no tricks. Promise me you won’t try to scare your cousin.” 

“Okay. I promise,” I said. I raised my right hand as if I were swearing an 

oath. 

“I promise, too,” Dan said softly. 

I checked to see if his fingers were crossed. They weren’t. 

Dan and I had both made a solemn promise. We both promised not to terrify 
our cousin. And we meant it. 

But it was a promise we couldn’t keep. 

Before the week was over, our cousin Zane would be terrified. 

And so would we. 



4 


I was playing the piano when Zane arrived. The piano is tucked away in a small 
room in the back of the house. It’s a small black upright piano, kind of beat-up 
and scratched. Dad bought it from my old music teacher who moved to 
Cleveland. 

Two of the pedals don’t work. And the piano really needs to be tuned. But I 
love to play it—especially when I’m stressed out or excited. It always helps to 
calm me down. 

I’m pretty good at it. Even Dan agrees. Most of the time he pushes me off 
the piano bench so he can play “Chopsticks”. But sometimes he stands beside 
me and listens. I’ve been practicing some nice Haydn pieces and some of the 
easy Chopin etudes. 

Anyway, I was in the back of the house banging away on the piano when 
Zane and Uncle Cal arrived. I guess I was a little nervous about seeing Zane 
again. 

Dan and I were really mean to him during his last visit. Like Dad said, Zane 
has always been scared of this old house. And we did everything we could to 
make him even more scared. 

We walked around in the attic every night, howling softly like ghosts, 
making the floor creak. We crept into his bedroom closet in the middle of the 
night and made him think his clothes were dancing. We rigged a pair of Mom’s 
panty hose so they cast a ghostly shadow of legs onto his bedroom floor. 

Poor Zane. I think Dan and I went a little too far. After a few days, he 
jumped at every sound. And his eyes kept darting from side to side like a 
frightened lizard’s. 

I heard him tell Uncle Cal that he never wanted to come back here. 

Dan and I laughed about that. But it wasn’t very nice. 

So I was a little nervous about seeing Zane again. I was playing the piano 
so loudly, I didn’t hear the doorbell. Dan had to come running in and tell me 
Uncle Cal and Zane had arrived. 

I jumped up from the piano bench. “How does Zane look?” I asked my 
brother. 

“Big,” Dan replied. “He grew. A lot. And he let his hair grow long.” 



Zane was always a pretty big guy. That’s why Dan and I thought his being a 
total wimp was so funny. 

He’s big and beefy. Not tall. He’s built kind of like a bulldog. A big blond 
bulldog. 

I guess he’s actually good-looking. He has round blue eyes, wavy blond 
hair, and a nice smile. He looks as if he works out or plays sports. He really 
doesn’t look like the wimp type at all. 

That’s why it’s such a riot to see him quivering in fear. Or wailing like a 
baby. Running to his mom or dad in terror. 

I followed Dan through the back hall. “Did Zane say anything to you?” I 
asked. 

“Just hi,” Dan replied. 

“A friendly ‘hi’ or an unfriendly ‘hi’?” I demanded. 

Dan didn’t have time to answer. We had reached the front hall. 

“Hey—!” Uncle Cal greeted me, stretching out his arms for a hug. Uncle 
Cal looks a lot like a chipmunk. He’s very small. He has a round face, a twitchy 
little nose, and two teeth that poke out from his upper lip. 

“You’re getting so tall!” he exclaimed as I hugged him. “You’ve grown a 
lot, Trina!” 

Why do grown-ups always have to comment on how tall kids are getting? 
Can’t they think of anything else to say? 

I saw Dad lugging their two heavy suitcases up the stairs. 

“I didn’t know if you’d be hungry or not,” Mom told Uncle Cal. “So I made 
a bunch of sandwiches.” 

I turned to say hi to Zane. And a flash of white light made me cry out in 
surprise. 

“Don’t move. One more,” I heard Zane say. 

I blinked rapidly, trying to clear the light from my eyes. When I finally 
focused, I saw that Zane had a camera up to his face. 

He clicked it. Another bright flash of light. 

“That’s good,” he said. “You looked really surprised. I only like to take 
candid shots.” 

“Zane is really into photography,” Uncle Cal said, grinning proudly. 

“I’m blind!” I cried, rubbing my eyes. 

“I needed extra flash because this house is so dark,” Zane said. He lowered 
his head to the camera and fiddled with his lens. 



Dad came shuffling down the stairs. Zane turned and snapped his picture. 

“Zane is really into photography,” Uncle Cal repeated to my father. “I told 
him maybe you’ve got an old camera or two at the shop that he could have.” 

“Uh... maybe,” Dad replied. 

Uncle Cal makes a lot more money than Dad. But whenever he visits, he 
always tries to get Dad to give him stuff. 

“Nice camera,” Dad told Zane. “What kind of photos do you like to take?” 

“Candid shots,” Zane replied, pushing back his blond hair. “And I take a lot 
of still lifes.” He stepped into the hall and flashed a close-up of the banister. 

Dan leaned close and whispered in my ear, “He’s still a pain. Let’s give him 
a really good scare.” 

“No way!” I whispered back. “No scares this time. We promised Dad— 
remember?” 

“I’ve set up a darkroom in the basement,” Dad told Zane. “Sometimes I 
bring developing work home from the store. You can use the darkroom this 
week, if you want to.” 

“Great!” Zane replied. 

“I told Zane maybe you have some sheets of developing paper you can 
spare,” Uncle Cal said to Dad. 

Zane raised his camera and flashed another picture. Then he turned to Dan. 
“Are you still into video games?” he asked. 

“Yeah,” Dan replied. “Mostly sports games. I have the new NBA Jams. And 
I’m saving my allowance to get the new thirty-two-bit system. You still play?” 

Zane shook his head. “Not since I got my camera. I don’t really have time 
for games anymore.” 

“How about some sandwiches, everyone?” Mom asked, moving toward the 
dining room. 

“I think I’d like to unpack first,” Uncle Cal told her. “Zane, you should 
unpack, too.” 

We all split up. Dan and Dad disappeared somewhere. Uncle Cal and Zane 
went up to their rooms to unpack—our big old house has a lot of extra 
bedrooms. 

I was heading into the kitchen to help Mom with the sandwiches when I 
heard Zane scream. 

A shrill scream from upstairs. 

A scream of horror. 



5 


Mom gasped and dropped the sandwich tray she was carrying. 

I spun around and went running to the front hall. 

Dad was already halfway up the stairs. “What’s wrong?” he called. “Zane— 
what’s the matter?” 

When I reached the second floor, I saw Dan step out of his room. Zane 
stood in the hallway. Someone lay stretched across the floor at his feet. 

Even from halfway down the hall, I could see that Zane was trembling. 

I hurried over to him. 

Who was sprawled on the floor like that, legs and arms all twisted? 

“Zane—what happened? What happened?” Dad and Uncle Cal both 
shouted. 

Zane stood there shaking all over. The camera seemed to tremble, too, 
swinging on its strap over his chest. 

I glanced down at the body on the floor. 

A ventriloquist’s dummy. 

Rocky. 

Rocky sneered up at the ceiling. His red-and-white striped shirt had rolled 
up halfway, revealing his wooden body. One leg was bent under him. Both arms 
were stretched out over the floor. 

“That d-dummy—” Zane stammered, pointing down at Rocky. “It—it fell 
on me when I opened the bedroom door.” 

“Huh? It what?” Uncle Cal cried. 

“It dropped down on me,” Zane repeated. “When I pushed the door. I didn’t 
mean to scream. It just scared me, that’s all. It was so heavy. And it fell near my 
head.” 

I turned and saw Dad glaring angrily at Dan. 

Dan raised both hands in protest. “Hey—don’t look at me!” he cried. 

“Dan, you made a promise,” Dad said sharply. 

“I didn’t do it!” Dan cried. “It had to be Trina!” 

“Hey—no way!” I protested. “No way! I didn’t do it!” 

Dad narrowed his eyes at me. “I suppose the dummy climbed up on top of 



the door by himself!” he said, rolling his eyes. 

“It was just a joke,” Uncle Cal chimed in. “You’re okay—right, Zane?” 

“Yeah. Sure.” Zane’s cheeks were red. I could see he was embarrassed by 
all the fuss. “I just wasn’t expecting something to fall on me. You know.” He 
stared at the floor. 

“Let’s finish unpacking,” Uncle Cal suggested. “I’m starting to get hungry.” 
He turned to Dad. “Do you have any extra pillows? There’s only one on my bed. 
And I like to sleep with a lot of pillows.” 

“I’ll see if we have any more,” Dad replied. He frowned at me. “You and 
Dan—take Rocky up to the attic. And no more little jokes. You promised— 
remember?” 

I picked Rocky up carefully and slung him over my shoulder. “Get the attic 
door for me,” I instructed Dan. 

We made our way down the hall. “What is your problem, Mouse?” I 
whispered to my brother. 

“Don’t call me Mouse,” he replied through gritted teeth. “You know I hate 
it.” 

“Well, I hate broken promises,” I told him. “You can’t wait one minute to 
start scaring Zane? You’re going to get us in major trouble.” 

“Me?” Dan put on his innocent act. “I didn’t hide the dummy up there. You 
did—and you know it!” 

“Did not!” I whispered angrily. 

“Hey, guys, can I come with you?” I turned to see Zane right behind us. I 
hadn’t realized he’d followed us. 

“You want to come up to the Dummy Museum?” I asked, unable to hide my 
surprise. Last visit, Zane had been afraid of the dummies. 

“Yeah. I want to take some pictures,” he replied. He raised his camera in 
both hands. 

“Cool,” Dan said. “That’s a cool idea.” I could see that he was trying to be 
friendly to Zane. 

I didn’t want to be left out. “It’s neat that you’re into photography,” I told 
Zane. 

“Yeah. I know,” he replied. 

Dan led the way up the attic stairs. Halfway up, I turned back. I saw Zane 
lingering at the bottom. 

“Are you coming up or not?” I called down. My voice echoed in the 



narrow, dark stairwell. 

I caught a look of fear on Zane’s face. He was trying to be brave, I realized. 
Trying not to be afraid the way he was last time. 

“Coming,” he called up. I saw him take a deep breath. Then he came 
mnning up the stairs. 

He stayed close to Dan and me as we crossed the attic. The eyes peered out 
at us darkly from around the big room. 

I clicked on the light. The dummies all came into view. Propped on chairs 
and the old couch, leaning against the wall, they grinned at us. 

I carried Rocky over to his folding chair. I slid him off my shoulder and set 
him down. I crossed his arms in his lap and straightened his striped shirt. The 
mean-looking dummy sneered up at me. 

“Uncle Danny has a few new guys,” Zane said from across the room. He 
stood close to Dan in front of the couch. He held the camera in his hands, but he 
didn’t take any pictures. “Where does he find them?” 

“He found the newest one in a trash can,” I replied, pointing to the mean¬ 
looking dummy. 

Dan picked up Miss Lucy and held it up to Zane. “Hiya, Zane! Take my 
picture!” Dan made Miss Lucy say in a high, shrill voice. 

Zane obediently raised the camera to his eye. “Say cheese,” he told Miss 
Lucy. 

“Cheese,” Dan said in Miss Lucy’s high voice. 

Zane flashed a picture. 

“Give me a big wet kiss!” Dan made Miss Lucy say. He shoved the 
dummy’s face close to Zane’s. 

Zane backed away. “Yuck.” 

“Put the dummy down,” I told my brother. “We’d better get back 
downstairs. They’re all probably waiting for us.” 

“Okay, okay,” Dan grumbled. He turned to set Miss Lucy down. Zane 
wandered down the row of dummies, studying them. 

I bent down and straightened Wilbur’s bow tie. The old dummy was 
starting to look really ragged. 

I was still working on the bow tie when I heard a hard slap. 

And I heard Zane’s startled cry of pain. 

“Owwww!” 



6 


I spun around and saw Zane rubbing his jaw. 

“Hey—that dummy slapped me!” he cried angrily. 

He pointed to a red-haired dummy on the arm of the couch. 

“I-I don’t believe it!” Zane exclaimed. “It swung its arm up, and it—it 
slapped me!” 

Dan stood behind the couch. I saw a smile spread over his face. Then he 
burst out laughing. “Get serious,” he told Zane. “That’s impossible.” 

“You did it!” Zane accused my brother, still rubbing his jaw. “You moved 
the dummy!” 

“No way!” Dan backed away till he bumped the wall. “How could I? I was 
behind the couch the whole time.” 

I stepped quickly up to the couch. “Which dummy was it?” I demanded. 

Zane pointed to a dummy with red hair and bright red freckles painted all 
over his grinning face. “That guy.” 

“Arnie,” I reported. “One of Dad’s first dummies.” 

“I don’t care what his name is,” Zane snapped. “He slapped me!” 

“But that’s dumb,” I insisted. “It’s just a ventriloquist’s dummy, Zane. Here. 
Look.” 

I picked Arnie up. The old dummy was heavier than I remembered. I started 
to hand him to Zane. But my cousin backed away. 

“Something weird is going on here,” Zane said, keeping his eyes on the 
dummy. “I’m going to tell Uncle Danny.” 

“No. Don’t tell Dad,” I pleaded. “Give us a break, Zane. It’ll get us in big 
trouble.” 

“Yeah. Don’t tell,” Dan chimed in. “The dummy probably just slipped or 
something. You know. It fell over.” 

“It reached up,” Zane insisted. “I saw it swing its arm and—” 

He was interrupted by Mom’s voice from downstairs. “Hurry up, kids. Get 
down here. We’re all waiting for you.” 

“Coming!” I shouted. I dropped Arnie back onto the arm of the couch. He 
fell into the dummy next to him. I left him like that and followed Dan and Zane 
to the stairs. 



I held Dan back and let Zane go down by himself. “What are you trying to 
prove?” I angrily asked my brother. “That wasn’t funny.” 

“Trina, I didn’t do it. I swear!” Dan claimed, raising his right hand. “I 
swear!” 

“So what are you saying?” I demanded. “That the dummy really reached up 
and slapped him?” 

Dan twisted his face. He shrugged. “I don’t know. I just know that I didn’t 
do it. I didn’t swing that dummy’s arm.” 

“Don’t be stupid,” I replied. “Of course you did.” I shoved my brother 
toward the stairs. 

“Hey—give me a break,” he muttered. 

“You’re a total liar,” I told him. “You think you can scare Zane—and me. 
But it isn’t worth it, Dan. We promised Dad, remember? Remember?” 

He ignored me and started down the stairs. 

I felt really angry. I knew that Dan had perched the dummy on top of the 
bedroom door so that it would fall on Zane. And I knew that he had swung the 
dummy’s arm to slap Zane. 

I wondered how far Dan would go to frighten our cousin. 

I knew I had to stop him. If Dan kept this up, he’d get us both grounded for 
life. Or worse. 

But what could I do? 

I was still thinking about it in bed later that night. I couldn’t get to sleep. I 
lay there, staring up at the ceiling, thinking about Dan and what a liar he was. 

Dummies are made of wood and cloth, I told myself. They don’t swing their 
arms and slap people. 

And they don’t get up and walk around the house and climb up onto doors 
on their own. They don’t walk on their own.... 

They don’t... 

I finally started to drift off to sleep when I heard light footsteps on my 
bedroom carpet. 

And then a hoarse whisper close to my ear: 

“Trina... Trina...” 



7 


“Trina... Trina...” 

The hoarse whisper—so near my ear—made me shoot straight up in bed. 

I leaped to my feet. Pulled the covers with me. Lurched forward. 

And nearly knocked Zane onto his back. 

“Zane?” 

He stumbled backwards. “Sorry!” he whispered. “I thought you were 
awake.” 

“Zane!” I repeated. My heart thudded in my chest. “What are you doing in 
here?” 

“Sorry,” he whispered, backing up some more. He stopped a few inches in 
front of my dresser. “I didn’t mean to scare you. I just—” 

I held my hand over my heart. I could feel it start to slow back down to 
normal. “Sorry I jumped out at you like that,” I told him. “I was half asleep, I 
guess. And when you whispered my name...” 

I clicked on the bed-table lamp. I rubbed my eyes and squinted at Zane. 

He was wearing baggy blue pajamas. One pajama leg had rolled up nearly 
to his knee. His blond hair had fallen over his face. He had such a frightened, 
little-boy expression on his face. He looked about six years old! 

“I tried to wake up Dad,” he whispered. “But he’s such a sound sleeper. I 
kept knocking on his bedroom door and calling to him. But he didn’t hear me. So 
I came in here.” 

“What’s your problem?” I asked, stretching my arms over my head. 

“I-I heard voices,” he stammered, glancing to the open bedroom door. 

“Excuse me? Voices?” I pushed my hair back. Straightened my long 
nightshirt. Studied him. 

He nodded. “I heard voices. Upstairs. I mean, I think they were upstairs. 
Funny voices. Talking very fast.” 

I squinted at him. “You heard voices in the attic ? ” 

He nodded again. “Yeah. I’m pretty sure.” 

“I’m pretty sure you were dreaming.” I sighed. I shook my head. 

“No. I was wide awake. Really.” He picked up a little stuffed bear from my 
dresser. He squeezed it between his hands. 



“I never sleep very well in new places,” he told me. “I never sleep very well 
in this house!” He let out an unhappy laugh. “I was wide awake.” 

“There’s no one in the attic,” I said, yawning. I tilted my ear to the ceiling. 
“Listen,” I instructed. “Silent up there. No voices.” 

We both listened to the silence for a while. 

Then Zane set down the stuffed bear. “Do you think I could have a bowl of 
cereal?” he asked. 

“Huh?” I gaped at him. 

“A bowl of cereal always helps calm me down,” he said. An embarrassed 
smile crossed his face. “Just a habit from when I was a kid.” 

I squinted at my clock radio. It was a little after midnight. “You want a 
bowl of cereal now?” 

He nodded. “Is that okay?” he asked shyly. 

Poor guy, I thought. He’s really freaked out. 

“Sure,” I said. “I’ll come down to the kitchen with you. Show you where 
everything is.” 

I found my flip-flops and slipped my feet into them. I keep them under my 
bed. I don’t like walking barefoot on the floorboards in the hall. There are a lot 
of nails that poke up from the floor. 

Mom and Dad keep saying they’re going to buy carpet. But money is tight. 
I don’t think carpet is tops on their list. 

Zane appeared a little calmer. I smiled at him and led the way into the hall. 

He’s not such a bad guy, I thought. He’s a little wimpy—but so what? I 
decided to have a serious talk with Dan first thing in the morning. I planned to 
make Dan promise he wouldn’t pull any more scares on Zane. 

The long hall was so dark, Zane and I both held onto the wall as we made 
our way to the stairs. Mom and Dad used to keep a little night-light at the end of 
the hall. But the bulb burned out, and they never replaced it. 

Holding onto the banister, we made our way slowly down the steps. Pale 
light from outside cast long blue shadows over the living room. In the dim light, 
our old furniture rose up like ghosts around the room. 

“This house always creeps me out,” Zane whispered, staying close by my 
side as we crossed through the front room. 

“I’ve lived here all my life, and sometimes I’m scared of it, too,” I 
confessed. “Old houses make so many strange sounds. Sometimes I think I hear 
the house groaning and moaning.” 



“I really did hear voices,” Zane whispered. 

We crept through the shadows to the kitchen. My flip-flops slapped on the 
linoleum. Silvery moonlight washed through the curtains over the kitchen 
window. 

I started to fumble on the wall for the light switch. 

But I stopped when I saw the dark figure slumped at the kitchen table. 

Zane saw him, too. I heard Zane gasp. He jerked back into the doorway. 
“Dad? Are you still up?” I called. “Why are you sitting in the dark?” 

My hand found the light switch. I clicked on the kitchen light. 

And Zane and I both let out a scream. 



8 


I recognized the red-and-white striped shirt. I didn’t even have to see the face. 

Rocky leaned over the table, his wooden head propped in his hands. 

Zane and I crept closer to the table. I moved to the other side. The dummy 
sneered at me. His glassy eyes were cold and cruel. 

Such a nasty expression. 

“How did he get down here?” Zane asked. He stared hard at the dummy, as 
if expecting the dummy to answer. 

“Only one way,” I murmured. “He sure didn’t walk.” 

Zane turned to me. “You mean Dan?” 

I sighed. “Of course. Who else? Mister Dumb Jokes.” 

“But how did your brother know we’d be coming down to the kitchen 
tonight?” Zane asked. 

“Let’s go ask him,” I replied. 

I knew Dan was awake. Probably sitting on the edge of his bed, waiting 
eagerly to hear us scream from the kitchen. Giggling to himself. So pleased with 
himself. 

So pleased that he broke his promise to Dad. And gave Zane and me a little 
scare. 

I balled both hands into tight fists. I could feel the anger rising in my chest. 

When I get really furious like that, I usually go to the back room and pound 
the piano. I pound out a Sousa march or a hard, fast rock song. I pound the keys 
till I start to calm down. 

Tonight, I decided, I would pound my brother instead. 

“Come on,” I urged Zane. “Upstairs.” 

I took one last glance at Rocky, slouched over the kitchen table. The 
dummy stared blankly back at me. 

I really hate that dummy, I thought. I’m going to ask Dad to put him away 
in a closet or a trunk. 

I forced myself to turn away from the sneering, wooden face. Then I put 
both hands on Zane’s shoulders and guided him back to the stairs. 

“I’m going to tell Dan that we’re both fed up with his dumb jokes,” I 
whispered to my cousin. “Enough is enough. We’ll make him promise to stop 



leaving that dummy everywhere we go.” 

Zane didn’t reply. In the dim light, I could see the grim expression on his 

face. 

I wondered what he was thinking about. Was he remembering his last visit 
to our house? Was he remembering how Dan and I terrified him then? 

Maybe he doesn’t trust me, either, I told myself. 

We climbed the stairs and crept down the dark hallway to my brother’s 
room. 

The door was half open. I pushed it open the rest of the way and stepped 
inside. Zane kept close behind me. 

I expected Dan to be sitting up, waiting for us. I expected to see him 
grinning, enjoying his little joke. 

Silvery moonlight flooded in through his double windows. From the 
doorway, I could see him clearly. Lying on his side in bed. Covers up to his chin. 
Eyes tightly closed. 

Was he faking? Was he really awake? 

“Dan,” I whispered. “Da-an.” 

He didn’t move. His eyes didn’t open. 

“Dan—I’m coming to tickle you!” I whispered. He could never keep a 
straight face when I threatened him. Dan is very ticklish. 

But he didn’t move. 

Zane and I crept closer. Up to the bed. We both stood over my brother, 
staring hard at him, studying him in the silvery light. 

He was breathing softly, in a steady rhythm. His mouth was open a little. 
He made short whistling sounds. Mouse sounds. With his pointy chin and 
upturned nose, he really did look like a little mouse. 

I leaned over him. “Da-an, get ready to be tickled!” I whispered. 

I leaned back, expecting him to leap out at me, to shout “Boo!” or 
something. 

But he continued sleeping, whistling softly with each breath. 

I turned to Zane, who hung back in the center of the room. “He’s really 
asleep,” I reported. 

“Let’s go back to our rooms,” Zane replied in a soft whisper. He yawned. 

I followed him to the bedroom door. “What about your cereal?” I asked. 

“Forget it. I’m too sleepy now.” 

We were nearly to the door when I heard someone move in the hall. 



“Ohhh.” I let out a low moan as a face appeared in the doorway. 
Rocky’s face. 

He had followed us upstairs! 



9 


I grabbed Zane’s arm. We both shouted cries of surprise. 

The dummy moved quickly into the room. 

I cut my cry short as I saw that he wasn’t walking on his own. He was being 
carried. 

Dad had the dummy by the back of the neck. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” Dan called sleepily from behind us. He raised his 
head from the pillow and squinted at us. “Huh? What’s everybody doing in my 
room?” 

“That’s what I’d like to know,” Dad said sharply. He gazed suspiciously 
from Zane to me. 

“You—you woke me up,” Dan murmured. He cleared his throat. Then he 
propped himself up on one elbow. “Why are you carrying that dummy, Dad?” 

“Perhaps one of you would like to answer that question,” Dad growled. He 
had pulled a robe over his pajamas. His hair was matted to his forehead. 

He wasn’t wearing his glasses, so he squinted at us. 

“What’s going on? I don’t understand,” Dan said sleepily. He rubbed his 

eyes. 

Was he putting on an act? I wondered. His innocent-little-boy act? 

“I heard noises downstairs,” Dad said, shifting Rocky to his other hand. “I 
went down to see what was going on. I found this dummy sitting at the kitchen 
table.” 

“I didn’t put him there!” Dan cried, suddenly wide awake. “Really. I 
didn’t!” 

“Neither did Zane or me!” I chimed in. 

Dad turned to me. He sighed. “I’m really sleepy. I don’t like these jokes in 
the middle of the night.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” I cried. 

Dad squinted hard at me. He really couldn’t see at all without his glasses. 
“Do I have to punish you and your brother?” he demanded. “Do I have to ground 
you? Or keep you from going away to camp this summer?” 

“No!” Dan and I both cried at once. Dan and I were both going to summer 
camp for the first time this year. It’s all we’ve talked about since Christmas. 



“Dad, I was asleep. Really,” Dan insisted. 

“No more stories,” Dad replied wearily. “The next time one of my dummies 
is somewhere he shouldn’t be, you’re both in major trouble.” 

“But, Dad—” I started. 

“One last chance,” Dad said. “I mean it. If I see Rocky out of the attic 
again, you’ve both had it!” He waved Zane and me to the door. “Get to your 
rooms. Now. Not another word.” 

“Do you believe me or not?” Dan demanded. 

“I don’t believe that Rocky has been moving around the house on his own,” 
Dad replied. “Now lie down and get back to sleep, Dan. I’m giving you one last 
chance. Don’t blow it.” 

Dad followed Zane and me into the hall. “See you in the morning,” he 
murmured. He made his way to the attic stairs to take Rocky back up to the 
Dummy Museum. I heard him muttering to himself all the way up the stairs. 

I said good night to Zane and headed to my room. I felt sleepy and upset 
and worried and confused—all at once. 

I knew that Dan had to be the one who kept springing Rocky on Zane. But 
why was he doing it? And would he quit now—before Dad grounded us or 
totally ruined our summer? 

I fell asleep, still asking myself question after question. 

The next morning, I woke up early. I pulled on jeans and a sweatshirt and 
hurried downstairs for breakfast. 

And there sat Rocky at the kitchen table. 



10 


I peered around the kitchen. No one else around. 

How lucky that I was the first one downstairs! 

I grabbed Rocky up by the back of the neck. Then I tucked him under one 
arm and dragged him up to the attic as fast as I could. 

When I returned to the kitchen a few moments later, Mom had already 
started breakfast. 

Whew! A close call. 

“Trina—you’re up early,” Mom said, filling the coffee maker with water. 
“Are you okay?” 

I glanced at the table. I had the sick feeling that Rocky would be sitting 
there sneering at me. 

But of course he was upstairs in the attic. I had just carried him up there. 

The table stood empty. 

“I’m fine,” I told her. “Just fine.” 

It was definitely Be Kind to Zane Day. After breakfast, Dad hurried off to the 
camera store. A short while later, Mom and Uncle Cal left for the mall to do 
some shopping. 

It was a bright morning. Yellow sunlight streamed in through the windows. 
The sky stretched clear and cloudless. 

Zane brought down his camera. He decided it was a perfect day to take 
some photographs. 

Dan and I expected him to go outside. But our cousin wanted to stay 
indoors and shoot. 

“I’m very interested in moldings,” he told us. 

We followed him around the house. Dan and I had made a solemn vow to 
be nice to Zane and not to scare him. 

After breakfast, when Zane was upstairs getting his camera, I grabbed my 
brother. I pinned him against the wall. “No tricks,” I told him. 

Dan tried to wriggle away. But I’m stronger than he is. I kept him pinned 
against the wall. “Raise your right hand and swear,” I instructed him. 

“Okay, okay.” He gave in easily. He raised his right hand, and he repeated 



the vow I recited. “No tricks against Zane. No making fun of Zane. No dummies 
— anywhere! ” 

I let him go as Zane returned with his camera. “You have some awesome 
moldings,” Zane said, gazing up at the living room ceiling. 

“Really?” I replied, trying to sound interested. 

What could be interesting about a molding? 

Zane tilted up his camera. He focused for what seemed like hours. Then he 
clicked a photo of the molding above the living room curtains. 

“Do you have a ladder?” he asked Dan. “Td really like to get a closer shot. 
I’m afraid my zoom lens will distort it.” 

And so Dan hurried off to the basement to get Zane a ladder. 

I was proud of my brother. He didn’t complain about having to go get the 
ladder. And he’d lasted a whole ten minutes without cracking any molding jokes 
or making fun of Zane. 

Which wasn’t easy. 

I mean, what kind of a nerd thinks it’s cool to take photos of ceilings and 
walls? 

Meanwhile, we had no school, and it was the sunniest, warmest, most 
beautiful day of March outside. Almost like spring. And Dan and I were stuck 
holding the ladder for Zane so he could use his macro lens and get a really tight 
molding shot. 

“Awesome!” Zane declared, snapping a few more. “Awesome!” 

He climbed down the ladder. He adjusted the lens. Fiddled with some other 
dials on the camera. 

“Want to go outside or something?” I suggested. 

He didn’t seem to hear me. “I’d like to get a few more banister shots,” he 
announced. “See the way the sunlight is pouring through the wooden bars? It 
makes a really interesting pattern on the wall.” 

I started to say something rude. But Dan caught my eye. He shook a finger 
at me. A warning. 

I bit my lip and didn’t say anything. 

This is sooooo boring, I thought. But at least we’re keeping out of trouble. 

We stood beside Zane as he photographed the banister from all angles. 
After about the tenth shot, his camera began to hum and whir. 

“End of the roll,” he announced. His eyes lit up. “Know what would be 
really cool? To go down into the basement to the darkroom and develop these 



right now.” 

“Cool,” I replied. I tried to sound sincere. Dan and I were both trying so 
hard to be nice to this kid! 

“Uncle Danny said I could use his darkroom downstairs,” Zane said, 
watching the camera as it rewound the film roll. “That would be awesome.” 

“Awesome,” I repeated. 

Dan and I exchanged glances. The most beautiful day of the century —and 
we were heading down to a dark closet in the basement. 

“I’ve never watched pictures get developed,” Dan told our cousin. “Can 
you show me how to do it?” 

“It’s pretty easy,” Zane replied, following us down the basement stairs. 
“Once you get the timing down.” 

We made our way through the laundry room, past the furnace, to the 
darkroom against the far wall. We slipped inside, and I clicked on the special red 
light. 

“Close the door tightly,” Zane instructed. “We can’t let in any light at all.” 

I double-checked the darkroom door. Then Zane set to work. He arranged 
the developing pans. He poured bottles of chemicals into the pans. He unspooled 
the film roll and began to develop. 

I’d watched Dad do it a hundred times before. It really was kind of 
interesting. And it was cool when the image began to appear and then darken on 
the developing paper. 

Dan and I stood close to Zane, watching him work. 

“I think I got some very good angles on the living room moldings,” Zane 
said. He dipped the large sheet of paper in one pan. Then he pulled it up, let it 
drip for a few seconds, and lowered it into the pan beside it. 

A grin spread over his face. “Let’s take a look.” 

He leaned over the table. Raised the sheet of paper. Held it up to the red 

light. 

His grin faded quickly. “Hey—who shot this?” he demanded angrily. 

Dan and I moved closer to see the photo. 

“Who shot this?” Zane repeated. He furiously picked up another sheet from 
the developing pan. Another one. Another one. 

“How did these get on the roll?” he cried. He shoved them all toward Dan 
and me. 

Photos of Rocky. 



Close-up portraits. 

Photo after photo of the sneering dummy. 

“Who shot them? Who?” Zane demanded angrily, shoving the wet photos in 
our faces. 

“I didn’t!” Dan declared, pulling back. 

“I didn’t either!” I protested. 

But then, who did? I asked myself, staring hard at the ugly, sneering face on 
each sheet. 

Who did? 



11 


“What’s going on up here, guys?” 

The dummies stared back at me blankly. None of them replied. 

“What’s the story?” I demanded. My eyes moved from one dummy to the 
next. “Come on, guys. Speak up or I’ll come back here with a buzz saw and give 
you all haircuts!” 

Silence. 

I paced back and forth in front of them, gazing at them sternly, my arms 
crossed in front of my chest. 

It was late in the afternoon. The sun had begun to lower itself behind the 
trees. Orange light washed in through the dusty attic windows. 

I had crept up to the attic to search for clues. Something weird was going 
on. 

How did all those photos of Rocky get onto Zane’s roll of film? Who took 
those photos? 

The same person who kept carrying Rocky downstairs and sitting him 
where he would frighten Zane. 

“It was Dan—right, guys?” I asked the wide-eyed dummies. “Dan came up 
here—right?” 

I searched the floor. The couch. Under all the chairs. 

I didn’t find a single clue. 

Now I was questioning the dummies. But of course they weren’t being very 
helpful. 

Stop wasting time and get back downstairs, I told myself. 

I turned and started to the stairs—when I heard soft laughter. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry and spun around. 

Another quiet laugh. A snicker. 

And then a hoarse voice: “Is your hair red? Or are you starting to rust? ,, 

“Excuse me?” I cried, raising a hand to my mouth. My eyes swept quickly 
from dummy to dummy. 

Who said that? 

“Hey, Trina... you’re pretty. Pretty ugly!” That was followed by another 



soft snicker. Evil laughter. 

“I like your perfume. What is it... flea and tick spray?” 

My eyes stopped on the new dummy, the one Dad called Smiley. He sat 
straight up in the center of the couch. The voice seemed to be coming from him. 
“Pinch me. I’m having a nightmare. Or is that really your face?” 

I froze. A cold shiver ran down my back. 

The hoarse voice did come from the new dummy! 

He stared blankly at me. His mouth hung open in a stiff, unpleasant grin. 

But the voice came from Smiley. The rude insults came from Smiley. 

But that’s impossible! I told myself. 

Impossible! 

Ventriloquist’s dummies can’t talk without a ventriloquist. 

“Th-this is crazy!” I stammered out loud. 

And then the dummy started to move. 



12 


I let out a scream. 

Dan popped up from behind the couch. 

The dummy toppled onto its side. 

“You-you-you—!” I sputtered, pointing furiously at my brother. 

My heart was pounding. I felt cold all over. “That’s not funny! You—you 
scared me to death!” I shrieked. 

To my surprise, Dan didn’t laugh. His eyes were narrowed. His mouth hung 
open. “Who was making those jokes?” he demanded. His eyes darted from 
dummy to dummy. 

“Give me a break!” I shot back. “Are you going to tell me it wasn’t you?” 

He scratched his short brown hair. “I didn’t say a word.” 

“Dan, you’re the biggest liar!” I cried. “How long have you been up here? 
What are you doing here? You were spying on me—right?” 

He shook his head and stepped out from behind the couch. “What are you 
doing up here, Trina?” he asked. “Did you come up to get Rocky? To take Rocky 
downstairs again and try to scare Zane?” 

I let out an angry growl and shoved Dan with all my might. 

He stumbled backwards and fell onto the couch. He cried out as he landed 
on top of the new dummy. He and the dummy appeared to wrestle for a moment 
as Dan struggled to climb to his feet. 

I stepped up close to the couch and blocked his way. As he tried to get up, I 
pushed him back down. 

“You know I’m not the one who’s been moving Rocky around,” I shouted. 
“We all know you’ve been doing it, Dan. And you’re going to get the two of us 
in real trouble with Dad.” 

“You’re wrong!” Dan declared angrily. His little mouse face turned bright 
red. “Wrong! Wrong! Wrong!” 

He burst up from the couch. The dummy bounced on the cushion. Its head 
turned. It appeared to grin up at me. 

I turned to my brother. “If you weren’t planning more trouble, what were 
you doing up here?” 

“Waiting,” he replied. 



“Excuse me? Waiting for whom?” I demanded, crossing my arms over my 
chest. 

“Just waiting,” he insisted. “Don’t you get it, Trina?” 

I kicked at a ball of dust on the floor. It stuck to the toe of my sneaker. “Get 
it? Get what?” 

“Don’t you see what’s going on?” Dan demanded. “Haven’t you caught on 

yet?” 

I bent down and pulled the dust ball off my sneaker. Now it stuck to my 
fingers. “What is in your little mouse brain?” I asked. I rolled my eyes. “This 
should be good.” 

My brother stepped up beside me. He lowered his voice to a whisper. “Zane 
is doing it all,” he said. 

I laughed. I wasn’t sure I’d heard him. 

“No. Really.” He grabbed my arm. “I know I’m right, Trina. Zane is doing 
everything. Zane is moving the dummy, bringing it downstairs, then pretending 
to be scared. Zane made it slap him. Zane carried it to the kitchen table both of 
those times.” 

I shoved Dan’s hand off my arm. Then I spread my hand over his forehead 
and pretended to check his temperature. “You are totally losing it,” I told him. 
“Go lie down. I’ll tell Mom you’re running a high fever.” 

“Listen to me!” Dan screeched. “I’m serious! I’m right. I know I’m right!” 

“Why?” I demanded. “Why would Zane do that, Dan? Why would he scare 
himself?” 

“To pay us back for last time,” Dan replied. “Don’t you get it? Zane is 
trying to get us in trouble.” 

I dropped down onto the couch beside Smiley. I thought hard about what 
my brother was saying. “You mean Zane wants Dad to think that you and I are 
using the dummies to scare Zane.” 

“Yes!” Dan cried. “But Zane is doing it all. He’s scaring himself. And 
making it look as if we’re doing it—to get us in big trouble.” 

I fiddled with the dummy’s hand as I thought about it some more. “Zane 
scare himself? I don’t think so,” I replied finally. “What gave you this idea? 
What proof do you have?” 

Dan dropped down on the couch arm. “First of all,” he started, “you didn’t 
carry Rocky downstairs all those times, did you?” 

I shook my head. “No way.” 



“Well, neither did I,” Dan declared. “So who does that leave? Rocky isn’t 
walking around by himself—right?” 

“Of course not. But—” 

“It was the camera that gave it away,” Dan said. “The photos Zane 
developed of Rocky were the biggest clue.” 

I let the dummy hand fall to the couch. “What do you mean?” I asked. I 
really wasn’t following my brother’s thinking at all. 

“That camera is never out of Zane’s sight,” Dan replied. “Most of the time, 
he keeps it around his neck. So who else could have snapped all those photos of 
Rocky?” 

I swallowed hard. “You mean that Zane—?” 

Dan nodded. “Zane was the only one who could have taken those pictures 
of Rocky. He sneaked up to the attic. He snapped them. Then he acted scared 
and angry when he developed them.” 

“But it was all an act?” I asked. 

“For sure,” Dan replied. “It’s all been an act. To scare us. And to get us in 
trouble with Dad. Zane is trying to pay us back for how we scared him last 
time.” 

I still had my doubts. “It isn’t like Zane,” I argued. “He’s so wimpy, so 
quiet and shy. He’s not the kind of boy who plays tricks on people.” 

“He’s had months to plan it!” Dan exclaimed. “Months to plan his revenge. 
We can prove it, Trina. We can hide up here and wait for him. That’s why I was 
up here. Hiding behind the couch.” 

“To catch him in the act?” 

Dan nodded. He whispered even though we were alone. “After everyone 
goes to bed tonight, let’s sneak up here and wait. Wait and see if Zane comes.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “It’s worth a try... I guess.” 

Was Dan right? 

Would we catch Zane in the act? 

I couldn’t wait for everyone to go to sleep. I was dying to find out. 



13 


Gusts of wind rattled the attic windowpanes. Heavy clouds covered the moon. 

We crept up the attic stairs into the darkness. Up a step. Then stop. Up a 
step. Then stop. Trying to be silent. 

The old house moaned and groaned beneath us. 

The attic stretched blacker than the stairway. 

I reached for the light switch. But Dan slapped my hand away. “Are you 
crazy?” he whispered. “It has to be dark. Totally dark. Or else Zane will know 
that someone is up here.” 

“I know that,” I whispered sleepily. “I just wanted to take one look at the 
dummies. You know. Make sure they’re all here.” 

“They’re all here,” Dan replied impatiently. “Just keep moving. We’ll hide 
behind the couch.” 

We crept on tiptoe over the attic floorboards. I couldn’t see a thing. The 
heavy clouds kept any light from washing in through the windows. 

Finally, my eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see the arms of the couch. 
I saw dummy heads. Dummy shoulders. Shadows against shadows. 

“Dan—where are you?” I whispered. 

“Back here. Hurry.” His whisper came from behind the couch. 

I could feel the dummy eyes on me as I made my way around the couch. I 
thought I heard a soft snicker. The evil laughter again. 

But that had to be my imagination. 

I trailed my hand over the couch arm. Felt a wooden dummy hand resting 
on the arm. The dummy hand felt surprisingly warm. 

Humanly warm. 

Don’t start imagining things, Trina, I scolded myself. 

That dummy hand is warm because it’s hot up in this attic. 

The wind rattled the glass. Strong gusts roared against the roof, so low over 
our heads. 

I heard a loud groan. A soft chuckle. A strange whistling sound. 

Ignoring all the attic noises, I ducked down on the floor beside my brother. 
“Well? Here we are,” I whispered. “Now what?” 



“Sssshhhh.” In the darkness, I could see him raise a finger to his lips. “Now 
we wait. And listen.” 

We both turned and rested our backs against the back of the couch. I raised 
my knees and wrapped my arms around them. 

“He isn’t coming,” I whispered. “This is a waste of time.” 

“Ssshhh. Just wait, Trina,” Dan scolded. “Give him time.” 

I yawned. I felt so sleepy. The heat of the attic was making me even 
sleepier. 

I shut my eyes and thought about Zane. 

At dinner, he couldn’t wait to pass around the photographs of Rocky. “I 
don’t know who took these shots,” Zane complained to my dad. “But they 
wasted half a roll of film.” 

Dad glared angrily at Dan and me. But he didn’t make a fuss. “Can we talk 
about it after dinner?” he suggested quietly. 

“I’m kind of scared,” Zane told Dad in a trembling voice. “So many weird 
things have been happening. It’s like the dummies have lives of their own.” He 
shook his head. “Wow. I hope I don’t have nightmares tonight.” 

“Let’s not talk about the dummies now,” Mom chimed in. “Zane, tell us 
about your school. Who is your teacher this year? What are you studying?” 

“Could I have a second helping of potatoes?” Uncle Cal interrupted. He 
reached for the bowl. “They’re so good. I may have to make a pig of myself.” 

Dad took another quick glance at the close-up snapshots of Rocky. He 
flashed Dan and me another angry scowl. Then he set the photos down on the 
floor. 

After dinner, Dan and I were careful to keep as far away from Dad as we 
could. No way we wanted to hear another lecture about how we were terrifying 
our poor cousin. And how we’d be punished if we didn’t stop it at once. 

Now it was a little before midnight. And we were huddled in the dark attic. 
Listening to the swirling wind and the moans and groans of the house. Backs 
pressed against the couch. Waiting... 

I kept my eyes closed. Thinking hard. Thinking about Zane. About Rocky. 

Dan and I aren’t alone up here, I thought drowsily. There are thirteen 
wooden dummies up here with us. Thirteen pairs of eyes staring into the heavy 
darkness. Thirteen frozen grins. Except for Rocky’s sneer, of course. 

Empty, lifeless bodies... 

Heavy, wooden heads and hands... 



Thinking about the dummies, the dummies all around, I guess I drifted off 
to sleep. 

Did I dream about the dummies? 

Maybe I did. 

I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened by footsteps. Soft, shuffling footsteps across the attic floor. 
And I knew the dummies had come alive. 



14 


I jerked my head up, listening hard. 

My hands were still wrapped around my knees. Both hands had fallen 
asleep. They tingled. The back of my neck ached. My mouth felt dry and sour. 

I uttered a silent gasp as I heard the shuffling, scraping footsteps move 
closer. 

Not dummies walking around, I realized. 

A single figure. One. One person. Moving slowly, carefully toward the 
couch. 

Why did I think I heard dummies moving? It must have been a picture left 
over from my dream. 

I shook my hands, trying to make them stop tingling. 

I was wide awake now. Totally alert. 

The footsteps scraped closer. 

Could it be Dan? Where was Dan? 

Had he climbed up while I slept? Was he making his way back to the 
couch? 

No. 

Squinting into the darkness, I saw Dan beside me. 

He had climbed to his knees. He saw me move. He waved his hand and 
signaled for me to be silent. 

Dan gripped the back of the couch with both hands. Then he leaned forward 
and peered out into the room. 

I crawled to the other end of the couch. Then, keeping low, I poked my 
head out and squinted into the deep shadows. All grays and blacks. 

The wind howled around the house. Across the big attic room, the 
windowpanes rattled and shook. 

I wanted to jump out. To scream and jump out. And flash on the light. 

But I felt Dan’s hand on my arm. He must have read my thoughts. He raised 
a finger to his lips. 

We both waited. Frozen there behind the couch. Crouching low. Listening 
to each footstep. Each creak of the floorboards. 



The dark figure stopped in front of the folding chair next to the couch. He 
stood inches from Dan and me. If I wanted to, I could reach out and grab his leg. 

I struggled to see his face. But it was hidden by the couch. And I didn’t dare 
raise myself up higher. 

I heard the clonk of wood against wood. Two dummy hands hitting each 
other. 

I heard the rustle of heavy cloth. The thud of leather shoes bumping each 
other. 

The intruder had picked up a dummy off the chair. 

Squinting into the deep blackness, I could see him swing the dummy over 
his shoulder. I could see the dummy arms swaying, swaying at his back. 

The dark figure turned away quickly. And began walking to the attic stairs. 

I crept out from behind the couch. Moving on tiptoe, I began to follow the 
intruder. 

Pressed against the wall, tiptoeing as silently as I could, I moved across the 
room. I held my breath. I could hear Dan close behind me. 

I reached the light switch just as the intruder made it to the stairs. 

My hand fumbled against the wall as I reached. 

Reached... reached for the light switch with a trembling hand. 

Yes! 

I flicked on the light. And Dan and I both shrieked at the same time. 



15 


“Zane!” 

My brother and I both screamed his name. 

Zane’s eyes bulged. His mouth opened in a high, frightened wail. 

I saw his knees bend. I think he nearly crumpled to the floor. 

He uttered several squeaks. Then his mouth hung open. I could see he was 
gasping for breath. 

“Zane—we caught you!” I managed to choke out. 

He had Rocky draped over his shoulder. 

“What—what—?” Zane struggled to speak, but no words came out. He 
sputtered and started to choke. The sneering dummy bounced on his shoulder. 

“Zane—we figured it out,” Dan told him. “Your little tricks aren’t going to 
work.” 

Our cousin was still sputtering and coughing. 

“We know it’s been you all along,” Dan told him. 

He stepped over and slapped Zane hard on the back a few times. 

After a few seconds, Zane stopped sputtering. 

Dan picked Rocky up off Zane’s shoulder and started to carry him back to 
his chair. 

“How-how-how did you know?” Zane stammered. 

“We just figured it out,” I told him. “What’s the big idea, anyway?” 

Zane shrugged. He lowered his eyes to the floor. “You know. Just having 
some fun.” 

I glared at him. “Some fun?” I cried angrily. “You tried to get us in huge 
trouble. You—you could have ruined our whole summer!” 

Zane shrugged again. “It was kind of my turn. You know?” 

“Well, we’re even now,” Dan chimed in. 

“Right,” I agreed quickly. “We’re all even now—right, Zane?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” A grin spread slowly over his face. “I had you 
guys going, didn’t I? With that stupid dummy popping up everywhere you 
looked.” 

Dan and I didn’t grin back. 



“You fooled us,” I murmured. 

“You fooled everyone,” my brother added. 

Zane grinned. A gleeful grin. I could see how pleased he was with himself. 
“I guess Dan and I deserved it,” I confessed. 

“Guess you did,” Zane shot back. Would he ever stop grinning? 

“So now that we’re even, do we have a truce?” I demanded. “No more 
joking around with the dummies? No more trying to scare each other or get 
anyone in trouble?” 

Zane bit his lower lip. He thought about it a long, long time. “Okay. Truce,” 
he said finally. 

We all shook hands solemnly. Then we slapped each other high fives. Then 
the three of us started laughing. I’m not sure why. The laughter just burst out of 
us. 

Crazy giggling. 

I guess because it was so late and we were so sleepy. And we were so glad 
we could be friends now. We didn’t have to play tricks on each other anymore. 

As we made our way down the stairs, I felt really happy. 

I thought all the scary stuff with the dummies was over. 

I had no way of knowing that it was just beginning. 



16 


The next morning, Dan, Zane, and I went for a long bike ride. The strong winds 
had faded away during the night. A soft breeze, warm and fresh-smelling, 
followed us as we pedaled along the path. 

The trees were still winter bare. The ground glistened with a silvery 
morning frost. But the sweet, warm air told me that spring was on its way. 

We hiked slowly, following a dirt path that curved into the woods. The sun, 
still low in the sky, warmed our faces. I stopped to unzip my jacket. And pointed 
to a patch of green daffodil leaves just beginning to poke up from the ground. 

“Only three more months of school!” Dan cried. He raised both fists in the 
air and let out a cheer. 

“We’re going to camp this summer for the first time,” I told Zane. “Up in 
Massachusetts.” 

“For eight weeks!” Dan added happily. 

Zane brushed back his blond hair. He leaned over the handlebars of my 
dad’s bike and began pedaling harder. “I don’t know what I’m doing this 
summer,” he said. “Probably just hanging out.” 

“What do you want to do this summer?” I asked him. 

He grinned at me. “Just hang out.” 

We all laughed. I was in a great mood and so were the guys. 

Dan kept pulling wheelies, leaning way back and raising his front tire off 
the ground. Zane tried to do it—and crashed into a tree. 

He went sailing to the ground, and the bike fell on top of him. I expected 
him to whine and complain. That’s his usual style. But he picked himself up, 
muttering, “Smooth move, Zane.” 

“I want to see that one again!” Dan joked. 

Zane laughed. “You try it!” 

He brushed the dirt off his jeans and climbed back onto the bike. We 
pedaled on down the path, joking and laughing. 

I think we were in such great moods because of the truce. We could finally 
relax and not worry about who was trying to terrify who. 

The dirt path ended at a small, round pond. The pond gleamed in the 
sunlight, still half-frozen from the long winter. 



Zane climbed off his bike and rested it on the tall grass. Then he stepped up 
to the edge of the pond to take photos. 

“Look at the weeds poking up from the melting ice!” he exclaimed, clicking 
away. “Awesome. Awesome!” He knelt down low and snapped a bunch of weed 
photos. 

Dan and I exchanged glances. I couldn’t see what was so special about the 
weeds. But I guess that’s why I’m not a photographer. 

As Zane stood up, a tiny brown-and-black chipmunk scampered along the 
edge of the pond. Zane swung his camera and clicked off a couple of shots. 

“Hey! I think I got him!” he declared happily. 

“Great!” I cried. Everything seemed great this morning. 

We hung out at the pond for a while. We took a short walk through the 
woods. Then we started to get hungry for lunch. So we rode back to the house. 

We were about to return the bikes to the garage when Zane spotted the old 
well at the back of our yard. “Cool!” he cried, his blue eyes lighting up. “Let’s 
check it out!” 

Holding his camera in one hand, he hopped off his bike and went running 
across the grass to the well. 

It’s a round, stone well with green moss covering the smooth gray stones. It 
used to have a pointed red roof over it. But the roof blew off during a bad storm, 
and Dad hauled it away. 

When we were little, Dan and I used to scare each other by pretending that 
monsters and trolls lived down inside it. But we hadn’t paid much attention to 
the old well in years. Dad kept saying he was going to tear it down and cover it 
up. But he never got around to it. 

Zane clicked a bunch of photos. “Is there still water down there?” he asked. 

I shrugged. “I don’t know.” 

Dan grabbed Zane around the waist. “We could toss you down and see if 
you make a splash!” he declared. 

Zane wrestled himself out of my brother’s grasp. “I’ve got a better idea.” 
He picked up a stone and dropped it down the well. 

After a long wait, we heard a splash far down below. 

“Cool!” Zane exclaimed. He took several more pictures until he had 
finished the roll. 

Then we made our way inside the house for lunch. We hurried upstairs to 
clean up. 



Zane stopped at the doorway to his room. 

I saw his eyes bulge and his mouth drop open. I saw his face go white. 
Dan and I ran up next to him. 

We stared into the bedroom—and cried out in horror. 



17 


“The r-room—it’s been trashed /” Dan stammered. 

The three of us huddled in the doorway, staring into the bedroom. Staring at 
an unbelievable mess. 

At first I thought maybe Zane had left the windows open all night, and the 
strong winds had blown everything around. 

But that didn’t make any sense. 

All of the clothes had been pulled out of the closet and tossed over the floor. 
The dresser drawers had all been pulled out and dumped over the carpet. 

The bookshelves had been emptied. Books littered the floor, the bed—they 
were tossed everywhere. One bed table was turned on its side. The other stood 
upside down on top of the bed. A lamp lay on the floor in front of the closet. Its 
shade was ripped and broken. 

“Look—!” Zane pointed into the center of the room. 

Sitting on a tangled hill of clothes was Rocky. The dummy sat straight up, 
his legs crossed casually in front of him. He sneered at us as if daring us to enter. 

“I-I really don’t believe this!” I cried, tugging at the sides of my hair. 

“What don’t you believe?” 

Mom’s voice made me jump. 

I turned to see her coming out of her bedroom. She tucked her blue sweater 
into her jeans as she walked toward us. 

“Mom—!” I cried. “Something terrible has happened!” 

Her smile faded. “What on earth—?” she started. 

I stepped aside so she could see into Zane’s room. 

“Oh, no!” Mom cried out and raised both hands to her cheeks. She 
swallowed hard. “Did someone break in?” Her voice sounded tiny and 
frightened. 

I peered quickly into my room across the hall. “No. I don’t think so,” I 
reported. “This is the only room that’s messed up.” 

“But—but—” Mom sputtered. Then her eyes stopped on Rocky on top of 
the pile of clothes. “What is he doing down here?” Mom demanded. 

“We don’t know,” I told her. 

“But who did this?” Mom cried, still pressing her hands against her cheeks. 



“We didn’t!” Dan declared. 

“We’ve been outside all morning,” Zane added breathlessly. “It wasn’t 
Trina, or Dan, or me. We weren’t home. We were riding bikes.” 

“But—someone had to do this!” Mom declared. “Someone deliberately tore 
this room apart.” 

But who was it? I wondered. My eyes darted around the mess, landing on 
the sneering dummy. 

Who was it? 



18 


We all pitched in and helped get the room back together. It took the rest of the 
afternoon. 

The lamp in front of the closet was broken. Everything else just had to be 
picked up and put back where it belonged. 

We worked in silence. None of us knew what to say. 

At first, Mom wanted to call the police. But there was no sign that someone 
had broken into the house. All the other rooms were perfectly okay. 

Dad returned home from the camera shop while we were still cleaning up. 
He, of course, was furious. “What do I have to do? Bolt the attic door?” he 
shouted at Dan and me. 

He grabbed up Rocky and slung the dummy over his shoulder. “This isn’t a 
joke anymore,” Dad said, narrowing his eyes at both of us. “This isn’t funny. 
This is serious.” 

“But we didn’t do it!” I protested for the hundredth time. 

“Well, the dummy didn’t do it,” Dad shot back. “That’s one thing I know 
for sure.” 

I don’t know anything for sure, I thought. I stared at Rocky’s sneering face 
as Dad started down the hall to the attic stairs. Then I bent down to pick up the 
broken lamp from the floor. 

That night I dreamed once again about ventriloquist’s dummies. 

I saw them dancing. A dozen of them. All of Dad’s dummies from upstairs. 

I saw them dancing in Zane’s room. Dancing over the tangled piles of 
clothes and books. Dancing over the bed. Over the toppled bed table. 

I saw Rocky dancing with Miss Lucy. I saw Wilbur doing a frantic, crazy 
dance on top of the dresser. And I saw Smiley, the new dummy, clapping his 
wooden hands, bobbing his head, grinning, grinning from the middle of the room 
as the other dummies danced around him. 

They waved their big hands over their heads. Their skinny legs twisted and 

bent. 

They danced in silence. No music. No sound at all. 

And as their bodies twisted and swayed, their faces remained frozen. They 



grinned at one another with blank, unblinking eyes. Grinned their frightening, 
red-lipped grins. 

Bobbed and bent, tilted and swayed, grinning, grinning, grinning the whole 
time in the eerie silence. 

And then the grins faded as I pulled myself out of the dream. 

I opened my eyes. Slowly woke up. 

Felt the heavy hands on my neck. 

Stared up into Rocky’s ugly face. 

Rocky on top of me. The dummy on top of my blanket. Over me. 

Reaching. Reaching his heavy wooden hands for my throat! 



19 


I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror. 

My hands shot out. I grabbed the dummy’s hands. 

I thrashed my legs. Kicked off the blanket. Kicked at the dummy. 

The big eyes stared at me as if startled. 

I grabbed his head. Shoved him down. 

I sat up, my entire body trembling. Then I grabbed the dummy’s waist. 

And flung him to the floor. 

The ceiling light flashed on. Mom and Dad burst into my room together. 

“What’s happening?” 

“Trina—what’s wrong?” 

They both stopped short when they saw the dummy sprawled on the floor 
beside my bed. 

“He—he—” I gasped, pointing down at Rocky. I struggled to catch my 
breath. “Rocky—he jumped on me. He tried to choke me. I-I woke up and—” 

Dad let out a loud growl and tore at his hair. “This has got to stop!” he 
bellowed. 

Mom dropped down beside me on the bed and wrapped me in a hug. I 
couldn’t stop my shoulders from trembling. 

“It was so scary!” I choked out. “I woke up—and there he was!” 

“This is out of control!” Dad screamed, shaking his fist in the air. “Out of 
control!” 

Mom calmed me down. Then she and I both had to calm Dad down. 

Finally, after everyone was calm, they turned out the light and made their 
way out of the room. They closed the door. I heard Dad carrying Rocky back up 
to the attic. 

Maybe Dad should get a lock for the attic door, I thought. 

I shut my eyes and tried not to think about Rocky, or Zane, or the dummies 
—or anything at all. 

After a while, I must have drifted back to sleep. 

I don’t know how much time passed. 

I was awakened by a knock on the door. Two sharp knocks and then two 



more. 

I sat straight up with a gasp. 

I knew that Rocky had come back. 



20 


The bedroom door creaked open slowly. 

I took a deep breath and held it, staring through the dark. 

“Trina—?” a voice whispered. “Trina—are you awake?” 

As the door opened, a rectangle of gray light spilled into the room from the 
hallway. Dan poked his head in, then took a few steps across the floor. 

“Trina? It’s me.” 

I let out my breath in a long whoosh. “Dan—what do you want?” My voice 
was hoarse from sleep. 

“I heard everything,” Dan said, stepping up beside the bed. He pulled down 
one pajama sleeve. Then he raised his eyes to me. “Zane put Rocky on your bed. 
Zane did it!” Dan whispered. 

“Huh? Why do you say that? We all have a truce—remember? Zane agreed 
the tricks were all over.” 

“Right,” Dan whispered. “And now Zane thinks he can really scare us. 
Because we don’t suspect him any longer. Zane hasn’t given up, Trina. I’m sure 
of it.” 

I bit my lower lip. I tried to think about what Dan was saying. But I was so 
sleepy! 

Dan leaned close and whispered excitedly. “This morning before we went 
biking, Zane went up to his room—remember? He said he forgot his camera. 
So... he had time to mess up his room. Before he left the house.” 

“Yeah. Maybe,” I murmured. 

“And tonight he brought Rocky down and set him up on your bed. I’m sure 
of it,” Dan insisted. “I’m sure it’s Zane. We have to hide up in the attic again. 
Tomorrow night. We’ll catch Zane again. I know we will.” 

“Hide up there again? No way!” I cried. “It’s hot up there. And too creepy. 
And I’m staying as far away from those dummies as I can.” 

My brother sighed. “I know I’m right,” he whispered. 

“I don’t know what I know,” I replied. “I don’t know anything about 
anything.” I slid under the covers, pulled the blanket over my head, and tried to 
get back to sleep. 



The next night, Mom and Dad had a dinner party in honor of Zane and Uncle 
Cal. They invited the Birches and the Canfields from down the street, and 
Cousin Robin and her husband Fred. 

Fred is a great guy. Everyone calls him Froggy because he can puff out his 
cheeks like a frog. Froggy is short and very round and really looks like a frog. 

He always makes me laugh. He knows a million great jokes. Robin is 
always trying to get him to shut up. But he never does. 

Mom and Dad don’t have many dinner parties. So they had to work all day 
to get the dining room ready. To set the table. And to cook the dinner. 

Mom made a leg of lamb. Dad cooked up his specialty—Caribbean-style 
scalloped potatoes. Very spicy. 

Mom bought flowers for the table. She and Dad brought out all the fancy 
plates and glasses that we usually see only on holidays. 

The dining room really looked awesome as we all sat down to dinner. Dan, 
Zane, and I were down at the far end of the table. Froggy sat at our end. I guess, 
because he’s just a big kid. 

Froggy told me a moron joke. Someone asks a moron: “Can you stand on 
your head?” And the moron says, “No, I can’t. It’s up too high.” 

I started to laugh when I saw Zane jump up from the table. “Where are you 
going?” I called after him. 

Zane turned back at the dining room doorway. “To get my camera,” he 
replied. “I want to take some pictures of the table before it gets all messed up.” 

He disappeared upstairs. 

A few seconds later, we all heard him scream. 

Chairs scraped the floor as everyone jumped up. We all went running up the 
stairs. 

I reached Zane’s room first. From the doorway, I saw him standing in the 
center of the room. 

I saw the sick look on Zane’s face. 

And then I saw the camera in his hand. 

Or what was left of the camera. 

It looked as if it had been run over by a truck. The film door had been 
twisted off and lay on the floor. The lens was smashed. The whole camera body 
was bent and broken. 

Zane turned the camera over in his hands, gazing down at it sadly, shaking 



his head. 

I raised my eyes to the bed. And saw Rocky sitting on the bedspread. A roll 
of gray film unspooled across his lap. 

Dad burst into the room. All of our other guests pushed in after him. 

“What happened?” someone asked. 

“Is that Zane’s camera?” 

“What’s going on?” 

“That’s what happens when you try to take my picture!” Froggy joked. 

No one laughed. It wasn’t funny. 

Dad’s face turned dark red as he took the camera from Zane’s hand. Dad 
examined it carefully. His expression remained grim. 

“This isn’t mischief anymore,” he murmured. I could barely hear him over 
all the other voices in the room. Everyone had begun talking at once. 

“This cannot be allowed,” Dad said solemnly. He raised his eyes to Dan, 
then me. He stared at us both for the longest time without saying anything. 

Zane let out a long sigh. I turned and saw that he was about to cry. 

“Zane—” I started. 

But he uttered an angry shout. Then he pushed past Froggy and Mr. and 
Mrs. Birch. And went running from the room. 

“Someone here has done a very sick thing,” Dad said sadly. He raised the 
camera to his face, running a finger over the broken lens. “This is a very 
expensive camera. It was Zane’s most prized possession.” 

All of our guests became very quiet. 

Dad kept his eyes on Dan and me. He started to say something else. 

But then we all heard the deafening crash from downstairs. 



21 


“What is going on here?” Dad cried. He tossed the broken camera onto the bed 
and darted from the room. 

The others went hurrying after him. All talking at once. I heard their shoes 
pounding down the stairs. 

I turned to Dan. “Still think Zane is doing these things?” 

Dan shrugged. “Maybe.” 

“No way,” I told him. “No way Zane is going to smash his own camera. He 
loved his camera. No way he would smash it just to get you and me in trouble.” 

Dan raised troubled eyes to me. “Then I don’t get it,” he said in a tiny 
voice. I could see the fear on his face. 

I heard startled shouts and cries of alarm from downstairs. “Let’s check out 
the next disaster,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

We reached the bedroom door at the same time and squeezed through 
together. Then I led the way along the hall and down the stairs. 

I fought back my own fear as we approached the dining room. 

Something very strange was going on in this house, I knew. Dad was right 
when he said it was no joke. 

Tearing Zane’s room apart wasn’t a joke. It was evil. 

Wrecking Zane’s camera was evil, too. 

Thinking about Rocky gave me a chill. The dummy was always there. 
Whenever something evil happened, there sat Rocky. 

Trina, don’t be crazy! I scolded myself. Don’t start thinking that a wooden 
ventriloquist’s dummy can be evil. 

That’s crazy thinking. That’s really messed up. 

But what could I think? 

My throat tightened. My mouth suddenly felt very dry. 

I took a deep breath and led the way into the dining room. 

I saw Dad in the kitchen doorway. He had his arm around Mom’s shoulders. 
Mom had her head buried against Dad’s shirtsleeve. 

Was she crying? 

Yes. 



The guests all stood against the wall, shaking their heads, their expressions 
grim and confused. They muttered quietly, staring at the disaster. 

The disaster. The terrible disaster. 

The dining room table. 

I saw the overturned platters first. Dad’s scalloped potatoes smeared over 
the tablecloth. Clumps of potatoes stuck to the wall and the front of the china 
hutch. 

The salad poured over the floor and the chairs. The bread ripped into small 
chunks, the chunks tossed over the table. The flowers ripped off their stems. The 
vase on its side, water pouring over the tablecloth, puddling on the floor. 

The glasses all turned over. A bottle of red wine tipped over, a dark red 
stain spreading over the tablecloth. 

I heard Mom’s sobs. I heard the sounds of Dad’s muttered attempts to calm 
her down. I saw the other guests shaking their heads, their faces so upset, so 
concerned, so puzzled. 

And then Dan grabbed my shoulder and pointed me toward the head of the 
table. And I saw two dummies sitting there on dining room chairs. 

Wilbur and the new dummy. Wilbur and Smiley. 

They sat at the table, grinning at each other, wine glasses in their hands. As 
if celebrating. As if toasting each other. 



22 


That night, Dan and I hid behind the couch in the attic once again. The attic 
stretched dark and silent. So dark, I could barely see my brother sitting beside 
me. 

We were both in pajamas. The air was hot and dry. But my hands and my 
bare feet felt cold and clammy. 

We talked softly, our legs stretched out on the floor, resting against the back 
of the couch. As we talked, we waited—and listened. Listened to every sound. 

It was nearly midnight, but I didn’t feel sleepy. I felt alert. Ready for 
anything. 

Ready to catch Zane in the act once again. 

This time, I brought my little flash camera with me. When Zane crept up 
here to carry one of the dummies downstairs, I’d snap his photo. Then I’d have 
proof to show Mom and Dad. 

Yes, I finally decided that Dan was right. Zane had to be the one who was 
destroying our house. 

Destroying our house and trying to scare everyone into thinking the 
dummies had come to life. 

“But why?” I whispered to Dan. “Did we scare Zane so badly the last time 
he was here? So badly that he’ll do anything to pay us back?” 

“He’s sick,” Dan muttered. “That’s the only answer. He’s totally messed 

up.” 

“So messed up that he wrecked his own camera,” I murmured, shaking my 
head. 

“So messed up that he ran downstairs and trashed the dining room,” Dan 
added. 

The dining room. That’s what convinced me that Zane was guilty. 

All of us were upstairs in Zane’s room, examining his broken camera. 

Zane was the only other person downstairs. 

Zane was the only person in the house who could have trashed the dining 
room and wrecked the dinner. 

Of course he acted horrified and shocked. Of course he acted as if he didn’t 
have a clue about what had happened. 



What a sad, sad night. 

The dinner guests didn’t know what to say to Mom and Dad. It was such a 
frightening mystery. No one had an answer. 

The guests helped clean up the mess. The food was ruined. It couldn’t be 
eaten. No one felt like eating, anyway. 

Everyone left as soon as the dining room was cleaned and cleared. 

As the last guest left, I turned to Dan. “Uh-oh,” I whispered. “Family 
Conference Time. We’re in for a major lecture now.” 

But I was wrong. Mom hurried up to her room. And Dad said he was too 
disgusted to talk to anyone. 

Uncle Cal asked if Dad would like him to take the car and pick up some 
fried chicken or hamburgers or something. 

Dad just scowled at him and stomped away. He carried Smiley and Wilbur 
up to the attic. I heard him slam the attic door. Then he disappeared into the 
bedroom to help comfort Mom. 

Zane turned to his dad. “I-I can’t believe my good camera is smashed,” he 
whimpered. 

Uncle Cal placed a hand on Zane’s shoulder. “I’ll bet your uncle Danny has 
a new camera at his shop that he’ll want to give you.” 

“But I liked my old camera!” Zane wailed. 

And that’s when I decided he was guilty. He’s a phony, I decided. He’s 
carrying on like this—putting on a show for Dan and me. 

But I wasn’t going to fall for it. No way. 

I made sure I had film in my little camera. Then I grabbed Dan and we 
crept up to the attic to wait. To wait in the darkness and catch Zane. 

To end the disasters in our house once and for all. 

We didn’t have to wait long. 

After about half an hour, I heard the tap of soft footsteps on the attic floor. 

I sucked in my breath. My whole body tensed, and I nearly dropped the 
camera. 

Beside me, Dan raised himself to his knees. 

My heart pounding, I crept to the edge of the couch. 

Tap tap. Shuffling footsteps on the bare floorboards. 

I saw a dark figure bend down and lift a dummy off a chair. 

“It’s Zane,” I whispered to Dan. “I knew it!” 

In the heavy darkness, I could see him carrying the dummy to the stairs. 



I stood up. My legs trembled. But I moved quickly. 

I raised the camera. Stepped in front of the couch. 

Pushed the shutter button. 

The room flashed in an explosion of white light. 

I clicked off another one. 

Another bright white flash. 

And in the flash, I saw Rocky dangling over Zane’s shoulder. 

No. 

Not Zane! 

Not Zane. Not Zane. 

In the flash of light, I saw Rocky dangling over another dummy’s shoulder! 
Smiley! The new dummy. 

The new dummy was shuffling toward the stairs, carrying Rocky away. 



23 


The dummy turned. 

My hand fumbled for the light switch. I clicked on the light. 

I stood frozen in front of the couch. Too startled to move. 

“Smiley—stop!” I screamed. 

The dummy’s grin faded. The eyes narrowed at me. “I’m not Smiley,” he 
croaked. He had a hoarse, raspy voice. “My name is Slappy.” 

He turned back to the stairs. 

“Stop him!” I cried to my brother. 

We both made a dive for the dummy. 

Slappy spun around. He pulled Rocky off his shoulder—and heaved him at 

Dan. 

I grabbed Slappy around the waist and tackled him to the floor. 

He swung both hands hard. One of them slammed into my forehead. 

“Unh.” I let out a groan as the pain shot through me. 

My hands slid off the dummy’s slender waist. Slappy jumped nimbly to his 
feet, his grin wide and leering. 

He was enjoying this! 

He kicked me in the side with the toe of his big leather shoe. 

My head still throbbing, I rolled out of the way. And turned back in time to 
see Dan grab the dummy from behind. 

Dan drove his head into the dummy’s back. They both dropped hard to the 
floor. 

“Let go of me, slave!” Slappy demanded in his ugly, hoarse voice. “You are 
my slave now! Let go of me! I order you!” 

I pulled myself to my knees as Dan and Slappy wrestled over the floor. 

“He’s so... strong!” Dan called out to me. 

Slappy rolled on top of him. Started to pound him with his wooden fists. 

I grabbed Slappy by the shoulders and tugged with all my strength. Slappy 
swung his arms, thrashing at my brother. 

I pulled hard, trying to tug him off Dan’s stomach. 

“Let go! Let go!” the dummy shrieked. “Let go, slave!” 



“Get off him!” I cried. 

We were making such a racket, I didn’t hear the attic door open downstairs. 
And I didn’t hear the footsteps running up the stairs. 

A face appeared. And then a large body. 

“Dad!” I cried breathlessly. “Dad—look!” 

“What on earth—!” Dad exclaimed. 

“Dad—it’s alive! The dummy is alive!” I shrieked. 

“Huh?” Squinting through his glasses, Dad lowered his gaze to the dummy 
on the floor. 

The dummy sprawled lifelessly on its back beside Dan. One arm was 
twisted beneath its back. Both legs were bent in two. 

The mouth hung open in its painted grin. The eyes stared blankly at the 
ceiling. 

“It is alive!” Dan insisted. “It really is!” 

Dad stared down at the still, silent dummy. 

“The dummy picked up Rocky!” Dan declared in a high, excited voice. “He 
said his name was Slappy. He picked up Rocky. He was carrying him 
downstairs.” 

Dad tsk-tsked and shook his head. “Give it up, Dan,” he murmured angrily. 
“Just stop it right now.” He raised his eyes to Dan, then to me. “I knew you two 
were the troublemakers.” 

“But, Dad—” I protested. 

“I’m not an idiot,” Dad snapped, scowling at me. “You can’t expect me to 
believe a dumb story about a dummy coming to life and carrying another 
dummy around. Have you both lost your minds entirely?” 

“It’s true,” Dan insisted. 

We both gazed down at Slappy. He sure didn’t look alive. For a moment, I 
had the frightening feeling that I’d dreamed the whole scene. 

But then I remembered something. “I have proof!” I cried. “Dad, I can 
prove to you that Dan and I aren’t lying.” 

Dad rubbed the back of his neck. “I’m so tired,” he moaned. “It’s been such 
a long, horrible day. Please. Give me a break, Trina.” 

“But I took some pictures!” I told him. “I have pictures of Slappy carrying 
Rocky!” 

“Trina, I’m warning you—” Dad started. 

But I spun away, searching for my camera. Where was it? Where? 



It took me a few seconds to spot it on the floor against the wall back by the 
couch. I hurried across the room to grab it. 

And stopped halfway. 

The back of the camera—it had sprung open. The film was exposed. The 
pictures were ruined. 

The camera must have flown out of my hand when I tried to tackle Slappy, I 
realized. I picked it up and examined it sadly. 

No pictures. No proof. 

I turned back to find Dad scowling at me. “No more wasting my time, 
Trina. You two are grounded until further notice. I’m so disgusted with both of 
you. Your mother and I will think of other punishments after your cousin 
leaves.” 

Then Dad waved a hand at Slappy and Rocky. “Put them away. Right now. 
And stay out of the attic. Stay away from my dummies. That’s all I have to say 
to you. Good night.” 

Dad turned away sharply and stomped down the stairs. 

I glanced at Dan and shrugged. I didn’t know what to say. 

My heart was pounding. I was so angry. So upset. So hurt. My chest felt 
about to explode. 

I bent down to pick up Slappy. 

The dummy winked at me. 

His ugly grin grew wider. And then he puckered his red lips and made 
disgusting, wet kissing sounds. 



24 


“Don’t touch me, slave,” Slappy growled. 

I gasped and jumped back. I still couldn’t believe this was happening. I 
wrapped my arms around myself to stop my body from trembling. 

“You—you really are alive?” Dan asked softly. 

“You bet your soft head lam!” the dummy roared. 

“What do you want?” I cried. “Why are you doing this to us? Why are you 
getting us in all this trouble?” 

The ugly grin spread over his face. “If you treat me nice, slaves, maybe I 
won’t get you in any more trouble. Maybe you’ll get lucky.” He tapped his head 
and added, “Knock on wood.” 

“We’re not your slaves!” I insisted. 

He tossed back his head and let out a dry laugh. “Who’s the dummy here?” 
he cried. “You or me?” 

“You carried Rocky downstairs all those times?” Dan asked. I could see that 
my brother was having a hard time believing this, too. 

“You don’t think that bag of kindling can move on his own, do you?” 
Slappy sneered. “I had some fun with that ugly guy. I put him at the scene of the 
crimes to throw you off the track. To keep you slaves guessing.” 

“And you smashed Zane’s camera and ruined the dinner party?” I 
demanded. 

He narrowed his eyes to evil slits. “I’ll do much worse if you slaves don’t 
obey me.” 

I could feel the anger rising through my body. “You—you’re going to ruin 
everything!” I screamed at him. “You’re going to ruin our lives! You’re going to 
keep us from going to camp this summer!” 

Slappy snickered. “You won’t be going to camp. You’ll be staying home to 
take good care of me!” 

And then I exploded. 

“Nooooo!” I uttered a long wail of protest. 

I grabbed his head in both hands. I started to tug. 

I remembered his head had been split in two when Dad found him. I 
planned to pull his head apart—to split it in two again! 



He kicked his legs frantically and thrashed his arms. 

His heavy shoes kicked at my legs. 

But I held on tight. Pulling. Pulling. Struggling to pull his head apart. 

“Let me try! Let me try!” Dan called. 

I let out a sigh and dropped the dummy to the floor. “It’s no use,” I told 
Dan. “Dad did too good a job. It’s glued tight.” 

Slappy scrambled to his feet. He shook his head. “Thanks for the head 
massage, slave! Now rub my back!” He laughed, an ugly dry laugh that sounded 
more like a cough. 

Dan stared at the dummy in wide-eyed horror. “Trina—what are we going 
to do?” he cried, his voice just above a whisper. 

“How about a game of Kick the Dummy Down the Stairs?” Slappy 
suggested, leering at us. “We’ll take turns being the dummy. You can go first!” 

“We—we have to do something!” Dan stammered. “He’s a monster! He’s 
evil! We have to get rid of him!” 

But how? I wondered. 

How? 

And then I had an idea. 



25 


Slappy must have read my thoughts. He turned and started to run. 

But I dove fast—and wrapped my hands around his skinny legs. 

He let out a harsh, angry cry as I began twisting his legs around each other, 
struggling to tie them in a knot. 

He swung an arm. The wooden hand caught me on the ear. 

But I held on. 

“Dan—grab his arms! Hurry!” 

My brother moved quickly. Slappy tried to bat him away. But Dan ducked 
low. And when he came up, he grabbed Slappy’s wrists and held on. 

“Let me go, slaves!” the dummy rasped. “Let me go now. You’ll be sorry! 
You’ll pay!” 

I saw the fear on Dan’s face. 

Slappy swung a hand free. He tried to swipe at Dan’s throat. 

But Dan reached out and grabbed onto the loose arm again. 

I felt eyes on me. I glanced up to see the other dummies around the room. 
They appeared to watch us struggle. A silent, still audience. 

I pulled a red kerchief off a dummy’s neck. And I stuffed it into Slappy’s 
mouth to keep him quiet. 

“Downstairs! Hurry!” I instructed my brother. 

The dummy twisted and squirmed, trying to break free. 

But I had his legs tied around each other. And Dan kept a tight grip on his 
arms. 

We began making our way to the attic stairs. “Where are we taking him?” 
Dan demanded. 

“Outside,” I replied. The dummy bucked and squirmed. I nearly dropped 

him. 

“In our pajamas?” Dan asked. 

I nodded and began backing down the stairs. Slappy struggled hard to get 
free. I nearly lost my balance and toppled over backwards. 

“We’re not going far,” I groaned. 

Somehow we made it all the way downstairs. I had to let go with one hand 



to open the front door. Slappy bucked his knees, trying to untangle his legs. 

I pushed the door open. Grabbed the legs again. 

Dan and I carried the squirming dummy outside. 

A cold, clear night. A light, silvery frost over the grass. A half moon high 
over the trees. 

“Ohhh.” I let out a moan as my bare feet touched the frozen grass. 

“It’s c-cold!” Dan stammered. “I can’t hold on much longer.” 

I saw him shiver. The front lawn suddenly darkened as clouds rolled over 
the moon. My legs trembled. The damp cold seeped through my thin pajamas. 

“Where are we taking him?” Dan whispered. 

“Around to the back.” 

Slappy kicked hard. But I held on tightly. 

Something scampered past my bare feet. I heard scurrying footsteps over 
the frosty ground. 

A rabbit? A raccoon? 

I didn’t stop to see. Gripping Slappy’s ankles with both hands, I backed up. 
Backed along the side of the house. 

“My feet are numb!” Dan complained. 

“Almost there,” I replied. 

Slappy uttered hoarse cries beneath the kerchief that gagged his mouth. His 
round eyes rolled wildly. Again, he tried to kick free. 

Dan and I hauled him to the back of the yard. By the time we got to the old 
well, my feet were frozen numb, too. And my whole body shook from the cold. 

“What are we going to do?” Dan asked in a tiny voice. 

The clouds rolled away. Shadows pulled back. The silvery moonlight lit up 
the old stone well. 

“We’re going to toss him down the well,” I groaned. 

Dan stared at me, surprised. 

“He’s evil,” I explained. “We have no choice.” 

Dan nodded. 

We lifted Slappy onto the smooth stones at the top of the well. He bucked 
and kicked. He tried to scream through his gag. 

I saw Dan shiver again. 

“It’s a wooden dummy,” I told him. “It isn’t a person. It’s an evil wooden 
dummy.” 

We both shoved hard at the same time. 



The dummy slid off the stone wall and dropped into the well. 

Dan and I both waited until we heard the splash from far below. 

Then we ran side by side back to the house. 

He’s gone! I thought gratefully. Joyfully. The evil thing is gone for good. 

I slept really well that night. And I didn’t dream about dummies. 

The next morning, Dan and I met in the hall. We both were smiling. We felt 
so good. 

I was actually singing as I followed Dan down the stairs for breakfast. 

Dad greeted us at the kitchen door with an angry frown. “What is he doing 
down here?” Dad demanded. 

He pointed into the kitchen. 

Pointed at the breakfast table. 

Pointed to Slappy, sitting at the breakfast table, grinning his ugly painted 
grin, his eyes wide and innocent. 



26 


Dan’s mouth dropped open. 

I let out a sharp cry. 

“Don’t act stunned. Just get him out of here,” Dad said angrily. “And why is 
he all wet? Did you have him out in the rain?” 

I glanced out the kitchen window. Lightning flashed through a dark gray 
sky. Sheets of rain pounded the glass. Thunder rumbled overhead. 

“Not a very nice morning,” Uncle Cal said, stepping up behind Dan and me. 

“I’ve got coffee ready,” Dad told him. 

“I see your friend here beat us down to breakfast,” Uncle Cal said, 
motioning to Slappy. 

The dummy’s grin seemed to grow wider. 

“Get him out of here, Trina,” Dad repeated sharply. “Anyone want pancakes 
this morning?” He moved to the cabinet and started searching for a frying pan. 

“Make a few extra for me. I’m starving,” Uncle Cal said. “I’ll go see if 
Zane is up.” He turned and hurried out of the kitchen. 

Dad leaned into the cabinet, banging pots and pans, searching for the one he 
always used for pancakes. 

“Dad, I have to tell you something,” I said softly. I couldn’t hold it in any 
longer. I had to tell Dad the truth. I had to tell him the whole story. 

“Dad, Slappy is evil,” I told him. “He’s alive, and he’s evil. Dan and I threw 
him down the well last night. We had to get rid of him. But now—he’s back. You 
have to help us, Dad. We have to get rid of him—now.” 

I took a deep breath and let it out. It felt so good to get the story off my 
chest. 

Dad pulled his head from the cabinet and turned to me. “Did you say 
something, Trina? I was making such a racket, I couldn’t hear you.” 

“Dad, I-I—” I stammered. 

“Get that dummy out of here—now!” Dad shouted. He stuck his head back 
into the cabinet. “How can a whole frying pan disappear into thin air?” 

I let out a disappointed sigh. A loud burst of thunder made me jump. 

I motioned with my head for Dan to help me. We lifted Slappy off the chair. 
I held him around the waist, as far away from me as possible. 



His gray suit was sopping wet. Water dripped off his black leather shoes. 

We were halfway up the attic stairs when Slappy blinked and let out a soft 
chuckle. “Nice try, slaves,” he rasped. “But give up. I’m never going away. 
Never!” 



27 


What a dreary morning. 

Rain pounded the windows. Lightning crackled through the charcoal-gray 
sky. Thunder boomed so close it rocked the house. 

I felt as if the storm were inside my head. As if the heavy, heavy storm 
clouds were weighing me down. As if the thunder erupted inside my brain, 
drowning out my thoughts. 

Dan and I slumped on the couch in the den, watching the storm through the 
Venetian blinds over the big window. We were trying to come up with an idea, a 
way to get rid of Slappy. 

The room was chilly. Damp, cold air leaked through the old window. I 
mbbed the sleeves of my sweater, trying to warm myself. 

We were alone in the house. Mom, Dad, Uncle Cal, and Zane had gone into 
town. 

“I tried to tell Dad,” I said. “You heard me, Dan. I tried to tell him about 
Slappy. But he didn’t hear me.” 

“Dad wouldn’t believe you anyway, Trina,” Dan replied glumly. He sighed. 
“Who would believe it?” 

“How can a wooden dummy come to life?” I asked, shaking my head. 
“How?” 

And then I remembered. 

And then I had an idea. 

I jumped up from the couch. I tugged my brother by the arm. “Come on.” 

He pulled back. “Where?” 

“To the attic. I think I know how to put Slappy to sleep—for good.” 

I stopped at the attic door and held Dan back. “Be very quiet,” I instructed 
him. “Maybe Slappy is asleep. If he’s asleep, my plan will go a whole lot better.” 

Thunder roared as I opened the door. I led the way up the stairs, moving 
slowly, carefully, one step at a time. I could hear the rain pounding down on the 
roof. And I could see the flicker of lightning on the low ceiling. 

I stopped as I reached the top of the stairs and turned toward the dummy 
collection. A flash of lightning through the window cast the shadows of their 
heads on the wall. As the lightning flickered, the shadows all seemed to be 



moving. 

Dan stepped up behind me. “Here we are. Now what?” he whispered. 

I raised a finger to my lips and began to tiptoe across the floor. Thunder 
boomed. It sounded so much louder up here under the roof! 

When Dan and I dragged Slappy up here this morning, we had tossed him 
down on the floor. We were too freaked and frightened to spend the time 
propping him up on his chair. We just wanted to dump him and get away from 
the attic. 

I saw Slappy in the flickering white lightning. Lying on his back in the 
center of the floor. The other dummies sat around him, grinning their silent grins. 

I took a step closer. And then another. Moving as silently as I could. 

I peered down at the evil dummy. His arms were at his sides. His legs were 
twisted around each other. 

And his eyes were closed. 

Yes! 

His eyes were closed. He was asleep. 

I took another few steps toward Slappy. But I felt Dan’s hand on my arm, 
tugging me back. “Trina—what are you going to do?” he whispered. 

My eyes darted to Slappy. Still asleep. Thunder roared all around. It 
sounded as if we were standing in the middle of it. 

“Remember those weird words I read?” I whispered to my brother, keeping 
my eyes on the evil dummy. “Remember those weird words on that slip of 
paper?” 

Dan thought for a moment. Then he nodded. 

“Well, maybe it was those words that brought him to life,” I whispered. 
“Maybe it’s some kind of secret chant.” 

Dan shrugged. “Maybe.” He didn’t sound too hopeful. 

“I saw you tuck that slip of paper back into Slappy’s jacket pocket,” I told 
my brother. “I’m going to take it out and read the words again. Maybe the same 
words that bring him to life will also put him back to sleep.” 

Of course it was a crazy idea. 

But a dummy coming to life was crazy, too. And a dummy trying to turn 
you into his slave was crazy. 

It was all crazy. So maybe my idea was just crazy enough to work. 

“Good luck,” my brother whispered, his eyes on the sleeping dummy on the 


floor. 



I made my way over to Slappy. 

I knelt down on my knees beside him. 

I took a deep breath and held it. Then slowly, slowly, I began to reach my 
hand down to his jacket pocket. 

I knew the slip of paper was inside that pocket. Could I pull it out without 
waking up Slappy? 

I lowered my hand. Lowered it. 

My fingers touched the top of the jacket pocket. 

Still holding my breath, I began to slip two fingers inside. 

“Gotcha!” Slappy shrieked as his hands shot up. He grabbed both of my 
wrists and began to squeeze. 



28 


I was so stunned, I nearly fell on top of him. 

As I struggled to keep my balance, his wooden hands dug into my wrists. 
They tightened around me, cutting into my skin. 

“Let go of me!” I screamed. I struggled to pull my arms away. But he was 
too strong. Too strong. 

The hard fingers dug into my wrists. They squeezed harder, harder—until 
they cut off all circulation. 

“Let go of me! Let go!” My cry came out a shrill wail. 

“I give the orders, ssssslave!” Slappy hissed. “You will obey me. Obey me 
forever! Or you will pay!” 

“Let go! Let me go!” I shrieked. I tugged. I struggled to my feet. I jerked 
my arms up and down. 

But Slappy didn’t loosen his hold. 

His whole body bounced in the air. Hit the floor. Bounced back up as I 
pulled. 

But his hands gripped even harder. 

I couldn’t free myself. And the pain—the intense pain—shot down my 
arms. Down my sides. Down my whole body. 

“Pick me up, sssslave!” the dummy hissed. “Pick me up and put me on my 
chair.” 

“Let go!” I cried. “You’re breaking my wrists! Let go!” 

The dummy uttered a cold laugh in reply. 

The pain shot through my body. My legs wobbled. I dropped back to my 
knees. 

I turned in time to see Dan dive toward us. 

I thought he was going to grab the dummy’s hand and try to set me free. 

Instead, Dan grabbed for the jacket pocket. 

Slappy let go of my wrists. But not in time. 

Dan pulled the slip of paper from the pocket. 

Slappy swiped at Dan’s hand, trying to grab the paper away. 

But Dan swung around. He unfolded the paper and raised it to his face. And 



then he shouted out the mysterious words that were written there 
“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano. ” 

Would it work? 

Would it put Slappy back to sleep? 



29 


I rubbed my aching wrists and stared down at the grinning dummy. 

He gazed back at me. And then winked. 

His laughter roared over the thunder, over the hard, steady drumming of 
rain on the roof. 

“You cannot defeat me that way, slave!” Slappy cried gleefully. 

I took a step back. A chill ran down my back, making my whole body 
shudder. 

My plan hadn’t worked. 

My only plan. My last, desperate plan. A total failure. 

I caught the disappointment on Dan’s face. The slip of paper fell from his 
fingers and floated to the floor. 

“You will pay for this!” Slappy threatened. “You will pay for your foolish 
attempt to defeat me.” 

He pushed his hands against the floor and started to climb to his feet. 

I backed up. 

And saw the other dummies move. 

All of them. They were sliding off their chairs. Lowering themselves from 
the couch. 

They stretched their skinny arms. Flexed their big, wooden hands. 

Their heads bobbed, their knees bent as they started to shuffle toward us. 

They had all come to life! Twelve dummies, brought to life by those strange 
words Dan had cried out. 

Twelve dummies staggering toward Dan and me. 

We were trapped between them. Trapped in the circle as they shuffled, 
dragging their heavy shoes. Their eyes wide. Locked on Dan and me. 

As they staggered and shuffled. Moving stiffly, grinning, grinning so coldly. 

Closing in on Dan and me. 



30 


Wilbur limped toward us, his big, chipped hands stretched out, ready to grab us. 
Lucy’s big blue eyes gleamed coldly as she staggered toward us. Arnie let out a 
high-pitched giggle as he pulled himself closer. 

Closer. 

Dan and I spun around. But we had nowhere to turn. Nowhere to escape. 

The dummies’ big shoes scraped heavily over the wooden floorboards. 
Their knees bent with each step. They looked as if they would tumble to the 
floor. 

But they kept coming. Lurching forward. Bodies bending. Heads bobbing. 

Alive. Wooden creatures. Alive! 

Dan raised his hands over his face as if to shield himself. 

I took a step back. But the dummies behind me were closing in, too. 

I took a long, deep breath and held it. 

Then I waited. 

Waited for their wooden hands to grab us. 

I uttered a loud gasp as Wilbur and Arnie staggered right past me. 

The dummies all brushed past Dan and me. 

As if we weren’t there. 

I stared in shock as they circled Slappy. I saw Rocky grab Slappy by the 
collar. I saw Lucy grab Slappy’s shoes. 

Then the circle of dummies moved in closer. Tighter. 

I couldn’t see what they were doing to Slappy. But I saw their skinny arms 
jerking and tugging. I saw them all struggling together. 

Wrestling with him. 

Were they pulling him apart? 

I couldn’t see. But I heard Slappy’s scream of terror. 

Dan and I clung to each other, watching the strange sight. It looked like a 
football huddle. A huddle of dummies. 

The dummies grunted and groaned, muttering in low tones as they worked 
over Slappy. 

We couldn’t see Slappy in the middle. 



We heard only one scream. 

We didn’t hear him scream again. 
And then I heard the attic door open. 
Footsteps on the stairs! 

Someone was coming up. 



31 


I poked Dan and turned him to the stairs. 

We both cried out as Zane climbed up to the attic and squinted across the 
long room at us. 

Did he see the struggling dummies? Did he see that they were all alive? 

I turned back—in time to see the dummies all collapse in a heap. 

“Whoa!” I cried, my heart pounding. I blinked several times. I didn’t 
believe what I saw. 

The twelve dummies lay lifeless on the floor, arms and legs in a wild tangle. 
Mouths open. Eyes gazing up blankly at the low ceiling. 

Slappy lay sprawled in the middle. His head tilted to one side. I saw the 
blank stare in his eyes. Saw the open-mouthed, wooden grin. 

He was completely lifeless now. As lifeless as all the others. 

Had the other dummies somehow destroyed his evil? 

Would Slappy remain a lifeless block of wood forever? 

I didn’t have time to think about it. Zane came hurrying across the attic, an 
angry scowl on his face. His eyes were on the pile of dummies. 

“Caught you!” Zane cried to Dan and me. “Caught you both! Planning your 
next trick! I knew you two were the ones! I’m telling Uncle Danny what you’re 
doing!” 



32 


Of course no one believed Dan and me. 

Of course everyone believed Zane. 

We were in the worst trouble of our lives. Dan and I were grounded forever. 
We probably won’t be allowed to leave the house until we are in our forties! 

The next day, Zane and Uncle Cal were at the front door, saying good-bye. 
It’s a terrible thing to say—but Dan and I were not sad to see Zane go. 

“I hope I never have to come back here,” he whispered to me in the hall. 
Then he put on a big, phony smile for Mom and Dad. 

“Zane, what kind of camera would you like?” Dad asked, putting a hand on 
Zane’s shoulder. “You have a birthday coming up. I’d like to send you a new 
camera for your birthday.” 

Zane shrugged his big shoulders. “Thanks,” he told my Dad. “But I’m 
really not into photography anymore.” 

Mom and Dad raised their eyebrows in surprise. 

“Well, what would you like for your birthday, Zane?” Mom asked. “Is there 
something else you’re interested in?” 

Zane shyly lowered his eyes to the floor. “Well... I’d kind of like to try 
being a ventriloquist—like you, Uncle Danny.” 

Dad beamed happily. 

That creep Zane had said just the right thing. 

“Maybe you have a spare dummy you can lend Zane,” Uncle Cal suggested. 

Dad rubbed his chin. “Well... maybe I do.” He turned to me. “Trina, mn up 
to the attic. And pick out a good dummy for Zane to take home. Not one of the 
old ones. But a nice one that Zane can enjoy.” 

“No problem, Dad,” I replied eagerly. I hurried up to the attic. I hoped they 
didn’t see the enormous grin on my face. 

Can you guess which dummy I picked out for Zane? 

I know it’s horribly mean. But I really had no choice—did I? 

“Here’s a good one, Zane,” I said a few seconds later. I placed the grinning 
dummy in Zane’s arms. “His name is Slappy. I think you two will be very happy 
together.” 

I hope Zane has fun learning to be a ventriloquist. 



But I have the feeling he may have a few problems. Because as Zane 
carried Slappy into the car, I saw the dummy wink at me. 




BAD HARE DAY 


Goosebumps - 41 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“Pick a card, any card.” I spread out the deck of cards in front of Sue Mailer, 
facedown. She giggled and picked one. 

“Don’t show it to me,” I warned her. She glanced at the card, keeping it 
hidden from me. 

A small crowd of kids gathered on the school steps to watch. School was 
out for the day. Sue showed them her card. 

I love doing magic tricks—especially in front of an audience. My dream is 
to be a great magician like my idol, Amaz-O. 

I’ve been playing around with stage names. My real name is Tim Swanson 
—but that’s way too boring for a professional magician. I’ve been thinking of 
calling myself Swanz-O. My best friend, Foz, thinks Swanz-0 sounds like a 
laundry detergent. 

“Now, Sue,” I said in a louder voice, so everybody could hear me. “Put the 
card back in the deck.” 

Sue slipped the card in with the others. I shuffled the deck and tapped it 
three times. “I will now make your card rise to the top of the deck,” I announced. 

Tap, tap, tap. I picked up the top card and showed it to Sue. “Was this your 
card?” I asked her. 

Her eyebrows shot up in amazement. “The three of clubs!” she cried. “That 
was my card!” 

“How’d you do that?” Jesse Brown asked. 

“Magicians never reveal their secrets,” I said, bowing. “And now, for my 
next trick—” 

“I know how he did it.” My little sister, Ginny, suddenly popped up in the 
crowd. The sound of her scratchy voice made my hair stand on end. She loves to 
spoil my magic shows. 

But a true magician doesn’t let anything throw him. I grinned my biggest, 
fakest grin at the little brat. 

“Ladies and gentlemen, my lovely assistant, Ginny!” 

“I’m not your assistant, freak-face,” Ginny snarled. “You won’t catch me 
doing nerdy magic tricks. I’m into karate. Hi-ya!” She demonstrated her karate 
chop. 



Some of the kids laughed. I pretended to laugh, too. “Ha, ha. Isn’t she a 
riot?” 

Everybody says Ginny looks like an angel. She has long, wavy blond hair, 
rosy cheeks, big blue eyes. People always ooh and aah over her. 

No one ever oohs and aahs over me. I’ve got curly light-brown hair and 
hazel eyes. I’m twelve, which Mom says isn’t a “cute age”. 

My nose is long and curves up at the end like a hot dog. Ginny likes to flick 
the end of my nose with her finger and say, “Boi-oi-oing.” 

Her nose is small and perfect, of course. 

I tried to continue my show, Ginny or no Ginny. I slipped the deck of cards 
into my pocket and yanked out my magic scarf. “Now, be amazed as I—” 

Ginny reached into my pocket and snatched out the cards. “Look, 
everybody!” she cried, showing them the cards. “All the cards are the three of 
clubs!” 

Ginny started passing the cards around so everyone could see. 

“Hey! Give those back!” I protested. I grabbed the cards away. It was true. 
Every single card in the deck was the three of clubs. But no one was supposed to 
know that. 

“You’re a phony,” Sue mumbled. 

“No—wait!” I cried. “Watch this!” 

I whipped out my magic rings—two large silver hoops hooked together. 
The kids quieted down a little. 

“These silver rings are locked together,” I declared. “They’re completely 
solid—linked together forever!” I tugged on them to show that they wouldn’t 
come apart. 

Then I handed them to Jesse. “Try to pull the rings apart,” I told him. He 
pulled hard. He pulled lightly. He pulled hard again. He jangled them around. 
The rings stayed hooked together. 

I took them back. “The rings will never come apart,” I said. “Unless I say 
the magic words.” I waved one hand over the rings. “Hocus pocus!” I gently 
pulled the rings apart. A couple of kids clapped. 

“You’re not going to fall for that old trick, are you?” Ginny mocked. “You 
want to know how he does it?” She grabbed the rings away and began to 
demonstrate. “They’re trick rings—” 

“I will now make my lovely assistant disappear!” I cried, shoving Ginny 
aside. “Beat it!” 



“Stop pushing me!” she shouted. “Hi-ya!” 

She karate-kicked me in the stomach. 

“Oof!” I doubled over. Everybody laughed and clapped. 

“That’s a great trick!” Sue said. 

I clutched my stomach. Some trick. 

Stupid Ginny and her karate kicks. Why did Mom have to take her to that 
martial-arts school? My life has been miserable ever since. She’s only ten, and 
she fights way better than I do. I’ve got the bruises to show it. 

“Kick him again!” somebody yelled. 

Ginny crouched, ready to attack. 

“Try it, and I’ll tell Mom where that dent in the refrigerator door came 
from,” I warned her. 

She backed off. She knew Mom would kill her for karate-chopping the 
fridge just because we were out of ice cream. 

“She’s not going to kick him,” Jesse said. “Show’s over.” 

The kids drifted away. 

“Wait!” I cried. “Come back!” 

“See you tomorrow, Tim,” Sue said. Everybody began to head for home. 

“Thanks for wrecking everything, Ginny,” I snapped. 

She flicked my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.” 

“Stop it!” I swatted her away. “You’re definitely going to get it. I’m telling 
Mom about the fridge for sure.” 

“Go ahead,” she taunted. “But if you do, I’ll give you the freezer chop.” 
She waved her arms through the air, making those weird karate noises. “Wah 
wah wee — ah! Right to the neck. You’ll never walk again!” 

She trotted away. “See you at home, Swanz-O!” 

This is what I have to deal with every day of my life. A little sister who 
could kill me if she wanted to. What can I do? I’m helpless against her. 

That’s one reason I want to be a magician. Maybe Ginny can karate-chop 
my arms off—but not if I make her disappear first! 

I sighed and buttoned up my denim jacket. It was almost four o’clock and 
getting chilly. The wind had picked up, too. When is it going to get warm? I 
wondered. It’s the end of March—it’s supposed to be spring already. 

The school door burst open. “I’m outta here!” Foz shouted. 

Foz’s real name is Foster Martin. But he doesn’t look like a Foster. He’s a 
Foz. He’s chubby, with a brown buzz cut. His shirt is always untucked. 



“Where 5 ve you been?” I asked him. 

“Mrs. Pratt made me stay after school,” he replied, making a disgusted face. 

“Why?” I asked. 

“No reason,” Foz said. 

Foz has to stay after school almost every day. He always says it’s for no 
reason. 

I picked up my magic kit and started down the school steps. Foz followed. 
We left the school grounds and walked toward town. 

“What were you doing at school so late?” he asked. 

“I was trying out a few magic tricks. Ginny told everybody how they work. 
It was a disaster.” 

“You need better tricks,” Foz said. “Lots of kids have the same magic kit as 
yours.” 

“You’re right,” I agreed, rattling my kit. “This is amateur stuff. I’m ready 
for some real magic tricks. Professional ones.” 

“Like a hat you can pull a rabbit out of.” 

“Or that spinning box Amaz-0 has,” I added. 

Amaz-0 was my hero—the greatest magician ever. “Did you see him on 
TV last week? His assistant stepped into a big black box. Amaz-0 spun it around 
three times, and she disappeared!” 

“He’s doing a show at Midnight Mansion,” Foz said. Midnight Mansion is a 
club in town where magicians perform every night. 

“I know. I wish I could go. But the tickets cost twenty-five dollars.” 

We turned onto Bank Street and headed toward the center of town. It wasn’t 
on the way home, but Foz knew what I was doing. Malik’s Magic Shoppe was 
on Bank Street. I stopped in there at least once a week, just to drool over the cool 
tricks they had. 

“Malik’s has a bunch of new tricks,” I told Foz. “Designed by Amaz-0 
himself.” 

“I’ll bet they’re expensive,” Foz said. 

“They are.” I reached into my pocket to see how much money I had. Five 
bucks. 

“That’ll buy you a squirting flower,” Foz said. “Maybe.” 

I stuffed the bill back into my pocket. “You’ve got to see this stuff, anyway. 
There’s a table—you put a plate or something on it—it can be anything you 
want. The plate will rise up over the table and float!” 



“How does it work?” Foz asked. 

“I don’t know. Mr. Malik wouldn’t tell me. He said you have to buy the 
trick to find out.” 

“How much does it cost?” 

“Five hundred dollars.” 

Foz rolled his eyes. “I guess you’ll have to stick with card tricks.” 

“I guess.” I sighed. 

A little bell rang as we opened the door to Malik’s. I breathed in the musty 
smell of the shop. It was jam-packed with old tricks, new tricks, magic books, 
and costumes. There were even cages in the back for rabbits and doves. Mr. 
Malik sold everything. 

I called out, “Hi, Mr. Malik.” He stood behind the cash register. He was a 
short, bald old man with a fat stomach. 

I waited for Mr. Malik to say, “What’s new, Magoo?” in his gravelly voice. 
That’s how he greets all his regular customers. 

I called out, “Hi!” again, but he didn’t answer. He just stood there and 
grunted. 

“Mr. Malik?” Foz and I crept closer to the counter. 

“Unh!” Mr. Malik grunted. He stumbled forward. 

Something was sticking out of his stomach. A sword! 

“Mr. Malik?” I asked. “Are you okay?” 

He clutched the handle of the sword and moaned in pain. 

Someone had stabbed him! 

“Help me!” he groaned. “Please—help!” 

Foz and I froze in fear. I let out a gasp—but I was too frightened to move. 
Foz’s whole body trembled. 

Mr. Malik uttered another groan. Then his expression changed. He pulled 
out the sword—and he tossed it to me. 

“Hey!” I cried. “It’s a fake!” 

Mr. Malik laughed. He rubbed his round stomach, which hadn’t been 
stabbed at all. “What’s new, Magoo?” he chuckled. “Get a load of that trick 
sword. Just got it in today.” 

I tested the sword against my own stomach. It had a sliding blade. I pushed 
the blade into the handle, then let go. It popped out again. Very cool. 

Foz fingered the blade. “Think of the tricks you could play on Ginny with a 
sword like this! ” 



“Like it, Tim?” Mr. Malik asked. “Only twenty bucks.” 

I shook my head. “We’re just looking, Mr. Malik.” 

He hung the sword on the wall behind him. “All right. Take your time and 
look around. But would it kill you to actually buy something once in a while?” 

Mr. Malik always said that, too. 

I wandered to the back of the shop. I checked out a rack of magician’s 
jackets. I pulled a sparkly blue tuxedo jacket off the rack and tried it on. It had a 
trick sleeve for hiding things. 

I stared at myself in the mirror. I pretended to announce myself. “The 
Amazing Swanz-O!” 

Foz shook his head in disgust. “That name is so lame.” 

“Yeah, you’re right.” I thought of another name. “How about ‘Swanson the 
Magnificent’?” 

“It’s okay,” Foz said. “A little boring, but okay.” 

He tried on a top hat and added, “You need something cooler, like ‘Tim the 
Destroyer’.” 

“That sounds like a wrestler,” I commented. 

“At least it’s not wimpy,” Foz retorted. “Like Swanz-O.” 

“Hey, boys.” Mr. Malik shuffled toward us. He held out two tickets. 

“Take these, if you want them,” he said. “Two free passes to Amaz-O’s 
magic show tomorrow night.” 

“Wow!” I cried. I took a ticket and read it. 

Admit One 
An Evening of Magic 
with the Great Amaz-0 
March 23 
10 P.M. 

Midnight Mansion 

“Thanks Mr. Malik! I can’t believe we’ll get to see Amaz-0 in person!” I 
gushed. “Tomorrow night!” 

“Tomorrow night?” Foz frowned at his ticket. “I can’t go. My aunt and 
uncle are coming over. It’s my mother’s birthday.” 

“So? This is a once-in-a-lifetime chance! Your mother has a birthday every 
year.” 



Foz stuffed the ticket into my palm, shaking his head. “I know my mom— 
and she won’t see it that way. Anyway, tomorrow night is a school night.” 

I’d forgotten about that. I hoped my mom would let me go. Ten o’clock was 
pretty late to go out on a school night. 

She has to let me go, I decided. She just has to. What kind of horrible 
mother would keep her son from seeing his hero in person? Only a really mean, 
monstery mother. 

My mother is a grump, but she’s not a monster. 

I took off the blue jacket and hung it back up on the rack. A large wooden 
box caught my eye. It was the size of a coffin, brightly painted with red and 
yellow stars. I lifted the lid. 

The box was empty, lined with blue velvet on the inside. “What’s the box 
do, Mr. Malik?” I asked. 

“That’s for sawing people in half,” Mr. Malik replied. 

I examined the inside of the box, trying to figure out how it worked. I found 
no secret compartments or panels or anything. 

“How does it work?” I asked Mr. Malik. 

“You going to buy it?” he demanded. 

“Well—how much does it cost?” 

“Two-fifty.” 

“Two dollars and fifty cents? I can afford that.” 

Mr. Malik waved me away and started toward the stockroom at the back of 
the shop. “Two dollars and fifty cents,” he muttered. “In your dreams.” 

“He meant two hundred and fifty dollars, Brainz-O,” Foz said. 

I tried to cover myself. “I knew that. I was joking.” 

Foz fiddled with a cool-looking trick in the corner. I moved closer to see. 

“It’s a guillotine,” Foz said. “For chopping off heads.” 

The guillotine had a place for the victim to rest his head at the bottom—and 
a razor-sharp blade at the top. 

Mr. Malik emerged from the back room. “I’m closing up soon, boys,” he 
called. 

“I just want to see how this works,” Foz said. He twisted a lever on the 
guillotine. 

“Foz—no!” I cried. 

The blade slid down the guillotine. 

And landed with a horrifying thunk. 



“My hand!” Foz shrieked. “My hand!” 



2 


Mr. Malik gasped. “I’ll call an ambulance! Nine-one-one!” He grabbed the 
phone. 

The guillotine blade had sliced right through Foz’s hand. He screamed in 

pain. 

“Oh!” Foz moaned. “I cut off my hand!” he wailed. “I’ll never write again!” 

I started laughing. 

“Why are you laughing?” Mr. Malik demanded. “This is an emergency!” 

“No, it’s not.” Foz held up his hands to show that he was fine. “Got a paper 
towel? I need to wipe off this fake blood.” 

“Fake?” Mr. Malik stammered. “Fake blood?” 

“We got you back for that sword trick,” I told him. 

Mr. Malik clutched his sweaty forehead in his hands. “I’m so stupid! I 
know that’s a trick guillotine. Why did I fall for such a dumb joke?” 

“Hey,” Foz protested. “It was a lot funnier than your sword-in-the-stomach 
joke.” 

Mr. Malik wiped his brow and smiled. “All right, boys. Enough tricks. It’s 
five o’clock. Get out of here.” He shoved us toward the door. 

“Thanks for the tickets, Mr. Malik,” I called. “See you next week.” 

“Sure. Next week, when I’ll have a new shipment of magic tricks you won’t 
buy.” 

The bell on the door jangled as we left the shop. Foz and I walked down 
Bank Street toward home. 

“Sure you won’t go to Midnight Mansion tomorrow night?” I asked him. 

“I can’t. Your mom will never let you go, either.” 

“I’ll find a way,” I insisted. “You’ll see.” 

We paused in front of Foz’s house. “Come over to my house after school 
tomorrow,” I said. “I’m giving another magic show. Only this time Ginny won’t 
wreck it.” 

“I’ll be there,” Foz promised. 

“And bring your sister’s rabbit,” I added. 

Foz shuffled his feet uncomfortably. “Clare is not going to like that...” he 



began. 

“Please, Foz,” I begged. “I’m going to finish building my rabbit table 
tonight. The rabbit trick is going to be so amazing—” 

“I’ll try to bring the rabbit,” Foz said. “But if anything happens to it, Clare 
will kill me.” 

“Nothing will happen to it—I promise.” 

I waved good-bye to Foz and went home. “The Great Swanzini is here!” I 
announced as I burst into the kitchen. 

“You mean the Great Jerk,” Ginny mumbled. She sat at the kitchen table, 
folding napkins. She reached up and flicked at my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.” 

“Get off me.” I slapped her hand away. 

Mom set a plate of chicken on the table. “Go wash up, Tim,” she ordered. 
“And tell your father supper is ready.” 

“Look, Mom.” I held up a quarter. Then, with a flick of my wrist, I slipped 
it up my sleeve. “I made the quarter disappear!” 

I showed her my two empty hands. 

“Very nice. I see two hands that haven’t been washed yet,” Mom said 
impatiently. 

“I saw the quarter go up your sleeve,” Ginny sneered. 

“No one appreciates me around here,” I complained. “Someday I’m going 
to be the greatest magician in the world. And my own family doesn’t care!” 

Mom strode to the kitchen door. “Bill!” she called upstairs to my dad. 
“Supper!” 

I made my way out of the kitchen to wash my hands. My parents didn’t take 
my magic act seriously. They thought it was just a hobby. 

But Ginny’s karate lessons were the most important thing in the world, of 
course. Mom always said, “Girls need to know how to defend themselves.” Now 
I needed to defend myself against my own sister! 

I returned to the kitchen and sat down. Mom plunked a piece of chicken 
down beside the rice on my plate. Dad and Ginny were already eating. 

“I had a terrible day at work today,” Mom grumbled, ripping into her 
chicken. She’s a high school guidance counselor. “First Michael Lamb 
threatened to beat up another boy. His teacher yelled at him, and he threatened to 
beat her up, too. She sent him to my office. When I tried to talk to him, he said 
he’d beat me up. So I called his mother in—and she tried to beat me up. I had to 
call the police!” 



“That’s a piece of cake next to my day,” Dad complained. Dad sells cars. 
“Some guy came in and said he wanted to test-drive the new minivan. I handed 
him the keys, and he took off. He never came back. He stole the car!” 

I sighed and shoveled rice into my mouth. Dinner is like this every night. 
Both of my parents hate their jobs. 

“I had a really tough day, too,” Ginny put in. “Michael Franklin teased me. 
So I had to karate-kick him in the leg!” 

I smirked. “Poor you.” 

Mom’s forehead wrinkled—her concerned look. “You didn’t hurt yourself, 
did you, Ginny?” 

“No,” Ginny replied. “But I could have.” 

“What about me?” I protested. “I’m the one who got kicked in the stomach. 
And it hurt a lot!” 

“You seem to be fine now,” Dad chimed in. 

I gave up. I knew that arguing would get me nowhere. Mom and Dad 
always take Ginny’s side. 

“Is there any dessert?” Ginny demanded. 

“Ice cream,” Mom answered. 

“I’ll clear the table,” I offered, hoping it would put Mom in a better mood. I 
needed both Mom and Dad to be in a good mood. 

Because I was about to ask the big question. 

Would they let me go to Midnight Mansion tomorrow night? 

Would they? 



3 


I stood up, collecting dirty plates. “Guess what? Amaz-0 is doing his act at 
Midnight Mansion tomorrow night. Mr. Malik gave me two free passes.” I held 
my breath, waiting for their answer. 

“Excellent!” Ginny cried. “That means I can go too!” 

“I’m not taking you,” I told her. “I’ll ask Mark or Jesse or somebody. 
Anybody but you.” I dropped the plates in the sink. They crashed but didn’t 
break. 

“Careful, Tim,” Mom warned. 

Ginny slithered over to the sink and tried to hug me. “Please, Tim. I’m your 
sister. Your only sister in the whole world. I’d do anything for you. You have to 
take me with you!” 

“Neither one of you is going,” Dad said quietly. “It’s a school night.” 

“But Dad, it’s free!” I protested. “Just this once. Amaz-0 is my hero. I’ll 
never get another chance to see him in person!” 

“What time does the show start?” Mom asked. 

“Ten o’clock,” I told her. 

She shook her head. “Absolutely not. You’re not going out at ten o’clock on 
a school night. Especially not to a nightclub. You’re much too young.” She 
furiously spooned ice cream into a bowl. 

“Mom—please!” I begged. “I’m twelve. I can handle it.” 

“You heard your mother,” Dad said. “You’ll have other chances to see 
Amaz-O, Tim. Don’t worry.” 

Mom offered me a bowl of ice cream. “I don’t want it,” I grumbled. I 
stormed out of the kitchen. As I left, I heard Ginny say, “Good. Now I’ll get two 
bowls of ice cream.” 

Stupid Ginny, I thought. Stupid Mom and stupid Dad. My one chance to see 
my idol, the great Amaz-0—and they won’t let me go. 

I wandered into the garage. In the corner stood a new trick I was building— 
the rabbit table. It was a square table that came up to my waist. The top had a 
hole in it that led to a secret compartment under the table. 

I planned to hide a rabbit in the compartment and cover the hole with my 
magic top hat. When I pressed a pedal at the foot of the table, the bottom of the 



secret compartment would rise up. Then I’d lift my hat—and there would be the 
rabbit! 

The table was almost finished. I turned it upside down and hammered on 
the bottom of the secret compartment. 

This trick is going to knock everybody out tomorrow afternoon, I thought. 
I’ll be almost as amazing as Amaz-O! 

I was so busy hammering I didn’t hear the garage door open. Two baby blue 
high-tops suddenly appeared in front of me. I didn’t have to look up. I knew 
Ginny’s smelly sneakers when I saw them. 

“Go away,” I commanded. 

She never listens to me. “You going to do the rabbit trick tomorrow?” she 
asked. 

“Uh-huh. Now go away.” 

“Where are you going to get the rabbit?” 

I set down my hammer. “I’m going to turn you into a rabbit.” 

“Ha ha.” She flipped her wavy blond hair. “You know what this table would 
be perfect for?” she asked. “Karate-chopping. I’ll bet I could chop it in half with 
one hand.” 

“Try it and I’ll—” 

“You’ll what?” she taunted. 

What could I do to her? Not much. “I’ll turn you into a rabbit for real,” I 
threatened. 

“Oh, yeah? How are you going to do that?” 

“It’s easy,” I replied. “Mr. Malik showed me how. Tonight, while you’re 
sleeping, I’m going to sneak into your room and turn you into a rabbit.” 

“Give me a break,” Ginny said. “That is so dumb.” 

“Maybe. Maybe not. I guess we’ll find out tonight.” I picked up my 
hammer again. “I hope you like carrots,” I told her. 

“You’re crazy,” she said. She hurried out of the garage. 

Well, I thought. At least that got rid of her for a while. 

I set the table on its legs again. All I had to do was paint it, and it would be 
ready. 

Wouldn’t it be great? I thought as I opened a can of blue paint. Wouldn’t it 
be great if I really could turn Ginny into a rabbit? 

But that was impossible. Wasn’t it? 



4 


“We want the rabbit trick! We want the rabbit trick!” 

Ginny sat in the grass in our backyard. Six or seven other kids sat around. I 
was in the middle of my magic act. Ginny was stirring up trouble. 

She knew I didn’t have a rabbit for the trick. I was still waiting for Foz to 
show up. 

Where is he? I wondered. He’s ruining my show! 

The other kids joined in Ginny’s chant. “The rabbit trick! The rabbit trick!” 

I tried to stall them. “The amazing, incredible rabbit trick is coming up,” I 
promised. “But first—wouldn’t you like to see me pull a quarter out of Ginny’s 
ear again?” 

“No!” the kids yelled. “Boo!” 

“Karate fight!” Sue called. “We want a karate fight. Ginny versus Tim!” 

Things were getting ugly. 

At last I glimpsed Foz at the side of the house. He waved at me frantically. 

“Intermission!” I announced. “I’ll be back in two minutes. And then—I’ll 
pull a rabbit out of my hat!” 

I hurried over to Foz. A big cardboard box sat at his feet. 

“What took you so long?” I demanded. 

“I’m sorry,” Foz said. “I almost had to rip the rabbit out of Clare’s hands.” 

I opened the box. Clare’s big white rabbit lifted its nose and sniffed at me. I 
grabbed it and stuffed it under my jacket. 

“Be careful!” Foz warned. “If anything happens to it, my sister will chop 
me into rabbit food!” 

“The rabbit will be fine,” I told him. “What could happen to it?” 

I sneaked the rabbit to the table. With my back to the audience, I stuffed it 
into the secret compartment and plopped my hat on top. 

Then I turned to face the kids. None of them had seen the rabbit. Perfect. 

“Ladies and gentlemen!” I called. “Thanks for being so patient. Here is the 
moment you’ve all been waiting for—” 

“Karate fight!” Ginny called. 

“Even better than a karate fight!” I said. “I, the Great Timothini, will now 



pull a rabbit out of my hat!” 

Ginny snorted. “The Great Timothini?” 

I pointed at her. “You, in the front row. Quiet!” 

“You be quiet!” Ginny shot back. 

“Get on with it!” Jesse called. 

“Okay. I need complete silence now. I must concentrate.” 

To my surprise, the kids actually quieted down. Even Ginny. Everyone 
stared up at me, waiting. 

I lifted my hat off the table. “As you can see, my hat is empty. It’s an 
ordinary, everyday top hat. Sue, will you please examine the hat?” 

I passed the hat to Sue. She turned it over. “It looks like a regular hat to 
me,” she declared. 

I set the hat on the table, covering the secret compartment. “Thank you, 
Sue. Now—watch carefully.” 

I waved my arms over the hat. “Abracadabra, abracadeer, rabbit, rabbit, 
rabbit— appear! ” 

I stepped on the pedal to make the rabbit rise up. Then I lifted the hat with a 
flourish. 

Nothing there. The hat stood empty. 

I checked the secret compartment. No rabbit there, either. 

My heart pounded. How could this be? 

“The rabbit!” I cried. “It’s gone!” 



5 


What have I done? I thought in horror. 

My trick must have worked better than I thought! 

I glanced up and saw Ginny pointing across the backyard. “There it goes!” 
she cried. “There’s the rabbit!” 

I whirled around. Clare’s white rabbit was hopping away. 

How could that happen? I wondered. I glanced into the secret compartment 
again. 

I’d left one side of the secret compartment open. How could I have been so 
stupid? 

“Tim—you promised!” Foz screamed. “Grab it!” 

I chased after the rabbit. Foz huffed behind me. The rabbit had already 
hopped halfway across our next-door neighbors’ backyard. I glanced back. 
Ginny and the other kids were yelling and running after us. 

The rabbit stopped behind a bush. I sped up—and pounced. 

“Got him!” I cried. But the rabbit slipped out of my hands and bounded 
away. 

“He’s headed for the stream!” Ginny shouted. 

A muddy stream ran behind all the backyards on our block. The rabbit 
disappeared behind the trees that hid the stream. 

Whooping like crazy, Ginny led the kids after the rabbit. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re scaring it away!” 

But none of them listened to me. There was nothing to do but keep chasing. 

“Don’t let the rabbit hop into the water!” Foz screamed. “He’ll drown!” 

“He won’t drown,” I told Foz. “That stream is only about two inches deep.” 

“Just catch the rabbit!” Foz ordered. He was in a total panic. Maybe his 
sister really would chop him into rabbit food. 

The rabbit hopped through the mud and across the stream into the Darbys’ 
yard. I shoved the other kids aside. I splashed through the stream. 

The rabbit stopped. Its ears twitched. 

I motioned to the others to keep still. I squatted down and crept toward the 
rabbit. 



I saw why it had stopped. The Darbys’ cat, Boo Boo, crouched low in the 
grass, waiting to pounce. 

The rabbit was trapped between us. I crawled closer. Closer. I was almost 
there.... 

“Watch out for the cat!” Foz shrieked. 

With a yowl, the cat leaped. The rabbit bounced about a foot in the air. I 
missed him. 

Everybody raced after him again. I threw Foz a dirty look. 

“You’re ruining everything!” I shouted. 

“You’re the one who lost him in the first place!” Foz yelled back. 

“Hey!” Sue called. “Look at Ginny!” 

Ginny had raced to the head of the pack. The rabbit paused, then started 
mnning again. Ginny took a flying leap. “Yaw, hee ha how!” she screeched in 
her weirdo karate voice. 

She landed on her feet in front of the rabbit. It tried to change course. Too 

late. 

“Hiii—ya!” Ginny swooped down and grabbed the rabbit. She held him 
over her head like a trophy. 

“I got him!” she cried. “I got him!” 

“Yay, Ginny!” Everyone crowded around her, slapping her on the back. 

“Don’t let him go!” Foz cried. He hurried over to Ginny and snatched the 
rabbit away. 

We all started back to my yard. “Awesome trick, Tim.” Jesse patted me on 
the back. “You almost made the rabbit really disappear!” 

Everybody laughed. “You should change your stage name, Timothini,” Sue 
chimed in. “How about ‘The Great Goofballini’?” 

“Or ‘Mess-Up the Magnificent’!” Jesse suggested. 

I sighed and shut my eyes. Another magic show—another disaster. 

“I can’t believe you almost lost my sister’s rabbit,” Foz grumbled. 

“I’m sorry, Foz. I’ll be more careful next time.” 

He clutched the rabbit tightly to his chest. “Next time, get your own rabbit.” 

He hurried to the side of the house and stuffed the rabbit into the box. 

“Anybody want to come over to my house?” Jesse called. He lived next 
door. “I’ve got a great trick to show you—the disappearing dog. I let go of his 
leash, and he runs away!” 

Laughing, the other kids drifted over to Jesse’s house. Foz took the rabbit 



home to his sister. 

“You going over to Jesse’s?” Ginny asked. 

I shook my head. “I’m going inside for a snack.” 

“Maybe you should do your magic act inside from now on,” Ginny said. 
“Then your tricks won’t be able to escape from you!” She giggled. 

“Very funny,” I mumbled. “You won’t be laughing so hard when I turn you 
into a rabbit. I don’t think rabbits know how to laugh.” 

“Ooh. I’m scared.” She rolled her eyes. 

“You’d better be.” I leaned close to her and whispered. “Tonight’s the night. 
Tonight, while you’re sleeping, I’ll turn you into a rabbit. And if you try to run 
away, the Darbys’ cat will get you.” 

She rolled her eyes again. Then she reached up to tweak my nose. “Boi-oi- 
oing.” 

She trotted off to Jesse’s house. 

I definitely need better magic tricks, I thought as I dragged myself into the 
house. Better equipment, too. So I can do really cool tricks. Tricks that actually 
work. 

I thought of all the stuff Mr. Malik sold in his shop. If I could have just one 
of those tricks, I could do a great act. I’ve got to get one somehow. 

But how? 

That night everybody went to bed early. Mom and Dad were exhausted and 
crabby after another bad day at work. 

“Today was the worst day ever!” Mom grumbled. “I’m so exhausted. 
Everybody to bed!” 

Ginny and I knew better than to protest. We didn’t want to stay up, anyway, 
with Mom and Dad grouching around all evening. 

I lay in bed with the lights off, trying to sleep. Amaz-O’s show is tonight, I 
thought miserably. He’s performing tonight, only a few miles away from my 
house. I have free passes. And I can’t go. It’s not fair! 

How am I ever going to be a great magician if I never see any magic 
shows? Amaz-0 is the greatest of the great—and I have to miss my one chance 
to see him! 

Or do I? A wicked thought popped into my head. Why should I miss the 
show? 

I’ve got the tickets. I can ride to Midnight Mansion on my bike. I could 



sneak out of the house for a couple of hours—and Mom and Dad would never 
have to know. 

I rolled over in bed and peered at my alarm clock. The dial glowed in the 
dark. Nine-forty. 

The show would start in twenty minutes, I knew. I could still make it if I 
left right now. 

I couldn’t stand to think about it any longer. I had to go. 

I slid out of bed, hoping my mattress wouldn’t creak. I tiptoed across the 
room to my dresser. I silently pulled on a pair of jeans and a shirt. 

Sneakers in hand, I carefully opened my bedroom door. The house was 
dark. I heard Dad snoring in my parents’ room down the hall. 

I crept toward the stairs. Am I really doing this? I thought, suddenly 
nervous. Am I really sneaking out in the middle of the night to go to Midnight 
Mansion? 



6 


Yes—I’m really doing it, I thought. I’ll do anything to see Amaz-O. It’s totally 
worth the risk. 

What’s the worst that could happen? 

Mom and Dad could find out. Then what? Maybe they’d ground me. But I 
will have seen the great Amaz-0 in person. And while I’m grounded, I can try to 
learn some of Amaz-O’s tricks. 

Anyway, I won’t get caught. I won’t. 

I paused at the top of the stairs. The stairs in my house are the creakiest 
stairs in the universe. 

Once when I was little, I tried to sneak downstairs on Christmas Eve to see 
what Santa had left me. I barely touched the top step with my foot 
— CRRREEEEAAAK! Mom burst out of her room before I even had a chance to 
try the second step. 

It’s not going to happen this time, I told myself. I’ll take each step very 
slowly. I’ll lean on the banister to keep them from creaking. No one will wake 
up. No one will hear me. 

I put both my hands on the banister and rested my weight on it. Then I set 
my right foot carefully—the toe, then the heel—on the top step. 

Crick. Just a tiny little sound. I’m sure no one heard it, I thought. 

I shifted my hands down the banister and took another step. This one made 
no creak at all. 

So far, so good. 

I took the third step. Creak. Not a rip-roaring loud creak, but louder than the 
first. I froze. 

I listened for the sound of someone stirring in the house. 

Silence. All clear. 

If Amaz-0 only knew what I’m going through to see him, I thought. I must 
be his biggest fan on the face of the earth. 

I made it all the way down the stairs with only one more creak. I breathed a 
sigh of relief. 

I’m safe now, I thought. I’ll wait until I get outside to put my shoes on. 
Then I’ll grab my bike and go. 



I tiptoed across the cold hallway floor. I reached for the handle of the front 
door. Twisted it. 

Almost there. 

Almost. 

Then a shrill voice demanded, “Tim—where do you think you’re going?” 



7 


I spun around. Ginny! 

She was dressed in jeans and a sweater, all ready to go out. She bounded 
down the stairs. 

“Ssshhhhhhhh! You’ll wake up Mom and Dad!” 

I grabbed her by the arm and yanked her out the front door. 

“What are you doing up?” I demanded. 

“I was waiting for you to come into my room and turn me into a rabbit,” 
she replied. “Or pretend to, anyway.” 

“I’m not going to do that tonight,” I said. “Go back to bed.” 

“What are you doing up? Where are you going?” 

I sat on the front steps and pulled on my sneakers. “Out to the garage,” I 
lied. “To practice a new trick.” 

“You are not. I know where you’re going. To Midnight Mansion!” 

I grabbed her by the shoulders. “Okay. You’re right. I’m going to Midnight 
Mansion. Don’t tell Mom and Dad—promise?” 

“I want to go!” she insisted. “Let me go with you.” 

“No. Go back to bed—and don’t tell. Or you’ll be sorry.” 

“You have to take me!” she declared. “If you don’t, I’ll run upstairs and tell 
Mom and Dad right now. Then you’ll never get to see Amaz-O.” 

“You wouldn’t.” 

“I would.” 

I knew she would. 

“All right,” I agreed. “You can come. But you have to be good and do 
everything I tell you to do.” 

“Maybe I will—and maybe I won’t.” 

I sighed. I had to take her, no matter how bratty she was. If I did, she’d 
never tell—because then she’d be in as much trouble as me. 

“Let’s go,” I whispered. 

We sneaked into the garage and got our bikes. Then we pedaled off into the 
night. 

It felt strange riding down Bank Street late at night. The shops were all 



closed and dark. Hardly any traffic on the street. 

Oh, no. A police car up ahead—cruising toward us down Bank Street. If he 
spotted us, he’d stop us for sure. And then he’d take us home. And then we’d 
really be in trouble. 

I searched desperately for a place to hide. The police couldn’t miss us— 
Bank Street was lined with streetlights. 

“Ginny!” I called. “Quick—out of the light!” I swerved into the dark 
doorway of a dress shop. Ginny followed. We leaped off our bikes and pressed 
ourselves into the shadows. 

The police car glided past. I held my breath as the headlights brushed across 
us. The car stopped. 

“He saw us!” Ginny whispered. “Run!” 

I grabbed her arm to stop her. “Wait.” I peeked out into the street. 

The police car was idling, but the driver stayed inside. 

“It’s a red light,” I told Ginny. A few seconds later the light turned green, 
and the police car rolled away. 

“We’re safe now,” I said. We hopped back onto our bikes and rode off. 

Midnight Mansion loomed huge and dark at the edge of town. People said 
that a crazy old woman had lived alone in the mansion for forty years. She was 
rich, but so stingy she wore ragged old clothes and ate nothing but peanut butter, 
right out of the jar. 

When people tried to visit her, she screamed, “Go away!” and threw rocks 
at them. She had about fifty cats. When she died, a businessman bought the 
mansion and turned it into a nightclub. 

I braked in front of the old house and stared at it. Midnight Mansion. 

It looked like a spooky old castle made of sooty black stone. Three stories 
tall, with two towers shooting up into the night sky. Vines crept across the roof. 
A floodlight threw creepy shadows over the house. 

I’d seen the mansion a million times before. But late at night it looked 
bigger and darker than usual. I thought I saw bats fluttering around the two 
towers. 

“No wonder the old lady went crazy,” Ginny whispered. “Living in a 
spooky place like that.” 

“Do you think she kept prisoners in those towers?” I wondered. 

“I think she had a torture chamber in the basement,” Ginny said. 

We walked our bikes up to the entrance. People hurried inside to see Amaz- 



O’s magic show. Three men in long black capes breezed past us. A woman with 
long black hair, black lipstick, and pointy black fingernails smiled at me. 

“Where did all these weird people come from?” Ginny asked. 

I shrugged. “Let’s go in. The show is about to start.” 

We locked our bikes and ran up the long stone steps. We entered a big hall 
lit by a crystal chandelier. We crossed the hall to a doorway covered by a heavy 
red curtain. 

A tall, thin man in a black tuxedo guarded the curtain. He reached out a 
long, bony finger to stop us. 

He had no hair, a pencil neck, and dark, hollow eye sockets. “He looks like 
a skeleton,” Ginny whispered to me. 

I pulled the two tickets out of my back pocket and handed them to him. 

“Very good,” he croaked in a low voice. “But where are your parents? I 
can’t seat children without their parents.” 

My parents? Think fast, Swanz-O, I told myself. “Um—my parents. Yes. 
Well, my parents, you see...” I had a feeling he didn’t want to hear that my 
parents were home sleeping. 

“They’re outside, parking the car,” I lied. “They’ll be here in a minute. 
They told us to come in and get a table.” 

The man’s hollow black eyes seemed to burn a hole in my brain. Would he 
buy it? 

“I don’t like it. But all right.” He led us through the red curtain. The 
houselights went down just as we walked in. He showed us to a table right next 
to the stage. 

“Excellent!” I said to Ginny as we sat down. “The best seats in the whole 
place!” 

“This is so exciting!” she exclaimed. “I can’t believe we’re in a real, grown¬ 
up nightclub. By ourselves!” 

The eerie-looking host stood by the red curtain, watching us. “We may not 
be here long,” I warned her. “That skeleton guy’s got his eye on us. When he 
realizes we’re not here with our parents—” 

“Shh! The show’s starting.” 

A voice came over a loudspeaker. “Ladies and gentlemen! Midnight 
Mansion is proud to present the most famous magician in America. The 
fabulous, the incredible, the mind-boggling Amaz-O!” 

A drum roll, and then horns bleating “Ta da!” The audience clapped and 



cheered. The curtain rose. 

I gasped when I saw the stage. It was filled with wonderful equipment—a 
tall, shiny black box with a door in the front, a platform suspended from the 
ceiling, a glittering box with holes in it for a head, arms, and legs to stick out of. 
And a big white rabbit sitting beside a vase of blue flowers on a table covered 
with a red scarf. 

The rabbit wasn’t tied up or caged or anything. “I wonder how he keeps that 
rabbit from running away,” Ginny whispered. “That’s a trick you need to learn.” 

“You’re so funny, Ginny,” I said, rolling my eyes. “My sides are splitting 
with laughter.” 

“You have no sense of humor,” Ginny jeered. “That’s your problem.” 

“No. You’re my problem,” I snapped. 

Amaz-0 strode onstage. He was tall and slim, and his top hat made him 
seem even taller. He had long black hair and wore a black cape lined with red 
satin over a black tuxedo. 

He tossed the cape over his shoulders and bowed. 

I can’t believe I’m seeing Amaz-0 in person! I thought, my heart pounding 
with excitement. And so close—I could almost touch him! 

Maybe I’ll even see how some of his tricks are done, I thought. Maybe, 
sitting so close, I’ll catch some of his secrets! 

Without saying a word, Amaz-0 scanned the audience. He trained his eyes 
on me. 

My whole body shook. He’s staring right at me! I gasped. 

Amaz-0 took a step forward and leaned toward me. 

What’s he doing? I thought. Is he going to talk to me? 

Amaz-0 leaned closer. His face was right next to mine! I cowered in my 

seat. 

He scowled and whispered in a deep, menacing voice, “Disappear! 
Disappear!” 



8 


I shrank back. 

“Disappear!” he growled again. 

“Excuse me?” I gasped. I stared up at him. On TV he seemed friendly. But 
in person he was definitely frightening. 

“Disappear!” he whispered. “I’m going to make you disappear at the end of 
the show. I will ask for volunteers—and I will choose you.” 

He didn’t want me to disappear for real. He wanted me to be part of his act! 
I couldn’t believe it! 

I’ll find out how he does his famous disappearing trick! I thought. Maybe 
I’ll get to meet him after the show. Maybe he’ll even tell me some of his secrets! 

Ginny leaned across the table. “He’s going to make you disappear forever!” 
she teased. “What will I tell Mom and Dad?” 

I paid no attention to her. Nothing Ginny did or said could bother me now. 

This was too cool! Just seeing Amaz-0 was exciting enough. But he chose 
me to be in his show! 

Maybe he could tell that I’m a magician, too, I thought. 

Amaz-0 began his act. “Good evening, ladies and gentlemen,” he crooned. 
“Tonight you will see some amazing feats. You will see me do things you always 
thought were impossible. Are these feats real—or are they illusions? It’s up to 
you to decide.” 

He waved his hands, and a wand appeared out of thin air. The audience 
clapped. 

Then Amaz-0 began to fidget with his hat, as if it felt uncomfortable on his 
head. “Something is wrong with my hat,” he said. “It feels strange—almost as 
if...” 

He lifted the hat off his head and peered into it. He showed us the inside of 
it. It looked perfectly normal. There was nothing inside it. 

He placed it back on his head. “It’s funny,” he chuckled. “I thought for a 
minute there might be something inside my hat. I thought I felt—oh, I don’t 
know—a flock of birds fluttering around in there.” 

The hat jiggled. Amaz-0 appeared annoyed. “There it goes again!” 

He whipped the hat off his head and stared into it. On top of his head sat a 



large white feather. People in the audience giggled. 

“What’s so funny?” Amaz-0 asked. He felt the top of his head and found 
the feather. “Where did that come from?” he gasped, acting amazed. Everyone 
laughed. 

“Well, I’ll try not to let this bother me,” he went on, replacing his hat. 
“Back to the show. For my first trick—” 

The hat began to shake again—slightly at first, then harder. It practically 
jumped off his head. The audience cracked up. Amaz-0 pretended to be 
horrified. 

He yanked the hat off his head—and out flew a whole flock of doves! They 
swooped over the audience and flew up to the rafters. 

“I knew something was going on in there!” Amaz-0 joked. Loud laughter 
and clapping. 

He’s the greatest, I thought, clapping along. How did he get all those birds 
inside his hat? 

I glanced at the rabbit on stage. It sat calmly on the table, staring at Amaz- 
O. It almost seemed to be watching the act. 

I can’t wait to see his rabbit trick, I thought. Will he make the rabbit 
disappear? Or pull off some kind of twist? 

“For my next trick I need a needle and thread,” Amaz-0 announced. He 
produced a packet of needles and a long, thick thread from one of his pockets. 
He picked out a needle and squinted, trying to push the thread through the eye. 

“I always have trouble threading a needle,” he said. He licked the end of the 
thread and tried again. He couldn’t get the thread to go through. 

He threw up his hands in frustration. “It’s impossible!” he cried. “How do 
tailors do it?” 

The audience chuckled. I waited to see what would come next. I knew all 
this needle-and-thread business was a buildup to something incredible. 

“So much for the hard way to thread a needle,” Amaz-0 said. “I’ll show 
you a better way.” 

He snatched up the packet of needles. There must have been at least twenty 
needles stuck into a piece of cardboard. He popped the whole thing into his 
mouth. Then he dangled the long string over his mouth like a piece of spaghetti. 

He slowly drew the string into his mouth, chewing. It looked as if he were 
eating a piece of spaghetti—with a packet of needles in his mouth, too. 

“Don’t you think that hurts?” Ginny whispered. “Chewing up all those 



needles?” 

I barely nodded. I watched Amaz-O, spellbound. 

Amaz-0 nearly swallowed the whole string. About an inch of string stuck 
out between his lips. The audience waited, hushed. 

He paused. Then he opened his mouth and tugged at the string. Slowly, 
slowly, he pulled it out of his mouth. 

One by one the needles appeared—dangling from the string! Somehow he 
had threaded twenty needles with his tongue! 

The audience gasped, then applauded. The needles flashed as Amaz-0 held 
up the string. 

“Threading needles the easy way!” he cried as he took another bow. 

I’ve got to find out how he did that, I thought. Maybe I’ll ask him after the 
show. 

“How’s the show going?” Amaz-0 asked the audience. We all cheered. “I 
wonder how much time we have left?” He strode across the stage to the table 
where the rabbit and the blue flowers sat on top of the red scarf. 

With a flick of his wrist, he yanked the scarf out from under the rabbit. 

The rabbit didn’t move. Neither did the vase of flowers. The table was now 

bare. 

The rabbit blinked calmly. Amaz-0 waved the scarf over his left hand. He 
let it drop—and a big red alarm clock appeared in his hand! 

He glanced at the clock. “I suppose we have time for a few more tricks.” He 
covered the clock with the scarf—and the clock disappeared. 

A loud ringing suddenly erupted from the other side of the stage. I turned 
toward it. 

The red alarm clock—floating in midair! It seemed to have flown across the 
stage by itself. 

Amaz-0 crossed the stage, grabbed the clock, and shut off the alarm. 

“My clock is a little fast,” he joked. “It’s not time for the show to end. Not 

yet.” 

I hope not, I thought. This is the greatest magic act I’ve ever seen in my 

life! 

The rest of the show was fantastic, too. Amaz-0 escaped from a locked 
safe. He walked through a brick wall. He tapped his hat with his magic wand— 
and in a puff of smoke his tuxedo changed from black to yellow! 

“And now for my big finale,” Amaz-0 announced. “I am going to make a 



member of the audience disappear. Are there any volunteers?” 

He gazed out over the audience. No one said a word. Ginny kicked me 
under the table. 

“Ow!” I whispered, rubbing my skin. “What did you do that for?” 

“He asked for volunteers, you moron,” she said. “That means you.” 

I’d been so caught up in the show, I almost forgot. I stood up. “I’d like to 
volunteer.” 

Amaz-0 smiled. “Excellent, young man. Please step up on stage.” 

My stomach suddenly jolted with terror. I stumbled up to the stage. 

Here I go, I thought nervously. Amaz-0 is going to make me disappear. 

I hope nothing goes wrong. 



9 


Amaz-0 towered over me on stage. This is unbelievable, I thought. I’m on stage 
with the great Amaz-O. I’m about to be part of one of his famous tricks. 

He’s going to make me disappear! 

I clutched my stomach, wondering, Why do I feel so scared? 

“Thanks for volunteering, young man,” Amaz-0 said to me. “You must be 
very brave. Are your parents here tonight?” 

My parents? Uh-oh. “Um—they’re here. Sure they’re here,” I stammered. 
“But—uh—they had to make a phone call.” 

Amaz-0 frowned. “A phone call? In the middle of my show?” 

“Well—it was an emergency,” I explained. 

“Never mind. I’m glad they’ve stepped away. If they knew what was about 
to happen to you, they might try to stop me.” 

“Stop you?” My heart skittered nervously. But I heard the audience 
laughing. 

Don’t let him scare you, I told myself. This is just part of the act. He’s 
joking. 

I faked a laugh. “What—um—exactly—is about to happen to me?” 

“I’m going to make you disappear,” Amaz-0 replied. “You will be 
transported into another dimension. I will try my best to bring you back, of 
course—but it doesn’t always work.” 

“It doesn’t?” I gulped. 

He patted me on the back. “Don’t worry. I’ve done this hundreds of times. 
I’ve only missed once or twice.” 

The audience chuckled. They figured he was kidding. I hoped they were 
right. 

“Is that your sister sitting at the front table?” Amaz-0 asked. 

I nodded. 

“Better wave good-bye to her, just in case,” he warned me. 

Ginny smiled and waved at me. 

She can’t wait for me to disappear! I thought bitterly. She hopes I’ll never 
come back. 



“Go on,” Amaz-0 urged. “Wave to her.” 

I smiled weakly and waved at Ginny. The audience laughed. Then Amaz-0 
led me to a tall black box in the center of the stage. He threw open the door. It 
looked like a closet inside. 

“Step inside here if you would, please,” he said. 

I stepped inside the box. Amaz-0 shut the door firmly. 

It was pitch-black inside that box. I stood still, waiting for something to 
happen. I could hear Amaz-0 talking to the audience. 

“Ladies and gentlemen, this box is my own invention—the Fifth Dimension 
Spin-o-Rama.” I heard him slap his hand against the side of the box. 

“Here’s how it works: my brave volunteer steps inside the box. I lock him 
in. I spin the box ten times —very fast. 

“A magical force inside the box will send the boy into another dimension. 
He will disappear! 

“I must ask for absolute silence while I do this trick. I need complete 
concentration.” 

For several seconds I heard nothing. 

Then the box began to spin. “Whoa!” I cried. My body slammed against the 
back of the box. 

It whirled around faster than any ride in an amusement park. I shut my eyes. 
I felt so dizzy. 

I hope I don’t puke, I thought. That would spoil everything. 

The box kept spinning, spinning. How will the trick work? I wondered. 
How will I disappear? 

What if he really sends me into another dimension? 

But that’s just talk, I told myself. Magician talk—to entertain the audience. 

Isn’t it? 



10 


The box spun faster and faster. I clutched my stomach. I saw stars dancing 
before my eyes. 

When is it going to stop? I thought. I’m really going to be sick. 

Then, suddenly, the bottom of the box dropped out from under me. 

“Help!” I cried as I fell down, down, down. 

“Whoa!” 

I slid down a long wooden chute and landed— thunk !—on some kind of 
mattress. 

I lay on my back in a daze. I heard water dripping somewhere. A dim 
yellow light flickered from a bare bulb on the ceiling. 

I sat up, gazing around me. The room was nearly empty, dark and damp, 
with a cement floor. I spotted a furnace in the corner. 

I’m in the basement of Midnight Mansion, I realized. 

I stood up and examined the chute. So that’s how the trick works, I thought. 
Amaz-0 sets up his spinning box over a trap door in the floor of the stage. The 
bottom of the box drops out, and the volunteer slides down the chute and out of 
sight. When Amaz-0 opens the door of the box— presto !—the volunteer has 
disappeared. It’s so simple. 

But how do I get back upstairs? I wondered. How will Amaz-0 make me 
reappear? 

Muffled applause drifted down from overhead. I could hear Amaz-O’s 
voice, faintly. “Thank you very much, ladies and gentlemen. I must be going 
now. I’ve got to disappear into the fifth dimension and find that boy! Good 
night!” 

The audience laughed. Then I heard music, an explosion, and loud 
clapping. 

Amaz-0 must have made himself disappear, I thought. He’ll probably come 
sliding down this chute any minute. 

I waited. 

No one came sliding down the chute. 

I waited a few more minutes. 

Nothing. 



He must have disappeared some other way, I figured. 

He’ll show up soon, I thought. He’ll come and let me out of here. And then 
I’ll ask him how he does that trick with the alarm clock. Maybe he’ll even give 
me his autograph! 

A few minutes later I heard chairs scraping across the floor upstairs and a 
stampede of footsteps. The show was over. The audience was leaving. 

Is somebody going to let me out of here? I wondered. I was getting a little 
nervous. I sat down on the mattress to wait. 

What’s taking Amaz-0 so long? 

Maybe he wants to wait until everyone is gone, so no one will figure out 
how he did the trick. That must be it. 

I waited a little longer. I heard a rustling, scuttling noise. A rat! I thought, 
jumping up off the mattress. I stared at the floor, watching for the rat. 

The noise stopped. 

Maybe it wasn’t a rat, I thought, trying to calm myself. My muscles were all 
tense. Maybe it was only a mouse. Or a cockroach. Or my imagination. 

The drip, drip, drip of the water somewhere in the basement was starting to 
drive me crazy. Drip, drip, drip. Like some kind of water torture. 

Where is Amaz-O? When is he going to let me out of here? 

I listened for signs of life upstairs. Nothing. Everything was silent up there 

now. 

Okay, I said to myself. Everyone is gone. You can let me out now, Amaz-O. 

I listened hard. I didn’t hear anyone in the building. 

What if Amaz-O is gone, too? I thought, panicking. What if he forgot about 
me and left me here? 

I’ve got to find a way out myself, I decided. 

I crept across the cement floor, keeping an eye out for rats. 

It sure is dark down here, I thought. 

I drifted toward the dripping sound and found myself in a room with a big 
laundry sink. I crossed the laundry room. On the other side I found a steep flight 
of steps leading to a door at the top. 

Aha, I thought, feeling better now. A way out. 

I climbed the rickety stairs. I reached for the doorknob and pushed. 

The door didn’t open. I turned the knob again and pulled. 

Nothing. 

The door was locked! 



I rattled the door as hard as I could. I pounded on it with my fists. 
“Let me out of here!” I cried. “Can anyone hear me? 

“Let me out of here!” 



11 


“Hey!” I shouted. I rattled the door. “Somebody! Get me out of here!” 

How could Amaz-0 do this? I thought angrily. How could he forget all 
about me like this? 

He wouldn’t lock me in the basement on purpose—would he? 

No, I told myself. Why would he want to do that? 

It’s all just a big mistake. 

I shook the door again. It loosened a little. I pushed on it, and it opened a 
crack. 

The door was bolted from the outside with a metal hook. But the hook 
wasn’t secure. 

I’ll bet I can break the door open, I realized. 

I backed partway down the stairs. Then I ran to the top and threw myself 
against the door. 

“Ow!” I grunted. The door loosened a little more. But it didn’t open. And 
now my shoulder ached. 

Then I thought the unthinkable. I couldn’t believe I was thinking this—but I 
sure wished Ginny were with me. 

She could’ve karate-kicked through that door in about five seconds. I know, 
because she’s kicked her way into my bedroom lots of times. 

Where is Ginny, anyway? I thought. She must be outside in the parking lot, 
waiting for me. 

I had to try again. I rammed my shoulder against the door as hard as I 
could. 

Bang! The hook broke, and the door flew open. 

Excellent, I thought, rubbing my shoulder. I’m out of that horrible basement 
at last. 

But where am I now? 

A long, dark corridor. 

“Hello?” I called. No answer. “Hello?” 

Where is everybody? I wondered. Shouldn’t there be stagehands bustling 
around or something? 



I tiptoed down the hall. The place appeared deserted. 

How could they have left me down in the basement like that? I thought 
angrily. How could they leave me here alone—and just go home? 

At the end of the hall I saw a sliver of light. It came from under a door. 

Someone’s still here, I realized. Maybe it’s Amaz-O! 

I crept down the hall. The door had a star on it. It must be Amaz-O’s 
dressing room! I thought. This is fantastic! I’m alone in Midnight Mansion with 
the great Amaz-O! We’ll probably stay up all night talking about magic. If I 
could get him to show me a few of his secrets... 

I felt so excited and nervous my hands shook. I almost forgot about being 
left in the basement. 

That was just a mistake, I thought. A stagehand forgot to come get me. 
Amaz-O must have thought I was all right. He’ll probably be really glad to see 
me. 

I stared at the star on the door. What should I do? I wondered. Should I 
knock? Should I call out his name? 

I’ll knock, I decided. I stepped to the door. Thunk! I tripped over something 
propped against the wall. A large black case with PROPERTY OF AMAZ-O 
written on the side. 

Wow, I thought, running my fingers along the gold letters. This must be 
Amaz-O’s magic kit! I’m touching it with my own hands! 

I turned back to the door. I was about to meet my idol, my all-time hero. It 
was the biggest moment of my life. 

I reached for the door. My hand trembled. I knocked lightly. 

I waited. 

Maybe he didn’t hear me, I thought. I knocked again, harder this time. 

Nothing. 

“Hello?” I called softly, peeking into the room. Amaz-O’s big white rabbit 
perched on the couch. 

Amaz-O sat on a chair across from the rabbit. I could see his legs. 

“Hello?” I called again. “It’s me. From the disappearing act. Can I come 

in?” 

I paused at the door. Amaz-O didn’t answer me. Suddenly the door 
slammed shut in my face! 

“Hey!” I cried in surprise. 

A voice growled at me from the other side. “Beat it!” 



“But—I’m your biggest fan! I’d just like to shake hands—” 
“Beat it!” the voice snarled again. “Beat it, punk!” 



12 


Punk? Punk? 

Did the great Amaz-0 call me a punk? 

I couldn’t believe it. I stood staring at the star on the door in shock. 

How could Amaz-0 talk to me this way? After I volunteered for his 
disappearing trick—and he left me locked in the basement! 

What’s his problem, anyway? 

For a few seconds I couldn’t move. I couldn’t think. My hero had called me 
a punk. The greatest magician in the world—and he turned out to be a big fat 
jerk! 

Okay, so he wasn’t fat. But he was the biggest jerk I’d ever met in my 
whole life. 

I hung my head and turned away from the door to leave. Then I saw it again 
—the big black case. 

Amaz-O’s magic kit. 

Without thinking, I grabbed the case and ran. 

It was heavy and awkward, but I lugged it down the hall as quickly and 
quietly as I could. 

Why am I doing this? I wondered as I burst into the stage area. 

I’m still not sure why I did it. I’d gone through so much trouble to get to the 
show—sneaking out of the house to meet Amaz-O. And then he was so mean to 
me. Maybe I wanted to get back at him. 

It doesn’t matter why I did it. I did it. I stole Amaz-O’s magic tricks. 

In the back of my mind, I knew I was headed for trouble. 

I paused near the stage. Was Amaz-0 following me? I listened. 

Not a sound. No one coming. I swallowed hard and started running again. 

I passed under the chandelier in the lobby and burst through the front door. 
I hope Amaz-0 was the last person in the club, I thought. I hope there aren’t any 
guards lurking around. 

I didn’t have time to check. I dragged the case across the gravel parking lot 
toward my bike. 

Almost there, I told myself, panting. The parking lot was empty now. The 
floodlights that lit up the mansion were off. The old house lay hidden in 



darkness. 

It must be really late, I thought. I’d better hurry home. 

My bike stood where I’d left it, leaning against a rail. 

I was reaching for the handlebars when a voice called “Stop 
I froze. 

I knew I was caught. 



13 


I heard heavy footsteps crunch toward me across the gravel parking lot. 

Here they come, I thought. They’ve caught me red-handed with Amaz-O’s 
bag. They’ll probably arrest me. 

“Where were you?” the voice called. 

Ginny! I’d completely forgotten about her. Oops. 

“Why are you leaving without me?” she demanded. 

“Wh-why?” I stammered. What could I say? I didn’t want to admit I’d 
forgotten all about her. “I-I wasn’t leaving without you. I was looking for you. 
Where have you been?” 

“Looking for you, Tim,” she snapped. “What happened to you? You 
disappeared—and you never came back!” 

“It’s a long story,” I said. 

She leaned forward to read the lettering on Amaz-O’s black case. 
“'Property of Amaz-O.’ Where did you get that?” 

“He gave it to me,” I lied. “Wasn’t that nice of him?” 

She reached out to open the clasp that held the case shut. “Cool. What’s 
inside?” 

I stopped her hand. “I’ll show it to you when we get home. It’s filled with 
tricks. Amaz-0 said I could keep it. He was grateful to me for being such a good 
sport in the disappearing act.” 

Ginny looked puzzled. “If Amaz-0 gave you that case,” she began, “why 
are those guards running this way?” 

I glanced toward the mansion. Two guards charged across the parking lot, 
waving flashlights. Uh-oh. 

I grabbed the case. “Let’s get out of here!” I cried. “Quick—get on your 
bike. Let’s ride!” 

“I can’t!” Ginny cried. 

“Huh? Why not?” 

“My bike is gone!” 



14 


I jumped on my bike. “Too bad!” I cried. “See you at home!” 

“Tim!” Ginny wailed. “You can’t leave me here!” 

I would have left her there if I could. She can take care of herself. But I 
knew Mom and Dad would kill me. 

Besides, when the guards caught her, she’d tell on me. I’d still get in 
trouble. 

I sat on my bike, watching the guards run right for us. Then I spotted her 
bike on the edge of the parking lot. “It’s over there!” I told her. “Hurry!” 

She raced to her bike. I balanced the case on top of my handlebars. It wasn’t 

easy. 

“Stop!” a guard yelled. Ginny and I sped out of the parking lot and down 
the dark street. 

“Hey—stop!” the guards shouted. The beams of their flashlights blinded me 
for a second. I pedaled as hard as I could. Ginny darted ahead of me. 

I clutched the black case with one hand and steered with the other. The case 
slowed me down. The guards were gaining on us. At the first corner I zoomed 
left. Ginny followed. 

I glanced back. The guards had stopped running. One of them bent over, 
panting. 

“They’ll never catch us now!” Ginny shouted. We hiked home as fast as we 
could. The streets were empty and really dark. The lights were out in most of the 
houses. 

It’s after midnight, I realized. Please let Mom and Dad be asleep. If they 
catch us, they’ll ground us till we’re thirty-five! I’d almost rather be arrested. 

But then, if I got arrested, Mom and Dad would still ground me. 

We braked at our street and walked our bikes into the driveway. 

“Sshhh,” Ginny whispered. 

“Sshhh yourself,” I whispered back. 

We parked the bikes in the garage. It was hard to see without the lights on. 
On the way into the house, Ginny tripped over the lawn mower. 

“Ow!” she yelped. 

“Quiet!” I snapped. 



We both froze. Did Mom and Dad hear us? 

Silence. “I think it’s okay,” I whispered. 

“That hurt,” Ginny whined. 

“Ssshhhh!” 

We sneaked into the house. “Til hide the case in my room,” I whispered. 

“I want to look at it now,” Ginny protested. 

I shook my head. “It’s mine.” 

“No, it’s not. You have to share it with me.” 

“Amaz-0 gave it to me,” I insisted, even though it wasn’t exactly true. 

“I’m going to tell Mom and Dad,” Ginny threatened. “I’ll tell them you 
woke me up and forced me to go with you to Midnight Mansion.” 

“You little brat!” I cried angrily. Stupid Ginny. “Okay, I’ll share it with 
you.” 

“Promise?” 

“If you promise not to tell Mom and Dad.” 

“I promise. But you can’t keep the case in your room. It’s both of ours 
now.” 

I sighed. “All right. I’ll hide it in the attic. Okay?” 

She nodded. 

“But we won’t touch it until Saturday,” I said. “On Saturday, we’ll have 
plenty of time to try everything out and do it right. Deal?” 

“Deal. On Saturday we’ll both open the case, at the same time, together. ” 

“Right. Now go to bed. I’ll sneak it up to the attic.” 

We tried to be careful going up the creaky stairs. It took us about ten 
minutes. At the top I paused to listen for sounds from Mom and Dad’s room. 

“Everything is okay,” Ginny whispered. “Dad is snoring.” 

She crept into her room and shut the door. I tiptoed up to the attic, lugging 
the black case. 

I shut the attic door and switched on the light. Where can I hide this? I 
wondered, gazing around at all the junk. I stepped over piles of old magazines. 
In one corner sat my old toy chest. 

Perfect, I thought, opening the chest. I pulled out a toy school bus and a 
couple of trucks to make room for the case. 

What’s in here, anyway? I wondered as I hefted Amaz-O’s case. I held 
Amaz-O’s magic kit in my hands. How could I go to sleep without seeing what’s 
in it? How could I wait two whole days until Saturday? 



Maybe I’ll take a little peek inside, I thought. Just a quick one. Then I’ll go 
to bed. 

I set the case on the floor. My hands trembled as I fumbled with the clasp. 
Here goes, I thought, tugging open the clasp. I pulled the case open— 

And it blew up in my face! 



15 


I fell over backwards. I lay sprawled on the floor, covering my eyes. 

What happened? 

Am I dead? 

I opened my eyes. I squeezed my arms. I grabbed my chest. 

I’m okay, I realized. 

I sat up. The case sat on the floor. No signs of an explosion. 

Carefully I crawled over to the case. I could have sworn it had blown up. 
But I didn’t see anything that would blow up. 

Then, taped to the inside of the top flap, I saw a little metal disk. I tapped it. 
It made a muffled roar. 

I examined the metal disk. It was an electronic chip. It made an explosion 
sound effect when I shook it or tapped it. 

Just one of Amaz-O’s tricks. 

What else is in here? I wondered. 

I pulled out all kinds of cool stuff. A pair of trick handcuffs. A pocket watch 
for hypnotizing people. Three different decks of trick cards. A rope. And a long 
chain of silk scarves tied together. 

I wonder how all this stuff works, I thought. I’ll have to fool around with it 
on Saturday and figure it out. 

I found a small black sack that held three oval shells and a little red ball. 
The shell game, I realized. One of my favorite tricks. You hide the ball under one 
of the shells and shift them around. The audience has to guess which shell the 
ball is under. 

They always guess wrong, because the ball isn’t under any of the shells. 
The magician secretly palms the ball while he’s shifting the shells around. 

Gets ’em every time. 

I reached into the case again. My hand brushed against something silky. I 
pulled it out. It was a black tuxedo jacket. 

“Wow!” I gasped. “Amaz-O’s own jacket!” 

I had to try it on. I pulled it over my shoulders. It was too big. The 
shoulders drooped halfway down my arms, and the sleeves covered my hands. 

But it felt great. I ran my hands over the satin lapels. 



I stood up and walked around in it. A real magician’s jacket. I wonder what 
he’s got in the pockets? 

I stuck my hands in the pockets. But suddenly I felt something wiggle. 
Along the back of the jacket, near my neck. 

I shook my shoulders. The wiggling stopped. 

But then I felt it again. Something came sliding down the sleeve! 

I shook my arm. What is it? I thought. Is it alive? 

The thing crawled along my arm. “Yuck!” I sputtered. “Get off me!” I 
squirmed inside the coat, trying to shake the thing off. 

I had to get the jacket off—right away! I struggled to get my arms out of the 
sleeves. 

Then something poked its head out. Out of the sleeve, near my hand. 

A snake. 

Alive snake. 



16 


I clamped my mouth shut to keep from screaming. The snake felt warm and 
creepy against my arm. I shook my arm hard. The snake clung to me! 

I gritted my teeth and shook my arm again. And again. I brushed at my 
sleeve with my free hand. 

It wasn’t working! 

I shook my arm once more, as hard as I could. The snake uncoiled and 
slithered out of the sleeve. It dropped to the floor. 

It hissed and curved around the toy chest. I watched it with a shiver. 

Then I felt it again—that slippery, wriggling feeling. Something hissed near 
my ear and squirmed across my shoulder. 

“Ohhh!” I moaned. Another snake! I slapped at it. “Get off me!” 

As I tried to brush the snake away, another one slithered down my sleeve. 
Something slimy wriggled across my stomach and down my back. A snake 
popped out of an inner pocket and plopped to the floor. It started to coil around 
my leg. 

The jacket is crammed with snakes! I realized with horror. 

I thrashed my arms, frantically trying to tear off the jacket. A snake slid 
down the front of my shirt. 

I thrashed harder, shaking my arms and legs. Now I was covered with 
snakes! My whole body! 

I wanted to scream—but I couldn’t wake Mom and Dad. A snake curled up 
my neck and around my head. I squirmed, desperately trying to get out of the 
jacket. 

“Help!” I moaned. “Ohhhh—help!” 



17 


Snakes everywhere! 

One slithered over my head. With a trembling hand, I grabbed at it and 
heaved it away. 

Gasping in terror, I struggled out of the jacket. I tossed it on the floor. 
Snakes wriggled over it. Snakes wriggled over my feet. I hopped up and down. 
Then I hopped onto a chair. A snake coiled up the leg of the chair. It crept closer. 
“Go away!” I whispered. “Leave me alone!” 

The snake hissed. I jumped off the chair. 

Squish! My stomach turned. Did I step on a snake? I was afraid to look. 

I lifted my foot and glanced down. I hadn’t stepped on a snake. It was one 
of Ginny’s old dolls. 

A snake slid over the doll’s face and around its neck. Another snake 
slithered over my shoe. 

There’s no escape! I realized. I’ve got no choice—I have to wake up Mom 
and Dad. What else can I do? 

I hopped around the squirming, hissing snakes. 

I’ll get into trouble, I thought. But at least I’ll be out of this snake pit! 

A snake darted toward me—then suddenly froze. The room fell silent. No 
more hissing. 

All around me the snakes stopped moving. They lay stiff on the floor. Their 
cold eyes stared. 

What happened? Were they dead? 

I glanced around, afraid to move. The floor was littered with dead snakes. 

How could they all die at once? I wondered. It’s so weird! 

I stood there, not moving a muscle. My eyes darted around the room. 

I slowly reached out my leg and tapped one of the snakes with my foot. It 
jiggled a little. 

I took a deep breath. Should I touch it? 

I got up the courage to bend close to the snake. I stuck out a finger and 
poked at it. Nothing happened. My heart pounded. I picked up the snake. 

It lay limp in my hand. It didn’t seem real. 



I twisted the body. It was rubber! I examined the eyes. They were made of 
glass. 

They’re mechanical snakes, I realized. 

I turned the snake over. I found a tiny wind-up key hidden under a rubber 

flap. 

Amaz-O’s jacket was rigged with wind-up snakes. 

I began to breathe again. Everything is okay, I told myself. I don’t have to 
wake up Mom and Dad. I’m not going to get into trouble. I’m not going to be 
eaten alive by snakes. 

When will I learn? I scolded myself. All of these things are just tricks. None 
of them is real. Amaz-0 is a magician. 

I gathered up the snakes and stuffed them back inside the jacket. Then I 
jammed the jacket into Amaz-O’s magic kit. I took one last look inside the bag. 

This is amazing, I thought. I’ve got some of Amaz-O’s best tricks—right 
here in my own house! 

I forced myself to close the kit. I’d better stop fooling around with this 
stuff, I thought—before anything else happens! 

I’ll check it all out on Saturday. In daylight, when I have plenty of time to 
see how it all works. 

Then I’ll give the kit back to Amaz-O. On Monday. 

I knew I had to return the kit. It had been wrong to take it. And crazy. 

If only Amaz-0 hadn’t been so mean to me! He used me in his act—and 
then he locked me in the basement! He told me to get lost. He called me a punk! 

I started to get angry all over again. Amaz-0 doesn’t deserve to get his 
magic kit back, I thought. 

But deep down I knew I had to return it. I wanted to do the right thing. I’d 
check out the tricks, then give them back. 

Of course, I didn’t know then how dangerous the kit was. I didn’t know the 
trouble it would cause. 

If I had known, I would have returned the case that night! 



18 


“Another day of work,” Mom sighed at the breakfast table the next morning. 
“I’m absolutely dreading it. Those students just drive me crazy.” 

Dad grabbed a doughnut and gazed out the window. “It’s raining,” he said 
unhappily. “I probably won’t sell a single car today.” 

Ginny and I exchanged glances. Mom and Dad had no idea we had sneaked 
out the night before. 

I slumped into a chair and ate my cereal. I was sleepy. I’m not used to 
staying up so late. 

“You look tired, Tim,” Mom said, sitting across from me. She glanced at 
Ginny. “So do you, honey.” 

“Didn’t you two get any sleep?” Dad asked. 

“Sure we did,” I replied. 

Ginny grinned. “Not that much sleep. Tim and I have a secret!” 

The little brat! I kicked her under the table. 

“Ow!” she cried. “Tim kicked me!” 

“Don’t kick your sister,” Dad scolded. “I have to leave.” He picked up his 
briefcase and kissed Mom good-bye. “Off to another day of torture. See you 
tonight, kids.” 

Dad left. Mom started clearing away the breakfast dishes. “Did you say 
something about a secret?” she asked. 

“No!” I insisted. “Ginny didn’t say anything about a secret. She said, 'Tim 
and I want a wee pet.’” 

Mom shot me a weird look. “A what? A wee pet?” 

“Yeah,” I said. “You know, a little pet. A nice little kitten or something. 
Ginny’s learning about Scotland in school now. She’s picked up some Scottish 
words, right, Ginny? She’s been running around calling everything ‘wee’.” 

“I have not,” Ginny protested. “I’ve never called anything ‘wee’ in my life! 
And I’m not learning about Scotland in school!” 

“Yes, you are, ” I insisted. 

“What in the world are you two talking about?” Mom carried the pile of 
cereal bowls to the sink. 

“We did a bad thing, Mom,” Ginny blurted out. “Ow!” I kicked her again, 



but that didn’t stop her. 

“We sneaked out last night, Mom. We rode our bikes to Midnight Mansion 
to see the magic show. We didn’t get back until after midnight. I’m sorry, Mom. 
Please don’t get angry. Tim made me do it. I didn’t want to.” 

I covered my face with my hands. Why does Ginny have to be such a big 
mouth? 

I’m doomed, I thought. Doomed! 



19 


“What did you say, Ginny?” Mom asked, wiping her hands on a towel. “I was 
running water in the sink, and I couldn’t hear you.” 

I let out a long breath. I couldn’t believe my luck. I glared at Ginny and 
kicked her again—really hard this time. 

“Nothing, Mom,” Ginny murmured. “I didn’t say anything.” 

“You two better get ready for school,” Mom said. 

I pushed my chair away from the table and dragged Ginny out of hers. 
“We’ll be ready in a minute, Mom,” I said. 

“What is your problem?” I whispered to Ginny in the hall. “You could’ve 
gotten us in big trouble!” 

“You would get in trouble. Not me,” Ginny replied. “You’re the big brother. 
You made me go.” 

“I didn’t make you do anything. And anyway, you promised not to tell!” 

“You promised not to peek into Amaz-O’s kit until Saturday,” Ginny 
reminded me. “But I sneaked up to the attic this morning—and I know you 
looked! You opened that bag! You even played with some of the stuff!” 

“Me? I did not!” I lied. 

“Yes, you did. One of the sleeves of a jacket was sticking out of the kit. 
And I found a scarf on the floor. You big fat liar!” 

“So what? You’ll still get to see the stuff on Saturday.” 

“You promised,” Ginny repeated. She flicked my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.” 

I stormed into my room. There’s no arguing with Ginny. She does whatever 
she wants—promise or no promise. 

She’s always getting me into trouble, I thought angrily. She drives me 
crazy! I wish there were some way I could pay her back. Some way to pay her 
back for everything. 

Little did I realize I would soon find it. 



20 


“Are you sure you kids don’t want to go to the antiques show with us?” Dad 
asked. “You might see some neat old junk there.” 

“We’re sure,” I insisted. Saturday morning had arrived, and all I could think 
about was Amaz-O’s magic kit. I couldn’t wait to get my hands on it. 

I wished my parents would hurry up and leave. 

“All right,” Mom said, kissing Ginny and then me. “There’s tuna salad in 
the fridge for lunch. We won’t be back until dinnertime.” 

“Be good,” Dad added. 

“I'll be good,” Ginny declared. “I don’t know about Tim. ” 

I tried to shove her, but she dodged me. “I’ll be good,” I promised. “I’m 
always good.” 

Mom rolled her eyes. “Just don’t fight too much,” she said. “’Bye.” 

Ah. At last. As soon as they were gone, I raced to the phone and dialed 
Foz’s number. 

“The coast is clear,” I told him. “Come on over.” 

I’d told Foz all about the show at Midnight Mansion and Amaz-O’s magic 
kit. He begged me to let him see the cool tricks in Amaz-O’s bag. 

As soon as Foz arrived, we all trooped up to the attic. Ginny made a beeline 
for the magic kit. I blocked her. 

“Heee-ya!” She leaped into a pre-karate chop stance. “Out of my way!” 

“Ginny—wait!” I pleaded. “There’s a lot of weird stuff in that bag. Let me 
show it to you my way.” 

“Okay.” She relaxed. “But don’t forget you’re supposed to share it with 

me.” 

I pulled up two chairs. “You guys sit here,” I said to Ginny and Foz. “And 
get ready for the greatest magic show in the history of the world!” 

I reached into the toy chest and pulled out Amaz-O’s magic kit. I held it up 
in front of Foz and Ginny. “First,” I began in my magician voice, “gaze deeply 
into the magic trove.” 

I held the bag near their faces. They stared at it. I yanked it open. 

Kaboom! It made the exploding sound, just as it did the first time I opened 
it. 



Ginny and Foz fell off their chairs! 

“What happened?” Foz moaned, clutching his head. “That thing blew up in 
my face!” 

I cracked up. “It’s only a sound effect,” I explained. 

“Not funny,” Ginny complained. 

“You should have seen your faces,” I said gleefully. I reached into the black 
sack that held the three shells and the red ball. I set the shells in a row on a small 
table. 

“Watch closely,” I said. I held up the red ball. “See this ball? I’ll place it 
under one of these shells.” I pretended to tuck the ball under the middle shell. 
But secretly I palmed the ball and flicked it up my sleeve. 

I began moving the shells over the table, shifting their places. 

“Keep your eyes on the middle shell,” I instmcted. Then I stopped moving 
the shells. 

“Which shell is the ball under?” I asked. 

“That one,” Ginny said, pointing to the shell on the right. 

“Are you sure?” I prompted. “Foz, where do you think the ball is?” 

“The same one as Ginny,” he said. “I watched it the whole time.” 

“If you say so,” I said. I was sure the ball wasn’t under that shell—it wasn’t 
under any of them. I felt the ball rubbing against my wrist. 

I lifted the shell—and gasped. There was a ball under there. A red ball, just 
like the one I’d palmed. 

“I was right!” Ginny crowed. “That’s a stupid trick.” 

“But this is impossible!” I cried. I let the first ball fall out of my sleeve. I 
had palmed it. 

“This is very strange,” I muttered. “Let me try again.” 

I dropped the first ball on the floor. I picked up the second ball and 
pretended to slip it under a different shell. I palmed the ball and tucked it up my 
sleeve again. 

“Here we go,” I said, shifting the shells all over the table. I slid the shells 
around a little longer, then stopped. 

“The ball is under the first shell,” Foz said. 

“Yes, the first shell,” Ginny agreed. 

“This time you’re wrong!” I cried. I lifted the first shell. Another red ball! 

Ginny sneered. “You’re a real ace, Tim.” 

“Wait a second,” I said. I lifted up the other two shells. All three of them 



had red balls under them! 

“This isn’t working at all,” I grumbled. I set the shells down, then lifted 
them again. More balls! There were now three balls under each shell! 

“This isn’t the shell game I know.” I was mystified. “This must be some 
other trick.” 

“It’s way better than your dumb trick,” Ginny said. “Those balls are coming 
out of nowhere!” 

The shells began to dance as balls bubbled out of them like popcorn. Ten 
balls. Twenty balls. 

Little red balls covered the table and bounced to the floor. 

“They’re still coming!” Foz cried in amazement. “We’re going to be up to 
our necks in red balls!” 

“How do I stop this thing?” I wondered. 

Can I stop it? 



21 


I snatched up the shells and tossed them into their black sack. Then I grabbed all 
the red balls I could and stuffed them in, too. 

“Help me, you guys!” I pleaded. 

Ginny and Foz fell to their knees, gathering up red balls. We shoved them 
all into the sack. I pulled the string that closed it and dropped it into the magic 
kit. 

The black sack kept bubbling. Red balls started bursting out of it. 

“Stop that!” I yelled. I reached into the magic case and pulled out the first 
thing I touched. Then I snapped the case shut. 

“I don’t really get that trick,” Ginny complained. 

“Here’s another trick,” I said. “This one will be better.” In my hand I held a 
flattened top hat. “Let’s see what this does.” 

I punched the top hat open and placed it on my head. 

“It’s just a hat,” Foz said, fidgeting. “It’s kind of hot up here. Can we go 
down to the kitchen and get something to eat?” 

“You guys don’t get it,” I said. “This is Amaz-O’s magic case! Okay, so I 
don’t know how anything works yet. Once we figure it out, we could put on the 
best magic show ever! I could become a famous magician!” 

“And I could be a famous magician’s sister.” Ginny yawned. “Big deal.” 

“That hat looks way cool on you,” Foz said. “Now can we get something to 

eat?” 

“I’m hungry, too,” Ginny added. 

“Wait!” I cried. I felt something move under the hat. I whipped it off. 

“A white dove!” Foz cried. 

“That’s a good trick,” Ginny admitted. 

I shook the dove off my head. “How do you get it back in the hat?” I asked. 
Before I had a chance to try, another dove popped out of the hat. 

I set the second dove on the floor. “There’s another one!” Foz shouted. 

A third dove flew out of the hat and settled on top of an old lamp. Out 
popped a fourth, and a fifth... 

Foz started laughing. “These tricks are totally out of control!” 



“This is no joke, Foz!” I snapped. 

“We’re going to be in major trouble,” Ginny warned. “We’ve got to find a 
way to get rid of these birds!” 

The attic was quickly filling up with flapping, fluttering doves—and they 
kept coming. I knew we had to get rid of them—but how? 

“Maybe there’s something in here that will help.” I ripped open the magic 
case. Kaboom! It made that stupid exploding sound again. Dozens of little red 
balls flew into my face. 

“I’m really getting sick of this,” I muttered. 

I brushed away piles of balls. I pulled out a long black stick with a white 
tip. A magic wand! 

“Maybe this will help!” I cried. I hoped it would. The attic was a total mess 
—white doves and red balls everywhere. 

“This is the answer,” I declared. “Amaz-0 probably uses this wand to make 
the magic stop.” 

“I hope you’re right,” Ginny said. “If that doesn’t work, you and I are going 
to have to run away from home.” 

“It’ll work,” I insisted. “It’s got to.” 

I waved the wand in the air. “Stop!” I shouted. “Everything stop!” 



22 


Did it work? 

No. 

More doves flew out of the hat. More red balls bubbled out of the black 

sack. 

“That magic wand is the only thing in there that doesn’t work!” Foz joked. 

“Be quiet!” I snapped. “I’ve got to think!” 

“Yikes!” Ginny screamed. “A snake!” 

She pointed at the magic case. A snake slithered out of it. Then a second, a 

third. 

The mechanical snakes had come back to life! 

Hissing snakes soon covered the floor, wriggling over the bouncing red 
balls. Dove feathers fell from the ceiling. The attic was so crowded I could 
hardly see across the room. 

Ginny yelped as a snake began to crawl up her leg. “Let’s get out of here!” 
she cried. 

She yanked open the attic door. She and Foz hurried downstairs. I grabbed 
the magic case and followed them. A snake slithered after me. 

“Get back in there!” I yelled. I picked up the snake and threw it into the 
attic room. I shut the door. I pushed on it to make sure it was closed. Then I ran 
downstairs and out to the backyard. 

A gust of March wind slapped my face. Ginny’s long hair flew out behind 
her. 

“Snakes—ick!” she squealed. “Tim—what are we going to do? When Mom 
and Dad see the attic, we’re dead meat!” 

Foz stared at the magic case. “What did you bring that out for? It’s 
dangerous!” 

“It’s okay if we stay outside,” I told him. “So what if a bunch of birds 
comes out? They’ll fly away.” 

I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But I couldn’t give Amaz-O’s case 
back without seeing everything in it first. I just couldn’t. 

“Hurry up, Tim,” Ginny whined. “I’m starving. It’s lunchtime!” 

“Wait. Wait.” I opened the magic case. Ka-boom! It didn’t sound so loud 



outside—especially with the wind blowing as hard as it was. 

I held the magic wand poised between my fingers. What does this thing do? 
I wondered. 

I waved it around, trying out new magician names. “The Great Incredible- 
O. Mister Terrifico—that’s not bad. Get out of there, Ginny!” She was 
rummaging through the magic kit. 

“You promised we’d share it, remember?” she snapped. Then her face 
brightened. “Hey! Great!” 

She pulled a carrot out of Amaz-O’s bag. “Just what I needed—something 
to eat.” 

“Put that back!” I ordered. 

“It’s still fresh,” she said. “Yum!” 

She opened her mouth, ready to bite the carrot. 

“Ginny—no!” I cried. “Maybe you shouldn’t eat that. Maybe—” 

Ginny never listens to me. 

She crunched down on the carrot. 

A flash of white light blinded me for a moment. 

When my eyes focused, I saw the most amazing thing I’d ever seen in my 


life! 



23 


The carrot dropped to the grass. Ginny’s nose twitched. Then she began to 
shrink. 

As she shrank, her hair turned from blond to white. Her nose turned pink. 
White fur and whiskers sprouted from her face. She grew smaller, furrier, 
whiter.... 

“I don’t believe it!” Foz gasped. “Your sister—she’s a rabbit!” 

Ginny sat on the grass, twitching her little pink nose. She stared at me with 
her rabbity eyes. She waved her little paws and made angry, rabbity noises. 

“Man, she is steamed! ” Foz cried. 

I was stunned. “I wished it,” I murmured. “And now it’s come true.” 

“What are you talking about?” Foz demanded. He grabbed me by the 
shoulders. “Get it together, Tim. We’ve got to do something! What’s going to 
happen when your parents get home?” 

“I told Ginny I’d turn her into a rabbit,” I explained, still dazed. “To get 
back at her for ruining all my magic shows. And now she is a rabbit!” 

Ginny the rabbit rose on her hind legs, gesturing angrily at me. Then she 
bounced up and thumped my shin with one of her big rabbit feet. 

“Ow!” I cried. “That hurts as much as one of her karate kicks!” 

“Look in the kit, Tim,” Foz urged me. “There’s got to be some way to 
change her back.” 

“You’re right. There’s got to be!” My eyes fell on the carrot in the grass. 
“The carrot,” I said. “When Ginny bit it, she turned into a rabbit. But maybe if a 
rabbit bites it, it turns into a girl!” 

Foz shook his head. “Huh?” 

I snatched up the carrot. “We’ve got to try it. There’s nothing to lose, right? 
She’s already a rabbit. What else could happen to her?” 

I shoved the end of the carrot toward Ginny’s mouth. “Come on, Ginny. 
Take another bite.” 

She stared at the carrot suspiciously. She clamped her mouth shut and 
turned her face away. 

“You little brat!” I shouted. “You want me to get in trouble, don’t you! You 
want to stay a rabbit just to get me in trouble!” 



Foz grabbed the carrot out of my hand. “Calm down, Tim. You’re scaring 

her!” 

Ginny’s long rabbit ears perked up—she heard something. I heard it, too. A 
car coming. Pulling into the driveway! 

“Hurry, Ginny!” I cried. “I think Mom and Dad are home. Take a bite of the 
carrot. It’ll turn you back into a girl. I know it will!” 

Ginny eyed me suspiciously. She sniffed the carrot with her twitchy pink 

nose. 

“Hurry!” I shouted again. 

She opened her mouth and took a nibble of carrot. 

Foz and I watched her in a panic. “Please let it work,” I prayed. “Please let 
it work!” 



24 


Ginny’s rabbit nose twitched. Her ears stood straight up. Then they flopped 
down. 

Nothing happened. She was still a rabbit. 

“Mom and Dad!” I cried. “They’re here! Foz—stay with Ginny. If Mom 
and Dad ask, say she’s your sister’s rabbit!” 

I ran to the driveway. A car was backing out—not Mom and Dad. Just 
somebody turning around in our driveway. 

Whew. Close one. 

The wind gusted as I ran back to Foz and Ginny. Foz was on his knees, 
digging through the magic kit. Ginny hopped up and down impatiently. 

The magic wand lay in the grass. Maybe this will work now, I hoped, 
picking it up. I’ve got to change her back! 

I waved the wand over Ginny. “Turn my sister back into a girl!” I cried. 

Nothing. 

“Maybe you need to say the spell in a rhyme,” Foz suggested. “Magicians 
always do that.” 

“Okay.” I waved the wand again. “Let me think.... Magic wand, winds that 
whirl, turn Ginny back into a girl!” 

The wand began to shake. “Something’s happening!” I shouted. 

The white tip of the wand broke open. Out popped a white silk 
handkerchief. 

“Wow!” Foz gasped. A blue one flew out, then a red one, then a yellow one. 
The wind blew them away before I could catch them. 

I turned back to Ginny. Still a rabbit. 

“It didn’t work,” I said unhappily. I tossed the wand into the grass. “It only 
makes stupid handkerchiefs.” 

I crossed over to the magic case. Ginny leaped at me, trying to bite my leg. 

“Watch out!” I warned her. “I’m trying to help you!” 

She twitched her nose in disgust. 

Foz moved aside as I dove into the magic kit. I dumped everything out. A 
slip of paper tumbled out of a pocket in the case. 



I snatched it up. At the top of the paper I saw the word INSTRUCTIONS. 

“Look!” I cried. “Instructions!” I patted Ginny between the ears. “HI have 
you back to normal in a second.” 

I raised the paper to read what it said. “'Instructions. To use the magic top 
hat...’ No. That’s not what I need right now....” 

“Hurry, Tim!” Foz said. 

I scanned the paper, searching for anything about rabbits. “Here’s 
something!” I announced. “‘The magic carrot...’” 

Just then a strong gust of wind blasted across the yard. The paper flew out 
of my hands. 

“No!” I shouted, grasping for the paper. “I need that!” I watched helplessly 
as it flew out of my reach—high up into the sky. 



25 


“Get that paper!” I screamed. The wind blew it across the yard. I darted after it. 

Foz zoomed ahead of me, yelling, “I’ve got it! I’ve got it!” The paper 
floated within his reach. He dove for it. 

Whoosh! Another strong gust of wind. The paper fluttered away. Foz fell 
flat on his face. 

I ran past him, following the paper. It blew across my neighbor’s yard. 

“Get it!” Foz shouted, racing after me. “It’s headed for the woods!” 

The wind died for a minute. The paper settled on the grass. 

I pounced on it. But the wind picked up before I landed. The paper blew 
away again. 

“Rats! ” I cried. 

“There it goes!” Foz shouted. The paper drifted toward the stream. 

The paper floated above the stream, then landed in the water. Foz zipped 
across the yard to grab it. 

“Don’t let it get wet!” I screamed. 

Too late. The paper was soaked. 

“I’ve got it!” Foz shouted. He leaned over the stream and snatched at the 
paper. But the current carried it away. 

Foz and I chased it down the stream, panting. But we couldn’t run as fast as 
the current. 

“It’s getting away,” I huffed. A few seconds later we lost sight of it. 

Foz and I collapsed on the ground. 

“That’s it,” I groaned. “We’ll never get it back now. So how do I turn Ginny 
back into a girl?” 

Foz heaved himself to his feet and pulled me up by the hand. “Don’t panic, 
Tim. Panicking isn’t going to help.” 

Great advice. 

We hurried back to Ginny. I hoped maybe she’d magically turned back into 
a girl while we were gone. No such luck. 

Ginny knew we hadn’t found the instructions. She bounced around the yard, 
squealing angry rabbit squeals. 



Foz rubbed his short hair as he watched her. “Boy, she’s really stressed,” he 

said. 

I fell to my knees to talk to her. “Don’t worry, Ginny,” I soothed. “I’ve got 
an idea. I’m going to take you to Amaz-0 right now. He’ll turn you back into a 
girl. I’m sure he will.” 

With one of her long rabbit ears, Ginny flicked my nose. She couldn’t say 
“Boi-oi-oing.” She didn’t have to. I knew what she meant. 

“Let’s pick this stuff up,” I said to Foz. We began to gather all the tricks off 
the grass and pile them into Amaz-O’s magic case. “Amaz-0 won’t want to help 
us if I don’t give him back his magic kit.” 

Foz took my bike, balancing the magic kit on the handlebars. I picked up 
Ginny. “Come on, little rabbit sister,” I cooed. She let me pull her up by the back 
—then nipped me on the wrist! 

“Ow!” I dropped her. “Do you want me to help you or not?” 

She hopped up and down angrily. I knew what she was thinking. If I didn’t 
change her back into a girl, I’d be in as much trouble as she was. I had no 
choice. 

I reached for her again. “Don’t bite me this time,” I warned her. “Or I’ll put 
a muzzle over that little snout of yours.” 

She squirmed in my arms but didn’t bite. I set her in the basket on her bike. 

“To Midnight Mansion,” I told Foz. We set off, pedaling hard against the 
strong wind. 

I rode through town in a daze. Ginny’s long white ears waved in my face. 

Amaz-O’s words rang in my ears. “Beat it, punk!” he’d said. I wondered if 
he’d really help me. 

He’s got to, I told myself. He’ll be glad to get his magic kit back. 

I’ll make him help, I decided. I won’t give him the kit until he turns Ginny 
back into a girl. 

We pulled into the parking lot in front of Midnight Mansion. The old castle 
looked just as scary in the daytime as it did at night. There were no floodlights 
casting shadows on the stone towers. But the gray, vine-covered walls gave the 
place a spooky, abandoned feeling. 

I skidded to a stop in front of the mansion. Foz carried the magic kit. I 
grabbed Ginny out of the bike basket. 

“Behave,” I warned her as we climbed the front steps to the mansion. 
“Remember, I’m trying to help you. Don’t go biting me or anything.” 



She twitched her nose at me. She lifted her little rabbit lips and bared her 
tiny rabbit teeth. 

“Go ahead—bite me,” I whispered. “See how you like spending the rest of 
your life as a rabbit. You don’t even like lettuce!” 

She closed her mouth and twitched her nose again. It doesn’t matter 
whether she’s a girl or a rabbit, I thought. Either way she’s a pain in the neck. 

We stopped at the top of the steps. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “I don’t believe it!” 

The sign on the front door read SORRY, WE’RE CLOSED. 



26 


“No!” I cried. I banged my forehead against the door. 

Foz said, “This place gives me the creeps. It looks like Count Dracula’s 
castle.” He shivered. “Let’s get out of here.” 

He set the magic case down. “Amaz-O’s magic kit is so heavy. Do you 
think we can leave it by the door?” 

I glared at him. “No, we can’t leave it by the door. And we’re not going 
home. Not yet.” 

I squeezed Ginny in my arms, thinking. “Okay, so the place is closed. But 
Amaz-0 could be in there, rehearsing or something. Right?” 

“He could be, I guess,” Foz said. “But chances are—” 

“We’ve got to take that chance,” I insisted. I tried the front door. Locked. 
Of course. 

“There must be another way in,” I said. “A back door or something.” I 
dashed down the steps and around the side of the club. 

“Bring the case, Foz!” I ordered. 

He followed me, lugging the kit. I kept my eyes peeled for guards. 

At the back of the mansion we found a door. I tried it. It opened easily! 

We crept inside. We found ourselves in the club’s kitchen. It was long, 
narrow, and shiny clean. The lights were off, but we could see by the light from a 
window at one end. 

Foz paused in front of a huge, stainless steel refrigerator. “I’ll bet they’ve 
got some great food in here,” he whispered. “Lemon meringue pie or 
something.” 

I tugged at his arm. “This is no time for a snack!” I snapped. “Come on!” 

We left the kitchen and entered a long, dark hallway. I recognized that hall. 
It was the same hallway I’d walked down after my escape from the basement— 
the first time Amaz-0 let me down. 

“There’d better not be a second time,” I muttered under my breath. 

We tiptoed down the dark hall. Up ahead I saw the door to Amaz-O’s 
dressing room. It was half-open. A dim light spilled out into the hallway. 

Yes! I thought to myself. That’s a good sign. 

With Ginny in my arms, I crept up to the door. Please, please let him be in 



there, I prayed. Please be here, Amaz-O. Please help us. 
I stopped in front of the door. I took a deep breath. 
“Mr. Amaz-O? Are you here?” 



27 


No reply. 

I tried again. “Mr. Amaz-O? Hello?” 

“He’s not here,” Foz said. “Let’s go.” 

“Shhh!” I pushed the door open and crept into the dressing room. One small 
lamp cast a dim pool of light on the dressing table. The great Amaz-0 sat on the 
couch, his left side facing the door. He was staring at the wall. He didn’t seem to 
notice us. 

“Mr. Amaz-O?” I said politely. “It’s me again. The kid you made disappear 
in your magic show.” 

I thought Amaz-O would turn his head to face us now, but he didn’t. He 
didn’t do anything. He just sat there. 

Man, I thought. He really hates kids. Or he hates his fans. Or he hates all 
people. Or something. 

When I become a great magician, I vowed, I won’t be like Amaz-O. I won’t 
let my fame go to my head. I’ll be nice to people. This is ridiculous. 

I didn’t care what Amaz-O’s problem was. I needed his help—badly. And I 
wouldn’t give up until I got it. 

I stepped farther into the dressing room. “Mr. Amaz-O, I’m sorry to bother 
you. But I really need your help. It’s important.” 

Amaz-O didn’t move. He stared at the wall. Silent. 

“Do you think he’s asleep?” Foz whispered. 

I shrugged. I took another breath and crept closer to the couch. 

“I know you told me to beat it,” I said. “I wouldn’t bother you if it wasn’t a 
matter of life and death—I swear.” 

Still no response. I turned back to Foz, who cowered in the doorway. He 
looked as if he were ready to run for it. I waved him into the room. 

Foz stepped in. He set the magic kit on the floor, shaking. 

I stared at Amaz-O. He ignored me. Who does he think he is? I thought 
angrily. He can’t treat me this way! I’m not leaving until he helps me turn Ginny 
back into a girl. 

I steeled myself and approached the magician. He didn’t look at me. I 
tapped him on the shoulder. 



He toppled over onto his side. Thunk! 

Foz gasped. “Is he—? Is he—?” 

I peered at the body on the couch. “He isn’t alive!” I cried. “Amaz-0 isn’t 
alive!” 

“Oh, no!” Foz was wringing his hands in terror. “Oh, no! He’s dead! He’s 
dead! Help!” 

“He’s not dead,” I said. “He’s a dummy! 

“Amaz-0 is nothing but a big wooden puppet!” 



28 


How could it be possible? I stared at the puppet on the couch. I couldn’t resist 
touching its cheek—then pinching it—just to be sure. 

Oh, wow! 

It was true. Amaz-0 was made of wood. 

Foz sputtered, “But—I saw him on TV. He looked totally real.” 

“And I saw him live,” I said. “On stage. I stood right next to him, and he 
made me disappear!” 

How can this be? I wondered. How can the greatest magician in the world 
be a puppet? 

“This can’t be the guy you saw,” Foz insisted, poking at the dummy. “This 
is probably just a dummy he keeps around for fun. The real Amaz-0 has got to 
be around here somewhere.” 

Rabbit Ginny squirmed angrily in my arms. “Calm down,” I ordered, trying 
to pet her. 

She growled. I’ve never heard of a rabbit growling before. Only a Ginny- 
rabbit would growl. 

Amaz-O, my idol, I thought bitterly. What a fake he turned out to be. Not 
only was he a jerk to me—he’s not even a real person! He’s a puppet! 

“What are we going to do?” Foz asked. 

I shook my head. I had no idea. “Now I’ll never get Ginny changed back 
into a girl,” I said. “Mom and Dad are going to murder me.” 

“Why don’t you tell them she ran away?” Foz suggested. “They’ll never 
believe you turned her into a rabbit, anyway.” 

“Why would she run away?” I demanded. “She was their little darling. She 
could do no wrong. I’m the one who should run away.” 

Foz lifted the Amaz-0 puppet’s head, studying it. “I wonder how this thing 
works....” he said. 

Alow voice suddenly growled, “Hey, punk—I told you to beat it!” 

I froze. “Did you say something, Foz?” I asked. 

He shook his head, eyes wide. He’d heard the voice, too. 

“So beat it! Get out of here!” the voice growled. 

I glanced around the room. I didn’t see anyone. 



“Did the puppet talk?” I asked Foz. 

“I—I don’t think so,” he stammered. “The voice came from the other side 
of the room.” 

“The puppet didn’t talk, dummy,” the voice grumbled. I turned to find it. I 
gazed across the room. Amaz-O’s white rabbit sat on a chair in front of the 
dressing table. 

“I told you to get lost. Now get lost!” the rabbit growled. 

“Tim—did—did you see that?” Foz stammered. “I think that rabbit talked.” 

“Of course I talked, stupid,” the rabbit snarled. 

“You talked?” I echoed in amazement. 

“I guess that thing on the couch isn’t the only dummy in this room,” the 
rabbit snapped. “I can do lots of things. I’m a magician.” 

Foz and I stared at the rabbit, stunned. Even Ginny stopped squirming in 
my arms. 

“You’re not a magician,” Foz said. “You’re a rabbit.” 

The rabbit’s ears twisted. “Duh. You guys are really quick. You know that?” 

“You don’t have to be so mean,” I protested. 

“You don’t have to be so stupid,” the rabbit replied. “I may look like a 
rabbit. But so does your little sister. Am I right?” 

“He’s got a point,” Foz admitted. 

“I am the great Amaz-O,” the rabbit announced. “In person. That dummy 
on the couch is a puppet I had built to look like me—the old me.” 

My jaw fell open. “You’re Amaz-O? What happened to you?” 

The rabbit sighed. “It’s a long story. Let’s just say I had a rival—a real 
powerful one. A sorcerer, actually.” 

Foz gasped. “A sorcerer? Do they really exist?” 

“I’m telling you about one, aren’t I?” the rabbit shouted. 

“Yes, but—” 

“So be quiet and listen to the story,” Amaz-O, the rabbit, grumbled. “If 
you’d stop talking you might learn something.” 

Amaz-O sure was a grouch. 

“Anyway, long story short,” Amaz-O went on. “This sorcerer guy—Frank 

“A sorcerer named Frank?” I cut in. I didn’t mean to interrupt. It just 
slipped out. 

The rabbit glared at me. “Yes, a sorcerer named Frank. You got a problem 



with that?” 

I shook my head. 

“Can I finish talking now? You got any more stupid questions?” 

Foz and I both shook our heads. 

“This guy’s named Foz—” Amaz-0 gestured toward Foz “—and you want 
to make fun of a guy named Frank.” 

“I’m sorry,” I said. “I didn’t mean to make fun of Frank.” 

“He’s a very powerful guy,” Amaz-0 said. “I’m proof of that.” 

The rabbit hopped out of the chair, crossed the dressing room, and sat on 
the couch next to the dummy. 

“Here’s what happened,” he began. “I was at the height of my fame. I was 
the most brilliant magician in the world. I made appearances on all the top TV 
shows. I had millions of fans. Dopey little kids like you looked up to me.” 

“Hey!” I protested. “Stop calling us dopey.” 

Amaz-0 ignored me. He continued, “My tricks were the most amazing 
anyone had ever seen. And Frank was jealous. He was a sorcerer, working alone 
in a basement. He could cast amazing spells—but he was kind of ugly, with a 
high-pitched voice. People didn’t take him seriously. 

“He wanted to be famous like me, but he wasn’t. So he turned me into a 
rabbit. Very funny, right? Ha ha. Turn the magician into a rabbit. Yuk, yuk, yuk.” 

Foz and I exchanged baffled glances. Amaz-0 was turning out to be a little 
weird. 

“I’m not powerful enough to reverse Frank’s spell,” Amaz-0 went on. “I’m 
a magician, not a sorcerer. But I refused to let him stop me. So I built that 
mechanical dummy over there. I made him look just like me. And I kept on 
doing my shows, just as before.” 

“So you control the puppet?” Foz asked. “You make it look as if he’s the 
magician, performing all the tricks?” 

“I just said that, didn’t I?” Amaz-0 snapped. “Are you hard-of-hearing, 
kid?” 

“You’re really mde, you know that, Amaz-O?” I said. I was getting sick of 
his put-downs. “You’re the rudest person—or rabbit, or whatever—I ever met in 
my life!” 

Amaz-O’s long ears drooped. “Hey—I’m sorry,” he said. “Being a rabbit 
gets on my nerves. But also, I can’t let people get too close—you know? I don’t 
want anyone to find out my secret. It could ruin me.” 



Ginny squirmed in my arms again. I’d nearly forgotten all about her. I 
realized I’d better hurry up and ask Amaz-0 to help me change her back. 

“We’re in terrible trouble, Amaz-O,” I said, holding Ginny toward him. 
“This is my sister, Ginny. She ate some of the carrot that was in your magic kit 

55 

“So you confess, do you? You stole my magic kit!” 

“I—I only borrowed it,” I stammered. “I brought it back—see? I’m sorry.” 
“I’ll bet you are,” Amaz-0 snapped. 

“Can you help us, Amaz-O?” I pleaded. “Please, can you help me turn 
Ginny back into a girl?” 

Amaz-0 studied Ginny with his beady rabbit eyes. I held my breath waiting 
for his answer. 

He settled deeper into the couch and shook his head. “Sorry,” he said. 
“There’s nothing I can do for her.” 



29 


“Noooo!” I moaned, sinking into a chair. “You were my last chance. I’m 
doomed!” 

“You didn’t let me finish,” Amaz-0 said. “There’s nothing I can do for her 
—because the magic will wear off by itself.” 

“Yo! All right!” Foz exclaimed happily. He shot both fists into the air. 

“But when?” I asked. “My parents are coming home soon.” 

“How many bites of the carrot did she eat?” Amaz-0 asked. 

“Two,” I replied. 

“How long ago?” 

“About an hour ago,” I answered. 

“Okay,” Amaz-0 said. “She should turn back into a girl in half an hour. Do 
you feel better now?” 

I nodded and sighed with relief. That was a close one, I thought. But 
everything is going to be okay. 

“Hey—” Foz said, jumping up. “We’d better hurry up and take Ginny home 
—before she turns back into a girl. We don’t have enough bikes to go around!” 

I pushed Ginny into his arms. “Take her home, Foz,” I said. “I’ll be there in 
a few minutes.” I wanted to talk to Amaz-0 a little longer. 

Clutching Ginny in his arms, Foz hurried out of the dressing room. “Don’t 
stay too long,” he called over his shoulder. “I don’t want to be alone with Ginny 
when she turns back into a girl. I have a feeling she’s going to be in the mood to 
karate-chop somebody!” 

In reply, Ginny beat her hind legs against his chest. 

“I’m right behind you,” I promised. Foz disappeared down the dark 
hallway. 

“Listen, Amaz-O,” I said. “I’m really sorry I stole your magic bag. I know 
it was a terrible thing to do.” 

“Shove this stupid dummy aside and sit down on the couch,” Amaz-0 said. 
I moved the dummy and sat down next to Amaz-O. 

“You really love magic, don’t you?” he said. 

My heart started pounding. This was the heart-to-heart magician talk I’d 
been hoping to have with Amaz-0 all along! 



“It’s my dream to be a magician,” I told him. “A great magician like you. 
I’d do anything. Anything!” 

“Well, you were great in the show the other night,” Amaz-0 said. “You 
disappeared very well, kid.” 

“Thanks.” 

Amaz-0 sat quietly for a moment. He seemed to be thinking. 

“Say, kid—” he said at last. “How would you like to join the act? I’m 
getting really tired of working with that big wooden dummy over there.” 

“Me?” Now my heart was really racing. “You want me to join the act?” I 
got so excited I jumped off the couch. Then I quickly sat down again. “Do you 
mean it, Amaz-O? Do you think I could?” 

Amaz-0 hopped over to the dressing room door. He kicked it shut. 

“Why don’t we give you a try....” 



30 


And that’s how I joined Amaz-O’s act. I was so excited about being a magician, 
I said yes without even thinking about it. I guess I should’ve asked a few 
questions first. 

Don’t get me wrong. I love being on stage in front of clapping, cheering 
audiences. 

But I don’t like hiding inside the black top hat. And I hate it when the 
Amaz-0 dummy pulls me up too hard by the ears. That really hurts. 

I also hate it when they forget to clean my cage. Sometimes they forget 
about it for days! 

I guess I made a little mistake. See, when Amaz-0 said he was tired of 
working with the big dummy, I thought he wanted me to take the dummy’s 
place. 

I didn’t realize he wanted to retire—and have me take his place! 

I’m not complaining. Amaz-0 gives me plenty of juicy lettuce and all the 
carrots I can eat. I even have a stage name of my own now. At last. It may not be 
my first choice, but it’s still a professional name—“Fluffy.” 

The best part is, I’m on stage every night in a real magic act! My dream— 
my all-time dream! 

How many kids—er—I mean, rabbits—can say their all-time dream came 
true at age twelve? 

I’m really lucky—don’t you agree? 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats




EGG MONSTERS 
FROM MARS 


Goosebumps - 42 
R.L. Stine 





1 


My sister, Brandy, asked for an egg hunt for her tenth birthday party. And 
Brandy always gets what she wants. 

She flashes her smile, the one that makes the dimples pop up in her cheeks. 
And she puts on her little baby face. Opens her green eyes wide and tugs at her 
curly red hair. “Please? Please? Can I have an egg hunt at my party?” 

No way Mom and Dad can ever say no to her. 

If Brandy asked for a red, white, and blue ostrich for her birthday, Dad 
would be out in the garage right now, painting an ostrich. 

Brandy is good at getting her way. Real good. I’m her older brother, Dana 
Johnson. And I admit it. Even I have trouble saying no to Brandy. 

I’m not little and cute like my sister. I have straight black hair that falls over 
my forehead. And I wear glasses. And I’m a little chubby. “Dana, don’t look so 
serious.” That’s what Mom is always telling me. 

“Dana has an old soul,” Grandma Evelyn always says. 

I don’t really know what that means. I guess she means I’m more serious 
than most twelve-year-olds. 

Maybe that’s true. I’m not really serious all the time. I’m just curious about 
a lot of things. I’m very interested in science. I like studying bugs and plants and 
animals. I have an ant farm in my room. And two tarantulas. 

And I have my own microscope. Last night I studied a toenail under the 
microscope. It was a lot more interesting than you might think. 

I want to be a research scientist when I’m older. I’ll have my own lab, and 
I’ll study anything I want to. 

Dad is a kind of chemist. He works for a perfume company. He mixes 
things together to make new smells. He calls them fragrances. 

Before Mom met Dad, she worked in a lab. She did things with white rats. 

So both of my parents are happy that I’m into science. They encourage me. 
But that doesn’t mean they give me whatever I ask for. 

If I asked Dad for a red, white, and blue ostrich for my birthday, do you 
know what he’d say? He’d say, “Go play with your sister’s!” 

Anyway, Brandy asked for an egg hunt for her birthday. Her birthday is a 
week before Easter, so it wasn’t a crazy idea. 



We have a very large backyard. It stretches all the way back to a small, 
trickling creek. 

The yard is filled with bushes and trees and flower beds. And there’s a big 
old doghouse, even though we don’t have a dog. 

Lots of good egg-hiding places. 

So Brandy got her egg hunt. She invited her entire class. 

You may not think that egg hunts are exciting. 

But Brandy’s was. 

Brandy’s birthday came on a warm and sunny day. Only a few small cumulus 
clouds high in the sky. (I study clouds.) 

Mom hurried out to the backyard after breakfast, lugging a big bucket of 
eggs. “I’ll help you hide them,” I told her. 

“That wouldn’t be fair, Dana,” Mom replied. “You’re going to be in the egg 
hunt too—remember?” 

I almost forgot. Brandy usually doesn’t want me hanging around when her 
friends come over. But today she said that I could be in the egg hunt. And so 
could my best friend, Anne Gravel. 

Anne lives in the house next door. My mom is best friends with Anne’s 
mom. Mrs. Gravel agreed to let Mom hide eggs all over their backyard too. So 
it’s only fair that Anne gets to join in. 

Anne is tall and skinny, and has long red-brown hair. She’s nearly a head 
taller than me. So everyone thinks she’s older. But she’s twelve too. 

Anne is very funny. She’s always cracking jokes. She makes fun of me 
because I’m so serious. But I don’t mind. I know she’s only joking. 

That afternoon Anne and I stood on the driveway and watched the kids 
from Brandy’s class arrive at the party. Brandy handed each one of them a little 
straw basket. 

They were really excited when Brandy told them about the egg hunt. And 
the girls got even more excited when Brandy told them the grand prize—one of 
those expensive American Girl dolls. 

Of course the boys started to grumble. Brandy should have had a prize a 
boy might like. Some of the boys started using their baskets as Frisbees. And 
others began wrestling in the grass. 

“I was a lot more sophisticated when I was ten,” I muttered to Anne. 

“When you were ten, you liked Ninja Turtles,” Anne replied, rolling her 



eyes. 

“I did not!” I protested. 

“Yes, you did,” Anne insisted. “You wore a Ninja Turtle T-shirt to school 
every day.” 

I kicked some gravel across the driveway. “Just because I wore the shirt 
doesn’t mean I liked them,” I replied. 

Anne flung back her long hair. She sneered at me. I hate it when Anne 
sneers at me. “You had Ninja Turtle cups and plates at your tenth birthday party, 
Dana. And a Ninja Turtle tablecloth. And we played some kind of Ninja Turtle 
Pizza Pie-throwing game.” 

“But that doesn’t mean I liked them!” I declared. 

Three more girls from Brandy’s class came running across the lawn. I 
recognized them. They were the girls I call the Hair Sisters. They’re not sisters. 
But they spend all their time in Brandy’s room after school doing each other’s 
hair. 

Dad moved slowly across the grass toward them. He had his camcorder up 
to his face. The three Hair Sisters waved to the camera and yelled, “Happy 
Birthday, Brandy!” 

Dad tapes all our birthdays and vacations and big events. He keeps the tapes 
on a shelf in the den. We never watch them. 

The sun beamed down. The grass smelled sweet and fresh. The spring 
leaves on the trees were just starting to unfurl. 

“Okay—everyone follow me to the back!” Brandy ordered. 

The kids lined up in twos and threes, carrying their baskets. Anne and I 
followed behind them. Dad walked backwards, busily taping everything. 

Brandy led the way to the backyard. Mom was waiting there. “The eggs are 
hidden everywhere,” Mom announced, sweeping her hand in the air. 
“Everywhere you can imagine.” 

“Okay, everyone!” Brandy cried. “At the count of three, the egg hunt 
begins! One —” 

Anne leaned down and whispered in my ear. “Bet you five dollars I collect 
more eggs than you.” 

I smiled. Anne always knows how to make things more interesting. 

“Two—” 

“You’ve got a bet!” I told her. 

“Three!” Brandy called. 



The kids all cheered. The hunt for hidden eggs was on. 

They all began hurrying through the backyard, bending down to pick up 
eggs. Some of them moved on hands and knees through the grass. Some worked 
in groups. Some searched through the yard on their own. 

I turned and saw Anne stooping down, moving quickly along the side of the 
garage. She already had three eggs in her basket. 

I can’t let her win! I told myself. I sprang into action. 

I ran past a cluster of girls around the old doghouse. And I kept moving. 

I wanted to find an area of my own. A place where I could grab up a bunch 
of eggs without having to compete with the others. 

I jogged across the tall grass, making my way to the back. I was all alone, 
nearly to the creek, when I started my search. 

I spotted an egg hidden behind a small rock. I had to move fast. I wanted to 
win the bet. 

I bent down, picked it up, and quickly dropped it into my basket. 

Then I knelt down, set my basket on the ground, and started to search for 
more eggs. 

But I jumped up when I heard a scream. 



2 


“Aaaaaiiiiii!” 

The scream rang through the air. 

I turned back toward the house. One of the Hair Sisters was waving her 
hand wildly, calling to the other girls. I grabbed up my basket and ran toward 
her. 

“They’re not hard-boiled!” I heard her cry as I came closer. And I saw the 
drippy yellow yolk running down the front of her white T-shirt. 

“Mom didn’t have time to hard-boil them,” Brandy announced. “Or to paint 
them. I know it’s weird. But there just wasn’t time.” 

I raised my eyes to the house. Mom and Dad had both disappeared inside. 

“Be careful,” Brandy warned her party guests. “If you crack them—” 

She didn’t finish her sentence. I heard a wet splat. 

Then laughter. 

A boy had tossed an egg against the side of the doghouse. 

“Cool!” one of the girls exclaimed. 

Anne’s big sheepdog, Stubby, came running out of the doghouse. I don’t 
know why he likes to sleep in there. He’s almost as big as the house. 

But I didn’t have time to think about Stubby. 

Splat. 

Another egg exploded, this time against the garage wall. 

More laughter. Brandy’s friends thought it was really hilarious. 

“Egg fight! Egg fight!” two boys started to chant. 

I ducked as an egg went sailing over my head. It landed with a craaack on 
the driveway. 

Eggs were flying everywhere now. I stood there and gaped in amazement. 

I heard a shrill shriek. I spun around to see that two of the Hair Sisters had 
mnny yellow egg oozing in their hair. They were shouting and tugging at their 
hair and trying to pull the yellow gunk off with both hands. 

Splat! Another egg hit the garage. 

Craaack! Eggs bounced over the driveway. 

I ducked down and searched for Anne. She probably went home, I figured. 




Anne enjoys a good laugh. But she’s twelve, much too sophisticated for a 
babyish egg fight. 

Well, when I’m wrong, I’m wrong. 

“Think fast, Dana!” Anne screamed from behind me. I threw myself to the 
ground just in time. She heaved two eggs at once. They both whirred over my 
head and dropped onto the grass with a sickening crack. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” I heard Brandy shrieking desperately. “It’s my birthday! 
Stop it! It’s my birthday!” 

Thunk! Somebody hit Brandy in the chest with an egg. 

Wild laughter rang out. Sticky yellow puddles covered the back lawn. 

I raised my eyes to Anne. She was grinning back at me, about to let me 
have it again. 

Time for action. I reached into my basket and pulled out the one and only 
egg I had picked up. 

I raised it high above my head. Started to throw—but stopped. 

The egg. 

I lowered it and stared at it. 

Stared hard at it. 

Something was wrong with the egg. 

Something was terribly wrong. 



3 


The egg was too big. Bigger than a normal egg. About the size of a softball. 

I held it carefully, studying it. The color wasn’t right either. It wasn’t egg- 
colored. That creamy off-white. And it wasn’t brown. 

The egg was pale green. I raised it to the sunlight to make sure I was seeing 
correctly. 

Yes. Green. 

And what were those thick cracks up and down the shell? 

I ran my pointer finger over the dark, jagged lines. 

No. Not cracks. Some kind of veins. Blue-and-purple veins crisscrossing 
the green eggshell. 

“Weird!” I muttered out loud. 

Brandy’s friends were shouting and shrieking. Eggs were flying all around 
me. An egg splattered over my sneakers. The yellow yolk oozed over my laces. 

But I didn’t care. 

I rolled the strange egg over and over slowly between my hands. I brought 
it close to my face and squinted hard at the blue-and-purple veins. 

“Ooh.” I let out a low cry when I felt it pulsing. 

The veins throbbed. I could feel a steady beat. 

Thud. Thud. Thud. 

“Oh wow. It’s alivel” I cried. 

What had I found? It was totally weird. I couldn’t wait to get it to my 
worktable and examine it. 

But first I had to show it to Anne. 

“Anne! Hey—Anne!” I called and started jogging toward her, holding the 
egg high in both hands. 

I was staring at the egg. So I didn’t see Stubby, her big sheepdog, run in 
front of me. 

“Whooooa!” 

I let out a cry as I fell over the dog. 

And landed with a sickening crunch on top of my egg. 



4 


I jumped up quickly. Stubby started to lick my face. That dog has the worst 
breath! 

I shoved him away and bent down to examine my egg. 

“Hey!” I cried out in amazement. The egg wasn’t broken. I picked it up 
carefully and rolled it in my hands. 

Not a crack. 

What a tough shell! I thought. My chest had landed on top of the egg. 
Pushed it into the ground. But the shell hadn’t broken. 

I wrapped my hands around the big egg as if soothing it. 

I could feel the blue-and-purple veins pulsing. 

Is something inside getting ready to hatch? I wondered. What kind of bird 
was inside it? Not a chicken, I knew. This was definitely not a hen’s egg. Splat! 
Another egg smacked the side of the garage. 

Kids were wrestling in the runny puddles of yolk on the grass. I turned in 
time to see a boy crack an egg over another boy’s head. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” 

Brandy was screaming at the top of her lungs, trying to stop the egg fight 
before every single egg was smashed. I turned and saw Mom and Dad running 
across the yard. 

“Hey, Anne—!” I called. I climbed to my feet, holding the weird egg 
carefully. Anne was frantically tossing eggs at three girls. The girls were 
bombarding her. Three to one—but Anne wasn’t retreating. 

“Anne—check this out!” I called, hurrying over to her. “You won’t believe 
this egg!” 

I stepped up beside her and held the egg out to her. 

“No! Wait—!” I cried. 

Too late. 

Anne grabbed my egg and heaved it at the three girls. 



5 


“No—stop!” I wailed. 

As I stared in horror, one of the three girls caught the egg in midair—and 
tossed it back. 

I dove for it, making a headfirst slide. And grabbed the egg in one hand 
before it hit the gravel. 

Was it broken? 

No. 

This shell must be made of steel! I told myself. I pulled myself to my feet, 
gripping the egg carefully. To my surprise, it felt hot. Burning hot. 

“Whoa!” I nearly dropped it. 

Throb. Throb. Throb. 

It pulsed rapidly. I could feel the veins beating against my fingers. 

I wanted to show the egg to Mom and Dad. But they were busy breaking up 
the egg fight. 

Dad’s face was bright red. He was shouting at Brandy and pointing to the 
yellow stains up and down the side of the garage. 

Mom was trying to calm down two girls who were crying. They had egg 
yolk stuck to their hair and all over their clothes. They even had it stuck to their 
eyebrows. I guess that’s why they were crying. 

Behind them Stubby was having a feast. He was running around in circles, 
lapping up egg after egg from the grass, his bushy tail wagging like crazy. 

What a party! 

I decided to take my weird egg inside. I wanted to study it later. Maybe I’d 
break off a tiny piece of shell and look at it under the microscope. Then I’d make 
a tiny hole in the shell and try to see inside. 

Throb. Throb. 

The veins pounded against my hand. The egg still felt hot. 

It might be a turtle egg, I decided. I walked carefully to the house, cradling 
it in both hands. 

One morning last fall, Anne found a big box turtle on the curb in front of 
her house. She carried it into her backyard and called me over. She knew I’d 
want to study it. 



It was a pretty big turtle. About the size of a lunch box. Anne and I 
wondered how it got to her curb. 

Up in my room I had a book about turtles. I knew the book would help me 
identify it. I had hurried home to get the book. But Mom wouldn’t let me go 
back out. I had to stay inside and have lunch. 

When I got back to Anne’s backyard, the turtle had vanished. I guess it 
wandered away. 

Turtles can be pretty fast when they want to be. 

As I carried my treasure into the house, I thought it might be a turtle egg. 
But why was it so hot? And why did it have those yucky veins all over it? 

Eggs don’t have veins—do they? 

I hid the egg in my dresser drawer. I surrounded it with my balled-up socks 
to protect it. Then I closed the drawer slowly, carefully, and returned to the 
backyard. 

Brandy’s guests were all leaving as I stepped outside. They were covered in 
sticky eggs. They didn’t look too happy. 

Brandy didn’t look too happy, either. Dad was busy shouting at her, angrily 
waving his arms, pointing to the gloppy egg stains all over the lawn. 

“Why did you let this happen?” he screamed at her. “Why didn’t you stop 

it?” 

“I tried!” Brandy wailed. “I tried to stop it!” 

“We’ll have to have the garage painted,” Mom murmured, shaking her 
head. “How will we ever mow the lawn?” 

“This was the worst party I ever had!” Brandy cried. She bent down and 
pulled chunks of eggshell from her sneaker laces. Then she glared up at Mom. 
“It’s all your fault!” 

“Huh?” Mom gasped. “My fault?” 

“You didn’t hard-boil the eggs,” Brandy accused. “So it’s all your fault.” 
Mom started to protest—but bit her lip instead. 

Brandy stood up and tossed the bits of eggshell to the ground. She flashed 
Mom her best dimpled smile. “Next year for my birthday, can we have a Make 
Your Own Ice-Cream Sundae party?” 

That evening I wanted to study my weird green egg. But we had to go visit 
Grandma Evelyn and Grandpa Harry and take them out to dinner. They always 
make a big fuss about Brandy’s birthday. 



First, Brandy had to open her presents. Grandma Evelyn bought her a pair 
of pink fuzzy slippers that Brandy will never wear. She’ll probably give them to 
Stubby as chew toys. 

Brandy opened the biggest box next. She pulled out a pair of pink-and- 
white pajamas. Brandy made a big fuss about them and said she really needed 
pajamas. She did a pretty good acting job. 

But how excited can you get over pajamas? 

Her last present was a twenty-five-dollar gift certificate to the CD store at 
the mall. Nice present. “I’ll go with you to make sure you don’t pick out 
anything lame,” I offered. 

Brandy pretended she didn’t hear me. 

She gave our grandparents big hugs. Brandy is a big hugger. Then we all 
went out for dinner at the new Italian restaurant on the corner. 

What did we talk about at dinner? Brandy’s wild birthday party. When we 
told Grandma and Grandpa about the egg fight, they laughed and laughed. 

It wasn’t so funny in the afternoon. But a few hours later at dinner, we all 
had to admit it was pretty funny. Even Dad managed a smile or two. 

I kept thinking about the egg in my dresser drawer. When we got back 
home, would I find a baby turtle on my socks? 

Dinner stretched on and on. Grandpa Harry told all of his funny golfing 
stories. He tells them every time we visit. We always laugh anyway. 

We didn’t return home till really late. Brandy fell asleep in the car. And I 
could barely keep my eyes open. 

I slunk up to my room and changed into pajamas. Then, with a loud yawn, I 
turned off the light. I knew I’d fall asleep the moment my head hit the pillow. 

I fluffed my pillow the way I liked it. Then I slid into bed and pulled the 
quilt up to my chin. 

I started to settle my head on the pillow when I heard the sound. 

Thump. Thump. Thump. 

Steady like a heartbeat. Only louder. 

Much louder. 

THUMP. THUMP. THUMP. 

So loud, I could hear the dresser drawers rattling. 

I sat straight up. Wide awake now. I stared through the darkness to my 
dresser. 

THUMP. THUMP. THUMP. 



I turned and lowered my feet to the floor. 

Should I open the dresser drawer? 

I sat in the darkness, trembling with excitement. With fear. 
Listening to the steady thud. 

Should I open the drawer and check it out? 

Or should I run as far away as I could? 



6 


Thump, thump, THUMP. 

I had to see what was happening in my dresser drawer. 

Had the egg hatched? Was the turtle bumping up against the sides of the 
drawer, trying to climb out? 

Was it a turtle? 

Or was it something weird? 

Suddenly I felt very afraid of it. 

I took a deep breath and rose to my feet. My legs felt rubbery and weak as I 
made my way across the room. My mouth was suddenly as dry as cotton. 

Thump, THUMP, thump. 

I clicked on the light. Blinked several times, struggling to force my eyes to 
focus. 

The steady thuds grew louder as I approached the dresser. 

Heartbeats, I told myself. 

Heartbeats of the creature inside the egg. 

I grabbed the drawer handles with both hands. Took another deep breath. 

Dana, this is your last chance to run away, I warned myself. 

This is your last chance to leave the drawer safely closed. 

Thump, thump, thump, thump, thump. 

I tugged open the drawer and peered inside. 

I stared in, amazed that nothing had changed. The egg sat exactly where I 
had left it. The blue-and-purple veins along the shell pulsed as before. 

Feeling a little calmer, I picked it up. 

“Ouch!” 

I nearly dropped it. The shell was burning hot. 

I cupped it in my hands and blew on it. “This is so totally weird,” I 
murmured to myself. 

Mom and Dad have to see it, I decided. Right now. Maybe they can tell me 
what it is. 

They were still awake. I could hear them talking in their room down the 


hall. 



I carried the egg carefully, cradling it in both hands. I had to knock on their 
door with my elbow. “It’s me,” I said. 

“Dana, what is it?” Dad demanded grumpily. “It’s been a long day. We’re 
all very tired.” 

I pushed open their door a crack. “I have an egg I want to show you,” I 
started. 

“No eggs!” they both cried at once. 

“Haven’t we seen enough eggs for one day?” Mom griped. 

“It’s a very strange egg,” I insisted. “I can’t identify it. I think—” 

“Good night, Dana,” Dad interrupted. 

“Please don’t ever mention eggs again,” Mom added. “Promise?” 

“Well, I...” I stared down at the pulsing green egg in my hand. “It’ll only 
take a second. If you’ll just—” 

“Dana!” Dad yelled. “Why don’t you go sit on it and hatch it?” 

“Clark—don’t talk to Dana that way!” Mom scolded. 

“He’s twelve years old. He can take a joke,” Dad protested. 

They started arguing about how Dad should talk to me. 

I muttered good night and started back to my room. 

I mean, I can take a hint. 

Thump. Thump. The egg pulsed in my hand. 

I had a sudden impulse to crack it open and see what was inside. But of 
course I would never do that. 

I stopped outside Brandy’s room. I was desperate to show my weird 
treasure to somebody. I knocked on her door. 

No answer. 

I knocked again, a little harder. Brandy is a very heavy sleeper. 

Still no answer. 

I started to knock a third time—and the door flew open. Brandy greeted me 
with an open-mouthed yawn. “What’s wrong? Why’d you wake me?” 

“I want to show you this egg,” I told her. 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “You’re serious? After what happened at my 
party? After the worst birthday party in the history of America, you really want 
to show me an egg?” 

I held it up. “Yeah. Here it is.” 

She slammed the door in my face. 

“You mean you don’t want to see it?” I called in. 



No reply. 

Once again, I could take a hint. I carried the egg back to my room and set it 
down carefully in the dresser drawer. Then I closed the drawer and climbed back 
into bed. 

Thump. Thump. Thump. 

I fell asleep to the steady throbbing. 

The next morning, I woke up just in time to watch the egg hatch. 



7 


A loud cracking sound woke me up. 

Blinking, I pulled myself up on one elbow. Still half-asleep, I thought I 
heard Brandy cracking her knuckles. 

That’s one of Brandy’s secret talents. She never does it when adults are 
around. But when we’re alone, she can crack out entire symphonies on her 
knuckles. 

Another loud crack snapped me alert. 

The dresser. The noises were coming from my dresser. 

I heard a long rip, like Velcro ripping open. Then more cracks. Like 
cracking bones. 

And I knew it had to be the egg. 

My heart started to pound. I leaped up. Grabbed my glasses and slapped 
them onto my face. My legs got tangled in the bedsheet, and I nearly went 
sprawling over the floor. 

I hurtled across the room. The egg was hatching—and I had to be there in 
time to watch. 

I grabbed the drawer handles and eagerly pulled the drawer open. I was so 
eager, I nearly pulled the drawer out of the dresser! 

Catching my balance, I gripped the dresser top with both hands and stared 
down at the egg. 

Craaaaack. 

The blue-and-purple veins throbbed. A long, jagged crack split across the 
green shell. 

Unh unh. 

I heard a low grunt from inside the egg. The grunt of a creature working 
hard to push out. 

Unnnnnh. 

What a struggle! 

It doesn’t sound like a turtle, I told myself. Is it some kind of exotic bird? 
Like a parrot? Or a flamingo maybe? 

How would a flamingo egg get in my backyard? 

How would any weird egg get in my backyard? 



Unnnh unnnnh. 

Craaaaack. 

The sounds were really gross. 

I rubbed my eyes and squinted down at the egg. It was bouncing and 
bobbing in the drawer now. Each grunt made the egg move. 

The veins throbbed. Another crack split along the front of the shell. And 
thick yellow goo poured out into the drawer, seeping onto my socks. 

“Yuck!” I cried. 

The egg shook. Another crack. More of the thick liquid oozed down the egg 
and onto my socks. 

The egg bobbed and bounced. I heard more hard grunting. Unnnnh. 
Unnnnh. The egg trembled with each grunt. 

Yellow slime oozed as the cracks in the shell grew wider. The veins pulsed. 
The egg shook. 

And then a large triangle of shell broke off. It fell into the drawer. 

I leaned closer to stare into the hole in the egg. I couldn’t really see what 
was inside. I could see only wet yellow blobby stuff. 

Unnh unnnnnh. 

Another grunt—and the eggshell crackled and fell apart. Yellow liquid 
spilled into the drawer, soaking my socks. 

I held my breath as a weird creature pushed itself out of the breaking shell. 
A yellow, lumpy thing. 

A baby chicken? 

No way. 

I couldn’t see a head. Or wings. Or feet. 

I gripped the dresser top and stared down at it. The strange animal pushed 
away the last section of shell. This was amazing! 

It rolled wetly over my socks. 

A blob. A sticky, shiny yellow blob. 

It looked like a pile of very runny scrambled eggs. 

Except it had tiny green veins crisscrossing all over it. 

My chest felt about to explode. I finally remembered to breathe. I let out my 
breath in a long whoosh. My heart was thudding. 

The yellow blob throbbed. It made sick, wet sucking sounds. 

It turned slowly. And I saw round black eyes near its top. 

No head. No face. Just two tiny black eyes on top of the lumpy yellow 



body. 

“You’re not a chicken,” I murmured out loud. My voice came out in a 
choked whisper. “You’re definitely not a chicken.” 

But what was it? 

“Hey—Mom! Dad!” I shouted. 

They had to see this creature. They had to see the scientific discovery of the 
century! 

“Mom! Dad! Hurry!” 

No response. 

The lumpy creature stared up at me. Throbbing. Its tiny green veins pulsing. 
Its eggy body bouncing. 

“Mom? Dad?” 

Silence. 

I stared into my drawer. 

What should I do? 



8 


I had to show it to Mom and Dad. I carefully closed the dresser drawer so it 
couldn’t bounce out and escape. Then I went running downstairs, shouting at the 
top of my voice. 

My pajama pants were twisted, and I nearly fell down the stairs. “Mom! 
Dad! Where are you?” 

The house was silent. The vacuum cleaner had been pulled out of the closet. 
But no one was around to use it. 

I burst into the kitchen. Were they still having breakfast? 

“Mom? Dad? Brandy?” 

No one there. 

Sunlight streamed in through the kitchen window. The breakfast dishes— 
three cereal bowls and two coffee cups—were stacked beside the sink. 

Where did they go? I wondered, my heart pounding. How could they leave 
when I had the most amazing thing in the history of the known universe to show 
them? 

I turned to leave the kitchen when I saw the note on the refrigerator. It was 
written in blue ink in Mom’s handwriting. I snatched it off the magnet and read 
it: 

“Dad and I took Brandy to her piano lesson. Make yourself some cereal. 
Love, M.” 

Cereal? 

Cereal ? 

How could I think about cereal at a time like this? 

What should I do now? 

I leaned my forehead against the cool refrigerator, struggling to think. I 
couldn’t leave the throbbing egg blob locked up in the dresser drawer all 
morning. Maybe it needed fresh air. Maybe it needed exercise. Maybe it needed 
food. 

Food? I swallowed hard. What would it eat? What could it eat? It was just a 
lump of scrambled eggs with eyes. 

I’ve got to take it out of there, I decided. I’ve got to show it to someone. 

I thought instantly of Anne. 



“Yes!” I exclaimed to myself. I’ll take it next door and show it to Anne. She 
has a dog. She’s really good with pets and animals. Maybe she’ll have some idea 
of what I should do with it. 

I hurried back upstairs and pulled on the jeans and T-shirt I had tossed on 
the floor the night before. Then I made my way to the dresser and slid open the 
drawer. 

“Yuck!” 

The egg blob sat in its own yellow slime. Its whole body throbbed. The 
tiny, round eyes stared up at me. 

“I’m taking you to Anne’s,” I told it. “Maybe the two of us can figure out 
what you are.” 

Only one problem. 

How do I take it there? 

I rubbed my chin, staring down at it. Do I carry it on a plate? No. It might 
tumble off. 

A bowl? 

No. Ajar? 

No. It couldn’t breathe. 

A box. 

Yes. I’ll put it in a box, I decided. I opened my closet, dropped to my hands 
and knees, and shuffled through all the junk piled on the floor. 

That’s how I clean my room. I toss everything into the closet and shut the 
door. I have the cleanest room in the house. No problem. 

The only problem is finding things in my closet. If I’m searching for 
something to wear, sometimes it takes a few days. 

Today I got lucky. I found what I was looking for right away. It was a shoe 
box. The box my new sneakers came in. 

I picked up the shoe box from the clutter and climbed to my feet. Then I 
kicked a bunch of stuff back into the closet so I could get the door closed. 

“Okay!” I cried happily. I returned to the throbbing egg glob. “I’m carrying 
you to Anne’s in this box. Ready?” 

I didn’t expect it to answer. And it didn’t. 

I pulled off the shoe box lid and set it on the dresser top. Then I lowered the 
box to the drawer. 

“Now what?” I asked myself out loud. 

How do I get it in the box? Do I just pick it up? 



Pick it up in my hand? 

I held the box in my left hand and started to reach into the drawer with my 
right. But then I jerked my hand away. 

Will it bite me? I wondered. 

How can it? It doesn’t have a mouth. 

Will it sting me? Will it hurt me somehow? 

My throat tightened. My hand started to tremble. It was so gross—so wet 
and eggy. 

Pick it up, Dana, I told myself. Stop being such a wimp. You’re a scientist 
—remember? You have to be bold. You have to be daring. 

That’s true, I knew. Scientists can’t back away from something just because 
it’s yucky and gross. 

I took a deep breath. 

I counted to three. 

Then I reached for it. 



9 


As my hand moved toward it, the creature began to tremble. It shook like a glob 
of yellow Jell-O. 

I pulled back once again. 

I can’t do it, I decided. I can’t pick it up barehanded. It might be too 
dangerous. 

I watched it shake and throb. Wet bubbles formed on its eggy skin. 

Is it scared of me? I wondered. Or is it trying to warn me away? 

I had to find something to pick it up. I turned and glanced around the room. 
My eyes landed on my baseball glove tucked on the top shelf of my bookcase. 

Maybe I could pick up the egg creature in the glove and drop it into the 
shoe box. I was halfway across the room when I decided I didn’t want to get my 
glove all wet and gloppy. 

I need to shovel it into the box, I thought. 

A little shovel would make the job easy. I walked back to the dresser. The 
egg creature was still shaking like crazy. I closed the drawer. Maybe the darkness 
will calm it down, I thought. 

I made my way down to the basement. Mom and Dad keep all their 
gardening supplies down there. I found a small metal trowel and carried it back 
up to my room. 

When I pulled open the drawer, the eggy blob was still shaking. “Don’t 
worry, fella,” I told it. “I’m a scientist. I’ll be real gentle.” 

I don’t think it understood English. As I lowered the trowel into the drawer, 
the green veins on the throbbing body began to pulse. 

The creature started bobbing up and down. The little black eyes bulged up 
at me. I had the feeling the little guy was about to explode or something. 

“Easy. Easy,” I whispered. 

I lowered the trowel carefully beside it. Then I slowly, slowly slid it under 
the throbbing creature. 

“There. Gotcha,” I said softly. 

It wiggled and shook on the blade of the trowel. I began to lift it carefully 
from the drawer. 

The shoe box sat on the top of the dresser. I had the trowel in my right 



hand. I reached for the shoe box with my left. 

Up, up. Slowly. Very slowly, I raised the egg creature toward the box. 
Up. Up. 

Almost to the box. 

And the creature growled at me! 

A low, gruff growl—like an angry dog. 

“Ohhh!” I uttered a startled cry—and the trowel dropped from my hand. 
“Yaaiii!” I let out another cry as it clanged across the floor—and the 
creature plopped wetly onto my sneaker. 

“No!” 

Without thinking, I bent down and grabbed it up in my hand. 

I’m holding it! I realized, my heart pounding. 

I’m holding it. 

What’s going to happen to me? 



10 


Nothing happened. 

No shock jolted my body. No rash spread instantly over my skin. My hand 
didn’t fall off. 

The creature felt warm and soft, like runny scrambled eggs. 

I realized I was squeezing it tightly. Too tightly? I loosened my grip. 

And lowered it into the shoe box. And fastened the lid over the top. 

I set the shoe box down on the dresser top and examined my hand. It felt 
wet and sticky. But the skin hadn’t turned yellow or peeled off or anything. 

I could hear the creature pulsing inside the box. 

“Don’t growl like that again,” I told it. “You scared me.” 

I grabbed some tissues and wiped off my hand. I kept my eyes on the box. 
The creature was bouncing around in there. 

What kind of animal is it? I wondered. 

I wished Mom and Dad were home. I really, really wanted to show it to 
them. 

I glanced at the clock radio on my bedside table. Only nine o’clock. Anne 
might still be sleeping. Sometimes she slept until noon on Saturdays. I’m not 
really sure why. She said it made the day go faster. Anne is a pretty weird girl. 

I lifted the box with both hands. The egg creature felt surprisingly heavy. I 
made sure the lid was on tight. Then I carried it down the stairs and out the back 
door. 

It was a sunny, warm day. A soft breeze made the fresh spring leaves 
tremble on the trees. Two houses down Mr. Simpson was already mowing his 
back lawn. Near the garage two robins were having a tug-of-war over a fat 
brown earthworm. 

I carried the box to Anne’s back door. The door was open. I peered through 
the screen. 

“Hi, Dana. Come in,” Anne’s mother called from in front of the sink. 

Balancing the box against my chest, I pulled open the screen door and 
stepped into the kitchen. Anne sat at the breakfast table. She wore a big blue T- 
shirt over black bike shorts. Her red-brown hair was tied behind her head in a 
long ponytail. 



Three guesses what she was eating for breakfast. 

You got it. Scrambled eggs. 

“Yo, Dana!” she greeted me. “What’s up?” 

“Well—” 

Mrs. Gravel moved to the stove. “Dana, have you had breakfast? Can I 
make you some scrambled eggs?” 

My stomach did a flip-flop. I swallowed hard. “No. I don’t think so.” 

“Nice fresh eggs,” Mrs. Gravel insisted. “I could make them fried if you 
don’t like scrambled.” 

“No thanks,” I replied weakly. 

I felt the eggy blob bounce inside the box. 

“I might need some more,” Anne told her mom, shoveling in a big glob. 
“These eggs are great, Mom.” 

Mrs. Gravel cracked an egg on the side of the skillet. “Maybe I’ll make one 
for myself,” she said. 

All this egg talk was making me sick. 

Anne finished her orange juice. “Hey—what’s in the box? New sneakers?” 

“Uh... no,” I replied. “Check this out, Anne. You won’t believe what I 
found.” 

I was so eager to show it to her! Holding the box in front of me with both 
hands, I started across the kitchen. 

And tripped over Stubby. 

Again! 

That big dumb sheepdog always got underfoot. 

“Whooooaaa!” I let out a cry as I fell over the dog—and watched the shoe 
box fly into the air. 

I landed on top of Stubby. Got a mouthful of fur. 

Struggled frantically to my feet. 

And saw the egg creature sail out of the box and drop onto Anne’s breakfast 
plate. 

Anne’s mouth dropped open. Her face twisted in disgust. “Oh, yuck!” she 
wailed. “Rotten eggs! Gross! Rotten eggs!” 

“No—it’s alive!” I protested. 

But I don’t think anyone heard me. Stubby jumped up on me as I started to 
explain, and nearly knocked me down again. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Mrs. Gravel scolded. “You know better than that.” 



“Get this away!” Anne demanded, shoving her plate across the table. 

Her mom examined the plate, then glared at me. “Dana, what’s wrong with 
you? This isn’t funny. You ruined perfectly good scrambled eggs.” 

“You spoiled my breakfast!” Anne cried angrily. 

“No, wait—” I protested. 

But I wasn’t fast enough. 

Mrs. Gravel grabbed up the plate. She carried it to the sink, clicked on the 
garbage disposal—and started to empty the egg creature into the roaring drain. 



11 


“Nooooo!” 

I let out a shriek—and dove for the sink. 

I made a wild grab and pulled the creature from the drain. 

No. I pulled a handful of scrambled eggs from the drain! 

The egg creature rolled around the sink and started to slide toward the 
gurgling drain. I tossed the scrambled eggs down and grabbed the creature as it 
started to drop toward the grinding blades. 

The lumpy yellow blob felt hot in my hands. I could feel the veins 
throbbing. The whole creature pulsed rapidly, like a racing heart. 

I raised it up to my face and examined it. Still in one piece. “I saved your 
life!” I told it. “Whew! What a close one!” 

I balanced it carefully in my palm. It shuddered and throbbed. Wet bubbles 
rolled down its lumpy sides. The black eyes stared up at me. 

“What is that thing?” Anne demanded, getting up from the breakfast table. 
She straightened her long ponytail. “Is it a puppet? Did you make it out of an old 
sock or something?” 

Before I could answer, Mrs. Gravel gave me a gentle push toward the 
kitchen door. “Get it out of here, Dana,” she ordered. “It’s disgusting.” She 
pointed down. “Look. It’s dripping some kind of eggy goo all over my kitchen 
floor.” 

“I—I found it out back,” I started. “I don’t really know what it is, but—” 

“Out,” Anne’s mom insisted. She held open the screen door for me. “Out. I 
mean it. I don’t want to have to wash the whole floor.” 

I didn’t have a choice. I carried the egg creature out into the backyard. It 
seemed a little calmer. At least it wasn’t trembling and pulsing so hard. 

Anne followed me to the driveway. The bright sun made the egg creature 
gleam. My hands felt slimy and wet. I didn’t want to squeeze it too tightly. But I 
also didn’t want to let it fall. 

“Is it a puppet?” Anne demanded. She bent down to see it better. “Yuck. It’s 
alive?” 

I nodded. “I don’t know what it is. But it’s definitely alive. I found it 
yesterday. At Brandy’s party.” 



Anne continued to study the yellow blob. “You found it? Where?” 

“I found an egg back by the creek,” I told her. “A very weird-looking egg. I 
took it home, and it hatched this morning. And this is what came out.” 

“But what is it?” Anne asked. She gingerly poked its side with a pointer 
finger. “Oh, yuck. It’s wet and mushy.” 

“It’s not a chicken,” I replied. 

“Duhhh,” Anne said, rolling her eyes. “Did you figure that out all by 
yourself?” 

“I thought it might be a turtle egg,” I said, ignoring her sarcasm. 

She squinted harder at it. “Do you think it’s a turtle without its shell? Do 
turtles hatch without their shells?” 

“I don’t think so,” I replied. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of mistake,” Anne suggested. “A freak of nature. 
You know. Like you!” She laughed. 

Anne has a great sense of humor. 

She poked the egg creature again. The creature let out a soft wheeze of air. 
“Maybe you discovered a new species,” Anne suggested. “A whole new kind of 
animal that’s never been seen before.” 

“Maybe,” I replied. That was an exciting idea. 

“They’ll name it after you,” Anne teased. “They’ll call it the Dodo!” She 
laughed again. 

“You’re not being very helpful,” I said sharply. 

And then I had an idea. 

“Know what I’m going to do with it?” I said, cupping it carefully between 
my hands. “I’m going to take it to that little science lab.” 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “What science lab?” 

“You know that little lab,” I replied impatiently. “The one on Denver Street. 
Just three blocks from here.” 

“I don’t hang out at weird little science labs,” Anne said. 

“Well, I don’t, either,” I told her. “But I’ve passed by that lab a million 
times, riding my bike to school. I’m going to take this thing there. Someone will 
tell me what it is.” 

“I’m not going with you,” Anne said, crossing her skinny arms in front of 
her chest. “I have better things to do.” 

“I didn’t invite you,” I sneered. 

She sneered back at me. 



I think she was jealous that I found the mysterious creature and she didn’t. 

“Please get me the shoe box,” I said. “I left it in your kitchen. I’m going to 
ride my bike over to that lab right now.” 

Anne went inside and came back with the shoe box. “It’s all sticky inside,” 
she said, making a disgusted face. “Whatever that thing is, it sure sweats a lot.” 

“Maybe your face scared it!” I declared. My turn to laugh. I’m usually the 
serious one. I don’t get off too many jokes. But that was a pretty good one. 

Anne ignored it. She watched as I lowered the creature into the box. Then 
she raised her eyes to me. “You sure that isn’t some kind of wind-up toy? This 
thing is all a big joke—isn’t it, Dana?” 

I shook my head. “No way. It’s no joke. I’ll stop by later and tell you what 
the scientists at the lab say about it.” 

I fit the lid on the shoe box. Then I hurried to the garage to get my bike. 

I couldn’t wait to get to the science lab. 

As it turned out, I should have stayed as far away from that place as 
possible. 

But how could I know what was waiting for me there? 



12 


“Look out!” 

Anne’s stupid sheepdog ran in front of my bike just as I started down the 
driveway. 

I jammed on the hand brake. My bike squealed to a sharp stop—and the 
shoe box nearly toppled off the handlebars. 

“Stubby—you moron!” I shrieked. 

The dog loped off across the backyard, probably laughing to himself. I 
think Stubby gets a real thrill by tripping me up whenever he sees me. 

I waited for my heart to stop thudding in my chest. Then I steadied the shoe 
box on the handlebars. 

I started pedaling along the street, steering with one hand, keeping the other 
hand on top of the box. 

“The scientists at the lab have got to know what this thing is,” I told myself. 
“They’ve got to.” 

I usually speed down my street. But this morning I pedaled slowly. I 
stopped at each corner to make sure no cars were coming. 

I tried to steer away from bumps in the street. But my street has a lot of 
potholes. Each time I hit a bump, I could hear the egg creature bouncing inside 
the carton. 

Just don’t bounce out, I thought. 

I pictured it bouncing out of the box, dropping onto the street, and being run 
over by a car. 

I stopped to balance it better on the handlebars. Then I began pedaling 
slowly again. 

Some kids from school were starting up a softball game on the playground 
on the next block. They called to me. I think they wanted me to join the game. 

But I pretended I didn’t hear them. I didn’t have time for softball. I was on a 
scientific mission. I didn’t look back. I kept pedaling. 

As I turned the corner onto Denver, a city bus roared past. The whoosh of 
air from the bus nearly knocked me over. 

As I steadied the bike, I saw the lid push up from the shoe box. 

The egg creature was trying to escape! 



I grabbed the box and tried to push down the lid. I pedaled faster. The lab 
was only a block away. 

The creature pushed up against the lid. 

I pushed back. 

I didn’t want to crush it. But I didn’t want it to escape, either. 

I could feel it bouncing inside the box. Pushing up against the lid. 

I kept my hand on the lid, struggling to hold it down. 

A station wagon filled with kids rumbled past. One of the kids yelled 
something to me. I didn’t really hear him. I was concentrating as hard as I could 
on keeping the egg creature inside the box. 

I rolled through a stop sign. I didn’t even see it. Luckily no cars were 
approaching. 

The lab came into view on the next corner. It was a white shingled building. 
Very low. Only one story tall. But very long. With a row of small, square 
windows along the front. It looked like a very long train car. 

I bumped up the curb and rode my bike onto the grass. Then I grabbed the 
shoe box with both hands and hopped off. The bike fell to the ground, both 
wheels spinning. 

Gripping the box tightly in both hands, I ran across the front lawn, up to the 
white double doors in front. 

I found a doorbell on the wall to the right of the doors. I pushed it. Pushed it 
again. Kept my finger on it. 

When no one came to the door, I tried the knob. Pushed. Then pulled. 

No. The door was locked. 

I tried knocking. I pounded as hard as I could with my fist. 

Then I rang the bell again. 

Where was everyone? 

I was about to start pounding again when I saw the sign over the door. A 
small, hand-printed black-and-white sign that sent my heart sinking. It read: 

CLOSED SATURDAYS AND SUNDAYS. 



13 


I let out a long sigh and shoved the box under my arm. I was so disappointed. 
What was I going to do with this weird egg creature now? 

Shaking my head unhappily, I turned and started back to my bike. I was 
halfway across the grass when I heard the front door open. 

I turned to see an older man in a white lab coat. He had shiny white hair, 
parted in the middle and slicked down on the sides. His moustache was salt-and- 
pepper. He had pale blue eyes that peered out at me from his pale, wrinkly face. 

His smile made his eyes crinkle up at the sides. “Can I help you?” he asked. 

“Uh... yeah,” I stammered. I raised the shoe box in front of me and started 
back across the grass. I could feel the egg creature bouncing around in there. 

“Is that a sick bird?” the man asked, squinting at the box. “I’m afraid I can’t 
help you with that. This is a science lab. I’m not a vet.” 

“No. It’s not a bird,” I told him. I carried the box to the doorway. My heart 
was pounding. For some reason, I felt really nervous. 

I guess I was excited about talking to a real scientist. I respect and admire 
scientists so much. 

Also, I was excited about finally finding out what had hatched from that 
weird egg. And finding out what I should do with it. 

The man smiled at me again. He had a warm, friendly smile that made me 
feel a little calmer. “Well, if it isn’t a bird in there, what is it?” he asked softly. 

“I was hoping you could tell me!” I replied. I shoved the shoe box toward 
him, but he didn’t take it. 

“It’s something I found,” I continued. “I mean, I found an egg. In my 
backyard.” 

“An egg? What kind of egg, son?” 

“I don’t know,” I told him. “It was very big. And it had veins all over it. 
And it kind of breathed.” 

He stared at me. “An egg that breathed.” 

I nodded. “I put it in my dresser drawer. And then it hatched this morning. 
And—” 

“Come in, son,” the man said. “Come right in.” His expression changed. 
His eyes flashed. He suddenly looked very interested. 



He put a hand on my shoulder and guided me into the lab. I had to blink a 
few times and wait for my eyes to adjust to the dim light inside. 

The walls were all white. I saw a desk and chairs. A low table with some 
science magazines on it. This was a waiting room, I decided. It was all very 
clean and modern-looking. A lot of chrome and glass and white leather. 

The man had his eyes on the box in my hands. He rubbed his moustache 
with his fingers. “I’m Dr. Gray,” he announced. “I’m the managing lab scientist 
here.” 

I switched the box to my left hand so I could shake hands with him. “I want 
to be a scientist when I’m older,” I blurted out. I could feel my face turning red. 

“What’s your name, son?” Dr. Gray asked. 

“Oh. Uh. Dana Johnson. I live a few blocks away. On Melrose.” 

“It’s nice to meet you, Dana,” Dr. Gray said, straightening the front of his 
white lab coat. He moved to the front door. He closed it, locked it, and bolted it. 

That’s weird, I thought, feeling a shiver of fear. 

Why did he do that? 

Then I remembered that the lab was closed on weekends. He probably bolts 
the doors when the place is closed. 

“Follow me,” Dr. Gray said. He led the way down the narrow white 
hallway. I followed him into a small lab. I saw a long table cluttered with all 
kinds of test tubes, specimen jars, and electronic equipment. 

“Set the box down there,” he instructed, pointing to an empty spot on the 
table. 

I set the box down. He reached in front of me to remove the lid. “You found 
this in your backyard?” 

I nodded. “Back by the creek.” 

He carefully pulled the lid off the box. 

“Oh my goodness!” he murmured. 



14 


The egg creature stared up at us. It quivered and bubbled against the side of the 
box. The bottom of the box was puddled with a sticky yellow goo. 

“So you found one,” Dr. Gray murmured, tilting the box. The yellow blob 
slid to the other end. 

“Found one?” I replied. “You mean you know what it is?” 

“I thought I rounded them all up,” Dr. Gray replied, rubbing his moustache. 
He turned his pale blue eyes on me. “But I guess I missed one.” 

“What is it?” I demanded. “What kind of animal is it?” 

He shrugged. He tilted the box the other way, making the egg creature slide 
to the other end. Then he gently poked the eggy blob in the back. “This is a 
young one,” he said softly. 

“A young what?” I asked impatiently. 

“The eggs fell all over town,” Dr. Gray said, poking the egg creature. “Like 
a meteor shower. Only on this town.” 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “They fell from the sky?” I wanted desperately to 
understand. But so far, nothing made sense. 

Dr. Gray turned to me and put a hand on my shoulder. “We believe the eggs 
fell all the way from Mars, Dana. There was a big storm on Mars. Two years 
ago. It set off something like a meteor shower. The storm sent these eggs 
hurtling through space.” 

My mouth dropped open. I gazed down at the quivering yellow blob in the 
shoe box. “This—this is a Martian?” I stammered. 

Dr. Gray smiled. “We think it came from Mars. We think the eggs flew 
through space for two years.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. My heart was racing. My hands were suddenly 
ice cold. 

Was I really staring at a creature from Mars? 

Had I actually touched a Martian? 

Then I had an even weirder thought: I found it. I picked it up from my 
backyard. 

Did that mean it belonged to me? 

Did I own a Martian? 



Dr. Gray bounced the creature —my creature—in the box. Its veins pulsed. 
Its black eyes stared back at us. “We don’t know how the eggs made it through 
the earth’s atmosphere,” the scientist continued. 

“You mean they should have burned up?” I asked. 

He nodded. “Most everything burns up when it hits our atmosphere. But the 
eggs seem to be very tough. So tough they weren’t destroyed.” 

The egg creature made a gurgling sound. It plopped wetly against the side 
of the shoe box. 

Dr. Gray chuckled. “This is a cute one.” 

“You have a lot of others?” I asked. 

“Let me show you something, Dana.” Holding the box in front of him, Dr. 
Gray led the way through a large metal door. The door clanged heavily behind 
us. 

A long, narrow hallway—the walls painted white—led past several small 
rooms. Dr. Gray’s lab coat made a starchy, scratchy sound as he walked. At the 
end of the hall, we stopped in front of a wide window. 

“In there,” Dr. Gray said softly. 

I stared into the window. 

Then I stared harder. 

Was he crazy? Was he playing some kind of joke on me? 

“I—I can’t see anything at all!” I cried. 



15 


“Hold on a second. I forgot something,” Dr. Gray said. He stepped over to the 
wall and flicked a light switch. 

A light above our heads in the hallway flashed on. And now I could see 
through the window. 

“Oh, wow!” I exclaimed as my eyes swept over the large room on the other 
side of the glass. I stared at a crowd of egg creatures! 

Dozens of them. 

Yellow, eggy blobs. All pulsing and quivering. Green veins throbbing. 

The egg creatures huddled on the white tile floor. They looked like big 
globs of cookie dough on a baking sheet. Dozens of tiny, round black eyes stared 
out at us. 

Unreal! 

As I stared at them in amazement, I kept thinking they were like stuffed 
animals. But they weren’t. They were alive. They breathed. They shook and 
bounced and bubbled. 

“Would you like to go in?” Dr. Gray asked. 

He didn’t wait for me to answer. He pulled out a small black control unit 
from his pocket. He pushed a button, and the door swung open. Then he opened 
the door wider and guided me inside. 

“Whoa!” I uttered a cry when I felt a blast of cold air. “It’s freezing in 
here!” I exclaimed. 

Dr. Gray smiled. “We keep it very cold. It seems to keep them more alert.” 

He held the shoe box in one hand. He motioned to the egg creatures with 
the other. “Once they hatch, the creatures don’t like heat. If the temperature goes 
too high, they melt,” he explained. 

He lowered the box to the floor. “We don’t want them to melt,” he said. “If 
they melt, we can’t study them.” 

Leaning over the box, he lifted my egg creature out gently. He placed it 
beside three or four other egg creatures. All of the yellow blobs began bouncing 
excitedly. 

Dr. Gray picked up the box and stood back up. He smiled down at the new 
arrival. “We don’t want you to melt, do we?” he told it. “We want you to be nice 



and alert. So we keep it as cold in here as we can.” 

I shivered and rubbed my arms. I had goose-bumps all over my skin. From 
the excitement? Or from the cold? 

I wished I had worn something warmer than a T-shirt! 

The egg creatures bobbed and bubbled. I couldn’t take my eyes off them. 
Real creatures from Mars! 

I watched them start to bounce toward us. They moved surprisingly fast. 
They kind of rolled, kind of inched their way forward. They left slimy, yellow 
trails behind them as they moved. 

I wanted to ask Dr. Gray a million questions. “Do they have brains?” I 
asked. “Are they smart? Can they communicate? Have you tried talking to them? 
Do they talk to each other? How can they breathe our air?” 

He chuckled. “You have a good scientific mind, Dana,” he said. “Let’s take 
one question at a time. Which would you like me to answer first?” 

“Well—” I started to reply. But I stopped when I realized what the egg 
creatures had done. 

While Dr. Gray and I talked, they had all moved quickly into a circle. 

And now they had the two of us surrounded. 

I spun around. 

The egg creatures had moved behind us. They blocked the door. And now 
they were closing in on us, bubbling and throbbing, leaving a trail of slime as 
they slid forward. 

What were they planning to do? 



16 


In a panic, I turned to Dr. Gray. To my shock, he was grinning. 

“They—they’ve trapped us!” I stammered. 

He shook his head. “Sometimes they move like that. But don’t be scared, 
Dana. They’re harmless.” 

“Harmless?” I cried. My voice came out shrill and tiny. “But—but—” 

“What can they do?” Dr. Gray asked, placing a comforting hand on my 
trembling shoulder. “They’re only blobs of egg. They can’t bite you—can they? 
They don’t appear to have mouths. They can’t grab you. Or punch you. Or kick 
you. They have no hands or legs.” 

The egg creatures moved their circle closer. I watched them, my throat still 
tight, my legs shaking. 

I knew that what Dr. Gray was telling me was true. 

But why were they doing this? 

Why did they form a circle? Why were they closing in on us? 

“Sometimes they form triangles,” Dr. Gray told me. “Sometimes rectangles 
or squares. It’s as if they’re trying out different shapes they’ve seen. Maybe this 
is a way they’re trying to communicate with us.” 

“Maybe,” I agreed softly. I wished the egg creatures would back up. They 
were little, wet blobs. But they were really giving me the creeps! 

I shivered again. My breath steamed up in front of me. 

It was so cold, my glasses started to fog! 

I stared down at the egg creature I had brought. It had joined the circle. It 
bobbed and bounced with all the others. 

Dr. Gray turned and started to the door. I turned with him. I wanted to get 
out of that freezer as fast as I could! 

“Thank you for bringing that one in,” Dr. Gray said. He shook his head. “I 
thought I had collected them all. What a surprise that I missed one.” He 
scratched his hair. “You say you found it in your backyard?” 

I nodded. “It was an egg. But then it hatched in my dresser drawer.” My 
teeth chattered. I was so cold! 

“Does that mean it’s mine?” I asked Dr. Gray. “I mean, does it belong to 


me?” 



His smile faded. “I’m not really sure. I don’t know what the law is about 
alien creatures from outer space.” He frowned. “Maybe there is no law.” 

I glanced down at the little blob. The green veins along its side were 
bulging. Its whole body was throbbing like crazy. 

Was it sorry to see me go? 

No way. That’s really dumb, I told myself. 

“I guess you’ll want to keep it for a while and study it,” I said to Dr. Gray. 

He nodded. “Yes. I’m doing every kind of test I can think of.” 

“But can I come back and visit it?” I asked. 

Dr. Gray narrowed his eyes at me. “Come back? Dana, what do you mean 
by come back? You’re not leaving.” 



17 


“Excuse me?” I choked out. I knew I hadn’t heard him correctly. 

My whole body shook in a wild shiver. I rubbed my bare arms, trying to 
warm them. 

“Did you say I’m not leaving?” I managed to ask. 

Dr. Gray locked his pale blue eyes on mine. “I’m afraid you can’t leave, 
Dana. You must stay here.” 

A frightened cry escaped my throat. He wasn’t serious! He couldn’t be 
serious. 

He can’t keep me here, I told myself. 

No way. He can’t keep me here against my will. That’s against the law. 

“But... why?” I demanded weakly. “Why can’t I go home?” 

“You can understand—can’t you?” Dr. Gray replied calmly. “We don’t want 
anyone to know about these space aliens. We don’t want anyone to know that 
we’ve been invaded by Martians.” 

He sighed. “You don’t want to throw the whole world into a panic—do you, 
Dana?” 

“I—I—I—” I tried to answer. But I was too frightened. Too startled. Too 

cold. 

I glared angrily at Dr. Gray. “You have to let me go,” I insisted in a 
trembling whisper. 

His expression softened. “Please don’t stare at me like that,” he said. “I’m 
not a bad guy. I don’t want to frighten you. And I don’t want to keep you in this 
lab against your will. But what choice do I have? I’m a scientist, Dana. I have to 
do my job.” 

I stared back at him, my whole body shaking. I didn’t know what to say. 
My eyes moved to the metal door. It was shut. But he hadn’t bolted it. 

I wondered if I could get to the door before he did. 

“I have to study you too,” Dr. Gray continued. He tucked his hands into the 
pockets of his lab coat. “It’s my job, Dana.” 

“Study me?” I squeaked. “Why?” 

He motioned to my egg creature. “You touched it—didn’t you? You 
handled it? You picked it up?” 



I shrugged. “Well, yeah. I picked it up. So what?” 

“Well, we don’t know what kind of dangerous germs it gave you,” he 
replied. “We don’t know what kind of germs or bacteria or strange diseases these 
things carried with them from Mars.” 

I swallowed hard. “Huh? Diseases?” 

He scratched his moustache. “I don’t want to scare you. You’re probably 
perfectly okay. You feel okay—right?” 

My teeth chattered. “Yeah. I guess. Just cold.” 

“Well, I have to keep you here and study you. You know. Watch you 
carefully. Make sure that touching the egg creature didn’t harm you or change 
you.” 

No way, I thought. 

I don’t care about strange germs from Mars. I don’t care about egg diseases. 
I don’t care about science. 

All I care about is getting out of here. Getting home to my family. 

You’re not keeping me here, Dr. Gray. You’re not studying me. 

Because I’m outta here! 

Dr. Gray was saying something. I guess he was still explaining why he 
planned to keep me prisoner in this freezing cold lab. 

But I didn’t listen to him. Instead, I took off. 

I ran toward the big metal door. 

The circle of egg creatures blocked my way. But I leaped over them easily. 
And kept running. 

Gasping for breath, shivering, I reached the door. 

I grabbed the handle. And glanced back. 

Was Dr. Gray chasing after me? 

No. He hadn’t moved. 

Good! I thought. I caught him by surprise. 

I’m gone! 

I turned the door handle. Pulled hard. 

The door didn’t open. 

I pulled harder. 

It didn’t budge. 

I tried pushing it. 

No go. 

Dr. Gray’s voice rang in my ears. “The door is controlled electronically,” he 



said calmly. “It’s locked. It cannot be opened unless you have the control unit.” 

I didn’t believe him. I tugged again. Then I pushed again. 

He was telling the truth. The door was electronically sealed. 

I gave up with a loud cry of protest. I spun around to face him. “How long 
do I have to stay here?” I demanded. 

He replied in a low, icy voice. “Probably for a very long time.” 



18 


“Step away from the door, Dana,” Dr. Gray ordered. “Try to calm down.” 

Calm down? 

“YouTl be okay,” the scientist said. “I take very good care of my 
specimens.” 

Specimens ? 

I didn’t want to calm down. And I didn’t want to be a specimen. 

“I’m a boy. Not a specimen,” I told him angrily. 

I don’t think he heard me. He lifted me out of the way. Then he clicked the 
small remote unit in his hand. The door opened just long enough for him to slide 
through. 

It made a loud click as it snapped shut behind him. 

Locked in. I was locked in this freezer with three dozen Martians. 

My heart pounded. I heard a shrill whistle in my ears. My temples throbbed 
with pain. My whole head felt ready to explode! 

I’d never been so angry in my life. 

I let out a cry of rage. 

The egg creatures all began to chatter. I spun around in surprise. They 
sounded a little like chimps. 

A roomful of chimps, chattering away. 

Only they weren’t chimps. They were monsters from Mars. And I was 
locked in, all alone with them. 

A specimen. 

“Noooo!” I let out another howl and ran to the long window. 

“You can’t leave me here!” I shrieked. I pounded on the glass with both 

fists. 

I wanted to cry. I wanted to scream until my throat was raw. I’d never felt 
so angry and so frightened all at once. 

“Let me out! Dr. Gray—let me out of here! You can’t keep me here!” I 
screamed. I banged on the window as hard as I could. 

I’ll pound till I break the glass, I told myself. 

I’ll break through. Then I’ll climb out and escape. 



I beat my fists frantically against the glass. “Let me out of here! You can’t 
do this!” 

The glass was thick and hard. No way I could break through. 

“Let me out! ” I uttered a final scream. 

When I turned back into the room, the egg creatures stopped chattering. 
They stared up at me with their black, button eyes. 

They didn’t quiver or bounce. They stood totally still. As if they had frozen. 

I’m going to freeze! I realized. I rubbed my bare arms. But it didn’t help 
warm me. My hands were ice cold. 

Icicles are going to form on me, I thought. I’m going to freeze to death in 
here. I’m going to turn into a human Popsicle. 

The egg creatures stood so still. Their eyes were all locked on me. As if 
they were studying me. As if they were trying to decide what to do about me. 

Suddenly my egg creature broke the silence. I recognized it by the blue 
veins down its front. It started to chatter loudly. 

The other egg creatures turned, as if listening to it. 

Was it talking to them? Was it communicating in some weird Martian 
chatter language? 

“I hope you’re telling them all how I saved your life!” I called to it. “I hope 
you’re telling them what a good guy I am. You almost went down the drain— 
remember?” 

Of course the egg creature couldn’t understand me. 

I don’t know why I was shouting at it like that. I guess I was totally losing 
it. Totally freaked. 

As the egg creature chattered on, I stared at the others. They all listened in 
silence. I started to count them. There were so many of them—and so few of me! 

Were they friendly? Did they like strangers? Did they like humans? 

How did they feel about being locked up in this freezing cold room? 

Did they feel anything at all? 

These were questions I didn’t really want to know the answers to. 

I just wanted to get out of there. 

I decided to try the window again. But before I could move, my egg 
creature stopped talking. 

And the others started to move. 

Silently, they huddled together. Pressed together into a wide yellow wedge. 

And rolling faster than I could imagine, they attacked. 



19 


“Hey—!” I uttered a startled cry and backed up. 

The wedge of egg creatures rolled forward. Their bodies slapped the floor 
wetly as they bounced toward me. 

I retreated until my back hit the window. 

Nowhere to run. 

“What do you want?” I screamed. My voice came out high and tight in 
panic. “What are you going to do?” 

I turned and banged on the window again, pounding with open hands. “Dr. 
Gray! Dr. Gray! Help me!” 

Did they plan to roll over me? To swallow me up? 

To my surprise, the egg creatures stopped a few inches in front of me. They 
twirled and bounced until they had formed a circle once again. 

Then, moving quickly and silently, they shifted back into a big yellow 
triangle. 

I stared down at them, shivering, my teeth chattering. 

They’re not attacking, I decided. 

But what are they doing? 

Why are they forming these shapes? Are they trying to talk to me? 

I took a deep breath, trying to calm my panic. 

You’re a scientist, Dana, I reminded myself. Act like a scientist. Not a 
frightened kid. Try to talk back to them. 

I thought hard for a few seconds. Then I raised my hands in front of me. 
And I formed a circle with my pointer fingers and thumbs. 

I held the circle up so the egg creatures could all see it. And waited to see if 
they did anything. 

The yellow blobs had formed a wide triangle that nearly filled the room. I 
saw their round black eyes go up to the circle I had formed. 

And then I watched them bounce and roll—into a circle! 

Were they copying me? 

I straightened my fingers and thumbs into a triangle. 

And the egg creatures formed a triangle. 



Yes! 

We’re communicating! I realized. We’re talking to each other! 

I suddenly felt really excited. I felt like some kind of pioneer. 

I’m the first person on earth to communicate with Martians! I told myself. 
These creatures are friendly, I decided. They’re not dangerous. 

I didn’t really know that for sure. But I was so excited that I had 
communicated with them, I didn’t want to think anything bad about them. 

Dr. Gray has no right to keep them prisoner here, I thought. 

And he has no right to lock me up with them. 

I didn’t believe his excuse for keeping me here. Not for a minute. 

Just because I touched one? Just because I handled one? 

Did he really expect me to believe that touching an egg creature could harm 

me? 

Did he really think it would rot my skin off or something? 

Did he really think that touching an egg creature would give me a weird 
disease or change me in some way? 

That was just stupid. 

I carried that little yellow blob in my hands—and I felt perfectly fine. 

These creatures are my friends, I told myself. Touching them isn’t going to 
harm me in any way. 

But I’m a scientist. At least, I want to be a scientist. So I have to be 
scientific, I realized. 

I decided to check myself out—just to make sure. 

I raised my hands and inspected them carefully, first one, then the other. 
They looked okay to me. No strange rashes. No skin peeling off. I still had four 
fingers and a thumb on each hand. 

I rubbed my arms. They were the same too. Perfectly okay. 

Might as well check myself out all over, I told myself. 

I reached down and grabbed my left leg. 

Soft and mushy! 

“Oh no!” I wailed. 

I squeezed my leg again. Soft and lumpy. 

I didn’t have to look. I knew what was happening. 

I was slowly turning into one of them. I was turning into a lump of 
scrambled eggs! 



20 


“No. Oh, please—no.” 

I squeezed my mushy ankle. I couldn’t bear to look down. I didn’t want to 
see what was happening to me. 

But I had to. 

Slowly, I lowered my gaze. 

And saw that I was squeezing one of the egg creatures. Not my leg. 

I let go instantly and raised my hand. A relieved laugh escaped my throat. 
“Oh wow!” 

How could I think that mushy blob was my leg? 

I watched the little Martian scurry back to its pals. 

I shook my head. Even though no one else was around, I felt like a total 

jerk. 

Just calm down, Dana, I scolded myself. 

But how could I? 

The air in the lab seemed to get colder. I couldn’t stop shivering. I clamped 
my jaws tightly. But I couldn’t stop my teeth from chattering. 

I squeezed my nose. Cold and numb. I rubbed my ears. They were numb 

too. 

This is no joke, I thought, my throat tightening. I’m going to get frostbite. 
I’m really going to freeze. 

I tried thinking warm thoughts. I thought about the beach in summer. I 
thought about a blazing fire in the fireplace in our den. 

It didn’t help. 

A hard shiver made my whole body twitch. 

I’ve got to do something to take my mind off the cold, I decided. 

The egg creatures had spread out over the room. I raised my hands again 
and formed a triangle. 

They stared up at it, but didn’t move. 

I curled my fingers into a circle. 

They ignored this one too. 

“I guess you guys got bored, huh?” I asked them. 



I tried to bend my fingers and thumbs into a rectangle. But it was too hard. 
Fingers and thumbs can’t really bend into a rectangle. 

Besides, the egg creatures weren’t paying much attention to me. 

I’m going to freeze, I told myself again. Freeze. Freeze. Freeze. The word 
repeated in my mind until it became an unhappy chant. 

I lowered myself to the floor and pressed into the corner. I curled up, trying 
to save body warmth. Or what was left of it. 

A sound on the other side of the window made me jump up. 

Someone was coming. Dr. Gray? To let me out? 

I turned eagerly to the door. I heard footsteps out in the hall. Then a clink of 
metal. 

A slot opened just above the floor to the left of the door. A food tray slid in. 
It plopped onto the floor. 

I hurried over to it. Macaroni and cheese and a small container of milk. 

“But I hate macaroni and cheese!” I screeched. 

No reply. 

“I hate it! I hate it! I hate it!” I wailed. 

I was starting to lose it again. But I didn’t care. 

I leaned over the tray and held my hands over the plate of macaroni. The 
steam warmed my hands. 

At least it’s hot, I thought. 

I sat down on the floor and lifted the tray to my lap. Then I gulped down the 
macaroni, just for the warmth. 

It tasted horrible. I hate that wet, clotted, cheesy taste. But it did warm me 
up a little. 

I didn’t open the milk. Too cold. 

Feeling a little better, I shoved the tray aside and climbed to my feet. I 
strode over to the window and started pounding the glass with my fists. 

“Dr. Gray—let me out!” I shouted. “Dr. Gray—I know you can hear me. 
Let me out! You can’t lock me in here and make me eat macaroni and cheese! 
Let me out!” 

I screamed until my voice was hoarse. I didn’t hear a reply. Not a sound 
from the other side of the glass. 

I turned away from the window in disgust. 

“I’ve got to find a way out of here,” I said out loud. “I’ve got to!” 

And then, I had an idea. 



21 


Sad to say, it was a bad idea. 

The kind of idea you think of when you’re freezing to death in a total panic. 

What was the idea? To call home and tell Mom and Dad to come get me. 

The only problem with that idea was that there were no phones in the room. 

I searched carefully. There were metal shelves up to the ceiling against the 
back wall. They contained only scientific books and files. There was a desk in 
one corner. The desktop was bare. 

Nothing else. 

Nothing else in the whole room. Except for the dozens of egg creatures and 
me. 

I needed another idea, an idea that didn’t call for a telephone. 

But I was stumped. I tried the door again. I thought Dr. Gray might have 
gotten careless and left it unlocked. 

No such luck. 

I checked out the slot where my food tray had been delivered. It was only a 
few inches tall. Way too narrow for me to slip through. 

I was trapped. A prisoner. A specimen. 

I dropped glumly down to the floor and rested my back against the wall. I 
pulled up my knees and wrapped my arms around them. I curled into a ball, 
trying to stay warm. 

How long did Dr. Gray plan to keep me here? 

Forever? 

I let out a miserable sigh. But then a thought helped to cheer me. I suddenly 
had a little hope. 

I remembered something I had forgotten. I had told Anne where I was 
going! 

This morning in her backyard, I had told Anne I was going to take the egg 
creature to the science lab. 

I’m going to be rescued! I realized. 

I leaped to my feet and shot both fists into the air. I opened my mouth in a 
happy cheer. “Yesssss!” 



I knew exactly what would happen. 

When I don’t show up for dinner, Mom or Dad will call Anne. Because 
that’s where I’m always hanging out when I should be home for dinner. 

Anne will tell them I went to the science lab on Denver. 

Mom will say, “He should be back by now.” 

Dad will say, “I’d better go get him.” 

And Dad will come and rescue me. 

Only a matter of time, I knew. Only a matter of a few hours, and Dad will 
be here to get me out of this freezer. 

I felt so much better. 

I lowered myself back to the floor and leaned against the wall to wait. The 
egg creatures all stared at me. Watched me in silence. Trying to figure me out, I 
guess. 

I didn’t realize that I fell asleep. I guess I was worn out from all the 
excitement—and the fear. 

I’m not sure how long I slept. 

Voices woke me up. Voices from out in the hall. 

I sat up, instantly alert. And I listened. 

And heard Dad’s voice. 

Yes! 

He was here. He was about to rescue me. 

Yes! 

I climbed to my feet. I stretched. I got ready to greet Dad. 

And then, from the front hall, I heard Dr. Gray say, “I’m sorry, Mr. Johnson. 
Your son never stopped here.” 



22 


“Are you sure?” I heard Dad ask. 

“Very sure,” Dr. Gray replied. “I’m the only one here today. We’re closed. 
We had no visitors.” 

“He’s about this tall,” I heard Dad say. “He has dark hair, and he wears 
glasses.” 

“No. Sorry,” Dr. Gray insisted. 

“But he told his friend that he was coming here. He had something he 
wanted to show to a scientist. His bike is gone from the garage.” 

“Well, you can check outside for your son’s bike,” Dr. Gray told Dad. “But 
I don’t think you’ll find it.” 

He moved it! I realized. Dr. Gray moved my bike so no one would find it! 

I let out a shout of rage and ran to the window. “Dad—I’m in here!” I 
shouted. I cupped my hands around my mouth so my voice would be even 
louder. “Dad! Can you hear me? I’m in here! Dad?” 

I took a deep breath and listened. My heart was thudding so loudly, I could 
barely hear their voices from the front. 

Dad and Dr. Gray continued talking in low, calm voices. 

“Dad! Can’t you hear me?” I screamed. “It’s me, Dana! Come back here, 
Dad! I’m here! Come let me out!” 

My voice cracked. My throat ached from screaming so loud. 

“Dad— please! ” 

My chest heaving, I pressed my ear against the window and listened again. 

“Well, it’s very strange, Mr. Johnson,” Dr. Gray was saying. “The boy never 
came here. Would you like to look around the lab?” 

Yes, Dad! I pleaded silently. Say yes. 

Tell him that you’d like to look around the lab, Dad! Please! 

“No, thanks,” I heard Dad say. “I’d better keep searching. Thank you, Dr. 
Gray.” 

I heard Dad say good-bye. 

I heard the front door close. 

And I knew I was doomed. 



23 


“I don’t believe this,” I murmured out loud. “Dad was so close. So close!” 

I sank back to the floor. I felt as if my heart were sinking too. I wanted to 
keep dropping, down onto the floor, into the ground. Just keep sinking till I 
disappeared forever. 

My throat ached from screaming. Why couldn’t Dad hear me? I could hear 

him. 

And why did he believe Dr. Gray’s lies? Why didn’t Dad check out the lab 
for himself? 

He would see me through the window. And I would be rescued. 

Dr. Gray is evil, I realized. He pretends to be interested only in science. He 
pretended to be worried about my health, about my safety. He said that’s why he 
was keeping me here—to make sure I was safe. 

But he lied to my father. 

And he was lying to me. 

Crouched on the floor, I shivered as the frigid air seemed to seep right 
through my skin. I shut my eyes and lowered my head. 

I wanted to stay calm. I knew I had to stay calm to think clearly. But I 
couldn’t. The chills I felt running down my back weren’t just from the cold. 
They were also from terror. 

Voices in the front snapped me to attention. I held my breath and listened. 

Was that my dad? 

Or was I starting to hear things? 

“Maybe I will take a look around.” That’s what I thought I heard Dad say. 

Was I dreaming it? 

No. I heard Dr. Gray mumble something. Then I heard Dad say, 
“Sometimes Dana sneaks into places where he doesn’t belong. He’s so interested 
in science, he may have sneaked in through a back door, Dr. Gray.” 

“Yes!” I cried happily. Every time I lost all hope, I somehow got another 
chance. 

I jumped up and hurried to the window. I crossed my fingers and prayed 
Dad would walk to the back and see me. 

After a few seconds, I saw Dad and Dr. Gray at the far end of the long, 



white hall. Dr. Gray was leading him slowly, opening doors. They peered into 
each lab, then moved on. 

“Dad!” I called. “Can you hear me? I’m back here!” 

Even though I had my face pressed up to the window glass, he couldn’t hear 
me. 

I banged on the glass. Dad kept walking with Dr. Gray. He didn’t look up. 

I waited for them to come closer. My heart was banging against my chest 
now. My mouth was dry. I pressed up close to the window. 

In a few seconds, Dad would peer into the window and see me standing 

here. 

And then I would be out—and Dr. Gray would have some real explaining to 
do. 

With my hands and nose pressed against the glass, I watched them move 
forward. The hall was dark on this end. But I could see them clearly as they 
peeked into the labs at the other end. 

“Dad!” I shouted. “Dad—over here!” 

I knew he couldn’t hear me. But I had to shout anyway. 

The two men disappeared into a lab for a few seconds. Then they came out 
and stepped toward me. 

They were talking in low tones. I couldn’t hear what they were saying. 

Dad had his eyes on Dr. Gray. 

Turn this way, Dad, I silently urged. Please—look to the end of the hall 
Look in the window. 

Chatting softly, they disappeared through another door. 

What on earth are they talking about? I wondered. 

A few seconds later, they were back in the hall. Moving this way. 

Dad — please! Here I am! I pressed up eagerly against the glass. 

I pounded my fists on the window. 

Dad looked up. 

And stared into the window. 

He stared right at me. 

I’m rescued! I realized. 

I’m outta here! 

Dad stared at me for a few seconds. 

Then he turned back to Dr. Gray. “Thanks for showing me around,” he said. 
“Dana definitely isn’t here. Sorry I wasted your time.” 



24 


“Dad—I’m right here!” I shrieked. “You’re looking right at me!” 

Was I invisible? 

Why didn’t he see me? 

“Sorry I wasted your time, Dr. Gray,” I heard Dad say again. 

“Good luck in finding Dana,” Dr. Gray replied. “I’m sure he’ll turn up 
really soon. He’s probably at a friend’s house and forgot the time. You know 
how kids are.” 

“Nooooooo!” I let out a long wail. “Dad—come back! Dad!” 

As I stared in horror, Dad turned away and started back down the long hall. 
With another cry, I began to pound on the window glass with both fists. 
“Dad! Dad! Dad!” I chanted with each slam of my fist. 

Dad turned around. “What’s that noise?” he asked Dr. Gray. 

Dr. Gray turned too. 

I pounded the glass even harder. I pounded until my knuckles were raw and 
throbbing. “Dad! Dad! Dad!” I continued to chant. 

“What’s that pounding noise?” Dad demanded from halfway down the hall. 
“It’s the pipes,” Dr. Gray told him. “I’ve been having a lot of trouble with 
the pipes. The plumber is coming on Monday.” 

Dad nodded. 

He kept walking. I heard him say good-bye to the scientist. Then I heard the 
door close behind him. 

I knew that this time he wouldn’t come back. 

I didn’t move from the window. I stared through the glass down the long 

hall. 

A few seconds later, I saw Dr. Gray coming toward me. He had an angry 
scowl on his face. 

I’m his prisoner now, I thought glumly. 

What does he plan to do? 



25 


He stopped outside the window. He clicked on the hall light. 

In the bright light, I could see beads of sweat on his forehead. He frowned 
and stared in at me with those cold blue eyes. 

“Nice try, Dana,” he said sourly. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” I choked out. My legs were trembling. Not 
from the cold. I was really terrified now. 

“You almost got your father’s attention,” Dr. Gray replied. “That wouldn’t 
have been nice. That would have spoiled my plans.” 

I pressed both palms against the glass. I tried to force myself to stop 
trembling. 

“Why couldn’t Dad see me?” I demanded. 

Dr. Gray rubbed a hand over his side of the window. “It’s one-way glass,” 
he explained. “No one can see into the room from the hall—unless I turn on the 
bright hall light.” 

I let out a long sigh. “You mean—?” 

“Your father saw only blackness,” the scientist said with a pleased grin. “He 
thought he was staring into an empty room. Just the way you did—until I turned 
on the light.” 

“But why didn’t he hear me?” I demanded. “I was shouting my head off.” 

Dr. Gray shook his head. “A waste of time. The room you are in is totally 
soundproof. Not a sound escapes into the hall.” 

“But I can hear you!” I declared. “I could hear every word you and Dad 
said. And now you can hear me.” 

“There is a speaker system in the wall,” he explained. “I can turn it on and 
off with the same control unit that locks the door.” 

“So I could hear you, but you couldn’t hear me,” I murmured. 

“You’re a very smart boy,” he replied. His blue eyes flashed. “I know 
you’re smart enough not to try any more tricks in there.” 

“You have to let me out!” I screamed. “You can’t keep me here!” 

“Yes, I can,” he replied softly. “I can keep you here as long as I like, Dana.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. I was so frightened, I couldn’t speak. 

“It’s my duty to keep you in there,” Dr. Gray said calmly. He didn’t care 



that I was so scared and upset. He didn’t care about me at all, I realized. 

He must be crazy, I decided. 

Crazy and evil. 

“It’s my duty to keep you here,” he repeated. “I must make sure that the egg 
creatures haven’t harmed you. I must make sure that the egg creatures haven’t 
given you strange germs that you might pass on to others.” 

“Let me out!” I shrieked. I was too frightened and angry to argue with him 
now. Too angry and frightened to think clearly. “Let me out! Let me out!” I 
demanded, pounding on the glass with my aching fists. 

“Get some rest, Dana,” he instructed. “Don’t tire yourself out, son. I want to 
start doing tests on you in the morning. I have many, many tests to perform.” 

“But I’m f-freezing!” I stammered. “Let me out of here. At least let me stay 
somewhere warm. Please?” 

He ignored my plea. He clicked off the hall light and turned away. 

I watched him make his way down the long hall. He disappeared through a 
door in front. And closed the door hard behind him. 

I stood there, trembling, my heart pounding. 

I was cold—and very scared. 

I had no way of knowing things were about to get a lot scarier! 



26 


I was so desperate to get Dad’s attention, I nearly forgot about the egg creatures. 
Now I turned from the window to find them scattered around the room. 

They stood still as statues. They didn’t bounce or quiver. They all seemed to 
be staring at me. 

Dr. Gray had turned off all the lights except for a tiny, dim bulb in the 
ceiling. The little egg blobs appeared pale and gray in the dim light. 

I felt a chill at the back of my neck. 

Was it safe to go to sleep in the same room with them? 

I suddenly felt exhausted. So tired that all my muscles ached. My head 
spun. 

I needed sleep. 

I knew I had to rest so I could be alert and sharp tomorrow. Alert and sharp 
so I could find a way to escape. 

But if I fell asleep, what would the egg creatures do? 

Would they leave me alone? Would they sleep too? 

Or would they try to harm me in some way? 

Were they good? Were they evil? 

Were they intelligent at all? 

I had no way of knowing. 

I only knew I couldn’t stay awake much longer. 

I dropped down to the floor and curled up in the corner. I tried to stay warm 
by tucking myself into a ball. 

But it didn’t help. The cold swept over me. My nose was frozen. My ears 
were numb. My glasses were frozen to my face. 

Even wrapped up tightly, I couldn’t stop shaking. 

I’m going to freeze to death, I realized. 

When Dr. Gray comes back tomorrow morning, he’ll find me on the floor. 
A solid lump of ice. 

I gazed at the egg creatures. They stared back at me in the dim light. 

Silence. 

Such heavy silence in the room that I wanted to scream. 



“Aren’t you cold?” I cried out to them. My voice came out hoarse, weak 
from all the screaming I had done. “Aren’t you freezing to death too?” I asked 
them. “How can you guys stand it?” 

Of course they didn’t reply. 

“Dana, you’re totally losing it,” I scolded myself out loud. 

I was trying to talk to a bunch of egg lumps from another planet! Did I 
really expect them to answer me? 

They stared back in silence. None of them quivered. None of them moved. 
Their little dark eyes glowed in the dim light from the ceiling. 

Maybe they’re asleep, I thought. 

Maybe they sleep with their eyes open. That’s why they’re not moving. 
That’s why they’ve stopped bouncing. They’re sound asleep. 

That made me feel a little better. 

I tucked myself into a tighter ball, and I tried to fall asleep too. If only I 
could stop shivering. 

I closed my eyes and silently repeated the word, “sleep, sleep, sleep” in my 
mind. 

It didn’t help. 

And when I opened my eyes, I saw the egg creatures start to move. 

I was wrong. They weren’t asleep. 

They were wide awake. And they were all moving together. All moving at 
once. 

Coming to get me. 



27 


“Ohhh.” A low moan escaped from my throat. 

I was already shaking all over from the cold. But now my entire body 
shuddered from fear. 

The egg creatures moved with surprising speed. 

They were bunching together in the center of the room. Pressing into each 
other, making wet smacking sounds. 

I tried to climb to my feet. But my legs didn’t work. 

My knees bent like rubber, and I landed back on the floor. I pressed back 
into the corner—and watched them move. 

They slapped up against each other. Loud, wet slaps. 

And as they pushed together, they rolled forward. Rolled toward me. 

“What are you doing?” I cried in a high, shrill voice. “What are you going 
to do to me?” 

They didn’t reply. 

The wet smacks echoed through the room as the eggy creatures threw 
themselves into each other. 

“Leave me alone!” I shrieked. Once again I tried to stand. I made it to my 
knees. But I was trembling too hard to balance on two feet. 

“Leave me alone—please! I’ll help you guys escape too!” I promised. 
“Really. I’ll help you escape—tomorrow. Just let me make it through the night.” 

They didn’t seem to understand. 

They didn’t seem to hear me! 

What are they doing? I asked myself, watching them creep forward. Why 
are they doing this? 

They had waited until I nearly fell asleep, I realized. 

That means they wanted to catch me off guard. They wanted to sneak up on 
me. 

Because they were about to do something I wasn’t going to like. Something 
I wasn’t going to like at all. 

I pressed my back against the wall. 

The egg creatures moved quickly now, pale in the gray light. 



Squinting hard at them, I realized to my horror that they had all stuck 
themselves together. 

They were no longer dozens of little egg creatures. 

Now they had joined together to form one enormous egg creature! 

I was staring at a big, quivering wall of egg! A wall so big it nearly covered 
the floor of the room. 

A wall that was rolling toward me. Rolling to get me. 

“Whoa! Please—whoa!” I choked out. 

I knew I should climb to my feet. I knew I should try to run. 

But where could I run? 

How could I escape from this huge, solid egg wall? 

I couldn’t. 

So I lay there and watched it come. Too frozen. Too frozen to move. 
“Ohhhh.” I moaned as the front of the wall of eggs rose up over my shoes. 

It was moving so fast now. Crawling somehow. 

Crawling over me. 

The egg wall swept over my shoes. Over the legs of my jeans. Over my 
waist. 

I lay there helpless as it swept over me. 

Too frozen. Too frozen. 

Helpless, as it poured over me. 

Trapping me beneath it. 

Smothering me. 



28 


I should have moved. 

I should have fought it. 

Too late. Too late now. 

The sticky, warm egg creatures—all glued together—rolled over me like a 
heavy carpet. 

I pushed up both arms. I raised my knees. I tried to squirm away. 

Too late. 

I tried to roll out from underneath. But the heavy, living carpet had me 
pinned on my back. Pinned to the floor. 

It rolled over my waist. And then quickly, over my chest. 

Was it going to sweep over my head? Was it going to smother me? 

I punched at it with both fists. 

But it was too late to push it away. Too late to do it any harm. 

Too late to stop it as it crept closer to my neck. So warm and heavy. 

I twisted my head from side to side. I tried to roll away. 

But it was no use. 

Too late. Too late to fight back. 

And now I lay there, trapped. And felt it creep up to my chin. 

Felt it throbbing. Pulsing. 

Dozens of eggy monsters all pressed together. Alive. A living sheet of egg 
creatures. Covering me. 

Covering me. 

I took a deep breath and held it as the heavy, warm carpet pressed itself 
against my chin. My arms and legs were pinned to the floor. I couldn’t squirm 
away. 

I couldn’t move. 

To my surprise, the egg carpet stopped under my chin. 

I let out a long whoosh of air. 

And waited. 

Had it really stopped? 

Yes. 



It didn’t crawl over my head. It rested heavily on top of me. Throbbing 
steadily, as if it had two dozen heartbeats. 

So warm. 

I felt so warm beneath it. Almost cozy. 

I let out a sigh. For the first time, I had stopped shivering. My hands and 
feet were no longer frozen. No chills ran down my back. 

Warm. I felt toasty and warm. 

A smile spread over my face. I could feel my fear fading away with the 

cold. 

The egg creatures weren’t trying to harm me, I realized. 

They wanted to help me. 

They pressed themselves together to form a blanket. A warm and cozy 
blanket. 

They worked together to keep me from freezing. 

They saved my life! 

With the warm, pulsing blanket on top of me, I suddenly felt calm. And 
sleepy. I drifted into a peaceful, dreamless sleep. 

Such a wonderful, soothing sleep. 

But it didn’t help get me ready for the horrors of the next morning. 



29 


I awoke a couple of times during the night. At first, I felt alarmed and frightened 
when I saw that I wasn’t home in bed. 

But the pulsing, warm egg blanket relaxed me. I shut my eyes and drifted 
back to sleep. 

Some time in the morning, I was aroused from a deep sleep by an angry 
voice. I felt hands grab my shoulders roughly. 

Someone was shaking me hard. Shaking me awake. 

I opened my eyes to find Dr. Gray bending over me in his white lab coat. 
His face was twisted in anger. He shook me hard, shouting furiously. 

“Dana—what have you done? What have you done to the egg monsters?” 

“Huh?” I was still half asleep. My eyes struggled to focus. My head bobbed 
loosely on my shoulders as the angry scientist shook me. 

“Let go!” I finally managed to choke out. 

“What have you done to them?” Dr. Gray demanded. “How did you turn 
them into a blanket?” 

“I—I didn’t!” I stammered. 

He uttered a furious growl. “You’ve ruined everything!” he shrieked. 

“Please—” I started, struggling to wake up. 

He let go of me and grabbed the egg blanket in both hands. “What have you 
done, Dana?” he repeated. “Why did you do this?” 

With another cry of rage, he ripped the blanket off me—and heaved it 
against the wall. 

The egg creatures made a soft splat as they hit the lab wall. I heard them 
utter tiny squeals of pain. The blanket folded limply to the floor. 

“You shouldn’t do that, Dr. Gray!” I screamed, finally finding my voice. I 
jumped to my feet. I could still feel the warmth of the egg blanket on my skin. 

“You hurt them!” I shrieked. 

I gazed down at the yellow blanket. It bubbled silently where it had been 
thrown. It didn’t move. 

“You let them touch you?” Dr. Gray demanded, twisting his face in disgust. 
“You let them cover you up?” 

“They saved my life!” I declared. “They pushed together to make a warm 



blanket—and they saved my life!” 

I glanced down again. The egg creatures remained stuck together. The 
blanket appeared to be seething now. Throbbing hard. As if excited. Or angry. 

“Are you crazy?” Dr. Gray cried, his face red with anger. “Are you crazy? 
You let these monsters rest on top of you? You touched them? You handled 
them? Are you trying to destroy my discovery? Are you trying to destroy my 
work?” 

He’s the crazy one, I realized. Dr. Gray isn’t making any sense. He isn’t 
making any sense at all. 

He moved quickly—and grabbed me again. Held me in a tight grip so I 
couldn’t escape. And pulled me to the door. 

“Let go of me! Where are you taking me?” I demanded. 

“I thought you could be trusted,” Dr. Gray replied in a menacing growl. 
“But I was wrong. I’m so sorry, Dana. So sorry. I had hoped to keep you alive. 
But I see now that is impossible.” 



30 


He dragged me to the door. He stopped and reached into the pocket of his lab 
coat. Reached for the control unit to open the door. 

I saw my chance. He had me by only one hand. 

With a hard burst of strength, I pulled away. 

He let out a cry. Reached both hands for me. 

Missed. 

I ran to the other side of the lab. I turned at the wall to face him. 

He had a strange smile on his face. “Dana, there’s nowhere to run,” he said 
softly. 

My eyes flashed around the room. I don’t know what I was searching for. I 
had seen it all. And I knew that he was telling the truth. 

Dr. Gray stood blocking the only door. The long window was too heavy and 
thick to break through. And it didn’t open. 

There were no other windows. No other doors. 

No ways to escape. 

“What are you going to do now, Dana?” Dr. Gray asked softly, the strange 
smile stuck on his face. His blue eyes locked coldly on mine. “Where are you 
going to go?” 

I opened my mouth to reply. But I had nothing to say. 

“I’ll tell you what’s going to happen,” Dr. Gray said softly, calmly. “You’re 
going to stay in here. In this cold, cold room. I’m going to leave you now and 
make sure you’re locked in.” 

His smile grew wider. “Then do you know what I’m going to do? Do you?” 

“What?” I choked out. 

“I’m going to make it colder in here. I’m going to make it colder than a 
freezer.” 

“No—!” I protested. 

His smile faded. “I trusted you, Dana. I trusted you. But you broke that 
trust. You let them touch you. You let them form this—this carpet! You ruined 
them, Dana! You ruined my egg monsters!” 

“I—I didn’t do anything!” I stammered. I balled my hands into fists. But I 
felt so helpless. Helpless and afraid. 



“You can’t freeze me in here!” I cried. “I didn’t do anything! You can’t 
leave me in here to freeze!” 

“Of course I can,” Dr. Gray replied coldly. “This is my lab. My own little 
world. I can do whatever I want.” 

He pulled the little black remote unit from his lab coat pocket. He pointed it 
at the door and pushed a button. 

The door swung open. 

He started to leave. “Good-bye, Dana,” he called. 



31 


“No—stop!” I called. 

Dr. Gray turned from the doorway. 

And as he turned, the blanket of egg creatures rose up. 

It stood straight up—and flung itself over him. It dropped on top of the 
scientist with a hard thud. 

“Hey—” He let out an angry cry. The cry was muffled by the heavy yellow 
blanket of egg creatures. 

The egg blanket covered him. I watched him struggle underneath it. And I 
listened to his muffled cries. 

He was squirming and twisting beneath the blanket. But he couldn’t toss it 
off. And he couldn’t slide out from under it. 

He crumpled to the floor, and the blanket crumpled with him. 

I watched it seething and bubbling on top of him. 

Then I didn’t wait another second. I took a deep breath—and I ran across 
the room. I darted past the egg blanket with Dr. Gray twisting and thrashing 
underneath it. 

Out the door. 

Down the long hall to the front of the lab. 

Yes! A few seconds later, I pushed open the front door and burst outside. 
Breathing hard, sucking in the sweet, fresh air. 

A beautiful morning. A red ball of a sun still rising over the spring-green 
trees. The sky clear and blue. 

I glanced around. I could see a paperboy on his bike halfway up the block. 
No one else on the street. 

I turned and ran around to the side of the building. The grass smelled so 
wonderful! The morning air so warm and fresh. I was so thrilled to be outside! 

I had to get home. 

I had a hunch—and the hunch was right. I spotted my bike, resting against 
the back wall of the lab, hidden by a large Dumpster. 

I leaped onto it and started to pedal. Riding a bike never felt as exciting, so 
thrilling! 

I was getting away, away from the horror of crazy Dr. Gray and his freezing 



lab. 


I pedaled faster. I rode without stopping. Without seeing! The world was a 
blur of green. 

I must have set a speed record for getting home. 

I roared up the driveway, the tires sending gravel flying on both sides. 

Then I jumped off my bike and let it topple to the grass. I dove for the 
kitchen door and burst into the kitchen. “Mom!” I cried. 

She jumped up from the breakfast table. I caught the worried expression on 
her face. It melted away as I ran into the room. 

“Dana!” she cried. “Where were you? We’ve all been so terrified. The 
police are looking for you and—and—” 

“I’m okay!” I told her. I gave her a quick hug. 

Dad ran in from the hallway. “Dana—you’re okay? Where were you all 
night? Your mother and I—” 

“Egg monsters!” I cried. “Egg monsters from Mars! Hurry!” I grabbed 
Dad’s hand and tugged. “Come on!” 

“Huh?” Dad spun around. He narrowed his eyes, studying me. “What did 
you say?” 

“No time to explain!” I gasped. “They’ve got Dr. Gray. He’s evil, Dad. He’s 
so evil!” 

“Who has what?” Mom demanded. 

“The egg creatures! From Mars! Hurry! There’s no time!” 

They didn’t move. I saw them exchange glances. 

Mom stepped forward and placed a hand on my forehead. “Do you have a 
fever, Dana? Are you sick?” 

“No!” I screamed. “Listen to me! Egg creatures from Mars! Follow me!” 

I know I wasn’t explaining myself too well. But I was frantic. 

“Dana—come lie down,” Mom instructed. “I’ll call Dr. Martin.” 

“No—please! I don’t need a doctor!” I protested. “Just follow me—okay? 
You’ve got to see them. You’ve got to see the egg creatures. You’ve got to 
hurry.” 

Mom and Dad exchanged worried glances again. 

“I’m not crazy!” I shrieked. “I want you to come with me to the science 

lab!” 

“Okay, okay,” Dad finally agreed. “You were in that lab last night?” 

“Yes,” I told him, shoving him to the kitchen door. “I called and called. But 



you couldn’t hear me.” 

“Oh, wow,” Dad murmured, shaking his head. “Wow.” 

The three of us climbed into the car. 

It took about three minutes to drive to the lab. Dad parked in front. I 
jumped out of the car before he stopped. 

The front door to the lab stood wide open, as I’d left it. 

I ran inside with Mom and Dad close behind me. 

“They’re egg creatures,” I told them breathlessly. “They dropped down 
from Mars. They captured Dr. Gray.” 

I led the way down the long hall. 

I pushed open the door to the freezing back room. 

Mom and Dad stepped in behind me. 

I gazed around the room—and gasped in amazement! 



32 


I saw Mom and Dad staring at me. They had worried expressions on their faces. 
“Where are the egg creatures?” Mom demanded softly. 

Dad rested a hand gently on my shoulder. “Where are they, Dana?” he 
asked in a whisper. 

“Uh... they’re gone,” I choked out. 

The lab stood empty. 

No Dr. Gray. No egg creatures. No one. 

Bare white walls. Nothing on the floor. 

Nothing. 

“Maybe they went back to Mars,” I murmured, shaking my head. 

“And Dr. Gray? What about Dr. Gray?” Dad asked. 

“Maybe they took Dr. Gray with them,” I replied. 

“Let’s go home,” Mom sighed. “Let’s get you into bed, Dana.” 

Dad guided me from the room, his hands on my shoulders. “I’ll call Dr. 
Martin,” he said softly. “I’m sure we can get him to come to the house this 
morning.” 

“I—I do feel a little strange,” I admitted. 

So they drove me home and tucked me into bed. 

The doctor came later that morning and examined me. He didn’t find 
anything wrong. But he said I should stay in bed and rest for a while. 

I knew that Mom and Dad didn’t believe my story. I felt bad about that. But 
I didn’t know how to convince them I was telling the truth. 

I did feel a little weird. 

Just tired, I guess. 

I dozed off and woke up and dozed off again. 

In the afternoon, I woke up to hear my sister Brandy talking to some friends 
outside my room. “Dana totally freaked out,” I heard Brandy say. “He says he 
was kidnapped by egg monsters from Mars.” 

I heard Brandy’s friends giggling. 

Oh great, I thought bitterly. Now everyone thinks I’m a nut case. 



I wanted to call Brandy into my room and tell her what really happened. I 
wanted to make her believe me. I wanted to make someone believe me. 

But how? 

I fell asleep again. 

I was awakened by a voice calling my name. I sat up in bed. The voice 
floated in from my open bedroom window. 

I climbed out of bed and made my way to the window. Anne was calling me 
from the driveway. “Dana—are you okay? Do you want to come over? I got a 
new CD-ROM version of Battle Chess. ” 

“Cool!” I called down to Anne. “I’ll be right over.” 

I pulled on a T-shirt and a pair of jeans. I was feeling pretty good. Rested. 
Like my old self. 

So happy that everything was back to normal. 

I hummed to myself as I brushed my hair. I stared at myself in the mirror. 

You had an amazing adventure, Dana, I told myself. Imagine—you spent a 
night with egg creatures from Mars! 

But now you’re okay, and your life is back to normal. 

I felt so happy, I gave Brandy a hug on my way down the stairs. She stared 
at me as if I truly were crazy! 

Humming loudly, I made my way out the kitchen door and started across 
the yard to Anne’s house. 

Everything looked so beautiful to me. The grass. The trees. The spring 
flowers. The sun setting behind the trees. 

What a day! What a beautiful, perfect, normal day! 

And then halfway across Anne’s lawn, I stopped. 

I crouched down on the grass—and I laid the biggest egg you ever saw! 





THE BEAST 
FROM THE EAST 


Goosebumps - 43 
R.L. Stine 



1 


When I was a really little girl, my mom would tuck me into bed at night. She 
would whisper, “Good night, Ginger. Good night. Don’t let the bedbugs bite.” 

I didn’t know what bedbugs were. I pictured fat red bugs with big eyes and 
spidery legs, crawling under the sheet. Just thinking about them made me itchy 
all over. 

After Mom kissed me on the forehead and left, Dad would step into my 
room and sing to me. Very softly. The same song every night. “The Teddy Bears’ 
Picnic.” 

I don’t know why he thought that song made a good lullaby. It was about 
going into the woods and finding hundreds and hundreds of bears. 

The song gave me the shivers. What were the bears eating at their picnic? 
Children? 

After Dad kissed me on the forehead and left the room, I’d be itching and 
shaking for hours. 

Then I’d have nightmares about bedbugs and bears. 

Until a few years ago, I was afraid to go into the woods. 

I’m twelve now, and I’m not scared any longer. 

At least, I wasn’t scared until our family camping trip this summer. That’s 
when I discovered that there are a lot scarier creatures than bears in the woods! 

But I guess I’d better begin at the beginning. 

The first thing I remember about our camping trip is Dad yelling at my 
brothers. I have two ten-year-old brothers—Pat and Nat. You guessed it. They’re 
twins. 

Lucky me—huh? 

Pat and Nat aren’t just twins. They’re identical twins. They look so much 
alike, they confuse each other ! 

They are both short and skinny. They both have round faces and big brown 
eyes. They both wear their brown hair parted in the middle and straight down the 
sides. They both wear baggy, faded jeans and black-and-red skater T-shirts with 
slogans no one can understand. 

There is only one way to tell Pat from Nat or Nat from Pat. You have to ask 
them who they are! 



I remember that our camping trip began on a beautiful, sunny day. The air 
smelled piney and fresh. Twigs and dead leaves crackled under our shoes as we 
followed a twisting path through the woods. 

Dad led the way. He carried the tent over his shoulder, and he had a bulging 
backpack on his back. Mom followed him. She was also loaded down with stuff 
we needed. 

The path led through a grassy clearing. The sun felt hot on my face. My 
backpack began to feel heavy. I wondered how much deeper into the woods 
Mom and Dad wanted to go. 

Pat and Nat followed behind us. Dad kept turning around to yell at them. 
We all had to yell at Pat and Nat. Otherwise, they never seemed to hear us. They 
only heard each other. 

Why was Dad yelling? 

Well, for one thing, Nat kept disappearing. Nat likes to climb trees. If he 
sees a good tree, he climbs it. I think he’s part chimpanzee. 

I tell him that as often as I can. Then he scratches his chest and makes 
chimp noises. He thinks he’s really funny. 

So there we were, hiking through the woods. And every time we turned 
around, Nat would be up a tree somewhere. It was slowing us down. So Dad had 
to yell at him. 

Then Dad had to yell at Pat because of his Game Boy. “I told you not to 
bring that thing!” Dad shouted. Dad is big and broad, kind of like a bear. And he 
has a booming voice. 

It doesn’t do him much good. Pat and Nat never listen to him. 

Pat walked along, eyes on his Game Boy, his fingers hammering the 
controls. 

“Why are we hiking in the woods?” Dad asked him. “You could be home in 
your room doing that. Put it away, Pat, and check out the scenery.” 

“I can’t, Dad,” Pat protested. “I can’t quit now. I’m on Level Six! I’ve never 
made it to Level Six before!” 

“There goes a chipmunk,” Mom chimed in, pointing. Mom is the wildlife 
guide. She points out everything that moves. 

Pat didn’t raise his eyes from his Game Boy. 

“Where’s Nat?” Dad demanded, his eyes searching the clearing. 

“Up here, Dad,” Nat called. I shielded my eyes with one hand and saw him 
on a high branch of a tall oak tree. 



“Get down from there!” Dad shouted. “That branch won’t hold you!” 

“Hey—I made it to Level Seven!” Pat declared, fingering frantically. 

“Look—two bunny rabbits!” Mom cried. “See them in the tall grass?” 

“Let’s keep walking,” I groaned. “It’s too hot here.” I wanted to get out of 
the clearing and back under the cool shade of the trees. 

“Ginger is the only sensible one,” Dad said, shaking his head. 

“Ginger is a freak!” Nat called, sliding down from the oak tree. 

We made our way through the woods. I don’t know how long we walked. It 
was so beautiful! So peaceful. Beams of sunlight poked through the high 
branches, making the ground sparkle. 

I found myself humming that song about the bears in the woods. I don’t 
know what made it pop into my head. Dad hadn’t sung it to me in years and 
years. 

We stopped for lunch by a clear, trickling stream. “This would make a nice 
camping spot,” Mom suggested. “We can set up the tent on the grass here by the 
shore.” 

Mom and Dad started to unpack the equipment and set up the tent. I helped 
them. Pat and Nat threw stones into the stream. Then they got into a wrestling 
match and tried to shove each other into the water. 

“Take them into the woods,” Dad instructed me. “Try to lose them—okay?” 

He was joking, of course. 

He had no way of knowing that Pat, Nat, and I would soon be lost for real 
—with little hope of ever returning. 



2 


“What do you want to do?” Nat demanded. He had picked up a thin tree branch 
to use as a walking stick. Pat kept slapping at it, trying to make Nat stumble. 

We had followed the stream for a while. I saw a million tiny, silver 
minnows swimming near the surface. Now we were making our own path 
through the tangle of trees, low shrubs, and rocks. 

“Hide-and-seek!” Pat declared. He slapped Nat. “You’re It!” 

Nat slapped him back. “You’re It.” 

“You’re It!” 

“You’re It!” 

“You’re It!” 

The slaps kept getting harder. 

“I’ll be It!” I cried. Anything to keep them from murdering each other. 
“Hurry. Go hide. But don’t go too far.” 

I leaned against a tree, shut my eyes, and started to count to one hundred. I 
could hear them scampering into the trees. 

After thirty, I counted by tens. I didn’t want to give them too big a head 
start. “Ready or not, here I come!” I called. 

I found Pat after only a few minutes. He had crouched behind a large white 
mound of sand. He thought he was hidden. But I spotted his brown hair poking 
up over the top of the sand. 

I tagged him easily. 

Nat was harder to find. He had climbed a tree, of course. He was way up at 
the top, completely hidden by thick clumps of green leaves. 

I never would have found him if he hadn’t spit on me. 

“Get down, creep!” I shouted angrily. I waved a fist up at him. “You’re 
disgusting! Get down—right now!” 

He giggled and peered down at me. “Did I hit you?” 

I didn’t answer. I waited for him to climb down to the ground. Then I 
mbbed a handful of dried leaves in his face until he was sputtering and choking. 

Just a typical Wald family hide-and-seek game. 

After that, we chased a squirrel through the woods. The poor thing kept 
glancing back at us as if he didn’t believe we were chasing after him. He finally 



got tired of the race and scurried up a tall pine tree. 

I glanced around. The trees in this part of the woods grew close together. 
Their leaves blocked most of the sunlight. The air felt cooler here. In their shade, 
it was nearly as dark as evening. 

“Let’s go back,” I suggested. “Mom and Dad might be getting worried.” 

The boys didn’t argue. “Which way?” Nat asked. 

I glanced around, making a complete circle with my eyes. “Uh... that way.” 
I pointed. I was guessing. But I felt ninety-nine percent sure. 

“Are you sure?” Pat asked. He eyed me suspiciously. I could see he was a 
little worried. Pat didn’t like the outdoors as much as Nat and me. 

“Sure I’m sure,” I told him. 

I led the way. They followed close behind. They had both picked up 
walking sticks. After we had walked a few minutes, they started fighting a duel 
with them. 

I ignored them. I had my own worries. I wasn’t sure we were walking in the 
right direction. In fact, I felt totally turned around. 

“Hey—there’s the stream!” I cried happily. 

I immediately felt better. We weren’t lost. I had picked the right direction. 

Now all we had to do was follow the stream back to the clearing where we 
had set up camp. 

I began to hum again. The boys tossed their sticks into the stream. We 
began to jog along the grassy shore. 

“Whoa!” I cried out when my left boot started to sink. I nearly fell into a 
deep mud patch. I pulled my hiking boot up. Soaked in wet, brown mud up over 
the ankle. 

Pat and Nat thought that was a riot. They laughed and slapped each other 
high fives. 

I growled at them, but I didn’t waste any words. They’re both hopeless. So 
totally immature. 

Now I couldn’t wait to get back to camp and clean the thick mud off my 
boot. We jogged along the shore, then cut through the skinny, white-trunked 
trees and into the clearing. 

“Mom! Dad!” I called, hurrying over the grass. “We’re back!” 

I stopped so short, both boys tumbled into me. 

My eyes searched the clearing. 

“Mom? Dad?” 



They were gone. 



3 


“They left us!” Pat exclaimed. He ran frantically around the clearing. “Mom! 
Dad!” 

“Earth to Pat,” Nat called. He waved his hand in front of Pat’s face. “We’re 
in the wrong place, you wimp.” 

“Nat is right,” I replied, glancing around. There were no footprints, no tent 
markers. We were in a different clearing. 

“I thought you knew the way, Ginger,” Pat complained. “Didn’t they teach 
you anything at that nature camp?” 

Nature camp! Last summer my parents forced me to spend two weeks at an 
“Explore the Great Outdoors” camp. I got poison ivy the first day. After that, I 
didn’t listen to anything the counselors said. 

Now I wished I had. 

“We should have left markers on the trees,” I said, “to find our way back.” 

“Now you think of it?” Nat groaned, rolling his eyes. He picked up a long, 
crooked stick and waved it in my face. 

“Give me that,” I ordered. 

Nat handed me the stick. Yellow sap oozed onto my palm. It smelled sour. 

“Gross!” I shouted. I tossed the stick away. I rubbed my hands on my jeans. 
But the yellow stain wouldn’t come off my palm. 

That’s weird, I thought. I wondered what the stuff was. I definitely didn’t 
like it on my skin. 

“Let’s follow the stream,” I suggested. “Mom and Dad can’t be too far.” 

I tried to sound calm. But I was totally twisted around. In fact, I had no idea 
where we were. 

We headed out of the clearing and back to the shore. The sun fell lower in 
the sky. It prickled the back of my neck. 

Pat and Nat tossed pebbles into the water. After a few minutes, they tossed 
them at each other. 

I ignored them. At least they weren’t throwing anything at me. 

As we walked along, the air became cooler. The path grew narrower. 

The water turned dark and murky. Silvery-blue fish snapped at the air. The 
skinny branches of the tall trees reached down toward us. 



A feeling of dread swept over me. Nat and Pat grew quiet. They actually 
stopped picking on each other. 

“I don’t remember any of these bushes near our campsite,” Pat said 
nervously. He pointed to a short, squat plant. Its strange blue leaves looked like 
open umbrellas stacked one on top of the other. “Are you sure we’re going the 
right way?” 

By now I was sure we weren’t headed in the right direction. I didn’t 
remember those strange bushes, either. 

Then we heard a noise on the other side of the shrubs. 

“Maybe that’s Mom and Dad!” Pat exclaimed. 

We pushed our way through the plants. And ran into another deserted 
clearing. 

I glanced around. This grassy field was enormous. Large enough for a 
hundred tents. 

My heart hammered against my chest. 

We stood on rust-colored grass. It stuck up over my ankle. A clump of 
gigantic purple cabbage plants grew to our right. 

“This place is cool!” Nat cried. “Everything is so big.” 

To me, the clearing wasn’t cool at all. It gave me the creeps. 

Strange trees surrounded us on all sides. Their branches shot out at right 
angles to the trunk. They resembled stairs going up and up and up. Up into the 
clouds. 

They were the tallest trees I’d ever seen. And perfect for climbing. 

Red moss clung to the branches. Yellow gourds hung from braided vines, 
swaying in the air. 

Where were we? This looked like a weird jungle—not the woods! Why 
were all the trees and plants so strange? 

A knot formed in the pit of my stomach. 

Where was our clearing? Where were Mom and Dad? 

Nat jogged over to a tree. “I’m climbing up,” he said. 

“No, you don’t,” I protested. I rushed over and pulled his arm from the 
branch. 

The red moss rubbed against my palm. My skin turned red where I touched 
it. Now I had a yellow-and-red design on my hand. 

What’s going on here? I wondered. 

Before I could show my hand to my brothers, the tree started to shake. 



“Whoa! Watch out!” I cried. 

A small furry animal jumped out of the branches and landed at my feet. I 
had never seen anything like it before. It was the size of a chipmunk, brown all 
over except for a white patch around one eye. 

It had a bushy tail and floppy ears like a bunny. And two big front teeth like 
a beaver. Its flat nose twitched. It stared at me with gray eyes, round with fear. I 
watched it scurry away. 

“What was that?” Pat asked. 

I shrugged. I wondered what other kinds of weird creatures lived in these 
woods. 

“I’m kind of scared,” Pat admitted, huddling close to me. 

I felt scared too. But I knew I was the big sister. So I told him everything 
was okay. 

Then I glanced down. “Nat! Pat!” I shouted. “Look!” 

My muddy boot stood inside a footprint three times the size of mine. No— 
even bigger. What kind of animal had a footprint that huge? 

A bear? A giant gorilla? 

I didn’t have time to think about it. 

The ground started to tremble. 

“Do you feel that?” I asked my brothers. 

“It’s Dad!” Pat shouted. 

It definitely was not Dad. He’s a big guy. But no way could he make the 
ground shake that way! 

I heard grumbles and growls from somewhere in the distance. And then a 
roar. Twigs and branches snapped loudly in the air. 

All three of us gasped as a tall beast stomped through the trees. It was huge. 
So tall that its head touched the middle branches. 

It had a narrow, pointy head over a long neck. Its eyes shone like bright 
green marbles. Shaggy blue fur covered every part of its body. Its long, furry tail 
thumped heavily on the ground. 

The weirdest creature I’d ever seen in my life! 

The beast entered the far side of the clearing. 

I sucked in my breath as it drew closer. Close enough for me to see its long 
snout. Its nostrils flared in and out as it sniffed the air. 

My brothers hung back, hiding behind me. We huddled together. Trembling. 

The beast opened its mouth. Two rows of sharp, yellow teeth rose up from 



purple gums. One long, jagged fang slid down over the creature’s chin. 

I crouched on my hands and knees. Pulled my brothers down with me. 

The beast spun around in circles. It sniffed the air and wiggled its hairy, 
pointed ears. Had it smelled us? Was it searching for us? 

I couldn’t think. I couldn’t move. 

The beast turned its ugly head. It stared at me. 

It saw me. 



4 


My eyes on the creature, I grabbed my brothers by their T-shirts. I dragged them 
behind some of the huge cabbage plants. 

The beast stayed on the other side of the clearing, sniffing the air. It 
stomped back and forth, sniffing hard. The ground seemed to shake each time 
one of its furry paws hit the ground. I could feel Nat and Pat shiver with fear. 

The beast turned away from us. 

Whew! I thought. It hasn’t seen us. I bit my bottom lip and held onto Pat 
and Nat. 

“Argggh,” the beast grunted. It dropped to all fours. It pressed its snout to 
the ground and crept along, making loud snuffling noises. 

I didn’t tell Pat or Nat what I was thinking. The beast hadn’t seen us—but 
there was no way we could keep it from smelling us. 

Its long tail swished back and forth. The tail banged against the trees. 
Gourds fell to the ground. 

The beast crawled into the center of the clearing. Closer. 

I dug my fingernails into my palm. 

Turn around, beast, I prayed. Go back into the woods. The blue creature 
stopped. It sniffed again. And then it turned. It began to creep in our direction. 

I swallowed. Hard. My mouth suddenly felt so dry. 

The creature’s tail pushed against one of the cabbage plants near us. The 
leaves rustled. 

“Get down!” I whispered, shoving my brothers. We stretched out flat on the 
ground. 

The beast stopped a few feet from our hiding place. 

Its tail brushed my arm. The fur felt rough and scratchy. 

I jerked my arm away. Could he feel me? Was I like a tiny animal to him? 
One he could pick up and squeeze the way my brothers teased our dog? 

The beast rose up on its hind legs and sniffed. It towered over the cabbage 
plant. It had to be at least eight feet tall! 

It picked at its fur with a clawed thumb—and placed whatever it found in 
his mouth. 

A pleased grin formed under its twitching snout. It peered around the 



clearing. 

Don’t look down, I prayed. Don’t see us. 

My body tensed. 

The creature growled and ran its long tongue over its fang. Then it tromped 
off into the trees. 

I let out a sigh of relief. 

“We’d better wait a few minutes,” I told my brothers. I counted to one 
hundred. Then I crawled out from behind the plant. No sign of the creature. 

But then I felt the earth shake. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “Here it comes again!” 



5 


The beast’s enormous blue head bobbed up between the trees. How had it come 
back so fast? And from the other direction? 

We scrambled back to our hiding place behind the huge cabbage plant. 

“We have to get away from here,” I whispered. “If it keeps searching back 
and forth, it’s bound to find us.” 

“How do we get away?” Nat demanded. 

I picked up a gourd from the ground. “I’ll throw this gourd. The beast will 
turn its head to see what the noise is. Then we’ll run—in the other direction.” 

“But, what if it sees us? What if it chases us?” Nat asked. He didn’t seem 
happy about my plan. 

Nat and Pat exchanged nervous glances. 

“Yeah. What if it runs faster than us?” Pat demanded. 

“It won’t,” I said. I was bluffing. But my brothers didn’t know that. 

I peeked over the top of the cabbage. The creature stood closer than ever. It 
sniffed the air, its pink snout coiling like a snake. 

I glanced at the gourd in my hand, then brought my arm back, ready to 
throw. 

“Wait!” Pat whispered. “Look!” 

My arm froze where it was. Another beast had tromped into the clearing. 

And another. 

And another. 

I gulped. More blue beasts clomped into the clearing. 

No way could we make a run for it now. 

The enormous creatures tromped around the clearing. They growled and 
grunted to each other. 

One stopped and jabbered loudly in a deep and gravelly voice. The folds of 
hairless skin under its chin wobbled back and forth. 

“Look at them all!” Nat murmured. “There must be at least two dozen.” 

A small beast jogged into the clearing. Its fur shone a brighter blue than the 
rest. It stood only about three feet tall. 

Was it a child? A young beast? 



The tiny beast placed its short, pink snout on the ground and sniffed. Dirt 
and dried-up bits of leaves stuck to its snout. 

“It looks hungry,” Pat whispered. 

“Shhh!” I warned. 

The tiny beast glanced up eagerly. In our direction. 

It did look hungry. But for what? 

I held my breath. 

The small beast suddenly scooped a gourd off the ground. It shoved the 
whole thing into its mouth and crunched down. Yellow juice squirted between its 
lips and soaked down its shaggy blue fur. 

It eats fruit! I cheered silently. That was a good sign. Maybe they are 
vegetarians, I thought. Maybe they don’t eat meat. 

I knew that most wild animals ate only one type of food. Either meat, or 
else fruits and vegetables. 

Except for bears, I suddenly remembered. Bears will eat both. 

A large beast thudded over to the kid. It yanked the little creature to its feet 
and began jabbering angrily at it. It dragged the kid back toward the woods. 

The beast with the hairless folds of skin stepped into the center of the 
clearing. 

“Ghrughl” It snorted at the others. It waved a furry paw in a circle. It 
waved and grunted and jabbered. 

The other creatures nodded and grunted to one another. They seemed to 
understand each other. They seemed to be grunting some kind of language. 

The big beast gave a final grunt. The other creatures turned back toward the 
woods. They spread out and began to creep silently into the trees. I felt the earth 
trembling under the pounding of their feet. Twigs and leaves crackled and 
cracked. 

In a few seconds, they had vanished. The clearing stood empty. 

I let out another long sigh of relief. 

“What are they doing, anyway?” Pat asked. 

Nat wiped sweat off his forehead. “They act as if they’re searching for 
something,” he answered. “Hunting.” 

I swallowed hard. 

I knew what they were hunting for. 

They were hunting for us. 

And now there were so many of them. Spreading out in every direction. 



We don’t stand a chance, I realized. 
They’re going to catch us. 

And then what? 



6 


I stood up slowly. I turned in a full circle, checking everywhere for a sign of the 
hairy creatures. 

Their low grumbles and growls faded into the distance. The ground stopped 
shaking. 

A gust of cool wind blew through the clearing. It made the gourds in the 
trees knock against each other. An eerie melody whistled through the trees. 

I shuddered. 

“Let’s get out of here. Now!” Nat cried. 

“Wait!” I told him. I grabbed his arm and held him back. “Those beasts are 
too near. They’ll hear us or see us.” 

“Yeah, well, I’m not going to stick around. I’m going to run as hard as I 
can. I’m outta here!” 

“I’m with you.” Pat leaped to his feet. “But which way do we go?” he 
asked. 

“We can’t go anywhere now,” I argued. “We’re lost. We don’t know which 
way to go. So we have to stay right here. Mom and Dad will come find us. I 
know they will.” 

“And what if they don’t? What if they’re in trouble, too?” Nat asked. 

“Dad knows how to survive in the woods,” I said firmly. “And we don’t.” 

At least I didn’t. If only I had listened at that outdoors camp. 

“I do, too!” Pat whined. “I can take care of myself. Right Nat? Let’s get 
going!” 

Who was he kidding? Pat didn’t even like the woods. 

But he’s stubborn. When he gets an idea, no one can change his mind. And 
Nat always agrees with him. Twins! 

“Ginger—are you coming or not?” Pat demanded. 

“You’re crazy,” I told him. “We have to stay here. That’s the rule, 
remember?” 

Mom and Dad always told us, if we ever get lost, stay where we are. 

“But there are only two of Mom and Dad—and there’s three of us,” Pat 
argued. “So we should go find them.” 

“But they’re not the ones who are lost!” I cried. 



“I think we should go,” Pat repeated. “We have to get away from those ugly 
creatures!” 

“Okay,” I told them. “We’ll go. At least we’ll be together.” 

I still thought they were wrong. But I couldn’t let them go off without me. 
What if something horrible happened to them? 

Besides, I didn’t want to stay in these strange woods alone. 

As I turned to follow them, I glimpsed something move in the tall grass. 
“It’s... it’s... them!” Nat stammered. “They’re back!” 

I stared at the grass in horror. 

“Run!” Pat shrieked. He bolted across the clearing. 

A squirrel scurried out of the grass. 

“Pat, wait!” Nat yelled. 

“It’s only a squirrel!” I shouted. 

He didn’t hear us. 

Nat and I took off, chasing after Pat. 

“Pat! Hey—Pat!” 

I didn’t see the thick, twisted root that poked out of the ground. I tripped 
over it and hit the ground hard. I lay there stunned. 

Nat knelt down beside me. He grabbed my arm and helped me to my feet. 

I glanced up ahead. Pat had already vanished into the woods. I couldn’t see 
him anywhere. 

“We have to catch up to him,” I told Nat breathlessly. I straightened up, 
brushing dirt off my knees. 

The earth started to tremble again. 

“Oh, no!” Nat moaned. 

The creatures were back. 

I whirled around. Big blue beasts pushed back through the trees. I counted 
four behind us. Three on my left. Five to our right. 

I gave up counting. 

There were too many of them. 

The big one grunted and raised its furry paws high in the air. It pointed at 
us. The other creatures grunted and uttered cries of excitement. 

“They’ve caught us!” I groaned. 

“Ginger...” Nat whimpered. His eyes opened wide with terror. I clutched at 
his hand and held it tight. 

The beasts drew closer. And formed a circle around us. 



Nowhere to run now. 

“We’re trapped,” I whispered. 
The beasts began to growl. 



7 


Over the drone of their low growls, I heard the eerie melody whistling through 
the gourds again. 

Nat huddled close to me. “They’ve got us,” he whispered. “Do you think— 
do you think they got Pat?” 

I couldn’t answer. I couldn’t talk. 

I felt weak and helpless. Sweat ran down my face into my eyes. I wanted to 
wipe the sweat away, but I couldn’t lift my hand to do it. 

I was too scared to move. 

Then the beast with the flabby chin stepped forward. It stopped a few 
inches away from me. 

I slowly raised my eyes. I stared at its furry belly. Then its broad chest. I 
saw shiny, black insects crawling in its fur. 

I raised my eyes to its face. Its green eyes glared down at me. It opened its 
mouth. I stared helplessly at its long fang, chipped on the end. 

You don’t need a tooth like that for eating fruit ! I thought. 

The beast stretched to its full height. It raised a furry paw high above us. 
Ready to strike. 

Nat huddled closer to me. I could practically feel his heart beating through 
his T-shirt. Or maybe it was my own heart that was pounding. 

The creature growled and swung. 

I squeezed my eyes shut. 

I felt a slap on my shoulder—so hard it knocked me backwards. 

“You’re It!” the creature bellowed. 



8 


Huh? My mouth dropped open in astonishment. 

“You’re It,” the beast repeated. 

I gaped at Nat. His eyes bulged in surprise. 

“It... it talked!” Nat stammered to me. “In our language.” 

The creature scowled at Nat. “I talk in many languages,” he growled. “We 
have a universal language adaptor.” 

“Oh,” Nat said weakly. He and I exchanged stunned glances. 

The creature growled again and took a step closer to me. “Did you hear 
me?” he growled. “You’re It!” 

His marble eyes glared into mine. He tapped a paw impatiently on the 
ground. 

“What do you mean?” I asked. 

The creature grunted. “You’re the Beast from the East,” he said. 

“What are you talking about? I’m not a beast. I’m a girl!” I declared. 
“Ginger Wald.” 

“I am Fleg,” the beast replied, pounding himself on the chest. He waved a 
paw at the creature beside him, a beast with one eye missing. “This is Spork,” 
Fleg announced. Fleg pounded the other beast on the back. 

Spork grunted at Nat and me. I stared at his dark, empty eye socket. And I 
spotted a deep black scar on the side of Spork’s nose. 

An eye missing and a scar. The big creature had been in a pretty nasty fight. 
I hoped it wasn’t a fight with a human. Because if Spork was the winner, I would 
hate to see the loser! 

Nat gaped at Spork. 

“Uh, this is my brother Nat,” I said quickly. 

Spork growled in reply. 

“Have you seen our mom and dad?” I asked Fleg. “See, we’re all here 
camping, and we got separated. But we’re trying to get back together and go 
home. So, we’d better go—” 

“There are others?” Fleg glanced sharply around the clearing. “Where?” 

“That’s the problem,” Nat answered. “We can’t find them.” 



Fleg grunted. “If you can’t find them, they can’t play.” 

“Right. That’s the rule,” Spork agreed. He scratched at the insects that 
climbed around in his fur. 

“Now start moving,” Fleg demanded. “It’s getting late. And you’re It.” 

I stared at Nat. This was too weird. What did he mean —they can’t play ? 
And why did he keep saying I was It? Did they want to play tag or something? 

The circle of beasts began stomping their paws, shaking the forest ground. 
“Play... play...” they chanted. 

“Play what?” I demanded. “Is this really some kind of game?” 

Spork’s eye bulged and a big smile spread under his ugly, pink snout. “The 
best game,” he said. “But you are too slow to win.” 

Spork rubbed his paws together. He ran his tongue over the tops of his 
teeth. “You should run.” He grunted. 

“Yes, run,” Fleg ordered. “Before I count to trel.” 

“Hold on,” I protested. “What if we don’t want to play?” 

“Yeah—why should we?” Nat demanded. 

“You have to play,” Fleg replied. “Read that sign over there.” 

He pointed to a cardboard sign tacked to one of the gourd trees. The sign 
read: GAME IN SEASON. 

Fleg stared down at me. His eyes narrowed menacingly. His wet nose 
flared. 

He grinned. Not a friendly grin. 

“Game in season?” Nat read the sign in a trembling voice. 

“You have to tell us how to play,” I declared. “I mean, we can’t play a game 
without knowing what it is.” 

Spork growled deep in his throat and moved closer to me. So close I could 
smell his fur. What a sour stench! 

Fleg reached out a paw and held Spork back. 

“It’s a good game,” Fleg told us. “It’s very exciting.” 

“Uh... why is it so exciting?” I asked. 

His eyes narrowed. “It’s a game of survival !” he replied with a grin. 



9 


Survival? 

Oh, no! No way I wanted to play! 

“You have until the sun sinks behind the Gulla Willow,” Fleg declared. 
“What’s a Gulla Willow?” Nat asked. 

“And where is it?” I wanted to know. 

“At the edge of the woods,” Fleg replied. He waved a paw to the trees. 
“Which edge? Where? How will we know which tree?” I demanded. 

Fleg flashed Spork a grin. They both made weird choking sounds in their 
throats. 

I could tell they were laughing. All the other creatures started laughing, too. 
Such an ugly sound. More like gagging than laughing. 

“We can’t play the game unless we know more,” I shouted. 

The laughter stopped. 

Spork scratched the bugs on his chest. “It’s simple. If you’re It when the 
sun goes down, you lose,” he told me. 

The others grunted in agreement. 

“And what happens to the losers?” I asked in a trembling voice. 

“We nibble on them,” Fleg replied. 

“Excuse me?” I asked. “You nibble?” 

“Yes, we nibble on them. Until dinnertime. Then we eat them.” 



10 


The creatures around us exploded into more laughter. The sick gagging sound 
made me feel like puking. 

“It’s not funny!” Nat shrieked. 

Fleg narrowed his eyes at us. “It’s our favorite game.” 

“Well, I don’t like your game!” Nat cried. 

“We’re not going to play. We don’t want to,” I added. 

Spork’s eye lit up. “You mean you surrender? You give up?” He smacked 
his lips hungrily. 

“NO!” I shouted. Nat and I jumped back. “We’ll play. But by the rules. You 
have to tell us the rules. All of them.” 

A cloud rolled overhead. It cast a shadow over the clearing. I shivered. 

Were they going to attack us because we didn’t want to play? 

“Made in the Shade!” Spork cried suddenly. 

“Made in the Shade,” Fleg repeated. 

Huh? 

“What’s going on?” I demanded. 

The cloud slowly passed. 

“No time to explain,” Fleg said. He waved a paw at the other creatures. 
“Let’s go,” he insisted. “This time-out has been too long.” 

“This isn’t fair!” Nat protested. “Please. We need to know the rules.” 

“Okay,” Fleg said as he turned to go. “Gling—you must always attack from 
the east.” 

“The east,” I mumbled. I raised a hand to shade my eyes as I scanned the 
clearing. 

East. North. South. West. I pictured a map. East was to my right. West to 
my left. But which direction was east out here in the woods? Why hadn’t I 
listened at that outdoors camp? 

“Proo—the brown squares are Free Lunch squares,” Fleg continued. 

“You mean they’re for resting? They’re safe?” I asked. I liked that rule. 
Maybe we could find a brown square and stay there until sunset. 

Fleg snorted. 



“No. Free Lunch. It means anyone can eat you!” He glared down at me. 
“Rule Zee,” he announced. “You must be three feet tall to play.” 

I glanced at the beasts. They were at least ten feet tall! So much for Fleg’s 
rules. 

“Well, thanks for explaining,” I said, shaking my head. “But we really can’t 
play this game. We have to find our parents and—” 

“You must play,” Fleg growled. “You’re It. You’re the Beast from the East. 
Play—or surrender.” 

“The sun will be down soon,” Spork added, licking his fang. 

“You have until the sun goes down behind the Gulla Willow tree,” Fleg 
said. “Then, the Beast from the East is the loser.” 

Spork made a choking sound, his ugly laugh. “You will make a delicious 
loser. I’m thinking maybe a sweet-and-sour sauce. Or perhaps you’d go better 
with something a little more spicy.” 

The creatures all gagged and choked. They thought Spork was a riot. 

Fleg turned to the woods. He stopped. “Oh,” he added with an evil grin. 
“Good luck.” 

“Good luck,” Spork repeated. He poked a finger into his open eye socket 
and scratched inside it. Then he turned and lumbered after Fleg. 

The other creatures followed. The earth trembled under their heavy feet. In 
a few moments, the clearing stood empty again. 

I gaped at Nat. 

This wasn’t a game! These evil monsters searched the woods for lost kids. 
And then they— 

“What are we going to do?” Nat cried. “Maybe they already ate Pat. Maybe 
they found him on a brown Free Lunch square.” 

“And Mom and Dad, too,” I murmured. 

He let out a frightened gasp. 

“There has to be someplace safe!” I told him. “The way we use the porch at 
home when we play tag.” 

Nat swallowed nervously. “What’s safe here?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know,” I admitted. 

“We can call time-out,” Nat suggested. “You’re always allowed a time-out 
in every game.” 

“This is different. This is for our lives,” I said softly. 

The leaves rustled in the trees above us. The wind made the gourds whistle. 



I heard a low growl. Then a creature laughed. That ugly gagging sound. 
Twigs crackled. Bushes swayed. I heard low grunts. 

“We’d better start playing,” Nat urged. “They sound hungry.” 



11 


“How can we play?” I cried. “There’s no way we can win. There are too many of 
them. And we don’t even know where that Gulla tree is.” 

“So what?” Nat demanded. “We don’t have a choice—do we?” 

The leaves in a tree branch over our heads rustled. The branch started 
thrashing around. 

Thud. 

I shrieked and leaped back. 

Something small and brown hit the ground at my feet. 

One of those small, brown animals we had seen earlier. It rubbed up against 
my leg, and made a gurgling sound. 

“At least these little guys aren’t mean,” Nat said. He reached down to pet it. 

The animal snapped at Nat’s hand, clamping four rows of tiny, sharp teeth. 

“Whooa!” Nat jerked his hand away and leaped back. The animal scurried 
into the underbrush. 

Nat swallowed hard. “Weird,” he murmured. “What kind of forest is this? 
How come there aren’t any normal animals?” 

“Shhh!” I placed my finger over my lips and scowled. “Listen.” 

“I don’t hear anything,” Nat complained. 

“Exactly,” I answered. 

The grunts and growls and choking laughter had vanished. The woods were 
quiet. Really quiet. 

“Now’s our chance!” I cried. “Let’s run for it.” I grabbed his hand. 

“Wait!” Nat cried. “Which way?” 

I squinted around the clearing. “Back to the stream,” I declared. “We’ll try 
to follow it back to Mom and Dad. Maybe we’ll hear their voices along the 
water.” 

“Okay,” Nat agreed. 

We raced across the clearing. We plunged into the woods and pushed 
through the thick line of trees. 

I peered ahead into the forest. “This way!” I shouted, pointing to my left. 

“Why?” Nat asked. 



“Because,” I said impatiently. “I see light through the trees up ahead. That 
means the woods thin out. There were fewer trees near the stream, remember?” 

I hurried on. Nat followed. We ran silently for a while. The trees did begin 
to thin out. Soon, scraggly bushes dotted the ground. 

“There!” I stopped. Nat nearly crashed into me. “Up ahead.” 

“The stream!” Nat exclaimed. He slapped me a high five. 

Excited now. we began to run. We reached the water at about the same time. 

“Now what?” Nat asked. 

“Let’s head left again,” I suggested. “The sun was in our eyes when we 
started. So now we want it on our backs.” 

Yes! I thought. We were definitely headed back the way we came. All we 
had to do now was follow the stream back to the right clearing. Back to our 
parents. 

“Stay low,” I told Nat. “Try not to make any noise, just in case.” In case the 
beasts were following us. “And keep an eye out for Pat,” I added. 

I had no idea if Pat was still in the woods or not. I hoped he had made it 
back to our camp. But he could be anywhere. Maybe hiding someplace nearby, 
alone and scared. 

Thinking about how scared Pat might be made me feel braver. We had to 
stay calm so we could help Pat. 

Nat and I crouched down. We scooted along the stream, pushing through 
the umbrella bushes that grew close to the water’s edge. 

I could still see the silvery-blue fish circling below the surface of the water. 

Gazing at the fish, I stumbled. I grabbed at a leaf on an umbrella bush to 
steady myself. The leaf shredded in my hand. Blue sap smeared over my fingers. 

Not again! Another color. Yellow. Red. And now blue. “Ginger! Come 
here!” 

Nat’s cry startled me. I rushed to his side. 

Nat pointed to the ground. 

I glanced down, afraid of what I would see. 

“A footprint,” I said, frowning. Then I let out a loud whoop. 

Nat’s boot rested inside the footprint perfectly. It was exactly the same size 
as his. 

“Pat!” we said together. 

“He has been here!” Nat cried joyfully. 

“Yes!” I shouted. Pat had found his way back to the stream. 



“Maybe he already made it back to camp,” Nat said excitedly. “We can 
follow his footprints.” 

We started out eagerly. With each step I pictured Mom and Dad and Pat’s 
smiling faces when Nat and I showed up at camp. 

Pat’s footprints marched along the stream for a while. Then they veered into 
the woods. 

We followed them through the trees and found ourselves on a narrow path. 
The trees grew closer together here. 

Overhead, the sun disappeared from view. 

The air grew damp and cold. 

I heard a familiar growl. 

Right behind us. 

The ground shook. 

“Beasts!” I screamed. “Run!” 

I pushed Nat forward. We sprinted down the path. It curved to the right and 
then back to the left. I had no idea which direction we were going now. 

Branches of trees whipped our faces. I struggled to shove them aside. The 
trees swayed and shook above our heads. Gourds hit the ground all around us. 

Something warm and wet tangled itself around my arm. I yanked free. 
Another wet thing grabbed me. 

Vines. 

Thick yellow vines. 

Some draped over the branches of the trees, dangling onto the forest floor. 
Others sprouted from the tree trunks. They wrapped around each other, weaving 
thick nets from tree to tree. 

Some vines stretched across the path. Nat and I had to jump and twist, 
leaping over the vines in our way. 

It was hard work. I could hear Nat breathing hard. 

My side ached. My breath came in short, sharp bursts. 

I longed to rest. But we couldn’t rest. The ground was shaking under our 
feet. The woods echoed with thunderous cries. 

The beasts were coming. And they were gaining on us. 

“Watch out!” Nat warned. 

I spotted a tangled web of vines strung across the path. 

Nat jumped the web. He cleared it. I gathered myself and leaped. I jumped 

high. 



But not high enough. 

Vines wrapped around my ankles. I fell to the ground. 

More thick yellow vines twisted around my legs. Frantically, I grabbed at 
them and tried to pull them off. 

The vines tugged back. 

Hard. 

“Nat!” I shrieked. “Help!” 

“I’m stuck!” he cried. His voice cracked. “Help me, Ginger!” 

I couldn’t help him. I couldn’t move. 

I glanced down at my legs. The vines were tugging tighter and tighter. 
Another vine inched around my waist. 

I gaped down at it. 

What were those shiny things? 

Eyes? 

“Eyes!” I cried out. 

Vines don’t have eyes! 

And then I realized what I was staring at. 

The vines weren’t vines. 

They were snakes. 



12 


I screamed. 

“Ginger!” Nat cried behind me. “These aren’t vines. They’re—snakes!” 
“Tell me something I don’t know!” I groaned. 

The snake around my waist uncoiled and slithered onto my right arm. It was 
covered with thick scales that felt rough against my bare skin. 

I took a deep breath. Then I wrapped my left hand around the snake’s body. 
It was warm. 

I yanked hard. Tried to pull it off. 

No way. 

The snake coiled tighter around my arm. Its hard, cold eyes stared up at me. 
Its tongue flicked in and out. 

I felt something brush against my thigh. I glanced down. 

Another snake climbed up my body. 

Sweat ran down my forehead. 

“Ginger! Help!” Nat wailed. “They’re climbing all over me.” 

“M-me, too!” I stammered. I glanced at my brother. His eyes bulged in 
terror. He twisted and squirmed, trying to free himself. 

The snake around my thigh pulled back its head. And stared at me with 
those piercing eyes. 

The snake around my arm wound tighter and tighter—until my fingers 
turned numb. It hissed. A long, slow hiss. As if it had all the time in the world. 
“They’re going to attack!” Nat cried in a strangled voice. 

I didn’t answer. I felt a wiry tongue flick against my neck. 

Cold. 

Their tongues were cold. 

And prickly. 

I squeezed my eyes shut and held my breath. 

Don’t bite. Please don’t bite, I prayed. 

A growl disturbed the bushes around us. 

“Grrouggghl” 

Fleg jumped out of the bushes. He stared at Nat and me, his mouth open. 



I gasped. 

I saw Fleg’s eyes bulge in surprise as he spotted the snakes. “Double Snake 
Eyes!” he called out. 

My entire body trembling, I gaped at him in horror. 

Double Snake Eyes? 

Was that good—or bad? 



13 


“Congratulations! Double Snake Eyes!” Fleg cried. He shook his head in 
wonder. “And you said you never played this game before!” 

The snakes tightened around me. 

I stared at him. “What are you talking about?” I choked out. 

“Twenty points—that’s what I’m talking about.” The Huge beast grunted. 
“I’d better play harder. Or you’re going to win!” 

“Who cares about winning!” I screamed. “I can’t breathe! Get these snakes 

off!” 

Fleg grinned. “Off!” he screamed with laughter. The folds of skin under his 
jaw flapped up and down. “That’s a good one.” 

“We mean it,” Nat pleaded. “Get them off us!” 

Fleg seemed confused. “Why?” He asked. “They might bite you.” 

“We know!” I screamed. “Help us—please!” 

The snakes flicked their tongues against my cheek. My stomach lurched. 

Fleg grinned. “If they bite you, you could be awarded a Triple Hisser,” he 
explained. “Worth sixty points.” 

Points for getting bitten. Some game! 

“Forget the points!” I shrieked. “Get—them—off. Now!” 

Fleg shrugged. “Okay.” 

He stepped up to me. Then he pushed a claw under the snake that was 
coiled around my arm. “You need claws to do this right,” he bragged. 

Fleg scratched his claw along the snake’s skin. 

I could feel the snake loosen its grip. 

“They’re ticklish,” Fleg explained. He yanked the snake away and tossed it 
into the woods. 

He tickled the other snake, then pulled it from around my leg. Then he 
turned to Nat and repeated the same motions, tickling the snakes and prying 
them loose. 

When Fleg was done, he leaped toward the edge of the woods. 

I struggled to my feet and rubbed my arms and legs. My whole body itched 
and tingled. I knew I’d see those snakes in my dreams! 



Fleg stuck his furry head out from behind a tree. 

“You could have tagged me,” he called. “Too bad!” 

He opened his mouth in a gagging laugh. Then he plunged into the woods 
and disappeared. 

My mouth dropped open. I stared after him in disbelief. 

“Tag!” Nat cried. “Now I get it. It’s just like tag. The rules are easy, 
Ginger.” He turned to face me. “Touch one of the beasts, and you won’t be It 
anymore. You won’t be the Beast from the East!” 

Nat took off, running after Fleg. 

“Wait, Nat!” I started after him. I stepped on something hard. I heard a 
crunch. 

Another crunch. I glanced down. 

“Nat! Stop!” I screamed. I spotted an orange rock at my feet. I picked it up 
and hurled it after Nat. “Hey—stop!” 

I glanced down at my hand. Orange. My fingers had turned orange where 
they had grasped the rock. 

The rock smacked into a tree trunk. Nat stopped. Whirled around. “What 
did you do that for?” he cried. 

“To stop you,” I answered. 

“Listen, Ginger,” Nat urged. “You have to tag one of the beasts. It’s the only 
way to win the game. To stay alive.” 

“I don’t think so,” I said as calmly as I could. 

Nat scowled. “What’s your problem? It’s just like tag.” 

“No,” I said. “This is not just like tag. Not the game that we used to play.” 

I pointed at the ground. 

Nat stepped closer. He gazed down to where I was pointing. 

He gasped. “What is that?” he asked. 



14 


“Bones,” I murmured. “A pile of animal bones.” 

Nat and I stared. The bones gleamed coldly in the sunlight. Picked clean. 

“Notice anything else?” I pointed to the ground beside the bones. 

“What?” Nat frowned. 

“It’s brown,” I said. “The grass under the bones. It’s a square brown patch.” 

Free Lunch. 

Nat swallowed hard. 

“A beast ate it,” he murmured. “Whatever it was.” 

I wrapped my arms around my chest. “This is not like tag, Nat,” I told him 
solemnly. I couldn’t take my eyes off the poor animal’s bones. “This game is 
deadly.” 

“Only if we lose,” Nat said. “Ginger, we just saw Fleg. He helped us.” 

“So?” I asked. 

“So, we’ll make him help us again.” 

“How can we do that?” 

Nat grinned. “Easy. We’ll trick him. Pretend to need help. Pretend you have 
another snake on you or something.” 

“Right,” I replied, rolling my eyes. Like I was really going to let Fleg near 
me again. 

Nat grabbed my arm. “It’ll work. You scream for help. Fleg gets close. You 
jump out and tag him. Easy.” Nat snapped his fingers. 

I shook my head. “Forget it. I’m going to find the stream again and get out 
of here.” 

“Why are you so stubborn?” Nat cried. 

“Because I’m It!” I screamed. “I’m the one they’re going to eat!” 

“I-I know we can win if we try,” Nat stammered. 

I took a few deep breaths and tried to get rid of the panic in my chest. 

“Okay,” I said finally. “Okay. Okay. I’ll try it. What should I do?” 



15 


Nat beamed at me. “First I’ll climb a tree,” he said. “I can spot the beasts’ hiding 
places from up there.” 

I gazed up at the tall, leafy trees around us. 

I thought about it. All we needed was to tag one beast. Any beast. 

“Do it,” I told Nat. “But don’t stay up there too long.” 

Nat searched the woods for the best tree. “That one,” he said finally. 

The tree was tall. Dozens of sturdy branches sprang from its sides. In the 
center of each branch was a big, strong knot. Tiny golden leaves covered the 
branches. The tree looked strong, strong enough to hold Nat. 

“This is a cinch,” he assured me. “As easy as climbing a ladder. I’ll be able 
to see everything from up there.” 

I waited near the base of the tree. 

Nat placed his foot on the lowest branch and hoisted himself up. 

He climbed slowly. Steadily. 

“See anything yet?” I called anxiously. 

“I see a weird nest,” he shouted down. “With big eggs.” 

“What about the beasts?” I yelled. “Do you see them?” 

“Not yet.” Nat climbed higher. A few seconds later, he disappeared from 

view. 

“Nat! Can you hear me?” I called. I cupped my hands around my mouth. 
“Nat! Where are you? Answer me!” 

I rushed around the tree, peering up through the branches. I spotted Nat 
near the very top. 

Nat was moving carefully. He let go of one branch and pulled himself onto 
the next highest branch. The top of the tree swayed dangerously. 

I caught my breath. 

Maybe this wasn’t such a good idea. 

Not if I had to climb up and rescue him. 

“Nat!” My throat hurt from shouting so loud. “Be careful!” 

The trunk swayed back and forth. Slowly at first. Then faster. 

Bits of loose bark broke off and fell in slow spirals toward the ground. 



The thick branches swished back and forth. Each branch started to bend in 
the middle. 

At the knots. 

I stared. The branches reminded me of something. Something familiar. 

Arms, I thought. The knots were like elbows. And the branches were like 
big arms, reaching... 

I blinked. Was I seeing things? 

The branches were reaching. 

They were reaching for Nat. 

“Nat!” I screamed. 

High above me, I saw him grasp onto a slender branch. 

“Nat!” I ran frantically around the base of the tree, pounding my fists on the 
trunk. “Nat! Come down!” I yelled. “The tree is alive!” 



16 


Nat peered down at me from the top of the tree. “What’s wrong?” he called 
down. 

“Come down!” I screamed. “The branches—” 

I was too late. 

The upper branches grabbed at Nat’s arms. Pinned them to his side. I saw 
him gasp in shock. 

Other branches lashed out, slapping at him. 

Slapping him. Whipping him. 

“Ginger!” Nat screamed. “Help me!” 

What could I do? 

I gazed up in horror as two lower branches reached up toward Nat. The top 
branches passed him down to the lower branches. 

The branches wrapped around him, hugging tight. 

This isn’t happening! I told myself. This can’t be happening! 

Nat’s feet dangled in the air. He kicked furiously at the tree. “Let me go! 
Let me gooooo!” 

More branches lashed out. Some held him tight. Others swiped at him, 
slapping at him. 

The branches passed Nat down. 

They were carrying him lower, down to the center of the tree. 

Where the branches were the thickest. 

Where the tree’s arms were strongest. 

Nat cried out. He kicked out again and again. The branches wrapped around 
his legs. 

No way to climb up to him. Every branch was thrashing wildly. Even the 
little thin ones that couldn’t reach Nat were clawing upwards. Straining to take a 
swipe at him. 

As I watched helplessly, the thickest branches pulled Nat into the center. 

He disappeared. 

“Help!” His muffled cry drifted down to me. “Ginger—it’s going to 
swallow me!” 



I had to do something. Had to pull him away somehow. Had to free him 
from the living tree. 

But how? 

We had gotten rid of the snakes. We had to get rid of the branches, too. If 
only... 

That’s it! 

I had a crazy idea. But maybe, just maybe it would work. 

If the tree is alive, maybe it has feelings, I thought. 

And if it has feelings, maybe it’s ticklish—just as the snakes were! 

“Ginger! Help!” Nat’s cries grew weaker. 

I knew I didn’t have much time. 

I leaped at the tree. A branch dipped down and slapped at me. 

I jumped back and scrambled around the trunk. I ducked as a thick branch 
swung at me. 

The tree was trying to keep me away while it swallowed up my brother. But 
I ducked beneath the slapping limbs and branches. 

Reached out. And began to tickle the rough bark. 

Tickled it with one hand. Then with both. 

Was that a shiver? Did the tree actually shiver? 

Or did I imagine it? 

Please! I silently begged. Please, please, let go of my brother. 

I tickled furiously with both hands. “Nat!” I called. “Nat! Can you hear 
me?” 

Silence. 

“Nat? Nat?” 

No answer. 



17 


I didn’t give up. I tickled harder. 

The trunk started to jiggle. 

Bunches of leaves shook free and floated down. They landed in my hair and 
covered my arms as I jabbed and scratched at the tree tmnk. 

I tickled harder. The branches shook and swayed. The trunk wriggled. 

Yes! I thought excitedly. It’s working! I think it is ticklish! 

I’ll make this tree collapse with laughter! 

I tickled harder. The trunk squirmed under my fingertips. 

I glanced up. Nat’s boots poked through the leaves. 

Then his legs. His arms. His face. 

The branches were shaking. Quivering and shaking. 

Nat swung free. He leaped from branch to branch. His tree-climbing skills 
were finally coming in handy! 

“Hurry!” I shouted up to him. “I can’t keep this up much longer. Jump!” 

Nat wriggled down the tree trunk. 

“Here goes!” Nat cried. He let go of the trunk and leaped into the air. 

He landed in a crouched position at my feet. “Whoa! Good job, Ginger!” 

I grabbed his hand and we hurtled away from the tree. 

Nat brushed twigs and leaves from his hair. “I saw some beasts!” 

I bit my lip. In all the excitement over the living tree, I had forgotten we 
were playing a deadly game. 

“I saw three of them,” Nat reported. “Fleg, Spork, and another one with a 
smashed tail. That way.” He pointed to the right. 

“What were they doing?” I asked. 

“They are all hiding behind a big, gray boulder. You can sneak up on them, 
easy.” 

“Right.” I rolled my eyes. “Piece of cake.” 

“You can do it.” Nat’s dark eyes locked on mine. “I know you can, Ginger.” 

Nat led the way. We crept slowly through the woods toward the boulder. 

The sky dimmed overhead and the air grew cooler. I knew that it was nearly 
evening. Soon the sun would disappear behind the Gulla Willow tree. 



I hoped I had enough time. 

“There’s the rock!” Nat whispered. 

I saw a small clearing in the trees. In the middle of the clearing a craggy, 
gray boulder rose up from the flat ground. 

It was big enough to hide a dozen beasts. 

My heartbeat quickened. 

“I’ll hide behind this cabbage plant,” Nat said. 

He ducked behind the plant. I followed. I wasn’t quite ready to face the 
beasts alone. 

I bent down and tightened my bootlace, trying to ignore the fluttering in my 
stomach. 

“Just sneak up on them,” Nat whispered. 

“Come with me,” I begged. 

Nat shook his head. “Too noisy if we both go,” he said. “It’s safer if you go 
alone.” 

I knew he was right. 

Besides, I told myself, it was pretty easy. The beasts behind the big rock 
had no idea I was coming. All I had to do was tag one of them. 

I felt a thrill of excitement. I could do it. 

And the game would be over. We’d be safe. 

I took a deep breath. “Ready or not, here I come,” I whispered. 

I crept toward the boulder. I glanced back. Nat poked his head from behind 
the cabbage and flashed me a thumbs-up sign. 

A few more steps and I’d be at the rock. I held my breath. 

The gray rock rose up in front of me. 

I reached out. My fingers were trembling with excitement. I leaped behind 
the rock. “Gotcha,” I cried. “You’re It!” 



18 


“Huh?” 

My hand swiped empty air. 

They were gone! 

No beasts. Only a pile of broken gourds scattered over the ground. 

I blinked in surprise. And scrambled to the front of the rock. 

No beasts. They had moved on. 

“Nat!” I called. “Nat!” 

My brother came jogging to the boulder. “What happened?” 

“Nothing happened. They’re gone,” I told him. “Now what?” 

“Hey,” Nat snapped. “It’s not my fault.” 

I stared at him, feeling totally disappointed. And afraid. 

A sharp gust of wind kicked up. I glanced at the sky. Shades of pink 
streaked overhead. The sun was setting. 

My chest tightened in despair. 

“It’s hopeless,” I muttered. 

Nat shook his head. “Do you know what we need?” he asked. 

“No. What?” I replied. 

“We need another plan.” 

I had to laugh. Nat was such a jerk! 

He leaned against the boulder and wrinkled his nose. “What kind of rock is 
this anyway?” he asked. 

“A creepy one,” I answered. 

Nat peered at the huge rock. “Something’s growing on it,” he said. 

“Well, don’t touch anything,” I warned. 

But telling Nat not to do something only makes him want to do it more. 

Nat stuck his finger into a hole in the boulder. 

The big rock trembled. 

A crack appeared at its top and spread quickly. 

Nat pulled his finger away. 

“What’s happening?” I yelled. 

A cloud of gray smoke shot up from inside the boulder. 



KERPLOOM! 

Nat and I ducked, clapping our hands over our ears. 

The explosion roared like a million firecrackers going off at once. 

More gray smoke billowed out of the boulder. 

I could barely see Nat. I started to cough. My eyes burned. 

The smoke filled the clearing around us and drifted above the treetops. A 
few seconds later, it faded away. 

And I saw Fleg standing in the clearing. 

Spork appeared behind him, scratching at his open eye socket. 

Another beast followed. And then another. They stared at Nat and me. 

“You touched the Penalty Rock!” Fleg cried. 

Nat took a step closer to me. “Huh?” 

Fleg nodded to the beast with the smashed tail. “Get him, Gleeb,” Fleg 
growled. 

Gleeb’s snout tensed. His eyes bulged. He reached out for Nat’s arm. 

“Wait! Stop,” I yelled. “Nat didn’t know it was a penalty.” 

“No fair! No fair!” Nat cried. 

The beasts ignored us. 

Gleeb scooped Nat up and lifted him high in the air. “Let’s go,” Gleeb 
gmnted. 

Gleeb balanced Nat on both paws. Then he pretended to drop him. 

Nat shrieked. 

Gleeb and the other beasts snorted their ugly laughter, clapping their hairy 
paws together. 

“Stop it!” I screamed. “Let him go!” 

“Yes, go,” the beasts echoed. They clapped their paws again. “Let’s go! 
Let’s go!” they chanted. 

I glared at Fleg. “Tell him to put my brother down.” 

“He touched the Penalty Rock,” Fleg explained. “He must have his 
penalty.” 

“But we didn’t know about it!” I protested. “We don’t know any of your 
dumb rules. That isn’t fair.” 

I tried to grab Nat’s dangling legs. 

“Let me see your hand,” Fleg demanded. He snatched at my arm and lifted 
my hand up to his eyes. He studied my palm. 

“Nubloff colors!” he exclaimed. He studied me. “That’s fifty points. You 



can’t trick me. You’ve played this game before. You already know the rules.” 

I stared at my hand. Yellow sap from the stick. Blue from the leaf of the 
umbrella plant. Orange from the rock. Nubloff colors? 

“But... but...” I stammered. “I didn’t get these colors on purpose. They just 
happened.” 

Fleg and Spork exchanged glances. 

“Come,” Fleg ordered, waving to Gleeb. 

Gleeb tossed Nat over his shoulder and followed Fleg to the woods. The 
others stomped after them. 

“Ginger!” Nat wailed as the beast carried him away. 

I ran after them, feeling totally helpless. 

“Stop! Where are you taking him?” I shrieked. “What are you going to do 
to him?” 



19 


I chased after them. Down a wide path lined with more giant rocks. 

More penalty boulders? 

I stayed in the center of the path, afraid to touch them. 

The beasts stopped at the entrance to a tunnel. It was carved into the side of 
the largest rock I had seen. They ducked their heads and hurried inside. 

I followed behind, my heart pounding. 

“Ginger!” Nat’s cry echoed off the tunnel walls. 

The beasts growled and grunted, jabbering in excitement. Some pounded 
their paws on the ceiling as they moved. 

Everything shook. The walls. The ceiling. The ground. 

“Nat!” I cried. I couldn’t hear my own voice over the noise. 

I followed the beasts out of the tunnel and into another large clearing. 

“What’s that?” I gasped. 

In the center of the clearing, a large wooden box hung from a tree. It looked 
like an enormous bird house. I saw a tiny door on one side. 

A sign above the door read: PENALTY CAGE. 

Gleeb raised Nat high in the air. He held him up for all the beasts to see and 
spun him around and around. 

Nat screamed. 

Spork and the other beasts stomped and clapped. 

“NO!” I shouted. “You can’t do this!” 

“He must go in the box,” Fleg declared. “He touched the Penalty Rock. It’s 
in the rules.” 

Gleeb tossed Nat inside the Penalty Cage. He slammed the door. Fleg 
dropped a large twig into the rough wooden latch to lock the door. 

Nat reached through the slats. “Ginger,” he cried. “Get me out of here.” The 
penalty box swung in the air. 

“Don’t worry, Nat,” I called. “I’ll get you out.” I shivered. He seemed so 
small and helpless. 

“You can’t keep him in there forever,” I told Fleg. “When does he get out?” 

“When we eat him,” Fleg replied softly. 



20 


“But I’m the Beast from the East!” I protested. “You said you would eat me.” I 
took a step closer to him. 

“Players in the Penalty Cage get eaten, too.” Fleg snorted in disgust. “Don’t 
pretend you forgot. Everyone knows that. It’s a basic rule.” 

“There must be another way to get him out,” I said, edging closer. 

“Only if he eats a Free Escape Tarantula,” Fleg explained. He scratched the 
flab under his chin. 

“Huh? He has to eat a tarantula?” I demanded, taking another step toward 
the beast. 

Fleg narrowed his eyes. “Don’t pretend you don’t know that,” he said, 
beginning to turn away. 

I hurled myself at Fleg’s hairy chest. 

I slapped him hard. 

“You’re It!” I screamed. I lifted both fists in triumph. “You’re It! I tagged 
you!” 

Fleg raised an eyebrow. “Sorry,” he said calmly. “I paused the game. It 
doesn’t count.” 

“No!” I shrieked. “You can’t! You can’t keep changing the rules!” 

“I didn’t. Rules are rules.” Fleg reached over me and checked the lock on 
Nat’s cage. It held fast. 

“Try again,” Spork grunted. “You can always try again.” 

The rest of the beasts nodded in agreement, grinning and snorting in 
excitement. They were enjoying themselves. They rumbled away from the 
clearing. 

“Ginger!” Nat cried. He pounded on the box. “Get me out of here!” 

I gazed at him in despair. No way could I reach him up there. 

He stared down at me through the slats. His brown hair fell into his eyes. 
“Do something,” he pleaded. 

“I’ll try again,” I said. 

It was the only thing to do. 

“Can you see them?” I called up to him. “Which way did they go?” 



Nat pointed. “I see a few beasts hiding over there.” 

“I’ll be back,” I promised. “After I tag one of them.” 

I tried to sound as if it was a sure thing. I wished I could believe my own 
words. 

“Hurry!” Nat called after me. 

A strong wind blew through the clearing, rocking the cage from side to side. 
Nat hunched down, hugging his knees. 

I gave him one last look and took off. 

Long shadows fell across the ground. I gazed at the sky. The orange was 
turning into deep pink. Almost sundown. 

I plunged into the darkening woods. 

All around me I could hear small animals skittering through the carpet of 
leaves on the forest floor. As if hurrying home before sunset. 

Home. Where they were safe. 

The wind howled loudly through the trees. I stumbled and almost fell over a 
rotted tree stump. 

The woods were closing in on me. Time was closing in on me. 

And then I saw a beast hiding behind an umbrella bush. His shoulders 
slumped forward. His head bobbed gently up and down. 

He was sound asleep. 

Here’s my chance, I thought. 

I moved slowly toward him. The beast shifted position. 

I stopped. Held my breath. 

He quieted down again. He must have moved in his sleep. 

This is it, I thought. My chance. In a second, he’ll be the Beast from the 

East. 

I rushed forward. 

And gasped. 

The earth dropped away. 

Nothing under me. 

Nothing but air. 

I fell quickly. Sank straight down. 

Down... down... down... 

Screaming all the way. 



21 


I hit solid ground. 

Hard. 

The air burst from my lungs. 

My shoulder jammed against a sharp rock. 

I cried out. Rubbed my arm. 

Struggling to catch my breath, I pulled myself up and stared around me. 

Too dark. I couldn’t see a thing. 

It’s over, I thought. The game is over. 

“Hey—is anyone up there?” I called. “Can anyone hear me?” 

I stopped and listened for an answer. Any answer. 

Silence. 

I forced myself to my feet. My shoulder ached. I rolled it back and forth a 
couple of times to keep it from getting stiff. 

I reached out and patted the walls around me. Solid dirt. I was in some sort 
of deep pit. The kind people dig to trap animals. 

Now I was the trapped animal. 

I ran my hands quickly over the walls. Maybe I could find something to 
hold onto. Some way to climb out. 

Yuck! What was that? 

My hand touched something cold sticking out of the side of the pit. 

I clenched my teeth and forced myself to touch it again. It stayed firm under 
my fingers. A root, I thought excitedly. 

It’s not alive. 

I ran my hand further up the wall. The roots were everywhere. As high up 
as I could feel. Perfect! 

I raised my foot and stepped onto the lowest root. It held. 

Footholds! I could climb out of the pit. 

My hands grabbed the highest root I could reach. I pulled myself up. I heard 
a crumbling of loose dirt. 

I pressed myself against the wall as more dirt sifted down the side of the pit, 
spraying my face. 



I squeezed my eyes shut. Waited for the dirt to stop falling. Then I found 
the next root and began climbing again. 

How much time did I have left? How much time before the sun went down? 
My shoulder ached. But I had a long way to go. I rested briefly against the 
wall. Then I continued climbing. 

Snap! 

The root shattered under my right foot. My leg dangled in the air. 

Snap! 

The root under my right hand popped loose. 

“Hey!” I cried out as I felt myself fall. 

I landed hard on the floor of the pit. I lay still for a moment, trying to catch 
my breath. 

I gazed up. A last bit of pink sky glowed over the mouth of the pit. 

In the fading light, I looked around. I saw the useless roots on the sides of 
the deep hole. I glanced down. 

Oh, no. 

There was just enough sunlight to see the ground beneath me. 

It was brown. 

And square. 

A Free Lunch square. 

I was trapped. Trapped on a Free Lunch square. The beasts could eat me— 
anytime they wanted. 

I froze in panic. And heard rumbling footsteps above me. 

I huddled in a corner of the pit. Pressed my back against the dirt. 

“This way!” I heard Fleg shout. “She’s down here!” 



22 


Fleg appeared in the opening above me. His flabby chin hung down. His eyes 
locked onto mine. 

“Found you!” he cried. 

Spork slid next to Fleg. He grinned down at me and drooled yellow drool. It 
splattered beside my boot. 

“Something down there smells delicious!” Spork cried. “I’m soooo 
hungry!” 

Gleeb shoved his furry face between Fleg’s and Spork’s. 

He smacked his lips. I heard his stomach growl. 

“Finally!” Spork grunted. “Pull her out! Let’s eat!” 

I covered my face with my hands. “Please. Don’t hurt me,” I cried. “I 
haven’t done anything to you.” 

Fleg shrugged. “You play the game. Sometimes you win. Sometimes you 
lose.” 

Spork and Gleeb reached down into the pit. Their big paws swiped at me. 

I pressed my back tighter against the wall. “Please,” I begged. “Please go 
away and leave me alone. You win, okay? You can have all my points.” 

“Points can’t be given away,” Fleg scolded. “You know that.” 

The others grunted in agreement. They reached down for me. 

My eyes searched the pit. 

I needed a weapon. 

The roots? 

I yanked a fat one out of the dirt. 

“Stay back!” I shouted, whipping the root at their paws. 

The beasts slapped each other on the back and laughed their ugly laugh. 
“You’ll be sorry,” I threatened. 

Who was I kidding? This stupid root couldn’t hurt them. And they knew it. 
I was the Beast from the East. I was dinner. 

Fleg leaned into the pit and snarled. His claws were only inches from my 

face. 


I ducked. 



His paw brushed against the back of my neck. I felt claws scratch my skin. 

I jerked away. The hair on my arms stood straight up. 

If only I could burrow into the earth like an animal, I thought. 

Fleg’s paw swiped the air in front of my face. 

“Stop ducking away,” he shouted. “You’re just making me hungrier.” 

“This isn’t fair!” I screamed. 

He turned to Spork and Gleeb. “I’m tired of this,” he complained. “Enough 
stalling.” 

His round eyes gleamed down hungrily at me. 

“Get her!” he bellowed. 

Spork leaned down and grabbed my arm. I felt his claws dig into my skin. 
He pulled me up and yanked me to my feet. 

It’s all over, I thought sadly. The game is over. 



23 


A cloud passed overhead, throwing the pit into deep shadow. 

Fleg howled. He slapped his broad forehead. “Made in the Shade!” he 
cried. 

Spork opened his paw and let go of my arm. 

I dropped to the ground. Fell to my knees. 

“Made in the Shade!” Spork cried. 

“Made in the Shade!” Gleeb echoed. 

I climbed to my feet. The angry voices of the beasts made my head throb. 

They stomped their feet loudly. 

“What’s going on?” I demanded. 

“You’re safe,” Spork replied, sneering in disgust. “This time.” 

Safe? I breathed a sigh of relief. 

“But... why?” I asked, amazed. 

“You’re Made in the Shade,” Fleg explained. 

“We can’t touch you. It’s a free pass. But you can only use it once.” 

Once was enough, I hoped. I didn’t plan to play this game forever. 

“We have to let you go this time,” Fleg growled. “But you’re still the Beast 
from the East.” 

“You still have to tag someone before sundown,” Spork agreed. 

Gleeb sighed. The three beasts turned to the woods. “We’ll go now,” Fleg 
announced. 

“Wait!” I scrambled to my feet. “How do I get out of here? How can I tag 
someone if I’m stuck in this pit?” 

Fleg rolled his eyes. He reached down and pressed one paw against a purple 
rock on the ground near the edge of the pit. 

The pit floor creaked and groaned. 

Then it rose up. Higher and higher. 

Finally it jerked to a halt a few feet below the ground. 

I was close enough to stare at the beasts’ ankles. I could see shiny black 
bugs crawling in their fur. I swallowed nervously. Was this some kind of trick? 
Or was I really safe? 



“I still need help to climb out of here,” I told Fleg. 

Fleg pounded on the purple rock again. 

The floor started moving. This time it stopped level with the ground. 

I hopped off the Free Lunch square. The beasts circled me. 

“The sun is almost down,” Fleg warned. “The game is almost over.” 

“You don’t have much time,” Spork added. 

Fleg snorted. Then he turned and lumbered away. 

“Good luck,” Spork cried as he hurried after Fleg. Gleeb followed. They 
raced back toward the stone tunnel. 

“Wait!” I yelled. I ran after them as fast as I could. 

I raced into the rock tunnel. I could hear the beasts up ahead of me. They 
growled and grunted, scraping their claws across the walls and ceiling again. 
Making a racket. 

I saw them burst through the other side of the tunnel. They split up, running 
in different directions. 

Which way should I go? I knew I couldn’t waste time. 

I followed Fleg. 

He wove in and out between the trees. He leaped over some scraggly 
bushes. 

I panted, straining to keep up. 

Fleg picked up the pace. 

Faster and faster. 

I could barely keep up now. I was gasping for air. 

“Wait!” I shouted desperately. “Wait!” 

Fleg glanced once over his shoulder. He disappeared into the trees. I 
stopped running after him. 

Overhead, the sky turned to purple. Soon it would be completely dark. 

I spun around, searching desperately for a beast to tag. 

“Yoo-hoo! Over here!” I heard a call. 

I whirled around. 

Spork. He waved to me from between two tall trees. 

I raced toward him. 

Spork lumbered down a twisting path. I followed him. 

What else could I do? 

Suddenly, my foot caught on a rock. I sprawled into the dirt. 



I forced myself to get up. The woods were quiet around me. 

No beasts. 

I wanted to scream! So I did. 

“Fleg! Spork! Gleeb! Where are you?” I shouted. How could I tag them? I 
couldn’t even find them. 

My eyes scanned the area. 

What was that? I squinted harder. 

Yes! A blue furry head! It popped up behind a bush. 

My last chance. 

I gathered my energy and sprinted toward the bush. My hand reached out. 
“Tag!” I yelled. “You’re—” 



24 


“Gurraughl” The tiny beast pawed the air. 

The baby beast! The only beast under three feet tall. Too short to play the 
game. 

No fair! I thought. 

My hopes were crushed. Again. 

I picked up a rock and heaved it angrily into the woods. 

“Where is everyone?” I screamed. “Come out and play!” 

The little beast patted its claws together and gurgled happily. 

I stared at it. Why was it here all alone? 

Then it hit me. Of course. 

There must be another beast nearby. A grownup beast to watch the kid. One 
over three feet tall. 

One I could tag. 

I checked out the area. Trees and large rocks. I would have to search behind 
every one of them. 

Taking a deep breath, I tiptoed silently through the trees. Stopped to peer 
behind each rock. 

Crunch. My foot cracked a pile of twigs. 

I stood completely still. And waited. 

Silence. 

I moved forward. 

I listened carefully. 

Silence. 

I crept forward. A beast had to be here somewhere. 

But where? 

Then I heard a noise. 

Mumbling. 

I crept behind a bush and inched closer to the sound. It came from behind a 
tall, jagged rock. 

I peeked out. 

Spork! 



Yes! Spork stood behind the rock, talking to himself. He scratched the 
lumpy scar on his nose. 

I could easily tag him. 

But was this another penalty rock? 

Would it go up in smoke? 

I didn’t want to end up in a cage dangling above the ground. 

Like Nat. Poor Nat. 

I took another deep breath and inched closer to Spork. 

Spork turned and searched the woods behind him. “Little beast,” he called 
out. “Is that you?” 

I dropped to the ground and waited. 

My heart pounded in my ears. I forced myself to stay quiet. 

Spork didn’t move from his spot. He sighed and started mumbling again. 
Three more steps and I could tag him. 

Two more. 

I wiped my forehead. One more. 

It was too good to be true. Spork had no idea I was behind him. 

I smacked him hard. “You’re It!” I shrieked. 

Spork gasped in surprise. His big paws shot up into the air. I thought he was 
about to faint! 

“I’ve done it! I’ve done it!” I cried happily. 

I was free! 

Nat was free! 

Spork grunted and raised himself up. He towered over me. He didn’t seem 
the least bit upset. But he had just lost the game. 

“You’re It!” I repeated. “You’re the Beast from the East!” 

Spork raised a paw lazily and scratched his open eye socket. 

I felt a chill of fear. What if Spork refused to obey the rules? 

“Sorry,” Spork said softly. “Not this time.” 

“Hey—!” I shouted angrily. “You have to obey the rules! I tagged you, fair 
and square!” 

Spork stared at me as if I were being very funny. Something was wrong. 
But what? What was it? Why didn’t he say something? Spork’s lips curled into a 
nasty grin. 



25 


“You tagged me from the west,” Spork whispered. “It doesn’t count.” 

I could feel the blood msh to my face. “No fair! I tagged you! I tagged 
you!” I wailed. 

Spork shrugged. 

“You have to tag me from the east. Remember?” Spork’s little eyes nearly 
disappeared as his face crumpled in laughter. “You’re still the Beast from the 
East!” 

I groaned. 

How could I have forgotten? That was the most important rule of all. 

How was I supposed to know which way was east? I couldn’t even see the 
sun anymore! 

My head throbbed. My whole body ached. I was sore and hungry. 

Spork stood there, shaking with silent laughter. 

I glanced at the darkening sky. 

Wait a minute! 

I climbed up on the boulder. The sun was setting behind me. That was the 
west. In front of me was east. 

I studied Spork. Without Fleg around, the big beast seemed less menacing. 
Harmless almost. 

After all, he was supposed to be baby-sitting. And what had happened? 
He’d lost the little beast. 

And now he was so busy laughing at my mistake, he had practically 
forgotten about me. 

“Hey, Spork,” I called. “Do you want to play one of my games now?” 

“But we’re still playing this one.” Spork blinked in surprise. 

“I’ll pause it. It’s kind of boring anyway, isn’t it?” I asked. “My game is lots 
more fun.” 

Spork scratched the hole where his eye used to be. He pulled a big, black 
bug out of it, and tossed the bug away. “What’s your game called?” 

“Freeze Frame,” I answered quickly. 

Nat and Pat loved to play this game. 



“We spin around and when I say stop, we freeze—and see if one of us can 
keep our balance and not fall over.” 

“Sounds fun,” Spork agreed. “Why not?” 

“Okay then,” I said. “Let’s try it. Spin!” I shouted. 

We both started to spin. 

I peeked at Spork. His arms swung out as he whirled around. 

“Faster!” I called out. “Much faster.” 

Spork whirled faster and faster as he turned around in circles. 

His tail swished against the bushes. I jumped out of the way. 

Spork started to wobble. 

“Game— unpausedl” I shouted. 

Spork didn’t seem to hear me. He teetered and stumbled into a tree. 
“Freeze!” I shouted. 

Spork froze in place. 

I leaped at him and tagged him. Hard. 

From the east. 

“You’re It!” I shouted. I backed away. “I tagged you from the east! This 
time you’re really It!” 

Spork placed both paws against his head and closed his eyes. I could tell he 
was still dizzy. He spread his legs and balanced himself against the tree. 

He bopped himself in the face with his paw. “You did it,” he agreed. He ran 
his bumpy tongue over his lips. He exhaled a deep breath. “I’m It,” he admitted. 
“Yes. Yes. Yes!” I cried. I jumped up in excitement. 

Spork plopped down against the boulder. 

“I’m free!” I shrieked. “The game is over.” I clenched my hand into a fist 
and pumped my arm. 

“I’m going to rescue Nat,” I said. “Which way is he?” 

Spork pointed his clawed finger to my right. 

“We’re outta here!” I shouted. 

I’d never been so happy in all my life. 

“Well, Spork old pal,” I said, beaming at him. “This is good-bye. See you!” 
“Not so quick,” Spork said. “I’m afraid you can’t leave.” 



26 


“Forget it,” I said. “You can’t change the rules again! No way.” 

“You can’t leave,” he repeated. “The game continues until sunset.” He 
glared at me stubbornly. 

I gazed at the sky. The purple was fading to gray. Not much time left. But 
enough. 

I wasn’t going to be It again. 

I could hide until dark. But where? 

“Don’t just stand there,” Spork warned. “You could be tagged again.” 
“Never,” I insisted. “I won’t let that happen.” 

Before I could move, Fleg stomped from behind a tree. The flabby skin 
under his chin swung from side to side. 

Gleeb crept behind him. 

“She tagged me!” Spork told them. 

“I knew it!” Fleg stared at me. “I knew you played this game before.” 

I balled my hands into fists. I was angry. I’d had enough. 

They forced me to play their stupid game. But I wasn’t going to lose now. 
Fleg waved me away. “You have until I count to trel,” he said. “Then we’re 
allowed to come after you again.” 

He turned his back and covered his eyes. “Gling... proo... zee... freen... 
trel,” he counted. 

I had no choice. I ran. 

Don’t stop, I told myself. Don’t think about anything. Run. Find a place to 

hide. 

“Ready or not—here we come!” I heard Fleg cry. 

Behind me, the beasts growled and grunted in excitement. 

I hurled myself off the path and pushed through the tall, scratchy grass 
between the trees. I jumped over a clump of cabbage plants. 

My legs ached. My feet burned. 

But I couldn’t stop. 

Not until I reached a hiding place. 

I skidded to a stop when I heard rushing water. I nearly fell into the stream. 



A large blue fish leaped out of the water and snapped at my ankles. 

This was no place to hide. I turned back into the woods. 

A cold wind blew in my face. The gourds whistled their strange melody. 

“Here I come!” Spork shouted off to my left. 

I pushed myself faster. No way he was going to tag me. 

I glanced around. Which way? 

The rock tunnel! I saw it only a few feet away. 

I darted into the darkness. Without the beasts yelling and shouting, it was 
eerily quiet inside. I slowed down and tiptoed through the tunnel. 

When I reached the other side, I crept into the dense trees. I slumped 
against a tree and waited, trying to keep quiet. I was breathing so hard I was 
afraid the beasts could hear me! 

A moment passed. 

I felt the trembling that meant the beasts were approaching. 

I held my breath and ducked beneath an umbrella plant. 

Seconds later, Fleg, Spork, and Gleeb burst out of the tunnel and raced 
down the path. Four more beasts followed behind them. They passed the bush 
where I hid. Crashed into the woods. And kept going. 

I waited to make sure they were gone. 

Silence. 

I breathed a sigh of relief. 

I scrambled to my feet and stretched. 

Something rushed at me from behind. 

“No!” I cried in terror. 

Two arms wrapped around my waist. And a creature threw me to the 
ground. 



27 


I thrashed and kicked wildly. 

“Stop it. Cut it out!” a familiar voice demanded. 

“Nat!” I screamed. I whirled around. “Nat! You’re safe! How did you get 
out of the cage?” 

“Cage? What cage?” My brother squinted at me. 

“The penalty cage,” I declared. “Nat—how did you escape? Did they let 
you go?” 

“I’m not Nat. It’s me. Pat.” 

“Pat?” I stared at him in confusion. Then I threw my arms around his neck. 
I’d never been so happy to see him. 

“Where have you been?” I demanded. 

“Where have / been?” Pat cried. “Where have you been? I’ve been 
searching everywhere for you guys. These woods are creepy.” 

He glanced around. “Where’s Nat, anyway?” 

“Trapped.” I started to explain. “See, the beasts got him. After you ran into 
the woods, we had to play this game and...” 

“A game?” Pat cried. He shook his head in disbelief. “I was lost in the 
woods—and you two are playing a game?” 

“It’s not what you think,” I said. 

I checked the trees around us for any sign of the creatures. 

“They forced us to play,” I told Pat, lowering my voice to a whisper. “It’s 
like tag—only they play for keeps. I was the Beast from the East and—” 

“Right.” Pat rolled his eyes. 

“Really,” I insisted. “This game is deadly. You have to believe me.” 

“Why?” Pat shrugged. “You never believe me. Why should I believe you?” 

“Because if we lose, they’ll eat us!” I told him. 

Pat burst out laughing. 

“I’m serious!” I grabbed Pat’s shoulders and shook him hard. “I’m telling 
the truth! It’s dangerous here. Fleg and Spork are after me, right now.” 

Pat twisted out of my grasp. “Right. Fleg and Spork. Woof woof!” Pat 
barked. 



“Shhh,” I hissed. “Keep quiet!” I pulled him behind an umbrella plant. “Pat, 
you have to believe me. They’re all around us. They could get us if we’re not 
careful.” 

“And I suppose this game was their idea?” he asked. 

“Yes,” I answered. 

“And I suppose they can talk,” Pat went on. “In English.” 

“Yes. Yes. Yes,” I insisted. 

“You’re weirder than I thought,” Pat said, shaking his head. “So where’s 
Nat? For real?” 

“ Grrravghl ” 

A deep growl echoed off the nearby rocks. “This way!” A beast bellowed. 
“Near the tunnel!” 

Heavy footsteps pounded closer. The ground shook under our feet. 

Pat’s eyes widened in shock. He reached for my arm. 

“It’s them!” I exclaimed. “Now do you believe me?” 

Pat swallowed hard and nodded his head. “Yes. I believe you,” he choked 

out. 

“She’s over here!” a beast shouted. 

“He heard us,” I whispered in Pat’s ear. “Run!” 

Pat and I took off. 

We raced through the woods, leaping over fallen logs, pushing sharp 
branches out of our faces. 

“This way!” I called. I grabbed Pat’s hand. “Stay low.” 

We ducked into a thick clump of trees. 

Spork thudded past us. 

I could hear him sniffing the air. 

“Can he smell us?” Pat asked in a whisper. 

“Sshh!” I pressed my finger to my lips. 

We crept between the bushy plants. 

Fleg appeared, stomping in our direction. 

I dropped to my hands and knees. I pulled Pat down beside me. 

Fleg thudded past us. 

I knew we weren’t safe. More beasts would follow. And one of them might 
find us. 

I motioned for Pat to follow me. 



We scrambled deeper into the woods. 

The trees were close together here. The bushes were so thick I couldn’t see 
between them. I flung out an arm, feeling my way. 

My hand brushed against something. 

Something big. 

And warm. 

And furry. 



28 


I leaped back. Crashed into Pat. 

What had I touched? 

The bushes parted and a strange creature bounced out. 

I had never seen anything like it. 

It had the body of a dog, as big as a German shepherd, and the face of a 
squirrel. 

I don’t believe this! I thought. 

It could talk, too. “In here! Quick!” the creature urged in a scratchy, 
squeaky voice. 

Its squirrel-nose twitched. Its bushy dog tail thrashed from side to side. 

Could we trust it? 

“In here!” it squeaked. 

It waved a paw in the air. Pointed to a bush of big orange leaves. 

Pat held back, but I crept forward. I spotted the entrance to a cave hidden 
behind the leaves. 

“It’s a good hiding place,” I told Pat. 

“It’s the Hiding Cave,” the squirrel-dog announced. “The Hiding Cave is 
the place to hide. Quick!” The animal held the leaves aside for us. 

The ground shook. I turned and saw furry blue beasts in the distance. They 
were moving quickly toward us. 

“Better do it, Pat,” I said. 

Pat hesitated. 

I yanked his hand and pulled him after me. I bent down to enter the Hiding 
Cave. 

I suddenly remembered what happened when Nat touched the penalty rock. 
The thought made me shiver. Would we really be safe in the Hiding Cave? 

Thump. Thump. 

The beasts drew closer. 

Pat hesitated and held back. 

“Where are they?” a beast shouted. I recognized Fleg’s voice. 

“They must be nearby,” Spork answered. 



The squirrel-dog stayed outside. It let go of the orange leaves. They sprang 
back into place, hiding the entrance to the cave. 

Pat and I crouched inside, hidden from view. 

We huddled close together. The air felt damp inside. It had a sour smell that 
I tried to ignore. 

I slumped against the wall of the cave and wiped the sweat off my forehead. 
I tucked my feet under me. “Try to get comfortable,” I whispered to Pat. “We 
might be here for a long time.” 

Something tickled my neck. I reached to scratch it. 

Something tickled my ear. 

I shivered. 

I brushed my hand against my ear and felt something crawl onto my cheek. 

“Ow!” I cried out as I felt a sharp bite on my shoulder. 

I turned to Pat. He was slapping at his ears and neck. 

Something buzzed past my ear. 

Something skittered through my hair. I shook my head hard. 

My whole body itched and tingled. Every inch of me! 

Beside me, Pat squirmed, and wriggled, scratched and slapped at himself. 

I leaped to my feet. “Help!” I cried. “What is happening? What is going on 
in here?” 



29 


“Help!” I cried, scratching desperately. “Help us!” 

The squirrel-dog’s face poked into the entrance. 

“What is happening to us?” I cried, squirming and scratching. 

“I forgot to tell you,” the strange creature whispered. “The Hiding Cave is 
also a hiding place for bugs!” 

Bugs! 

“Ohhh!” Pat let out a low moan. He rubbed his back against the cave wall. 
Scratched his hair. 

The bugs were everywhere. Crawling on the walls. Flying through the air. 
Buzzing. Whistling. Clicking. 

They crawled up and down my legs and arms. Over my face. In my hair. 

I picked some kind of worm off my cheek. I dragged my hand down my 
arms and my bare legs, brushing bugs onto the cave floor. 

Pat squirmed next to me. “Get them off me, Ginger,” he wailed. “Helllp!” 

“Sshhh!” The squirrel-dog stuck his nose back into the cave. “Quiet! Here 
comes the Beast from the East. Don’t make a sound or he’ll find you!” 

Pat and I drew closer together. 

I held my breath and tried not to move. 

I counted to ten. Silently. I pretended there were no bugs on me. 

I shut my eyes and pictured my bedroom. The posters on the wall. My 
comfortable canopy bed. I thought of being under the covers. Going to sleep. 

And then I thought about bedbugs! 

I couldn’t ignore the insects crawling over me. It was impossible not to 
think about them. 

I couldn’t stand it. I needed to scratch. I needed to screaml 

I couldn’t sit there another second. 

I heard a beast stomp close to the cave opening. 

I recognized Spork’s voice. “Hey—!” he snarled at the squirrel-dog. “Have 
you seen strangers here?” 

Did Spork know this creature? 

Were they friends? 



“Answer me,” Spork demanded. 

I waited for the squirrel-dog’s answer. Please don’t tell them we’re hiding in 
here, I prayed. Please. 

A fat, wet bug landed on my face. I picked at it with my fingers. It clung to 
my cheek. I pulled harder. I couldn’t tug it loose. 

I felt a scream building up inside me. 

I couldn’t take it another second. 

My mouth opened. 

I had to scream. I had to! 



30 


“Ah—” 

I clamped my hand over my mouth. 

I let out a tiny squeak. 

The orange leaves rustled. Fleg’s paw pushed into the cave entrance. 

I froze. I heard Pat gasp. 

“What’s in there?” I heard Fleg ask the squirrel-dog. 

“Bugs,” the squirrel-dog replied. “Thousands of them.” 

Millions! I thought bitterly. The bugs crawled over my face, my arms, my 
legs. They buzzed in my ears. 

Fleg pushed his nose into the cave. 

I stopped breathing. 

Fleg sniffed. “What’s that awful smell?” he complained. 

“Insects,” I heard the squirrel-dog answer. 

“They stink!” Fleg muttered. He let go of the leaves and they snapped back 
into place. “Only bugs in there,” Fleg reported to Spork. “No humans.” 

“Of course not,” the squirrel-dog said calmly. “The humans went the other 
way.” 

“Why didn’t you say so?” Fleg exploded. 

Spork shouted to the other beasts. “They’re not here! The other way, quick! 
Only trel minutes left to play.” 

“I’ll find her,” I heard Spork tell the others. “I have to tag her back! No 
human is going to make me Beast from the East!” 

I heard their footsteps pound in the other direction. 

Only trel minutes! I didn’t exactly know what trel meant. But I knew the 
game was nearly over. If Spork didn’t tag me back, my brothers and I would be 
free! 

But I couldn’t take another second in this bug-infested cave. 

I moved to the entrance on trembling legs. I itched so badly, I could barely 
control my muscles! 

I peered out of the cave. “Are they all gone?” I whispered to the squirrel- 

dog. 



“For now,” he answered. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I called back to Pat. I sprang out of the cave. He 
jumped out after me. 

We frantically brushed bugs off our skin and clothes. I scratched my head 
and rubbed my back up against a tree. 

Pat stomped his feet. “They’re even in my boots!” he wailed. He untied his 
laces and pulled off his boot. He shook it upside down. A hundred black bugs 
poured onto the ground and scurried away. 

“I’m never going to stop itching!” I wailed. “I’m going to itch for the rest of 
my life!” 

“You’d better hide,” the squirrel-dog warned. “They could be back. And 
you’re only allowed to use the Hiding Cave once a game.” 

Pat and I thanked the strange creature. Then we plunged back into the 
woods. 

I hadn’t been in this part of the forest before. Pat and I pushed our way past 
a row of high bushes. I stopped. 

A giant willow tree stood up ahead. Its branches spread low, sweeping 
against the ground. 

The Gulla Willow? 

It had to be. 

I glanced around, searching for a hiding place. A long, low rock stretched 
beyond the tree. 

Only a few minutes left. 

“Quick,” I whispered, grabbing Pat. I pulled him behind the rock. 

“That must be the Gulla Willow,” I told him. “When the sun sets behind it, 
we’ll be safe.” 

Pat nodded but didn’t reply. He was breathing hard. He scratched his 
cheeks. Still itchy. We were both still itchy. 

“Stay down,” I warned him. “And don’t touch the rock.” 

We crouched together in silence. 

And waited. 

My heart slammed against my chest. My skin tingled. I huddled beside my 
brother—and listened. 

Silence. 

The whisper of the wind through the trees. No other sound. 

“Are we safe now?” Pat asked in a trembling whisper. 



“Not yet,” I answered. I raised my eyes to the charcoal gray sky. A last ray 
of purple light spread over the top of the willow. 

Hurry! I urged the sun. Go down! What are you waiting for? 

The sky darkened. The purple light faded behind the Gulla Willow. 

Only gray sky now. Night sky. 

The sun was down. 

“We’re safe!” I cried, jumping to my feet. I turned and hugged Pat. “We’re 
safe! We made it.” 

I stepped out from behind the rock. 

A heavy hand slapped me hard. On the shoulder. 

“You’re It!” Spork bellowed. “You’re the Beast from the East!” 



31 


“Huh?” 

I gasped in shock. I could still feel the beast’s stinging slap on my shoulder. 

“No fair!” Pat cried. “No fair!” He stared as the beasts circled us. Pat had 
never seen them close-up before. 

“It’s dark! The sun is down!” I protested. “You can’t tag me now!” 

“Game Over! Game Over!” Fleg shouted. He stepped out of the woods and 
hurried toward the circle of beasts. 

I pointed angrily at the Gulla Willow. “The sun set behind the tree. You 
can’t tag me!” 

“The game hadn’t been called yet,” Spork said calmly. “You know the rule. 
Fleg has to shout out ‘Game Over’ before the game can end.” 

The beasts all murmured agreement. 

I clenched my fists. “But... but...” I stammered. I lowered my head in 
defeat. I knew they wouldn’t listen to me. 

Pat gulped. “What will they do now, Ginger?” he whispered softly. “Will 
they hurt us?” 

“I already told you,” I whispered back. “They’re going to eat us.” 

Pat let out a cry. He started to say something. But there wasn’t time. 

Fleg stepped forward and grabbed me by the waist. He tossed me over his 
shoulder. 

The blood rushed to my head and I felt dizzy. The ground was so far away! 

Spork hoisted Pat over his shoulder. 

“Hey—whoa!” I protested. “Put my brother down!” 

“He was your Helper,” Spork replied. “We always eat the Helper, too!” 

“Put me down!” Pat shrieked. “Let me go.” 

But the huge beast ignored him. 

They carried us both into a small clearing. 

A large stone pit sat in the center. A raging fire burned inside the pit. Yellow 
and blue flames leaped at the sky. 

Fleg lowered me onto a tree stump. Spork set Pat down beside me. 

The beasts circled around us. Drooling. Licking their lips. 



I thought I heard thunder. But I soon realized it was the sound of their 
stomachs growling. 

“It’s Flelday,” Spork said, smiling. “On Flelday we always barbecue.” 

I swallowed hard. And stared at the flames leaping against the sky. I 
wrapped my arms around my chest and hugged myself. 

Spork poked at the fire with a long metal rod. 

He pointed the rod at me. “Yum yum.” He grinned, rubbing his stomach. 

I felt sick. 

Gleeb lugged a huge pot over to the fire. He set it down in the middle of the 
flames. 

Fleg pulled some gourds off the nearby trees. He cracked them open and 
poured their yellow juice into the pot. He collected sticks and leaves and tossed 
them in, too. 

Gleeb stirred and stirred. A sour, rotting stench rose up from the pot. 

“The broth is ready,” Gleeb announced. 

I turned to Pat. “I’m sorry,” I said in a trembling voice. “Sorry I lost the 
game.” 

“I’m sorry, too,” he whispered, his eyes on the flames. 

The beasts began chanting. “Flelday. Flelday. Flelday.” 

“Who brought the barbecue sauce?” Spork asked. “I’m starving!” 

Fleg lifted me in his arms. And carried me toward the cooking pot. 



32 


“Whoa! Wait! Stop!” 

A familiar voice shouted across the clearing. 

I jerked my head around. “Nat!” I screamed. 

“Ginger!” Nat cried. He ran toward us, waving his arms. “What’s going on? 
What are they doing?” 

Fleg lowered me to the ground. “Nat—!” I screamed. “Run! Find help! 
Hurry!” 

He stopped halfway across the clearing. “But, Ginger—” 

“They’ll eat you, too,” I shrieked. “Run!” 

“Capture him!” Spork shouted to the other beasts. 

Gleeb and several others took off after Nat. 

Nat spun around. He darted for the woods and disappeared into the trees. 

I watched helplessly as the beasts plunged into the woods after him. 

Don’t find him, I prayed, crossing my fingers. All ten of them! 

Nat will escape, I told myself. He’ll climb a tree. He’ll get away from them. 
Then he’ll run and find help. 

Pat and I stared at the dark trees. And waited. 

“Oh, nooo!” I uttered a long wail when the beasts returned from the woods. 
And one of them carried Nat over his shoulder. 

Nat kicked and punched. But he couldn’t free himself. 

The beast dumped Nat beside Pat and me. Nat landed hard, face-down on 
the ground. 

Now they had all three of us. A feast! 

Spork and Fleg gazed at us hungrily. Gleeb ran his tongue over his long 

fang. 

I dropped down beside Nat. “How did you get out?” I asked him. “How did 
you get out of that cage?” 

Nat rolled over and sat up. “It wasn’t that hard,” he said, groaning. “The 
boards were weak. I worked and worked—until I pushed enough boards out. 
Then I broke out.” 

“You should have stayed away,” I told him. “You should have run. Now 



they’re going to eat you, too.” 

Nat raised his eyes to the cook pot and the blazing fire. “I—I don’t want to 
play anymore,” he stammered. 

“Nat,” I whispered sadly, “I’m afraid the game is just about over.” 



33 


“Quiet!” Fleg demanded. “Dinner—stop talking!” He stared at Nat. 

Fleg’s eyes narrowed. He tilted his head. He whispered to Spork and Gleeb. 

The other beasts moved closer. They were all moving their eyes from Pat to 
Nat. They began murmuring to each other, shaking their big, furry heads. Their 
snouts waved up and down as they talked. 

“You doubled!” Spork said to Pat. “You did a Classic Clone!” 

I stared at the beasts. Studied their startled expressions. Hadn’t they ever 
seen twins before? 

“You doubled yourselves!” Fleg declared. “That’s a Classic Clone. Why 
didn’t you tell us?” 

“Uh... tell you what?” I asked. 

Fleg glared at me. “Why didn’t you tell us that you are Level Three 
players?” 

My brothers and I exchanged confused glances. 

“You’re in the wrong game,” Spork announced, shaking his head. 

“If you can double yourselves, that means you belong in Level Three,” Fleg 
said. He slapped his furry forehead. “I’m so embarrassed! Why didn’t you tell us 
sooner?” 

“Well, I told you we didn’t want to play,” I replied sharply. “But you 
wouldn’t listen.” 

“I’m so sorry,” Fleg apologized. “We’re only Level One players. We’re just 
beginners. We’re not experts like you.” 

“Experts?” Pat muttered. He turned to me and rolled his eyes. 

“That’s why we have to play in the daytime,” Fleg explained. “We’re not 
ready to play at night.” 

All around us, the beasts were muttering and shaking their heads. 

“Of course, we’ll have to let you go now,” Fleg said. He scratched at his 
flabby chin. 

“Well, of course,” I cried. I wanted to jump up and down and shout for joy. 
But somehow I kept myself in control. 

“That’s it?” Nat cried to Fleg. “We’re free?” 

“Yes. Good-bye.” Fleg scowled. He rubbed his belly. I heard it growl. 



“Don’t ask again,” I told Nat. “Let’s just get out of here!” 

“Good-bye,” Fleg repeated. He waved his paws as if he were trying to shoo 
us away. 

I jumped to my feet. I didn’t feel tired or scared or itchy or dirty anymore. 

This time the game was really over! 

“How do we find our parents?” I asked. 

“That’s easy,” Fleg replied. “Follow that path.” He pointed. “Follow it 
through the trees. It leads back to your world.” 

We shouted good-bye—and took off. The narrow dirt path twisted through 
the trees. Silvery moonlight danced over the ground. 

“I am so glad you guys are twins!” I exclaimed. 

I had never said that before! But I really meant it. They had saved our lives! 

The trees thinned out. I could see a full moon climbing up over the dark 
treetops. I felt as if we were running to it, running into its warm, white light. 

“Mom and Dad will never believe this story,” I said. I planned to tell them 
every gory detail. 

“They have to believe us,” Pat declared. “It’s all true.” 

I put on a burst of speed. My brothers ran harder to keep up with me. 

I couldn’t wait to get back. Mom and Dad must be so worried. 

“Oh!” I gasped and skidded to a stop. 

Pat and Nat stumbled into me. All three of us struggled to stay on our feet. 

A huge beast had stepped out from behind a tree, blocking the path. 

He crossed his furry arms over his enormous chest. His snout flared as he 
stared down at us with cold marble eyes. He opened his lips and growled, 
exposing his long fang. 

I wasn’t afraid. Not this time. 

“Step aside,” I ordered him. “You have to let us go by. My brothers and I 
are Level Three players.” 

“You’re Level Three? Hey—that’s great! So am I!” the beast exclaimed. 
“Tag! You’re It.” 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats




; 

jni 


[tfll t fll 



•■WKE 



'.tP a ■ v « 

IlnHlMf h ^S 

If 1 -- h^rlSfl 

f , £ , 1 1 * || S J*MT vw|rilrj| 

1/J£"j53y»| 1 ■ rr-” 

r 11 


A 

niJ,e for tile camera 


Vi 

w 1 

,7 v a .. 
* 1? 




















Sm, te for the 


R.L.STINE 


camera . 


SAY CHEESE AND DIE—AGAIN! 

•• SCHQJ AS T I C 













SAY CHEESE AND 


DIE—AGAIN! 
Goosebumps - 44 



R.L. Stine 




1 



1 


“Greg Banks!” 

A shiver ran down the back of my neck as Mr. Saur called my name. I had been 

slumping low in my seat in the last row of the classroom. I tried to hide behind 
Brian 

Webb, the big gorilla of a kid who sits in front of me. 

And I folded my hands and prayed that Mr. Saur wouldn’t call on me to give my 
report next. 

“Greg Banks!” he called. 

I felt another cold shiver. Then my legs started to shake as I climbed to my feet. 
Then my throat tightened until I could barely breathe. 

I hate giving reports in front of the whole class. 

Especially when I haven’t had much time to practice. Especially when we’re not 

allowed to have notes. Especially when half of our grade in English depends on 
how 

we do on this report. 

I cleared my throat and made my way up to the front of the classroom. I was 
halfway there when Donny Greene stuck his big white sneaker into the aisle and 
tripped me. 

I stumbled—but didn’t fall. The whole class exploded in laughter, anyway. 

Mr. Saur frowned at Donny. “Donny, do you have to trip every person who walks 



by you?” he demanded. 

“Yes,” Donny replied with a straight face. 

And once again, the whole class burst out laughing. 

Everyone thinks Donny is a riot. Everyone but Mr. Saur. 

Mr. Saur doesn’t think anyone is funny. That’s why we call him Sourball Saur. 

He probably wouldn’t think that was funny, either! 

Mr. Saur is tall and thin and nearly bald. He never kids around. He never smiles. 
His mouth is always puckered, as if he’s just bitten into a lemon. 

Sourball Saur. 

He’s sort of a legend at Pitts Landing Middle School. Everyone tries not to get 

him. My best friends—Michael, Bird, and Shari—were lucky. They’re in Miss 

Folsom’s class. I was the only one who got stuck with the Sourball. 

I stepped up beside his desk and cleared my throat again. I wondered if everyone 

could see my knees shaking. My face felt burning hot. My hands were cold as 
ice. 

Does everyone get this nervous when they stand in front of the class? 

Mr. Saur folded his pale, skinny hands on his desk and cracked his knuckles. 
“Okay, Greg, let’s hear your true story,” he said. 

I cleared my throat for the thousandth time. I took a deep breath. Then I started 
to 

tell the story of what happened to my friends and me last summer.... 



2 


“I was hanging out with my friends. Bird, Michael, and Shari. We had nothing to 

do, and we were kind of bored. So we dared each other to do something exciting. 
We 

dared each other to sneak into the Coffman house.” 

Mr. Saur raised a hand to interrupt me. He frowned his sour frown. “What’s the 
Coffman house?” 

“It’s a haunted house!” Donny Greene called out. 

“It’s where Donny lives!” Brian Webb mumbled, loud enough for everyone to 
hear. It got a big laugh. 

Mr. Saur raised both hands for quiet and gave everyone his lemon expression. 

“It’s a deserted, old house in my neighborhood,” I told him. “We went inside. 

Down to the basement. And we found an old camera. And that’s what my true 
story 

is about. Because the camera had evil powers.” 

Mr. Saur groaned and rolled his eyes. Some kids laughed. But I took another 
deep 

breath and continued my story. 

“It was an instant camera. The picture popped right out. But it was never the 
picture we snapped. It always showed something terrible happening. 

“I took the old camera home. I snapped a photo of my dad’s new station wagon. 
The photo slid out. In the photo, the station wagon was totaled. Completely 



wrecked. 


And then, a few days later, my dad was in a terrible accident. The photo came 
true.” 

I glanced around the room to see how my story was going over. A few kids were 
laughing. Others were staring at me hard. Trying to decide if I was for real. 

Brian Webb tried to make me lose it. He stuck his two pointer fingers into his 
nostrils and twirled them around. He thinks he’s funny, but he’s just gross. 

“I took a snapshot of my friend Bird Arthur,” I continued. “At his Little League 
game. Bird smiled and posed for the camera. But the photo showed him lying 
unconscious on the ground. 

“Then, a few minutes later, a kid hit a line drive. It smacked Bird in the head. 

And Bird fell unconscious on the ground. Just like in the photo.” 

I heard some nervous giggles from the back of the room. I glanced up to see 

puzzled expressions on a lot of faces. Brian still had his fingers in his nose. I 
turned 

away. No way was I going to laugh at that. 

Mr. Saur had his elbows on the desk and his round, bald head buried in his 
hands. 

His face was hidden. So I couldn’t tell if he liked my report or not. 

“Then something even more scary happened,” I continued. “I brought the 
camera 

to Shari Walker’s birthday party. I snapped Shari’s picture, standing next to a 
tree. 



“When the photo popped out, it showed the tree—but no Shari. It was like she 
was invisible or something. And then, a few minutes later, Shari disappeared.” 

A few kids gasped. Some others laughed. Mr. Saur still had his face buried in his 
hands. 

“A couple of days later, Shari came back,” I told them. “But now we were too 

frightened to keep the camera. So we took it back to the Coffman house. And we 
met 

this strange guy, dressed all in black. He was the inventor of the camera. He told 
us 

that the camera had a curse on it, and—” 

To my surprise, Mr. Saur jumped to his feet. “That will be enough,” he snapped. 
“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I heard him correctly. 

3 

The room went silent. 

Mr. Saur shook his head. Then he narrowed his watery brown eyes at me. 
“Greg,” 

he said, “I have some very bad news for you.” 


4 



2 


The lunch bell rang. 

“We’ll hear more reports tomorrow,” Mr. Saur announced. “Class dismissed.” 
Chairs scraped the floor as everyone stood up. I watched the other kids gather up 
their books and backpacks and head for the door. Freedom. 

I had an urge to run after them. But Mr. Saur kept his eyes locked on me, holding 
me in place with those cold eyes. 

I waited until the classroom had emptied out. Then I turned to the lemon-faced 
teacher. “What’s the bad news?” I gritted my teeth. 

“I’m giving you an F,” Sourball said. 

“Huh?” 

“I’m failing you on that report, Greg.” 

I felt my knees give. I had to grab the chalk tray to keep myself from collapsing 
in a quivering heap on the floor. “B—but—but— why?” I choked out. 

He crossed his bony arms over the front of his yellow alligator-shirt. I wished the 
alligator would reach up and bite him. 

“You didn’t do the assignment,” he said. 

“But—but—but—” I still gripped the chalk tray. My legs were shaking too hard 
to stand up. 

“Greg, you were supposed to share a true story,” Mr. Saur scolded. “Instead, you 



came in here with that wild tale. It was completely silly. I don’t know what you 
were 

thinking!” 

“But it’s true!” I wailed. “The camera—” 

He waved a hand in my face. “Silly,” he repeated. “You came in here with a 
wild, 

silly story. Something you probably read in a comic book.” 

“Mr. Saur—!” I started. I let go of the chalk tray and balled my hands into tight 

fists. “You have to believe me. The camera is real. I didn’t make up the story.” 

I took a deep breath. Then I struggled to keep my voice low and calm. “You can 

ask my friends,” I told him. “They’re in Miss Folsom’s class. They’ll tell you it 
really 

happened.” 

“I’m sure they will.” He smirked at me. “I’m sure your friends will tell me 
whatever you want them to tell me.” 

“No. Really—!” I protested. 

Mr. Saur shook his head. “You didn’t take the assignment seriously, Greg. You 
treated it like a big joke. So I have to give you an F.” 

I raised my fists and let out a loud groan. 

Greg, get control, I warned myself. Get control. 

5 

But how could I get control? The grade was so unfair. And it meant so much to 



me. 


It was a matter of life or death! 

“Mr. Saur—you can’t give me an F!” I wailed. I felt like dropping to my knees 
and begging for mercy. “You will ruin my life!” 

He stared coldly at me. He didn’t say a word. 

“If I don’t get better grades, I can’t visit my cousins this summer,” I explained. 

“You see, my cousins live near Yosemite. In California. And my parents said that 
if I 

get a better grade in your English class, I can spend the summer with them.” 

He didn’t move. His cold frown didn’t budge. His eyes didn’t blink. 

“If you give me an F, I’ll be stuck all summer in Pitts Landing!” I cried. 

Finally, Mr. Saur moved. An unpleasant smile spread over his face. His wet 

brown eyes flashed. “Then you’ll have plenty of time to make up more crazy 
stories,” 

he said. 

He turned away from me and started scribbling notes in his black grade book. 
“Mr. Saur—please!” I begged. “You’ve got to believe me. My story is true. I 
didn’t make it up. Please—” 

He raised his eyes from the grade book. “Okay. Prove it.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“Bring in the camera,” he said. “Bring it in and prove that it’s evil. Prove that 



your story is true—or else I have to fail you.” 

I stared at him, studying his face. Was he serious? 

He stared back for a moment, daring me with his eyes. Then he shooed me away 

with both hands. “Go to lunch, Greg. Maybe next time you’ll take my 
assignment 

seriously.” 

I gathered up my backpack and slung it over my shoulder. Then I slumped out of 
the room, thinking hard. 

Could I go back to that creepy old house and dig out that camera? 

No. No way. 

The camera was too dangerous. Too frightening. Too evil. 

But I needed a good grade. I needed it desperately. 

What should I do? 


6 



3 


I found my friends at our usual table in the corner of the lunchroom. I dropped 
my 

tray down with a sigh, and spilled half my drink. 

“Greg—what’s your problem?” Bird looked up from his sandwich. He had egg 
salad all over his chin and cheeks. 

“Are you eating that sandwich or wearing it?” Shari asked him. 

“Excuse me?” Bird didn’t understand. 

Michael inflated his brown paper sandwich bag and popped it between his 
hands. 

Then he crushed his chocolate milk carton flat. He always gulps his milk down 
first, 

then crushes the carton. We’re not sure why. 

Michael is a little weird. 

I dropped into my chair. I didn’t start to eat. I didn’t even look at my food tray. I 
just stared at the wall until the tiles became a green blur. 

“What’s your problem?” Bird repeated. Now he had egg salad on his forehead, 
too! I don’t know how he does it. 

Bird’s real name is Doug Arthur. But he looks so much like a bird, everyone 
calls 

him Bird. Even his parents. 

He has small, birdlike brown eyes, close together over a long, beak-shaped nose. 



And he has a short tuft of feathery brown hair on top of his head. He’s tall and 
thin 

and sort of bobs up and down like a flamingo when he walks. 

Michael poked a finger through his sandwich. He always makes a hole in the 
center of his sandwich and eats it inside out. “Bad day, Greg?” 

“For sure,” I muttered. I sighed again. 

Shari wore a pale blue T-shirt over faded jeans. She tossed back her black hair. 

She was busy pulling the bright red pepperoni off her pizza slice. “Come on, 
Greg. 

Spill,” she urged without looking up. 

I took a deep breath. Then I told them what had happened to me in English class. 
Bird dropped his sandwich onto the table. “Sourball didn’t believe you?” he 
cried. He slapped his forehead. When he pulled his hand away, his fingers were 
smeared with egg salad. 

“Well, we could all go tell him it’s true,” Shari suggested. 

I shook my head. “He won’t believe you, either,” I moaned. 

“But we all saw it!” Michael protested. “We all know it’s true.” 

“Yeah. It’s four against one,” Bird added. He was wiping egg salad off the front 
of his shirt. “He’ll have to believe us.” 

“He won’t,” I sighed. “You know Sourball. He said I have to bring in the camera 


and prove to him that it’s evil.” 



“But you can ’t!” Michael and Shari cried together. 

7 

I glanced over their shoulders. Brian and Donny were grinning at me from the 

next table. Brian and Donny are the two biggest guys at Pitts Landing Middle 
School. 

We call them Sumo One and Sumo Two—because they’re both shaped a little 
like 

sumo wrestlers. 

Of course, no one has ever called them Sumo One or Sumo Two to their faces. 

When Donny and Brian get angry, they sit on kids and squash them like bugs. 

And now, they had followed me from Mr. Saur’s class and were grinning at me 

from the next table. When they saw me watching, they formed little square 
cameras 

with their fingers and raised them in front of their eyes. 

“Click! Click!” Brian called. “I’ve got an evil camera here!” 

“Say cheese!” Donny shouted. “Say cheese—and die! Ha-ha-ha!” 

“Click. Click. Click.” They clicked their air cameras. 

“Watch the birdie!” Donny cried. 

“Watch the birdbrain!” Brian yelled. 

They both tossed back their heads and laughed like lunatics, slapping each other 
high fives. 

“Funny, guys,” I said, rolling my eyes. “Real funny.” 



“You two should do stand-up,” Michael told them. “You should stand up in the 
corner!” 

No one laughed. No one ever laughs at Michael’s jokes. His jokes are never 
funny. In fact, they are embarrassing. 

Michael has short red hair, blue eyes, and a face full of freckles. He isn’t exactly 
fat—but no one would ever call him skinny. 

One of these days, he’s going to surprise us and make a joke that isn’t totally 
lame. 

But I was in no mood for jokes, anyway. My summer was about to be ruined. 
My 

three friends all had plans to go away. No way I wanted to be left all alone in 
Pitts 

Landing with nothing to do for three months! 

If I had to bring in that camera to prove to Mr. Saur that I was telling the truth... 
I’d do it! 

Shari must have read my thoughts. She reached across the table and grabbed my 
arm. “Greg—you can’t,” she said. “That camera is too dangerous.” 

Bird agreed. “I’m not going back to that weird house,” he said, shaking his head. 
“Never again.” 

“Hey—what about your brother?” Michael asked me. 

I turned to him, confused. “What about my brother?” 



“Isn’t he working in a camera store?” Michael demanded. 

I nodded. My older brother, Terry, was working at Kramer’s Photo Store after 
school. “Yeah. He’s at Kramer’s. He works in the developing lab. So what?” 
“Maybe Terry could borrow an old camera from the store,” Michael suggested. 
“You can bring it in and tell Mr. Saur it’s the evil camera.” 

“Just one problem,” I told Michael. “I have to prove the camera is evil. How do I 
do that?” 

Michael thought about it. And thought. 

8 

“It won’t work,” I sighed. “We have to go get the real camera.” I glanced around 
the table. “Who will go with me?” 

No one answered. Bird concentrated on getting the egg salad out from under his 

fingernails. Shari twisted a lock of black hair around one finger. Michael stared 
at the 

floor. 

“Don’t all volunteer at once,” I grumbled. 

They still didn’t move. 

“I just need the camera for one day,” I added. “Then we’ll return it and never 
take 

it out again.” 

No one replied. Bird raised his beady little eyes to the ceiling and started 



whistling to himself. 

I sneered at them. “Okay, wimps. I’ll go by myself.” 

“Don’t do it,” Shari warned again. “Not even for a day. Something horrible will 
happen. I know it will.” 

If only I had listened to her. 

9 



4 


The rest of the afternoon, I barely heard a word anyone said. I think I had a 
spelling 

quiz. I think we played volleyball in gym. I think someone slammed the ball 
onto my 

head. 

Did it hurt? Did I have to leave the game for a while? 

I really don’t remember. 

In music class, Miss Jakes caught me staring out the window, a dazed look on 
my 

face. She thought it was because of the volleyball accident. She wanted to send 
me to 

the nurse. 

But I explained that I was okay. I told her I wasn’t hurt—I was only 
daydreaming. 

I didn’t explain that I was thinking hard. Thinking about that evil camera hidden 
away in the Coffman house. 

Thinking about how I was going to sneak out after dinner. Ride my bike up the 
hill to the deserted old house. Creep down to the basement—and pull the camera 
from its hiding place in the wall. 

I’m going to prove the camera is evil, Sourball. I’m going to prove you’re wrong 
and unfair! I thought bitterly. 



I’m going to prove it to Brian and Donny and all the other kids who laughed at 
my story. 

I’m going to get an A for my report. Not an F. 

I thought about all that. And I thought about Shari, Michael, and Bird. 

I didn’t blame my friends for being scared. I was scared, too. I promised myself 
I’d be really careful. 

I’ll bring it to school. But I won’t take anyone’s picture with it, I decided. 

Then how would I prove to Mr. Saur that the camera is evil? 

I thought hard. I’ll take a snapshot of the empty classroom, I decided. Or maybe 
the lunchroom or the gym when no one is there. 

As soon as Mr. Saur changes my grade to an A, I’ll return the camera, I promised 
myself. I’ll shove it back into its hiding place. And I’ll never take it out again. 
After school, I searched for Shari. She lives next door, so we usually walk home 
together. But I didn’t see her anywhere. 

I crossed the street, kicking a bottle cap I found at the curb. Thinking about my 
plan. Thinking about the camera. 

I had walked about half a block when I heard voices behind me. “Greg! Hey— 
Greg!” 

Two hands grabbed my shoulders and spun me around hard. 


Brian Webb! 



10 


“Greg—Donny and I went to the Coffman house!” he exclaimed, grinning, 
holding me in place. “We found the evil camera!” 

“Say cheese!” Donny cried. 

He pointed the camera and flashed it in my face. 

11 



5 


I uttered a hoarse cry. 

And shut my eyes against the white flash. 

Something horrible is going to happen to me now, I realized. 

The picture is going to show me in pain. In agony. In terrible trouble. And then 
it’s going to come true! 

When I opened my eyes, Brian and Donny were laughing. They slapped each 
other a high five. 

I stared at the camera in Donny’s hand. 

A yellow cardboard camera. One of those cheap throwaway cameras. 

Not the evil camera. Not the old camera from the Coffman house. 

“Good joke, guys!” I said sarcastically. I blinked several times, trying to make 
the 

yellow dots disappear. “You guys are a riot.” 

“You’re the funny one!” Brian shot back. “That was such a funny story you told 
in class!” 

“Yeah. It had us all laughing,” Donny chimed in. 

I stared angrily at them. My heart thumped loudly. Sumo One and Sumo Two. 
They were so big, they nearly blocked out the sunlight! 

I knew they wanted to keep on teasing me. Have some more laughs at my 



expense. Maybe get into a fight. 

But I didn’t have time to fight with them. 

“Maybe you won’t be laughing tomorrow,” I murmured. Then I turned, jogged 
across the street, and headed for home. 

At dinner, I stared down at my plate. I was too nervous to eat. My stomach felt 
as if it 

were tied in a tight knot. 

“Pass the potatoes,” my brother, Terry, said with a mouth full of chicken. 

“It’s not potatoes. It’s turnips,” Mom corrected him. 

Terry shrugged. “Whatever.” He scooped a pile onto his plate and began 
spooning them quickly into his mouth. 

“Slow down, Terry,” Dad scolded. “You’re eating so fast, you don’t know what 
you’re eating!” 

“Sure, I do,” Terry protested. “I’m eating dinner!” 

Mom and Dad laughed. 

Terry looks a lot like me—blond hair, green eyes, kind of a goofy smile. We 
could almost be twins, except that he’s sixteen, four years older than me. 

“Why are you in such a hurry?” Mom asked him. 

12 

Terry burped. “Excuse me.” He licked chicken grease off his fingers. “I have to 
get back to work. A lot of special orders came in today. So I promised Mr. 



Kramer 


I’d put in a few extra hours in the developing lab.” 

“You’re learning a lot about photography—aren’t you?” Dad said. 

“Yeah. A lot.” 

Oh, please! I thought. Please don’t talk about photography! 

I knew that soon after dinner, I’d be sneaking out to that creepy old deserted 
house. I didn’t want to think about cameras or photography. 

Terry’s chair scraped the floor as he jumped to his feet. He tossed his greasy 
napkin onto the table. “Got to run. See you later.” He loped to the door. 

“Don’t you have any homework tonight?” Mom called after him. 

“No,” he shouted from the front hall. “They don’t give homework in high 
school!” The front door slammed behind him. 

“What a comedian,” Dad muttered, shaking his head. 

They both suddenly remembered that I was at the table, too. “Greg—you haven’t 
touched your chicken!” Mom said, staring at my full plate. 

“I ate too much junk after school,” I lied. “I’m not too hungry.” 

“Your mom and I are going over to Alana’s after dinner,” Dad told me. Alana is 
Mom’s sister. “Alana still isn’t feeling well. Do you want to come with us?” 
“Uh... no,” I replied, thinking hard. “I’ve got too much homework. I’m going to 


be studying all night.” 



I don’t like to lie to Mom and Dad—if I can help it. 

Tonight I couldn’t help it. 

“How are your grades this semester?” Mom asked. 

“Yes, how are they?” Dad repeated, leaning closer. “Pete and Alice out in 

Yosemite called me this afternoon. They asked if you are coming to visit them 
this 

summer. I told them we’d know as soon as your next report card arrives.” 

“Uh... I’m doing real well,” I told them, staring down at my chicken and turnips. 
I’ll be doing real well after tomorrow, I thought. My stomach knotted even 
tighter. 

Mom and Dad stood up to clear the table. “Pete and Alice said to be sure to bring 
a camera,” Dad said. “It’s such beautiful country out there.” 

“Maybe Terry can get you a good camera at the store,” Mom suggested. 

Please stop talking about cameras! I thought, gritting my teeth. “Maybe he can,” 
I said. 

I waited till Mom and Dad drove off for Alana’s house. Then I waited ten 
minutes 

more. Sometimes they forget something, turn around, and come back home. 

I peered out the window. Under the white moonlight, the bare trees were bending 
and shaking. A breezy night. Still cold even though spring was only a few weeks 


away. 



I pulled a long-sleeved flannel shirt over my T-shirt. Tucked a pocket flashlight 
into my jeans. And headed out to the garage to get my bike. 

The swirling wind felt heavy and wet. I glanced up at the sky, hoping it wasn’t 
getting ready to rain. A pale half-moon floated over the quivering trees. 

13 

The front tire on my bike was a little low. But I guessed I could make it up the 

hill to the Coffman house. I walked the bike out of the garage, then climbed on. 

I’d left all the lights on in the house. From the driveway, it looked so bright and 

warm and safe. For a moment, I was tempted to go back inside and forget about 
the 

evil camera. 

But my mind was made up. I desperately wanted to visit my cousins this 
summer. 

No way I could do that if I got an F from Mr. Saur on my report. 

I took a deep breath. Clicked on the bike headlight. And pedaled down to the 
street. 

It was lucky that Mom and Dad had to go away, I told myself. At least I didn’t 
have to sneak out of the house. 

“That’s it, Greg,” I said out loud, pedaling harder. “Look on the bright side.” 

The street seemed darker than usual. Glancing up, I saw that two streetlights 
were 


out. 



The wind swept toward me. On both sides, the trees appeared to be shivering. I 

swerved to miss a sheet of old newspaper fluttering across the street. 

I shifted gears as the street sloped uphill. I pictured the ramshackle old Coffman 

house. Hidden behind ancient oak trees at the top of a weed-choked lawn. 

I remembered that it stood three stories tall, gray shingle, with a wraparound 

screened porch, a sloping red roof, and tall chimneys on either end. 

Many years ago, it must have been a really fancy house. But no one had lived in 

it for dozens of years. And the house had crumbled and decayed until it looked 
like a 

wreck. 

I crossed a street, pedaling smoothly and steadily uphill. Familiar houses rolled 
past in the darkness. And then a small wooded area. 

I felt my throat tighten. And my hands grow cold. 

The house—the Coffman house—stood just beyond the woods. 

The tree branches swayed, glowing gray—the color of bone—under the cold 
moonlight. 

I squeezed the brake as I rolled past the woods. 

Past the sloping lawn. Past the ancient oak trees. 

Up to the old house—and gasped in shock. 


14 



6 


The house was gone. 

I jumped off my bike and let it fall to the sidewalk. I uttered a low cry of 
surprise. 

Then I blinked several times. Tried to make the big, old house appear where it 
belonged behind the oak trees. 

But no. 

The trees rose up over the lawn, silvery-gray in the moonlight. Now they 
protected only scattered piles of boards and shingles. 

The house had been torn down. 

Totaled. 

Dazed, I stood at the curb, staring up to where the house should be. Staring hard. 
Trying to force it to come back. 

A minute or two later, I felt a stab of pain—and slapped a mosquito on my 

forehead. It’s too early in the spring for mosquitoes, I thought. I felt wet blood 
on my 

forehead. 

Rubbing the bite, I turned to the gravel driveway. And saw a stenciled sign near 
the street: SOLD. 

So the Coffman house had been sold. 

And the new owner tore it down. 



I rubbed the mosquito bite, thinking hard. The house was gone. But what about 
the basement? 

What about the basement workshop? I remembered it so well. I remembered the 
worktable. And I remembered the hiding place in the wall above it. The small 
compartment where the camera lay hidden away. 

What about the basement? 

Before I even realized it, my feet were carrying me up the hill. My sneakers slid 
over the slick, tall grass. I inhaled the fresh dew. I kept my eyes locked on the 
trembling silver trees. 

I stepped around a pile of rusted nails and bolts. Jumped over a low stack of 

rotted shingles. Shingles that had been pulled off the house. 

Halfway up the lawn, I could see what else was left of the house. Wooden doors 

stacked in a high pile. Broken glass over the ground. Window frames leaning 
against 

a wall of rotting boards. Cracked shingles everywhere. A white sink on its side 
against a tree. An old washtub resting beside it. 

But what about the basement? 

I crept closer. My legs suddenly felt heavy. My whole body felt heavy—as if 
some invisible force were pushing me back, pushing me away. 

15 

A deep shadow ran along the ground behind the round, old oaks. At first glance, 



I 

thought I was staring at a pool of water. A small lake. 

But as I made my way closer, I saw that the deep shadow was a hole. A huge, 
square pit in the ground. 

The basement. 

Nothing but a hole now. 

I stopped at the edge, my body feeling even heavier. Heavy with disappointment. 
I stopped and stared down into the deep hole. 

The trees shut out most of the moonlight. With a trembling hand, I pulled out my 

pocket flashlight and clicked it on. I aimed the narrow beam of yellow light into 
the 

hole. 

Empty down there. The light slid over the dirt. On one side, thick tree roots 
poked 

into the open square. 

I ran the light over the pit walls. Tangles of roots spread over the smooth, black 
dirt. 

Nothing left. The basement had been completely cleared out. Even the concrete 
floor had been broken up and carted away. 

And where was the camera? 


Where? 



Had someone found it? Pulled it out and kept it? 

Or had it been crushed when the workers smashed the concrete? Crushed and 
destroyed forever? 

I moved the beam of light back and forth along the far wall. I’m not sure what I 
expected to see. 

Did I think I’d find the camera hidden in its square hole in the pit wall? Did I 
think I would see it in a corner of the muddy floor? 

The light swept over dirt and knots of tree roots. 

Nothing else. 

I clicked off the flashlight and shoved it into my pocket. 

I turned away from the hole, side-stepping a pile of broken shingles. 

A strong gust of wind made the old trees groan and creak. I barely noticed the 
eerie sounds. 

I’m going to get an F, I thought unhappily. 

The camera is gone forever, and I’m going to get an F. 

My summer is ruined. And the other kids in class will never believe me. They 
will laugh at me and click cameras at me forever. 

I let out a long, glum sigh. 

Angrily, I kicked a broken board out of my path and started down the lawn to my 


bike. 



I had taken four or five steps when a shrill voice yelled, “Caught you! You’re not 


going anywhere!” 
16 



7 


The high voice in the night air startled me. Without thinking, I started to run. 
Then 

stopped. 

I spun around, my heart heaving against my chest. 

And saw a boy. About my age. He had picked up a board from the ground and 
held it high, as if ready to swing it. 

He wore a black sweatshirt over faded jeans, holes in both knees. His dark hair 
was cut very short. He glared at me with dark, tense eyes. 

“Dad—I caught him!” he shouted. He had a high, shrill voice that made him 
sound like a little kid. 

“Whoa. What do you mean?” I cried. “Caught me?” 

“Don’t move,” he ordered me, raising the board higher. He took a step closer. 
Then another. His eyes burned hard into mine. 

“I wasn’t doing anything!” I told him. “I—I was just looking.” 

As he stepped up to me, I saw his expression change. The anger faded from his 
eyes. His mouth slid open. 

“You—you’re not him!” he stammered. 

“Huh? Who?” I cried. “I’m not who?” 

“Hey—I’m sorry,” he said, shaking his head. “I thought you were someone 
else.” 



“Well... I’m not someone else!” I replied. “I’m me.” 

“There’s a kid who lives down the block,” the boy explained, scratching his dark 

crew cut. “He’s been sneaking over here at night and stealing stuff from the 
yard.” 

My eyes wandered over the cluttered lawn. “What was he stealing? There isn’t 
much left.” 

The boy nodded. He tossed away the board he planned to use as a weapon. It 
clattered against a pile of boards beside me. “He was taking lumber and stuff. I 
thought you were him.” 

“Did your family buy the Coffman house?” I asked. Even though it was such a 

cool, windy night, my forehead was all sweaty. I reached up and mopped the 
sweat 

with the back of my hand. 

“Yeah. We bought it,” he replied. “But Dad said the house was too wrecked to 
fix 

up. So he had it torn down. We’re going to build a new house.” 

The wind made the trees creak again. I glanced down to the street and saw the 
back wheel of my bike spinning. 

“People told us the Coffman house was haunted,” the boy said. “So I’m glad 
Dad 

tore it down.” He kicked at a shingle on the ground. “My name is Jon. What’s 
yours?” 



“Greg. I—I live down at the bottom of the hill. A few blocks past the school.” 

17 

I gazed to where the house had stood. “My friends and I used to sneak into the 
old house,” I told him. “You know. Just for fun. For excitement. I think it was 
haunted. Really.” 

He narrowed his eyes at me, studying me. “What were you doing here?” he 
demanded. “Why did you come up here tonight?” 

I decided to tell him the truth. “I was looking for something,” I said. “A camera.” 
He scratched his short hair again. “An old camera?” 

“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “An old camera. It was hidden down in the basement. 
Did you see it?” 

“Yeah,” Jon replied. “The men dug it up when they pulled out the basement.” 
“Oh, wow!” I cried. I couldn’t hide my excitement. “Where is it, Jon? I mean— 
what did they do with it? Do you know where it is?” 

He pointed over my shoulder toward the street. “Probably over there,” he said. “I 
don’t think they emptied it yet.” 

I spun around and saw a big Dumpster on the other side of the driveway. “They 
threw it in there?” I demanded. 

I didn’t wait for him to answer. I started running full speed through the tall 
weeds 

to the street. I stopped in front of the big steel Dumpster. I could see all kinds of 



junk 

piled over the top. 

“Is it okay to look for it?” I called back to Jon. 

He came walking slowly down to me, hands shoved in his pockets. “Sure. Go 
ahead. Why do you want a stupid old camera, anyway?” 

I didn’t answer him. No time for answering questions. 

I lifted both hands to the top of the Dumpster. It was pretty high. It took me three 
tries to pull myself up and in. 

A street lamp across the street cast a glow of dim yellow light over the 
Dumpster. 

My eyes wandered quickly over the trash. All stuff from the basement, I 
realized. 

I saw rusted old tools from the workshop. Part of an ancient vacuum cleaner. The 
spin cylinder from a dryer. Old clothes. Torn suitcases. 

Is it here? I asked myself. Is the camera in here? 

I pulled away a broken suitcase and tossed it aside. I grabbed stacks of old 
magazines and shoved them out of the way. 

I’m going to search every inch of this Dumpster till I find it, I told myself. 

I pulled away a torn section of a garden hose. Then I pawed through a pile of old 
clothes. 


Where is it? Where? 



I dropped onto my hands and knees and dug deeper into the garbage. The stale 

odor of dust and decay floated up to me, swept over me. I held my breath and 
kept 

pawing away. 

I had to find it. I had to. 

I didn’t stop until I saw the two eyes staring up at me. 

Two eyes. Yellow in the pale light. 

Staring up at me from the trash. Staring up at me without blinking. 

I’m not alone in here! I realized. 

And then I opened my mouth in a shrill, terrified scream. 

18 


19 



8 


The eyes stared up at me without blinking. Yellow and cold. 

A chill tightened the back of my neck. 

I stared down at them, waiting for them to move. Waiting for something to jump 
up at me. 

“What’s wrong? Did you find the camera?” Jon called from the sidewalk. 

“No. I—uh—I—” 

I reached my hand down toward the glassy yellow eyes. And felt bristly fur. 

My heart pounding, I pushed some junk aside. 

And without thinking, I picked up the staring creature. 

Felt its body, stiff and hard beneath bristly brown and black fur. 

A dead raccoon. 

Its sour odor reached my nostrils. “Oooooh, yuck!” I let out a groan—and 
heaved 

the smelly creature out of the Dumpster. 

“Hey, Greg—” Jon called up to me. 

“I found a dead raccoon,” I told him, holding my nose. “It smelled so bad, I—” 

I stopped when I saw the camera. 

It had been hidden beneath the raccoon’s body. The glow from the street lamp 

spilled over it. The glass of the camera lens reflected the light like a single, 
shining 



eye. 


I grabbed it. Pulled it up from the trash. 

Then I climbed to my feet. Leaning over the Dumpster, I held it up to Jon. “I 
found it!” I cried happily. “Here it is. I can’t believe I found it!” 

Jon wrinkled his face up at me. “Great,” he said, without enthusiasm. 

I strapped the camera around my neck. Then, holding on to the top of the 
Dumpster, I lowered myself to the ground. 

My shirt and jeans were covered with dust and sticky grease. But I didn’t care. I 
had the camera in my hands. 

“What’s so great about it?” Jon demanded. He squinted down at it. Rubbed a 
hand over the top. “Does it work?” 

I didn’t want to tell him the story of the camera. I knew he wouldn’t believe it, 

anyway. I didn’t want to scare him. And mainly, I wanted to get home with it as 
fast 

as I could. 

“Yeah. It works,” I replied, dusting off the back with my hand. “It takes pretty 
good pictures.” 

“But why do you want it so much?” Jon asked, studying it as I worked to clean 
the dust off. 

20 

“Oh... well. I promised to show it to someone. In school,” I told him. “I kind of 



need it for a project.” 

Jon scratched his short, dark hair. “Maybe I should show the camera to my dad,” 
he said, motioning behind him. “He might not want you to take it.” 

“But you threw it in the trash!” I cried. I held the camera tightly in both hands, 
afraid he was going to try to grab it away. 

“But we didn’t know it works,” Jon replied in his high, shrill voice. “Is it 
valuable? Maybe it’s valuable. An antique or something.” 

“No way. It’s not valuable,” I insisted. “Please, Jon. I—” 

“We’d better show it to Dad,” Jon said. He reached for the camera. 

I pulled away. 

I grabbed the camera tighter. 

Heard a click. 

A white flash of light startled us both. 

“Oh, noooo!” I let out a cry, realizing I had pushed the shutter. 

And snapped a picture of Jon. 


21 



9 


“Hey—why did you do that?” Jon demanded. 

“It—it was an accident,” I stammered. I pulled the picture from the slot at the 
bottom of the camera. “I didn’t mean to. Really.” 

Jon and I both blinked several times, trying to get the flashing lights to fade from 

our eyes. “It’s an instant camera?” Jon demanded. “It looks too old to be an 
instant 

camera.” 

“Yeah. I know,” I replied. I held up the photo to watch it develop. Silently, I 

prayed that the photo wouldn’t show anything terrible. 

Please, please—let Jon be okay in the snapshot, I pleaded. 

With my free hand, I pulled the little flashlight from my pocket. I beamed it 
down 

on the photo as it slowly developed. 

As I stared at the small, square snapshot, I could see Jon’s face come into view. 
His eyes were closed. His mouth was open, twisted in a strange expression. 
Before I could really see what was going on, Jon grabbed the photo away from 
me. He raised it close to his face and studied it. 

“Hey—what’s with this camera?” he demanded. 

I stepped up behind him to see the snapshot. “Oh, nooooo,” I groaned. 

The photo came out very clear and bright. It showed Jon howling in pain. His 



eyes shut. His mouth open in a scream. 

His leg was raised. He was holding on to his sneaker with both hands. 

He was holding on to his sneaker because a huge nail was sticking up from the 

top. An enormous carpenter’s nail—nearly as big as a pencil—shoved up 
through the 

center of Jon’s foot! 

Jon laughed. He turned to me. “What is this? Some kind of joke camera?” 

I swallowed hard. I knew it wasn’t a joke. 

The horrifying photos always came true. 

How could I keep Jon from having a nail jammed in his foot? What could I do? 

I decided I had to warn him. I had to tell him the truth about the camera. 

“This is cool!” Jon exclaimed, studying the photo. “It really looks like me. I 
wonder how it works.” 

“It—it isn’t cool,” I stammered. “It’s really kind of scary, Jon. The camera is 
evil. 

It has a curse on it. The photos always come true.” 

He laughed. “For sure!” 

I knew he wouldn’t believe me. 

“Well, just be careful—okay?” I insisted. “The photo isn’t a joke.” 

He laughed again. 


22 



A gust of wind sent the tall weeds swaying. Snakes of black cloud slithered over 
the moon. Darkness swept over us. 

“I need to borrow the camera,” I told Jon. “Just for one day.” 

“It’s such a cool camera,” he replied. “I don’t know. Maybe I should take it 
home.” 

“I’ll bring it back tomorrow afternoon,” I promised. “I just have to take it to 
school.” 

He twisted his mouth, thinking hard. “I’d better ask my dad.” He pointed to a 

wall of lumber under the trees. “He’s back there with the architect, talking about 
the 

new house.” 

“No. Wait!” I cried. 

But Jon took off, running up the hill through the swaying weeds. 

I started after him—but stopped when I heard a shrill bleat. And then Jon’s 
horrifying roar of pain soared out over the lawn. 


23 



10 


My breath caught in my chest. I stumbled forward through the weeds. 

And saw Jon holding his sneaker, his face twisted in pain. 

Even in the dim moonlight, I could see the huge nail pushing up through his 
foot. 

“Jon!” I shouted. “I’ll get your dad!” 

I didn’t need to find him. Two men—one tall and thin, the other chubby and 

short—rushed out from behind the lumber pile. I guessed they were the architect 
and 

Jon’s dad. 

“Jon? What’s wrong?” the chubby one—Jon’s dad—called. 

Jon tossed back his head in another scream of pain. 

“He’s got a nail in his foot!” I shouted, running up to them, pointing frantically. 

Both men ran past me. “Oh, good heavens!” Jon’s dad moaned. 

They grabbed Jon under the arms. The tall man held Jon’s injured foot above the 

ground. “Into my car,” he urged. “I have a towel. We can wrap the foot. He’s 
losing a 

lot of blood.” 

“Should we pull out the nail?” Jon’s dad asked in a quivering voice. 

“No. Too dangerous,” the other man replied. 

“Don’t pull it out! Don’t!” Jon pleaded. “It’ll hurt too much!” 



“We can’t even take off the sneaker!” Jon’s dad cried. 


“The hospital is that way,” the architect said, pointing. “Only a few minutes 
away.” 

“Owwww. It hurts! It hurrrrts!” Jon wailed. 

The two men lifted him off the ground. And half-walking, half-running, they 

carried him down to a car parked across from the Dumpster. 

I watched from the weeds as they gently lowered Jon into the backseat. I saw 

them struggle with a long white towel. Finally, they had it tightly wrapped 
around the 

foot and sneaker. 

They closed Jon’s car door. Then they quickly slid into the front. A few seconds 
later, the car roared off into the darkness. 

I stood in the middle of the yard, feeling the swaying weeds brush against my 
jeans legs. I swallowed hard. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. 

“Poor Jon,” I murmured out loud. 

The camera was as evil as ever. Tonight it had found another victim. 

It’s all my fault, I thought sadly. It was an accident. I didn’t mean to press the 
shutter. But I pressed it. 

The two men hadn’t even looked at me. They were so upset about Jon, I don’t 
think they saw me. 


24 



I glanced down and realized that I still gripped the camera in my hands. I had a 

strong urge to heave it to the ground. To stomp on it again and again until I 
smashed 

it forever. 

My eye caught something fluttering in the tall grass. I bent and picked it up. The 
snapshot. 

I squinted once again at Jon, holding his foot, shrieking in pain. 

I tucked the snapshot into the pocket of my flannel shirt. I’ll bring it in to Mr. 
Saur, I decided. I’ll bring in the camera and the photo of Jon. I’ll tell him exactly 
what happened to Jon tonight. 

I won’t have to snap a picture in school. 

I have this picture as proof. 

So it won’t be dangerous. It won’t be dangerous at all. 


25 



11 


The next morning, I gulped down my breakfast. Then I pulled on my backpack, 
strapped the camera around my neck, and hurried out the door. 

I left the house fifteen minutes early. I didn’t want to run into Shari, or Michael, 
or Bird. 

I stepped out into a warm day. The air smelled fresh and sweet. I saw a row of 
tulips poking up through the ground along the side of the house. First flowers of 
spring. 

I loped down the driveway and turned at the sidewalk. The camera felt heavy 
against my chest. I reached up to adjust the strap—and heard a voice calling me. 
“Greg! Hey, Greg—wait up!” 

Shari. 

I spun the camera behind me and tried to hide it under my arm. 

Too late. She had already spotted it. 

“I don’t believe you!” Shari cried, running up beside me. “You’re unreal! You 

pulled that thing from the Coffman house?” She stared at the camera, shaking 
her 

head. 

“Well... not exactly,” I replied. “How come you’re so early, Shari?” 

“I was watching out the window for you,” she confessed. “I wanted to see if you 



were crazy enough to get that camera.” 

I frowned at her. “You were spying on me? Why?” 

“Because I’m not letting you take that evil thing to school.” She stepped in front 
of me, blocking my way. 

I snickered. “Who made you queen of the world?” I sneered. “It’s a free country, 
you know.” 

She crossed her arms over the front of her plaid vest. “I’m serious, Greg. You 
can’t take it. I won’t let you.” 

I faked to the left and tried to edge past her on the right. 

But she stayed in front of me. I bumped into her—then backed up a step. 

“I’m serious,” she repeated. “Take the camera home.” 

“Shari, you’re being a real jerk,” I muttered. “You can’t tell me what to do.” 

Her expression changed. She uncrossed her arms and tugged her black hair back 

over her shoulders. “Don’t you remember how dangerous that camera is? Don’t 
you 

remember all the horrible things it did to us?” 

I gripped the camera in both hands. It suddenly felt very heavy. The metal felt 
cold against the front of my T-shirt. 

26 

“Don’t you remember, Greg?” Shari pleaded. “I disappeared because of that 
camera. Disappeared into thin air! You don’t want that to happen to someone 



else— 


do you? Think how terrible you’d feel.” 

I swallowed hard, remembering the night before. 

The camera had already injured someone. 

“I’m not going to take any pictures,” I told her. “Really. I’m just going to show it 
to Mr. Saur so he’ll change my grade.” 

“Why will seeing an old camera make him change your grade?” Shari 
demanded. 

“Because I have a photo to show him, too,” I declared. I pulled the snapshot of 
Jon out of my pocket and flashed it in front of her face. 

“Oooh—gross!” she cried, shoving the photo away with both hands. “That is 
sick!” 

“I know,” I agreed, sliding the photo back in my pocket. “The poor kid. I took 
this picture. Then, a minute later, it really happened to him.” 

“So I’m right!” Shari declared, her eyes narrowed at the camera in my hands. 
“You just proved my point—didn’t you, Greg! I’m right!” 

A car rumbled past, filled with kids on their way to school. A small brown dog 
stuck its head out the back window and barked at us. 

I glanced at my watch. If we stayed here arguing another few minutes, Shari and 

I 


would be late for school. 



“We’ve got to go,” I told her. I started walking, taking long strides. But she 
hurried to block my way. 

“No, Greg. I can’t let you. I can’t.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Shari, give me a break.” 

“It’s too dangerous,” she insisted. “I know I’m right. I know it will get you into 
big trouble.” 

“Get out of my way, Shari.” 

“Give me the camera.” 

“No way!” I cried. 

She grabbed for it with both hands. And yanked it off my shoulder. 

I grabbed it back. 

And the camera flashed in Shari’s face. 


27 



12 


Shari blinked. Her hands shot away from the camera. She let out a startled cry. 
“Oh! Sorry!” I cried, backing away. “Sorry! Really! I’m sorry! I didn’t mean to 


The camera felt warm in my hands. I reached for the square photo that slid from 
the slot. 

“Give me that!” Shari demanded. She swiped the snapshot away from me. 
“What 

have you done to me?” 

“It was an accident!” I shouted. “You know I didn’t mean to snap it.” 

Shari stared down at the square as it started to develop. “What have you done? 

What have you done?” she repeated. Her voice trembled more each time she said 
it. I 

saw that her hand was shaking. 

“I told you not to bring out the camera,” Shari cried. “I begged you to leave it at 
home.” 

“Shari, I’m sorry,” I apologized again. “Maybe it won’t be so bad. Maybe—” 

She swallowed hard. “Maybe I’ll disappear again, Greg. Maybe I’ll disappear 
forever.” 


“No!” I cried. “Don’t say that. Please 



We both stared down at the photo. It developed so slowly. First, the yellow 
darkened over the white square. I began to see Shari’s face. 

Was she screaming? Was she howling in pain? 

I couldn’t tell. 

The blue tint filled in over the yellow. I could see Shari’s face outlined in green. 
“You look okay,” I told her. “I think you’re okay.” 

“Wait,” she said softly. She bit her lower lip. She didn’t blink. Her eyes squinted 
hard as the red and blue tints spread. 

The picture darkened. Darkened to black. 

I could see Shari’s face clearly now. She wasn’t smiling. She didn’t look happy. 
But she wasn’t screaming, either. 

Darker. 

“Hey!” Shari cried. “It’s a negative.” 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand. 

“It’s not a photo,” Shari replied, holding the square up to me. “It’s a negative. 

The photo didn’t come out. It’s all reversed.” 

I stared at it. She was right. Everything was reversed. 

“Maybe the camera is broken,” I said. I let out a long sigh of relief. “You’re 
okay, 

Shari. The camera doesn’t work.” 


28 



“Maybe,” she said. She handed me the negative. I slid it into my pocket. When I 
looked up, she had a strange smile on her face. 

An evil smile. 

“Shari—what’s your problem?” I asked. 

I should have known. I should have guessed what she planned to do. I should 
have moved faster. 

She grabbed the camera with both hands. Spun it around. Pointed it in my face. 
And flashed a picture. 

“Hey!” I tried to duck away from the lens. 

Too late. She caught me. 

“Shari—that’s not funny!” I cried. 

“It won’t hurt you,” she replied. “The camera is broken—remember?” 

I pulled the square from the slot in front of the camera. 

My throat suddenly felt dry. Is it broken? I wondered. Will this one be a 
negative, 

too? 

Or will it show me howling in pain with a nail through my foot—or something 
even worse? 

As I stared at the small square, my imagination ran wild. I pictured my body 

stretched out like a rubber band. I pictured myself tugging at an arrow through 
my 



chest. I pictured myself lying mashed under a huge steamroller. 

“Shari—how could you do this to me?” I groaned, watching the colors darken. 

Her dark eyes flashed. “You’re really scared,” she said. “Admit it, Greg. You’re 

really scared. Now maybe you get it. Maybe you see why I didn’t want you to 
bring 

the camera to school.” 

My hand trembled. I gripped the snapshot with both hands. 

The colors darkened. 

“It’s not a negative,” I said. 

Shari stepped up behind me and stared down at the photo. 

“Oh, noooo!” we both cried at the same time. 

Shari started to laugh. 

“I don’t believe this!” I wailed. 


29 



13 

“This is horrible !” I shrieked. 

I recognized my face. But I didn’t recognize my body. 

At first, I thought my head was resting on top of a giant balloon. Then I realized 
that the giant balloon was me. 

In the photo, I weighed about four hundred pounds! 

No joke. Four hundred pounds! 

I gaped at the photo, studying my round face and my even rounder body. I had 

about eight chins. My cheeks were puffed way out. The collar of my T-shirt was 

hidden under one of my flabby chins. The shirt was stretched tight over my chest 
and 

only came down to my belly, which bulged nearly to the ground. 

I looked like a really gross mountain of pudding! 

“Stop laughing!” I snapped at Shari. “It isn’t funny!” 

“It’s very funny,” she insisted. She grabbed the photo, raised it to her face, and 

started laughing all over again. “You’re bigger than Sumo One and Sumo Two!” 
she 

exclaimed. 

I grabbed the photo back. I stared at the folds of flab hanging down from my 
cheeks. My face was so huge and puffy, my eyes looked like tiny pig eyes. 

And my stomach! My stomach hung down over my fat knees! 



“Are you still going to bring the camera to school?” Shari asked. “You won’t 
change your mind?” 

“I have to show it to Mr. Saur,” I told her. “I’m just going to show him the 
camera. And the picture of Jon.” 

“And the picture of you?” she asked, grinning. 

“No way.” I shoved it into my jeans pocket. “I don’t want anyone to see it. 
Ever.” 

Shari glanced at her watch. “Come on,” she said. “We’d better hurry! We’re 
late.” 

She started to run down the sidewalk, and I followed her. 

All the way to school, I kept picturing my photo. Kept picturing my flabby face, 
my enormous four-hundred-pound body. 

Don’t worry about it, I told myself. 

The camera is broken. There’s nothing to worry about. 

Nothing to worry about. 

But guess what? I was worried. 

The halls were nearly empty when Shari and I arrived at school. The first bell 
had 

already rung. 

30 

I hid the camera under a bunch of stuff on the floor of my locker. I didn’t have 



Mr. Saur’s English class until just before lunch. And I didn’t want to take a 
chance of 

Brian or Donny or somebody else grabbing the camera and messing around with 
it. 

I slammed the locker shut and locked it. Then I waved to Bird and Michael, who 
were hurrying into their classroom. 

I wanted to tell them I had the camera. And I wanted to tell them about Jon and 
the nail in his foot. 

But I decided I’d better keep quiet. 

Michael and Bird agreed with Shari. They didn’t want me to take the camera out 
again. They were too afraid of it. 

And, they were probably right. 

I slid into class just as the final bell rang. I ducked low in my seat, trying not to 

be noticed. I had a long time to wait until Mr. Saur’s class. 

Today was the first day ever that I couldn’t wait for Sourball’s class to begin! 

Once again, I didn’t hear a word my other teachers said. In social studies, Mrs. 

Wackman was rattling on about bauxite production in South America. I wanted 
to 

raise my hand and ask her what bauxite is! I’ve always wondered about bauxite. 

I 

think it’s some kind of South American car. But I’m not sure. 

Her voice faded into the background. My mind was busy practicing my speech 
to 



Mr. Saur. 


“Mr. Saur,” I planned to say, “you made a terrible mistake yesterday. But I’m not 
going to hold it against you. I know you will be fair and change the grade on my 
report as soon as I show you this.” 

Whoa. 

That’s too stiff, I told myself. That doesn’t sound like me at all. I’ll never be able 
to get those words out. 

I tried a different approach. “Here’s the evil camera, Mr. Saur. And here’s a 

picture it took of a boy I met. A minute later, the picture came true. You asked 
me to 

bring in proof—and here it is.” 

That’s better, I decided. It’s straight to the point. 

Will he believe me? 

He’ll have to, I thought. Photos don’t lie. 

He’ll have to change my grade. 

I stared at the wall clock over the chalkboard. Why was it moving so slowly? 
Why? 

Finally, the bell rang. I jumped up, ran out the door, and dove for my locker. Bird 
called to me from down the hall. But I pretended I didn’t hear him. 

I pulled the camera from its hiding place and slammed the locker door shut. I 
tucked it carefully under my arm, protecting it. 



I saw Sumo One and Sumo Two across the hall. They were shoving a fifth 
grader 

up against a locker. Making him bounce back like a yo-yo. That’s their hobby. 
Making kids bounce. 

And guess who is one of their favorite bouncers? 

That’s right. Me. 

31 

I spun around and hurried the other way. I didn’t feel like bouncing today. And I 
didn’t want Brian and Donny to set their eyes on the camera. 

I took the long way around to Mr. Saur’s class, jogging the whole way. I held the 
camera snugly and practiced my speech. 

A group of kids were talking in front of the classroom, blocking the door. “Make 

way!” I cried, pushing through them. I wanted to see Mr. Saur before the bell 
rang. 

I stepped into the room. Blinked against the bright sunlight streaming through 
the 

windows. 

I turned and ran breathlessly toward Mr. Saur’s desk. 

But I stopped halfway there. 

My heart skipped a beat. And I let out a cry of dismay. 


32 



14 


“May I help you?” asked the young woman sitting behind Mr. Saur’s desk. “Are 
you 

okay?” 

I stared at her with my mouth hanging open to my knees. I didn’t answer her 
questions. I gripped the camera tightly in both hands, afraid I might drop it. 
“Where—where’s Mr. Saur?” I finally managed to choke out. 

“He’s not feeling well,” she replied, studying me. “I’m Ms. Rose. I’m 
substituting today.” 

“He—he’s not here?” I stammered in a high, shrill voice. 

She nodded. “I’ll be teaching the class today. Is there anything I can help you 
with?” 

I glanced down at the camera. “No,” I muttered unhappily. “No. You can’t help 
me.” 

The room was never this noisy when Mr. Saur sat behind the desk. Kids were 

shouting and laughing. Someone tossed a balled-up piece of paper at me. It 
bounced 

off my shoulder and onto Ms. Rose’s desk. I heard loud laughter from the back 
of the 

room. 

We always give substitutes a really hard time. 



When a teacher doesn’t show up, it’s always time to celebrate. But I didn’t feel 
like celebrating today. I was so disappointed. 

I started to my seat—then turned back to Ms. Rose. “Can I put this in my 
locker?” I asked, holding up the camera. “It will only take a second. My locker is 
right out there.” I pointed to the hall. 

The final bell rang. She held her hands over her ears. The bell was on the ceiling 
right over her desk. 

“Okay,” she said when the clanging stopped. “But hurry back. I’m going to be 
talking about the subjunctive tense today. And you don’t want to miss that.” 
Thrills and chills, huh? 

I thanked her and hurried to the door. The long hall stood empty. Everyone was 
in class. 

My sneakers thudded loudly on the hard floor. My mind was racing. Thinking 

about Mr. Saur. And about the camera. I’ll have to leave it in my locker until he 
gets 

back, I decided. 

I promised Jon I’d keep it only for one day. 

But what choice did I have? 

I turned the corner—and bumped into Brian and Donny. 

“Hey—” Brian grunted. 

“Hey—” Donny greeted. 



33 


They say “Hey” a lot. I think it’s their favorite word. 

“You guys are late,” I said, trying to hurry past them. 

But they blocked my way with their big, wide bodies. 

“Sourball isn’t here,” Donny said, grinning. “He’s sick or something. So we’ve 
got a substitute.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered. 

“So we’re in no hurry,” Brian said. “Why should we hurry for a substitute?” 

I tried to slip between them. But they were too quick for me. They squeezed 
together, and I bounced back off them. 

“We’re going to switch places.” Brian grinned. “I’m going to tell her I’m Donny. 
And Donny is going to say he’s me.” 

“Good joke,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “Very original. Now, can I get by?” 

“No way,” Donny said, puffing up his big chest and leaning over me menacingly. 
“You have to pay a toll if you want to pass,” Brian demanded. He stuck out his 
big paw for money. 

“How much is the toll?” I sighed. 

“How much have you got?” Brian shot back. 

They both guffawed and slapped high fives. They really think they’re funny. 
“I’ve got to get to my locker,” I insisted. 



I tried once again to push past them—and Brian grabbed the camera. 

“Hey!” I reached for it with both hands. But Brian raised it high over his head. 
“Look—Greg brought his magic camera to school,” he told Donny. 

“Oooh—I’m scared!” Donny replied sarcastically. He pretended to shiver and 
shake. 

“But the camera is bad!” Brian exclaimed, holding it out of my frantic reach. 
“It’s 

cursed, Donny! You remember Greg’s report.” 

Donny’s ugly grin grew wider. “You mean the report he got an F on?” 

They both had another good laugh. 

“Let’s check it out,” Brian declared. “Say cheese, Greg.” 

He lowered the camera to his eye and aimed it at me. 

“No—please!” I pleaded. I made another grab for the camera. 

But Donny grabbed me and pinned my arms behind my back. “Go ahead. Snap 
it,” he told Brian. “Let’s put a curse on Greg. Snap his picture.” 


34 



15 


“No—please!” I begged. 

Donny wrapped his huge paws tightly around me and pinned my arms against 
my 

back. 

“The camera really is cursed!” I protested. “You don’t know what you’re doing! 
Stop!” 

Brian ignored me, of course. He held the camera to his eye—and raised his 
finger 

over the shutter button. 

“Brian—please!” I wailed. 

I saw his finger lower over the button. 

Then a loud voice called, “What’s going on here, guys?” 

Brian cried out and nearly dropped the camera. Donny dropped my arms and 
stumbled back against the wall. 

“Mr. Grand!” I exclaimed. 

He’s the principal of Pitts Landing Middle School. Mr. Grand is young and has 

blond wavy hair and a really good tan. He looks more like a surfer than a 
principal. 

The girls in our school all have crushes on him. 

For once, I was glad to see him. 



“Where should you guys be right now?” he asked, glancing up at the clock on 
the 

wall. 

“Uh... we’re going to Mr. Saur’s class,” Donny replied, turning bright red. 

“We were just helping Greg with his camera,” Brian added. He handed the 
camera back to me. 

“That looks like a valuable old camera,” Mr. Grand said to me. “You should be 
careful with that, Greg.” 

“I’m trying,” I said. “I’m going to lock it in my locker right now.” 

I pushed past Sumo One and Sumo Two and hurried down the hall. As I reached 

my locker, I heard Mr. Grand scold them: “Get to class, guys. And don’t give 
your 

substitute a hard time—okay?” 

“Okay,” Brian promised. 

“No problem,” Donny agreed. 

I met Shari after school, and we walked home together. “What’s up?” I asked. 

“I got an A on my math test,” she announced. 

“Big surprise. You always get As in math,” I reminded her. 

“So? Maybe I like to brag.” 

I felt a little strange. Tired. Kind of weak. I stopped about half a block from my 
house and tugged off my backpack. 



35 


“What’s your problem?” Shari demanded. “Why do you keep fiddling with that 
backpack?” 

“I think someone messed with it,” I said, loosening the straps. “I had it just right. 
And now it’s too tight.” 

“Why would anyone mess with your backpack?” Shari demanded. She blew a 
bubble-gum bubble nearly as big as her head. 

I stuck out a finger and popped it. 

“Yuck!” she cried out as it stuck all over her face. “Are you impressed? That was 

my biggest one ever,” she declared. “Wish I had a picture of it.” 

“Don’t say picture,” I grumbled. “Don’t say the words picture or camera.” I had 

already told her at lunch about Mr. Saur not showing. 

“Where is the camera?” she asked, pulling gum from her hair. 

“Locked up safe in my locker,” I said. I turned and saw Michael and Bird 
mnning 

down the sidewalk toward us. 

“Did you tell Michael and Bird I have the camera?” I asked Shari. 

She shook her head. “No. They’d be too upset. After all the horrible things it did 

last summer, they never want to see that camera again. And neither do I,” she 
added, 


glaring at me. 



“Hey—what’s up?” Bird called. He slapped me on the back so hard, I stumbled 
off the curb. 

Michael laughed. “You guys doing anything?” 

“Not much,” I replied, straightening my backpack. I still couldn’t get it 
comfortable. 

“Get your bikes,” Michael urged. “Come on. It’s a great day to ride around.” 
“Sounds good,” I agreed. Anything to get my mind off Mr. Saur and that stupid 
camera. 

“Let’s meet at my house,” Shari suggested. “I have to ask my mom first.” 
Michael and Bird jogged toward their houses. Shari and I crossed the street and 
headed to our homes, which are side by side. 

Mom and Dad were at work. Terry wasn’t home from high school yet. I dropped 

the backpack in the front hall. Pulled a box of juice from the refrigerator and 
drank it 

in two long sips from the straw. 

I still felt weak. Kind of lifeless. I thought maybe a long bike ride would help get 
my energy back. 

My jeans felt uncomfortable. A little tight. I ran to my room and pulled on my 

pair of really baggy shorts. Mom and Dad always teased me about these shorts. 
They 

say there’s room enough for a friend inside them. 



But I like them. I think they’re cool. And they’re really comfortable. I usually 
don’t wear them when I ride my bike. They’re so long and baggy, sometimes the 
cuffs get caught in the chain. 

I hurried outside and found Shari, Michael, and Bird waiting for me on their 

bikes. “Let’s go, Greg,” Bird urged. “It’s starting to get cloudy.” 

I pulled open the garage door and stepped inside, careful to walk around the 
black 

oil stains on the concrete floor. I took my bike from against the wall and walked 
it 

out onto the driveway. 

36 

Then, I did my high-flying circus riding trick. It’s my favorite way of getting on 

my bike. I lean on the handlebars and heave myself up in the air. Then I come 
flying 

down on the seat. 

Up I went. Pushed my body into the air. 

Swung my legs in the air. Dropped onto the seat. 

And both tires popped. 

I heard the explosion and then a whoosh of air as the tires flattened against the 
drive. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I cried. 


37 



16 

“Whoa!” Shari cried. 

Michael and Bird burst out laughing. 

“Nice tires,” Michael said. 

“Maybe you should go on a diet!” Bird exclaimed. 

“Huh? A diet?” I repeated, swallowing hard. I knew that Bird was only joking. 
But his words sent a chill down my back. 

The snapshot flashed into my mind. The ugly snapshot from the evil camera. 

I saw myself all bloated and huge. Like an enormous saggy water balloon. 

I felt my face go hot and knew that I was blushing. I saw my friends staring at 
me. I climbed off my bike. “Guess I jumped too hard,” I murmured. 

“Maybe you need a tricycle,” Michael cracked. 

No one laughed. Michael’s jokes never make any sense. 

I squatted down and examined the tires. I ran my hands along the rubber—and 
found two big holes. Two blowouts. And they were new tires, too. 

I dragged the bike back into the garage. “I’ll take Terry’s old bike,” I told my 
friends. 

I actually like my brother’s bike better than mine. It’s a twelve-speed, and mine 
is 

only ten. He hardly ever rides it now that he’s got his driver’s license. But he 
doesn’t 



like me riding it. 

“Better not sit on it!” Bird suggested. “Maybe you should just walk it!” He and 

Michael laughed and slapped each other’s hands. 

“Ha-ha,” I said. “You guys are as funny as a flat tire.” 

“No. We’re as funny as two flat tires!” Michael joked. 

“Maybe you need a mountain bike,” Bird said. “Something sturdy.” 

“Maybe you need a sturdy punch in the face,” I threatened. 

“Just don’t sit on me!” Michael exclaimed, raising both hands in front of him as 
if 

to shield himself from me. 

“Are we going to ride or not?” Shari demanded, sighing. She glanced up at the 
graying sky. “If we don’t hurry, we’re going to get caught in the rain.” 

I eased myself carefully onto Terry’s bike. Then I followed them down the 
driveway and into the street. 

We rode aimlessly around town. When we reached the long, narrow park a few 
blocks from school, we bumped onto the grass and raced as fast as we could. 

Bird has the best bike and the longest legs. So he always wins our races. 

After about an hour, it started to drizzle, so we turned for home. I was glad. My 
legs felt heavy. My muscles ached. 

As we pedaled through the raindrops, I caught Shari watching me. Studying me. 


38 



Despite the sweat rolling down my forehead, I suddenly felt cold all over. Why 
is 

she staring at me like that? I wondered. 

Why? 

The next morning, I woke up with two words on my lips: Mr. Saur. 

Today is the day I show him the camera, I told myself, stretching and yawning. 
And today is the day I get my grade changed. 

I stood up, still yawning. Rubbed my eyes. And saw that my pillow had fallen to 
the floor during the night. 

When I bent over to pick it up, I felt a tug on the front of my pajama shirt. The 
buttons all popped off and scattered over the floor. 

“Huh?” I opened my mouth in surprise—and heard a long rrrrrrip. It took a few 
seconds to realize that my pajama bottoms had ripped right up the back. 

“Oh, nooooo.” I opened my mouth in a long, low moan. 

The collar of the pajama shirt dug tightly into my neck. I tried to loosen it—and 
both sleeves ripped at the shoulder! 

My heart pounding, I straightened up and crossed the room to the mirror. 

My whole body was trembling as I stepped up to the mirror. 

I shut my eyes. I couldn’t bear to look. 

But I had no choice. I had to see. I had to know. 

Slowly, slowly, I opened one eye, then the other. I took a deep breath and gazed 



at my reflection. 

Had the snapshot come true? Did I weigh four hundred pounds? 
39 



17 


I leaned into the mirror and stared at myself. 

No. Not four hundred pounds. 

I didn’t look too different. A little puffy. My cheeks were a little rounder. My 
shoulders were broader. 

I stepped back to check out the rest of my body—and Mom came walking into 
the room. “Greg, what are you doing? You’re going to be late for school.” 

I spun away from the mirror. “Mom—I grew last night!” I blurted out. “I—I 
ripped my pajamas.” 

She narrowed her eyes at the torn pajama top. “Greg, you didn’t grow 
overnight,” 

she said calmly. “Those pajamas always were a little small on you.” 

I turned back to the mirror. “They were?” 

Maybe Mom was right. Maybe I wasn’t growing huge. Maybe it was all in my 
imagination. 

I turned back to her. “How do I look?” 

She shrugged. “You look fine.” 

“I mean, do I look fatter to you?” 

She studied me for a moment. “Well, actually...” Her voice trailed off. 

“Actually what?” I demanded. 



“Maybe I’ll put skim milk on your cereal this morning,” she replied. 

“Hi, Greg. Putting on a little weight?” 

That’s how Mr. Saur greeted me when I hurried up to his desk before English 
class. 

His words sent a cold shiver down the back of my neck. But I ignored them. I 
held up the camera. “Mr. Saur, I want to show you something.” 

He lowered his eyes to the camera and frowned at it. “You want to take my 
picture? I already had my photo taken for the yearbook, Greg.” 

“No,” I replied. “This is the camera, Mr. Saur. This is the camera that—” 

He raised a hand to tell me to stop talking. “Not right now, Greg,” he said, 
climbing up from his desk chair. 

“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. 

He was gazing over my shoulder. I turned and saw Mr. Grand standing in the 
classroom doorway. Mr. Saur hurried over to talk to him. 

They talked until the bell rang. Then Mr. Saur returned to the front of the room 
to 

begin class. “I’m sorry I wasn’t here yesterday,” he announced. “I understand 
you 

had a wonderful time learning the subjunctive tense.” 

40 

I was still standing beside his desk, the camera in my hands. He stepped up to 
the 



chalkboard, turned, and saw me. 

“Greg, take your seat, please,” he said. “We have a lot to do today.” 

“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. I raised the camera. 

“Take your seat,” he insisted. 

I had no choice. I sighed and trudged to my chair near the back of the room. 

How can I prove that my report was true if he won’t even listen to me? I asked 
myself unhappily. 

“Today, we’re going to hear more of your reports about true things that happened 

to you,” Mr. Saur told the class. He turned to a girl in the front row. “Marci, I 
believe 

it is your turn. What is your report about?” 

Marci Ryder stood up. “It’s about my cat, Waffles. It’s about all the funny things 
Waffles does around the house.” 

I groaned. Bor-ring! I thought. A few other kids groaned, too. 

But Mr. Saur actually smiled. The first time ever! 

He practically purred! “I like cats,” he told Marci. “I have six of them myself.” 
Oh, yuck! I thought. Six cats! 

I can’t sit through a boring report about a boring cat! I told myself. 

I shot my hand into the air and waved it frantically. “Mr. Saur? Mr. Saur?” 

The teacher’s smile faded. “Greg—now what?” he demanded. 

“Uh... before Marci starts,” I said, “can I show you the camera? You know. The 



one from my report? You said if I brought it in and proved that it’s evil, you’d 
change my grade.” 

Mr. Saur rubbed his chin and frowned at me. “It’s Marci’s turn,” he replied 
coldly. “I know we all want to hear about Waffles.” 

“But, Mr. Saur—you promised!” I cried. 

A few kids snickered. My voice was so high, only dogs could hear it. 

“Greg, you’re not going to change my mind,” Mr. Saur insisted. 

“But I can prove it!” I pleaded. “I can prove the camera is evil.” 

A few more kids snickered. 

“Greg is evil!” Donny shouted. 

It got a big laugh. 

“Greg is baaaaad! ” some other kid shouted. 

Another big laugh. 

Mr. Saur slammed the chalkboard with his wooden pointer. “Quiet, everyone.” 

He sighed and motioned me forward. “Okay, Greg. One minute. It isn’t fair to 
the 

others to give you extra time. But I’ll give you one minute to show off your 
camera.” 

One minute! 

I knew that’s all I needed. 

I felt my shirt pocket to make sure I had the snapshot of Jon inside. I knew that 



once Sourball saw that photo and heard what happened to Jon that night, he’d 
believe 

me. 

“Come on, Greg,” the teacher urged. “Get up here. One minute.” 

“Coming,” I said. I eagerly tried to stand up. 

41 

Tried again. 

Again. 

We have those chairs with the desk attached to the front. 

And I was stuck in the chair. Too fat to get out! 

42 



18 


What is happening to me? I wondered, feeling panic creep up from my stomach. 
My 

big blobby stomach. 

I climbed into this chair without any problem. That was less than an hour ago. 

And now I’m stuck in here. I must have put on a hundred pounds while I was 
sitting 

here! 

“Greg, we’re waiting.” Mr. Saur rolled his eyes and tapped the chalkboard 
impatiently with the pointer. 

On the fourth try, I finally managed to slide out of the seat. Carrying the camera 
carefully, I tromped up to the front of the room. 

“This is the camera,” I told Mr. Saur. “My friends and I found it in a deserted 
house. Just as I said in my report. The camera has a curse on it, and—” 

He took the camera from my hands and examined it. He rolled it over and over. 
He brought it up close to his face. He raised the viewfinder to his eye. 

“No—don’t!” I shrieked. “Don’t take a picture!” 

He lowered the camera. “If I don’t take a picture, how will I know if the camera 
is evil or not?” 

I reached into my shirt pocket. “I brought a photo,” I told him. “This will prove 
I’m telling the truth.” 



My fingers were so fat, I had trouble poking them into the pocket. My hands felt 
like squishy balls of dough. They were too blobby to make a fist! 

I nearly pulled the pocket off as I struggled to take out the snapshot of Jon. 
Finally, I pulled it out and shoved it in Mr. Saur’s face. “Here. Look!” 

He took the snapshot and studied it. 

“That boy is named Jon,” I told him. “I took his picture two nights ago. He was 

perfectly okay. But the photo showed him with a nail through his foot. Two 
minutes 

later, it came true. Jon got a nail in his foot, and his dad had to rush him to the 
hospital.” 

Mr. Saur burst out laughing. 

Another first. The first time he’d ever laughed in class! 

“It’s not funny,” I insisted. “Poor Jon was in so much pain. He—” 

“I’ve seen those trick nails,” Mr. Saur said, his eyes on the photo. 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand him. 

He handed the photo back to me. “I used to have a fake arrow,” he said. “When I 
slid it on, it looked as if I had an arrow going straight through my head. So I 
understand how you made it appear that this boy has a nail through his foot.” 
“No! It’s real! It’s real!” I cried. “Look how much pain Jon is in! Look at his 
face!” 


43 



“Your friend is a good actor,” Mr. Saur replied. 

“No!” I shrieked. “He isn’t my friend! I don’t even know him! You’ve got to 
believe me! You’ve got to!” 

Mr. Saur glanced up at the clock. “Your minute is up.” 

“But you promised—!” I cried. 

“Greg, go sit down,” he ordered. “You’re not going to fool me with an old 
camera and a joke snapshot.” 

“You lose, Greg!” Donny shouted. 

“You’re evil, Greg!” Brian chimed in. 

Everyone laughed. I could feel my face growing hot. I knew I must be beet-red. 

I felt ready to explode. I was embarrassed and hurt and angry—all at the same 
time. 

“I’d give you an A for effort,” Mr. Saur said cruelly. “But I’m still giving you an 
F for your report. F for fake! ” 

Everyone laughed again. 

I couldn’t take it anymore. 

I let out a cry of fury—and went running for the door. 

At least, I tried to run. But I was too heavy to move fast. I could only waddle. 
“Greg—where are you going?” I heard Mr. Saur call. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him and lumbered to the door. I had the camera tucked 



under one flabby arm. I pulled the door open with the other. 

And bounced out into the silent, empty hall. 

I could hear Mr. Saur calling me from the classroom. And I could hear the kids 
laughing and talking excitedly. 

I slammed the door shut behind me and kept moving. 

I didn’t know where I was going. I didn’t have a plan. I was so angry. I wanted 
to 

scream and cry and punch the walls. 

I turned the corner—and saw Shari down the hall. 

“Greg!” she called, surprised to see me. “What’s going on?” 

She was wearing a short black skirt over blue tights. She started to run down the 
hall toward me. 

She took about four steps—and then cried out as her skirt fell down! 


44 



19 

“I don’t believe this!” Shari wailed. 

We both stared down at her skirt, which had fallen around her ankles. 

She dropped her books and bent to pull it up. 

Normally, I would have burst out laughing. But she seemed so upset, I just stood 
there. 

“I—I’m losing weight,” she stammered, straightening the skirt around her waist. 
“I weighed myself this morning. I’ve lost eight pounds!” 

“Oh, wow!” I shook my head. Why was she losing weight? 

I tried to cheer her up. “Uh... eight pounds isn’t so much,” I said. I knew it was 
lame. But I couldn’t think of anything else. 

“Greg—I only weighed ninety to start!” she replied sharply. “Now I’m down to 
eighty-two. I can’t keep my skirt up. All my clothes hang on me!” 

“Maybe if you eat a really big lunch...” I started. 

“You’re no help!” she snapped. 

“Look at me!” I cried, holding my arms out so she could see my big stomach. “I 

think I put on two hundred pounds overnight! A few minutes ago, I couldn’t get 
out 

of my chair!” 

Her eyes checked me out. She was so upset about being skinny, she hadn’t even 



looked at me. 


She squinted hard at me. Then she burst out laughing. “Oh, gross. You look 
really 

weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch,” I sighed. 

“What are we going to do?” she demanded. “Why is this happening to us?” 

I started to answer—but I heard footsteps approaching from down the hall. 

Shari heard them, too. “Let’s go,” she urged. “Quick—help me pick up my 
books.” 

I bent to pick up the books—and the back of my jeans burst open with a loud 
rrrrrrip. 

After school, Bird and Michael and some other kids started up a softball game 
on the 

diamond behind school. I didn’t want to play. I didn’t want them to see how 
huge I 

was getting. 

But they pulled me onto the diamond and forced me to play first base. 

Maybe they won’t notice anything different, I thought. I crossed my fingers and 
hoped. Maybe they won’t notice that I’ve filled out a bit—since this morning! 

My T-shirt was stretched against my bulging stomach. The shirt was so tight, I 
could barely move my arms. My ripped jeans fit over my legs like tights. 


45 



Maybe they won’t notice, I told myself as I tried to trot out to first base. Maybe 
they won’t notice. 

“Hey, Greg—” Bird called from the pitcher’s mound. “Have you been super¬ 
sizing all your meals?” 

Everyone whooped and laughed. A few guys rolled around on the grass, giggling 
like hyenas. 

Michael pointed at me. “Hey—it’s Sumo Three!” he yelled. 

“It’s Sumo Three and Four!” someone else called out. 

More loud whooping and laughing. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered angrily. 

“Give him a lunch break!” Michael called. 

It wasn’t funny. But everyone laughed, anyway. 

They gathered around me in a wide circle. They shook their heads. “Weird,” 
Bird 

muttered. “How did you put on two hundred pounds since yesterday?” 

I didn’t want to talk about it. “Are we going to play ball or what?” I demanded. 

I had a strong urge to tell Bird and Michael why I was ballooning up so fast. I 
wanted to tell them that I had taken out the evil camera. That Shari had taken my 
picture. That it showed me weighing at least four hundred pounds. 

And now it was coming true. 

But I didn’t dare tell them. They had warned me not to go back to the Coffman 



house. And they had begged me not to take out the camera. 

If I told them the truth, they’d think I was a total jerk. 

So I kept my mouth shut and tried to concentrate on the game. 

I did pretty well until I went to bat in the third inning. I hit the ball over the 

second baseman’s head and trotted to first base with a single. 

I was totally out of breath by the time I reached the base. But the ball was still 

rolling around in the outfield. “Keep running!” my teammates shouted. “Greg— 
go to 

second!” 

So, huffing and puffing, I lifted my heavy legs and made my way to second. 
“Slide! Slide!” everyone was shouting. 

So I slid into second. Safe! 

And then I couldn’t get off my back. 

I wasn’t strong enough to pick up my heavy body. I must look like Humpty- 
Dumpty! I realized. 

I tried rolling. I tried rocking back and forth. 

And then I tried calling my friends for help. 

* * * 

I was exhausted by the time I pulled my huge body to my house. Sweat poured 
off 

my forehead and rolled down my round cheeks and chins. 



My clothes were stretched so tight, I could barely breathe. My jeans were ripped. 
My shirt pressed against my skin. Even my sneakers pinched my feet! 

This is horrible! I’ve got to get into something comfortable, I decided. 

46 

I remembered my huge, baggy shorts. The ones I wore to go bike riding the 
other 

day. 

I carried my bulky body over to the dresser. Bent over with a groan and pulled 
out the big shorts. 

I tugged them on, eager to get comfortable. 

Tugged. Tugged harder. Then gasped in horror. 

The huge, baggy shorts were skintight! 


47 



20 


I put on nearly three hundred pounds that day. By evening, I could barely walk. 
“It’s an allergic reaction,” Mom said. 

I stared at her. “Excuse me? What’s that?” 

“You ate something you’re allergic to,” she answered. “A person doesn’t swell 
up 

like a balloon overnight.” 

Dad squinted at me. He was trying to look calm, but I could see how worried he 
was. “Do you eat a lot of candy bars after school?” he asked. 

Mom shook her head at Dad. “He could eat a thousand candy bars a day! They 
wouldn’t make him this huge!” she declared. 

“We’d better take him to an allergy doctor,” Dad murmured, rubbing his chin. 
“We’ll take him to Dr. Weiss first,” Mom argued. “Dr. Weiss can tell us what 
kind of doctor to take him to.” 

They started to argue about what kind of doctor I needed. 

I waddled out of the room. It took all my strength just to raise my enormous legs. 
My chins sagged down over my neck. My big stomach bounced out of the room 
ahead of me. 

I knew that no doctor could help me. I knew I didn’t have an allergy. And I knew 
I didn’t become a blimp because of candy bars. 



The snapshot from the evil camera made me look as big as a mountain. And the 
snapshot had come true. 

No doctor could slim me down. No diet would work. 

Later, I begged Mom and Dad to let me stay home. “Please don’t make me go to 
school tomorrow like this,” I pleaded. “The kids will laugh at me. I’ll be so 
embarrassed.” 

“You can’t miss school,” Dad insisted. “What if it takes weeks and weeks to get 
you back to normal?” 

“The kids won’t laugh at you,” Mom added. “Your friends will understand that 
you’re sick.” 

I begged and whined. I even got down on my fat knees to plead with them. 

But would they listen? No. 

“Don’t be embarrassed,” Dad said as I waddled out the door to go to school the 
next 

morning. 

Don’t be embarrassed? 

I wore one of his baggy running suits—and it was tight on me! 

48 

I felt embarrassed just walking down the street. When cars drove past, I knew 
the 

people inside were staring at me. Laughing at the big mound of Jell-0 bouncing 



along the sidewalk. 

I didn’t want to walk to school. But my parents have a Honda Civic—and I 
didn’t 

fit in the car! 

Kids were staring as I squeezed through the front door of Pitts Landing Middle 

School. But everyone was kind. No one made jokes. In fact, no one said a word 
to 

me. 

I think they were afraid to come up to me. Afraid I might fall on them! I really 
did look like one of the balloons in the Thanksgiving Day parade! 

The morning went pretty well. I kept to myself and tried to hide in corners. It 
wasn’t easy to hide. But everyone left me alone. 

Until I stepped into Mr. Saur’s class. 

He was as sour as ever. And he embarrassed me in front of the whole class. 
“Greg, I don’t think you’ll fit into a chair,” he said, rolling his wooden pointer 
between his hands. “Why don’t you just stand by the window.” 

I didn’t say anything. I waddled over to the side of the room. 

The room fell silent. The other kids didn’t laugh. They could see that there was 
something seriously wrong with me. 

But Mr. Saur insisted on giving me a hard time. 

“Greg, forget the window,” he said. “If you stand there, I’m afraid you’ll block 



out all the sunlight.” Then he smiled. 

Again, no one laughed. I think the other kids felt sorry for me. Even Donny and 
Brian weren’t cracking jokes. 

“Greg, I want you to go see the nurse,” Mr. Saur ordered. “I want her to discuss 
the four food groups with you. I think you’ve been eating too much of all four!” 

I think that was supposed to be a cruel joke. But no one laughed. 

I turned my bulk around and stared at him. Was he serious? Was he really 
sending me to the nurse? 

“Get going,” he said, pointing to the door. 

I turned and shuffled heavily out of the classroom. I expected Donny to stick out 

his big foot and try to trip me, the way he always does. 

But he stared straight ahead, as silent and still as everyone else in the class. 

I was glad. If he tripped me, I knew I’d never be able to get up. 

I pulled myself down the hall, thinking angry thoughts about Mr. Saur. Why did 

he make fun of me in front of everyone? Why was he so cruel? 

I couldn’t answer my questions. Besides, I felt too angry to think clearly. I’ll pay 

him back some day. That’s what I told myself. I’ll do something mean to him. 
I’ll 

embarrass old Sourball in front of everyone. 

My angry thoughts followed me to the nurse’s office. But I instantly forgot them 
when I saw the girl huddled in the chair in the waiting room. I stopped outside 



the 


door and gaped at her in shock. 

Shari! 

It took me a few seconds to recognize her. 

49 

Her jeans and T-shirt appeared to be about ten sizes too big! Her arms were as 

thin as toothpicks. Her face was pale and puckered. Her head had shrunk. It 
looked 

like a tiny lemon on her frail, noodlelike body. 

“Greg,” she whispered weakly. “Is that you in that big body?” 

“Shari!” I cried. “How much weight have you lost?” 

“I—I don’t know,” she stammered. “Look at me! I’m shrinking away. I’m so 

light. It took me hours to walk to school this morning because the wind kept 
pushing 

me back!” 

“Are you sick?” I cried. 

She frowned at me. “I’m not sick, and neither are you,” she replied in a tiny, frail 

voice. “I’m shrinking away, and you’re bloating up—and it’s because of those 
photos 

we took.” 

I sighed and lifted my huge stomach with both hands so that I could get through 
the doorway. “What are we going to do, Shari?” I whispered. “It’s those photos. 



You’re right. But what are we going to do?” 
50 



21 


Dad picked me up after school. He had rented a van since I couldn’t fit into the 
car. 

Dad helped me squeeze through the door. My body took up the entire backseat. 
The seat belt wouldn’t stretch over my stomach. So we had to forget about it. 
“I’m sure Dr. Weiss will have you back to normal in no time,” Dad said. He was 
trying to be cheerful. But I could tell he was really upset and worried. 

He drove slowly to Dr. Weiss’ office across town. The van couldn’t pick up 
speed because of all the weight it carried—me! 

Dr. Weiss is a nice elderly man with bright blue eyes and a long mane of white 

hair. He talks to all the kids as if they’re two years old. He still gives me a 
lollipop 

after each visit, even though I’m twelve! 

But I didn’t think he’d give me a lollipop today. 

He tsk-tsked as I climbed on the scale. But he couldn’t get my weight. The scale 
didn’t go high enough! 

He had trouble listening to my heartbeat. His stethoscope got stuck in the folds 
of 

flab over my chest. 

He took all kinds of tests, his expression tense and thoughtful. “We’ll send the 
blood samples to the lab,” he told me. “We should have some answers in a few 



days.” 

He shook his head and frowned. His blue eyes appeared to fade. “I’ve never seen 
anything like it, Greg,” he said softly. “I’m completely stumped.” 

I wasn’t stumped. I knew exactly what the problem was. 

As soon as I got home, I lumbered to my room and grabbed the phone. It took all 
my strength to raise my huge, flabby arm and hold the receiver up to the bulging 
flesh of my face. 

I punched in Shari’s number. It took three tries. My finger was so fat, it kept 
hitting two numbers at once. 

She answered on the third ring. “Hello?” Her voice floated out so tiny and weak, 
I could barely hear her. 

“I’m coming over,” I announced. “And I’m bringing the camera.” 

“You don’t have to shout!” she squeaked. And then she added, “Hurry, Greg. 
I’ve 

lost five more pounds. I’m so light, I’m afraid I’m going to float away.” 

“I’ll be right there,” I told her. “We’ll figure out a way to save ourselves.” 

I hung up the phone. Then I carefully dug the camera out from its hiding place in 

my underwear drawer. I had to bend over to reach into the drawer. I was huffing 
and 

puffing, gasping for breath. 

If I get any fatter, I’ll explode, I thought unhappily. 



51 


Carefully gripping the camera, I lowered my bulk down the stairs. “I’m going to 
Shari’s,” I called to my parents. 

They were in the den, discussing what Dr. Weiss had told Dad. 

“It started to rain,” Mom called. “Take an umbrella.” 

“I’m only going next door!” I shouted back. 

Besides, an umbrella wouldn’t cover all of me. 

I peeked outside. It was only drizzling. Not much of a rain at all. 

I tucked the camera under the folds of my arm, pulled open the front door, and 
started to step out. But I stopped when I saw the dark-haired boy walking up the 
driveway. 

Jon! 

“Oh, no!” I murmured. I knew why he had come. He wanted his camera back. 
But I couldn’t give it back. I needed it to save Shari and me. 

I watched him walking slowly, his head down because of the rain. 

What am I going to do? I asked myself. I can’t let him take back his camera. I 
can’t! 

I’ll duck back inside and hide, I decided. 

I tried to back up. Tried to back my heavy bulk into the house. 


Too late. 



Jon saw me. 


52 



22 


He waved to me and started jogging toward the house. 

I had the camera in my hand. I carefully lowered it to the porch and stepped in 

front of it. I knew it would be hidden behind my enormous body. 

But what was I going to say to Jon? How could I convince him to let me keep 
the 

camera for a while longer? 

“Hi!” he called. 

“Hi,” I answered, my voice muffled by the thick folds of flab around my face. 

“I’m looking for a boy who lives around here,” Jon said, stepping up to the 
porch. 

“His name is Greg, and he’s blond, and he’s about my age. Do you know him? 
He 

has a camera of mine.” 

I stared at him. My mouth dropped open. I could feel my chins drop onto my 
chest. 

“What’s his name?” I choked out. 

“Greg,” Jon repeated. “I don’t know his last name. Does he live around here?” 

He doesn’t recognize me! I realized. I’m so huge, he doesn’t know that I’m me! 
“Uh... yeah. I think I know who you mean,” I told him. “There’s a kid named 
Greg who lives over there.” I pointed up the street. 



“Do you know which house?” Jon asked, turning to where I pointed. 

“It’s about four blocks that way,” I lied. “A big redbrick house. You can’t miss it. 
It’s the only brick house on the block.” 

“Hey, thanks,” Jon said. The rain started to come down harder. He turned quickly 
and jogged down the driveway. 

A close call, I thought. 

I felt bad about lying to Jon. But I had to lie. I couldn’t give him back the 
camera—ever. It was too dangerous. 

I watched him until he disappeared behind some hedges. Then, I reached my 
flabby hand down, picked up the camera, and bounced across the front yard to 
Shari’s house. 

Shari greeted me at her front door. I could see the shock in her eyes when she 
saw 

how huge I had become. 

I was shocked, too. I cried out in surprise. She was starting to look like a stick 
figure! 

As she led the way to her room, she kept tripping over the cuffs of her jeans, 
which sagged down over her feet. She had tied a knot in the belt around her tiny 
waist, an attempt to keep the jeans from falling off. 

“If I get any smaller, I’ll have to wear doll clothes!” she wailed. 


53 



“Did your parents take you to a doctor?” I asked, huffing and puffing as I tried to 
drag my weight after her. 

“Of course,” she replied in her tiny, weak voice. “The doctor said to make me 
drink milk shakes five times a day!” 

“I wish my doctor said that.” I sighed. 

I lowered myself carefully onto her bed. I didn’t want the bed to collapse under 
me. But as soon as I sat down, I heard a crunching sound. The sound of wood 
splintering. 

And the bed crashed loudly to the floor. 

“Don’t worry about it,” Shari said softly. “I don’t have the strength to climb up 
to 

bed, anyway.” 

“If I get any bigger,” I moaned, “I won’t be able to get out of the house. I really 
won’t fit through the door.” 

She folded her hands in front of her. Her fingers were so skinny, they looked like 
bird claws. With her black hair hanging down from her tiny, round head, and her 
straight pole of a body, she looked more like a mop than a person! 

“What are we going to do?” she wailed. 

I patted the camera with a fat, spongy hand. “I brought this,” I said. “I thought 
maybe—” 

“What good will that stupid camera do?” Shari cried. “I wish I’d never seen it! 



Never! Never!” 


“I have an idea,” I told her. I flicked a fly off one of my chins. 

She hugged herself, wrapping her skinny arms around her toothpick body. “What 
kind of an idea?” 

“Let’s take new pictures of ourselves,” I said. “Maybe the new pictures will 
show 

us looking normal. Maybe the new pictures will change us back to the way we 
were 

before.” 

She raised her eyes to mine. I could see her thinking about it, thinking hard. “It’s 
kind of risky—isn’t it?” she said finally. 

“Do you have a better idea?” I asked. 

She thought hard again. Then she lowered her eyes to the camera. “Okay,” she 
agreed. “Let’s do it.” 


54 



23 


I struggled to climb to my feet. But my arms and legs were barely strong enough 
to 

push up my huge body. 

Before I could move, Shari flew across the room. She grabbed the camera from 
my lap. 

“Oh!” she cried out as she nearly dropped it. “It feels so heavy!” 

“That’s because you’re so light,” I told her. I tried again to lift my bulk off the 
bed. And failed again. 

“Sit still,” Shari ordered. “I’ll take your picture first.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I hope the new photo shows me skinny.” I tried to cross my 
fingers. But they were too fat to cross! 

“Say cheese,” Shari said, aiming the camera at me. 

“Don’t be funny,” I snapped. “Just take the picture.” 

She stared through the viewfinder. Raised her finger over the shutter button. 

Then she lowered the camera with a sigh. “It—it’s too dangerous,” she 
stammered. 

“Shari—take my picture!” I insisted. “Look at us! We couldn’t be any worse 
off—could we?” 

She nodded in agreement. Then, with a sigh, she raised the camera to her eye 



again. It felt so heavy in her skinny arms, she had to hold it up with both hands. 
“Here goes,” she said softly. “I hope it shows you normal again, Greg.” 

She snapped the picture. The flash made me blink. 

A second later, the white square slid out from the front of the camera. She 
carried 

it over to the bed and dropped lightly down beside me. 

“Let’s see it!” I cried, eagerly grabbing for it. 

“Careful!” Shari warned. “If you fall over, you’ll crush me!” 

I gasped. She was right. Sitting next to me could be extremely dangerous. 
“Maybe you’d better stand up,” I suggested. 

She climbed to her feet, swaying because she wasn’t used to being so light. “It’s 
starting to develop,” she announced. 

She held the snapshot in front of me so we could both watch it. The yellow filled 
in first. I squinted to see if I could make out my face. 

Was it fat in the photo? Or back to normal? 

The yellow was too pale. I couldn’t see my face at all. 

Shari and I both were frozen there, staring at the small square. Not moving a 
muscle. Not blinking. Watching it darken. 

And suddenly, I could see myself. 

My huge blobby face. My round, balloon body. 


55 



Still enormous. Still enormously fat. 

“Noooooooo!” I let out a long cry of horror. “Noooooooo! I want to be changed 
back!” 

Shari was shaking her tiny head sadly, still staring at the darkening photo. 
“What’s that on your face?” she cried. “Yuck!” 

I grabbed the snapshot from her and held it close. “Oh, no!” I groaned. “My 
skin—it’s all scaly. I look like an alligator or something!” 

Shari grabbed back the photo and studied it. “The scaly stuff is on your arms, 
too,” she said. “It looks like reptile skin or something.” 

And as she said that, I started to itch. 

I glanced down and saw red scales covering my arms. Itchy red patches. I started 
to scratch. But the scratching made the scales itch even more. 

My skin flaked off under my fingernails. 

“Oh, yuck!” I moaned. “It itches so bad!” 

I scratched my arms. Then I scratched my face. More dry skin peeled off as I 
scratched. Chunks of skin. 

Shari took a step back. She let the new photo fall to the carpet. “Oh, this is so 

horrible!” she declared. “You’re still huge—and now all your skin is cracking 
off!” 

“Ohh! My back itches so bad!” I wailed. “But I can’t reach it.” 

“I’m not going to scratch it for you!” Shari declared. “It—it’s too gross!” 



I pulled a chunk of scaly, red skin off the back of my hand. “Do you want me to 
take a new picture of you?” I asked Shari. “Maybe you’ll have better luck.” 

“No! No way!” she cried. She took another few steps back. “No new picture. It 
will only make things worse.” 

Her face twisted in disgust. She swallowed hard. “I’m sorry, Greg,” she choked 
out. “But you look so gross, I think I’m going to be sick.” 

I tried to scratch the back of my neck. But my arms were too fat. I couldn’t reach 
back there. 

I rubbed my forehead. A big chunk of skin dropped off and bounced on the 
carpet. 

“Let’s just rip up the photos!” Shari declared. 

“Huh?” I gaped at her. 

She bent to pick up the scaly new picture of me. “Let’s rip them all up,” she 
urged. “I’ll bet as soon as we rip them up, our bodies will return to normal.” 

I stopped my frantic scratching for a moment. “Do you think so? Do you think 
that’s all we have to do?” 

“Maybe,” Shari replied. “It’s worth a try—don’t you think?” 

I pulled the first two photos from my pocket. The negative of Shari and the first 
fat photo of me. 

“I’ll rip these two up,” I said. “You tear that one. We’ll see what happens.” 



We both held the photos up. I started to tear mine—then stopped. 

“Maybe if we rip them up, we’ll disappear completely!” I exclaimed. 

Shari and I stared at each other. Our hands stayed in the air, ready to tear the 
snapshots to pieces. 

56 

Should we do it? 

57 



24 


“No!” Shari cried. “Don’t do it!” 

We both lowered the snapshots. 

“You’re right,” I said. My whole body was shaking. “It’s too dangerous.” 

“If we tear the photos to pieces, we might be torn to pieces, too,” Shari said. “Or 
we might disappear completely and never come back.” 

I shuddered. “Let’s not talk about what might happen to us,” I moaned. “Look at 
us. What could be worse?” 

“A lot of things,” Shari sighed. “We’ll think of something to save ourselves, 

Greg. We just have to think positive.” 

I stared at her. “What did you say?” 

“I said, think positive,” she repeated. 

Think positive. 

“Shari—you just gave me a really good idea!” 

I cried. 

* * * 

We carried the snapshots to Kramer’s, the photo store where my brother works. 

It wasn’t easy to walk there. I had to stop to catch my breath every few steps. 

And I had to scratch my scaly, peeling skin. And I had to hold on to Shari to 
keep the 



wind from blowing her away. 

The walk was only about eight blocks. But it took us more than an hour. 

When we finally stepped inside the store, my heart sank to my knees. I didn’t see 
Terry. 

“He’s in the developing lab,” Mr. Kramer told me. He kept staring at Shari and 

me. I guess we looked pretty weird. A stick figure and an elephant. 

I pulled Shari to the lab in the back of the store and knocked on the door. You 

can’t just open the door and walk into the developing lab. If you let in the light, 
you 

destroy the film in there. 

We waited about five minutes. Then Terry came out. At first, he didn’t recognize 
me. I think he forgot that I had put on four hundred pounds in the past few days. 
“Yuck. What happened to your skin, Greg?” he demanded, making a disgusted 
face. “Have you got a rash or something?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied glumly. “Can you do me a favor, Terry?” 

He shrugged. “What’s the favor?” 

I held up the first two snapshots. The negative of Shari, and the positive of me 
weighing a ton. “Can you reverse these for us?” I asked. 

58 

He squinted at the two squares for a long while. “I don’t get you,” he said finally. 
I sighed. “Can you take the negative and make a positive of it? And can you take 



the positive and make a negative?” 

Shari let out a sharp cry. She realized what my plan was. 

Maybe if we reversed the pictures, it would reverse our bodies. 

Terry would make a positive of Shari’s negative, and she’d grow back to her 

normal size. Then he’d make a negative of my picture, and I’d shrink the way 
Shari 

had. 

It seemed to make sense. Was it worth a try? 

Definitely. 

Terry took the two snapshots. He studied them closely. He scratched his head. “I 

guess I could do it,” he said. “But I’m really busy in there. When do you need 
it?” 

“NOW!” Shari and I both cried. 

Terry stared at us, then down at the two photos. 

I scratched the back of my neck. My arms were so fat, I could barely lift them 

that high. In a few hours, I knew, I’d be too heavy to walk. Someone would have 
to 

wheel me around in a wheelbarrow. No—make that two wheelbarrows! 

“Please!” I begged. 

“I just don’t have time,” Terry said. 

“I’ll give you my allowance for the next two months!” I cried. 

“Okay. I guess I can find the time. It’s a deal,” Terry replied. “Wait out here.” 



He disappeared into the lab. We stood outside the door and waited. 

And waited. 

And waited. 

The longest half hour of my life. 

Mr. Kramer kept staring back at us from the front counter. Shari and I tried to 
ignore him. 

I wanted to sit down. Carrying so much weight made my feet hurt. But I was 

afraid if I took a seat, I’d break it. And I wouldn’t be able to get back up. 

So Shari and I stood outside the door to the lab. And thought about this new 
plan. 

Would it work? Would reversing the photos reverse us ? 

Finally, the door swung open and Terry stepped out. “Here,” he grunted. He 
handed me the new prints. “Don’t forget what you said about your allowance.” 

“I won’t,” I promised. “Thanks, Terry.” 

I gazed at the new prints. Terry had done it right. A positive of Shari, smiling 
into 

the camera. A negative of me, weighing four hundred pounds. 

“Now, get lost,” Terry said, glancing up to the front desk. “Go ahead. Beat it. 
Before you make me lose my job.” 

I took Shari’s hand and started to pull her to the front of the store. 

Poor Shari. She really did feel light as a feather. She looked even paler and 



skinnier than when we came into the store. Her hand felt like brittle bones. 

We stepped out of the store and stopped on the corner. I held the new prints up 
so 

we both could see them. 

“Is it working?” I asked her. “Do you feel any different?” 

59 

“Not yet,” she replied softly. 

“Neither do I,” I moaned. 

We stared at the new prints. And waited. 

We stood on that corner for at least half an hour. Staring and waiting. 

Waiting to feel different. Waiting for our bodies to change. 

But nothing happened. 

We didn’t change at all. 

“We’re doomed,” I murmured sadly. “Doomed.” 

A chunk of skin peeled off my forehead and dropped to the sidewalk. 


60 



25 


The next morning, I woke up early, before my alarm. I stretched and yawned. 
Then I 

turned and struggled to pull my huge body out of bed. 

“Heave-ho!” I cried, straining every muscle. 

And I went flying across the room! 

“Oww!” I groaned as I hit the wall. I bounced off. Dropped to the floor. Bounced 
up again. 

“What’s going on?” I cried out loud. 

And scrambled to the mirror. And stared at the reflection of my old face. My old 
body. 

No folds of sagging flesh. No puffed-out cheeks or bulging balloon of a belly. 
Me! 

I was back! 

I squeezed my arms. I mbbed my face. I pulled my hair. 

I felt so happy to see myself! 

I leaped onto the bed and started jumping up and down, tossing up my arms, and 
whooping and cheering at the top of my lungs. 

“It worked! It worked!” 

Reversing the photo had reversed me! 



“Yaaaaay!” I let out a cheer for myself. 

Mom and Dad burst into the room, still in their bathrobes. Frightened 
expressions 

on their faces. “Greg—what’s wrong?” 

And then they both froze with bulging eyes and opened mouths. 

Mom uttered a squeak of surprise. Dad goggled at me in shocked silence. 

“You—you’re you again!” Mom stammered finally. 

“You—you—you—” Dad struggled to say something, but he couldn’t. He 
pointed a finger at me and stuttered. 

And then they both rushed over and wrapped me in a tight hug. 

“I knew it was something you ate,” Mom said happily. “Some kind of food 
poisoning.” 

“Just an allergic reaction,” Dad added, finally able to speak. “I knew you’d be 
fine in a day or two.” 

“We knew you’d be fine,” Mom declared. 

“Yeah. Me, too,” I said. 

What a lie! 

“You were very good during all this trouble, Greg,” Mom said, wiping away a 
tear from her eye with the back of her hand. “You had such a good attitude.” 

61 

“Yeah. Well... I always try to think positive,” I told her. 



I gobbled down my breakfast and hurried next door to Shari’s house. As I ran up 
to 

the back door, she stepped out, grinning, waving her arms in the air in triumph. 
“It worked! It worked, Greg!” she cried happily. 

She came running toward me, her black hair flying behind her head, laughing 
and 

cheering. Back to normal. 

Back to normal! 

Whooping and shouting, the two of us did a wild “Back to Normal” dance in her 
backyard. 

When we stopped to catch our breath, Shari turned to me. “We’d better hurry. 

We’re going to be late for school. I can’t wait to show everyone that I’m me 
again.” 

“Me, too!” I cried. “But wait right here. I have to get something in my room. I’ll 
be right back.” 

I turned and started jogging quickly across the grass to my house. 

“What are you getting?” Shari called, following me. 

“The camera,” I shouted back. 

She ran faster. Caught up with me. Grabbed my shoulders and pulled me to a 

stop. “Greg—the camera? Why do you need the camera?” 

I narrowed my eyes at her. My expression turned serious. I lowered my voice to 
a 



whisper. 


“For revenge,” I replied. 
62 



26 


“Greg—don’t!” Shari pleaded. 

I ignored her. I knew what I wanted to do. I knew what I had to do. 

I ran into the house. Took the stairs two at a time up to my room. Pulled the 
camera from its hiding place. And hurried back outside. 

Shari was waiting for me on the sidewalk. “Greg—this is crazy,” she insisted. 
“What are you going to do?” 

I couldn’t stop an evil smile from spreading across my face. “I’m going to take 
Mr. Saur’s picture,” I told her. 

“NO!” she gasped. “Greg—you can’t!” 

“Watch me,” I replied, still grinning. 

“But—but—but—” she sputtered. 

I started walking toward school, taking long strides. I gripped the camera tightly 
in both hands. 

“Greg—something terrible will happen!” Shari protested. 

“I know,” I said, unable to stop grinning. “Old Sourball deserves it.” 

“But, Greg—” She tried to stop me. But I jogged faster, moving away from her. 

“He deserves it,” I repeated. “He refused to believe a true story. He called me a 

liar in front of the whole class. And he gave me an F. An F for a really good 
report.” 



“But, Greg—” Shari started. 

I didn’t let her get a word in. I was too worked up. The closer we came to school, 
the more excited I got about my revenge plan. 

“He’s going to ruin my whole summer,” I continued. “And he’s wrong, wrong, 

wrong! And then, when I got so huge, Sourball was really cruel. He made jokes 
about 

me in front of everyone. He embarrassed me, Shari. He totally embarrassed me.” 
“Greg—” 

“He wanted to hurt my feelings,” I declared. I could see our school through the 

trees in the next block. “He wanted to embarrass me in front of the whole class. 
He 

deserves what he’s going to get.” 

“So what are you going to do?” she demanded breathlessly. 

I stopped at the corner. “He dared me to prove that the camera is evil. So I’m 

going to prove it—and get my revenge at the same time.” 

* * * 

I slipped into class just as the final bell rang. The other kids were already in their 
seats, just getting quiet. 

Mr. Saur had his back turned. He was writing something on the chalkboard. 


63 




I stepped up behind him. And waited for him to turn around. 

My heart thudded in my chest. My hands were shaking so much, I could barely 
hold the camera. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

This was my big moment. My big chance. 

“Mr. Saur—?” I called softly. 

He spun around, as if I had shouted. “Greg!” he cried. “You’re looking very 
slender.” 

I ignored his words. I raised the camera to my eye. 

Time for revenge, I thought. 

“I brought the camera,” I told him. My voice came out high and shrill. 

“Remember? The camera from my report? You asked me to prove that it’s evil. 
So 

here goes!” 

I centered his startled face in the viewfinder. 

I raised my finger over the shutter button. 

He grabbed the camera from my hands. 

“Oh, yes! The evil camera!” he declared, staring down at it. “Don’t waste it on 



me. Let’s take everyone’s picture!” 

“No!” I cried. 

He waved his hand. “Donny and Brian—move in closer.” Then he shoved me in 
front of him. “Get in the shot, Greg.” 

“No!” I pleaded. “Mr. Saur—no!” 

“Say cheese, everyone!” 

The camera flashed. 

The white square photo slid out. 

Mr. Saur smiled at me. “I think I got everyone in class in the shot,” he said. 
“Now 

what’s going to happen?” 

I swallowed hard. “Uh... we’ll see,” I replied. “We’ll see.” 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
CSit jwkcmfeGiji 



r 

Be c 1 ihoH 

nou eon r l ml 

.--■j> . ••: •. _' ,,' f 

- i ji.■■ 

1 . 





















GHOST CAMP 


Goosebumps - 45 
R.L. Stine 





1 


“You know I get bus sick, Harry,” Alex groaned. 

“Alex, give me a break.” I shoved my brother against the window. “We’re 
almost there. Don’t start thinking about getting bus sick now!” 

The bus rumbled over the narrow road. I held onto the seat in front of me. I 
gazed out the window. 

Nothing but pine trees. They whirred past in a blur of green. Sunlight 
bounced off the dusty glass of the window. 

We’re almost to Camp Spirit Moon, I thought happily. 

I couldn’t wait to get off the bus. My brother, Alex, and I were the only 
passengers. It was kind of creepy. 

The driver was hidden in front of a green curtain. I had glimpsed him as 
Alex and I climbed on board. He had a nice smile, a great suntan, curly blond 
hair, and a silver earring in one ear. 

“Welcome, dudes!” he greeted us. 

Once the long bus ride began, we didn’t see him or hear from him again. 
Creepy. 

Luckily, Alex and I get along okay. He’s a year younger than me. He’s 
eleven. But he’s as tall as I am. Some people call us the Altman twins, even 
though we’re not twins. 

We both have straight black hair, dark brown eyes, and serious faces. Our 
parents are always telling us to cheer up—even when we’re in really good 
moods! 

“I feel a little bus sick, Harry,” Alex complained. 

I turned away from the window. Alex suddenly looked very yellow. His 
chin trembled. A bad sign. 

“Alex, pretend you’re not on a bus,” I told him. “Pretend you’re in a car.” 

“But I get carsick, too,” he groaned. 

“Forget the car,” I said. Bad idea. Alex can get carsick when Mom backs 
down the driveway! 

It’s really a bad-news habit of his. His face turns a sick yellow. He starts to 
shake. And then it gets kind of messy. 

“You’ve got to hold on,” I told him. “We’ll be at camp soon. And then 



you’ll be fine.” 

He swallowed hard. 

The bus bounced over a deep hole in the road. Alex and I bounced with it. 

“I really feel sick,” Alex moaned. 

“I know!” I cried. “Sing a song. That always cures you. Sing a song, Alex. 
Sing it really loud. No one will hear. We’re the only ones on the bus.” 

Alex loves to sing. He has a beautiful voice. 

The music teacher at school says that Alex has perfect pitch. I’m not sure 
what that means. But I know it’s a good thing. 

Alex is serious about his singing. He’s in the chorus at school. Dad says 
he’s going to find a voice teacher for Alex this fall. 

I stared at my brother as the bus bounced again. His face was about as 
yellow as a banana skin. Not a good sign. 

“Go ahead—sing,” I urged him. 

Alex’s chin trembled. He cleared his throat. Then he began to sing a Beatles 
song we both really like. 

His voice bounced every time the bus bumped. But he started to look better 
as soon as he started to sing. 

Pretty smart idea, Harry, I congratulated myself. 

I watched the pine trees whir past in the sunlight and listened to Alex’s 
song. He really does have an awesome voice. 

Am I jealous? 

Maybe a little. 

But he can’t hit a tennis ball the way I can. And I can beat him in a swim 
race every time. So it evens out. 

Alex stopped singing. He shook his head unhappily. “I wish Mom and Dad 
signed me up for the music camp.” He sighed. 

“Alex, the summer is half over,” I reminded him. “How many times do we 
have to go over this? Mom and Dad waited too long. It was too late.” 

“I know,” Alex said, frowning. “But I wish—” 

“Camp Spirit Moon was the only camp we could get into this late in the 
summer,” I said. “Hey, look—!” 

I spotted two deer outside the window, a tall one and a little baby one. They 
were just standing there, staring at the bus as it sped by. 

“Yeah. Cool. Deer,” Alex muttered. He rolled his eyes. 

“Hey—lighten up,” I told him. My brother is so moody. Sometimes I just 



want to shake him. “Camp Spirit Moon may be the coolest camp on earth,” I 
said. 

“Or it may be a dump,” Alex replied. He picked at some stuffing that poked 
up from a hole in the bus seat. 

“The music camp is so great.” He sighed. “They put on two musicals each 
summer. That would have been so awesome!” 

“Alex, forget about it,” I told him. “Let’s enjoy Camp Spirit Moon. We only 
have a few weeks.” 

The bus suddenly screeched to a stop. 

Startled, I bounced forward, then back. I turned to the window, expecting to 
see a camp out there. But all I could see were pine trees. And more pine trees. 

“Camp Spirit Moon! Everybody out!” the driver called. 

Everybody? It was just Alex and me! 

The driver poked his blond head out from behind the curtain. He grinned at 
us. “How was the ride, dudes?” he asked. 

“Great,” I replied, stepping into the aisle. Alex didn’t say anything. 

The driver climbed out. We followed him around to the side of the bus. 
Bright sunlight made the tall grass sparkle all around us. 

He leaned into a compartment and pulled out our bags and sleeping bags. 
He set everything down on the grass. 

“Uh... where’s the camp?” Alex asked. 

I shielded my eyes with my hand and searched around. The narrow road 
curved through a forest of pine trees as far as I could see. 

“Right through there, dudes,” the driver said. He pointed to a dirt path that 
cut through the trees. “It’s a real short walk. You can’t miss it.” 

The driver shut the baggage compartment. He climbed back onto the bus. 
“Have a great time!” he called. 

The door shut. The bus roared away. 

Alex and I squinted through the bright sunlight at the dirt path. I swung my 
duffel bag over my shoulder. Then I tucked my sleeping bag under one arm. 

“Shouldn’t the camp send someone out here to greet us?” Alex asked. 

I shrugged. “You heard the driver. He said it’s a very short walk.” 

“But still,” Alex argued. “Shouldn’t they send a counselor to meet us out 
here on the road?” 

“It’s not the first day of camp,” I reminded him. “It’s the middle of the 
summer. Stop complaining about everything, Alex. Pick up your stuff, and let’s 



get going. It’s hot out here!” 

Sometimes I just have to be the big brother and order him around. 
Otherwise, we won’t get anywhere! 

He picked up his stuff, and I led the way to the path. Our sneakers crunched 
over the dry red dirt as we made our way through the trees. 

The driver hadn’t lied. We’d walked only two or three minutes when we 
came to a small, grassy clearing. A wooden sign with red painted letters 
proclaimed camp spirit moon. An arrow pointed to the right. 

“See? We’re here!” I declared cheerfully. 

We followed a short path up a low, sloping hill. Two brown rabbits scurried 
past, nearly in front of our feet. Red and yellow wildflowers swayed along the 
side of the hill. 

When we reached the top, we could see the camp. 

“It looks like a real camp!” I exclaimed. 

I could see rows of little white cabins stretching in front of a round blue 
lake. Several canoes were tied to a wooden dock that stuck out into the lake. 

A large stone building stood off to the side. Probably the mess hall or the 
meeting lodge. A round dirt area near the woods had benches around it. For 
campfires, I guessed. 

“Hey, Harry—they have a baseball diamond and a soccer field,” Alex said, 
pointing. 

“Excellent!” I cried. 

I saw a row of round red-and-white targets at the edge of the trees. “Wow! 
They have archery, too,” I told Alex. I love archery. I’m pretty good at it. 

I shifted the heavy duffel bag on my shoulder. We started down the hill to 
the camp. 

We both stopped halfway down the hill. And stared at each other. 

“Do you notice anything weird?” Alex asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I do.” 

I noticed something very weird. Something that made my throat tighten and 
my stomach suddenly feel heavy with dread. 

The camp was empty. 

No one there. 



2 


“Where is everyone?” I asked, moving my eyes from cabin to cabin. No one in 
sight. 

I squinted at the lake behind the cabins. Two small, dark birds glided low 
over the sparkling water. No one swimming there. 

I turned to the woods that surrounded the camp. The afternoon sun had 
begun to lower itself over the pine trees. No sign of any campers in the woods. 

“Maybe we’re in the wrong place,” Alex said softly. 

“Huh? Wrong place?” I pointed to the sign. “How can we be in the wrong 
place? It says Camp Spirit Moon—doesn’t it?” 

“Maybe they all went on a field trip or something,” Alex suggested. 

I rolled my eyes. “Don’t you know anything about camp?” I snapped. “You 
don’t go on field trips. There’s nowhere to go!” 

“You don’t have to shoutl” Alex whined. 

“Then stop saying such stupid things!” I replied angrily. “We’re all alone in 
the woods in an empty camp. We’ve got to think clearly.” 

“Maybe they’re all in that big stone building over there,” Alex suggested. 
“Let’s go check it out.” 

I didn’t see any signs of life there. Nothing moved. The whole camp was as 
still as a photograph. 

“Yeah. Come on,” I told Alex. “We might as well check it out.” 

We were still about halfway down the hill, following the path through the 
tangles of pine trees—when a loud cry made us both stop and gasp in surprise. 

“Yo! Hey! Wait up!” 

A red-haired boy, in white tennis shorts and a white T-shirt, appeared beside 
us. I guessed he was sixteen or seventeen. 

“Hey—where did you come from?” I cried. He really startled me. One 
second Alex and I were alone. The next second this red-haired guy was standing 
there, grinning at us. 

He pointed to the woods. “I was gathering firewood,” he explained. “I lost 
track of the time.” 

“Are you a counselor?” I asked. 

He wiped sweat off his forehead with the front of his T-shirt. “Yes. My 



name is Chris. You’re Harry and you’re Alex—right?” 

Alex and I nodded. 

“I’m sorry I’m late,” Chris apologized. “You weren’t worried, were you?” 

“Of course not,” I replied quickly. 

“Harry was a little scared. But I wasn’t,” Alex said. Sometimes Alex can 
really be a pain. 

“Where is everyone?” I asked Chris. “We didn’t see any campers, or 
counselors, or anyone.” 

“They all left,” Chris replied. He shook his head sadly. When he turned 
back to Alex and me, I saw the frightened expression on his face. 

“The three of us—we’re all alone out here,” he said in a trembling voice. 



3 


“Huh? They left?” Alex cried shrilly. “But—but—where did they go?” 

“We can’t be all alone!” I cried. “The woods—” 

A smile spread over Chris’ freckled face. Then he burst out laughing. 
“Sorry, guys. I can’t keep a straight face.” He put his arms around our shoulders 
and led us toward the camp. “I’m just joking.” 

“Excuse me? That was a joke?” I demanded. I was feeling very confused. 

“It’s a Camp Spirit Moon joke,” Chris explained, still grinning. “We play it 
on all the new campers. Everyone hides in the woods when the new campers 
arrive at camp. Then a counselor tells them that the campers all ran away. That 
they’re all alone.” 

“Ha-ha. Very funny joke,” I said sarcastically. 

“You always try to scare the new campers?” Alex asked. 

Chris nodded. “Yeah. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. We have a lot of 
great traditions here. You’ll see. Tonight at the campfire—” 

He stopped when a big black-haired man—also dressed in white—came 
lumbering across the grass toward us. “Yo!” the man called in a booming, deep 
voice. 

“This is Uncle Marv,” Chris whispered. “He runs the camp.” 

“Yo!” Uncle Marv repeated as he stepped up to us. “Harry, what’s up?” He 
slapped me a high five that nearly knocked me into the trees. 

Uncle Marv grinned down at Alex and me. He was so huge —he reminded 
me of a big grizzly bear at the zoo back home. 

He had long, greasy black hair that fell wildly over his face. Tiny, round 
blue eyes—like marbles—under bushy black eyebrows. 

His arms bulged out from under his T-shirt. Powerful arms like a wrestler’s. 
His neck was as wide as a tree trunk! 

He reached down and shook Alex’s hand. I heard a loud crunch and saw 
Alex gasp in pain. 

“Good firm handshake, son,” Uncle Marv told Alex. He turned to me. “Did 
Chris play our little 'Alone in the Woods’ joke on you guys?” His voice boomed 
so loud, I wanted to cover my ears. 

Does Uncle Marv ever whisper? I wondered. 



“Yeah. He fooled us,” I confessed. “I really thought there was no one here.” 

Uncle Marv’s tiny blue eyes sparkled. “It’s one of our oldest traditions,” he 
said, grinning. What a grin! It looked to me as if he had at least six rows of teeth! 

“Before I take you to your cabin, I want to teach you the Camp Spirit Moon 
greeting,” Uncle Marv said. “Chris and I will show it to you.” 

They stood facing each other. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Uncle Marv bellowed. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Chris boomed back. 

Then they gave each other a left-handed salute, placing the hand on the 
nose, then swinging it straight out in the air. 

“That’s how Camp Spirit Moon campers greet each other,” Uncle Marv told 
us. He pushed Alex and me together. “You two try it.” 

I don’t know about you, but this kind of thing embarrasses me. I don’t like 
funny greetings and salutes. It makes me feel like a jerk. 

But I had just arrived at camp. And I didn’t want Uncle Marv to think I was 
a bad sport. So I stood in front of my brother. “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” I shouted. 
And I gave Alex a sharp nose salute. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Alex showed a lot more enthusiasm than I did. He 
likes this kind of thing. He flashed me a sharp salute. 

Uncle Marv tossed back his head in a loud, bellowing laugh. “Very good, 
guys! I think you’re both going to be great Camp Spirit Moon campers.” 

He winked at Chris. “Of course, the campfire tonight is the real test.” 

Chris nodded, grinning. 

“The campfire tonight?” I asked. “A test?” 

Uncle Marv patted my shoulder. “Don’t worry about it, Harry.” 

Something about the way he said that made me worry a lot. 

“All new campers come to a Welcoming Camp-fire,” Chris explained. “It’s 
a chance to learn our Camp Spirit Moon traditions.” 

“Don’t tell them any more about it,” Uncle Marv told Chris sharply. “We 
want them to be surprised—don’t we?” 

“Surprised—?” I choked out. 

Why did I suddenly have such a bad feeling? Why did my throat tighten up 
again? Why did I have a fluttering feeling in my chest? 

“Do we sing camp songs at the Welcoming Campfire?” Alex asked. “I’m 
really into singing. I take voice lessons back home and—” 

“Don’t worry. You’ll sing. Plenty,” Uncle Marv interrupted in a low, almost 



menacing voice. 

I caught the cold look in his tiny eyes—cold as blue ice. And I felt a shiver 
roll down my back. 

He’s trying to scare us, I thought. It’s all a joke. He’s having fun with us. He 
always tries to scare new campers. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. 

“I think you boys will enjoy the campfire tonight,” Uncle Marv boomed. “If 
you survive it!” 

He and Chris shared a laugh. 

“Catch you later,” Chris said. He gave Alex and me a nose salute and 
vanished into the woods. 

“This will be your bunk,” Uncle Marv announced. He pulled open the 
screen door of a tiny white cabin. “Whoa!” He nearly pulled the door off its 
hinges. 

Alex and I dragged our duffels and sleeping bags into the cabin. I saw bunk 
beds against three of the walls. Narrow wooden chests of drawers. Cubbyholes 
for storing things. 

The walls were white. A light dangling from the ceiling cast a bright glow. 
The afternoon sun sent orange rays through a small window above one of the 
bunk beds. 

Not bad, I thought. 

“That bunk is free,” Uncle Marv told us, pointing to the bed against the 
window. “You can decide who gets the top and who gets the bottom.” 

“I need the bottom,” Alex said quickly. “I toss and turn a lot at night.” 

“And he sings in his sleep,” I told Uncle Marv. “Do you believe it? Alex is 
so into singing, he doesn’t even stop when he’s sleeping!” 

“You will have to try out for the talent show,” Uncle Marv told Alex. And 
then he repeated in a low voice, “If you survive tonight.” He laughed. 

Why did he keep saying that? 

He’s kidding, I reminded myself. Uncle Marv is just kidding. 

“The boys’ cabins are on the left,” Uncle Marv told us. “And the girls’ 
cabins are on the right. We all use the lodge and mess hall. It’s that big stone 
building near the woods.” 

“Should we unpack now?” Alex asked. 

Uncle Marv pushed back his greasy black hair. “Yes. Use any cubbies that 
are empty. You’d better hurry, guys. The rest of the campers will be back from 
the woods soon with firewood. It will be time for our campfire.” 



He gave us a “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” and a sharp nose salute. 

Then he turned and lumbered away. The screen door slammed hard behind 

him. 

“Fun guy,” I muttered. 

“He’s kind of scary,” Alex admitted. 

“He’s just joking,” I said. “All summer camps try to terrify the new 
campers. I think.” I dragged my duffel bag over to the bed. 

“But it’s all in fun. There’s nothing to be scared about, Alex,” I told my 
brother. “Nothing at all.” 

I tossed my sleeping bag into the corner. Then I started toward the low 
dresser to see if I could find an empty drawer. 

“Whoa—!” I cried out as my sneaker stuck on something. 

I peered down. 

A blue puddle. 

My sneaker had landed in a sticky blue puddle. 

“Hey—” I tugged my sneaker out. The blue liquid was thick. It stuck to the 
bottom and sides of my shoe. 

I glanced around the room. 

And saw more blue puddles. A sticky blue puddle in front of every bed. 
“What’s going on here? What is this stuff?” I cried. 



4 


Alex had his bag open and was pulling stuff out and spreading it on the bottom 
bed. “What’s your problem, Harry?” he called without turning around. 

“It’s some kind of blue slime,” I replied. “Check it out. There are puddles 
all over the floor.” 

“Big deal,” Alex muttered. He turned and glanced at the blue liquid stuck to 
my sneaker. “It’s probably a camp tradition,” he joked. 

I didn’t think it was funny. “Yuck!” I exclaimed. I reached down and poked 
my finger into the tiny, round puddle. 

So cold! 

The blue slime felt freezing cold. 

Startled, I pulled my hand away. The cold swept up my arm. I shook my 
hand hard. Then I rubbed it, trying to warm it. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

Of course, everything got a lot weirder. In a hurry. 

“Campfire time!” 

Uncle Marv’s cry through the screen door shook our cabin. 

Alex and I spun to face the door. It had taken us forever to unpack our stuff. 
To my surprise, the sun had lowered. The sky outside the door was evening gray. 

“Everyone is waiting,” Uncle Marv announced. A gleeful smile spread over 
his face. His tiny eyes practically disappeared in the smile. “We all love the 
Welcoming Campfire.” 

Alex and I followed him outside. I took a deep breath. The air smelled fresh 
and piney. 

“Wow!” Alex cried out. 

The campfire was already blazing. Orange and yellow flames leaped up to 
the gray sky. 

We followed Uncle Marv to the round clearing where the fire had been 
built. And saw the other campers and counselors for the first time. 

They sat around the fire, all facing us. Watching us. 

“They’re all dressed alike!” I exclaimed. 

“The camp uniform,” Uncle Marv said. “I’ll get you and Alex your camp 



uniforms tonight after the campfire.” 

As Alex and I neared the circle, the campers and counselors rose to their 
feet. A deafening “YOHHHHHHHHHH, SPIRITS!” shook the trees. Then a 
hundred left-handed nose salutes greeted us. 

Alex and I returned the greeting. 

Chris, the red-haired counselor, appeared beside us. “Welcome, guys,” he 
said. “We’re going to roast hot dogs on the fire before the campfire activities 
begin. So grab a stick and a hot dog, and join in.” 

The other kids were lining up in front of a long food table. I saw a huge 
platter of raw hot dogs in the center of the table. 

As I hurried to get in line, several kids said hi to me. 

“You’re in my cabin,” a tall boy with curly blond hair said. “It’s the best 
cabin!” 

“Cabin number seven rules!” a girl shouted. 

“This is an awesome camp,” the kid in front of me turned to say. “You’re 
going to have a great time, Harry.” 

They seemed to be really nice kids. Up ahead, a boy and a girl were having 
a playful shoving match, trying to knock each other out of line. Other kids began 
cheering them on. 

The fire crackled behind me. The orange light from its flames danced over 
everyone’s white shorts and shirts. 

I felt a little weird, not being dressed in white. 

I was wearing an olive-green T-shirt and faded denim cutoffs. I wondered if 
Alex felt weird, too. 

I turned and searched for him in the line. He was behind me, talking 
excitedly to a short blond boy. I felt glad that Alex had found a friend so fast. 

Two counselors handed out the hot dogs. I suddenly realized I was starving. 
Mom had packed sandwiches for Alex and me to eat on the bus. But we were too 
excited and nervous to eat them. 

I took the hot dog and turned to the crackling fire. Several kids were 
already huddled around the fire, poking their hot dogs on long sticks into the 
flames. 

Where do I get a stick? I asked myself, glancing around. 

“The sticks are over there,” a girl’s voice called from behind me—as if she 
had read my mind. 

I turned and saw a girl about my age, dressed in white, of course. She was 



very pretty, with dark eyes and shiny black hair, pulled back in a ponytail that 
fell down her back. Her skin was so pale, her dark eyes appeared to glow. 

She smiled at me. “New kids never know where to find the sticks,” she 
said. She led the way to a pile of sticks leaning against a tall pine tree. She 
picked up two of them and handed one to me. 

“Your name is Harry, right?” she asked. She had a deep, husky voice for a 
girl. Like she was whispering all the time. 

“Yeah. Harry Altman,” I told her. 

I suddenly felt very shy. I don’t know why. I turned away from her and 
shoved the hot dog onto the end of the stick. 

“My name is Lucy,” she said, making her way to the circle of kids around 
the fire. 

I followed her. The kids’ faces were all flickering orange and yellow in the 
firelight. The aroma of roasting hot dogs made me feel even hungrier. 

Four girls were huddled together, laughing about something. I saw a boy 
eating his roasted hot dog right off the stick. 

“Gross,” Lucy said, making a disgusted face. “Let’s go over here.” 

She led me to the other side of the campfire. Something popped in the fire. 
It sounded like a firecracker exploding. We both jumped. Lucy laughed. 

We sat down on the grass, raised the long sticks, and poked our hot dogs 
into the flames. The fire was roaring now. I could feel its heat on my face. 

“I like mine really black,” Lucy said. She turned her stick and pushed it 
deeper into the flames. “I just love that burnt taste. How about you?” 

I opened my mouth to answer her—but my hot dog fell off the stick. “Oh 
no!” I cried. I watched it fall into the sizzling, red-hot blanket of flames. 

I turned to Lucy. And to my surprise—to my horror —she leaned forward. 

Stuck her hand deep into the fire. 

Grabbed my hot dog from the burning embers and lifted it out. 



5 


I jumped to my feet. “Your hand!” I shrieked. 

Yellow flames leaped over her hand and up her arm. 

She handed me the hot dog. “Here,” she said calmly. 

“But your hand!” I cried again, gaping in horror. 

The flames slowly burned low on her skin. She glanced down at her hand. 
Confused. As if she didn’t know why I was in such a panic. 

“Oh! Hey—!” she finally cried. Her dark eyes grew wide. “Ow! That was 
hot!” she exclaimed. 

She shook her hand hard. Shook it until the flames went out. 

Then she laughed. “At least I rescued your poor hot dog. Hope you like 
yours burned!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. I stared at her hand and arm. The flames 
had spread all over her skin. But I couldn’t see any burns. Not a mark. 

“The buns are over there,” she said. “You want some potato chips?” 

I kept staring at her hand. “Should we find the nurse?” I asked. 

She rubbed her arm and wrist. “No. I’m fine. Really.” She wiggled her 
fingers. “See?” 

“But the fire—” 

“Come on, Harry.” She pulled me back to the food table. “It’s almost time 
for the campfire activities to start.” 

I ran into Alex at the food table. He was still hanging out with the short 
blond boy. 

“I made a friend already,” Alex told me. He had a mouthful of potato chips. 
“His name is Elvis. Do you believe it? Elvis McGraw. He’s in our cabin.” 

“Cool,” I muttered. I was still thinking about the flames rolling up and 
down Lucy’s arm. 

“This is a great camp,” Alex declared. “Elvis and I are going to try out for 
the talent show and the musical.” 

“Cool,” I repeated. 

I grabbed a hot dog bun and tossed some potato chips on my plate. Then I 
searched for Lucy. I saw her talking to a group of girls by the fire. 



“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” a deep voice bellowed. No way anyone could 
mistake that cry. It had to be Uncle Marv. 

“Places around the council fire, everyone!” he ordered. “Hurry—places, 
everyone!” 

Holding plates and cans of soda, everyone scurried to form a circle around 
the fire. The girls all sat together and the boys all sat together. I guessed each 
cabin had its own place. 

Uncle Marv led Alex and me to a spot in the middle. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” he cried again, so loud the fire trembled! 

Everyone repeated the cry and gave the salute. 

“We’ll begin by singing our camp song,” Uncle Marv announced. 

Everyone stood up. Uncle Marv started singing, and everyone joined in. 

I tried to sing along. But of course I didn’t know the words. Or the tune. 

The song kept repeating the line, “We have the spirit—and the spirit has 

us.” 

I didn’t really understand it. But I thought it was pretty cool. 

It was a long song. It had a lot of verses. And it always came back to: “We 
have the spirit—and the spirit has us.” 

Alex was singing at the top of his lungs. What a show-off! He didn’t know 
the words, either. But he was faking it. And singing as loud as he could. 

Alex is so crazy about his beautiful singing voice and his perfect pitch. He 
has to show it off whenever he can. 

I gazed past my brother. His new friend, Elvis, had his head tossed back and 
his mouth wide open. He was singing at the top of his lungs, too. 

I think Alex and Elvis were having some kind of contest. Seeing who could 
sing the leaves off the trees! 

The only problem? Elvis was a terrible singer! 

He had a high, whiny voice. And his notes were all coming out sour. 

As my dad would say, “He couldn’t carry a tune in a wheelbarrow!” 

I wanted to cover my ears. But I was trying to sing along, too. 

It wasn’t easy with the two of them beside me. Alex sang so loud, I could 
see the veins in his neck pulsing. Elvis tried to drown him out with his sour, off- 
key wails. 

My face felt hot. 

At first, I thought it was the heat from the blazing campfire. But then I 
realized I was blushing. 



I felt so embarrassed by Alex. Showing off like that on his first night at 
camp. 

Uncle Marv wasn’t watching. He had wandered over to the girls’ side of the 
fire, singing as he walked. 

I slipped back, away from the fire. 

I felt too embarrassed to stay there. I’ll sneak back into place as soon as the 
song is over, I decided. 

I just couldn’t sit there and watch my brother act like a total jerk. 

The camp song continued. “We have the spirit—and the spirit has us,” 
everyone sang. 

Doesn’t the song ever end? I wondered. I backed away, into the trees. It felt 
a lot cooler as soon as I moved away from the fire. 

Even back here, I could hear Alex singing his heart out. 

I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself. I’ve got to tell him it isn’t cool to 
show off like that. 

“Ohh!” I let out a sharp cry as I felt a tap on my shoulder. 

Someone grabbed me from behind. 

“Hey—!” I spun around to face the trees. Squinted into the darkness. 

“Lucy! What are you doing back here?” I gasped. 

“Help me, Harry,” she pleaded in a whisper. “You’ve got to help me.” 



6 


A chill ran down my back. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered. 

She opened her mouth to reply. But Uncle Marv’s booming voice 
interrupted. 

“Hey, you two!” the camp director shouted. “Harry! Lucy! No sneaking off 
into the woods!” 

The campers all burst out laughing. I could feel my face turning hot again. 
I’m one of those kids who blushes very easily. I hate it—but what can I do? 

Everyone stared at Lucy and me as we made our way back to the fire. Alex 
and Elvis were slapping high fives and laughing at us. 

Uncle Marv kept his eyes on me as I trudged back. “I’m glad you make 
friends so easily, Harry,” he boomed. And all the campers started laughing at 
Lucy and me again. 

I felt so embarrassed, I wanted to shrivel up and disappear. 

But I was also worried about Lucy. 

Had she followed me to the woods? Why? 

Why did she ask me to help her? 

I sat down between Lucy and Elvis. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered. 

She just shook her head. She didn’t look at me. 

“Now I’m going to tell the two ghost stories,” Uncle Marv announced. 

To my surprise, some kids gasped. Everyone suddenly became silent. 

The crackling of the fire seemed to get louder. Behind the pop and crack of 
the darting flames, I heard the steady whisper of wind through the pine trees. 

I felt a chill on the back of my neck. 

Just a cool breeze, I told myself. 

Why did everyone suddenly look so solemn? So frightened? 

“The two ghost stories of Camp Spirit Moon have been told from 
generation to generation,” Uncle Marv began. “They are tales that will be told 
for all time, for as long as dark legends are told.” 

Across the fire, I saw a couple of kids shiver. 

Everyone stared into the fire. Their faces were set. Grim. Frightened. 

It’s only a ghost story, I told myself. Why is everyone acting so weird? 



The campers must have heard these ghost stories already this summer. So 
why do they look so terrified? 

I snickered. 

How can anyone be afraid of a silly camp ghost story? 

I turned to Lucy. “What’s up with these kids?” I asked. 

She narrowed her dark eyes at me. “Aren’t you afraid of ghosts?” she 
whispered. 

“Ghosts?” I snickered again. “Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts,” I told her. 
“And ghost stories never scare us. Never!” 

She leaned close to me. And whispered in my ear: “You might change your 
mind—after tonight.” 



7 


The flames flickered, crackling up to the dark, starry sky. Uncle Marv leaned 
into the orange firelight. His tiny, round eyes sparkled. 

The woods suddenly became quiet. Even the wind stopped whispering. 

The air felt cold on my back. I scooted closer to the campfire. I saw others 
move closer, too. No one talked. All eyes were on Uncle Marv’s smiling face. 

Then, in a low voice, he told the first ghost story.... 

A group of campers went into the woods for an overnight. They carried tents and 
sleeping bags. They walked single file along a narrow dirt path that twisted 
through the trees. 

Their counselor’s name was John. He led them deeper and deeper into the 
woods. 

Dark clouds floated overhead. When the clouds covered the full moon, the 
darkness swept over the campers. They walked close together, trying to see the 
curving path. 

Sometimes the clouds moved away, and the moonlight poured down on 
them. The trees glowed, silvery and cold, like ghosts standing in the forest. 

They sang songs at first. But as they moved deeper into the woods, their 
voices became tiny and shrill, muffled by the trees. 

They stopped singing and listened to the scrape of their footsteps and the 
soft rustlings of night animals scampering through the weeds. 

“When are we going to stop and set up camp?” a girl asked John. 

“We have to go deeper into the woods,” John replied. 

They kept walking. The air became colder. The trees bent and shivered 
around them in a swirling breeze. 

“Can we set up camp now, John?” a boy asked. 

“No. Deeper,” John replied. “Deeper into the forest.” 

The path ended. The campers had to make their way through the trees, 
around thorny bushes, over a deep carpet of crackling dead leaves. 

Owls hooted overhead. The campers heard the flutter of bat wings. 
Creatures scratched and slithered around their feet. 

“We’re really tired, John,” a boy complained. “Can we stop and set up the 



tents?” 

“Deeper into the woods,” John insisted. “An overnight is no fun unless you 
are deep, deep in the woods.” 

So they kept walking. Listening to the low hoots and moans of the night 
animals. Watching the old trees bend and sway all around them. 

Finally they stepped out into a smooth, wide clearing. 

“Can we set up camp now, John?” the campers begged. 

“Yes,” John agreed. “We are deep in the woods now. This is the perfect 
place.” 

The campers dropped all the bags and supplies in the middle of the clearing. 
Silvery moonlight spilled all around them, making the smooth ground shimmer. 
They pulled out the tents and started to unfold them. 

But a strange sound made them all stop their work. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“What was that?” a camper cried. 

John shook his head. “Probably just the wind.” 

They went back to the tents. They pushed tent poles into the soft, smooth 
ground. They started to unfold the tents. 

But the strange sound made them stop again. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

A chill of fear swept over the campers. 

“What is that sound?” they asked. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of animal,” John replied. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“But it sounds so close!” a boy cried. 

“It’s coming from right above us,” another boy said. “Or maybe beneath 

us!” 

“It’s just a noise,” John told them. “Don’t worry about it.” 

So they set up the tents. And they spread sleeping bags inside the tents. 
Ka-thump ka-thump. 

They tried to ignore the sound. But it was so close. So close. 

And such a strange—but familiar—sound. 

What could it be? the campers wondered. What on earth makes a sound like 

that? 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 



The campers couldn’t sleep. The noise was too loud, too frightening—too 

near. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

They burrowed deep into their sleeping bags. They zipped themselves in 
tight. They covered their ears. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

It didn’t help. They couldn’t escape the sound. 

“John, we can’t sleep,” they complained. 

“I can’t sleep, either,” John replied. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“What should we do?” the campers asked the counselor. 

John didn’t get a chance to answer. 

They heard another Ka-thump ka-thump. 

And then a deep voice growled: “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY 
HEART?” 

The ground shook. 

The campers suddenly realized what the frightening sound was. And as the 
ground rose up, they realized—too late—they had camped on the smooth skin of 
a hideous monster. 

“I guess we went too deep into the woods!” John cried. 

His last words. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

The monster’s heartbeat. 

And then its huge, hairy head lifted up. Its mouth pulled open. And it 
swallowed John and the campers without even chewing. 

And as they slid down the monster’s throat, the sound of the heartbeat grew 
louder and louder. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-THUMP! 

Uncle Marv shouted the last Ka-thump at the top of his lungs. 

Some campers screamed. Some gazed at Uncle Marv in silence, their faces 
tight with fear. Beside me, Lucy hugged herself, biting her bottom lip. 

Uncle Marv smiled, his face flickering in the dancing orange flames. 
Laughing, I turned to Elvis. “That’s a funny story!” I exclaimed. 

Elvis narrowed his eyes at me. “Huh? Funny?” 

“Yeah. It’s a very funny story,” I repeated. 



Elvis stared hard at me. “But it’s true!” he said softly. 



8 


I laughed. “Yeah. For sure,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

I expected Elvis to laugh. But he didn’t. The firelight flickered in his pale 
blue eyes as he stared at me. Then he turned to talk to my brother. 

A chill ran down my back. Why was he acting so weird? 

Did he really think I’d believe a crazy story like that was true? 

I’m twelve years old. I stopped believing in things like the Easter Bunny 
and the Tooth Fairy a long time ago. 

I turned to Lucy. She was still hugging herself, staring intently into the fire. 

“Do you believe him?” I asked, motioning to Elvis. “Is he weird or what?” 

Lucy stared straight ahead. She seemed so deep in thought, I don’t think she 
heard me. 

Finally she raised her head. She blinked. “What?” 

“My brother’s new friend,” I said, pointing to Elvis again. “He said that 
Uncle Marv’s story was true.” 

Lucy nodded, but didn’t reply. 

“I thought it was a funny story,” I said. 

She picked up a twig and tossed it on the fire. I waited for her to say 
something. But she seemed lost in thought again. 

The flames of the campfire had died down. Sparkling red embers and 
chunks of burning wood spread over the ground. Chris and another counselor 
carried fresh logs into the meeting circle. 

I watched them rebuild the fire. They piled armfuls of twigs and sticks onto 
the burning embers. When the sticks burst into flames, the two counselors 
lowered logs over them. 

Then they stepped back, and Uncle Marv took his place in front of the fire. 
He stood with his hands in the pockets of his white shorts. The full moon floated 
behind his head, making his long black hair shine. 

He smiled. “And now I will tell the second traditional story of Camp Spirit 
Moon,” he announced. 

Once again, the circle of campers grew silent. I leaned back, trying to get 
my brother’s attention. But Alex was staring across the fire at Uncle Marv. 

Alex probably thought the first ghost story was kind of dumb, I knew. He 



hates ghost stories even more than I do. He thinks they’re silly baby stuff. And 
so do I. 

So what was Elvis’ problem? 

Was he goofing? Just teasing me? Or was he trying to scare me? 

Unde Marv’s booming voice interrupted my thoughts. “This is a story we 
tell every year at Camp Spirit Moon,” he said. “It’s the story of the Ghost 
Camp.” 

He lowered his deep voice nearly to a whisper, so that we all had to lean 
closer to hear him. And in hushed tones, he told us the story of the Ghost Camp. 

The story takes place at a camp very much like Camp Spirit Moon. On a warm 
summer night, the campers and counselors met around a blazing council fire. 

They roasted hot dogs and toasted marshmallows. They sang the camp 
songs. One of the counselors played a guitar, and he led them in singing song 
after song. 

When they were tired of singing, the counselors took turns telling ghost 
stories. And telling the legends of the camp, legends that had been passed on 
from camper to camper for nearly a hundred years. 

The evening grew late. The campfire had died low. The moon floated high 
in the sky, a pale full moon. 

The camp director stepped forward to end the council meeting. 

Suddenly, darkness swept over the circle of campers. 

They all looked up—and saw that the moon had been covered by a heavy 
blanket of black clouds. 

And swirls of fog came drifting over the camp. A cold, wet fog. Cloudy 
gray at first. Then darkening. 

And thickening. 

Until the fog swept over the camp, billowing like black smoke. 

Tumbling and swirling, the cold wet fog rolled over the dying campfire. 
Rolled over the campers and counselors. Over the cabins and the lake and the 
trees. 

A choking fog, so thick and dark the campers couldn’t see each other. 
Couldn’t see the fire. Or the ground. Or the moon in the sky. 

The fog lingered for a short while, swirling and tossing, low over the 
ground. Wet, so wet and silent. 

It moved on just as silently. 



Like smoke blown away. 

The moonlight shone through. The grass sparkled as if a heavy dew had 
settled. 

The fire was out. Dark purple embers sizzled over the ground. 

The fog swirled away. Swept over the trees. And vanished. 

And the campers sat around the dead campfire. Their eyes blank. Their 
arms limp at their sides. 

Not moving. Not moving. Not moving. 

Because they were no longer alive. 

The fog had left a ghost camp in its wake. 

The campers, the counselors, the camp director—they were all ghosts now. 
All spirits. All ghosts. Every last one of them. 

They climbed to their feet. And returned to their bunks. 

They knew the ghost camp was their home now— forever! 

With a smile, Uncle Marv stepped back from the fire. 

I glanced around the circle. The faces were so solemn. No one smiled or 
laughed. 

It’s a pretty good story, I thought. Kind of scary. 

But it doesn’t have much of an ending. 

I turned to see what Alex thought. 

And gasped when I saw the terrified expression on his face. “Alex—what?” 
I cried, my voice cutting through the silence of the circle. “What’s wrong?” 

He didn’t reply. His eyes were raised to the sky. He pointed up. 

I gazed up too—and let out a cry of horror. 

As a black, swirling fog came sweeping over the camp. 



9 


My mouth dropped open as I watched the fog roll closer. It darkened the ground 
as it moved steadily toward us. 

Darkened the trees. Darkened the sky. 

This is crazy, I told myself. 

This is impossible ! 

I scooted next to Alex. “It’s just a coincidence,” I told him. 

He didn’t seem to hear me. He jumped to his feet. His whole body 
trembled. 

I stood up beside him. “It’s only fog,” I said, trying to sound calm. “It gets 
foggy out here in the woods all the time.” 

“Really?” Alex asked in a tiny voice. 

The black smoky fog swirled over us. 

“Of course,” I replied. “Hey—we don’t believe in ghosts, remember? We 
don’t think ghost stories are scary.” 

“But—but—” Alex stuttered. “Why is everyone staring at us?” he finally 
choked out. 

I turned and squinted through the thick fog. 

Alex was right. All around the circle, the other campers had their eyes on 
Alex and me. Their faces appeared to dim behind the curtain of dark mist. 

“I—I don’t know why they’re watching us,” I whispered to my brother. 

Fog billowed around us. I shivered. It felt cold against my skin. 

“Harry—I don’t like this,” Alex whispered. 

The fog was so thick now, I could barely see him, even though he stood 
close beside me. 

“I know we don’t believe in ghosts,” Alex said. “But I don’t like this. It— 
it’s too creepy.” 

From the other side of the circle, Uncle Marv’s voice broke the silence. “It’s 
a beautiful fog tonight,” he said. “Let’s all stand up and sing the Camp Spirit 
Moon song.” 

Alex and I were already standing. The other campers and counselors 
obediently climbed to their feet. 



Their pale faces shimmered in and out of the fog. 

I rubbed my arms. Cold and wet. I dried my face with the front of my T- 

shirt. 

The fog grew even heavier and darker as Uncle Marv began to sing. 
Everyone joined in. Beside me, Alex began to sing, quieter this time. 

Our voices were muffled by the heavy mist. Even Uncle Marv’s booming 
voice sounded smaller and far away. 

I tried to sing too. But I didn’t know the words. And my own voice came 
out choked and small. 

As I stared into the swirling fog, the voices faded. Everyone sang, but the 
sound sank into the fog. 

The voices vanished. All of them. All except for Alex’s. 

He seemed to be the only one still singing, his voice pure and soft beside 
me in the dark mist. 

And then Alex stopped singing, too. 

The fog swept on. The darkness lifted. 

Silvery moonlight washed down on us once again. 

Alex and I gazed around in surprise. 

No one else remained. 

Alex and I were all alone. All alone in front of the dying fire. 



10 


I blinked. And blinked again. 

I don’t know what I expected. Did I think they would all appear again? 

Alex and I gazed across the circle in stunned silence. 

They had vanished with the fog. The campers. The counselors. Uncle Marv. 

A chill ran down my back. My skin still felt damp and cold from the heavy 

mist. 

“Wh-where—?” Alex choked out. 

I swallowed hard. 

A burned log crumbled into the purple embers. The soft thud startled me. 

I jumped. 

And then I started to laugh. 

Alex squinted at me, studying me. “Harry—?” 

“Don’t you see?” I told him. “It’s a joke.” 

He squinted at me harder. “Huh?” 

“It’s a camp joke,” I explained. “It’s a joke they probably always play on 
new campers here.” 

Alex twisted up his whole face. He was thinking about it. But I don’t think 
he believed me. 

“They all ran off into the woods,” I told him. “They hid behind the fog and 
ran away. They were all in on the joke. I’ll bet they do it to every new kid.” 

“But—the fog—” Alex choked out. 

“I’ll bet the fog was a fake!” I exclaimed. “They probably have some kind 
of smoke machine. To help them with the joke.” 

Alex rubbed his chin. I could still see the fear in his eyes. 

“They probably do this all the time,” I assured him. “Uncle Marv tells the 
story. Then somebody turns on the smoke machine. The black smoke rolls over 
the campfire circle. And everyone runs and hides.” 

Alex turned and stared into the woods. “I don’t see anyone hiding back 
there,” he said softly. “I don’t see anyone watching us.” 

“I’ll bet they’re all back at the cabins,” I told him. “I’ll bet they’re waiting 
for us. Waiting to see the looks on our faces.” 



“Waiting to laugh at us for falling for their dumb joke,” Alex added. 

“Let’s go!” I cried. I slapped him on the shoulder. Then I started running 
across the wet grass toward the row of cabins. 

Alex ran close behind. The moon sent a silvery path across the grass in 
front of us. 

Sure enough—as we came near the cabins, the campers all came running 
out. They were laughing and hooting. Slapping each other high fives. 

Enjoying their joke. A joke they play on new campers when the fog rolls in, 
they told us. 

I saw Lucy laughing along with a bunch of girls. 

Elvis grabbed Alex and wrestled him playfully to the ground. 

Everyone teased us and told us how scared we looked. 

“We weren’t scared even for a second,” I lied. “Alex and I figured it out 
before the fog cleared.” 

That made everyone start laughing and cheering all over again. 

“Owoooooooh!” 

Some of the kids cupped their hands around their mouths and made ghost 
howls. 

“Owoooooooh!” 

That led to more laughing and joking. 

I didn’t mind the teasing. Not a bit. 

I felt so relieved. My heart was still pounding like crazy. And my knees felt 
kind of weak. 

But I felt so happy that it was all a joke. 

Every summer camp has its jokes, I told myself. And this is a pretty good 

one. 

But it didn’t fool me. Not for long, anyway. 

“Lights Out in five minutes,” Uncle Marv’s booming command stopped the 
fun. “Lights Out, campers!” 

The kids all turned and scurried to their bunks. 

I stared down the row of cabins, suddenly confused. Which one was ours? 

“This way, Harry,” Alex said. He tugged me toward the third cabin down 
the path. Alex has a better memory than I do for things like that. 

Elvis and two other guys were already in the cabin when Alex and I came 
in. They were getting changed for bed. The other guys introduced themselves. 
Sam and Joey. 



I made my way to the bunk bed and started to undress. 

“Owoooooooh!” A ghostly howl made me jump. 

I spun around and saw Joey grinning at me. 

Everyone laughed. Me, too. 

I like camp jokes, I thought. They’re mean. But they’re kind of fun. 

I felt something soft and gooey under my bare foot. Yuck! I glanced down. 
And saw that I had stepped in a fresh puddle of blue slime. 

The cabin lights went out. But before they did, I saw blue puddles—fresh 
blue puddles—all over the floor. 

The cold blue stuff stuck to the bottom of my foot. I stumbled through the 
dark cabin and found a towel to wipe it off. 

What are these blue puddles? I asked myself as I climbed up to my top 
bunk. 

I glimpsed Joey and Sam in the bunk against the wall. 

I gasped. 

They stared back at me, their eyes shining like flashlights! 

What is going on here? I wondered. 

What are the sticky blue puddles all over the floor? 

And why do Sam and Joey’s eyes glow like that in the dark? 

I turned my face to the wall. I tried not to think about anything. 

I had almost drifted to sleep—when I felt a cold, slimy hand sliding down 
my arm. 



11 


“Huh?” 

I shot straight up. Still feeling the cold, wet touch on my skin. 

I stared at my brother. “Alex—you scared me to death!” I whispered. “What 
do you want?” 

He stood on his mattress, his dark eyes staring at me. “I can’t sleep,” he 
moaned. 

“Keep trying,” I told him sharply. “Why are your hands so cold?” 

“I don’t know,” he replied. “It’s cold in here, I guess.” 

“You’ll get used to it,” I said. “You always have trouble sleeping in new 
places.” 

I yawned. I waited for him to drop back onto the bottom bunk. But he didn’t 
move. 

“Harry, you don’t believe in ghosts—do you?” he whispered. 

“Of course not,” I told him. “Don’t let a couple of silly stories creep you 

out.” 

“Yeah. Right,” he agreed. “Good night.” 

I said good night. He disappeared back to his bed. I heard him tossing 
around down there. He had a very squeaky mattress. 

Poor guy, I thought. That dumb Ghost Camp joke with the fog really 
messed him up. 

He’ll be fine in the morning, I decided. 

I turned and gazed across the dark cabin toward Joey and Sam’s bunk. Were 
their eyes still glowing so strangely? 

No. 

Darkness there. 

I started to turn away—then stopped. 

And stared hard. 

“Oh no!” I murmured out loud. 

In the dim light, I could see Joey. Stretched out. Asleep. 

Floating two feet above his mattress! 



12 


I scrambled to climb out of bed. My legs tangled in the blanket, and I nearly fell 
on my head! 

“Hey—what’s up?” I heard Alex whisper below me. 

I ignored him. I swung myself around, and leaped to the floor. 

“Ow!” I landed hard, twisting my ankle. 

Pain shot up my leg. But I ignored it and hobbled to the door. I remembered 
the light switch was somewhere over there. 

I had to turn on the light. 

I had to see for sure that I was right. That Joey slept floating in the air 
above his bed. 

“Harry—what’s wrong?” Alex called after me. 

“What’s up? What time is it?” I heard Elvis groan sleepily from the bunk 
against the other wall. 

I pulled myself across the cabin. My hand fumbled against the wall until I 
found the light switch. 

I pushed it up. 

The overhead light flashed on, flooding the tiny cabin in white light. 

I raised my eyes to Joey’s bunk. 

He lifted his head from the pillow and squinted down at me. “Harry— 
what’s your problem?” he asked. He was sprawled on his stomach, on top of his 
blanket. 

Not floating in the air. Not floating. 

Resting his head in his hands, yawning and staring down at me. 

“Turn off the light!” Sam barked. “If Uncle Marv catches us with the light 
on...” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Turn it off\ ” Elvis and Sam both insisted. 

I clicked off the light. 

“Sorry,” I muttered. “I thought I saw something.” 

I felt like a jerk. Why did I think I saw Joey floating in the air? 

I must be as creeped out as Alex, I decided. Now I’m seeing things! 



I scolded myself and told myself to calm down. 

You’re just nervous because it’s your first day in a new camp, I decided. 

I started slowly across the cabin to my bed. Halfway there, I stepped in a 
cold, sticky puddle of goo. 

The next morning, Alex and I found our white Camp Spirit Moon uniforms— 
white shorts and T-shirts—waiting for us at the foot of our beds. 

Now we won’t stand out like sore thumbs, I thought happily. 

Now we can really be part of Camp Spirit Moon. 

I quickly forgot about my fears from the night before. I couldn’t wait for the 
camp day to get started. 

That afternoon, Alex tried out for the Camp Spirit Moon talent show. 

I had to be at the soccer field. A bunch of us were supposed to practice 
putting up tents. We were getting ready for an overnight in the woods. 

But I stopped in front of the outdoor stage at the side of the lodge to listen 
to Alex sing. 

A counselor named Veronica, with long, copper-colored hair all the way 
down her back, was in charge of the tryouts. I leaned against a tree and watched. 

A lot of kids were trying out. I saw two guitar players, a boy with a 
harmonica, a tap dancer, and two baton twirlers. 

Veronica played a small upright piano at the front of the stage. She called 
Alex up and asked him what song he wanted to sing. 

He picked a Beatles song he likes. My brother doesn’t listen to any new 
groups. He likes the Beatles and the Beach Boys—all the groups from the 
sixties. 

He’s the only eleven-year-old I know who listens to the oldies station. I feel 
kind of sorry for him. It’s like he was born in the wrong time or something. 

Veronica played a few notes on the piano, and Alex started to sing. 

What a voice! 

The other kids had all been laughing and talking and messing around. But 
after Alex sang for a few seconds, they got real quiet. They huddled close to the 
stage and listened. 

He really sounded like a pro! I mean, he could probably sing with a band 
and make a CD. 

Even Veronica was amazed. I could see her lips form the word “Wow!” as 
she played the piano for Alex. 



When Alex finished singing, the kids all clapped and cheered. Elvis slapped 
Alex a high five as he hopped off the small stage. 

Veronica called Elvis up next. He told her he wanted to sing an Elvis song, 
since he was named after Elvis Presley. 

He cleared his throat and started to sing a song called “Heartbreak Hotel.” 

Well... it really was a heartbreak—because Elvis couldn’t sing a single note 
on key! 

Veronica tried to play along with him. But I could see that she was having 
trouble. I think she probably wanted to stop playing the piano and cover her 
ears! 

Elvis had a high, scratchy voice. And the notes came out really sour. Sour 
enough to make your whole face pucker up. 

The kids around the stage started grumbling and walking away. 

Elvis had his eyes shut. He was so wrapped up in his song, he didn’t even 
see them! 

Doesn’t he know how bad he is? I wondered. Why does he want to enter a 
talent show when he sounds like a squealing dog? 

Elvis started to repeat the chorus. I decided I had to get away from there 
before my eardrums popped. 

I flashed Alex a thumbs-up and hurried to the soccer field. 

Sam, Joey, and a bunch of other kids were already unfolding tents, getting 
ready for tent-raising practice. Chris, the counselor, was in charge. 

He waved to me. “Harry—unroll that tent over there,” he instructed. “Let’s 
see how fast you can put it up.” 

I picked up the tent. It was bundled tightly, no bigger than a backpack. I 
turned it over in my hands. I’d never set up a tent before. I wasn’t even sure how 
to unwrap it. 

Chris saw me puzzling over it and walked over. “It’s easy,” he said. 

He pulled two straps, and the nylon tent started to unfold. “See? Here are 
the poles. Just stretch it out and prop it up.” 

He handed the bundle back to me. 

“Yeah. Easy,” I repeated. 

“What’s that noise?” Joey asked, looking up from his tent. 

I listened hard. “It’s Elvis singing,” I told them. 

The sour notes floated over the soccer field from the stage. 

Sam shook his head. “It sounds like an animal caught in a trap,” he said. 



We all laughed. 

Joey and Sam took off their sneakers and went barefoot. I took mine off, 
too. The warm grass felt good under my feet. 

I unfolded the tent and spread it out on the grass. I piled the tent poles to the 

side. 

The sun felt hot on the back of my neck. I slapped a mosquito on my arm. 

I heard a shout and glanced up to see Sam and Joey wrestling around. They 
weren’t fighting. They were just goofing. 

They both picked up tent poles and started dueling with them, having a wild 
sword fight. They were laughing and having fun. 

But then Sam tripped over a tent. 

He lost his balance. Stumbled forward. Fell hard. 

I let out a scream as the tent pole went right through his foot. 



13 


My stomach lurched. I felt sick. 

The pointed pole had pierced the top of Sam’s foot, nailing his foot to the 
ground. 

Joey gaped, openmouthed, his eyes wide with surprise. 

With a gasp, I searched for Chris. I knew Sam needed help. 

Where had Chris wandered off to? 

“Sam—” I choked out. ‘Til get help. Til—” 

But Sam didn’t cry out. He didn’t react at all. Didn’t even grimace. 

He calmly reached down with both hands—and pulled the pole from his 

foot. 

I let out a groan. My foot ached! In sympathy, I guess. 

Sam tossed the pole aside. 

I stared down at his foot. No cut. No blood. 

It wasn’t bleeding! 

“Sam!” I cried. “Your foot. It’s not bleeding!” 

He turned and shrugged. “It missed my toes,” he explained. 

He dropped onto his knees and started propping up the tent. 

I swallowed hard, waiting for my stomach to stop churning. 

Missed his toes? I thought. Missed his toes? 

I saw the pole sink right into his foot! 

Or was I seeing things again? 

For the rest of the afternoon, I tried not to think about it. I worked on the tent. 
Once I got it spread out, it was easy to set up. 

Chris had us fold and unfold them a few times. Then we had a race to see 
who could set up a tent the fastest. 

I won easily. 

Sam said it was beginner’s luck. 

Chris said I was definitely ready for the overnight. 

“Where do we go for the overnight?” I asked. 

“Deep, deep into the woods,” Chris replied. He winked at Sam and Joey. 



I felt a chill, thinking about Uncle Marv’s ghost story. 

I shook the chill away. No way I was going to let myself get scared by a 
silly camp story. 

We had instructional swim at the waterfront. The lake was clear and cold. 
I’m up to Junior Lifesaver. Joey and I took turns rescuing each other. 

I didn’t think about Sam driving the pole through his foot. I forced it from 
my mind. 

After the swim, I returned to the bunk to get changed for dinner. There were 
fresh puddles of blue goo on the cabin floor. 

Nobody made a big deal about them. I didn’t want to, either. So I tried hard 
not to think about them. 

Alex came in, very excited. “I’m going to be the first act in the talent 
show!” he announced. “And Veronica liked my singing so much, she wants me 
to star in the camp musical.” 

“Way to go!” I cried. I slapped him a high five. Then I asked, “What about 
Elvis?” 

“He’s going to be in the show, too,” Alex replied. “He’s going to be stage 
manager.” 

I pulled on my white Camp Spirit Moon shorts and T-shirt and headed to 
the mess hall for dinner. 

I saw a group of girls come out of the cabins on the other side. I searched 
for Lucy, but didn’t see her. 

I was feeling pretty good. 

Not thinking about the strange things I’d seen. 

Not thinking about the blue puddles of slime. The mysterious black fog. 

Not thinking about the ghost story that Elvis said was tme. 

Not thinking about Lucy sticking her hand into the fire and pulling out my 
flaming hot dog. 

Not thinking about Joey floating above his bed. Or Sam jamming a thick 
pole through his foot. 

And not bleeding. Not crying out. 

So totally calm about it. As if he couldn’t feel it, couldn’t feel any pain. 

I was starving. Looking forward to dinner. Not thinking about any of these 
puzzling things. 

Leeling really good. 

But then Joey ruined my good mood at dinner. And forced all the scary 



thoughts back into my mind. 

The food had just been served. Chicken in some kind of creamy sauce, 
spinach, and lumpy mashed potatoes. 

I didn’t care what it was. I was so hungry, I could eat anything! 

But before I had a chance to eat, Joey called out to me from across the 
table. “Hey, Harry—look!” 

I glanced up from my plate. 

He picked up his fork—and jammed it deep into his neck! 



14 


“Ohhh.” I let out a groan. My fork fell from my hand and clattered to the floor. 

Joey grinned at me. The fork bobbed up and down, stuck in his neck. 

I felt sick. My heart started to pound. 

He pulled the fork out with a hard tug. His grin didn’t fade. “You try it!” he 
called. 

“Joey—stop it!” Elvis cried from across the table. 

“Yeah. Give us a break,” Sam agreed. 

I stared at Joey’s neck. No cut. No fork marks. No blood. 

“How—how did you do that?” I finally stammered. 

Joey’s grin grew wider. “It’s just a trick,” he replied. 

I glimpsed Alex at the end of the table. Had he seen Joey’s “trick”? 

Yes. Alex looked green. His mouth had dropped open in horror. 

“Here. I’ll show you how to do it,” Joey offered. 

He raised the fork again—but stopped when he saw Uncle Marv leaning 
over his shoulder. 

“What’s going on, Joey?” Uncle Marv demanded sharply. 

Joey lowered the fork to the table. “Just kidding around,” he replied, 
avoiding the camp director’s hard stare. 

“Well, let’s eat our dinner, guys,” Uncle Marv said sternly. “Without 
kidding around.” His stubby fingers tightened over Joey’s shoulders. “We have a 
night soccer game, you know. Boys against the girls.” 

Uncle Marv loosened his grip on Joey’s shoulders and moved on to the next 
table. A food fight had broken out there. And the mashed potatoes were flying. 

Joey mumbled something under his breath. I couldn’t hear him over all the 
noise. 

I turned to see how Alex was doing at the end of the table. He had his fork 
in his hand, but he wasn’t eating. He was staring hard at Joey. My brother had a 
very thoughtful expression on his face. 

I knew he was wondering exactly the same thing I was. 

What is going on here? 

Joey said the fork-stabbing was just a trick. But how did he do it? Why 



didn’t it hurt? Why didn’t he bleed? 

“Night soccer games are cool!” Elvis declared. He was stuffing chicken into 
his mouth. The cream sauce ran down his chin. 

“Especially boys against the girls,” Sam agreed. “We’ll kill them! They’re 
pitiful.” 

I glanced at the girls’ table across the room. They were chattering noisily. 
Probably about the soccer game. 

I saw Lucy in the shadows near the wall. She didn’t seem to be talking to 
anyone. She had a solemn expression on her face. 

Did she keep looking over at me? 

I couldn’t really tell. 

I ate my dinner. But my appetite had disappeared. 

“How did you do that fork thing?” I asked Joey. 

“I told you. It’s just a trick,” he replied. He turned away from me to talk to 

Sam. 

Dessert was little squares of red, yellow, and green Jell-O. It was okay. But 
it needed some whipped cream. 

As I was finishing my dessert, I heard some squeals from the front of the 
big room. I turned toward the cries—and saw a bat swooping wildly back and 
forth over the mess hall. 

Some of the younger kids were screaming. But everyone stayed calm at my 
table. 

The bat fluttered noisily, swooping and diving, darting from one end of the 
hall to the other. 

Uncle Marv followed it with a broom. And after only a minute or two, he 
gently pinned the bat to the wall with the straw broom head. 

Then he lifted the bat off the wall, carrying it in one hand. 

It was so tiny! No bigger than a mouse. 

He carried it out the door and let it go. 

Everyone cheered. 

“That happens all the time,” Sam said to me. “It’s because there aren’t any 
screens on the mess hall doors.” 

“And the woods are full of bats,” Joey added. “Killer bats that land in your 
hair and suck the blood out of your head.” 

Sam laughed. “Yeah. Right.” He grinned at me. “That’s what happened to 
Joey. That’s why he acts so weird now.” 



I laughed along with everyone else. 

But I wondered if Sam was really joking. 

I mean, Joey did act weird. 

“Soccer field, everyone!” Uncle Marv boomed from the mess hall door. 
“Check with the sports counselors. Alissa and Mark will set up the teams.” 

Chairs scraped over the stone floor as everyone jumped up. 

I saw Lucy waving to me. But Sam and Joey pulled me away. 

Into a cool, cloudy night. The full moon hidden behind low clouds. The 
grass already wet with a heavy dew. 

The counselors divided up the teams. Alex and I were on the second team. 
That meant we didn’t play the first period. Our job was to stand on the sidelines 
and cheer on the boys’ first team. 

Two floodlights on tall poles sent down wide triangles of white light over 
the field. It wasn’t really enough light. Long shadows spread over the field. 

But that was part of the fun. 

Alex stood close beside me as the game began. The girls’ team scored a 
goal in less than a minute. 

Girls on the sidelines went wild. 

The players on the boys’ team stood around, scratching their heads and 
muttering unhappily. 

“Lucky break! Lucky break!” yelled Mark, a tall, lanky boys’ counselor. 
“Go get them, guys!” 

The game started up again. 

The light from the floodlights appeared to dim. I raised my eyes to the sky 
—and saw fog rolling in. 

Another swirling fog. 

Mark jogged past us, looking like a big stork. “Going to be another foggy 
night,” he said to Alex and me. “Night games are more fun in the fog.” He 
shouted instructions to the boys’ team. 

The thick fog swept over us quickly, driven by a gusting wind. 

Alex huddled close to me. I turned and caught his worried expression. 

“Did you see what Joey did at dinner?” he asked softly. 

I nodded. “He said it was a trick.” 

Alex thought about that for a moment. “Harry,” he said, keeping his eyes on 
the game. “Don’t you think some of these kids are a little weird?” 

“Yeah. A little,” I replied. I thought about the tent pole going through Sam’s 



foot. 

“Something happened at the waterfront,” Alex continued. “I can’t stop 
thinking about it.” 

I watched the game, squinting into the drifting fog. It was getting hard to 
see the players. 

Cheers rang out from the girls’ side. I guessed they had scored another goal. 
Layers of heavy fog blocked my view. 

I shivered. “What happened?” I asked my brother. 

“I had free swim. After tryouts for the show,” he said. “There was my group 
and a couple of girls’ groups. Younger girls, mostly.” 

“The lake is nice,” I commented. “It’s so clear and clean. And not too cold.” 

“Yeah. It’s good,” Alex agreed. He frowned. “But something strange 
happened. I mean—I think it was strange.” 

He took a deep breath. I could see he was really upset. 

“Let’s go, guys! Go, go, go!” Mark shouted to the team. 

The glow from the floodlights twisted and bent in the fog, sending strange 
shadows over the playing field. The fog was so thick now, I had trouble telling 
the players from the shadows. 

“I was floating on top of the water,” Alex continued, wrapping his arms 
around his chest. “Sort of taking it easy. Moving slowly. Stroke... stroke... very 
slow. 

“It was free swim. So we could do what we wanted. Some of the guys were 
having a back-floating race near the shore. But I floated out by myself. 

“The water was so clear. I put my face in the water, and I stared down to the 
bottom. And—and I saw something down there.” 

He swallowed hard. 

“What was it? What did you see?” I asked. 

“A girl,” Alex replied with a shudder. “One of the girls from the younger 
group. I don’t know her name. She has short, curly black hair.” 

“She was under the water?” I demanded. “You mean, swimming 
underwater?” 

“No.” Alex shook his head. “She wasn’t swimming. She wasn’t moving. 
She was way underwater. I mean, near the bottom of the lake.” 

“She dove down?” I asked. 

Alex shrugged. “I got so scared!” he cried over the shouts of the two teams. 
“She wasn’t moving. I didn’t think she was breathing. Her arms floated up and 



down. And her eyes—her eyes stared out blankly into the water.” 

“She drowned ?” I cried. 

“That’s what I thought,” Alex said. “I panicked. I mean, I didn’t know what 
to do. I couldn’t think. I didn’t think. I just dove down.” 

“You dove down to the bottom to get her?” I asked. 

“Yeah. I didn’t really know if I was too late. Or if I should get a counselor. 
Or what,” Alex said, shuddering again. 

“I swam down. I grabbed her arms. Then I gripped her under the shoulders. 
I pulled her up. She floated up easily. Like she was weightless or something. 

“I pulled her up to the surface. Then I started to drag her to the shore. I was 
gasping for breath. Mostly from panic, I think. My chest felt about to burst. I 
was so scared. 

“And then I heard laughing. She laughed at me. I was still holding her 
under the shoulders. She turned—and spit water in my face!” 

“Oh, wow!” I gasped. “Wow, Alex. You mean she was okay?” 

“Yeah,” Alex replied, shaking his head. “She was perfectly okay. She was 
laughing at me. She thought it was really funny. 

“I just stared at her. I couldn’t believe it. I mean, she had been way down at 
the bottom. For a long, long time. 

“I let go of her. She floated away from me, still laughing. 

“I said, ‘How did you do that?’ That’s what I asked her. I asked, ‘How long 
can you hold your breath?’ 

“And that made her laugh even harder. ‘How long?’ I asked. 

“And she said, ‘Along, long time.’ 

“And then she swam back to the other girls.” 

“And what did you do?” I asked Alex. 

“I had to get out of the water,” he replied. “I was shaking all over. I couldn’t 
stop shaking. I—I thought...” His voice trailed off. 

“At least she was okay,” he murmured after a while. “But don’t you think 
that was weird, Harry? And then at dinner, when Joey stuck that fork in his neck 

“It’s weird, Alex,” I said softly. “But it may just be jokes.” 

“Jokes?” he asked. His dark eyes stared hard into mine. 

“Kids always play jokes on new campers,” I told him. “It’s a camp 
tradition. You know. Terrify the new kids. It’s probably just jokes. That’s all.” 

He chewed his bottom lip, thinking about it. Even though he was standing 



so close to me, the swirling black fog made him appear far away. 

I turned back to the game. The boys were moving across the grass toward 
the goal. Passing the ball, kicking it from player to player. They looked unreal, 
moving in and out of the swirling shadows. 

Jokes, I thought. 

All jokes. 

I squinted into the fog. And saw something that couldn’t be a joke. 

A boy kicked the ball to the net. The girls’ goalie moved to block the shot. 
She wasn’t fast enough. Or she stumbled. 

The ball hit her smack in the forehead. 

It made a sickening thud. 

The ball bounced onto the ground. 

And her head bounced beside it. 



15 


I gasped. And started to run. 

Through the thick wisps of black fog. 

The swirling, dark mist seemed to float up from the ground and sweep 
down from the trees. It felt cold and wet on my face as I hurtled toward the girl. 

Squinting into the heavy darkness, I could see her sprawled on her stomach 
on the ground. 

And her head... 

Her head... 

I bent down and grabbed it. I don’t know what I was thinking. 

Did I plan to plop it back on her shoulders? 

In a total panic, trembling with horror, I bent into the swirling mist—and 
picked up the head with both hands. 

It felt surprisingly hard. Inhumanly hard. 

I raised it. Raised it close to my face. 

And saw that I held a soccer ball. 

Not a head. Not a girl’s head. 

I heard a groan. And gazed down to see the girl climb to her knees. She 
muttered something under her breath and shook her head. 

Her head. The head on her shoulders. 

She stood and frowned at me. 

I stared at her face, her head. My whole body was still shaking. 

“Your head—” I choked out. 

She tossed back her straight blond hair. Brushed dirt off her white shorts. 
Then she reached for the ball. 

“Harry—you’re not on the first team!” I heard a boy call. 

“Get off the field!” another boy demanded. 

I turned and saw that the players had all gathered around. 

“But I saw her head fall off!” I blurted out. 

I instantly regretted it. I knew I shouldn’t have said it. 

Everyone laughed. They tossed back their heads and laughed at me. 
Someone slapped me on the back. 



Their grinning, laughing faces floated all around me. For a moment, it 
looked to me as if all their heads had come off. I was surrounded by laughing 
heads, bobbing in the eerie, shadowy light from the floodlights. 

The girl raised her hands to the sides of her head and tugged up. “See, 
Harry?” she cried. “See? It’s still glued on!” 

“Someone better check Harry’s head!” a boy cried. 

Everyone laughed some more. 

A kid came up, grabbed my head, and tugged it. 

“Ow!” I screamed. 

More wild laughter. 

I tossed the goalie the soccer ball. Then I slunk off the field. 

What is wrong with me? I wondered. Why am I so messed up? 

Why do I keep seeing things? 

Am I just nervous because I’m in a new camp? Or am I totally losing it? 

I trudged to the sidelines and kept walking. I didn’t know where I was 
going. I just knew I wanted to get away from the laughing kids, away from the 
soccer game. 

The heavy fog had settled over the field. I glanced back. I could hear the 
players’ shouts and cheers. But I could barely see them. 

I turned and started toward the row of cabins. The dew on the tall grass 
tickled my legs as I walked. 

I was halfway to the cabins when I realized I was being followed. 



16 


I spun around. 

A face floated out of the darkness. 

“Alex!” I cried. In all the excitement over the soccer ball and the goalie’s 
head, I had forgotten all about him. 

He stepped close to me, so close I could see beads of sweat on his upper lip. 
“I saw it, too,” Alex whispered. 

“Huh?” I gasped. I didn’t understand. “You saw what?” 

“The girl’s head,” Alex said sharply. He turned back to the soccer field. To 
see if anyone had followed him, I guess. 

Then he turned back to me and tugged my T-shirt sleeve. “I saw her head 
fall off, too. I saw it bounce on the ground.” 

I swallowed hard. “You did? Really?” 

He nodded. “I thought I was going to puke. It—it was so gross.” 

“But—it didn’t fall off!” I cried. “Didn’t you see? When I ran onto the 
field? I picked up the ball. Not her head.” 

“But I saw it, Harry,” Alex insisted. “At first I thought it was just the fog. 
You know. My eyes playing tricks on me because of the heavy fog. But—” 

“It had to be the fog,” I replied quietly. “That girl—she was perfectly okay.” 

“But if we both saw it...” Alex started. He stopped and sighed. “This camp 
—it’s so weird.” 

“That’s for sure,” I agreed. 

Alex shoved his hands into the pockets of his shorts. He shook his head 
unhappily. “Elvis says the ghost stories are true,” he said. 

I put my hands on Alex’s shoulders. I could feel him trembling. We don’t 
believe in ghosts—remember?” I told him. “Remember?” 

He nodded slowly. 

The first howl made us both jump. 

I turned to the woods. Another eerie howl rose up from the same spot. 

Not an animal howl. Not an animal cry at all. 

A long, mournful howl. A human howl. 

“Owwoooooooooooooo. ” 



Another deeper cry made me gasp. 

Alex grabbed my arm. His hand felt cold as ice. 

“What is that?” he choked out. 

I opened my mouth to reply—but another mournful howl interrupted. 
“Owwoooooooooooo. ” 

I heard two creatures howling. Maybe three. 

Maybe more. 

The eerie wails floated up from behind the trees. Until it sounded as if the 
whole woods were howling. 

Inhuman howls. Ghostly howls. 

“We’re surrounded, Harry,” Alex whispered, still gripping my arm. 
“Whatever it is, it’s got us surrounded.” 



17 


“Owwooooooo. ” 

The frightening wails rose up from the trees. 

“Run!” I whispered to Alex. “To the main lodge. Maybe we can find Uncle 
Marv. Maybe—” 

Heading into the fog, we started running toward the lodge. 

But the howls followed us. And grew louder. 

I heard the heavy thud of footsteps behind us, tromping over the grass. 

We can’t escape, I realized. 

Alex and I both turned at the same time. 

And saw Elvis, Sam, and Joey—grinning as they ran after us. 

Sam cupped his hands around his mouth and let out a long, ghostly howl. 
Laughing, Elvis and Joey tossed back their heads and howled too. 

“You jerks!” I screamed, swinging a fist at them. 

I could feel the blood mshing to my face. 

I felt ready to explode. I wanted to punch those three clowns. And kick 
them. And pound their grinning faces. 

“Gotcha!” Elvis cried. “Gotcha!” He turned to Sam and Joey. “Look at 
them! They’re shaking! Oh, wow! They’re shaking!” 

Sam and Joey laughed gleefully. “Did you think there were wolves in the 
woods?” Sam asked. 

“Or ghosts? Did you think we were ghosts?” Joey demanded. 

“Shut up,” I replied. 

Alex didn’t say a word. He lowered his eyes to the ground. I could see that 
he was as embarrassed as I was. 

“Owwoooooo!” Elvis uttered another high-pitched howl. He threw his arms 
around my brother’s waist and wrestled him to the ground. 

“Get off. Get off!” Alex cried angrily. 

The two of them wrestled around in the wet grass. 

“Did I scare you?” Elvis demanded breathlessly. “Admit it, Alex. You 
thought it was a ghost, right? Right?” 

Alex refused to reply. He let out a groan and heaved Elvis off him. They 



wrestled some more. 

Sam and Joey stepped up beside me, grinning. Very pleased with 
themselves. 

“You guys aren’t funny,” I grumbled. “That was so babyish. Really.” 

Joey slapped Sam a high five. “Babyish?” he cried. “If it was so babyish, 
why did you fall for it?” 

I opened my mouth to reply—but only a choking sound came out. 

Why did I fall for it? I asked myself. 

Why did I let myself get scared by three guys standing behind trees and 
making howling sounds? 

Normally, I would have laughed at such a dumb joke. 

As the five of us walked to the cabin, I thought hard about it. The campers 
and counselors had all been trying to scare Alex and me since we arrived, I 
realized. Even Uncle Marv had tried to scare us with his creepy stories. 

They must have a tradition of trying to scare new campers at Camp Spirit 
Moon, I decided. 

And it works. It really has scared Alex and me. It has made us tense. 
Jumpy. Ready to leap out of our skins at the slightest noise. 

We stepped into the cabin. I clicked the light on. 

Elvis, Sam, and Joey were still laughing, still enjoying their joke. 

Alex and I have got to get it together, I decided. 

We’ve got to shove all the stupid stuff about ghosts out of our heads. 

We don’t believe in ghosts, I told myself. 

We don’t believe in ghosts. We don’t believe in ghosts. 

I repeated that sentence over and over. Like a chant. 

Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts. We’ve never believed in ghosts. 

Never. Never. 

One night later... after a short hike through the woods—I did believe in 
ghosts! 



18 


Alex and I took a lot of teasing the next day. 

Coming out of the mess hall after breakfast, someone tossed a soccer ball at 
me and screamed, “My head! Give me back my head!” 

We had instructional swim in the morning. Joey and Sam and some of the 
other guys started howling like ghosts. Everyone thought it was a riot. 

I saw Lucy hanging out on the shore with some girls from her cabin. The 
other girls were laughing at the ghostly howls. Lucy was the only one who didn’t 
laugh. 

In fact, she had a solemn expression on her face. A thoughtful expression. 

Several times, I caught her staring at me. 

She’s probably thinking about what a total baby I am, I told myself 
unhappily. I’ll bet she feels sorry for me. Because I acted like such a jerk in front 
of everyone on the soccer field last night. 

After instructional swim, I dried myself off. 

Then I wrapped the towel around myself and walked over to Lucy at the 
little boat dock. 

The other girls had wandered away. Lucy stood in her white shorts and T- 
shirt. She had one foot on a plastic canoe, making it bob up and down in the 
shallow water. 

“Hi,” I said. I suddenly realized I didn’t know what to say. 

“Hi,” she replied. 

She didn’t smile. Her dark eyes locked on mine. 

To my surprise, she turned quickly—and ran off. 

“Hey—!” I called. I started to run after her. But stopped when my legs got 
tangled in my towel. “Hey—what’s your problem?” 

She vanished behind the Arts and Crafts cabin. She never looked back. 

I know what her problem is, I told myself sadly. She doesn’t want to be seen 
talking to a total nutcase. To someone who thinks that a girl’s head can roll off. 
And who thinks there are howling ghosts lurking in the woods. 

I wrapped the towel around me. Sam and Joey and some other guys were 
staring at me from the shore. I could see by the grins on their faces that they had 
seen Lucy run away from me. 



“Maybe it’s your breath!” Joey teased. 
They all fell on the ground, howling. 


* * * 


After lunch, we had letter-writing time. The counselors made sure we ah stayed 
in our bunks and wrote letters home to our parents. 

It was a camp rule that we had to write home once a week. “So your parents 
won’t worry about you,” Uncle Marv announced at lunch. “We want them to 
know that you’re having the best summer of your lives—right?” 

“Yohhhhhhhhhh, Spirits!” everyone cheered. 

I wasn’t exactly having the best summer of my life. 

In fact, so far, this was one of the worst. 

But I decided not to write that in my letter home. 

I climbed up to my top bunk and started to think about my letter to Mom 
and Dad. 

Please come and get me, I thought I might write. 

Everyone is weird here. Alex and I are both scared out of our wits. 

No. No way. I couldn’t write that. 

I leaned over the side of the mattress and peered down at my brother. He 
was sitting on his bunk, crouched over his letter. I could see him scribbling 
away. 

“What are you writing?” I called down. 

“I’m telling them about the Camp Spirit Moon talent show,” he replied. 
“How I’m going to be the star. And how I’m going to be in the musical next 
week.” 

“Nice,” I muttered. 

I decided I’d tell my parents only good things, too. Why worry them? Why 
make them think that I’m losing it? 

If Alex isn’t writing about all the weird things, I won’t either, I decided. 

I leaned over my sheet of paper and started my letter: 

Dear Mom and Dad, 

Camp Spirit Moon is a lot more exciting than I ever dreamed.... 

“Tonight’s after-dinner activity is a night hike,” Uncle Marv announced. 

A cheer shook the wooden rafters of the huge mess hah. 



“Where are we going to hike?” someone called out. 

Uncle Marv grinned. “Deep, deep into the woods.” 

Of course, that answer reminded everyone of Uncle Marv’s ghost story. 
Some kids cheered. Others laughed. 

Alex and I exchanged glances. 

But the hike turned out to be fun. A full moon made the woods glow. We 
followed a path that curved around the lake. 

Everyone seemed in a good mood. We sang the camp song so many times, I 
almost learned the words! 

About halfway around the lake, two deer stepped out onto the path. A 
mother and her doe. 

The little one was so cute. It looked just like Bambi. 

The two deer stared at us. They turned up their noses, as if to say, “What are 
you doing in our woods?” 

Then they calmly loped into the trees. 

The path headed through a small, round clearing. As we stepped out of the 
trees, the ground appeared to light up. The moonlight poured down so brightly, I 
felt as if I could see every bush, every weed, every blade of grass. 

It was really awesome. 

I started to relax. Sam, Joey, and I walked along singing, making up funny 
words to songs we knew. We sang “On Top of Spaghetti” about twenty times— 
until kids begged us to stop singing it! 

Why have I been so crazy? I asked myself. 

I’ve made some cool new friends here at Camp Spirit Moon. I’m having an 
excellent time. 

I felt great until we returned to camp. 

The black fog had started to roll in. It greeted us, wrapping its cold, wet 
mists around us, darkening the sky, the ground, the whole camp. 

“Lights Out in ten minutes,” Uncle Marv announced. 

Kids scampered to their cabins. 

But two strong arms held me from behind. Held me back. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. I felt myself being pulled into the trees. 

“Ssshhhhh,” someone whispered in my ear. 

I spun around to find Lucy holding onto me. “What are you doing?” I 
whispered. “We have to go to our bunks. We have to get ready for—” 

“Ssshhhhhh,” she hissed again in my ear. 



Her dark eyes searched my face. Were those tears staining her pale cheeks? 
Clouds of fog rolled around us. 

She loosened her grip on my arms. But her eyes stayed on mine. “Harry, 
you’ve got to help me,” she whispered. 

I swallowed hard. “Lucy, what’s wrong?” 

“I think you know,” she said softly. “It’s all true. What you think. It’s true.” 

I didn’t understand. I stared back at her with my mouth open. 

“We’re ghosts, Harry,” Lucy told me. “We’re all ghosts at this camp.” 

“But, Lucy—” I started. 

“Yes.” She nodded sadly. “Yes. Yes. Yes. I’m a ghost too.” 



19 


The trees disappeared behind the fog. The moonlight made Lucy’s eyes sparkle 
like dark jewels. But the light faded from her eyes as the fog covered the moon. 

I didn’t blink. I didn’t move. I suddenly felt as wooden as the trees hiding 
behind the swirling fog. 

“You—you’re joking, right?” I stammered. “This is one of those great 
Camp Spirit Moon jokes?” 

But I knew the answer. 

I could read the answer in her dark eyes. In her trembling mouth. In her 
pale, pale skin. 

“I’m a ghost,” she repeated sadly. “The stories—they’re true, Harry.” 

But I don’t believe in ghosts! 

That’s what I almost blurted out. 

But how could I not believe in ghosts when one stood right in front of me, 
staring into my face? 

How could I not believe in Lucy? 

“I believe you,” I whispered. 

She sighed. She turned her face away. 

“How did it happen?” I asked. 

“Just as Uncle Marv told in the story,” she replied. “We were sitting around 
the campfire. All of us. Just like the other night. The fog rolled in. Such a dark, 
heavy fog.” 

She sighed again. Even in the darkness, I could see the tears glistening in 
her eyes. 

“When the fog finally floated away,” Lucy continued, “we were all dead. 
All ghosts. We’ve been out here ever since. I can’t explain any more. I don’t 
know any more.” 

“But—when did it happen?” I demanded. “How long... how long have you 
been a ghost, Lucy?” 

She shrugged. “I don’t know. I’ve lost track of time. There is no time when 
you’re a ghost. There’s just one day and then the next. And then the next. 
Forever, I guess.” 

I stared at her without speaking. 



Chill after chill swept down my back. My whole body was shaking. I didn’t 
even try to stop it. 

I reached out and grabbed her hand. 

I guess I wanted to see if she was real or not. One last test to see if she was 
pulling a joke. 

“Oh!” I dropped her hand as its icy cold shot through me. So cold. Her hand 
—as cold as the black fog. 

“You believe me now?” she asked softly. Once again her dark eyes studied 
my face. 

I nodded. “I—I believe you,” I stammered. “I believe you, Lucy.” 

She didn’t reply. 

I could still feel the cold of her hand on my fingers. 

“The blue puddles,” I murmured. “The sticky blue puddles on the cabin 
floor. Do you know what they are?” 

“Yes,” she replied. “Those puddles are drops of protoplasm.” 

“Huh? Protoplasm?” 

She nodded. “The puddles are made when we materialize. When we make 
ourselves visible.” 

She twisted her face into a sorrowful frown. “It takes so much strength to 
make ourselves visible. So much energy. The protoplasm puddles are made when 
we use that energy.” 

I didn’t really understand. 

But I knew when I stepped in them that the slimy blue puddles were 
something strange. Something inhuman. 

Traces of ghosts. 

“And the things Alex and I saw?” I demanded. “Kids floating above their 
bunks? Their eyes glowing like spotlights? Kids stabbing themselves and not 
bleeding? Not crying out in pain?” 

“Some of the kids tried to scare you,” Lucy confessed. “They only wanted a 
little fun, Harry. It isn’t fun being a ghost. Believe me. It isn’t fun spending day 
after day after day out here, knowing you aren’t real anymore. Knowing you will 
never grow. Knowing you will never change.” She uttered a loud sob from deep 
in her chest. “Knowing you will never have a lifel” 

“I—I’m so sorry,” I stammered. 

Her expression changed. 

Her eyes narrowed. Her mouth twisted into an unpleasant sneer. 



I took a step back, suddenly afraid. 

“Help me, Harry,” Lucy whispered. “I can’t stand it anymore. You’ve got to 
help me get away from here.” 

“Get away?” I cried, taking another step back. “How?” 

“You’ve got to let me possess your mind,” Lucy insisted. “You’ve got to let 
me take over your body!” 

20 

“No!” I gasped. 

Panic shot through my body. I felt every muscle tense. The blood throbbed 
at my temples. 

“I need to take over your mind, Harry,” Lucy repeated, stepping toward me. 
“Please. Please help me.” 

“No!” I uttered again. 

I wanted to turn and run. But I couldn’t move. 

My legs felt like Jell-O. My whole body shook. 

I don’t believe in ghosts. 

That thought flashed into my mind. 

But it wasn’t true anymore. 

I stood at the edge of the woods—staring at Lucy. Staring at Lucy’s ghost. 

The fog swept around us. 

Again, I tried to run. But my legs wouldn’t cooperate. 

“Wh-what do you want to do to me?” I finally choked out. “Why do you 
have to take over my mind?” 

“It’s my only way to escape,” Lucy replied. Her eyes locked on mine. “My 
only way.” 

“Why don’t you just run away?” I demanded. 

She sighed. “If I try to leave the camp by myself, I’ll disappear. If I try to 
leave the others, I’ll fade away. I’ll join the mist, be part of the fog.” 

“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. 

I took a step back. The fog seemed to tighten around me, cold and wet. 

Lucy stood two feet in front of me. But I could barely see her. She seemed 
to shimmer in and out with the fog. 

“I need help.” Her voice floated softly. I had to struggle to hear her. “The 
only way a ghost can escape is to take over the mind of a living person.” 

“But—that’s impossible !” I screeched. 

What a dumb thing to say, I scolded myself. Seeing a ghost is impossible! 
Everything happening to me is impossible. 

But it’s happening. 



“I need to possess the mind and body of a living boy or girl,” Lucy 
explained. “I need to take over your body, Harry. I need you to take me away 
from here.” 

“No!” I screamed again. “I can’t! I mean...” My heart thudded so hard, I 
could barely speak. 

“I can’t let you take over my mind,” I finally managed to say. “If you do 
that, I won’t be me anymore.” 

I started to back away. 

I have to get to the cabin, I decided. I have to get Alex. We have to run 
away from this camp. As fast as we can. 

“Don’t be scared,” Lucy pleaded. She followed me. The fog circled us, as if 
holding us inside. 

“Don’t be scared,” Lucy said. “As soon as we are far away from here, I’ll 
get out. I’ll leave your mind. I’ll leave your body. I promise, Harry. As soon as 
we escape this camp, I’ll go away. You will be yourself again. You will be 
perfectly okay.” 

I stopped backing up. My whole body trembled. The fog washed its cold 
mist over me. 

“Please, Harry,” Lucy begged. “Please. I promise you’ll be okay. I 
promise.” 

I squinted at her through the rising mists. 

Should I do it? 

Should I let Lucy take over my mind? 

Will she give it back? 

Can I believe her? 



21 


Lucy floated in front of me. Her dark eyes pleaded with me. “Please,” she 
whispered. 

“No. I’m sorry. I can’t.” The words escaped my lips almost before I thought 
them. “I can’t, Lucy.” 

She shut her eyes. I could see the muscles in her jaw tighten as she gritted 
her teeth. 

“I’m sorry,” I repeated, backing up. 

“I’m sorry too,” she said coldly. Her eyes narrowed. Her lips formed a 
sneer. “I’m really sorry, Harry. But you don’t have a choice. You have to help 
me!” 

“No! No way!” 

I turned and tried to run. 

But something held me back. The fog. It tightened around me. 

The thick, wet mist. A choking mist. It drew around me, pushing me, 
holding me in place. 

I tried to scream for help. But the fog muffled my cry. 

Lucy vanished behind the black fog. 

And then I felt something cold on the top of my head. 

My hair tingled. 

I reached up with both hands. And felt ice. As if a frost had settled over my 

hair. 

“No!” I screamed. “Lucy—no!” 

The cold sank down. My scalp itched. My face froze. 

I rubbed my cheeks. 

Numb. 

Cold and numb. 

“Lucy—please!” I begged. 

I could feel her—so light, so cold—settling into my body. Sinking into my 
brain. 

I could feel her. And I could feel myself slipping away. 

Slipping... slipping... 



As if drifting into a deep sleep. 

The cold spreading over me. Sweeping down my neck. Down my chest. 
“Nooooo!” I uttered a long howl of protest. 

I shut my eyes tight. I knew I had to concentrate. I had to think hard. I had 
to keep awake. I couldn’t let myself fade away. 

I couldn’t let her take over. 

I couldn’t let her shove my mind aside. And take control. Take control of 
my body. 

I set my jaw hard. And kept my eyes shut. And tightened every muscle. 

No! I thought. No—you can’t do this to me, Lucy! 

You can’t take my mind! 

You can’t take over. You can’t—because I won’t let you! 

The cold settled over me. My skin tingled. I felt numb all over. 

And so sleepy... so sleepy... 



22 


“Nooooo!” I tossed back my head in another long howl. 

If I can keep screaming, I can keep awake, I told myself. 

And I can fight Lucy off. I can force her away. 

“Noooooooo!” I wailed into the spinning, whirling fog. 

“Noooooooo!” 

And I felt the cold start to lift. 

“Noooooo!” 

I squeezed my arms. Rubbed my cheeks. And knew the feeling was 
returning. 

“Noooooo!” 

I suddenly felt lighter. And totally alert. 

I did it! I realized. I fought her off! 

But how long did I have before she tried to take over again? 

I took a deep breath. Then another. 

I’m breathing, I told myself. I’m me—and I’m breathing. 

I felt stronger now. I lowered my head and darted into the fog. 

My sneakers pounded the ground. I made my way to the cabin. 

The lights were out. The other guys were in their bunks. 

I burst inside and let the screen door slam behind me. 

“What’s up?” Sam demanded. 

I didn’t answer him. I ran across the room. Grabbed my brother. Shook him 
hard. “Come on. Hurry,” I ordered. 

“Huh?” Alex squinted up at me sleepily. 

I didn’t say another word. I tossed him his shorts and his sneakers. 

I heard the other guys stirring. Joey sat up in his bed. “Harry—where were 
you?” he asked. 

“Lights Out was ten minutes ago,” Sam said. “You’re going to get us ah in 
trouble.” 

I ignored them. “Alex—hurry!” I whispered. 

As soon as he had his sneakers tied, I grabbed his arm and tugged him to 
the door. “Harry—what’s wrong?” he asked. 



“Where are you two going?” I heard Joey call. 

I pulled Alex outside. The screen door slammed behind us. 

“Run!” I cried. “HI explain later. We have to get out of here—now!” 

“But, Harry—” 

I pulled Alex over the grass. The fog had parted enough to let a trail of 
moonlight slip through. We followed the trail to the woods. 

Our sneakers slipped and slid over the wet grass. The only other sound was 
the chirp of crickets and the rush of wind rattling the pine trees. 

After a minute or two, Alex wanted to stop to catch his breath. 

“No,” I insisted. “Keep moving. They’ll follow us. They’ll find us.” 

“Where are we going?” Alex demanded. 

“Deep into the woods,” I told him. “As far away from that camp as we 

can.” 

“But I can’t keep running, Harry,” Alex cried. “My side hurts and—” 

“They’re all ghosts!” I blurted out. “Alex—I know you won’t believe me— 
but you’ve got to try. The kids. The counselors. Uncle Marv. They’re all ghosts!” 

Alex’s expression grew solemn. “I know,” he replied in a tiny voice. 

“Huh? How do you know?” I demanded. 

We squeezed between two tangled tree trunks. Over the chirp of crickets, I 
could hear the lake washing over the shore just beyond some tall shrubs. 

We’re still too close to the camp, I told myself. 

I pulled my brother in the other direction. Away from the lake. Pushing 
aside tall weeds and shrubs, we made our own path, deeper into the woods. 

“Alex—how do you know?” I repeated. 

“Elvis told me,” he replied, wiping sweat off his forehead with his arm. 

We ducked under a tall thorn bush. Thorns scraped the top of my head. I 
ignored the pain and kept moving. 

“Elvis said the ghost story about the fog was true,” Alex continued. “I 
thought he was just trying to scare me. But then he—he—” Alex’s voice trailed 
off. 

We ran into a small clearing. Moonlight made the grass glow like silver. My 
eyes flashed in one direction, then the other. I couldn’t decide which way to run. 

I swatted a mosquito off my arm. “What did Elvis do?” I asked Alex. 

Alex raked back his dark hair. “He tried to take over my mind,” he told me 
in a trembling voice. “He floated into the fog. And then I started to feel really 
cold.” 



Twigs snapped. Dry leaves crackled. 

Footsteps? 

I shoved Alex back into the trees. Out of the clearing. 

We pressed against a wide tree trunk and listened. 

Silence now. 

“Maybe it was a squirrel, or a chipmunk, or something,” Alex whispered. 
“Maybe,” I replied, listening hard. 

Moonlight trickled through the treetops. It made shadows dance over the 
smooth clearing. 

“We have to keep going,” I said. “We’re still too close to the camp. If the 
ghosts follow us...” 

I didn’t finish my thought. I didn’t want to think about what would happen 
if the ghosts followed us. If they caught us... 

“Which way is the highway?” Alex asked, his eyes searching the trees. “It 
isn’t too far from the camp—right? If we can get to the highway, someone will 
give us a ride.” 

“Good idea,” I said. Why hadn’t I thought of that? 

Now here we were, in the middle of the woods. Far from the highway. 

I didn’t even know which direction to go to find it. 

“It must be back that way,” Alex suggested, pointing. 

“No. That’s the way back to the camp,” I argued. 

Alex started to reply—but a loud thumping sound made him stop. “Did you 
hear that?” he whispered. 

I did. 

And then I heard it again. 

A loud thump. Very close by. 

“Is it an animal?” I cried softly. 

“I—I don’t think so,” Alex stammered. 

KA-THUMP. 

Louder. 

Is it a ghost? I wondered. 

Has one of them found us? 

“Quick—this way!” I urged. I grabbed Alex by the wrist and tugged him 

hard. 

We had to get away from whatever was making that frightening noise. 



KA-THUMP. 

Louder. 

“We’re going the wrong way!” I cried. 

We spun around and darted back into the clearing. 

KA-THUMP. 

“Which way?” Alex screeched. “Which way? It—it’s everywhere !” 
KA-THUMP 

And then—from somewhere just ahead of us—a deep, booming voice 
growled, “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY HEART?” 



23 


The ground tumbled and shook. 

Alex and I both let out terrified cries. 

But our cries were drowned out by a rumbling sound that quickly rose to a 

roar. 

The ground gave way beneath us. 

We both raised our arms high as we toppled over. 

I landed on my hands and knees. Alex fell onto his back. The ground 
trembled and tossed, tumbling us around. 

“It—it’s the monsterl” Alex shrieked. 

But that’s impossible! I thought, struggling to my feet. 

That monster is from a story. A dumb camp ghost story. 

It can’t be here in the woods. 

I helped pull Alex up. But the ground shook again, and we both fell to our 
knees. 

KA-THUMP. KA-THUMP. 

“It can’t be real!” I cried. “It can’t—” 

My mouth dropped open in horror as a huge, hairy head raised itself in front 
of us. Its eyes glowed as red as flames—round, terrifying, glowing eyes set deep 
in an ugly, growling face. The creature glared furiously at us. 

“Th-the monster!” Alex stuttered. 

We were both on our knees, bouncing helplessly on the rolling, tossing 
ground. 

Was it the ground? Or the monster’s chest? 

The creature opened an enormous cavern of a mouth. It flashed rows and 
rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

Slowly it raised its head, moving closer. Closer. 

Opening its hairy jaws wide. Preparing to swallow us as we frantically 
struggled to scramble away. 

“Harry—! Harry—!” Alex shrieked my name. “It’s going to eat us! It’s 
going to swallow us whole!” 

And then—in a flash—I had an idea. 



24 


The huge monster uttered a low growl. 

Its hairy mouth opened wider. An enormous purple tongue rolled out. I 
gasped when I saw that the tongue was covered in prickly burrs. 

“Look out, Alex!” I cried. 

Too late. 

The ground tossed, bouncing us both into the air. We landed with a hard 
plop on the tongue. 

“Owwww!” we both howled. It felt like a cactus! 

Slowly, the prickly purple tongue began to slide, carrying us into the 
creature’s open mouth. 

“We don’t believe in monsters,” I told Alex. 

I had to shout over the bellowing of the hungry monster. The tongue carried 
us closer. Closer to the rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

“We don’t believe in this monster!” I shouted. “It is just made up. Part of a 
story. If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!” 

Alex’s whole body shook. He hunched over, making himself into a tight 
ball. “It looks pretty real!” he choked out. 

The tongue dragged us closer. I could smell the monster’s foul breath. I 
could see black stains on its jagged teeth. 

“Concentrate,” I instructed my brother. “We don’t believe in you. We don’t 
believe in you.” 

Alex and I began chanting those words, over and over. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

The purple tongue carried us into the huge mouth. I tried to grab onto the 
teeth. But they were too slippery. 

My hands slid off. I felt myself being swallowed. 

Down, down. Into sour darkness. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” Alex and I continued to 
chant. 

But our voices were muffled as we slid down the creature’s throbbing 
throat. 



“Harry—it swallowed us!” Alex wailed. 

“Keep chanting,” I ordered him. “If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!” 
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

A glob of thick saliva rolled over me. I gagged as it clung to my clothes, my 
skin—hot and sticky. 

The walls of the throat throbbed harder. 

Pulling us down. Down. 

Down into the vast, churning gurgling pit of a stomach below. 

“Ohhhh.” Alex let out a long, defeated sigh. He sank to his knees. He was 
covered in thick saliva too. 

“Keep chanting! It’s got to work! It’s got to!” I screamed. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

“We don’t believe in you! ” 

Alex and I both opened our mouths in screams of horror as we began to fall. 
Falling, falling, into the churning stomach below. 



25 


I shut my eyes. 

And waited for the splash. Waited for the crash. 

Waited to hit the stomach floor. 

Waited. 

When I opened my eyes, I was standing on the ground. Standing next to 
Alex in a grassy clearing. 

The pine trees shivered in the breeze. A full moon poked out from behind 
wispy clouds. 

“Hey—!” I cried. I was so happy to hear my own voice! 

So happy to see the sky. The ground. So happy to breathe the cool air. 

Alex started spinning. Spinning like a top. Laughing at the top of his lungs. 
“We didn’t believe in you!” he cried gleefully. “We didn’t believe in you—and it 
worked!” 

We were both so thrilled. So excited that the monster had vanished. 

Poof! A puff of imagination. 

I started to spin with Alex. Spinning and laughing. 

We stopped when we realized we were no longer alone. 

I let out a startled cry when I saw the faces all around us. The pale, pale 
faces with their glowing eyes. 

I recognized Sam, and Joe, and Lucy, and Elvis. 

I moved close to Alex as the campers—the ghost campers—moved to form 
a circle around us. To trap us. 

Uncle Marv moved into the circle. His tiny eyes glowed red as fire. He 
narrowed them angrily at Alex and me. 

“Capture them!” he bellowed. “Take them back to camp. No one ever 
escapes Camp Spirit Moon.” 

Several counselors moved quickly to grab us. 

We couldn’t move. There was nowhere to run. 

“What are you going to do to us?” I cried. 



26 


“We need living kids,” Unde Marv boomed. “We cannot allow living kids to 
escape. Unless they carry one of us with them.” 

“Noooo!” Alex wailed. “You can’t take over my mind! You can’t! I won’t 
let you!” 

The ghostly circle tightened. The ghost campers moved in on us. 

I tried to stop my legs from shaking. Tried to slow my pounding heart. 

“Alex—we don’t believe in them, either,” I whispered. 

He stared at me, confused for a moment. Then he understood. 

We made the monster vanish by not believing in him. We could do the same 
thing to the ghost campers. 

“Grab them. Take them back to camp,” Uncle Marv ordered the counselors. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you,” Alex and I started to 
chant. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

I stared hard at the circle of ghostly faces. Waited for them to disappear. 

I chanted with my brother. Chanted faster. Chanted louder. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

I shut my eyes. Shut them tight. 

And when I opened them... 

The ghosts were still there. 

“You can’t make us disappear, Harry,” Lucy said, stepping into the circle. 
She narrowed her eyes at me. They glittered cold and silvery in the moonlight. 

“You made the monster disappear because it wasn’t real, just one of our 
ghost tricks,” Lucy explained. “We made you see it. But we’re all real! All of us! 
And we’re not going to vanish in a puff of smoke.” 

“We’re not going away,” Elvis added, moving close to my brother. “In fact, 
we’re coming closer. A lot closer.” 

“I’m taking over your mind,” Lucy whispered to me. “I’m going to escape 
Camp Spirit Moon inside your mind and body.” 

“Nooo! No—please!” I protested. 

I tried to back up. But the other ghost campers had me trapped. 



“You can’t! I won’t let you!” I shrieked to Lucy, frozen in terror. 

“Go away!” Alex shouted at Elvis. 

The woods darkened as clouds swept over the moon. All around me, the 
ghostly eyes appeared to glow brighter. 

I saw Elvis reach for my brother. 

And then my view was blocked by Lucy. She floated up. Up off the ground. 
Up over me. 

“No! Stay away! Stay away!” I screamed. 

But I felt my hair tingle. 

I felt the cold sweep down over me. Down, down. 

I felt Lucy’s ghostly cold. Felt her slipping into my mind. 

Slipping down, down. Taking over. 

And I knew I couldn’t escape. 



27 


“Get away, Lucy. I’m going first!” I heard a voice shout. 

“No way!” a boy cried. “Move out of the way. Uncle Marv said I could be 
first!” 

I could feel the cold sweep up from my body. I opened my eyes—and saw 
Lucy back on the ground. 

Other kids tugged her away. 

“Let go of me!” Lucy screamed, pulling back. “I saw him first!” 

“Finders keepers!” another ghostly girl cried. 

They are fighting over me, I realized. 

They pulled Lucy away. And now they’re fighting to see who will take over 
my mind. 

“Hey—let go!” I heard a ghostly girl cry. I saw her wrestling with another 

girl. 

The ghosts were wrestling and fighting, shoving and clawing at each other. 
I saw the counselors join the fight. 

“Stop this! Stop this!” Uncle Marv bellowed. 

He tried to pull the fighting campers apart. 

But they ignored him and continued to battle. 

And as I stared in horror, they began to spin around me. Faster and faster. A 
ghostly circle of wrestling, fighting, shrieking campers. Boys and girls, 
counselors and Uncle Marv, spinning, struggling, clawing. 

Faster. Faster. 

They spun around and around my brother and me. 

Until they became a swirl of white light. 

And then the light faded. Faded to gray smoke. 

Wisps of smoke that floated to the trees. And disappeared in the trembling 
branches. 

Alex and I stood watching until the last wisp of smoke had floated away. 
“They’re gone,” I choked out. “They fought each other. And they’re gone. 
All of them.” 

I shook my head. I drew in a deep breath of fresh air. 



My heart was still pounding. My whole body trembled. 

But I was okay. Alex and I were okay. 

“Are they really gone?” Alex asked in a tiny voice. 

“Yes. Let’s go,” I said, taking his arm. “Come on. Hurry. Let’s get away 
from here.” 

He followed me eagerly. “Where are we going?” 

“To the highway,” I said. “We’ll walk past the camp to the highway. And 
we’ll stop the first car that comes by. We’ll get to a phone. We’ll call Mom and 
Dad.” 

I slapped my brother on the back. “We’ll be okay, Alex!” I cried happily. 
“We’ll be home before you know it!” 

We walked quickly through the woods. Pushing bushes and weeds out of 
the way. Making our own path. 

As we made our way to the highway, Alex started to hum a song to himself. 

“Whoa!” I cried. “Alex, what’s wrong?” 

“Huh?” He stared at me in surprise. 

I stopped and held him in place. “Sing that again,” I ordered. 

He sang a little more. 

Horrible! His singing was horrible. Totally off-key and sour. 

I stared hard into my brother’s eyes. “Elvis—is that you in there?” I cried. 

Elvis’ voice came out of Alex’s mouth. “Please, Harry, don’t tell,” he 
begged. “I swear I’ll never sing again—if you promise not to tell!” 







Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
IpH 1- 1 

[ if \ v J 

/ \ 

II 

/ VvJBr 


lift 





HOW TO KILL 
A MONSTER 


Goosebumps - 46 
R.L. Stine 





1 


“Why do we have to go there?” I wailed from the backseat of the car. “Why?” 

“Gretchen, I’ve told you three times why.” Dad sighed. “Your mother and I 
have to go to Atlanta. For work!” 

“I know that,” I replied, leaning over the front seat. “But why can’t we go 
with you? Why do we have to stay with Grandma and Grandpa?” 

“Because we said so,” Mom and Dad declared together. 

Because we said so. Once they said those deadly words, there was no use 
arguing. 

I slumped down in my seat. 

Mom and Dad had some kind of work emergency in Atlanta. They got the 
call this morning. 

It’s not fair, I thought. They get to visit a cool city like Atlanta. And Clark 
—my stepbrother—and I have to go to Mud Town. 

Mud Town. 

Well, it’s not really called Mud Town. But it should be. Because it’s a 
swamp. Grandma Rose and Grandpa Eddie live in southern Georgia—in a 
swamp. 

Can you believe it? 

A swamp. 

I stared out the car window. We’d been riding on highways all day. Now we 
were driving on a narrow road through the swamp. 

It was late afternoon. And the cypress trees began to cast long shadows over 
the marshy grass. 

I stuck my head out the window. A blast of hot, humid air hit my face. I 
ducked back in and turned to Clark. His nose was buried in a comic book. 

Clark is twelve—like me. He’s much shorter than I am. Much shorter. And 
he has curly brown hair, brown eyes, and tons of freckles. He looks exactly like 
Mom. 

I’m kind of tall for my age. I have long, straight blond hair and green eyes. 
I look like Dad. 

My parents divorced when I turned two years old. The same thing happened 
to Clark. My dad and his mom married each other right after our third birthdays, 



and we all moved into a new house together. 

I like my stepmother. And Clark and I get along okay, I guess. He acts like 
a jerk sometimes. Even my friends say so. But I think their brothers act like 
jerks, too. 

I stared at Clark. 

Watched him read. 

His glasses slid down his nose. 

He pushed them up. 

“Clark...” I started. 

“Shhhh.” He waved his hand at me. “I’m at the good part.” 

Clark loves comic books. Scary ones. But he’s not brave—so he’s always 
terrified by the time he finishes. 

I glanced out the window again. 

I stared at the trees. At the branches, all draped in long gray webs. They 
dangled from every tree—curtains of gray. They made the swamp look really 
gloomy. 

Mom told me about the gray webs when we were packing this morning. She 
knows a lot about swamps. She thinks swamps are pretty—in a spooky sort of 
way. 

Mom said the gray webs were actually a swamp plant that grew right on the 
trees. 

A plant that grows on a plant. Weird, I thought. Definitely weird. 

Almost as weird as Grandma and Grandpa. 

“Dad, how come Grandma and Grandpa never visit us?” I asked. “We 
haven’t seen them since we were four.” 

“Well, they’re a little strange.” Dad peered at me through the rearview 
mirror. “They don’t like to travel. They almost never leave their house. And they 
live so far back in the swamp, it’s very hard to visit them.” 

“Oh, wow!” I said. “A sleepover with two strange old hermits.” 

“Smelly, strange old hermits,” Clark mumbled, glancing up from his comic. 

“Clark! Gretchen!” Mom scolded. “Don’t talk about your grandparents that 
way.” 

“They’re not my grandparents. They’re hers.” Clark jerked his head toward 
me. “And they do smell. I can still remember it.” 

I punched my stepbrother in the arm. But he was right. Grandma and 
Grandpa did smell. Like a combination of mildew and mothballs. 



I sank deep into my seat and let out a loud yawn. 

It seemed as if we’d been riding in the car for weeks. And it was really 
crowded back there—with me, Clark, and Charley kind of squished together. 
Charley is our dog—a golden retriever. 

I pushed Charley out of the way and stretched out. 

“Quit shoving him onto me!” Clark complained. His comic book dropped to 
the floor. 

“Sit still, Gretchen,” Mom muttered. “I knew we should have boarded 
Charley.” 

“I tried to find a kennel for him,” Dad said. “But no one could take him at 
the last minute.” 

Clark pushed Charley off his lap and reached down for his comic. But I 
grabbed it first. 

“Oh, brother,” I moaned when I read the title. “Creatures from the Muck? 
How can you read this garbage?” 

“It’s not garbage,” Clark shot back. “It’s really cool. Better than those 
stupid nature magazines you read.” 

“What’s it about?” I asked, flipping through the pages. 

“It’s about some totally gross monsters. Half-human. Half-beast. They set 
traps to catch people. Then they hide under the mud. Near the surface,” Clark 
explained. He grabbed the comic from my hand. 

“Then what happens?” I asked. 

“They wait. They wait as long as it takes—for the humans to fall in their 
traps.” Clark’s voice started to quiver. “Then they force them deep into the 
swamp. And make them their slaves!” 

Clark shuddered. He glanced out the window. Out at the eerie cypress trees 
with their long beards of gray. 

It was growing dark now. The trees’ shadows shifted over the tall grass. 

Clark lowered himself in his seat. He has a wild imagination. He really 
believes the stuff he reads. Then he gets scared—like now. 

“Do they do anything else?” I asked. I wanted Clark to tell me more. He 
was really scaring himself good. 

“Well, at night, the monsters rise up from the mud,” he went on, sliding 
down in his seat some more. “And they drag kids from their beds. They drag 
them into the swamp. They drag them down into the mud. No one ever sees the 
kids again. Ever.” 



Clark was totally freaked now. 

“There really are creatures like that in the swamp. I read about them in 
school,” I lied. “Horrible monsters. Half-alligator, half-human. Covered with 
mud. With spiky scales underneath, hidden. If you just brush against one, the 
scales rip the flesh right off your bones.” 

“Gretchen, stop,” Mom warned. 

Clark hugged Charley close to him. 

“Hey! Clark!” I pointed out the window to an old narrow bridge up ahead. 
Its wooden planks sagged. It looked ready to crumble. “I bet a swamp monster is 
waiting for us under that bridge.” 

Clark gazed out the window at the bridge. He hugged Charley closer to 

him. 

Dad began steering the car over the old wooden planks. They rumbled and 
groaned under the weight. 

I held my breath as we slowly rolled across. This bridge can’t hold us, I 
thought. No way. 

Dad drove very, very slowly. 

It seemed to take forever to ride across. 

Clark clung to Charley. He kept his eyes out the window, glued to the 
bridge. 

When we finally neared the end, I let out a long whoosh of air. 

And then I gasped—as a deafening explosion rocked the car. 

“Nooo!” Clark and I both screamed as the car swerved wildly. 

Skidded out of control. 

It crashed into the side of the old bridge. 

Plowed right through the old wood. 

“We-we’re going down!” Dad cried. 

I shut my eyes as we plunged into the swamp. 



2 


We hit hard, with a loud thud. 

Clark and Charley bounced all over the backseat. When the car finally slid 
to a stop, they were sitting on top of me. 

“Is everyone okay?” Mom asked in a shaky voice. She turned to the back. 
“Uh-huh,” I replied. “I guess.” 

We all sat quietly for a moment. 

Charley broke the silence with a soft whimper. 

“Wh-what happened?” Clark stammered. 

“Flat tire.” Dad sighed. “I hope the spare is okay. There’s no way we’re 
going to get help at night in the middle of a swamp.” 

I leaned out the window to check out the tire. Dad was right. It was totally 

flat. 

Boy, were we lucky, I thought. Lucky this was a low bridge. Otherwise... 
“Okay, everybody out of the car,” Mom interrupted my thoughts. “So Dad 
can change the tire.” 

Clark took a long look out the car window before he opened the door. I 
could tell he was afraid. 

“Better be careful, Clark,” I said as he swung his short, stubby legs out the 
door. “The swamp monster likes low targets.” 

“That’s funny, Gretchen. Really funny. Remind me to laugh.” 

Dad headed for the trunk to find the jack. Mom followed. Clark and I 
stepped into the swamp. 

“Oh, gross!” My brand-new white high-tops sank into the thick black mud. 

I let out a long sigh. 

How could anyone live in a swamp? I wanted to know. It was so gross out 

here. 

The air felt thick and soupy. So hot, it was hard to breathe. 

As I pulled my hair back into a scrunchie, I glanced around. 

I couldn’t see much. The sky had darkened to black. 

Clark and I drifted away from the car. “Let’s explore while Dad fixes the 
tire,” I suggested. 



“I don’t think that’s such a great idea,” Clark murmured. 

“Sure it is,” I urged. “There’s nothing else to do. And it’s better than 
standing around here, waiting. Isn’t it?” 

“I—I guess,” Clark stammered. 

We took a few steps into the swamp. My face began to tingle and itch. 

Mosquitoes! Hundreds of them. 

We ducked and dodged, frantically brushing them off our faces, off our bare 
arms. 

“Yuck! It’s disgusting out here!” Clark cried. “I’m not staying here. I’m 
going to Atlanta!” 

“It’s not this buggy at Grandma’s house,” Mom called out. 

“Oh, sure.” Clark rolled his eyes. “I’m going back to the car.” 

“Come on,” I insisted. “Let’s just see what’s over there.” I pointed to a 
patch of tall grass up ahead. 

I stomped through the mud, glancing over my shoulder—to make sure 
Clark was following me. He was. 

As we reached the grass, we could hear a loud rustling deep in the blades. 
Clark and I peered down, straining to see in the dark. 

“Don’t wander too far,” Dad warned, as he and Mom pulled our luggage 
from the trunk, searching for a flashlight. “There might be snakes out there.” 

“Snakes? Whoa!” Clark jumped away. He started running full speed back to 
the car. 

“Don’t be a baby!” I called after him. “Let’s do some exploring.” 

“No way!” He choked out the words. “And don’t call me a baby.” 

“I’m sorry,” I apologized. “Come on. We’ll walk over to that tree. The one 
that towers over the others. It’s not that far away. Then we’ll come right back,” I 
promised. “Puh-lease.” 

Clark and I started toward the tree. 

We walked slowly. Through the darkness. Through the jungle of cypress 
trees. 

The curtains of gray swayed on the tree branches. They were so thick— 
thick enough to hide behind. 

It would be real easy to get lost in here, I realized. Lost forever. 

I shuddered as the heavy gray curtains brushed against my skin. They felt 
like spiderwebs. Huge, sticky spiderwebs. 

“Come on, Gretchen. Let’s turn back,” Clark pleaded. “It’s gross out here.” 



“Just a little further,” I urged him on. 

We made our way carefully through the trees, sloshing through puddles of 
inky water. 

Tiny bugs buzzed in my ears. Bigger ones bit at my neck. I swatted them 
away. 

I stepped forward—onto a dry, grassy patch of ground. “Whoa!” 

The patch started to move. Started to float across the black water. 

I leaped off—and stumbled on a tree root. No—not a tree root. “Hey, Clark. 
Look at this!” I bent to get a better look. 

“What is that?” Clark kneeled beside me and peered at the knobby form. 
“It’s called a cypress knee,” I explained. “Mom told me about them. They 
grow near the cypress trees. They rise up from the roots.” 

“How come Mom never tells me about these things?” he demanded. 

“I guess she doesn’t want to scare you,” I replied. 

“Yeah, right,” he muttered, pushing up his glasses. “Want to go back now?” 
“We’re almost there. See?” I said, pointing to the tall tree. It stood in a 
small clearing just a few feet away. 

Clark followed me into the clearing. 

The air smelled sour here. 

The night sounds of the swamp echoed in the darkness. We could hear low 
moans. Shrill cries. The moans and cries of swamp creatures, I thought. Hidden 
swamp creatures. 

A shiver ran down my spine. 

I moved deeper into the clearing. The tree with the high branches stood 
right before me. 

Clark stumbled over a log. Stumbled into a black pool of mucky water. 
“That’s it,” he groaned. “I’m outta here.” 

Even in the dark, I could see the frightened expression on Clark’s face. 

It was scary in the swamp. But Clark seemed so petrified that I started to 

giggle. 

And then I heard the footsteps. 

Clark heard them too. 

Heavy, thudding footsteps across the black, misty swamp. 

Charging closer. 

Headed straight for us. 

“Come on!” Clark cried, yanking on my arm. “Time to go!” 



But I didn’t move. I couldn’t move. 

Now I could hear the creature’s breathing. Heavy, rasping breaths. Nearer. 
Nearer. 

It came springing out. From behind the gray-bearded tree limbs. 

A tall black form. A huge swamp creature. Loping toward us. Darker than 
the black swamp mud—with glowing red eyes. 



3 


“Charley—! What are you doing down there?” Mom cried, marching into the 
clearing. “I thought you kids were watching him.” 

Charley? 

I’d forgotten all about Charley. 

Charley was the swamp monster. 

“I’ve been looking all over for you,” Mom snapped angrily. “Didn’t we tell 
you to stay by the car? Dad and I have been searching everywhere.” 

“Sorry, Mom,” I apologized. I couldn’t say any more. Charley leaped on me 
and knocked me down—into the mud. 

“Off! Charley! Off!” I shouted. But he planted his huge paws on my 
shoulders and licked my face. 

I was covered in mud. Totally covered. 

“Come on, boy.” Clark tugged on Charley’s collar. “You were scared, 
Gretchen. You thought Charley was a swamp monster.” Clark laughed. “You 
were really scared.” 

“I—I was not,” I sputtered, wiping the mud from my jeans. “I was just 
trying to scare you.” 

“You were really scared. Just admit it,” Clark insisted. “Just admit it.” 

“I was NOT scared.” My voice started to rise. “Who was the one begging to 
go back?” I reminded him. “You! You! You!” 

“What’s all the fighting about?” Dad demanded. “And what are you two 
doing way out here? Didn’t I tell you to stay near the car?” 

“Um, sorry, Dad,” I apologized. “But we were kind of bored, just waiting 
around.” 

“We! What do you mean we? It was all Gretchen’s idea,” Clark protested. 
“She was the one who wanted to explore the swamp.” 

“That’s enough!” Dad scolded. “Everyone—back to the car.” 

Clark and I argued all the way back. Charley trotted by my side, flinging 
more mud on my jeans. 

The flat was fixed—but now Dad had to get the car back on the road. And it 
wasn’t easy. Every time he stepped on the gas, the tires just spun around and 
around in the thick mud. 



Finally, we all got out and pushed. 

Now Mom and Clark were splattered with mud, too. 

As we drove away, I stared out at the dark, eerie marsh. 

And listened to the night sounds. 

Sharp chitters. 

Low moans. 

Shrill cries. 

I’d heard lots of stories about swamp monsters. And I’d read some ancient 
legends about them. Could they be real? I wondered. Do swamp monsters really 
exist? 

Little did I know that I would soon find out the answer to that question. The 
hard way. 



4 


“Yes. Yes. They do.” 

“No way!” I told Dad. “That can’t be where they live!” 

“That’s their house,” Dad insisted as the car bumped up a narrow sandy 
road. “That’s Grandma and Grandpa’s house.” 

“That can’t be their house.” Clark rubbed his eyes. “It’s a swamp mirage. I 
read about them in Creatures from the Muck. The swamp mud plays tricks on 
your eyes. It makes you see things.” 

See what I mean about Clark? He really does believe the stuff he reads. 

And it was beginning to sound right to me, too. How else could you explain 
Grandma and Grandpa’s house? 

A castle. 

A castle in the middle of a swamp. 

Almost hidden in a grove of dark, towering trees. 

Dad pulled the car up to the front door. I stared at the house in the glow of 
the headlights. 

Three stories high. Built of dark gray stone. A turret rose up on the right 
side. On the left, a sliver of white smoke curled from a blackened chimney. 

“I thought swamp houses were smaller,” I murmured, “and built on stilts.” 

“That’s the way they look in my comic,” Clark agreed. “And what’s with 
the windows?” His voice shook. “Are they vampires or something?” 

I stared at the windows. They were tiny. And I could see only three of them. 
Three tiny windows in the entire house. One on each floor. 

“Come on, kids,” Mom said. “Let’s get your luggage.” 

Mom, Dad, and Clark climbed out of the car and headed for the trunk. I 
stood by the car door with Charley. 

The night air felt cold and damp on my skin. 

I stared up. 

Up at the big dark house. Almost hidden behind the trees. In the middle of 
nowhere. 

And then I heard the howl. A mournful howl. From somewhere deep in the 
swamp. 



A chill swept through me. 

Charley pressed against my leg. I bent to pet him. “What could that be?” I 
whispered to the dog in the dark. “What kind of creature howls like that?” 

“Gretchen. Gretchen.” Mom waved from the front door of the house. 
Everyone else had gone inside. 

“Oh, my,” Grandma said as I stepped into the dim entrance. “This can’t be 
our little Gretchen.” She wrapped her frail arms around me and gave me a big 
hug. 

She smelled just the way I had remembered—musty. I glanced at Clark. He 
rolled his eyes. 

I stepped back and forced a smile. 

“Move aside, Rose,” Grandpa yelled. “Let me get a look at her.” 

“He’s a little hard-of-hearing,” Dad whispered to me. 

Grandpa clasped my hand between his wrinkled fingers. He and Grandma 
seemed so slight. So fragile. 

“We’re really happy you’re here!” Grandma exclaimed. Her blue eyes 
twinkled. “We don’t get many visitors!” 

“For a while, we thought you weren’t coming!” Grandpa shouted. “We 
expected you hours ago.” 

“Flat tire,” Dad explained. 

“Tired?” Grandpa wrapped his arms around Dad. “Well, then come in and 
sit down, son.” 

Clark giggled. Mom shoved an elbow into his side. Grandpa and Grandma 
led us into the living room. 

The room was enormous. Our whole house could probably fit inside it. 

The walls were painted green. Drab green. I stared up at the ceiling. Up at 
an iron chandelier that held twelve candles, in a circle. 

An enormous fireplace took up most of one wall. 

The other walls were covered with black-and-white photographs. Yellowed 
with age. 

Photographs everywhere. Of people I didn’t recognize. Probably dead 
relatives, I thought. 

I glanced through a doorway into the next room. The dining room. It 
appeared to be as big as the living room. Just as dark. Just as dreary. 

Clark and I sat down on a tattered green couch. I felt the old springs sag 
under my weight. Charley groaned and stretched out on the floor at our feet. 



I glanced around the room. At the pictures. At the worn rug. At the shabby 
tables and chairs. The flickering light high above us made our shadows dance on 
the dark walls. 

“This place is creepy,” Clark whispered. “And it really smells bad—worse 
than Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I choked back a laugh. But Clark was right. The room smelled strange. 
Damp and sour. 

Why do two old people want to live like this? I wondered. In this musty, 
dark house. Deep in the swamp. 

“Would anyone like something to drink?” Grandma interrupted my 
thoughts. “How about a nice cup of tea?” 

Clark and I shook our heads no. 

Mom and Dad also said no. They sat opposite us. The stuffing in their 
chairs spilled out the backs. 

“Well, you’re finally here!” Grandpa yelled to us. “It’s just great. So, tell 
me—how come you were late?” 

“Grandpa,” Grandma shouted to him, “no more questions!” Then she turned 
to us. “After such a long trip, you must be starving. Come into the kitchen. I 
made my special chicken pot pie—just for you.” 

We followed Grandma and Grandpa into the kitchen. It looked like all the 
other rooms. Dark and dingy. 

But it didn’t smell as ancient as the other rooms. The tangy aroma of 
chicken pot pie floated through the air. 

Grandma removed eight small pies from the oven. One for each of us—and 
a couple of extras in case we were starving, I guessed. 

Grandma placed one on my plate, and I began to dig right in. I was starving. 

As I lifted the fork to my mouth, Charley sprang up from his place on the 
floor and started to sniff. 

He sniffed our chairs. 

The counter. 

The floor. 

He leaped up to the table and sniffed. 

“Charley, stop!” Dad ordered. “Down!” 

Charley jumped from the table. Then he reared up in front of us—and 
curled his upper lip. 

He let out a growl. 



A low, menacing growl that erupted into loud barking. 

Furious barking. 

“What on earth is wrong with him?” Grandma demanded, frowning at the 

dog. 

“I don’t know,” Dad told her. “He’s never done that before.” 

“What is it, Charley?” I asked. I shoved my chair from the table and 
approached him. 

Charley sniffed the air. 

He barked. 

He sniffed some more. 

A chill of fear washed over me. 

“What is it, boy? What do you smell?” 



5 


I grabbed Charley’s collar. Petted him. Tried to calm him down. But he jerked 
out of my grasp. 

He barked even louder. 

I reached for his collar again and tugged him toward me. His nails scraped 
the floor as he pulled away. 

The more I tugged on his collar, the harder Charley fought. He swung his 
head sharply from side to side. And started to growl. 

“Easy, boy,” I said softly. “Eeea—sy.” 

Nothing worked. 

Finally Clark helped me drag Charley into the living room—where he 
started to settle down. 

“What do you think is wrong with him?” Clark asked as we stroked the 
dog’s head. 

“I don’t know.” I stared down at Charley. Restless now, he turned in circles. 
Then he sat. Then turned in circles. Again and again. 

“I just don’t get it. He’s never done that before. Ever.” 

Clark and I decided to wait in the living room with Charley while Mom and 
Dad finished eating. We weren’t hungry anymore. 

“How’s that dog of yours?” Grandpa came in and sat down next to us. He 
ran his wrinkled fingers through his thinning gray hair. 

“Better,” Clark answered, pushing his glasses up. 

“Pet her?” Grandpa hollered. “Sure! If you think that will help.” 

After dinner, Mom, Dad, Grandma, and Grandpa talked and talked—about 
practically everything that had happened since they last saw each other. Eight 
years ago. 

Clark and I were bored. Really bored. 

“Can we, um, watch television?” Clark finally asked. 

“Oh, sorry, dear,” Grandma apologized. “We don’t have a television.” 

Clark glowered at me—as if it was my fault. 

“Why don’t you call Arnold?” I suggested. Arnold is the biggest nerd in our 
neighborhood. And Clark’s best friend. “Remind him to pick up your new 



comic.” 

“Okay,” Clark grumbled. “Um, where’s the phone?” 

“In town.” Grandma smiled weakly. “We don’t know many people—still 
alive. Doesn’t pay to have a phone. Mr. Donner—at the general store—he takes 
messages for us.” 

“Haven’t seen Donner all week, though,” Grandpa added. “Our car broke 
down. Should be fixed soon. Any day now.” 

No television. 

No phone. 

No car. 

In the middle of a swamp. 

This time it was my turn to glower—at Mom and Dad. 

I put on my angriest face. I was sure they were going to take us to Atlanta 
with them now. Absolutely sure. 

Dad glanced at Mom. He opened his mouth to speak. Then he turned 
toward me. And shrugged an apology. 

“Guess it’s time for bed!” Grandpa checked his watch. “You two have to get 
an early start,” he said to Mom and Dad. 

“Tomorrow you’re going to have so much fun,” Grandma assured Clark and 
me. 

“Yes, indeed,” Grandpa agreed. “This big old house is great to explore. 
You’ll have a real adventure!” 

“And I’m going to bake my famous rhubarb pie!” Grandma exclaimed. 
“You kids can help me. You’ll love it. It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after 
one bite!” 

I heard Clark gulp. 

I groaned—loudly. 

Mom and Dad ignored us. They said good night. And good-bye. They were 
leaving real early in the morning. Probably before we got up. 

We followed Grandma up the dark, creaky old steps and down a long, 
winding hall to our rooms on the second floor. 

Clark’s room was right next to mine. I didn’t have a chance to see what it 
looked like. After Clark went in, Grandma quickly ushered me to my room. 

My room. My gloomy room. 

I set my suitcase down next to the bed and glanced around. The room was 
nearly as big as a gym! And it didn’t have a single window. 



The only light came from a dim yellow bulb in a small lamp next to the 

bed. 

A handmade mg covered the floor. Worn thin in spots, its rings of color 
were dingy with age. 

A warped wooden dresser sat against the wall opposite the bed. It leaned to 
one side. The drawers hung out. 

Abed. A lamp. A dresser. 

Only three pieces of furniture in this huge, windowless room. 

Even the walls were bare. Not a single picture covered the dreary gray 
paint. 

I sat down on the bed. I leaned against the bars of the iron headboard. 

I ran my fingers over the blanket. Scratchy wool. Scratchy wool that 
smelled of mothballs. 

“No way I’m going to use that blanket,” I said out loud. “No way.” But I 
knew I would. The room was cold and damp, and I began to shiver. 

I quickly changed into my pajamas and pulled the smelly old blanket over 
me. 

I twisted and turned. Trying to get comfortable on the lumpy mattress. 

I stared up at the ceiling and listened. Listened to the night sounds of the 
creepy old house. Strange creaking noises that echoed through the old walls. 

Then I heard the howls. 

Frightening animal howls on the other side of the wall. 

The sad howls from the swamp. 

I sat up. 

Were they coming from Clark’s room? 



6 


I listened hard, afraid to move. 

Another long, sad howl. From outside. Not from Clark’s room. 

“Stop it!” I scolded myself. “Clark is the one with the wild imagination. 
Not you!” 

But I couldn’t shut out the eerie howls from the swamp. 

Was it an animal? Was it a swamp monster? 

I pressed the pillows over my face. It took me hours to fall asleep. 

When I woke up, I didn’t know if it was morning—or the middle of the 
night. Without a window, it was impossible to tell. 

I read my watch—8:30. Morning. 

I searched through the suitcase for my new pink T-shirt. I needed something 
to cheer me up—and pink is my favorite color. I pulled on my jeans. Slipped on 
my muddy sneakers. 

I dressed quickly. The room reminded me of a prison cell. I wanted to 
escape fast. 

I opened the bedroom door and peeked into the hall. 

Empty. 

But there, across from my room, I saw a small window. I hadn’t noticed it 
the night before. 

A bright ray of sunshine filtered through the dusty glass. I peered outside— 
into the swamp. 

A heavy mist hung over the red cypress trees, casting a soft, rosy glow over 
the wet land. The glowing mist made the swamp look mysterious and unreal. 

Something purple fluttered on a nearby tree limb. A purple bird. A purple 
bird with a bright orange beak. I’d never seen a bird like that before. 

Then I heard the sounds again. 

The horrible howls. The shrill cries. 

From animals hiding deep in the swamp—all kinds of creatures I’d 
probably never seen before. 

Swamp creatures. 

Swamp monsters. 



I shuddered. Then turned away from the window and headed for Clark’s 
room. 

I knocked on the door. “Clark!” 

No answer. 

“Clark?” 

Silence. 

I burst through the door and let out a cry. 

The sheets on Clark’s bed lay in a tangled mess—as if there had been some 
kind of struggle. 

And now there was nothing left of Clark—nothing but part of his pajamas, 
crumpled on the bed! 



7 


“Noooo!” 

I opened my mouth in a terrified cry. 

“Gretchen—what’s your problem?” 

Clark stepped out from the closet. 

He wore a T-shirt, baseball cap, sneakers, and his pajama bottoms. 

“Uh... n-no problem,” I stammered, my heart still pounding. 

“Then why did you scream?” Clark demanded. “And why do you look so 
weird?” 

“I look weird? You’re the one who looks weird,” I snapped. I pointed to his 
pajama bottoms. “Where are your pants?” 

“I don’t know.” He shook his head. “I think Mom must have packed them 
in your suitcase by mistake.” 

I have to stop letting this big, old house spook me. Clark is the one with the 
wild imagination—not me, I reminded myself again. 

“Come on,” I told my stepbrother. “Let’s go back to my room and look for 
your jeans.” 

On the way down to breakfast, Clark stopped to peer out the hall window. 
The mist had cleared. The dew-covered plants glistened in the sunlight. 

“It looks sort of pretty, doesn’t it?” I murmured. 

“Yeah,” Clark replied. “Pretty. Pretty creepy.” 

The kitchen looked pretty creepy too. It was dark—almost as dark in the 
morning as the night before. But the back door was open and some sun splashed 
on the floor and the walls. 

We could hear the sounds of the swamp through the open door. But I tried 
to ignore them. 

Grandma stood by the stove, a spatula in one hand, a huge plate of 
blueberry pancakes in the other. She set down the spatula and plate and wiped 
her hands on her faded flower apron. Then she gave us each a big good-morning 
hug—smearing Clark with pancake batter. 

I pointed at the stains on his shirt and giggled. Then I glanced down at my 
shirt. My brand-new pink T-shirt. Splotched with blueberry stains. 

I glanced around the kitchen for something to use to clean my shirt. The 



room was a disaster. 

Globs of pancake batter dripped from the stove. Batter covered the 
countertops and stuck to the floor. 

Then I took a good look at Grandma. She was a disaster too. 

Her face was striped—blue and white. Flour and blueberry stains filled the 
creases of her wrinkled cheeks. She had flour streaked across her nose and chin. 

“Did you sleep well?” She smiled, and her blue eyes crinkled. With the 
back of her hand, she wiped a wisp of gray hair from her eyes. Now a glob of 
blueberry batter nested in the thin strands of her hair. 

“I did,” Grandpa answered, as a loud shriek rang out from the swamp. 
“Always do. It’s so quiet and peaceful here.” 

I had to smile. Maybe Grandpa is lucky that he’s hard-of-hearing, I thought. 

Grandpa headed out the door, and Clark and I brushed ourselves off. Then 
we took our seats at the table. 

In the middle of the table sat another plate of blueberry pancakes. This plate 
was even bigger than the one Grandma had been holding. And it was stacked 
high with blueberry pancakes. 

“Grandma must think we eat like pigs,” Clark leaned over and whispered. 
“There’s enough here for fifty people.” 

“I know,” I groaned. “And we’ll have to eat them all. Otherwise, she’ll be 
insulted.” 

“We do?” Clark gulped. 

That’s one of the things I really like about my stepbrother. He believes 
almost everything I tell him. 

“Help yourself,” Grandma chirped, carrying two more plates of pancakes to 
the table. “Don’t be shy.” 

Why did Grandma make all these pancakes? I wondered. There’s no way we 
could eat all of them. No way. 

I placed a few pancakes on my plate. Grandma heaped about ten onto 
Clark’s plate. His face turned green. 

Grandma sat down with us. But her plate remained empty. She didn’t take a 
single pancake. 

All those pancakes and she didn’t even take one. I don’t get it, I thought. / 
just don’t get it. 

“What’s that you’re reading, dear?” She pointed to Clark’s rolled-up comic, 
sticking out of the back pocket of his jeans. 



“Creatures from the Muck, ” he answered between bites. 

“Oh, how interesting,” Grandma replied. “I love to read. So does Grandpa 
Eddie. We read all the time. We love mysteries. ‘There’s nothing like a good 
mystery,’ Grandpa Eddie always says.” 

I jumped up from the table. I just remembered—Grandma and Grandpa’s 
presents were still packed in my suitcase. 

Books! Mysteries! Dad told us they loved them. 

“Be right back!” I excused myself and dashed upstairs. 

I started down the long, winding hall to my room. Then stopped when I 
heard footsteps. 

Who could it be? 

I gazed down the dark hall. I gasped when I spotted a shadow moving 
against the wall. Someone else was up here. Someone was creeping toward me. 



8 


I pressed my back against the wall. Held my breath and listened. 

The shadow slid out of view. 

The footsteps grew softer. 

Still holding my breath, I inched down the dark twisting hallway. I peeked 
around a corner. And saw it. 

The shadow. Nearly shapeless in the dim light. 

It moved slowly along the dark green walls, growing smaller as the 
footsteps faded in the distance. 

I crept swiftly but silently, chasing the shadow through the corridor. 

Whose shadow is it? I wondered. Who else is up here? 

I crept closer. 

The shadow on the wall loomed large again. 

My heartbeat quickened as I chased the mysterious shape. 

The shadow turned another corner. I hurried to the turn as quietly as I could. 
And stopped. 

Whoever it was—stood right there. Just beyond the turn. 

I took a deep breath—and peeked around the corner. 

And saw Grandpa Eddie. 

Grandpa Eddie—carrying a huge platter stacked high with blueberry 
pancakes. 

How did Grandpa get up here? I wondered. I thought I saw him go outside. 

Grandpa came in through another door, I decided. That has to be it. This 
house is huge. It probably has lots of doors and halls and stairways I haven’t 
discovered yet. 

But what was he doing up here carrying an enormous tray of pancakes? 
Where was he taking them? 

What a mystery! 

Grandpa Eddie carefully balanced the big silver tray between his hands as 
he made his way down the hall. 

I have to follow him, I thought. I have to see where he’s going. 

I padded down the hallway. I wasn’t too worried about being quiet now. 



After all, Grandpa didn’t hear too well. 

I walked only a few yards behind him. 

When I heard the sounds, I froze. 

Sniffing. Behind me. Furious sniffing. 

Oh, no! Charley! 

Charley bounded down the hall toward me. Sniffing. Sniffing furiously. 
Then the dog spotted me—and stopped. 

“Good dog,” I whispered, trying to shoo him away. “Go back. Go back.” 

But he broke into a run. Barking his head off. 

I grabbed for his collar as he tried to dodge me—to race down the hall to 
Grandpa. 

I grasped the collar tightly. He barked even louder. 

“Rose?” Grandpa Eddie called out. “Is that you, Rose?” 

“Come on, Charley,” I whispered. “Let’s get out of here.” 

I dragged Charley around the corner—before Grandpa could catch me 
spying on him. Tugging the dog, I ducked into my room. 

I sat down on the scratchy blanket for a second to catch my breath. Then I 
quickly rummaged through my suitcase for Grandma and Grandpa’s mystery 
books. 

Where was Grandpa going with those pancakes? I wondered as I hurried 
down the stairs with the presents. 

Why was he creeping along so silently? 

It was a mystery I had to solve. 

If only I had minded my own business.... 



9 


“Why don’t you two go out and play while I clean up these dishes?” Grandma 
suggested after breakfast. “Then you can help me make my sweet-as-sugar 
rhubarb pie!” 

“Play?” Clark grumbled. “Does she think we’re two years old?” 

“Let’s go out, Clark.” I pulled him through the back door. Hanging out in a 
swamp wasn’t exactly my idea of fun. But anything was better than sitting 
around that creepy old house. 

We stepped into the bright sunlight—and I gasped. The hot, steamy air felt 
like a heavy weight against my skin. I tried to breathe deeply—to shake the 
smothered feeling I had. 

“So what are we going to do?” Clark grumbled, also drawing in a deep 
breath. 

I glanced around and spotted a path. It started at the back of the house and 
trailed into the swamp. 

“Let’s explore a little,” I suggested. 

“I am not walking through a swamp,” Clark declared. “No way.” 

“What are you afraid of? Comic-book monsters?” I teased him. “Creatures 
from the muck?” I laughed. 

“You’re a riot,” Clark muttered, scowling. 

We walked a few steps. The sun filtered through the treetops, casting leafy 
shadows along the trail. 

“Snakes,” Clark admitted. “I’m afraid of snakes.” 

“Don’t worry,” I told him. “I’ll watch out for snakes. You watch out for 
gators.” 

“Gators?” Clark’s eyes opened wide. 

“Yeah, sure,” I replied. “Swamps are filled with man-eating alligators.” 

A voice interrupted us. “Gretchen. Clark. Don’t stray too far.” 

I turned and saw Grandpa. He stood a few yards behind us. 

What was that in his hand? 

A huge saw. Its sharp teeth glinted in the sunlight. 

Grandpa headed toward a small, unfinished shed. It stood a few feet off the 
side of the path, tucked between two tall cypress trees. 



“Okay!” I shouted to Grandpa. “We won’t go far.” 

“Want to help finish the shed?” he yelled, waving the saw. “Building things 
builds confidence, I always say!” 

“Um, maybe later,” I answered. 

“Want to help?” Grandpa shouted again. 

Clark cupped his hands around his mouth and yelled, “LA-TER!” Then he 
turned back toward the path. 

And tripped. 

Over a dark form that rose up quickly, silently from the muddy grass. 



10 


“Gator! Gator!” Clark shrieked. 

Grandpa waved his saw wildly. “Later? Later? Okay!” 

“Help me! Help me! It’s got me!” Clark wailed. 

I peered down. 

Down at the dark shape in the grass. 

And laughed. 

“Cypress knee,” I said calmly. 

Clark turned, his mouth still open in fright. He stared at the knobby form in 
the grass. 

“It’s a cypress limb, poking up from the grass,” I explained. “It’s called a 
cypress knee. I showed you one yesterday. Remember?” 

“I remembered!” he lied. “I just wanted to scare you.” 

I started to crack a joke, but I saw Clark’s whole body trembling as he 
picked himself up. I felt kind of sorry for him. “Let’s go back to the house,” I 
suggested. “Grandma is probably waiting for us. To make her sweet-as-sugar 
rhubarb pie.” 

On the way back, I told Clark about seeing Grandpa upstairs, and the huge 
tray of pancakes he carried. But Clark didn’t think it was all that strange. 

“He probably likes to eat in bed,” he said. “Mom and Dad always like 
breakfast in bed.” 

“Yeah, maybe,” I agreed. But I wasn’t convinced. I wasn’t convinced at all. 

“Well, you two look as if you’ve had fun!” Grandma chirped when we 
walked through the door. 

Clark and I glanced at each other and shrugged. 

“Are you ready to bake?” Grandma smiled. “Everything is ready.” She 
waved at the counter, at the pie ingredients all lined up. 

“Who wants to roll out the dough,” she asked, staring straight at me, “while 
I slice the rhubarb?” 

“I guess I will,” I replied. 

Clark sighed. “Uh, maybe I’ll go into the living room and read my comic,” 
he told Grandma, trying to escape. “Mom says I just get in the way when she 
cooks.” 



“Nonsense!” Grandma replied. “You measure out the sugar. Lots and lots of 
sugar.” 

I rolled out the pie dough. It seemed like an awful lot of dough. But then— 
what did I know? I’m never around when Mom bakes. She says I get in the way 
too. 

When the dough was rolled flat, Grandma took over. “Okay, children. You 
sit down at the table and have a nice glass of milk. I’ll finish up.” 

Clark and I weren’t thirsty. But we didn’t feel like arguing. We drank our 
milk and watched Grandma finish making the pie. 

No—not one pie. Three pies. 

“Grandma, how come you’re making three pies?” I asked. 

“I always like to have a little extra,” she explained. “Just in case company 
drops in.” 

Company? I thought. Company? 

I stared at Grandma. 

Is she totally losing it? 

Who did she think was coming to visit? She lives in the middle of nowhere! 

What is going on around here? I wondered. 

Is Grandma really expecting visitors? 

Why does she make so much extra food? 



11 


“Work builds thirst!” Grandpa announced, banging open the kitchen door. He 
headed for the refrigerator. “See! I’m right!” Grandpa pointed to our empty milk 
glasses. “Are you two ready to help with the shed now?” 

“Eddie, the children didn’t come here to work!” Grandma scolded. “Why 
don’t you two have some fun exploring the house? There are endless rooms. I’m 
sure you’ll find some wonderful treasures.” 

“Great idea!” Grandpa’s face lit up with a smile. But it faded quickly. “Just 
one warning. You’ll find a locked room. At the end of the hall on the third floor. 
Now pay attention, children. Stay away from that room.” 

“Why? What’s in it?” Clark demanded. 

Grandma and Grandpa exchanged worried glances. Grandma’s face turned 
bright pink. 

“It’s a supply room,” Grandpa replied. “We’ve stored away things in there. 
Old things. Fragile things. Things that could easily break. So just stay away.” 

Clark and I took off. We were glad to get away. Grandma Rose and 
Grandpa Eddie were nice—but weird. 

The kitchen, living room, and dining room took up most of the first floor. 
And we’d seen them already. 

There was a library on the first floor too. But the books in there were old 
and dusty. They made me sneeze. Nothing very exciting in there. So Clark and I 
headed upstairs. To the second floor. 

We made our way past our bedrooms. 

Past the little hall window. 

We followed the twists and turns of the dim hallway—until we came to the 
next room. 

Grandma and Grandpa’s bedroom. 

“I don’t think we should go in there,” I told Clark. “I don’t think Grandma 
and Grandpa want us snooping through their things.” 

“Come on!” he urged. “Don’t you want to check it out? For pancake 
crumbs.” He laughed. 

I shoved Clark hard. 

“Hey!” he grumbled. His glasses slid down his nose. “It was just a joke.” 



I left my stepbrother in the hall and opened the door to the next room. The 
door was made of heavy, dark wood. It groaned when I pushed it. 

I fumbled in the dark for the light switch. The room glowed a sickly yellow 
—from a single, dirty bulb, dangling from the ceiling. 

In the dreary light, I could make out cartons. A room full of cartons. Stacks 
and stacks of them. 

“Hey! Maybe there’s some cool stuff in these boxes,” Clark said, pushing 
past me. 

Clark began to pry one open. “Whatever is in here must be pretty big,” he 
said, pointing to the carton’s bulging sides. 

I peered over Clark’s shoulder. The room smelled so musty and sour. I held 
my nose and squinted in the dim light. Waiting for Clark to reveal what was 
inside the box. 

Clark struggled with the cardboard flaps—and finally they sprang open. 

“I don’t believe this!” he exclaimed. 

“What?” I demanded, craning my neck. “What?” 

“Newspapers. Old newspapers,” Clark reported. 

We lifted the top layers of newspapers to reveal—more newspapers. Old, 
yellowed newspapers. 

We opened five more boxes. 

Newspapers. 

All the cartons were stuffed with newspapers. A room filled with cartons 
and cartons of newspapers. Dating way back to before Dad was born. More than 
fifty years of newspapers. 

Why would anyone want to save all this stuff? I wondered. 

“Whoa!” Clark leaned over a box across the room. “You’re not going to 
believe what’s in this one!” 

“What? What’s in it?” 

“Magazines.” Clark grinned. 

My brother was starting to get on my nerves. But I made my way across the 
room. I liked magazines. Old ones and new ones. 

I shoved my hand deep inside the magazine box and lifted out a stack. 

I felt something tickle the palm of my hand. Under the magazines. 

I peeked underneath. 

And screamed. 



12 


Hundreds of cockroaches skittered through my fingers. 

I flung the magazines to the floor. 

I shook my hand hard, trying to shake the ugly brown bugs off. “Help me! ” 
I wailed. “Get them off me!” 

I felt prickly legs scurrying up my arm. 

I struggled to brush them off—but there were dozens of them! 

Clark grabbed a magazine from the floor and tried to swat them off. But as 
he whacked my arm, more roaches flew out from the pages. 

Onto my T-shirt. My neck. My face! 

“Ow! Nooo!” I shrieked. “Help me! Help me!” 

I felt a cockroach skitter across my chin. 

I brushed it off—and slapped one off my cheek. 

Frantic, I grabbed Clark’s comic from his back pocket—and began batting 
at the scurrying cockroaches. Brushing and batting. Brushing and batting. 

“Gretchen! Stop!” I heard Clark scream. “Stop! They’re all off. Stop!” 

Gasping for breath, I peered down. 

He was right. They were gone. 

But my body still itched. I wondered if I would itch forever. 

I went out into the hall and sat on the floor. I had to wait for my heart to 
stop pounding before I could speak. “That was so gross,” I finally moaned. 
“Totally gross.” 

“Tell me about it.” Clark sighed. “Did you have to use my comic?” He held 
it up by a corner. Not sure if it was safe to stuff back in his pocket. 

My skin still felt as if prickly roach legs were crawling all over it. I 
shuddered—and brushed myself off one last time. 

“Okay.” I stood up and peered down the dreary hallway. “Let’s see what’s 
in the next room.” 

“Really?” Clark asked. “You really want to?” 

“Why not?” I told him. “I’m not afraid of little bugs. Are you?” 

Clark hated bugs. I knew he did. Big ones and little ones. But he wouldn’t 
admit it. So he led the way into the next room. 



We pushed open the heavy door—and peered inside. 



13 


“Wow! Look at all this junk!” My stepbrother stood in the middle of the room. 
Spinning round and round. Taking it all in. 

A room filled with toys and games. Really old toys and games. Mountains 
of them. 

In one corner stood a rusty tricycle. The big front tire was missing. 

“I bet this belonged to Dad,” I said. It was hard to imagine Dad as a little 
kid, riding this trike. 

I honked the horn. It still worked. 

Clark pulled out a dusty chess set from a banged-up wooden box. He began 
setting up the board while I hunted through the rest of the junk. 

I found a teddy bear with its head badly twisted out of shape. 

A box that held a single roller skate. 

A stuffed toy monkey with one of its arms yanked off. 

I rummaged through bags and bags of little toy soldiers, their uniforms 
faded, their faces rubbed off. 

Then I spotted an antique toy chest. It had a golden carousel painted on it, 
dulled with age. 

I lifted the dusty lid. A porcelain doll rested face down inside the chest. 

I lifted her gently. And turned her face toward me. 

Fine cracks ran across her delicate cheeks. A small chip marred the tip of 
her nose. 

Then I stared into her eyes—and gasped. 

She had no eyes. 

No eyes at all. 

Just two black holes cut out of the space below her small forehead. Two 
gaping black holes. 

“These are Grandma’s treasures?” I croaked. “It’s all junk!” 

I dropped the doll into the chest. 

And heard a squeak. 

From the other side of the room. Next to the door. 

I turned and saw a rocking horse, rocking back and forth. 



“Clark, did you push that horse?” I demanded. 

“No,” Clark replied, softly, watching the horse rock back and forth. Back 
and forth. Squeaking. 

“Let’s get out of here,” I said. “This room is starting to give me the creeps.” 
“Me, too,” Clark said. “Someone beheaded the queen in the chess set. 
Chewed her head right off.” 

Clark leaped over some boxes and jumped into the hall. 

I turned for one last look before I clicked off the light. Totally creepy. 
“Clark?” 

Where did he go? 

I glanced up and down the long hall. 

No sign of him. But he was just there. Standing in the doorway. 

“Clark? Where are you?” 

I walked down the corridor, following its twists and turns. 

A queasy feeling settled in my stomach. My heart began to race. 

“Clark? This isn’t funny.” 

No answer. 

“Clark? Where are you?” 



14 


“BOOOOOO!” 

I let out a long shrill scream. 

Clark stepped out from behind me, bent over with laughter. “Gotcha!” he 
cried. “Gotcha big-time!” 

“That wasn’t funny, Clark,” I growled at him. “It was just dumb. I wasn’t 
even scared.” 

He rolled his eyes. “Why can’t you just admit it, Gretchen? Admit it—just 
once. You were totally scared.” 

“Not!” I insisted. “You just surprised me. That’s all.” I stuffed my hands in 
my jeans pockets so Clark wouldn’t see them shaking. “You’re a real jerk,” I told 
him. 

“Well, Grandma told us to have fun. And that was fun!” he teased. “So 
where should we go now?” 

“We aren’t going anywhere,” I told him angrily. “I’m going to hide in my 
room and read.” 

“Hey! Great idea!” Clark exclaimed. “Let’s play hide-and-seek!” 

“Play? Did I hear you say play?” I asked sarcastically. “I thought you said 
that only two-year-olds play. ” 

“This is different,” Clark explained. “Hide-and-seek in this house is 
definitely not for babies.” 

“Clark, I am not—” 

He didn’t let me finish. “NOT IT!” he cried. Then he took off, running 
down the hall to hide. 

“I don’t want to be It,” I grumbled. “I don’t want to play hide-and-seek.” 

Okay, I told myself. Get this over with. Find Clark fast. Then you can go to 
your room and read. 

I started to count by fives. 

“Five, ten, fifteen, twenty...” I called out, counting to one hundred. Then I 
started down the dark hall. When I reached the end, the hall turned—revealing 
an old winding staircase that led up to the third floor. 

I started to climb the dusty, wooden stairs. They wound round and round. I 
looked up ahead, but I couldn’t see where the steps led. 



I couldn’t even see my own feet. It was totally black in there. 

The stairs creaked and groaned with every step I took. A thick layer of 
grime coated the banister—but I held onto it anyway. And I groped my way up 
—up the dark, winding staircase. 

Breathing hard, I climbed higher and higher. The dust in the air stuck in my 
throat. It smelled sour and old. 

I finally reached the top of the staircase and peered down the third-floor 
hallway. It looked like the one below—with the same twists and turns. 

The same dark green walls. The same dim shaft of light that entered from a 
single window. 

I slowly moved down the hall and opened the first door I reached. 

It was a huge room. Almost as big as the living room. But totally empty. 

The next room was just as large. Just as empty. 

I moved carefully down the dark hall. 

It was really hot up here. Beads of sweat dripped down the sides of my 
face. I blotted them with the sleeve of my T-shirt. 

The next room I entered was small. Well, not exactly small, but the smallest 
I’d seen so far. Against one wall stood an old player piano. 

If it wasn’t so gross up here, I’d come back to this room, I thought. I’d 
come back and see if the old piano worked. 

But right now all I wanted to do was find Clark in his hiding place. And 
leave. 

I walked a little farther. 

Rounded a corner. 

And choked on a scream—as I started to fall. 

No floor! 

No floor at all beneath my feet! 

My hand shot out in the dark, fumbling for something to grab onto. 

I grabbed something hard—an old banister. 

And held on. Held on. Held on. 

I gripped it tightly with both hands and swung myself back. Back up to the 
solid hallway floor. 

My heart pounding, I stared down into the gaping black hole where I had 
fallen. A hole where an old staircase once stood. Now rotted away with age. 

I let out a long sigh. “I’ll get you for this, Clark,” I cried out loud. “I told 
you I didn’t want to play.” 



I hurried down the hall, searching for my stepbrother. Searching quickly. To 
get this dumb game over with. 

And then I stopped. 

And stared—at the door at the end of the hall. 

A door with a shiny metal lock. 

I moved slowly toward the door. A tarnished silver key rested in the 
keyhole. 

What is inside there? I wondered. Why is it locked? 

I stepped closer. 

Why don’t Grandma and Grandpa want us in that room? 

They said it was a supply room. 

Practically every room in this weird old house is a storage room, I thought. 
Why don’t they want us to open that door? 

I stood in front of the door. 

I reached out my hand. 

And wrapped my fingers around the silver key. 



15 


No. 

I pulled my hand away from the doorknob. 

I have to find Clark, I decided. I’m tired of playing this stupid game. I’m 
tired of being It. 

Then I had a great idea. 

I’ll hide! I’ll trick Clark into being It! 

I’ll hide and Clark will get bored waiting for me to find him. He’ll have to 
look for me! 

Perfect! I thought. Now... where shall I hide? 

I searched the rest of the rooms on the third floor—scouting out a good 
hiding place. But the rooms up here were all empty. Nothing to slip behind. 

Nothing to crawl under. 

I returned to the little room with the player piano. Maybe I can figure out a 
way to hide behind that, I thought. 

I tried to push the piano away from the wall. 

Just enough so I could squeeze behind it. But it was way too heavy. I 
couldn’t budge it. 

I made my way back to the door with the silver key—the locked room. 

I peered up and down the dim hall. Had I searched everywhere? Did I miss 
a room? 

That’s when I spotted it. 

A small door. A door in the wall. 

A door I hadn’t noticed before. 

A door to a dumbwaiter. 

I’d seen dumbwaiters in the movies. In big, old houses like this one. They 
were little elevators that carried food and dishes from one floor to another. Pretty 
cool. 

A dumbwaiter! I thought. A perfect place to hide! I turned and started 
toward it—when I heard a crash. A crash—like the sound of a plate dropping. 

A crash coming from the other side of the door with the silver key. 

I pressed my ear against the door. I heard footsteps. 



So that’s where Clark is hiding! I realized. He is such a cheater! He hid in 
the one place he knew I wouldn’t look! 

He hid in the room Grandma and Grandpa told us to stay out of. 

Well, Clark, I thought. Too bad for you. I found you! 

I slipped my fingers around the key and turned it. The lock sprang open 
with a sharp click. I yanked open the door. 

And stared at a hideous monster. 



16 


I nearly fell into the room. 

I couldn’t move. Couldn’t back away. Couldn’t take my eyes off him. 

A living, breathing monster. At least ten feet tall. 

Standing inside the locked room. 

I gaped at his big, furry body. A body like a gorilla—with leaves and tree 
roots and sand tangled in his fur. His head was scaly, with snapping rows of 
jagged alligator teeth. 

A foul stench filled the room. The putrid smell of decay. The smell of the 
swamp. 

My stomach heaved. 

The creature raised his eyes to me—bulging eyes set into the sides of his 
enormous head. 

He held me in his stare for a moment. Then he glanced down at his hairy 
paws—where he balanced a tall stack of pancakes. 

He began stuffing the pancakes into his mouth. Devouring them. Gnashing 
them with his jagged teeth. 

Still gripping the door handle, I stared at the monster as he ate. He jammed 
another stack of pancakes down his throat. He swallowed them whole and 
gmnted with pleasure. 

His horrible alligator eyes went wide. The thick veins in his neck throbbed 
as he ate. 

I tried to call for help. To scream. But when I opened my mouth, no sound 
came out. 

With one hand the monster shoved pancakes into his mouth—stacks at a 
time. With the other, he scratched at one of his furry legs. 

Scratched and scratched. Until he found a big black beetle, nesting in his 
fur. 

He held the beetle up to the side of his head—to one of his bulging eyes. 

The beetle’s legs waved in the air. 

He glared at the beetle. At the waving legs. 

Then he popped the bug into his mouth—and chomped down on its shiny 
black shell with a sickening crunch. 



Blueberries and beetle juice oozed from his mouth. 

Run! I told myself. Run! But I was too terrified to move. 

The creature reached down for another stack of pancakes. 

I forced myself to take a small step back—into the hall. 

The monster jerked his head up. 

He glared at me. Then he let out a deep growl. 

He let the pancakes slide to the floor and lumbered toward me. 

I ran, screaming for help as I charged into the hall. 

“Gretchen! Gretchen! What’s wrong?” Clark turned the corner at the end of 
the corridor. 

“A monster! In the locked room! Hurry!” I shrieked. “Hurry! Get help!” 

I leaped down the stairs. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. “Amonster!” 

I turned to see if the beast was following me—and realized that Clark 
hadn’t moved. 

“There’s a monster in there!” I wailed. “Get away, Clark! Get away!” 

He snickered. “You must think I’m pretty stupid to fall for that one.” 

Clark headed toward the door of the monster’s room. Grinning. 

“No! Please!” I pleaded. “I’m telling the truth!” 

“You just want to scare me. To get even.” 

“I’m not kidding, Clark! Don’t go in there!” I shrieked. “DON’T!” 

Clark reached the door. “Here I am, swamp monster!” he called out as he 
stepped into the room. “Come and get me!” 



17 


A second later Clark’s terrified screams echoed from the room. 

The creature roared over Clark’s cries. 

Charley bounded up the stairs, barking wildly. 

“Run! Run!” Clark came bursting from the room, waving his arms. “A 
monster! A swamp monster!” 

We tore down the stairs, dragging Charley with us. Charley fought hard. He 
wanted to turn around and charge back up the steps. 

“Charley, come!” I pleaded. “Come!” 

But Charley sat down on a step and howled. He wouldn’t budge. 

A bellow thundered through the hall. 

Oh, no! He’s coming! He’s coming after us! 

“PLEASE, CHARLEY!” I begged, yanking on his collar. “PLEASE!” 

Clark stood on the steps, frozen in fear. 

“Help me, Clark!” I pleaded. “Don’t just stand there. Help me!” 

The swamp monster pounded down the hall. The old stairway quaked under 
our feet. 

“He’s coming to get us,” Clark whispered. He still hadn’t moved. 

I grabbed my stepbrother’s T-shirt and yanked him hard. “Help me, Clark!” 
I screamed. “Push Charley!” 

We struggled down the stairs. I tugged Charley and Clark shoved him from 
behind. 

“Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. 

No answer. 

The monster’s roar grew louder. Closer. 

“Lock Charley in the bathroom!” I ordered Clark when we reached the 
second floor. “He’ll be safe there. I’ll find Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I charged down to the kitchen. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I yelled. “Amonster!” 

No one in the kitchen. 

I flew into the living room. “Where are you? Help!” 

Not in the living room. 

I searched the library. Empty. 



I ran back up the stairs. I checked their bedroom and all the other rooms on 
the second floor. 

I couldn’t find them anywhere. 

Where are they? Where could they be? I asked myself. 

Clark stepped out of the bathroom—just in time to hear the monster’s 
footsteps rumbling above us. 

“W-where’s Grandma and Grandpa?” he stammered. 

“I—I don’t know. I can’t find them!” 

“Did you check outside?” His voice came out in a squeak. 

That’s it! I thought. Don’t panic, Gretchen. They must be outside. Probably 
in the back. Grandpa is probably working on the shed. 

We bolted down the stairs and into the kitchen. 

We stopped at the back door. Stared out across the swamp. To the shed. 

No one back there. 

“Where are—?” Clark began. 

“Listen!” I cut Clark off. “Do you hear that?” 

The sound of a car—starting up. 

“Grandpa and Grandma’s car! It’s back! It’s fixed!” I shouted. 

We followed the sound of the engine. It was coming from the front of the 
house. 

We ran to the front door and peered out the window. 

There they were! 

“Huh?” I cried out in shock. 

My grandparents were backing down the driveway. 

They were driving away! 

“No—wait! Wait!” I screamed, turning the lock. 

“They can’t hear you!” Clark shouted. “Open the door! Open it!” 

I yanked on the door. I pulled it as hard as I could. I turned the lock again. 
“Hurry!” Clark shrieked. “They’re leaving us here!” 

I tugged and tugged. And turned the knob frantically. 

Then I realized the horrible truth. 

“It’s bolted from the outside!” I told Clark. “They’ve locked us in!” 



18 


“How could they do this to us?” I wailed. “How could they leave us here? Why 
did they lock us in?” 

The ceiling shook above our heads. Shook hard. Hard enough to send the 
pictures on the living room wall crashing to the floor. 

“What was that?” Clark’s eyebrows shot up. 

“The monster! He’s coming after us!” I croaked. “We have to get out of 
here! We have to find help! ” 

Clark and I ran back to the kitchen. To the kitchen door. 

I twisted the doorknob. Pulled as hard as I could. But this door was also 
jammed shut—barred from the outside. 

We ran through the house. 

We checked all the side doors. 

All stuck. All of them—bolted shut from the other side. 

The monster’s footsteps rumbled above us. 

How could Grandma and Grandpa do this to us? How could they? How 
could they? The question screamed in my head as I charged into the library. To 
the window. 

The only window on the entire first floor. 

Our only escape now. 

I struggled to shove the window up. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

I pounded on the wooden sash with my fists. 

“Look!” Clark choked. He pointed to the grimy pane. “Look!” 

Two rusty nails. Driven into the wooden sash. Nailing the window shut— 
from the outside. 

Nailing us in. 

How could they do this to us? How could they? I chanted silently. How 
could they? 

“We have to break the glass!” I turned to Clark. “It’s the only way out!” 

“Okay!” Clark cried. He leaned forward and began beating his fists against 
the pane. 



“Are you nuts?” I screamed at him. “Find something stronger to—” 

But the rest of my sentence was lost—lost in a deafening crash from above. 
Followed by the thundering clatter of piano keys. 

“Wh-what’s he doing?” Clark stammered. 

“There’s an old piano up there. It sounds as if he’s throwing it across the 
room!” 

The floors, the walls, the library ceiling—everything quaked—as the 
monster hurled the piano across the third-floor room. Over and over again. 

A porcelain vase, a crystal dish, little glass animals flew from a nearby table 
and shattered at our feet. 

I threw my hands over my head as the library books spilled from their 
shelves. 

Clark and I huddled together. On the floor. Waiting for the avalanche of 
books to end. 

Waiting for the monster to stop. 

We huddled there until the house grew silent. 

A final book tumbled from a shelf. It landed on a small table next to me. 

“Hand me that!” I ordered Clark, pointing to a heavy brass candlestick next 
to the book. “Stand back.” 

I turned to the window. I pulled back my arm to swing the heavy 
candlestick—when I heard the whimpering. 

Charley’s whimpering. From upstairs. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “The monster—he’s got Charley!” 



19 


I ran for the stairway, clutching the candlestick in one hand, dragging Clark with 
the other. 

I had to save Charley! I had to! 

I raced up the stairs. I stopped when I reached the top. 

My heart pounded in my chest as I peered down the hall. 

The corridor was empty. 

I crept toward the bathroom. Except for Clark’s raspy breathing and the 
thudding of my heart, the house was still. 

As I neared the bathroom, the bathroom door came into view. 

Shut. 

I gripped the doorknob. It slipped in my sweat-drenched hand. 

I opened the door a crack and peeked inside. But I couldn’t see anything. 

I could feel Clark breathing down my neck as I pushed the door open a bit 
more. 

A bit more. 

“Charley!” I cried out with relief. 

Charley sat in the bathtub. Curled up in a corner. Scared—but safe. 

He gazed up at us with his big brown eyes. He wagged his tail weakly. 
Then he began to bark. 

“Shhhh!” I whispered, petting him. “Please, Charley. Don’t let the monster 
hear you. Quiet, boy.” 

Charley barked even louder. 

So loud that we almost didn’t hear the car pull up outside. 

“Shhhh!” I urged Charley. I turned to Clark. “Did you hear that?” 

His mouth dropped open. “A car door!” 

“Yes!” I cried. 

“Grandma and Grandpa are back!” Clark shouted. “I’ll bet they brought 
help!” 

“Stay,” I commanded Charley as we eased out of the bathroom. “Good boy. 
Stay.” 

Clark slammed the door behind us, and we bolted down the stairs. 



“I knew they’d be back! I knew they wouldn’t just leave us!” I flew down 
the steps, two at a time. 

And heard the engine start. 

Heard the car rumble away. 

Heard the tires crunch down the driveway. 

“Noooo!” I shouted as I reached the front door. “Don’t go! Don’t go!” 

I pounded the door with my fists. I kicked it hard. And then I saw the pink 
slip of paper on the floor, slipped under the door. 

A message. I picked it up with a trembling hand. And started to read: 

We’re not coming back. Until next week. Sorry, kids. But work is taking 
much longer than we thought. 

A phone message—from Mom and Dad. 

Grandma and Grandpa didn’t come back, I realized. Mr. Donner, from the 
general store, had driven over to deliver this phone message. 

The roar of the monster tore through my thoughts. 

I spun around. 

Clark was gone. 

“Clark!” I shouted. “Where are you?” 

The monster’s growls grew louder. Meaner. 

“Clark!” I called out again. “Clark!” 

“Gretchen—come quick!” I heard his desperate cry from the kitchen. 



20 


“Gretchen! Gretchen!” 

As I charged through the living room, he shouted my name over and over 
again. Each time his voice grew higher, more excited. 

“I’m coming!” I yelled. “Hold on, Clark. I’m coming!” 

I rounded the couch—and tripped over a footstool. My head hit the floor 

hard. 

Clark continued to cry out my name, but his voice seemed distant now. So 
far away. 

My head throbbed with pain. 

I struggled to stand, and the room spun around me. 

“Gre-tchen! Gre-tchen!” 

He sounded more frantic than ever. 

“I’m coming!” I said through a dizzy haze. 

Then I heard the monster’s bellow. It thundered through the house. 

I have to get to Clark. He’s in trouble! The monster has him! I realized. 

I stumbled through the living room. Toward the kitchen. 

The creature’s roars shook the walls. 

“Hold on, Clark!” I tried to shout, but my voice came out in a moan. “I’m 
coming!” 

I stumbled into the kitchen. 

“Gretchen!” Clark stood next to the refrigerator. 

Alone. 

“Where is he?” I cried. My eyes darted around the room, searching for the 
monster. 

“Wh-where’s who?” Clark stammered. 

“The monster!” I yelled. 

“Upstairs,” Clark replied, puzzled. “What took you so long to get here?” 

Clark didn’t wait for an answer. “Look at this.” He pointed to the 
refrigerator. I turned and saw two letters stuck there with magnets. 

“You were screaming like a maniac to show me that?” I shrieked. “I nearly 
killed myself! I thought the monster had grabbed you!” 



Clark’s hand trembled as he lifted the envelopes from the refrigerator. “It’s 
two letters addressed to us. From Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I stared at the envelopes in Clark’s hand. They were addressed to us, just as 
he said. And they were numbered, one and two. 

“They left us letters?” I couldn’t believe it. 

Clark ripped open the first envelope. The paper shook in his hands as he 
began to read it to himself. 

His eyes scanned the paper. He mumbled as he read. I couldn’t understand 
what he was saying. 

“Let me have that!” I reached out for the letter, but Clark jerked back. He 
held the paper tightly and continued to read. 

“Clark, what does it say?” I demanded. 

He ignored me. He pushed his glasses up on his nose and kept on reading. 
Mumbling. 

I watched Clark as he read. 

I watched his eyes move down the page. 

I watched his eyes grow wide with horror. 



21 


“Clark!” I shouted impatiently. “What does it say?” 

Clark began to read the letter out loud. “'Dear Gretchen and Clark,’” he 
started. The paper fluttered between his trembling fingers. 

“'We’re sorry to do this to you, but we had to leave. A few weeks ago, a 
swamp monster invaded our house. We captured it in the room upstairs. Then we 
didn’t know what to do with it. We didn’t have a car, so we couldn’t get to a 
phone to call for help. 

'“We’ve lived in terror for the past few weeks. We were afraid to let the 
monster out. It’s so loud and angry all the time. We know it would have killed 
us.’” 

My knees started to wobble as Clark continued. 

'“We didn’t want to tell your parents about the creature. If we did, they 
wouldn’t have let you come. We don’t get many visitors here. We wanted so 
much to see you. But I guess we were wrong. You should have gone to Atlanta 
with your mother and father. I guess we were wrong to let you stay.’” 

“They guess they were wrong! They guess!” I shrieked. “Can you believe 
them?” 

Clark peered up from the letter. His face was white. Even his freckles 
seemed to disappear. He shook his head, stunned. 

Then he continued to read our grandparents’ letter. '“We’ve been feeding 
the creature, slipping food through an opening Grandpa sawed in the bottom of 
the door. The monster eats a lot. But we had to feed him. We were afraid not to. 

'“We know it’s unfair to mn off now. But we’re just going for help. We’ll 
be back—as soon as we can find someone. Someone who knows what to do with 
this horrible beast. 

'“Sorry, kids. We really are—but we had to bolt you inside the house. To 
make sure you didn’t wander into the swamp by yourselves. It’s not safe out 
there.’” 

Were they for real?” 

“Not safe out there'.” I cried. “They left us in this house with a killer 
monster—and they say it’s not safe out there! They’re both crazy, Clark. Totally 
crazy!” 



Clark nodded and continued reading. “‘Sorry, kids. We really, really are 
sorry. But just remember one thing: You are perfectly safe as long as...’” 

The monster upstairs let out a loud bellow. And Clark dropped the letter. 

I watched in horror as it sailed through the air. 

Floated down to the floor. 

And slid under the refrigerator. 

“Get it, Clark!” I yelled. “Quick!” 

Clark stretched out on the floor and shoved his fingers under the 
refrigerator. But his fingers only managed to brush the tip of the paper, shoving it 
back. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re pushing it away!” 

But Clark didn’t listen. 

He shoved his hand in deeper. Groping for the paper. 

Pushing it back. Farther and farther. 

Until we couldn’t see it anymore. 

“What did it say?” I hollered. “You read the letter! We’re perfectly safe as 
long as... what?” 

“I—I didn’t get to that part,” Clark stammered. 

I wanted to strangle him. 

I spun around. And frantically searched for something to slip under the 
refrigerator—to ease out the letter. 

But I couldn’t find anything slim enough or long enough. Everything was 
way too big to fit underneath. 

Clark tore open the kitchen cabinets and drawers looking for something we 
could use. 

The monster stomped on the floor above us. 

The ceiling quaked. 

A dish fell off the counter and shattered on the cold gray tiles. Shattered 
into a thousand tiny pieces. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned, staring up at the ceiling, watching the paint crack and 
crumble. “He’s down to the second floor. He’s coming closer.” 

“We’re doomed,” Clark groaned. “He’s going to catch us and—” 

“Clark. We have to move the refrigerator. We have to find out what it says 
in the rest of that letter!” 

Clark and I tugged on the refrigerator. We pushed and tugged with all our 
strength. 



Upstairs, the monster roared an angry roar. 

We tugged harder. 

The refrigerator began to move. 

Clark knelt down and peered underneath it. “Push!” he told me. “Push! I 
can see a corner of the letter! Push—just a little more!” 

I gave the refrigerator one more hard shove—and Clark had it! He grasped 
the corner of the letter between his thumb and index finger. And pulled it out. 

He shook the paper, to free a clump of dust that clung to it. 

“Just read it!” I shouted at him. “Read it!” 

Clark started to read again. ‘“You are perfectly safe as long as...’” 



22 


I held my breath, waiting for Clark to finish the sentence. Waiting to find out 
how we could keep ourselves safe. 

“‘You are perfectly safe,’” Clark read, “‘as long as you do not open the door 
and let the monster out.’” 

“That’s it?” My jaw dropped. “It’s too late for that! It’s too late! Did they 
say anything else? They must have said something else!” 

“There’s a little more.” Clark read on: 

“‘Please. Please stay away from that room. Do not open that door.’” 

“Too late!” I wailed. “It’s too late!” 

‘“If the monster escapes, you will have no choice. You will have to find a 
way to kill it.’” Clark looked up from the letter. “That’s it, Gretchen. That’s all it 
says. You will have to find a way to kill it. ” 

“Quick!” I ordered Clark. “Open the other letter. It’ll probably tell us more. 
It has to!” 

Clark started to tear open the second envelope when we heard the heavy 
footsteps. 

Footsteps downstairs. 

In the next room—the living room. 

“Hurry, Clark! Open it!” 

Clark’s fingers fumbled as he tried to rip through the sealed envelope. But 
he stopped when we heard the creature’s breathing. 

Deep, wheezing breaths. 

Coming nearer. 

My heart thumped wildly as the monster’s wheezing grew louder. 

“He-he’s coming for us!” Clark cried, stuffing the unopened envelope in his 
pocket. 

“The dining room!” I shouted. “Head for the dining room!” 

“What are we going to do? How can we kill it?” Clark cried as we bolted 
from the kitchen. 

“We— owwww!” A sharp pain shot up my leg as I ran smack into the 
dining-room table. 



I clutched my knee. I tried to bend it. But the pain tore through it. 
I spun around. 

And there he stood. 

The swamp monster. 

In the kitchen—lumbering toward us hungrily. 



23 


The monster glared at me with his horrible bulging eyes. I watched the veins in 
his head throb as he let out a long, low growl. 

I stared at those huge, pulsing veins. Stared as they beat against his coarse 
alligator skin. 

“Run, Gretchen!” Clark pulled me from behind. He yanked me out of the 
dining room. We dove toward the stairs. 

“We need a place to hide.” Clark panted as we fled to the second floor. “We 
have to hide until Grandma and Grandpa come back with help.” 

“They’re not coming back!” I screamed at him. “They’re not coming back 
with help!” 

“They said they would,” Clark insisted. “They said so in the letter.” 

“Clark, you are such a jerk.” We reached the top of the stairs. I stopped to 
catch my breath. “Who is going to believe them?” I said, gulping air. “Who’s 
going to believe they have a swamp monster trapped in their house?” 

Clark didn’t reply. 

I answered for him. “No one! That’s who. Everyone they tell the story to 
will think they’re nuts.” 

“Someone might believe them.” Clark’s voice cracked. “Someone might 
want to help.” 

“Yeah, right. ‘Will you help us kill a swamp monster?’ they’ll ask. I’ll bet 
they get loads of volunteers!” I rolled my eyes. 

I stopped yelling at Clark when I heard the monster’s heavy breathing. I 
spun around—and saw the creature. 

He stood at the bottom of the stairs. Eyeing us. Drooling hungrily. 

Clark and I backed slowly away from the top of the stairs. 

The monster followed us with his eyes. 

“We have to kill it,” Clark whispered. “That’s what the letter said. We have 
to kill it. But how?” 

“I have an idea!” I told Clark. “Follow me!” 

We turned and ran. As we charged past the bathroom, we heard Charley 
whimpering. 

“Let’s get Charley!” Clark stopped running. “It’s too dangerous to leave 



him closed up in there. We have to take him with us.” 

“We can’t, Clark,” I replied. “He’ll be okay. Don’t worry.” 

I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But there was no time to stop for 
Charley now—because the monster had reached the second floor. 

There he stood. Looming at the end of the hall. 

He raised his hands up over his head. I saw that he held the wooden 
footstool I had tripped over in the living room. 

His eyes burned with anger. 

He glared at me, then growled a loud, savage growl. A stream of thick 
white drool dribbled down his chin. 

He licked the drool away with a reptile tongue—and smashed the stool 
down across his leg. It splintered into two jagged pieces. 

He raised the pieces and hurled them at us. 

“Let’s go!” Clark shrieked as the footstool bounced off the wall. 

We ran up the stairs. Up to the third floor. 

The monster lumbered after us. The whole house shook with each heavy 
step he took. 

“He’s coming!” Clark cried. “What are we going to do? You said you had 
an idea. What?” 

“There’s a collapsed stairway up here,” I told Clark, running as fast as I 
could through the dark, twisting hall. “It’s totally fallen down. Just a big hole. 
When we turn the corner, grab onto the railing. The monster will chase us around 
the corner—and he’ll fall down the open stairway.” 

The roar of the monster thundered in my ears. I saw him plodding down the 
hall after us. 

“Come on, Clark! Hurry!” 

“What if it doesn’t work?” Clark demanded, very frightened. “What if the 
fall only hurts him? Won’t it make him even more angry?” 

“Don’t ask questions, Clark,” I replied impatiently. “It’s got to work! It’s 
got to!” 

We started to run again. 

The monster howled. Howled with rage. 

“There’s the turn, Clark. Up ahead.” 

The creature roared. Only steps behind us. 

My heart pounded hard. My chest felt as if it were about to explode. “Grab 
the railing, Clark. Or else you’ll drop to the bottom. Here goes!” 



We turned the corner. 

We both threw our hands up. And grabbed the railing. 

Our bodies slammed hard against the wall—then dangled over the black, 
empty hole. 

The creature turned the corner. 

Would my plan work? Would he fall to his death? 

Was this the way to kill a monster? 



24 


The beast whirled around the comer. 

Staggered on the edge of the hole. 

His head jerked to face us. His eyes glowed red. 

He opened his mouth in an ugly growl. He swayed, trying to keep his 
balance. Then he plunged down the open staircase. 

I heard him land with a heavy thud. 

Clark and I hung on to the rotted banister. It creaked under the strain of our 
weight. 

My hands ached. My fingers were numb. I knew I couldn’t hold on much 
longer. 

We listened. 

Silence. 

The creature didn’t move. 

I looked down, but it was too dark to see. 

“My fingers are slipping,” Clark groaned. Then he swung out his foot, 
searching with his sneaker for the hallway floor. 

Hand over hand, he inched his way along the banister to the safety of the 
hall. I followed. 

We peered down into the black hole once more. But it was so black down 
there—we couldn’t make out a thing. Dark and silent. Totally silent. 

“We did it! We’re safe!” I cheered. “We killed the monster!” 

Clark and I jumped up and down in celebration. “We did it! We did it!” 

We ran downstairs. We let Charley out of the bathroom. 

“Everything is okay, Charley.” I hugged my dog. “We did it, boy,” I told 
him. “We killed the swamp monster.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” Clark urged. “We can walk to town. Call Mom and 
Dad from the general store. Tell them to pick us up—now!” 

We were so happy, we practically danced down the steps. The three of us 
headed into the library. “Stand back,” I told Clark. “And hold Charley. I’ll break 
the window, and we’ll get out of here.” 

I glanced around the room, searching for the heavy brass candlestick to 



break the glass. It wasn’t there. 

“Wait here,” I told Clark. “I left the candlestick up in the bathroom. I’ll be 
right back.” 

I sprinted out of the library. 

I couldn’t wait to break out of this creepy place. To leave this horrible 
swamp. And tell Mom and Dad how stupid they were to dump us here in a house 
with a real, live monster inside. 

I ran through the living room—to the stairs. 

I jogged up three steps—and stopped. 

Stopped when I heard the low groan. 

It can’t be, I thought. Maybe it’s Charley. Maybe Charley is growling. 

I listened. 

And heard it again. 

Not a dog growl. Definitely not a dog growl. 

Then I heard the rumbling footsteps, the footsteps of the swamp monster, 
coming from somewhere nearby. 

Closer. 

Closer. 



25 


“Clark!” I staggered back into the library. My legs were shaking. My whole body 
trembled. “He’s not dead!” I cried. “The monster isn’t dead!” 

The library was empty. 

“Clark? Where are you?” I shouted. 

“In the kitchen,” he called. “Feeding Charley.” 

I raced into the kitchen. Clark and Charley sat on the floor. Charley was 
lapping up a bowl of water. 

“The fall didn’t kill him! The monster isn’t dead!” I shrieked. 

Clark gasped in horror. “He must be really angry now. He must be furious. 
What are we going to do?” 

My eyes darted around the kitchen. “Put Charley in there,” I ordered. “In 
that closet. I have another idea.” 

“I hope it’s better than your last idea,” Clark moaned. 

“Do you have an idea?” I yelled at him. “Do you?” 

He didn’t. 

Clark dragged Charley across the kitchen. “Gretchen, this isn’t a closet. It’s 
some kind of room.” 

“I don’t care what it is,” I hollered. “Just put Charley in there.” 

On the counter sat one of Grandma’s rhubarb pies. “The monster hasn’t 
eaten since this morning,” I told Clark. “We’ll put this pie out on the counter 
where he’ll see it.” 

“But that will only slow him down for a second,” Clark whined. He shut 
Charley in the room. “He’ll gobble the pie in one bite. Then he’ll come after us 
again.” 

“No, he won’t,” I insisted. “We’re going to poison the pie. We’ll put stuff in 
it. Enough stuff to kill him!” 

“I don’t know, Gretchen,” Clark argued. “I don’t think that’s going to 
work.” 

Charley whimpered behind the closed door—as if he agreed. 

“We have no choice!” I snapped. “We have to try something!” 

I found a fork and carefully lifted up the pie crust with it. 



Then I searched the cabinet under the kitchen sink. It was filthy under there. 
Damp, with green mold growing on the pipes. 

I found a jar of turpentine sitting on a shelf right in front. The lid was 
screwed on tight. I had to twist it hard to open it. 

I slowly poured the entire jar of turpentine into the pie. 

“Yuck! That stuff stinks,” Clark said, holding his nose. 

I studied the pie. It was wet and runny now. “I think we need something to 
soak up the turpentine,” I told Clark. “This should do it!” I held up a can of drain 
cleaner. 

I sprinkled the blue drain-cleaner crystals over the pie. They made the 
rhubarb bubble and fizz. 

Clark leaped back. “I think that’s enough,” he said. 

I ignored him. 

I stuck my head under the sink and came up with two jars. “Rat poison!” I 
exclaimed, reading the dirty label on one of them. “Excellent.” The other jar was 
filled with ammonia. 

“Hurry!” Clark urged. “I hear the monster. He’s coming.” 

I sprinkled the pie with the rat poison and poured in the ammonia too. 

The monster’s groans came closer. Each time he groaned or growled, I 
jumped. 

I found an old can of orange paint and dumped it into the pie. 

“That’s enough! We have enough!” Clark insisted in a panic. 

“Okay. Okay. I just want to make sure this works.” 

I shoved in a handful of mothballs. 

“Hurry!” Clark urged. “Close it up. He’s coming!” 

The monster’s footsteps pounded the living-room floor. 

“Hurry!” Clark begged. 

I sprayed the top of the pie with bug spray. 

“Gretchen!” Clark pleaded with me. 

I placed the poisoned pie on the counter. 

It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after one bite. Grandma’s words came 
back to me. 

It better do more than that! I told myself. It better kill a monster! 

“Here he comes!” Clark cried. 

We ducked under the kitchen table. 

The monster stomped into the kitchen. Peering out from under the table, I 



could see him swing his arms wildly. He knocked over dishes, pots, glasses. 
Everything in sight. 

Then my heart stopped when I saw the big creature turn. 

He hesitated. Then he took a step toward the kitchen table. Another step. 
Another. 

Clark and I huddled together under the table. We were both trembling so 
hard, the table shook. 

The swamp monster sees us under here! I realized. 

We’re trapped. 

What is he going to do? 



26 


Clark and I held on to each other. The monster stepped up to the table—so close 
I could smell the sour odor of his thick fur. 

Clark started to let out soft, whimpering sounds. 

I clapped my hands over his mouth. I shut my eyes. 

Please go away, I prayed. Please, monster, don’t see us. 

I heard the creature sniffing. Like a dog trying to sniff out a bone. 

When I opened my eyes, he had moved away from the table. 

“Whew!” I breathed a long, silent sigh of relief. 

The monster rumbled around the room. 

Sniffing loudly, urgently. 

He sniffed the refrigerator. 

He lumbered over to the stove and sniffed some more. He plodded around 
the room. Sniffing. 

He smells us. He smells Clark and me, I thought. Please, see the pie. See 
the pie. 

The creature stomped back to the stove. 

Sniffing. 

He bent down and peered into the oven. Then he ripped the oven door off 
its hinges and hurled it across the room. 

The door hit the wall with a loud crash. Clark jumped in fright and banged 
his head on the table. He let out a low moan. 

I moaned too. “Look,” I whispered. 

The creature was eating—but he wasn’t eating our pie. There were two pies 
still in the oven. And the creature was stuffing himself with them. 

Oh, no, I thought. He’ll eat those pies. Then he’ll be full. He won’t eat our 
pie! We’re as good as dead. 

The monster hungrily jammed the two pies into his mouth. He practically 
swallowed them whole. Then he lumbered to the center of the room. 

Sniffing. 

Yes! He’s still hungry! I thought. Eat our pie. Eat our pie, I chanted to 
myself. 



I peered out from under the table—and saw the creature, heading toward 
the counter. Yes! 

He stopped. 

And sniffed. 

He saw the pie. 

He eyed it for a moment. Then he lifted it to his mouth and shoved it in. 

Yes! I cheered silently. He’s eating it! He’s eating our pie! 

He chomped away at the pie. Chomped and shoved more into his huge 
mouth. Chomped and shoved. Chomped and shoved. 

He licked his big lips as he ate. 

He licked his paws. 

He rubbed his stomach. 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “He likes it!” 



27 


I watched the monster shove the last bit of pie into his mouth. 

Then he flicked his reptile tongue in and out, licking up every last crumb 
from the pie tin. 

“It isn’t working,” I moaned to Clark. “He loves it.” 

“Now what are we going to do?” he whispered back. He hugged his knees 
tightly to his chest to keep them from shaking. 

The monster let out a long groan. 

I peered out from under the table. I saw the creature’s eyes bug out. They 
practically popped out of his head! 

A gurgling, choking sound escaped his throat. 

He grasped his neck with his two hairy paws. 

He groaned again. 

His stomach rumbled—a deep rumble. He clutched his stomach and 
doubled over. 

He uttered a weak cry of pain—and surprise. 

Then he dropped dead on the kitchen floor. 

“We did it! We did it!” I cheered. “We killed the swamp monster!” 

I pulled Clark out from under the table. 

I studied the creature from across the room. I was sure he was dead—but I 
still didn’t want to get too close. 

The monster’s scaly eyelids were closed. 

I stared at his chest—to see if it moved. To see if he was breathing. 

His chest remained still. 

I stared at him a few moments longer. 

He didn’t stir. 

Clark peered over my shoulder. “Is—is he really dead?” he stammered. 

“Yes!” I was sure of it now. Totally sure. “We did it!” I cried. I jumped up 
and down joyfully. “We killed the monster! We killed him!” 

Clark reached into his back pocket—for his comic book, Creatures from the 
Muck. He hurled it across the room. It hit the monster in the head and fell to the 
floor. 



“I never want to read about swamp monsters again. Never!” Clark cried. 
“Let’s get out of here!” 

Charley scratched at the door. When we opened it, he leaped out and 
jumped all over us. “It’s okay, boy,” I told him, trying to calm him down. “It’s 
okay.” 

I peered into the room where we had locked Charley. “Hey, Clark, I think 
there’s a door in here,” I said. “A door that leads out!” 

I stepped into the small, dark space—and stumbled over a broom lying on 
the floor. 

I squinted in the darkness. 

Two rusty shovels leaned against the wall to my right. On the left sat a coil 
of old hose. 

In front of me I saw the door. A door with a large glass window. 

I looked out the window—out to the backyard. To the path that ran through 
the swamp. 

Does that path lead through the swamp to town? I wondered. I decided it 
was worth a try. 

“We’re almost out of here!” I declared. “We’re almost free!” 

I turned the doorknob, but the door was locked. Bolted from the other side, 
like all the doors in the house. 

“It’s jammed shut,” I told Clark. “But I’ll break the window and we’ll climb 
out. No problem.” 

The shovels against the wall were big and heavy. I gripped the handle of 
one with both hands and took aim. 

I swung it back—and felt the floor quake. 

I spun around—and heard the roar. 

The roar of the swamp monster. 

He wasn’t dead. 



28 


The creature rumbled into the doorway. 

Clark and I both shrieked as he took a giant step into the room. His hideous 
head made a scraping sound as it brushed against the frame of the door. But he 
didn’t even seem to notice. 

Clark and I pressed against the wall. 

Charley backed into a corner, whimpering. Frightened. 

We were trapped. 

No way out. 

Nowhere to run. 

The monster’s eyes shifted from Charley, to me, to Clark. They rested on 
Clark for a moment. Then the creature lifted his head and wailed. 

“He-he’s going to get me first,” Clark cried. “I—I shouldn’t have thrown 
the comic at him. I shouldn’t have hit him in the head.” 

“He’s going to get us, you jerk!” I shouted at him. “Because we tried to kill 
him!” 

That shut Clark up. 

I have to do something, I thought. I have to do something. But what? What? 

The swamp monster staggered forward. 

He opened his snout with a snap—and bared jagged yellow teeth. 

Sharp yellow teeth, dripping with saliva. 

His eyes glowed red as he moved forward. Clomping closer and closer. 

I glanced down and realized that I still held the shovel. I lifted it with two 
hands—and thrust it forward. Jabbing—jabbing at the air between the creature 
and me. 

“Back!” I screamed. “Get back! Leave us alone!” 

The monster grunted. 

“Get back! Get back!” I swung the shovel wildly. “Go away!” 

I swung at the creature. 

I swung—and hit his stomach with a sickening thwack. 

The room went silent. 

Then the monster tossed back his head and let out a piercing howl. 



He stumbled forward. Swiped the shovel from my hand. And tossed it out 
the door. Tossed it as if it were a toothpick. 

I gasped as it crashed to the kitchen floor. 

I eyed the other shovel leaning against the wall. The monster followed my 

gaze. 

He snatched it up and broke it in half with his bare hands. Then he pitched 
the pieces into the kitchen. 

What can I do? I have to do something! 

And then it came to me! 

The letter. 

The second letter from Grandma and Grandpa—the one we hadn’t opened 

yet! 

“Clark! Quick! The second letter,” I cried. “Maybe it will tell us what to do! 
Read it!” 

Clark stared at me. Frozen. His eyes on the raging monster. 

“Clark!” I said, through clenched teeth. “Open... the... letter. NOW!” 

He reached into his jeans pocket with a trembling hand. He fumbled with 
the flap. 

“Hurry, Clark!” I pleaded. 

He finally managed to tear a hole in the corner of the envelope. 

And then I screamed. 

The monster dove forward. 

He grabbed my arm. He yanked it hard. 

And pulled me toward him. 



29 


The monster pulled me close. 

I stared up into his hideous face—and gasped. 

His eyes were deep, dark pools—with tiny worms swimming in them! 

I twisted my head away—so I wouldn’t have to stare into those horrible, 
wormy eyes. 

The creature gripped me tighter. 

His hot, sour breath swept over my cheeks. 

He opened his jaws wide. 

His mouth was filled with bugs! I saw them crawling up and down his 
tongue. 

I screamed. And struggled against the monster’s hold. But he clutched me 
too tightly. 

“Let me go!” I shrieked. “Please—!” 

The monster bellowed in reply, hitting me with a blast of his hot breath. 

He smells like a swamp, I realized as I fought against his grasp. He is a 
swamp. He’s like a living swamp. 

With my free hand, I pounded on the creature’s arm. I nearly gagged when I 
felt the moss. His whole body was covered with a layer of wet moss! 

“Let me go!” I pleaded. “Please—let me go!” 

Clark leaped forward. He grabbed my arm and tried to tug me away. “Leave 
her alone! ” he shrieked. 

Charley charged out of his corner. His lip curled back and he let out a low 
snarl. Then he sank his teeth into the monster’s hairy leg. 

Startled, the monster jerked away, dragging me along with him. 

But Charley wouldn’t give up. I glanced down to see him dig his teeth deep 
into the monster’s foot. 

With a growl, the beast raised his foot. And with one fierce shake, he hurled 
Charley across the room. 

“Charley!” I cried out. “Charley!” 

I heard Charley whimper on the other side of the room. 

“He’s okay,” Clark said, breathlessly. He tugged harder on my arm, trying 



to wrestle me free. 

With another angry growl, the beast swung at Clark. Shoved him hard 
against the wall. Then the monster leaned down—and pulled me up to his face. 
He opened his mouth. 

His disgusting, bug-infested tongue rolled out. 

And he LICKED me. 

He ran his hot, bumpy tongue up and down my arm. 

Then he lowered his enormous teeth—as he prepared to chew off my hand. 



30 


“Nooooo!” A horrified shriek tore from my throat. 

The monster’s jaw swung down. His mouth gaped open. The bugs swarmed 
over his yellow teeth. He lowered his mouth to my hand. 

Then he stopped. 

And let me go. 

He backed away, staring at me. Staring at my arm, eyes bulging. 

I stared at my arm too. It was covered with disgusting, monster saliva. 

The monster raised his hands and clutched at his throat now. Choking. 
Choking on something. 

He raised his wet eyes to me. 

“You—you human?” he choked out. 

“He can talk\” Clark gasped. 

“You human? You human?” he demanded. 

“Y-yes, I’m a human,” I stammered. 

The monster threw back his head and groaned. “Oh, no. I’m allergic to 
humans.” 

His eyes rolled up. 

He staggered forward and collapsed against the door to the outside. It 
crashed open under his heavy weight. Moonlight streamed in. 

He lay there on his stomach. He didn’t move. 

I rubbed my wet arm and stared down at the swamp monster. 

Was he really dead this time? 



31 


“Gretchen! Let’s go!” Clark yanked me toward the open door. 

We stepped over the monster. I glanced down at the creature one last time. 

His eyes were shut. He didn’t breathe. He didn’t move. 

“Come on, Gretchen!” Clark pleaded. 

Is he really dead? I stared at the swamp monster. I wasn’t totally sure. But I 
did know one thing—I wasn’t going to hang around to find out. 

Clark and I ran out through the broken door. We found Charley already 
there, waiting for us. We bolted down the path—away from the house. Into the 
swamp. 

I was so surprised to find it was dark out. Had we really fought the swamp 
monster all day? 

A pale moon hung over the cypress trees, casting an eerie glow over them. 

The mud rose up over my ankles as we made our way through the marshy 
ground. Through the tall weeds. Through a blanket of heavy mist. 

My shoes plunged into deep pools of water. 

Tripped over upraised roots. 

I swiped at the long beards of gray that hung from the trees. Swiped them 
from my face as we headed deeper and deeper into the swamp. 

When the house was no longer in view, we stopped running. Stopped to 
catch our breath. 

I listened in the darkness for footsteps. 

The swamp monster’s footsteps. 

There weren’t any. 

“We did it! We killed the monster!” My voice rang out in the night. 

“And we escaped!” Clark cheered. “We’re free! We’re okay!” 

“Yes!” I shouted. “We really did it!” 

Now that we had stopped running for our lives, we stepped through the 
swamp carefully. Leaping over the inky puddles and gnarled tree roots. 

The night air echoed with strange sounds. 

Low gurgling. Scampering footsteps. Piercing cries. 

But I didn’t care. 



I had already battled my worst nightmare—the swamp monster. Battled him 
and won. 

“Hey! Clark!” I suddenly remembered the other letter! “We never read 
Grandma and Grandpa’s letter. The second letter!” 

“So what?” Clark replied. “We don’t have to read it. The monster is dead. 
We killed it. Just as they told us to do in the first letter.” 

“Where is it? Where’s the letter?” I demanded. “Take it out, Clark.” I 
stopped walking. “I want to know what it says.” 

Clark pulled the crumpled envelope from his jeans pocket. As he smoothed 
out the wrinkles, a fierce animal cry cut through the swamp. 

“I—I don’t think we should stop now,” Clark said. “We can read it later. 
After we reach town. After we call Mom and Dad.” 

“Read it now,” I insisted. “Come on. Don’t you want to know what it says?” 

“No,” Clark declared. 

“Well, I do,” I told him. 

“Okay. Okay.” Clark ripped open the envelope and slipped out the letter. 

Alight wind began to blow, carrying the sharp animal cries to us. 

The dark trees mstled over our heads. 

Clark began to read slowly, struggling to see in the dim moonlight. “‘Dear 
Gretchen and Clark. We hope you children are safe and well. We forgot one 
word of warning in the first letter. 

“‘If the monster gets out... and you do kill it... and escape from the house 
—stay on the road. Do NOT go into the swamp.’” 

Clark rolled his eyes. He let out a loud groan. 

“Keep reading!” I shouted. “Read!” 

He squinted in the dark and went on. “‘The monster’s brothers and sisters 
live in the swamp—dozens of them. We think they are out there. Waiting for 
him.’” 

My heart started to race as Clark continued. 

“‘We’ve seen the monsters in the swamp. We’ve heard them whistling to 
each other every night. They’re unhappy their brother was captured. They’re 
waiting for him to return. So whatever you do, stay out of the swamp. It’s not 
safe out there. Stay out of the swamp! Good luck! We love you.’” 

Clark’s hands dropped to his sides. The letter fell to the marshy ground. 

I turned slowly, staring out at the shifting shadows. 

“Gretchen.” Clark choked out my name. “Do you hear that? What is that 



sound? What is it?” 


“Uh... it sounds like a whistle.” 

“Th-that’s what I thought,” he whispered. “What do we do now? Any 
ideas?” 

“No, Clark,” I replied softly. “I don’t have any more ideas. How about 
you?” 







Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
R.L. STINE 


JOIN THE ALL NEW 
GOOSEBUMPS 
EAN (UJB! 

. OITA I IS INSIDE!" - 







I"" ' ■- ■ 


1 r n 







LEGEND OF THE 
LOST LEGEND 


Goosebumps - 47 
R.L. Stine 





1 


Justin Clarke tugged his gloves under the sleeves of his heavy blue parka. 
Then he shielded his eyes with one hand and searched all around. “I don’t 
see Dad,” he told his sister, Marissa. “Do you?” 

“I can’t see anything !” Marissa cried, shouting over the wind. “All I 
can see is zee!” 

The sled dogs barked and shook themselves, eager to start moving 
again. 

Justin narrowed his eyes, squinting to the right, then the left. The ice 
stretched smooth and shiny, silvery under the bright sunlight. 

In the distance, it darkened to blue. Darker. Darker. Until the blue ice 
appeared to melt into the sky. Justin couldn’t see where the ice ended and 
the sky began. 

“It’s cold,” Marissa murmured. A sharp gust of wind blew the parka 
hood off her red hair. She instantly reached up with both gloved hands and 
pulled it back in place. 

Justin rubbed his stub of a nose. He pressed his furry gloves against his 
frozen cheeks, trying to warm them. 

The dogs tugged. Justin grabbed the handle of the dogsled to keep it 
from sliding away. 

“What do we do now?” Marissa asked. Justin could hear a slight 
tremble in her voice. He knew his sister was as frightened as he was. 

He stepped onto the sled runner. “Keep going, I guess. Keep going 
until we find Dad.” 

Marissa shook her head. She held her hood in place with both hands. 
“Maybe we should stay right here,” she suggested. “If we stay here, it will 
be easier for Dad to find us.” 

Justin stared hard at her. Why does Marissa look so different? he 
wondered. Then he realized—the cold had made her freckles disappear! 

“It’s too cold to stay in one place,” he said. “It will be warmer if we 
keep moving.” 

He helped her onto the back of the sled. At twelve, he was only a year 
older than Marissa. But he was big and athletic, and she was tiny and 



skinny. 

The dogs grunted and impatiently pawed the silvery ice. 

“I hate Antarctica!” Marissa wailed, grabbing the sled handle with 
both hands. “I hate everything about it. I can’t even spell it!” 

Uh-oh, thought Justin. Here she goes. Once Marissa started 
complaining, she never stopped. 

“We’ll be okay,” he said quickly. “As soon as we find Dad, everything 
will be okay. And we’ll have some amazing adventures.” 

“I hate amazing adventures!” Marissa declared. “Almost as much as I 
hate Antarctica! I can’t believe he brought us to this awful place—and then 
lost us!” 

Justin gazed up at the sky. The sun had started to set. Wide streaks of 
golden light sparkled over the ice. 

“We’ll find Dad really soon,” he told Marissa. “I know we will.” He 
lowered the hood over his forehead. “Let’s get going, okay? Before we 
freeze.” He snapped the line and, in a deep voice, called out to the six dogs, 
“Mush! Mush!” 

The dogs lowered their heads and moved forward with a burst of 
speed. The sled jerked hard as it started to slide. 

“Whoooooaaa!” 

Justin let out a startled shriek as he felt himself start to fall. 

His gloved hands flew off the sled handle. He frantically groped for it. 

Missed. 

And fell off the sled. He fell hard onto his back on the ice. 

“Ooooof!” He felt the breath whoosh from his lungs. 

His arms and legs kicked the air, like a bug on its back. 

He struggled to a sitting position. Blinking. The ice shimmering all 
around him. Shimmering so brightly, he could barely see the sled as it sped 
away. 

“Justin—I can’t stop it!” Marissa’s shrill shriek sounded tiny against 
the steady rush of cold wind. 

“Marissa—!” He tried to call to her. 

“I can’t stop it! Help me! Help!” Her cry already so far away. 



2 


Justin leaped to his feet and started to run after the sled. 

He fell again. Face first this time. 

How can I mn in snowshoes? he wondered. They’re like wearing 
tennis rackets on my feet! 

He had no choice. He jumped back up and started to run. 

He had to catch the sled. He couldn’t let Marissa face the cold and the 
endless ice on her own. 

“I’m coming!” he shouted. “Marissa—I’m coming!” 

He lowered his head against the onrushing wind. He dug the 
snowshoes into the snowy surface of the ice. One step. Then another. Then 
another. 

Running hard, he raised his head and squinted into the distance. The 
sled was a dark blur against the glowing ice. A tiny blur. 

“Marissa—!” he gasped. “Stop the sled! Pull the line! Pull it!” 

But he knew she couldn’t hear him. 

His heart thudded in his chest. He felt a sharp stab of pain in his side. 
His legs ached from lifting the heavy snowshoes. 

But he kept moving. He didn’t slow down. 

When he gazed up again, the sled appeared larger. Closer. 

“Huh?” His cry sent a puff of white steam floating above his head. 

Am I catching up? he asked himself. 

Yes! 

The sled appeared clearer now. Closer. 

He could see Marissa, holding on with one hand, waving frantically to 
him with the other. 

“How—how did you stop the sled?” he choked out as he staggered up 
to her. 

Her blue eyes were wide with fear. Her chin trembled. “I didn’t stop 
it,” she told him. 

“But—” 

“It stopped itself,” Marissa explained. “The dogs—they all stopped. 



I’m frightened, Justin. They stopped all by themselves.” She pointed. “Look 
at them.” 

Justin turned to the dogs at the front of the sled. All six of them had 
their heads lowered, their backs arched. They all whimpered and shook, 
huddled together. 

“Something is frightening them,” Justin murmured. He felt a sudden 
chill of fear. 

“They won’t move,” Marissa said. “They just hunch together, 
whimpering. What are we going to do?” 

Justin didn’t reply. He stared past the sled. Past the frightened dogs. 

He stared at an amazing sight. 

A blue lake. Almost perfectly round, as if someone had carved it out of 
the ice. A pool of water reflecting the clear blue of the sky. 

“Oh, wow!” Marissa gasped. She saw it too. 

In the center of the small lake, they both saw a creature sitting on a 
large chunk of ice. It had its head lowered, staring back at them. 

A sea lion. 

A blue sea lion! 

“It’s the one Dad is looking for!” Justin cried. He stepped up beside his 
sister. They both stared in amazement at the magical creature. 

“The only blue sea lion in the world,” Marissa murmured. “A creature 
from a myth. No one even believes it is real.” 

Where is Dad? Justin wondered, not taking his eyes from the 
enormous blue animal. How can Dad be missing this? 

He brought us all the way to Antarctica to search for this creature. And 
now he’s lost—lost!—and Marissa and I are the only ones to see it. 

“Do you think we can get closer to it?” Marissa asked. “Can we walk 
up to the edge of the water and see it better?” 

Justin hesitated. “Dad said it has strange powers,” he told his sister. 
“Maybe we should stay back here.” 

“But I want to see it better,” she protested. 

She started to step off the sled—then stopped. 

They both heard the rumbling sound at the same time. 

A deep rumble, low at first and then louder. 

“Where is it coming from?” Marissa asked in a whisper, her eyes 
suddenly wide with fear. 



“The sea lion?” Justin guessed. “Did it roar?” 

No. 

They heard it again. Louder this time. Like thunder. 

Thunder... beneath them. 

And this time the ground shook. 

Justin heard a cracking sound. He looked down in time to see the ice 
start to break. 

“Ohh!” A frightened cry escaped his throat. He grabbed for the back of 
the sled and pulled himself onto it. 

“What is happening?” Marissa cried. She grasped the sled handle with 
both hands. 

Another rumble of thunder beneath them. 

The sled tilted and started to rock. 

The sound of cracking ice drowned out the low rumble. 

Ice cracked all around. The ground appeared to split open. 

The blue sea lion, perched in the center of the small, round lake, stared 
back calmly at them. 

A loud crack made the dogs howl. 

The sled bobbed and tilted. Justin grasped the handle as tightly as he 
could. 

He peered down. And saw that the ground holding them had broken 
away, broken free. 

As the ice cracked, the lake opened up. Water rushed all around. 

It’s not a lake, Justin realized. It’s a hidden ocean —under the ice! 

“We-we’re floating away!” Marissa shrieked. 

The dogs howled, drowning out the sound of the cracking ice. Water 
mshed up over the sides of the sled. A strong current carried the sled away. 

Justin and Marissa held on tightly, struggling to stay on the rocking, 
tilting sled. 

The blue sea lion faded into the distance. 

And they floated away, bobbing and swaying. Floating out to sea. 



3 


“What happens next, Dad?” I asked. 

“Yeah. Don’t stop there,” Marissa begged. “You can’t leave Justin and 
me on a chunk of ice, floating out into the ocean. Go on with the story.” 

I pulled the top of the sleeping bag up to my chin. Outside our tent, the 
fire flickered low. I could hear the cluttering of insects all around us in the 
forest. 

I peered out through the open tent flap. Too dark to see the trees. I 
could see a narrow patch of purple sky. No moon. No stars at all. 

Is anything darker than a forest? I wondered. 

We had a kerosene lantern inside the tent. It sent warm yellow light 
around us. But no heat. 

Dad buttoned the top button of his sweater. It had been hot in the tent 
when we came in after dinner. But now a damp chill had fallen over us. 

“That’s all for tonight,” Dad said, scratching his brown beard. 

“But what happens next?” Marissa demanded. “Go on with the story, 
Dad. Please!” 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “Do we float out to sea? How do we get back? Do 
you show up and rescue Marissa and me?” 

Dad shrugged his big shoulders. Under the woolly sweater, he looked 
like a big, brown bear. “I don’t know,” he replied. “I don’t know what 
happens next.” 

He sighed and bent over his sleeping bag. He has a big stomach, and 
it’s hard for him to bend over. He started to unfold the sleeping bag. 

“I haven’t thought of an ending to the story yet,” Dad said softly. 
“Maybe I’ll dream a good ending tonight.” 

Marissa and I both groaned. We hate it when Dad stops a story in the 
middle. He always leaves us in terrible danger. And sometimes we have to 
wait for days to find out if we survive. 

Dad sat down on the tent floor. He groaned as he pulled off his boots. 
Then he struggled to squeeze into the sleeping bag. 

“Good night,” Marissa said, yawning. “I’m so tired.” 

I felt tired too. We’d trudged through the forest since early morning, 



cutting our own path through the trees, and rocks, and tangled weeds. 

“Justin, do me a favor,” Dad said. He pointed to the kerosene lantern. 
“Turn that off, okay?” 

“No problem,” I said. I leaned forward. Reached for the lantern. My 
hand bumped it. Knocked it on its side. And in seconds, the tent was ablaze 
with orange and yellow flames. 



4 


I let out a sick cry and struggled to pull myself out of the sleeping bag. 

Dad climbed to his feet first. I never saw him move so fast. 

He picked up a section of the canvas tent floor and smothered the 
flames on the tent wall. 

“Dad—sorry!” I managed to choke out. I finally struggled out of the 
sleeping bag. 

Luckily, the flames had only caught on one wall. I have too good an 
imagination. I instantly pictured us surrounded by fire. 

I guess I get my imagination from Dad. Sometimes it comes in handy. 
Sometimes it doesn’t. 

Now I was breathing hard, my whole body trembling. “Sorry,” I 
repeated. 

“That was close!” Marissa cried, shivering. “Justin is such a klutz!” 
She had scrambled to the tent flap, ready to run outside. 

Dad shook his head. “It just burned a small hole,” he reported. “Here. I 
can cover it with this.” He spread the section of canvas floor over the hole. 

“This thing burns pretty fast,” I murmured. 

Dad grunted but didn’t reply. 

“I’d hate to be in the middle of the forest without a tent,” Marissa 
declared. “Especially in this weird country.” 

“Everything is fine,” Dad said softly, still fiddling with the tent wall. 
“But no thanks to either of you,” he added sourly. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” I demanded, straightening a leg of my 
pajama pants. 

“You haven’t been much help,” Dad complained. 

“What did I do?” Marissa asked shrilly. “I didn’t try to burn the tent 
down.” 

“You wandered off and got lost this morning,” Dad reminded her. 

“I thought I saw a weird animal,” Marissa replied. 

“It was probably a squirrel,” I chimed in. “Or her shadow.” 

“Give me a break, Justin,” Marissa muttered. 



“Then tonight you both refused to get firewood,” Dad accused. 

“We were tired,” I explained. 

“And we didn’t know where to look,” Marissa added. 

“In a forest?” Dad cried. “You don’t know where to look for firewood 
in a forest ? How about on the ground ?” 

Dad was getting steamed. 

Maybe he’s right, I thought. Maybe Marissa and I should try to be a 
little more helpful. 

After all, this was a very important trip for Dad. And it was really 
great of him to bring us along. 

My dad is Richard Clarke. Maybe you’ve heard of him. He’s a very 
famous writer, storyteller, and story collector. 

Dad travels all over the world, searching for stories. All kinds of 
stories. Then he puts them in books. He has published ten books of stories. 
And he goes all over the country, telling some of the stories he has hunted 
down. 

He has been on a lot of exciting trips. But this one was special. He 
brought Marissa and me to Europe—to this forest in the tiny country of 
Brovania—because of a very special search. 

Dad had kept the whole thing as a surprise. But he told us about it as 
we made our way through the forest that morning. 

“We’ve come to Brovania to search for the Lost Legend,” he 
explained. He pulled a large black beetle from his beard and tossed it away. 

“The Lost Legend is a very old manuscript. It is said to be hidden 
away in a silver chest,” Dad continued as we walked. “It hasn’t been seen 
for five hundred years.” 

“Wow,” Marissa murmured from far behind us. 

She kept stopping to look at bugs and wildflowers. Dad and I had to 
keep waiting for her to catch up. 

“What is the legend about?” I asked. 

Dad shifted the heavy equipment pack on his back. “No one knows 
what the legend is about,” he replied. “Because it has been lost for so long.” 

He used his machete to hack away a tall clump of weeds. Then we 
followed him through a narrow opening in the trees. 

The trees were so thick and leafy overhead, little sunlight could get 
through. Even though it was still morning, the forest stretched as dark as 



night. 

“If we find the Lost Legend, we’ll be very lucky,” Dad said. “It will 
change our lives.” 

“What do you mean?” I asked. 

His expression turned solemn. “The ancient manuscript of the Lost 
Legend is worth a fortune,” he replied. “The whole world is curious about 
it. The whole world wants to read it. Because no one knows who wrote it— 
or what it’s about.” 

I thought about it all day as we twisted our way through the forest. What if 
I’m the one to find it? I asked myself. 

What if I look down and see the silver chest? Hidden between two 
rocks, maybe. Or half-buried in the dirt with only part of its silver lid 
poking up. 

Wouldn’t that be cool? Wouldn’t that be awesome ? 

I pictured how happy Dad would be. And I thought about how rich and 
famous I would be too. I’d be a hero. A real hero. 

That’s what I thought about all day. 

But so far, I knew I hadn’t been much of a hero. In fact, I nearly 
burned down the tent. 

And Dad was already grumbling that Marissa and I hadn’t been much 

help. 

I’ll be more helpful, I promised silently that night. I snuggled lower 
into the sleeping bag, trying to get warm. 

On the other side of the tent, I could hear Dad snoring lightly. Dad can 
fall asleep in seconds. And he’s such a sound sleeper, you practically have 
to hit him in the head to wake him up! 

Marissa and I are not like Dad. It takes us hours to fall asleep. And the 
tiniest, tiniest sound wakes us up instantly. 

So now I lay on my back in the sleeping bag, staring up at the dark 
ceiling of the tent. Trying to clear my mind. Trying not to think about 
anything. 

Trying to fall asleep... asleep... asleep. 

I had almost drifted off—when an animal howl cut through the silence. 

An angry howl. A menacing howl. So close! 

Right outside the tent. 



I jerked straight up. Wide awake. Breathing hard. I knew this wasn’t a 
storybook creature. This creature was real. 



5 


The air in the tent felt cold against my hot skin. I realized that I was 
sweating. 

I listened hard. 

And heard a shuffling sound. A low growl. The crackle of heavy paws 
over the leafy forest ground. 

My heart pounding, I slid the sleeping bag down. Started to crawl out 

of it. 

“Oh!” I let out a whispered cry as someone pushed past me. 

“Dad—?” 

No. I could still hear Dad’s steady snores from across the tent. 

I knew it would take more than a terrifying animal howl to wake Dad 
up! 

“Marissa—” I whispered. 

“Sssshh.” She held a finger up to her mouth as she crawled toward the 
tent flap. “I heard it too.” 

I moved quickly beside her. We stopped in front of the closed flap. 

“It’s some kind of animal,” Marissa whispered. 

“Maybe it’s a werewolf .” I whispered back. 

There goes my wild imagination again. 

But aren’t werewolves supposed to live deep in the forests of Europe? 
I think that’s where all the old werewolf movies took place. In a forest just 
like this one. 

I heard another low growl. 

I grabbed the tent flap and pulled it up. Cold air rushed in. A gust of 
wind ruffled my pajama shirt. 

I peered out into the night. A mist had fallen over the small clearing 
where we had set up the tent. Pale moonlight shining through the mist 
turned everything a shade of blue. 

“What is it?” Marissa whispered from close behind me. “Do you see 

it?” 

I couldn’t see any animal. Only swirls of blue mist. 



“Get back inside,” Marissa ordered. 

I heard more shuffling sounds. A loud sniff. 

“Hurry. Get back in,” Marissa urged. 

“Just wait,” I whispered. I had to see what was out there. I had to see 
what was making those noises. 

I shivered. The air felt heavy and damp. 

Wisps of the blue fog seemed to cling to me. I took a step out of the 
tent. The ground sent a shock of cold up from my bare feet. 

I held my breath and took another step. 

And saw the creature. 

A dog. A big dog, tall. Like a shepherd, only with long, white fur. The 
white fur shimmered like silver under the misty moonlight. The dog had his 
head lowered. He sniffed the ground. 

As I stared at the animal, he raised his head and turned to me. And 
started to wag his tail. 

I love dogs. 

I’ve always loved dogs. 

Without thinking, I reached out my arms. And I ran to pet him. 

“No! Don’t]” Marissa screamed. 



6 


Too late. 

I knelt down and petted the fur on the big dog’s back. It felt soft and 
thick. My hand touched leaves and small twigs tangled in the fur. 

The dog’s tail wagged furiously. I petted his head. He raised his eyes 
to me. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. The dog had one brown eye, one blue. 

“He might be a wolf!” Marissa called. I turned to see that she had 
taken only one step from the tent. She clung to the flap, ready to duck 
inside at any instant. 

“He’s not a wolf. He’s a dog,” I told her. I studied him again. “At least, 
I think he’s not a wolf,” I added. “I mean, he’s too friendly to be a wolf.” 

I rubbed the top of his head. Then I scratched the thick, white fur on 
his chest. I pulled blades of dried grass and weeds from his fur. 

The dog wagged his tail happily. 

“What is he doing out here?” Marissa demanded in a loud whisper. “Is 
he a wild dog? Justin—he might be dangerous.” 

The dog licked my hand. 

“I don’t think he’s too dangerous,” I told her. 

“But maybe he’s part of a pack,” Marissa warned. She let go of the tent 
flap and took another step across the ground toward me. “Maybe the other 
wild dogs sent him out as a scout. Maybe there are a hundred of them!” 

I climbed to my feet and glanced around. Squinting through the blue 
mist, I could see the tall, dark trees that circled the clearing. A half-moon 
floated low over the trees, shimmery through the fog. 

I listened hard. 

Silence. 

“I think this guy is alone,” I told my sister. 

Marissa gazed down at the dog. “Remember that story Dad used to tell 
about the ghost dog?” she asked. “Remember? The dog used to appear 
outside someone’s house. It was such a cute little dog. Very sweet and 
cuddly. It would tilt its head up toward the moon and let out an ‘eeeh eeeh ’ 
sound, as if it were laughing. 



“The dog was so cute, people had to come out and pet it. And when 
they did, the dog would start to bark. It would call its ghost dog friends. 

“The friends were mean and ugly. And they would circle the person, 
circle faster and faster. And then gobble the poor victim up. And the last 
thing the victim would see was the cute, cuddly dog tilting back its head, 
laughing ‘eeeh eeeh ’, laughing at the moon. 

“Remember that story?” Marissa demanded. 

“No, I don’t,” I told her. “I don’t think that’s one of Dad’s stories. It 
isn’t good enough. I think it’s one of yours.” 

Marissa thinks she’s a great storyteller like Dad. But her stories are 
pretty dumb. 

Whoever heard of a laughing dog? 

She took another step toward the dog and me. I shivered. The forest air 
was cold and damp, too cold to be out in pajamas and bare feet. 

“If he’s a wild dog, he could be dangerous,” Marissa repeated. 

“He seems gentle enough,” I said. I petted his head again. And as my 
hand slid down the fur on the back of the dog’s neck, I felt something hard. 

At first I thought it was another dead leaf matted in his thick, white fur. 
I wrapped my hand around it. 

Not a leaf. A collar. A leather dog collar. 

“It’s not a wild dog,” I told my sister. “He has a collar. He must belong 
to someone.” 

“Maybe he ran away and got lost,” Marissa said, kneeling beside the 
dog. “Maybe his owner is searching the forest for him.” 

“Maybe,” I agreed. I tugged the collar up over the thick fur. The dog 
turned his head and licked my hand. 

“Does it have an ID tag or a license?” Marissa asked. 

“That’s what I’m looking for,” I replied. “Whoa. Hold on. There is 
something tucked under the collar.” 

I pulled out a folded-up wad of paper. Squinting in the dim light, I 
started to unfold it. “It’s a note,” I told Marissa. 

“Maybe it has the owner’s address or a phone number on it,” she said. 

I finished unfolding it and held the sheet of paper up close to my face 
to read it. 

“Well? What does it say?” Marissa demanded. 

I read the handwritten words silently to myself—and gasped in 



surprise. 

“Justin—what does it say?” Marissa repeated. 



7 


Marissa tried to grab the note from my hand. But I swung it away from her. 

“It’s a very short note,” I told her. I held it up again and read it out 

loud: 

“‘I KNOW WHY YOU’RE HERE. FOLLOW SILVERDOG.’” 

“Silverdog?” Marissa lowered her gaze to the dog. “Silverdog?” 

His ears perked up. 

“He knows his name,” I said. I ran my eyes over the paper, trying to 
see if I had missed anything. But that’s all there was. No name at the 
bottom. Nothing else. 

Marissa took the note from me and read it for herself. “ 'I KNOW 
WHY YOU’RE HERE’,” she repeated. 

I shivered. The blue fog lowered around us. “We’d better show this to 
Dad,” I said. 

Marissa agreed. We turned and hurried to the tent. I glanced back to 
make sure the dog wasn’t leaving. Silverdog had walked over to a clump of 
tall weeds and was sniffing around them. 

“Hurry,” I whispered to Marissa. 

We both made our way to Dad’s sleeping bag. He was sound asleep on 
his back, making soft blowing sounds through his lips. 

I dropped to my knees and leaned over him. “Dad? Dad?” 

He didn’t stir. 

“Dad? Wake up! It’s important! Dad?” 

Marissa and I both shouted at him. But he’s such a sound sleeper, he 
didn’t hear us. 

“Tickle his beard,” Marissa suggested. “Sometimes that works.” 

I tickled his beard. 

Nothing. He snored away. 

I brought my face down to his ear. “Dad? Dad?” 

I tried shaking him by the shoulders. But it was hard to get a good grip 
under the sleeping bag. 

“Dad? Please! Wake up!” Marissa pleaded. 



He let out a groan. 

“Yes!” I cried. “Dad?” 

He rolled onto his side. Sound asleep. 

I turned and saw that Marissa had crawled back to the tent opening. 
She stared out. “The dog is heading toward the trees,” she reported. “What 
should we do?” 

“Get dressed,” I urged. “Hurry.” 

We both pulled on the jeans and sweatshirts we’d been wearing. I got 
one hiking boot on, then discovered I had a knot in the other shoelace. 

By the time I pulled the second boot on, Marissa was already back 
outside. “Where is Silverdog?” I asked, hurrying up beside her. 

She pointed through the thickening fog. Clouds had rolled over the 
moon. The heavy darkness made it almost impossible to see. 

But I spotted the big dog loping slowly toward the trees. 

“He’s leaving!” I gasped. “We have to follow him.” I started jogging 
across the dirt. 

Marissa hung back. “Not without Dad,” she insisted. “We can’t.” 

“But someone is trying to help us!” I cried. “Someone knows where 
the Lost Legend is. They sent the dog to bring us.” 

“It may be a trap,” Marissa insisted. “Some kind of evil trick.” 

“But, Marissa—” 

I searched through the fog. Where was the dog? I could barely see 
him. He had reached the trees on the far side of the clearing. 

“Remember the story Dad tells about the forest imp?” Marissa asked. 
“The imp puts out a trail of flowers and candy in the forest. And when 
children follow the trail, it leads them into The Pit With No Bottom. And 
the kids fall and fall for the rest of their lives. Remember?” 

“Marissa—please!” I begged. “No more stories. Silverdog is getting 
away.” 

“But—but—” she sputtered. “Dad wouldn’t want us to go wandering 
off on our own in the forest. You know he wouldn’t. We’ll be in real 
trouble.” 

“What if we found the Lost Legend?” I replied. “Then what? Then we 
wouldn’t be in trouble —would we!” 

“No! No way!” Marissa protested, folding her arms over her chest. 
“We can’t go. No way, Justin.” 



I sighed and shook my head. “I guess you’re right,” I said softly. “Let 
the dog go on its way. Let’s get some sleep.” 

I put my hand on her shoulder and led her back to the tent. 



8 


“Are you crazy?” Marissa cried. She spun away from me. “We can’t let the 
dog get away! It may lead us right to the Lost Legend!” 

She grabbed my hand, gave me a hard tug, and started to run, pulling 
me across the clearing. 

As I ran after her, I tried hard not to let her see the big smile on my 
face. I knew my little trick would work with Marissa. It always does. 

If I ever really want to do something, all I have to say is, “Let’s not do 
it.” 

Marissa always disagrees with me. Always. 

That makes it very easy to get her to do what I want. 

“Dad said we weren’t being helpful,” she murmured. “He was giving 
us a hard time because we wouldn’t find firewood. What if we find the Lost 
Legend? Then we’ll be helping him—big-time!” 

“Big-time,” I repeated. 

I pictured Marissa and me handing Dad the silver chest containing the 
Lost Legend. I pictured the shock on Dad’s face. Then I pictured his smile. 

Then I pictured the three of us on the TV news shows. I imagined 
myself telling everyone how Marissa and I found the valuable old 
manuscript—without any help from Dad. 

My boots clumped over the soft ground. I stopped when we reached 
the trees. 

“There’s just one problem,” I told Marissa. 

She spun around. “What’s that?” 

“Where’s the dog?” 

“Huh?” She turned back to the trees. 

We both searched the darkness. 

The dog had disappeared. 



9 


The fog dung to the dark trees. Clouds still covered the moon. 

Marissa and I peered into the darkness, listening hard. 

I sighed. I felt so disappointed. “I think our adventure is over before it 
even started,” I murmured. 

Wrong. 

Aloud bark made us both jump. “Hey—!” I cried out. 

Silverdog barked again. He was calling us! 

We stepped between the trees, following the sound. 

My boots sank into the soft dirt. Under the tall trees, the sky grew even 
darker. 

“Stick close together,” Marissa pleaded. “It’s so hard to see.” 

“We should have brought a flashlight,” I replied. “We left in such a 
hurry, I didn’t think—” 

A loud crackling sound made me stop. The crisp thud of paws over 
dead leaves. 

“This way,” I urged Marissa. I turned toward the sound. “Silverdog is 
right up ahead.” 

I still couldn’t see the dog. But I could hear his footsteps over the dry 
twigs and leaves of the forest floor. 

The dog had turned to the left, following a narrow path through the 
trees. The ground beneath my boots became hard. We both raised our arms 
in front of our faces as we stepped through a thicket of brambles. 

“Ouch!” I cried out as prickly thorns pierced through the sleeve of my 
sweatshirt. 

“Where is that dog taking us?” Marissa asked shrilly. I knew she was 
trying to sound calm. But I could hear the fear creep into her voice. 

“He’s taking us to someone who wants to help us,” I reminded her. 
“He’s taking us to someone who is going to make us rich and famous. 

“Ow!” I pulled a burr from my wrist. 

I hoped I was right. I hoped that the note didn’t lie. I hoped that the 
dog was taking us someplace nice. 

The footsteps turned sharply up ahead. I couldn’t see a path now. 



Actually, I couldn’t see three feet in front of me! 

We kept our arms in front of us, using them as shields. And we pushed 
our way through a thicket of tall weeds. 

“He’s speeding up,” Marissa whispered. 

She was right. I could hear the dog’s footsteps moving more rapidly 
over the ground. 

Marissa and I began jogging, eager to keep up. Over our own 
crunching footsteps, I could hear the dog breathing hard. 

The flutter of wings —many wings, low overhead—made me duck. 

“Were those birds?” Marissa cried. She swallowed hard. And then she 
added, “Or bats?” 

I could still hear the fluttering, in the distance now. The sound sent a 
chill down my back. 

So many flapping wings! 

“They were birds,” I told Marissa. “They had to be birds.” 

“Since when do birds fly like that at night?” she demanded. 

I didn’t answer. Instead, I listened for the dog’s footsteps up ahead. 
They seemed to be slowing down. 

We followed the sound through an opening between tall bushes. And 
stepped into a broad, grassy clearing. 

As we made our way into the grass, the clouds floated away from the 
moon. Under the moonlight, dew-covered grass shimmered like diamonds. 

I gazed up from the grass—and gasped in horror. 

Marissa grabbed my arm. Her mouth dropped open in shock. 

“I don’t believe it!” I cried. 

I stared at the creature standing a few yards up ahead of us. 

Not the dog. 

Not Silverdog. 

A brown-and-black-spotted deer. A stag with antlers that curled up 
from his head and gleamed in the moonlight. 

We had followed the wrong animal. 

And now we were hopelessly lost. 



10 


The big deer stared at us. Then he turned and trotted across the grass, into 
the trees on the other side. 

Frozen in shock, I watched him disappear. Then I turned to my sister. 
“We—we made a bad mistake,” I managed to choke out. “I thought it was 
the dog. I really did.” 

“Let’s not panic,” Marissa said. She huddled close to me. 

A gust of wind made the tall grass whisper and bend. I heard a low 
moaning sound from the trees behind us. I tried to ignore it. 

“You’re right. We won’t panic,” I agreed. But my legs were shaking, 
and my mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. 

“We’ll go back the way we came,” Marissa said. “We didn’t walk that 
far. It shouldn’t be too hard to retrace our steps.” She glanced around. 
“Which way did we come?” 

I spun around. “That way?” I pointed. “No. That way? No...” 

I wasn’t sure. 

“Maybe we should panic,” I said. 

“Why did we do this?” Marissa wailed. “Why were we so stupid?” 

“We thought we were helping Dad,” I reminded her. 

“Now we may never see him again!” she cried. 

I wanted to say something to calm her down. But the words caught in 
my throat. 

“This forest goes on for miles and miles!” Marissa continued. “The 
whole country is probably forest. We’ll never find anyone who can help us. 
We-we’ll probably be eaten by bears or something before we ever get out.” 

“Don’t say bears,” I begged. “There aren’t any bears in this forest—are 
there?” 

I shuddered. Dad had told us too many stories that ended with children 
being eaten by bears. That seemed to be one of Dad’s favorite endings. 

It was never one of mine. 

The wind bent the grass back the other way. In the far distance, I heard 
the flutter of wings once again. 

And over the whisper of the wings, I heard another sound. 



A dog bark? 

Was I imagining it? 

I listened hard. And heard it again. Yes! 

I turned and saw the happy expression on Marissa’s face. She heard it 
too. “It’s Silverdog!” she cried. “He’s calling us!” 

“Let’s go!” I exclaimed. 

I heard another long series of barks. The dog was definitely calling us. 
We spun around and ran toward the sound. 

Ran back into the trees. Ran through the tall bushes. Leaped over 
fallen logs. Ran to the barking. 

Ran. 

Ran full speed. 

Until the ground suddenly gave way. 

A hole opened up beneath us. 

And we started to fall. 

“Nooooooo!” I let out a long, terrified wail. “It’s The Pit With No 
Bottom!” 



11 


I landed hard on my elbows and knees. 

“Ooof!” I let out a groan as my face hit wet dirt. 

A bottom. 

A very hard bottom. 

I glanced over at Marissa. She was already climbing to her feet. She 
brushed dirt and dead leaves off the knees of her jeans. 

“What did you yell?” she asked. “I couldn’t hear you.” 

“Uh... nothing,” I mumbled. “Just yelled.” 

I glanced up. Marissa and I had tumbled down a short, steep hill. We’d 
fallen maybe three or four feet. 

Not exactly a bottomless pit. 

I brushed myself off, hoping Marissa couldn’t see how embarrassed I 

felt. 

When we climbed back to the top, Silverdog was waiting for us. The 
dog raised his head and stared at us with his brown and blue eyes—as if to 
say, “What is your problem? Why can’t you two jerks keep up with me?” 

As soon as we joined him at the top of the hill, the big dog turned and 
loped off, wagging his furry white tail. Every few steps, he glanced back to 
make sure we were following. 

I still felt kind of shaky from the fall. Even though it was such a short 
drop, I had banged my knees pretty hard. They still ached. My heart still 
raced. 

Dad and his crazy stories, I thought, shaking my head. The Pit With 
No Bottom... why would I even think such a crazy thought? 

Well... what could be crazier than following a big white dog through a 
Brovanian forest in the middle of the night? 

Maybe Marissa and I will have a legend to tell our friends when we’re 
finished, I thought. “The Legend of the Two Incredibly Stupid Kids.” 

Or, maybe we’ll find the silver chest containing the Lost Legend—and 
be rich and famous and make Dad proud. 

These were my thoughts as my sister and I followed Silverdog along a 
curving path through the forest. The dog loped easily between the trees and 



weeds. And we trotted behind him, eager not to lose him again. 

After a few minutes, we stepped into a large patch of tall grass. 
Marissa and I stopped and watched Silverdog run across the grass, 
prancing, raising his legs high. He ran to a small cabin on the other side of 
the grass. 

The cabin stood silvery gray under the moonlight. It had one narrow 
door and one square window under a slanted red roof. 

A stone fireplace stood beside the cabin. Some kind of barbecue grill, I 
guessed. Beside the fireplace, I saw a low pile of firewood, neatly stacked. 

I could see no lights on inside the cabin. No sign that anyone lived 
there. 

Silverdog pranced up to the tiny building, pushed in the door with his 
snout, and disappeared inside. 

Marissa and I hesitated at the edge of the clearing. We watched the 
cabin, waiting for someone to come out. The door remained half-open. 

We took a few steps closer. “This is where he wanted to bring us,” 
Marissa murmured, her eyes on the cabin door. “Silverdog sure seemed 
happy to get home. Did you see the way he strutted? Do you think the 
person who wants to help us is inside?” 

“Only one way to find out,” I replied. 

“The cabin looks almost like a fairy-tale cabin,” Marissa said. “Like a 
cabin in one of Dad’s old stories.” She laughed, a quiet dry laugh. “Maybe 
it’s made out of cookies and candy.” 

“Yeah. Right.” I rolled my eyes. 

“Do you remember the story—?” she started. 

“Please—no stories!” I begged. “Come on. Let’s check out the place.” 

We stepped up to the cabin. The whole building was only a few feet 
taller than we were! 

“Hello?” I called. 

No answer. 

“Anyone home?” I called, a little louder. 

No answer. 

I tried one more time. “Hello? Anyone in there?” I shouted, cupping 
my hands around my mouth. 

I pushed open the door. Marissa followed me inside. 

We found ourselves in a warm kitchen. Light from a candle on a small 



table flickered over the wall. I saw a crusty loaf of bread on the sink 
counter. A carving knife beside it. 

I saw a big black pot simmering on a wood-burning stove. It sent a 
sweet, tangy aroma floating through the room. 

I didn’t have time to see anything else. 

As I took one step into the small kitchen, a figure burst in from a back 
room. 

Avery large woman wearing a long, flowing, gray dress. 

She had flashing, bright green eyes. Blond bangs fell across her 
forehead, and long braids hung down the sides of her round-cheeked face. 

She wore a helmet over her head. A cone-shaped helmet with two 
horns poking up from the sides. Like a Viking from long ago. Or someone 
in an opera. 

Her arms were big, with powerful muscles. She had sparkling rings on 
every finger. A round, jeweled medallion swung heavily over her chest. 

She dove quickly past Marissa and me, her green eyes wild, her mouth 
twisted in an evil grin. 

She slammed the cabin door shut. 

Pressed her back against the door. 

“I’ve caught you!” she shrieked. And tossed back her head in an ugly 
cackle of triumph. 



12 


Her cruel laugh ended in a cough. Her green eyes sparkled at us, reflecting 
the candlelight. She stared at us hungrily. 

“Let us go!” 

Those were the words I wanted to shout. 

But when I opened my mouth, only a tiny squeak slipped out. 

Marissa moved first. She dove for the door. I forced my rubbery legs 
into action, and followed close behind. 

“Let us out!” I finally managed to scream. “You can’t keep us here!” 

The big woman’s smile faded. “Take it easy, kids,” she boomed. She 
had a loud, deep voice. “I was just kidding.” 

Marissa and I both gaped at her. “Excuse me?” I cried. 

“Sorry. I have a bad sense of humor,” the woman said. “I guess it 
comes from living out here in the middle of the forest. I can’t resist a really 
mean joke.” 

I still didn’t understand. “You mean you didn’t lock us in?” I 
demanded in a trembling voice. “You haven’t captured us?” 

She shook her head. The horns on the helmet moved with her head. 
She suddenly reminded me of a large, gray bull. 

“I haven’t captured you. I sent Silverdog so that I could help you.” She 
pointed toward the stove. 

I saw that the big white dog had dropped down beside it. He lowered 
his head, licking a big front paw. But he kept his eyes on Marissa and me. 

My sister and I stayed near the door. This woman was strange. And 
kind of terrifying. 

She was so big and loud. And powerful-looking. And those green eyes 
flashed and danced wildly beneath the horned helmet. 

Is she totally crazy? I wondered. 

Did she really bring us here to help us? 

“I know everything that happens in this forest,” she said mysteriously. 
She raised the jeweled medallion close to her face and stared into it. “I have 
ways of seeing things. Nothing escapes me.” 

I glanced at Marissa. Her eyes were wide with fright. Her hand 



reached for the cabin door. 

Back by the stove, Silverdog yawned. He lowered his head between 
his paws. 

“What are your names?” the woman boomed. She let the heavy 
medallion drop back onto her chest. “My name is Ivanna.” She narrowed 
her eyes at me. “Do you know what Ivanna means?” 

I cleared my throat. “Uh... no,” I replied. 

“I don’t, either!” the woman exclaimed. She tossed back her head in 
another cackling laugh. The medallion bounced on her chest. Her helmet 
nearly toppled off her blond hair. 

Despite the warmth of the small kitchen, I shivered. We had walked so 
far through the cold forest. I couldn’t shake off the chill. 

“You two look half-frozen,” Ivanna said, studying our faces. “I think I 
know what you need. Hot soup. Sit down.” She motioned to a small 
wooden table with two chairs in the corner of the room. 

Marissa and I hesitated. I didn’t want to leave the door. I knew we both 
were still thinking of making a run for it. 

“Our dad...” Marissa murmured. “He’ll be looking for us. He might be 
here—any minute.” 

Ivanna stepped over to the stove. “Why didn’t you bring him along?” 
she asked. She pulled down two bowls from a cabinet. 

“We couldn’t wake him up,” I blurted out. 

Marissa glared at me. 

“A heavy sleeper, huh?” Ivanna had her back to us. She was ladling 
soup from the black pot into the two bowls. 

I leaned close to Marissa. “If we want to escape, now is our chance,” I 
whispered. 

She turned to the door, then swung back. “I’m so cold,” she whispered. 
“And the soup smells so good.” 

“Sit down,” Ivanna ordered in her deep, booming voice. 

I led the way to the small wooden table. Marissa and I sat down on the 
hard chairs. 

Ivanna set the steaming bowls in front of us. Her green eyes lit up as 
she smiled. “Hot chicken noodle soup. It will warm you and get you ready 
for your test.” 

“Huh? Test?” I cried. “What test?” 



“Eat. Eat,” Ivanna ordered. “Warm yourselves.” She stepped back to 
the stove. 

I watched her bend to pet Silverdog’s head. Then I raised the soup 
spoon to my mouth. Blew on it. And swallowed a mouthful. 

Delicious. 

And it felt so warm and soothing on my dry throat. 

I took a few more spoonfuls. Then I glanced across the table. Marissa 
seemed to be enjoying it too. 

I had raised a spoonful of noodles nearly to my mouth—when Ivanna 
spun toward us from the sink. Her eyes went wide. Her mouth dropped 
open. 

She pointed at us with a trembling finger. “You—you haven’t eaten 
any of it —have you?” she demanded. 

“Huh?” Marissa and I both gasped. 

“Whatever you do, don’t eat it!” Ivanna cried. “I—I just remembered. 
It’s poison !” 



13 


The spoon dropped from my hand and splashed into the bowl. I grabbed my 
stomach, waiting for the pain to begin. 

I glanced over at Marissa—and saw her roll her eyes. “Another joke?” 
Marissa asked Ivanna. 

“Another joke!” Ivanna confessed gleefully. Once again, she roared 
with laughter. 

I swallowed hard. Why didn’t I guess it was another one of the 
woman’s mean jokes? I hate it when Marissa catches on to things before I 
do! 

“I knew it all along,” I muttered. 

Ivanna stepped up to the table, the medallion bouncing as she walked. 
“The soup isn’t poison. But don’t eat it yet,” she instructed. “I want to read 
the noodles.” 

“Excuse me?” I replied. 

She leaned over my bowl, bringing her face so close that the steam 
misted her cheeks. “Chicken soup noodles foretell your fate,” she 
whispered mysteriously. 

She studied the noodles in my bowl. Then she studied Marissa’s. 
“Hmmmm. Hmmmm,” she kept repeating. “Yes. Hmmmm hmmmm.” 

Finally, she stood up and crossed her powerful arms over her chest. 
Her cheeks were red from the hot steam off the soup. 

“Eat. Eat your soup now,” she instructed. “Before it gets cold.” 

“What did you see?” I asked. “In the noodles. What did they tell you?” 

Her expression turned solemn. “You must take the test in the 
morning,” she replied. “I was right. I know why you have come to the 
forest. I know what you seek.” 

She straightened the helmet on her head. “I can help you. I can help 
you find it. But first you must take the test.” 

“Uh... what kind of test?” I asked. 

Her eyes flashed. “A survival test,” she replied. 

I swallowed hard. “I was afraid of that,” I muttered. 

“What if we don’t want to take your survival test?” Marissa demanded. 



“Then you will never find the silver chest!” Ivanna declared heatedly. 

I gasped. “Wow! You do know what we’re looking for!” I exclaimed. 

She nodded. “I know everything in this forest.” 

“But—but we need our dad!” Marissa stammered. 

Ivanna shook her head. “There is no time. You will take the test in his 
place. Do not worry. It is not a difficult test. If you stay alive.” 

“Huh? If we stay alive ? Is that one of your jokes?” I asked weakly. 

“No,” Ivanna replied, shaking her head. “No joke. I never joke about 
the test in the Fantasy Forest.” 

I was holding the soup spoon. But I let it fall to the table. “Fantasy 
Forest? Where’s that? What is it?” 

Ivanna opened her mouth to answer. But before she could say a word, 
the cabin door burst open. 

I felt a blast of cold air. 

And then a wild creature, covered in black fur, scrabbled into the room 
on all fours. Snarling, it cast its bulging black eyes around the room. 

Then it snapped its jagged teeth—and, with a hoarse growl, leaped to 
attack me. 



14 


I uttered a scream—and tried to dodge out of the way. 

My chair fell, and I fell with it. 

The chair clattered noisily onto the floorboards. I landed on my side. 

I tried to roll away. But the snarling creature sank its teeth into my leg. 
“Owwww!” I shrieked. 

Over my cry, I heard Ivanna’s booming shouts: “Down, Luka! Get 
down! Off, Luka! Get off!” 

The wild creature gurgled. It let go of my leg. And backed away, 
breathing hard. 

As I scrambled to my feet, I stared at the panting creature. It had a 
man’s face. Hunched on its hind legs, it looked almost human. Except that it 
was covered with thick, black fur. 

“Get back, Luka!” Ivanna screamed. “Back!” 

The creature obediently inched back. 

“Don’t be scared of Luka,” Ivanna said, turning to me. “He’s a good 
boy.” 

“What—what is he?” I cried, rubbing my leg. 

“I’m not sure,” Ivanna replied, grinning at the furry thing. 

Luka hopped up and down, grinning, making grunting sounds. 

“He was brought up by wolves,” Ivanna said. “But he’s a good boy. 
Aren’t you, Luka?” 

Luka nodded. His tongue hung out of his open mouth. He panted like a 

dog. 

Ivanna petted his long, shaggy hair. 

He broke away from her and charged at me again. He sniffed my 
sweatshirt and jeans. Then he crawled under the table and sniffed Marissa’s 
hiking boots. 

“Get away, Luka!” Ivanna ordered. “Off! Off!” She turned to me. 
“He’s a good boy. He’s just nosy. He’ll calm down—once he gets to know 
you.” 

“Gets to know us?” Marissa demanded, watching Luka scurry over to 
Silverdog by the stove. 



“Luka will be a big help to you when you enter the Fantasy Forest,” 
Ivanna said with a smile. 

“He’s coming with us?” I cried. 

Ivanna nodded. “He will be your guide. And he will protect you.” Her 
expression turned solemn. Then she added softly, “You need all the help 
you can get.” 

We finished our soup quickly. Silverdog and Luka watched us from 
beside the stove. 

When we finished, Ivanna led us to a small back room. The room was 
bare except for two cots. 

“You will sleep here,” she said sternly. 

“But our dad—” Marissa started. 

Ivanna raised a hand to silence her. “You want to find the silver chest 
—don’t you? You want to surprise your father and make him proud—don’t 
you?” 

Marissa and I nodded. 

“Then you will take the test. If you pass it, I will tell you how to find 
the chest.” 

She dropped a coarse wool blanket onto each cot. “Sleep quickly,” she 
instructed. “The test begins first thing in the morning.” 

I awoke slowly. Stretched. Turned and reached to push the blanket off me. 

No blanket. 

Had I kicked it onto the floor? 

I blinked several times, trying to clear the sleep from my eyes. 

How long had I slept? 

Sunlight streamed all around. 

Yawning, I sat up. Started to climb off the cot. 

But the cot had disappeared, too. 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I realized the cabin had also disappeared. 

“Where am I?” 

I was sitting on the grass, fully dressed. I blinked, waiting for my eyes 
to adjust to the bright morning sunlight. The grass still shimmered wetly 
from the morning dew. 

I stood up. My mouth dry. Feeling stunned. 

Nothing but forest all around. 



My mind whirled. Ivanna had said the test would begin first thing in 
the morning. 

Had it already begun? Was I in the Fantasy Forest? 

Had the test begun before I awoke? 

Rubbing my eyes, I turned to Marissa. “Where are we?” I asked, my 
voice still hoarse from sleep. I cleared my throat. “Do you think—” 

I stopped with a gasp when I realized Marissa wasn’t there. 

I was alone. 

Alone in the middle of the forest. 

“Marissa—?” I called, feeling the panic tighten my chest. Where was 

she? 

Where was /? 

“Marissa—? Marissa—?” 



15 


“Marissa—?” 

My voice cracked. My throat tightened. 

I heard a low growl from the trees. The thud and crackle of heavy 
animal footsteps. 

I turned to the sound. And watched Luka come hopping out of the 
forest. He stood on his two feet like a man. But he hopped like a rabbit. 
Scratching the thick fur on one leg, he grinned at me as he came near. 

I didn’t grin back. “Where is Marissa?” I demanded. “Where is my 
sister?” 

He tilted his head and stared at me, confused. 

“Marissa!” I screamed at him. “Where is Marissa?” 

“Over here!” 

I jumped when her voice leaped out at me. “Where are you?” I called. 

I saw a flash of her red hair. Then she poked her head out from behind 
a wide, leafy bush. 

“Over here,” she repeated. “You were still asleep. So I thought I’d 
explore.” 

“You scared me to death!” I admitted. I began trotting through the tall 
grass and weeds, eager to join her. “Where are we?” I demanded. “What 
happened to Ivanna’s cabin?” 

Marissa shrugged. “Beats me. I woke up—and here we were.” 

Behind us, Luka growled. 

I turned and saw him pawing the dirt, like a dog. “Do you think he’s 
part human?” I whispered to Marissa. 

She didn’t seem to hear me. She pointed to a spot between two trees. 
“I found a path over there. Do you think we’re supposed to follow it?” 

“I don’t know what we’re supposed to do,” I replied shrilly. “Did 
Ivanna ever explain the test? No. Did she ever tell us the rules? No. Did she 
ever tell us what we’re supposed to do to pass the test? No.” 

Marissa’s eyes narrowed in fear. “I think we’re supposed to stay 
alive,” she said softly. “I think that’s how we pass the test.” 

“But where do we go? What do we do?” I cried. I could feel myself 



start to lose control. I felt angry and frightened and confused—all at the 
same time. 

Luka uttered another growl. He stopped digging up the dirt and came 
staggering over to us, standing up like a human. 

If he shaved off all the fur, put on some clothes, and got a haircut, he’d 
look like a young man, I thought. As I stared at him, he started to wave and 
point. 

“What is he doing?” I asked Marissa. 

She stepped up beside me and stared at him too. 

Luka grunted excitedly. He waved a furry hand at us and jabbed his 
other hand toward the trees. 

“I think he wants us to follow him,” I said. 

“Yes,” Marissa agreed. “Remember—Ivanna said he would be our 
guide.” 

Grunting and waving, Luka headed for the trees. 

I held back. “Can we trust him?” I asked. 

Marissa shrugged. “Do we have a choice?” 

Luka stepped onto a path that led through the forest. The path curved 
behind a clump of tall, yellow-leafed bushes. I saw his head bobbing above 
the bushes. Then he disappeared. 

“Hurry!” I tugged my sister’s arm. “We’d better not let him get out of 
sight.” 

I glanced down and saw two black backpacks on the grass. I bent 
down, grabbed one, and unzipped it. Empty. 

I handed the other backpack to Marissa. “Ivanna must have left these 
for us,” I told her. “They’re empty. But I guess we should take them.” 

We pulled the backpacks onto our backs. Then we jogged to the path 
and hurried to catch up with the bouncing, hopping Luka. 

He stopped to sniff a weed. Then he continued shuffling along the 

path. 

We followed close behind. Two or three times, he turned back to make 
sure we were following. 

The path curved between prickly weeds and tall reeds. We passed a 
small, round pond that reflected the blue sky. The air became warmer and 
wet. The back of my neck felt hot and prickly. 

We entered a cluster of trees with smooth, white trunks. The trees grew 



close together. The smooth bark of the trunks felt cool against my hot 
hands. 

“Where is he taking us?” Marissa whispered. 

I didn’t answer her. I didn’t know. I only knew that Luka was leading 
us deeper and deeper into this forest. 

We squeezed our way through the white-trunked trees. And came out 
in a large, grassy clearing. Small gray rocks poked up from the grass. The 
slender white trees formed a circle around the clearing. 

My boots crunched over the ground as I followed Luka across the 
grass. I looked down to see what made the crunching sound. 

And discovered that the ground was covered with large brown nuts. 

I picked one up. “Check this out,” I called to Marissa. I turned and saw 
that she had picked up two of them. “They must have fallen off the white 
trees,” I said. 

“They look like walnuts. But they’re bigger than eggs!” she declared. 
“I never saw walnuts this big!” 

“They feel so hot!” I exclaimed. I glanced up at the sky. “I guess it’s 
from the sun beating down on them.” 

“Hey—! Whoa!” 

Marissa’s cry made me look up. 

I saw a gray creature scamper across the clearing. 

At first I thought it was a dog or a very large cat. Then I realized it was 
a squirrel. It carried one of the large nuts in its front paws. And it hopped 
quickly toward the trees, its bushy gray tail floating behind it like a 
pennant. 

I turned as Luka let out a hoarse cry. 

I saw him stand straight up. I saw his eyes go wide with excitement. 

He let out another cry. Leaned forward. Reached out both hands. 

And started to chase after the squirrel. 

The squirrel saw Luka coming. It dropped the nut and took off at full 
speed into the white trees. 

Luka dropped to all fours and galloped after it. 

“No, Luka—come back!” Marissa shouted. 

“Come back! Come back!” we both called. “Luka—come back!” 



16 


Marissa and I both let out worried cries. Then we took off after Luka, into 
the clump of trees. 

“Luka—! Hey, Luka!” I called. My voice bounced off the trees. It 
echoed all around me. 

“Luka—! Hey, Luka!” 

The cry repeated and repeated, echoing loudly. 

I could hear his growl up ahead. And I could hear him thrashing his 
way through the trees as he chased the fat squirrel. 

“Luka—come back!” Marissa’s cry echoed all around the forest, too. 

As we called after him, it sounded as if there were dozens of us in the 
forest, all chasing after him, all frantically calling for him to stop chasing 
that squirrel and come back to us. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as I tried to slip through the narrow space between 
two white tree trunks—and my backpack caught between the trees. 

“Ow!” 

It snapped me back. I staggered and nearly fell. 

Mister Klutz. For a change. 

“Luka! Hey—Luka!” I could hear Marissa’s cry up ahead of me now. 

I tried to slip through the trees again, and the backpack caught again. I 
pulled it free and found another, wider opening. 

A few seconds later, I caught up with my sister. She had stopped 
running. She leaned against a tree trunk, breathing hard. 

“Where is he?” I cried. “Do you see him? Where did he go?” 

“I—I lost him,” Marissa replied breathlessly. “I don’t even hear him 
anymore.” 

I listened hard. The forest was silent now. No footsteps. No growls. 
The leaves above us brushed together, making a soft, whispering sound. 

“But how could he run away?” I cried. “He’s supposed to be our 
guide!” 

“I think he really wanted to catch that squirrel,” Marissa said quietly. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “He can’t just run away and leave us all by 
ourselves here.” 



Marissa sighed. “I think he just did.” 

“We have to find him!” I cried. “Come on. We have to keep going. We 
can’t let him—” 

Marissa shook her head. “How can we find him, Justin? Which way 
should we go?” 

“We’ll follow his footprints,” I replied. I lowered my gaze to the 
ground. A thick carpet of brown leaves spread over the dirt. 

No footprints. 

“I think he was heading that way,” I said, pointing to the trees. 

Marissa shook her head. “I don’t think so.” She pushed herself away 
from the tree trunk. “He’s gone, Justin.” 

I spun around, frantically searching for him. For any sign of him. 

“Hey—what’s that?” Marissa called. 

“Huh?” I turned back to her. 

“In your back pocket,” she said, pointing. “What is it?” 

Confused, I reached into the back pocket of my jeans—and pulled out 
a folded-up sheet of paper. My hands were sweaty and stuck to the paper. 
But I unfolded it quickly. 

“It’s some kind of a note,” I told Marissa. “In a tiny handwriting.” 

“Well, read it!” she cried. 

My eyes slid to the bottom of the page. “It-it’s from Ivanna,” I 
stammered excitedly. 

“What does it say?” Marissa demanded impatiently. 

I steadied the page between both my hands and read the note out loud 
to both of us: 

“DEAR KIDS, 

KEEP LUKA WITH YOU, AND YOU WILL PASS THE TEST. DO 
NOT LET HIM OUT OF YOUR SIGHT. BE CAREFUL NOT TO LOSE 
HIM—OR YOU ARE DOOMED.” 



17 


Marissa and I made our way slowly back to the clearing. The grass swayed 
under a soft breeze. Our boots crunched over the large nuts in the grass. 

I still held Ivanna’s note in my hand. I glanced over it one more time, 
hoping it didn’t say what it said. Then I angrily balled it up and tossed it 
away. 

Marissa trudged along beside me. The sun beat down on us. We were 
both sweating. 

“Maybe if we wait here, Luka will come back,” Marissa said. 

“He isn’t coming back,” I groaned. “He is probably miles away, still 
chasing after that squirrel.” 

“Then what do we do next?” Marissa demanded. “How do we pass the 
test?” 

I let out an unhappy sigh. “We can’t pass the test. You heard what the 
note said. We’re doomed.” 

“Well, we can try,” she insisted. She started across the clearing. I 
followed her. 

We had taken six or seven steps when I heard a startling sound. A loud 
snap, like a pencil being broken in two. 

Then a crack —soft at first, and then louder. 

I stopped and whirled around. I expected to see Luka come bounding 
out of the forest. 

But I saw only the tall, white trees. No one there. 

I heard another sharp snap. Then another. And another. 

And then I heard cracking all around. 

The earth is cracking open! 

That was my first thought. I pictured the ground splitting apart. A dark 
hole opening up. And Marissa and me falling, falling down into it. 

The Pit With No Bottom! 

I wished Dad had never told us that story! 

Now Marissa grabbed my shoulder and pointed down. “Justin—look!” 

I gazed down. The ground hadn’t split open. But the snapping and 
cracking echoed all around. 



Louder. Louder. 

“Ohh!” I let out a frightened moan as I realized to my horror that the 
grass was moving. 

I could feel it move under my feet. 

“What’s happening ?” Marissa cried, still holding on to me. “That 
sound—!” 

The cracking grew louder, rising up from the ground. Now it sounded 
as if all the trees were cracking apart. 

The grass swayed and bent. 

“It’s—the nuts!” I cried to Marissa. “Look! They’re all cracking 
open!” 

I covered my ears against the sound. 

And stared at the nuts, bouncing and trembling all around our feet. 

Cracking open. Splitting apart. 

Hundreds and hundreds of them. The whole clearing. The ground 
shaking as they all cracked apart. 

Cracked into pieces. Crumbled around us. 

We stared in amazement at the cracking nuts. And then, Marissa and I 
both screamed in shock when we saw what came climbing out. 



18 


Staring down as a nut split open, I saw gnashing teeth. Tiny black eyes. A 
twitching black nose. 

The creature pushed itself up. I saw spindly front legs. 

A slender body of gray fur. 

And those teeth. Snapping. Gnashing. 

“Amouse!” I choked out. 

“Hundreds of them!” Marissa cried. 

The nuts were splitting apart. All across the clearing. So many of 
them, it made the grass quiver and the ground appear to shake. 

I stood frozen in place, watching mice hatch around my feet. They 
pushed out slowly, poking their heads out first. Sniffing the air. Trying out 
their pointy teeth. 

The nuts rocked onto their sides. Cracked apart. Gray bodies slithered 
out. Sticklike back legs kicked their way out from the empty shells. 

“They’re not nuts—they’re eggs!” Marissa wailed. 

“But mice don’t come from eggs!” I protested. 

Marissa raised her eyes to me, her face twisted in shock. “I guess no 
one told these mice!” 

A mouse scampered over my boots. Mice were scurrying through the 
tall grass, making the grass whisper. 

Another gray body slithered over my boots. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I cried to Marissa. I grabbed her arm and 
started to pull. 

But so many mice scampered over the grass, so many gray bodies 
slithered at our feet—we couldn’t move. 

Shrill squeaks rose up from the grass as the creatures found their 
voices. “Eee eee eee eee!” The sound surrounded us. Grew louder, louder. 
Until it drowned out the whisper of the grass. Until it forced Marissa and 
me to cover our ears. 

“Eee eee eee eee! ” 

“We have to run!” I shouted. 

“But the ground is covered!” Marissa shrieked. “If we run—” 



“YOWWWWW!” I let out a cry as I felt a mouse drop inside my 
hiking boot. Its tiny feet scratched through my wool socks. 

I bent down to pull it out—and saw two more mice clinging by their 
teeth to my pants cuff. 

“Hey—” I tried to bat them away. 

Lost my balance. 

Fell to my knees. 

Justin the Super Klutz strikes again. 

Mice scurried over my hands. I felt one climb up my sweatshirt sleeve, 
onto my back. 

“Hellllp!” Marissa and I both cried out at the same time. 

I turned and saw her bent over, hands raised, struggling to pull two 
mice from her hair. 

Another mouse chewed the bottom of her sweatshirt. Two more mice 
climbed a leg of her jeans. Mice clung to her backpack. 

“Helllp me! Ohhhh—helllp!” 

Still on my knees, I struggled to push myself up. But a mouse slithered 
under my sweatshirt. I felt its prickly feet move across my chest. Then I felt 
a sharp stab of pain in the middle of my back. 

Did it bite me? 

Mice jumped onto my shoulders. Crawled over the back of my neck. 
Swarmed over my backpack. 

Swinging both hands wildly, I tried to brush them off me. 

But there were too many of them. 

Squeaking. Snapping. Clinging to my clothes. My wrists. My hair. 

“Helllllp! Hellllp!” 

I pulled a mouse from my ear. And tossed it across the grass. 

I could feel a bunch of them crawling over my bare skin under my 
sweatshirt. Another sharp bite made me cry out—and I dropped facedown 
onto the grass—onto more mice! 

I tried to swat the mice away. Tried to swat them and push them and 
grab them and tug them off me. 

But there were too many. Way too many. 

I turned and saw them swarming over Marissa. She cried out as she 
spun around, swinging her arms. Trying to shake the mice off. 

I wanted to help her. But I couldn’t get up. 



My whole body tingled and itched. 

The squeaking, chattering mice swarmed over me, holding me down. 
Prickling me, scratching me, biting me—until I couldn’t move, couldn’t 
breathe. 



19 


“Off! Get off!” I managed to cry. 

I swiped at my face, slapping two mice off my cheeks. I pulled one, 
squeaking and squirming, from my hair. Pulled another one off my 
forehead. 

I kicked my legs and swung my arms, frantically trying to free myself. 

“Oww!” I let out a wild shriek as a fat, gray mouse scratched at my 
ear. 

I reached up. Grabbed it. And squeezed. 

The mouse gave a soft groan—and collapsed. 

“Huh?” I felt something hard above its furry gray belly. Like a bump. 

I slapped away two other mice and examined the one in my hand. I 
pushed the tiny, hard bump. The mouse started to squirm and struggle. 

I pushed the bump again. The mouse slumped in my hand, silent and 

still. 

“It’s an on-off switch!” I screamed. 

I turned to Marissa. She had fallen to her knees. Dozens of mice 
swarmed over her. They covered her sweatshirt. They crawled through her 
hair. 

“It’s an on-off switch!” I shouted to her. “Marissa—squeeze the button 
on their front. You can turn them off!” 

I grabbed a mouse off my neck. Squeezed the button. Shut it off. 

I swiped up two more and turned them off. 

“They’re not real!” I cried happily. “The mice—they’re fakes! They’re 
little machines! ” 

Marissa climbed to her feet. She was brushing mice off her clothes. 
Clicking them off. “Weird!” she exclaimed. “Justin—this is so weird!” 

“We’ve got to get out of here,” I told her. “We’ve got to find Luka.” 

Marissa tugged a mouse off the back of her neck and clicked it off. 
“Do you think this was the test?” she asked. “Do you think we passed it?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied. My eyes searched the trees. “I don’t care 
about the test right now. I just want to get away from these dumb 
mechanical mice.” 



I brushed two more off the front of my jeans. Then I reached for 
Marissa. I pulled a mouse off her shoulder, clicked it off, and tossed it 
away. 

Then we both started to run for the trees. 

Mice scurried under our feet. Their shrill squeaks echoed all around 
us. 

We stepped on them as we ran. But we didn’t care. We knew they 
weren’t real. We knew they were mechanical. 

We were nearly out of the clearing when I stopped suddenly. I had an 

idea. 

I bent down and started scooping up mice. “Wait up!” I called to 
Marissa. 

She didn’t hear me. She kept running toward the trees. 

“Wait up! I’ll be right there!” I called. I picked up a few handfuls of 
mice and clicked them off. Then I shoved them into my backpack. 

These will be awesome for playing jokes on people back home! I told 
myself. They’re so lifelike. Can you imagine the fun I’ll have with these in 
Miss Olsen’s class? 

I shoved eight or nine more of them into the pack and closed it up. 
Then I climbed to my feet and ran after my sister. 

I glanced back once—and saw the mice, thousands of them, crawling 
over each other, crawling in wild circles through the grass. 

Then I turned and ran, following Marissa into the safety of the white¬ 
trunked trees. Ran full-speed. Ran blindly. 

So eager to get away from that clearing and the squeaking, scurrying 
mice. 

“Marissa—wait up!” I called. 

She was far ahead, running fast. 

“Wait up!” I called. 

And then I uttered a sharp cry as I ran—full-force—into a tree. 

“Oooof!” 

I felt the air burst from my lungs. I saw stars. Red and yellow stars, 
dancing in a pure white sky. 

Gasping for breath, I reached for the tree trunk. 

I heard a cracking sound. 

So loud. And close. 



The tree! 

The tree I had run into—it started to fall! 

“Look out—!” I called to my sister. 

Too late. 

As I stared helplessly, the tall, white tree collapsed. 
Marissa’s hands shot up as the tree fell on her. 

And crushed her beneath its heavy trunk. 



20 


“Nooooo!” I let out a howl of horror. And stared down at my sister. 

Marissa lay sprawled facedown in the dirt. The tree trunk had crushed 
her back and shoulders. 

Was she breathing? 

I couldn’t tell. 

“Marissa—!” I choked out her name and dropped down beside her. “I 
—I—” 

I saw her body give a hard shake. 

She raised her head and squinted up at me. “What happened?” Her 
words came out in a whisper. 

“Does it hurt?” I cried. “Are you in pain?” 

She squinted harder, as if thinking about it. “No. No pain.” Marissa 
rolled onto her back. Then she reached up with both hands—and shoved the 
tree trunk off her. 

“Huh?” I let out a startled cry. 

I saw the bewildered expression on my sister’s face. “It’s fake too,” 
she murmured. 

She reached out and tugged off a chunk of the tree trunk. “It’s plaster 
or something,” she announced. “Check it out, Justin.” 

My hand was trembling as I tore off a piece of the trunk. I was still 
shaking all over from the sight of Marissa falling under the tree. 

I squeezed the chunk of tree, and it turned to powder in my hand. I 
pulled off another hunk. Soft plaster. 

Marissa climbed to her feet. She brushed the plaster dust off her 
clothes. “It’s a total fake,” she murmured again. 

“Do you think the trees are all fake?” I cried. “The whole forest?” 

I got up. Then I took a running start. Stuck both hands straight out in 
front of me... 

.. .And ran as hard as I could, shoving my hands against a tree. 

The trunk cracked easily. I stood shaking my head in amazement as the 
tree toppled over. It hit another tree and knocked that one down too. The 
plaster trunks cracked and shattered as they hit the ground. 



“Fake. It’s all a fake!” Marissa declared. A smile spread over her face. 
“That looks like fun.” 

She took a running start, aiming at a tree across from the others. 

“No! Not that one!” I screamed. 

I guess Marissa couldn’t stop in time. She slammed her shoulder into 
the tree. “Yaaaay!” 

She raised both fists over her head in triumph as the tree toppled over. 

But she didn’t have much time to cheer. 

As the white trunk fell, I heard the hard flutter of wings. 

And I watched in horror as dark forms fluttered up from the fallen 
limbs. 

I had seen the bats. Dozens of black bats. Clinging upside down on the 
tree limbs. 

I had seen them. But I hadn’t warned Marissa in time. 

And now the bats all came flapping up, cluttering angrily, their sleep 
interrupted. 

Hissing and shrieking at us, they surrounded us—and began to circle. I 
could feel the warm breeze from their flapping wings. 

Faster. Faster, they circled. 

“Are they fake too?” Marissa asked in a tiny voice. 

“I—I don’t think so,” I stammered as they swooped in for the kill. 



21 


Marissa and I both ducked as the circle of bats swooped low. 

I shut my eyes and covered my head with my hands. 

And waited. 

The sound of a deep boom rose over the shrill chittering of the bats. 

The ground shook. 

Thunder? 

Another boom, low at first, then loud as an explosion. 

I raised my head in time to see the white trees tremble. 

The bats stopped their shrieking. Their wings shot up, stretched out. 

Another boom of thunder sent them racing back up to the sky. I 
watched them flutter up, rising, rising above the trees, rising against the 
bright sky until they seemed to disappear into the sun. 

Marissa let out a long sigh of relief. “We’re safe.” She climbed to her 
feet slowly. 

“But what is that sound?” I demanded, listening hard. 

Another thunderous boom. Closer this time. 

I felt the ground shake. A tree tottered, then came toppling to the 
ground. 

“It can’t be thunder,” Marissa said softly. She pointed to the sky. “No 
clouds or anything.” 

Another boom. 

Closer. 

“I—I know what it is,” I stammered. 

Marissa turned to me. Another boom shook the trees. 

“Footsteps,” I murmured. “Coming toward us. I know it’s footsteps.” 

Marissa’s mouth dropped open. “Justin—you’re letting your crazy 
imagination run away with you. Again!” 

“No. I’m right,” I insisted. “Footsteps.” 

My sister squinted at me. “Are you losing it? What could make 
footsteps that loud? It would have to be...” Her voice trailed off. 

Another boom. 



I let my crazy imagination run away with me. I couldn’t help it. I 
pictured a dinosaur. A Tyrannosaurus rex. Lumbering through the trees. Or 
maybe one of those fat ones with the long, skinny necks. 

Boooooom. Booooom. 

Or maybe two of them! 

“Whatever it is, it’s coming closer,” Marissa whispered. She shook her 
head. “Ivanna said this was a test of survival. But—” 

So far, it had been a test of our running skills ! 

But I didn’t care. No way I wanted to stick around to see what this 
giant creature was. 

As Marissa and I turned and started to run in the opposite direction, a 
shadow fell over us. 

I gazed up to see if clouds had blocked the sun. 

But I saw no clouds overhead. 

The shadow was cast by the creature, thundering closer and closer 
behind us. 

I heard trees cmnching underfoot. The ground shook. The heavy 
footsteps boomed close behind us. 

How tall was it? 

I glanced back—but could see only quivering trees. 

Booooom. Booooom. 

My knees buckled as the ground shook under my feet. 

Marissa and I ran side by side. We hurtled through the trees as fast as 
we could, gasping for breath as we ran. 

But we couldn’t run out of the shadow. No matter how hard we ran, it 
floated over us, cold and dark. 

Booooom. Booooom. 

So close now. So close that every footstep made me leap into the air. 

My heart thudded. My temples throbbed. 

Marissa and I forced ourselves to keep running, desperate to escape, 
desperate to run out from under the wide shadow that seemed to hold us 
prisoner. 

We ran until we reached a wide stream. 

We both stopped inches from the muddy shore. And stared down into 
the fast-flowing, blue water. 

“Now what?” I cried breathlessly. “Now what?” 



The shadow darkened as the creature moved over us. 

Marissa tugged my sleeve. “Look. You can see the bottom. It looks 
really shallow. Maybe we can walk across it. Or swim if we have to.” 
Boooom. Boooom. 

The shadow darkened. 

“Let’s go,” I said. 

We stepped into the cold, clear stream. 



22 


The water flowed faster than I thought. I stepped onto the stream’s soft 
bottom—and nearly lost my balance as the current swept around me. 

I grabbed Marissa’s shoulder to steady myself. We clung together for a 
moment, getting used to the water. 

“Brrrr.” I shivered. The water felt ice cold, even through my jeans legs. 

But it was shallow, as Marissa had said. It came up only a few inches 
above my boots. 

I took another step, leaning forward, trying to balance against the 
stream’s fast current. 

One more step. We were both halfway across the stream. 

“Oh—!” I cried out when I realized I couldn’t take the next step. 

“Hey—!” Marissa exclaimed. I saw her struggling, too. “I’m stuck!” 

“The bottom is so soft!” I cried. I worked to pull my foot up from the 

mud. 

Stuck. My hiking boots had sunk below the surface of the muddy 
bottom. 

I leaned down. And pulled. Pulled my leg up. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

I grabbed my leg with both hands and tried to tug my foot out from the 
muddy stream bottom. 

No. 

“We-we’re sinking!” Marissa wailed. “Justin—look! We’re sinking 
fast!” 

I swallowed hard. She was right. I could feel myself being pulled 
down. Down into the cold water, into the soft, sticky mud. 

The water came up to my knees now. It seemed to be rising quickly. 

But I knew the water wasn’t going up. I was heading down. 

“Pull off your boots and swim for it!” I instmcted Marissa. 

We both bent over and struggled to reach our hiking boots. 

But they were buried too deeply in the mud. 

The water rose up over my waist. If I kept sinking, it would be over 



my head in a few minutes. 

Booom. Booom. 

The thundering footsteps made the water ripple. 

The dark shadow spread over the stream. 

“Justin—look!” Marissa cried. She pointed to the other shore. 

I turned to the shore—so close. But so far away. 

I squinted into the shadows to see what she was gawking at. “What is 
it?” I cried. 

“A big plug,” Marissa reported. “In the stream bottom. Like a bathtub 
drain plug. This stream isn’t real, either. It’s a fake.” 

“The water feels plenty real!” I exclaimed, feeling myself sink even 
deeper into the mud. “Can you reach the plug, Marissa? Maybe if you pull 
it up, the water will drain.” 

She leaned toward it, bending at the waist. She stretched out both 
hands for the ring on top of the plug. “I-I’m trying,” she groaned. “If 
only...” 

Boooom. Booooom. 

Marissa uttered a sigh. “I can’t! I can’t reach it! It’s too far away.” 

The cold stream water flowed against my chest. I felt myself drop 
farther into the muddy bottom. 

“I think we failed Ivanna’s test,” I murmured. 

“Noooo!” Marissa wailed. She began thrashing at the water with both 
hands, twisting her body one way, then the other. 

The deepening shadow moved over us. 

I turned back and raised my eyes to the shore. 

I saw the creatures lurching toward us. 

And opened my mouth in an ear-shattering scream of horror. 



23 


At first I thought I was seeing black clouds, floating low over the trees. 

But then I realized the bobbing shapes were too dark to be clouds. Too 
dark and too solid. 

And then I saw the twin pairs of yellow eyes. 

And I recognized the shapes of the heads. And I knew I was staring at 

cats. 

Cats! 

Black cats. Huge heads rising over the trees. Tails curling up like 
smoke from chimneys. 

Two giant black cats, their paws thundering over the forest, shaking 
the ground and the trees. Their yellow eyes locked on Marissa and me. 

“They’re... not real!” Marissa murmured. “Not real... not real.” She 
had stopped thrashing the water and stood now perfectly still, staring back 
at the enormous cats, repeating the words like a chant. 

Trees crunched and fell. The two cats thundered their way to the shore. 

“Noooo...” Alow wail escaped Marissa’s throat. 

I struggled to breathe. My chest ached. My head started to spin. 

The cats pulled back their lips in a terrifying hiss. 

I saw rows of sharp teeth. I saw their yellow eyes narrow menacingly. 

Tossing back their heads in another hiss, the creatures arched their 
backs. The black fur on their backs stood straight up. 

“Wh-what are they going to do?” Marissa stammered. 

I opened my mouth to answer her, but only a tiny squeak escaped. 

The water flowed past my shoulders. I raised my hands out of the 
water, trying to keep from sinking under. 

“Justin—what are they going to do?” she repeated in a shriek. 

We didn’t have to wait long to find out. 

Before we could even cry out, the cat heads came swooping down at 
us. The jaws opened wide. The curled and jagged teeth slid apart. 

I turned and tried to squirm and wriggle away. But I couldn’t move. 
Water splashed over my face. Then I felt teeth clamp shut on the back of 



my sweatshirt. 

Sputtering, gasping for breath, I felt myself lifted up. My boots made a 
popping sound as they were pulled from the mud. 

I felt the cat’s hot breath on my neck and the back of my head. The 
teeth held me firmly, plucking me up, up out of the stream. 

“Whoooooa!” I finally found my voice. 

The cat dangled me high in the air. 

My arms and legs thrashed wildly. The cat tossed its head, swinging 
me from side to side. 

“Helllp! Ohhh, help!” I heard my sister’s cry from nearby. I turned and 
saw her hoisted up by the other cat, hoisted high in the air, the cat’s jaws 
clamped tightly on the back of Marissa’s sweatshirt. 

I tried to call out to Marissa. But a burst of hot cat breath nearly 
suffocated me. 

I felt myself being lifted even higher as the cat rose up on its hind legs. 
A paw swung up and batted my side. The other paw batted me the other 
way. 

Does it think I’m a cat toy? I wondered. 

I didn’t have time to think about it. 

I twisted dizzily as the cat played with me, batting me from side to 
side. Then, suddenly, I found myself being lowered. 

The jaws opened. 

I was falling now. 

Into the water? 

No. I landed hard on my back on the shore. So hard, I bounced. Pain 
shot through my body. 

I ignored it and scrambled to my feet. My heart pounding, my whole 
body shaking, I tried to run. 

But the cat grabbed me up again, its jaws closing around my right 
shoulder. 

As I sailed back up into the air, I saw Marissa falling through the air. I 
heard her cry out as she hit the ground. And then I saw the other black cat 
bend its head, open its jaws, and drag Marissa up in the air again. 

Up—and then down. My body slammed hard on the shore. I gasped 
and struggled to my hands and knees. In time to be picked up again and 
dangled over the water. 



Marissa and I both hung over the stream. 

Then once more, we were dropped to the shore. 

“Oww!” I bounced hard. Stared up as the cat lowered its massive head 
to pick me up again. 

“What are they doing?” Marissa screeched. “Why are they doing 
this?” 

“I know what they’re doing. They’re doing what cats always do!” I 
cried, feeling cold horror run down my body. “They’re playing with their 
food.” 



24 


“Whooooaaa!” 

My stomach lurched as I felt myself being swooped up into the air 
again. A black cat’s paw swiped at me and sent me swinging. 

“They-they’re going to eat us?” Marissa called. 

“We must look like mice to them!” I shouted back. 

And then I had an idea. 

The cat tossed its head and sent me flying. It caught me between its 
enormous paws. The paws squeezed my middle so hard, I thought my head 
might pop off! 

But as I struggled to breathe, my idea gave me hope. 

Do I have time? I wondered. Can I do it—before this cat swallows me 
whole? 

The cat tossed me up again, then caught me between its teeth. Pain 
shot down my back. My whole body tingled and ached. 

With a groan, I twisted my body. I reached behind me and struggled to 
grab the backpack. 

If I can unzip it, I thought, maybe I can reach the mechanical mice I 
stuffed inside. And maybe I can switch one or two of them on. And maybe 
the mice will distract the two cats. And maybe Marissa and I can escape. 

Maybe, maybe, maybe. 

But I had to try something. Or else, in a few seconds, Marissa and I 
would be cat chow. 

The cat’s tongue swept over the back of my neck. I cried out in pain. 
The tongue felt as rough as sandpaper! Hot cat breath stung my neck. 

I grabbed the backpack with one hand and started to tug it around to 
my chest. 

But the cat opened its jaws. The rough tongue bumped me from 
behind. And I went flying back to the ground. 

I landed hard on my hands and knees. Pain shot through me once 
again. I felt like collapsing in the dirt. 

But I knew I couldn’t give up. 

The cat leaned over me, hissing each breath. Yellow eyes gleamed 



down at me hungrily. 

Ignoring the pain, I grabbed the backpack. I pulled the straps off my 
shoulder. Then I swung the pack around to my chest and gripped it tightly 
with both hands. 

“Got to get the mice,” I murmured out loud. “Got to get the kitty cat 
some mice to play with.” 

My hands were trembling so hard, I couldn’t work the zipper. 

“Aaaaagh!” I let out a frustrated cry—just as the cat swooped me up in 
its jaws again. 

I tried to call out to Marissa. I wanted to tell her to hold on. That I had 
a plan. 

High in the air, I gripped the backpack with my right hand. Reached 
for the zipper with my left. 

Please. Please! I prayed silently. Let me get the mice out. Let me click 
them on. 

“My only chance,” I muttered, struggling with the backpack zipper. 
“My only chance...” 

A burst of hot cat breath made me shudder. Once again I felt the dry, 
scratchy tongue scrape the back of my neck. 

“Yessss!” I shouted as I finally pulled the zipper and opened the 
backpack. 

“Yessss!” 

I shot my hand excitedly into the backpack. I felt the furry mechanical 
creatures inside. 

I started to wrap my fingers around one... 

But the cat swung me hard. Tossed back its head and flung me into the 
air. 

“Noooooo!” I let out a long wail—and felt the backpack fly out of my 
hands. 

“Noooooo!” I frantically grabbed at it. Grabbed with both hands. 
Missed. Then I tried to snare it on my foot. 

“Noooooo!” I watched the backpack sail to the ground. 

It bounced once. Twice. Then lay in the dirt near the shore. 

The cat caught me in its teeth. I felt the sharp points dig into my skin. 

Then the jaws opened. And I started to slide. Down the scratchy 
tongue. Down, down into the cat’s cavern of a mouth. 



“Sorry, Marissa,” I murmured in my panic. “We are doomed.” 



25 


The ground disappeared from view as I slid further down the cat’s rough 
tongue. On my stomach, I reached out with both hands. 

And grabbed the two curved eyeteeth. They felt warm and sticky in 
my hands. 

With a hard tug, I pulled myself part of the way up. I crawled a little 
way on the tongue. Then I gave another tug, and my head poked out from 
the cat’s open mouth. 

I searched for Marissa, but I couldn’t see her. 

Had she already been swallowed? 

Beneath me, the tongue bucked and curled. The cat was trying to force 
me down. 

But I held tightly onto the eyeteeth. And glimpsed the ground far 
below. 

And saw three or four gray mice scampering out of the backpack, onto 
the dirt. 

They must have clicked on when the backpack hit the ground! 

Would the cats see them? Would they care? 

The cat chomped its teeth together. I cried out in pain, and my hands 
slid off the eyeteeth. 

The tongue rolled beneath me. I started to slide again. 

The mouth closed over me, shutting me in darkness. “Ohhhh.” So hot 
and wet inside. So hard to breathe. 

I heard low gurgling and growling below me in the cat’s stomach. 

“No!” I cried. “No no no no!” My voice sounded tiny and muffled 
inside the cat’s mouth. 

And then, to my shock, the sunlight poured back in as the jaws popped 
open. 

The tongue pushed me forward. Past the teeth. Past the lips. 

I sucked in a deep breath of cool, fresh air. 

And then I went flying from the cat’s mouth. 

I landed on my back on the ground next to Marissa. She gaped at me in 
surprise, her eyes wild, her red hair tangled and matted wetly to her head. 



We both scrambled to our feet—in time to see both giant black cats 
pounce. 

They both leaped at the same mechanical mouse. 

Hissing and clawing at each other, they began to fight over it. 

“Marissa—let’s go!” I choked out. 

She stared in amazement as the giant cats wrestled, hissing and 
scratching, rolling into the stream, then out again. 

“Hurry! Let’s go!” I shouted. I grabbed Marissa with both hands and 
tugged. “If they figure out the mice aren’t real, they’ll come back after us!” 

“But are the cats real?” Marissa demanded, still gazing at them in 
amazement. “Are the cats real? Or fake?” 

“Who cares?” I shrieked. “Let’s get out of here!” 

Once again, we started running through the forest. Which way were 
we headed? We didn’t pay any attention. We just wanted to get as far away 
from those cats as we could. 

My clothes felt wet and sticky from the inside of the cat’s mouth. But 
the cool, fresh air felt good against my skin and helped to dry me off. 

Our shadows leaned ahead of us, as if leading the way. I heard strange 
animal calls that sounded like shrill laughter. And I heard the flapping of 
wings above the trees. 

But Marissa and I ignored all the sounds. We kept running, pushing 
tall weeds and shrubs out of our way, making our own path. 

We didn’t speak. We didn’t even look at each other. We ran side by 
side, keeping each other in sight, helping each other through the tangled 
forest. 

We were both breathless when we reached a round, grassy clearing. 
White and yellow moths floated silently over the swaying grass. 

“Marissa—look!” I gasped, pointing to the other side of the clearing. 

A small cabin stood under the trees where the grass ended. A very 
familiar cabin. 

“It’s Ivanna’s!” Marissa exclaimed happily. “Justin—we made it! 
We’re back!” 

I sucked in a deep breath and scrambled across the grass. Marissa ran 
right behind me. 

“Ivanna! Ivanna!” We both called her name as we hurried to the cabin. 

She didn’t come out. So I grabbed the door and pushed it open. 



“Ivanna—we’re back!” I cried happily. I glanced quickly around the room, 
waiting for my eyes to adjust to the dim light. 

Marissa pushed me aside as she burst into the small kitchen. “We 
survived!” she exclaimed. “Ivanna—is the test over? Did we pass it? Justin 
and I—” 

We both saw Ivanna seated at the small wooden table. She sat stooped 
over, her head on the table. 

Her horned helmet had fallen off. It lay on its side on the table. Her 
long blond braids had come undone and fallen over her face. 

“Ivanna? Ivanna?” I called. I turned to my sister. “She must be asleep.” 

“Ivanna?” Marissa called. “We’re back!” 

The woman didn’t stir. 

I heard a whimper from the back of the room. Squinting into the 
shadows, I saw Silverdog. He was huddled sadly against the wall, his head 
on the floor between his paws. He let out another whimper. 

“Justin—something is wrong here,” Marissa whispered. 

“Ivanna! Ivanna!” I shouted her name. But she still didn’t move. 

The big white dog whimpered sadly. 

“Is she asleep?” Marissa demanded. “What’s wrong with her?” 

“Let’s see,” I murmured. 

I took a deep breath and made my way across the kitchen to the table. 
Marissa raised her hands to her cheeks and stared at me. She didn’t budge. 

I was nearly to the table when I stopped with a gasp. 

“Wh-what’s wrong?” Marissa stammered. 

“Look what’s sticking out of her back!” I choked out. 



26 


“Huh?” Marissa’s mouth dropped open in horror. “Justin—what?” 

I swallowed hard. My legs started to tremble. I grabbed the back of a 
chair to steady myself. 

“Marissa—look,” I instructed, still pointing. 

She came a couple of steps closer, her eyes bulging wide with fear. 

We both stared at the metal object poking out from the back of 
Ivanna’s dress. 

A large metal key. 

I worked up my courage and crept up behind Ivanna. My heart 
pounding, I leaned down and examined the big key. 

“It-it’s a windup key!” I stammered. 

Marissa opened her mouth, but no sound came out. 

I took the key in both hands and turned it one click. 

Ivanna’s head bobbed up, then fell back to the table. 

“Yes. It’s a windup key,” I told my sister. 

Ivanna’s hands had drooped to the floor at her sides. I reached down 
and grabbed one of them. 

It felt soft and spongy. Stuffed with cotton or something. 

I let the hand drop to the floor and turned back to Marissa. “Ivanna 
isn’t real,” I told her, swallowing again. “She’s some kind of dummy or 
puppet or something. Ivanna isn’t real, either!” 

“Then what is real?” Marissa demanded in a tiny voice. “This is so 
scary, Justin. Is it all part of a test, or what? How do we get out of here 
now? How do we find Dad? If Ivanna isn’t real, then who is?” 

I just shook my head. I didn’t know how to answer her questions. I felt 
as frightened as she did. 

My eyes fell on Silverdog back in the corner. The dog had his head 
buried in his paws. He whimpered softly. 

Then, suddenly, the dog’s ears perked up. He raised his head, his eyes 
flashing excitedly. 

I heard a sharp growl behind me. From the door. 



“Hey—!” I spun around as the door swung open. 

And a growling, snarling creature burst in. 

Luka! 

His eyes moved hungrily from me to Marissa. A pleased grin spread 
over his wild face. 

“No!” Marissa shrieked, backing away from him. 

Luka tossed back his long hair with a shake of his head. He opened his 
mouth in a long howl. 

He leaped into the center of the room. Tossed back his head in a roar. 
And hurtled toward us. 

“Luka—stop!” I begged. “Don’t hurt us!” 



27 


Luka’s grin faded. He lowered his arms. He narrowed his dark eyes at me. 

“I’m not going to hurt you,” he said softly. 

Marissa and I stared back at him in shock. “You—you can talk?” I 
stammered. 

He nodded. “Yes. I can talk. And the first thing I want to say is, 
congratulations!” His smile returned. 

He stepped across the room, walking upright like a human. He shook 
hands with Marissa, then with me. “Congratulations to both of you,” Luka 
said warmly. “You passed the test.” 

“But—but—” I could only sputter. 

Luka peeled a long strip of fur off his arm. Then he pulled the fur from 
around his neck. “I’m happy to get this stuff off,” he said, peeling more fur 
from his arm. “It’s so hot and itchy—especially when you’re running 
around like a wild man in the forest.” 

“I’m very confused,” I confessed. 

Marissa nodded agreement. “Ivanna isn’t real,” she murmured. She 
motioned to Ivanna, slumped over the table behind us. 

Luka shook his head. “No, she isn’t. I built her myself. Just as I built 
all the creatures you found in my Fantasy Forest.” 

“But—why?” I choked out. “Why did you build all that?” 

“As a test,” Luka replied simply. He stepped up behind Ivanna and 
pulled her up into a sitting position. He brushed the dummy’s hair behind 
her head with his hand. Then he propped the helmet back on her head. 

“So many people come to the forest,” Luka continued, turning back to 
Marissa and me. “They come searching for all kinds of treasures. Just as 
you two have. 

“My family has lived in this forest for hundreds of years,” Luka 
explained. “It became our job to protect many of the treasures. And so we 
built a test forest, to keep out those who were unworthy. To stop the people 
who don’t deserve the wonderful treasures.” 

“You built the entire forest?” Marissa asked him. 

He shook his head. “Just the part that isn’t real.” 



“And how did we pass the test?” I demanded. 

“By discovering what was real and what wasn’t,” Luka replied. “By 
surviving and triumphing over the unreal.” 

Marissa stared hard at Ivanna. The dummy’s green eyes gazed dully 
back. “Why did you build Ivanna?” Marissa asked. 

Luka grinned proudly. “She is my best creation. She keeps everyone 
from guessing that I am in charge here. No one believes that a wild wolf 
man runs the Fantasy Forest. It makes it so easy for me to watch everyone 
and see how they do on my test.” 

It all seemed very mysterious to me. But I was too happy it was all 
over to argue with him. 

“And now I shall give you the treasure you came for,” Luka 
announced. He turned quickly and disappeared into the back. 

Marissa and I exchanged glances. “I can’t believe it!” I whispered. 
“He’s giving us the silver chest containing the Lost Legend! Dad is going to 
be so amazed!” 

“We’re going to be rich and famous!” Marissa exclaimed. “And Dad 
won’t be able to tell us we’re not helpful—ever again!” 

A few seconds later, Luka returned carrying a small silver chest. 
“Congratulations again,” he said solemnly. “I am happy to award you the 
ancient treasure that you came here to seek. And I wish you good fortune 
with it.” 

He placed the silver chest in my hands. It felt lighter than I expected. 
The silver gleamed in the light from the candle on the table. 

My heart pounded. My hands trembled. 

I suddenly felt so excited, I nearly dropped the silver chest! To think 
that I held the Lost Legend in my hands! 

“Thank you,” I managed to choke out. 

“Yes, thank you,” Marissa said. “Now how do we get back to our 
dad?” 

Luka snapped his fingers. Back at the wall, Silverdog leaped to his 

feet. 

“Silverdog will lead you back to your camp,” Luka announced. “Stay 
close behind him, and he will protect you.” 

“Uh... protect us?” I asked, gripping the chest tightly. 

Luka nodded. “There are many thieves in the forest. Some of them are 



real, and some of them are not real. But they all would steal your treasure 
and make it their own.” 

“We’ll stay close to Silverdog,” I promised. 

We thanked Luka again. Then we followed the big white dog out of 
the cabin and back into the forest. 

The afternoon sun had started to lower itself behind the trees. It cast an 
orange glow over the forest floor. The air had already begun to carry an 
evening chill. 

Trotting steadily, the big dog kept his furry tail up high as he led the 
way, like a flag for us to follow. I carried the chest carefully between my 
hands and kept my eyes on the dog. Marissa followed close behind. 

We walked along a curving path through a patch of tall yellow weeds. 
Then we made our way around a high clump of evergreen bushes. 

On the other side of the bushes, Silverdog led us onto a leaf-covered 
path. Our boots crunched over the path as we hurried to keep up with the 
trotting dog. 

I gripped the silver chest tightly. I couldn’t wait to pull open the lid 
and gaze at the Lost Legend. To take it out and start to read it. 

What was the legend about? 

Who wrote it? And when was it written? 

So many questions. And I knew they would all be answered as soon as 
we opened the chest and removed the legend from its hiding place of five 
hundred years. 

The sun lowered itself behind the trees. Our shadows grew longer. The 
leaves crunched underfoot. 

“Oh—wait!” I cried out when I heard leaves crunching behind us. 
“Wait—!” 

Silverdog trotted on ahead of us. 

But Marissa and I stopped. 

And listened. 

Listened to the crunching footsteps creeping up fast from the trees 
behind us. 

I felt a chill of fear sweep down my back. “Marissa—we’re being 
followed,” I whispered. 



28 


“Luka warned us about thieves,” Marissa whispered. 

The crunching footsteps came closer. I tucked the silver chest under 
one arm as if protecting a football. My throat tightened. I could barely 
breathe. 

I turned and saw Silverdog trotting on up ahead, his tail still raised 
behind him. The dog disappeared behind a clump of tall weeds. 

“We can’t just stand here,” Marissa whispered. 

The footsteps were approaching faster now. Any moment, I knew, 
some thief—or several thieves—would burst out of the trees and grab the 
chest away from us. 

I turned to the tall weeds. I couldn’t see the dog at all now. 

“We have to run,” Marissa whispered. 

I listened to the crunching footsteps. 

“We can’t outrun him,” I told her. “I can’t run very fast. I have to be 
careful with this chest.” 

Marissa’s blue eyes grew wide with panic. Then her expression 
changed. “I have an idea, Justin. Let’s duck into those trees.” She pointed. 
“The thief will run right past us. Then we’ll hide there till he’s out of sight.” 

Was it a good idea? 

A terrible idea? 

We had no time to think about it. We had to move. 

We both spun around and started to run to the trees. Toward the 
approaching footsteps. 

Would we make it to safety? Could we hide in the trees before he came 
mshing out at us? 

I never found out. 

About halfway across the grass, I tripped over a fallen tree limb. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out. 

And stumbled forward. 

The silver chest flew from my hands. 

“Noooooo!” 



I desperately grabbed for it. 

Missed. 

Fell hard to my knees. 

I watched the chest sail into the air. 

And I stared in shock as a big man lumbered out of the dark shadows 
of the trees, raised his arms, and caught the chest easily. 



29 


I stared at the silver chest. Watched the man’s hands pull it in, then hold it 
tightly. 

Our chest. 

Our Lost Legend. 

We had gone through so many horrors to get it. And now someone else 
had taken it away. 

I stared at the chest gripped so tightly in the man’s hands. Then I 
raised my eyes to the man’s bearded face. 

“Dad!” I cried. 

“Dad!” Marissa echoed. “I don’t believe it!” 

Beneath the beard, a grin spread quickly over Dad’s face. “I don’t 
believe it, either!” he cried. “Where have you been? Why did you run 
away? I’ve been searching the forest for you! Where were you?” 

“It’s kind of a long story,” Marissa told him, rushing forward. 

“Yes. Marissa and I have a legend of our own,” I said. 

Dad set the chest on the ground, and we both hugged him. Dad was so 
glad to see us, he had tears in his eyes. When we finished hugging, he 
hugged us both again. 

“I can’t believe I finally found you!” he exclaimed happily. 

“And look what we found!” I declared, pointing to the chest. 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. When he jumped out and caught the chest, 
I don’t think he realized what he had caught. 

“It’s—a silver chest!” he exclaimed. 

“It’s the silver chest!” I told him. “The silver chest we came to 
Brovania to find!” 

“But—but—how?” 

I never saw Dad so confused. Or so excited. 

“The Legend of the Lost Legend,” he murmured. He carefully lifted 
the chest off the ground. “This is the most thrilling moment of my life,” he 
said. “How did you do this? How did you find this ancient chest? How did 
you—?” 

His voice cracked. I think he was too excited to speak. 



“I told you, Dad. It’s a very long story,” I said. 

“At least you can’t say we weren’t helpful!” Marissa chimed in. 

All three of us laughed. 

“Do you realize what this will mean to us?” Dad asked, lowering his 
voice to a whisper. “Do you realize what a thrilling discovery this is?” 

He dropped down to his knees to admire the chest. He tenderly ran his 
hands over the smooth silver of the lid. 

“Beautiful. Beautiful,” he repeated, grinning. 

“Can we open it?” Marissa asked, dropping down on the ground beside 
him. “Please, Dad? Can we open it and see the Lost Legend?” 

“We have to see it!” I exclaimed eagerly. “We have to!” 

Dad nodded. “Yes. We have to!” He laughed. “Believe me, I’m even 
more impatient to see it than you two are!” 

He bent over the chest. I saw his hands tremble as he lowered them to 
the silver clasp. 

“Beautiful. Beautiful,” he murmured again. 

His hands closed around the clasp. He turned it, then gave a sharp tug. 

Slowly, slowly, he pulled open the lid. 

And all three of us leaned close and gazed into the chest. 



30 


We leaned so dose over the chest, our heads touched. 

“I—I don’t believe it!” I gasped. 

“What is it?” Marissa shrieked. 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. He narrowed his eyes and gazed into the 
chest. He didn’t say a word. 

“It-it’s an egg\” I finally stammered. 

The three of us were staring down at a large yellow egg with brown 
speckles. 

“But—where is the Lost Legend?” Marissa demanded. “This can’t be 
it!” 

Dad sighed and shook his head. “This isn’t the right silver chest,” he 
said softly. 

He reached inside and carefully lifted the egg. Then he felt around on 
the bottom of the chest with his free hand. “Nothing else in here. Just an 
egg.” He examined the egg, rolling it slowly between his hands. Then he 
carefully lowered it back into the chest. “Just an egg,” he repeated sadly. 

I let out a hoarse cry. “But Marissa and I passed the test!” I wailed. 
“Luka said he would give us what we came here for!” 

“Who is Luka?” Dad asked. He carefully closed the clasp on the chest. 
Then, with a groan, he climbed to his feet. “Where can we find him?” 

Before I could answer, I heard a rustling sound across the clearing. I 
turned to see Silverdog come trotting out of the weeds. 

“Silverdog!” I cried. I rushed forward and petted the dog’s big head 
and the fur around his neck. “Take us back to Luka!” I ordered him. “Luka! 
Take us to Luka!” 

Silverdog wagged his tail. Did that mean he understood? 

“Luka!” I repeated. “Take us to Luka!” 

Still wagging his bushy tail, the big dog headed past us to the trees. 
Dad picked up the silver chest. And the three of us followed the dog back 
through the forest. 


Marissa and I hadn’t traveled far from the little cabin. A few minutes later, 



it came into view. Luka hurried out, his face twisted in surprise. 

“I didn’t expect to see you back here,” he said, shaking out his long, 
dark hair. “Did you get lost?” 

“No. Not exactly,” Marissa replied. 

“This is our dad,” I told Luka. “We finally found him.” 

Dad and Luka shook hands. 

“Well, why did you come back here?” Luka demanded. He lowered his 
gaze to the silver chest in Dad’s hands. “I gave you what you came here 
for.” 

“Not exactly,” Dad replied. “It’s an egg.” 

“Yes, I know,” Luka said, scratching his jaw. 

“But we didn’t come here for an egg!” I protested. 

Luka narrowed his eyes at us. “You didn’t come to the forest in search 
of the Eternal Egg of Truth?” 

“No way,” I replied. “Dad brought us here to find the Legend of the 
Lost Legend.” 

“Oops!” Luka blushed. “I made a little goof.” He looked very upset. 

“That’s okay,” Dad said softly. “Everyone makes mistakes.” 

Luka shook his head. “I’m so sorry. I usually get it right. I really 
thought you were searching for the Eternal Egg of Truth.” 

Still shaking his head, he took the silver chest from Dad’s hands. He 
carried it into the cabin. A few seconds later, he returned. “A thousand 
apologies,” he said. 

“But can you help us find the Lost Legend?” I demanded. “Do you 
have it?” 

“Do I have it?” The question seemed to surprise Luka. “No. I don’t 
have it. I think it will be very hard to get it.” 

“Why?” Dad asked eagerly. “Do you know where it is?” 

Luka nodded. “Yes. I can direct you to the people who have the Lost 
Legend. But I do not think they will part with it. They have been wandering 
the forest with it for five hundred years. I do not think they will want to 
give it to you—for any price.” 

“I—I just want to talk with them!” Dad cried excitedly. “I just want to 
see it with my own eyes!” 

“Go in this direction,” Luka instructed us, pointing. “Cross two 
streams, and you will probably find them on a wide, stone clearing. They 



wander the forest. They never stay in the same place for long. But I think 
you will find them in the stone clearing if you hurry.” 

“Thank you!” Dad cried, shaking Luka’s hand. 

We all thanked Luka. Then we hurried off in the direction he had 
pointed. We were so excited, all three of us talked at the same time. 

“Do you think they’ll be friendly?” 

“Do you think they’ll let us see the Lost Legend?” 

“Do you think they’ll let me borrow it?” Dad asked. “If I could only 
borrow it for a few weeks....” 

“Luka said they might not be friendly.” 

“He said they might not part with it—for any price.” 

The journey across the two streams was not difficult. We walked for 
only an hour. 

We were still talking excitedly as we drew near their camp. We 
stopped on a low hill overlooking a wide patch of stony ground. 

The stone clearing. 

We could see rows of small tents made of animal hides. Several 
people, dressed in brown robes, worked to build a fire in the center of the 
clearing. A bunch of scrawny gray dogs wrestled and snapped at each other 
at the edge of the clearing. 

“I can’t believe it,” Dad exclaimed, his eyes searching the small tent 
village. “I can’t believe these wanderers actually have the Lost Legend.” 

“But will they let us see it?” I asked. 

“Only one way to find out,” Dad replied. He led the way down the hill. 
“Hello, there!” he called out to the wanderers. “Hello!” 



31 


“Hello, there! Hello!” 

As we stepped onto the stone ground, the scrawny gray dogs stopped 
wrestling. Barking furiously, they came scurrying up to greet us. They 
lowered their heads, bared their jagged teeth, and growled. 

Marissa, Dad, and I stopped. I saw three men in brown robes come 
running out of tents. They quickly shooed the dogs away. The men, I saw, 
were as scrawny as the dogs. 

“Hello,” Dad greeted them warmly. “I am Professor Richard Clarke, 
and this is Justin and Marissa.” 

The three men nodded solemnly. But they did not speak. 

Two of them were bald. One had long, wavy white hair and a bushy 
white mustache. 

Marissa and I exchanged glances. 

I could see that she was as frightened as I was. 

These brown-robed wanderers did not look friendly. 

The white-haired man spoke first. “How did you find us?” he 
demanded coldly. 

“Someone directed us to you,” Dad replied. 

“Why have you come here, Professor Clarke?” the wanderer asked. 

“We’re searching for the Legend of the Lost Legend,” Dad told him. 

The three men all gasped in shock. They leaned close and whispered 
furiously to each other. 

When they finished their excited conversation, they turned back to us. 
But they didn’t speak. 

“Do you have it?” Dad asked eagerly. “Do you have the Lost Legend?” 

“Yes,” the white-haired man replied. “Yes, we have it.” 

He whispered something to the two bald men. They spun around, their 
long robes twirling with them, and hurried away. 

A few seconds later, they returned. One of them carried a small silver 
chest. 

“Oh, my goodness!” Dad declared, his eyes bulging. “Is that it? Is that 
really it? Is that the Lost Legend?” 



“Yes,” the white-haired man replied. “Do you want it?” 

“Huh?” all three of us cried. 

The wanderer shoved the chest into my hands. I was so shocked, I 
nearly dropped it! 

“It is yours,” the white-haired man said. He stepped back. 

Dad swallowed hard. “Are you sure?” he cried. “Are you sure you 
want to give it to us?” 

“Yes. Take it,” the man replied quickly. “Goodbye.” 

He and the other two turned and walked quickly back to their tents. To 
our surprise, they instantly began to pack up. 

Dozens of wanderers began pulling up tents, packing up supplies, 
putting out the campfire. In minutes, they had scurried away. 

The stone clearing stood bare. No sign they had ever been there. 

“How strange,” Dad said. “How totally strange.” 

We began to walk away from the clearing. I think all three of us were 
in shock or something. I know I was completely stunned. 

“They handed the treasure over to us without a word,” Dad said, 
mbbing his beard. “Why did they do that? Why did they give this treasure 
to us without asking for anything in return? I just can’t believe it.” 

I still had the chest in my arms. After we had walked for a short while, 
I stopped. “Where are we going?” I demanded. “Let’s open the chest. Let’s 
take a look at it!” 

“Yes!” Dad agreed. “I am so surprised—so stunned—I guess I don’t 
know what I’m doing!” 

He took the chest from me and carefully set it down on the ground. 
“Let’s see it. Let’s finally see it!” 

Carefully, he unlatched the lid and opened the chest. Then he reached 
inside—and pulled out a manuscript. A thick stack of yellowed paper with 
tiny black writing all over it. 

“Yes!” Dad whispered happily. “Yes!” 

He gripped the ancient legend tightly in both hands and held it down 
so that Maris sa and I could see it. 

“Wow!” Marissa cried. “It really looks five hundred years old— 
doesn’t it?” 

“Dad, what does it say on the top page?” I asked, struggling to make 
out the words. 



“Uh... let’s see,” Dad replied. He raised the manuscript close to his 
face, squinted hard at the tiny words, and then read them out loud: 

“WHOEVER OWNS THE LOST LEGEND WILL BE LOST 
FOREVER.” 

“Huh? What does that mean?” I cried. 

Dad shrugged. “It doesn’t really mean anything. It’s just part of the 
legend.” 

“Are you sure?” Marissa demanded in a trembling voice. 

Dad stared down at the manuscript. “‘Lost forever...’” he murmured. 
‘“Whoever owns the Lost Legend will be lost forever.’” 

Then he raised his eyes to the trees that surrounded us. “Hey—where 
are we?” 

All three of us gazed around at the strange, dark trees. 

We had wandered away from the stone clearing. Now nothing looked 
familiar. 

“Where are we?” Dad repeated. 

“We-we’re lost,” I whispered. 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
R.L.STINE 










ATTACK OF THE 
JACK-O’-LANTERNS 


Goosebumps - 48 
R.L. Stine 





1 


“Where are you going, Elf?” Dad called from the den. 

“Don’t call me Elf!” I shouted back. “My name is Drew.” 

Dad thinks it’s real cute to call me Elf, but I hate it. He calls me Elf because 
I’m tiny for a twelve-year-old. And I have short, straight black hair and sort of a 
pointy chin and a pointy little nose. 

If you looked like an elf, would you want people calling you Elf? 

Of course not. 

One day my best friend, Walker Parkes, heard my dad call me Elf. So 
Walker tried it. “What’s up, Elf?” Walker said. 

I stomped on Walker’s foot as hard as I could, and he never called me that 
again. 

“Where are you going, Drew?” Dad called from the den. 

“Out,” I told him, and slammed the front door behind me. I like to keep my 
parents guessing. I try never to give them a straight answer. 

You might say I’m as mischievous as an elf. But if you said it, I’d stomp on 
your foot, too! 

I’m tough. Ask anyone. They’ll tell you that Drew Brockman is tough. 
When you’re the shrimpiest girl in your class, you’ve got to be tough. 

Actually, I wasn’t going anywhere. I was waiting for my friends to come to 
my house. I walked down to the street to watch for them. 

I took a deep breath. The people in the corner house had a fire going in their 
fireplace. The white smoke floated out from their chimney. It smelled so sweet 
and piney. 

I love autumn. It means Halloween is on the way. 

Halloween is my favorite holiday. I guess I like it so much because it gives 
me a chance to look like someone else. Or something else. 

It’s the one night of the year that I don’t have to look like pointy-chinned 
me. 

But I have a problem with Halloween. Two kids in my class are the 
problem. Tabitha Weiss and Lee Winston. 

For the past two years, Tabby and Lee have totally ruined Halloween for 
Walker and me. 



I’m so angry about it. Walker is angry, too. Our favorite holiday ruined 
because of two stuck-up kids who think they can do whatever they want. 

Grrrrrrrr. 

Just thinking about it makes me want to punch someone! 

My other friends, Shane and Shana Martin, are upset about it, too. Shane 
and Shana are brother and sister, twins my age. They live in the house next door, 
and we hang out a lot. 

Shane and Shana don’t look like anyone else I know. They both have very 
round faces with curly ringlets of blond hair. They have red cheeks and cheery 
smiles, and they’re both short and kind of chunky. 

My dad says they’re roly-poly. Dad always thinks of something icky to say 
about everyone! 

Anyway, the twins are as angry as Walker and me about Tabby and Lee. 
And this Halloween, we’re going to do something about it. 

Only we don’t know what we’re going to do. 

That’s why they’re coming over to my house to discuss it. 

How did the Tabby and Lee problem start? Well, I have to go back two 
years to explain it to you. 

I remember it so clearly. 

Walker and I were ten. We were just hanging out in front of my house. 
Walker had his bike on its side and was doing something to the spokes on one 
wheel. 

It was a beautiful autumn day. Down the block, someone was burning a big 
pile of leaves. It’s against the law here in Riverdale. My dad always threatens to 
call the police when someone burns leaves. But I love the smell. 

Walker was fiddling with his bike, and I was watching him. I forget what 
we were talking about. I glanced up—and there stood Tabby and Lee. 

Tabby looked as perfect as always. “Little Miss Perfect.” That’s what Dad 
calls her—and for once, he’s right. 

The wind was blowing pretty hard. But her long, straight blond hair stayed 
in place. It didn’t fly out ah over her head like mine did. 

Tabby has perfect creamy-white skin and perfect green eyes that sparkle a 
lot. She’s very pretty, and she knows it. 

Sometimes it takes ah my strength not to shake both hands in her hair and 
mess it ah up! 

Lee is tall and good-looking, with dark brown eyes and a great, warm smile. 



Lee is African-American, and he sort of stmts when he walks and acts real cool, 
like the rappers on MTV videos. 

The girls at school all think he’s terrific. But I can never understand a word 
he says. That’s because he always has a huge wad of green-apple bubble gum in 
his mouth. 

“Mmmmmbbb mmmmbbbbb.” Lee stared down at Walker’s bike and 
mumbled something. 

“Hey,” I said. “What’s up, guys?” 

Tabby made a disgusted face and pointed a finger at me. “Drew, you have 
something hanging from your nose,” she said. 

“Oh—!” I shot my hand up and rubbed the bottom of my nose. Nothing 
there. 

“Sorry,” Tabby snickered. “It only looked like you did.” 

Tabby and Lee both laughed. 

Tabby is always playing mean jokes like that on me. She knows I’m self- 
conscious about my looks. So I always fall for her dumb tricks. 

“Nice bike,” Lee mumbled to Walker. “How many speeds?” 

“It’s a twelve-speed,” Walker told him. 

Lee sneered. “Mine is a forty-two-speed.” 

“Huh?” Walker jumped to his feet. “There’s no such thing as a forty-two- 
speed!” he cried. 

“Mine is,” Lee insisted, still sneering. “It’s specially made.” 

He blew a big green bubble-gum bubble. That’s hard to do while you’re 
sneering. 

I wanted to pop it all over his smug face. But he stepped back and popped it 
himself. 

“Did you get a haircut?” Tabby asked me, studying my windblown hair. 

“No,” I replied. 

“I didn’t think so,” she said. She smoothed her perfect hair back with one 
hand. 

“Grrrrrrr.” I couldn’t help it. I balled my hands into fists and let out an 
angry growl. 

I growl a lot. Sometimes I don’t even know I’m doing it. 

“Mummmmmbb mmmmbbbbb.” Lee said something. Bubble-gum juice 
ran down his chin. 


“Excuse me?” I asked. 



“I’m having a Halloween party,” he repeated. 

My heart started to pound. “A real Halloween party?” I demanded. “With 
everyone in costumes, and hot apple cider, and games and bobbing for apples, 
and scary stories?” 

Lee nodded. “Yes. A real Halloween party. At my house on Halloween 
night. You guys want to come?” 

“Sure!” Walker and I replied. 

Big mistake. Real big mistake. 



2 


The Halloween party was already crowded with kids from school when Walker 
and I showed up. Lee’s parents had orange and black streamers strung up all 
over the living room. Three huge jack-o’-lanterns grinned at us from the window 
seat by the front window. 

Of course Tabby was the first person I ran into. Even in costume, she 
wasn’t hard to recognize. She was dressed as a princess. 

Perfect? 

She wore a frilly pink princess-type gown with long, puffy sleeves and a 
high, lacy collar. And she had her blond hair pinned up with a sparkly rhinestone 
tiara in it. 

She smiled her lipsticked lips at me. “Is that you, Drew?” she asked, 
pretending she didn’t recognize me. “What are you supposed to be? A mouse?” 

“No!” I protested. “I’m not a mouse. I’m a Klingon. Don’t you ever watch 
Star Trek?” 

Tabby snickered. “Are you sure you’re not a mouse?” 

She turned and walked away. She had a pleased smile on her face. She gets 
such a thrill from insulting me. 

I growled under my breath and searched for someone else to talk to. I found 
Shane and Shana in front of the fireplace. The twins were easy to recognize. 
They were both big, puffy white snowmen. 

“Excellent costumes!” I greeted them. 

They wore two white snowballs. One big snowball over their bodies. A 
smaller snowball over their heads. 

The snowman faces had eyeholes cut in them. But I couldn’t tell Shane 
from Shana. “What is the snow made of?” I asked. 

“Styrofoam,” Shana answered. She has a high, squeaky voice. So now I 
knew who was who. “We carved them out of big blocks of it.” 

“Cool,” I said. 

“Great party, huh?” Shane chimed in. “Everyone from our class is here. Did 
you see Bryna Morse’s costume? She sprayed her whole body with silver spray 
paint. Her face and hair, too!” 

“What’s she supposed to be?” I demanded, searching the crowded room for 



her. “Silver Surfer?” 

“No. I think the Statue of Liberty,” Shane replied. “She was carrying a 
plastic torch.” 

A loud crackle in the fireplace made me jump. Most of the lights were off, 
giving the room a dark, Halloween mood. The fire made long shadows dance 
over the floor. 

I turned and saw Walker making his way to us. His entire body was 
wrapped in bandages and gauze. He was a mummy. 

“I’m in trouble,” he announced. 

“What’s your problem?” Shane asked. 

“My mom did a terrible wrapping job,” Walker complained. “I’m coming 
unraveled.” He struggled to retie the loose bandages around his neck. 

“Aaaagh!” He let out an angry cry. “The whole thing is coming undone!” 

“Are you wearing clothes underneath?” Shana asked. 

Shane and I laughed. I pictured Walker huddled in the middle of the party in 
his underwear, piles of bandages at his feet. 

“Yes. I’ve got my clothes on underneath the costume,” Walker replied. “But 
if these bandages all come undone, I’ll fall on my face!” 

“Hey—what’s up?” Lee interrupted. He wore a Batman costume, but I 
recognized his dark eyes under the mask. And I recognized his voice. 

“Awesome party,” Shana said. 

“Yeah. Awesome,” I repeated. 

Lee started to reply. But a thunderous crash made everyone gasp. 

We all froze. “What was that?” Lee cried. 

The crowded room grew silent. 

I heard another crash. Bumping sounds. Low voices. 

“It—it’s coming from the basement!” Lee stammered. He pulled off the 
Batman mask. His bushy hair fell over his face, but I could see his frightened 
expression. 

We all turned to the open doorway at the far end of the living room. Beyond 
the doorway, stairs led down to Lee’s basement. 

“Oh—!” Lee gasped as we heard another crash. 

Then heavy footsteps—up the basement stairs. 

“Someone is in the house!” Lee shrieked in terror. “Someone has broken 

in!” 



3 


“Mom! Dad!” Lee cried. His voice rang out shrilly in the silent living room. The 
rest of us had all frozen in place. 

A shiver ran down my back as I listened to the heavy footsteps treading up 
the stairs. 

“Mom! Dad! Help!” Lee called again, his eyes bulging with fear. 

No reply. 

He took off toward their bedroom at the back of the house. “Mom? Dad?” 

I started to run after him. But he returned to the living room a few seconds 
later, his whole body trembling. “My parents—they’re gone!” 

“Call the police!” someone shouted. 

“Yes! Call nine-one-one!” Walker screamed. 

Lee hurtled to the phone beside the couch. His foot kicked over a can of 
Pepsi on the rug. But he didn’t notice. 

He grabbed the phone receiver and jammed it to his ear. I saw him push the 
emergency number. 

But then he turned to us and let the phone fall from his hand. “It’s dead. The 
line is dead!” 

Some kids gasped. A few cried out. 

I turned to Walker and opened my mouth to speak. But before I could get a 
sound out, two bulky figures burst out from the basement doorway. 

“Noooooo—!” Lee let out a horrified howl. Tabby stepped up and huddled 
close beside him. Her heavily made-up eyes were wide with fright. She grabbed 
Lee’s arm. 

The two intruders moved quickly into the living room entrance and blocked 
the doorway. One of them had a blue wool ski mask pulled down over his face. 
The other wore a rubber gorilla mask. 

They both wore black leather jackets over black jeans. 

“Party time!” the gorilla shouted in a gruff voice. He laughed. A cruel 
laugh. “Party time, everyone!” 

Several kids cried out. My heart started to pound in my chest. I suddenly 
felt hot and cold at the same time. 

“Who are you?” Lee demanded over the frightened cries of some kids. 



“How did you get in? Where are my parents?” 

“Parents?” the guy in the ski mask replied. He had bright blue eyes, almost 
as blue as the wool mask that covered his face. “Do you have parents?” 

They both laughed. 

“Where are they?” Lee cried. 

“I think they ran away when they saw us coming!” the guy said through the 
ski mask. 

Lee swallowed hard. A tiny gulping sound escaped his throat. 

Tabby stepped in front of him. “You can’t come in here!” she shouted 
angrily to the two intruders. “We’re having a party!” 

The gorilla turned to his partner and laughed. They both laughed loudly, 
tossing back their heads. 

“It’s our party now!” the gorilla announced. “We’re taking over!” 

Hushed gasps rang out around the room. My legs suddenly felt rubbery and 
weak. I grabbed Walker’s shoulder to keep from collapsing. 

“Wh-what are you going to do?” Tabby demanded. 



4 


“Everybody down on the floor!” the guy in the ski mask ordered. 

“You can’t do this!” Tabby screamed. 

“We’re just kids!” someone else cried. “Are you going to rob us? We don’t 
have any money!” 

I saw Shane and Shana huddled together by the fireplace. Their faces were 
hidden by their snowman costumes. But I knew they must be terrified, too. 

“Down on the floor! ” both intruders screamed. 

The room echoed with heavy thuds and the rustle of costumes as we all 
obediently dropped to the floor. 

“You, too!” the gorilla screamed at Shane and Shana. 

“It’s impossible! How can we get down in these big snowballs?” Shana 
cried. 

“Get down on the floor anyway,” the gorilla ordered nastily. 

“Get down—or we’ll push you down,” the ski-masked guy threatened. 

I watched Shane and Shana struggle to lower themselves to the floor. They 
had to pull off their bottom snowballs to get onto their knees. Shana’s snowball 
broke in half as she worked to pull it off. 

“Okay—push-ups, everybody!” the gorilla ordered. 

“Huh?” Confused cries rose up through the room. 

“Push-ups!” the gorilla repeated. “You all know how to do push-ups— 
right?” 

“How—how many do we have to do?” Walker asked. He knelt close beside 
me on the rug in front of the coffee table. 

“Do them for a couple of hours,” the ski-masked guy replied. 

“Hours?” several kids cried out. 

“A few hours of push-ups will get you all warmed up,” the gorilla said. 
“Then we’ll think of something harder for you to do!” 

“Yeah. Much harder!” his partner added. Then they both burst out laughing 
again. 

“You can’t do this!” I screamed. My voice came out high and tiny, like a 


mouse voice. 



Other kids protested, too. I turned to the door. The guy in the ski mask had 
moved into the living room. But the gorilla was still blocking any escape. 

“Get started! ” the gorilla ordered. 

“Or we’ll make it three hours!” his partner added. 

I heard a lot of groans and complaints. But we all dropped onto our 
stomachs and started doing push-ups. 

What choice did we have? 

“We can’t do this for two hours!” Walker protested breathlessly. “We’ll 
faint!” 

He raised and dropped, raised and dropped, close beside me on the floor. 
His mummy costume was unraveling with each move he made. 

“Faster!” the gorilla ordered. “Come on. Speed it up!” 

I had done only four or five push-ups, and my arms already started to ache. 
I don’t get much exercise, except for bike riding and swimming in the summer. 
There was no way I’d last for more than ten or fifteen minutes. 

I raised my eyes to the front of the room—and saw a sight that made me cry 
out in shock. 



5 


“Walker—look!” I whispered. 

“Hunnh?” he groaned. 

I poked Walker in the side. 

He lost his balance and hit the floor. “Hey, Drew—! What’s your problem?” 
he groaned. 

We both turned our eyes to the doorway. 

And saw to our surprise that Tabby and Lee weren’t down on the floor with 
the rest of us. They had joined the two intruders in front of the doorway. 

And they both had wide, gleeful grins on their faces. 

I stopped the push-ups and raised myself to my knees. I saw Lee start to 
laugh. 

Tabby joined him. She laughed so hard, her tiara shook. They slapped each 
other a high five. 

All around me on the floor, some kids were still working away, pushing 
themselves up, then down, up, then down. Groaning and grunting as they 
obediently did their push-ups. 

But Walker and I had stopped. We were both on our knees, watching Tabby 
and Lee. The two creeps were laughing and celebrating. 

I was about to cry out in anger—when the two intruders tugged off their 
masks. 

I instantly recognized the boy with the gorilla mask. He was Todd Jeffrey, a 
high-school kid who lives next door to Lee. 

I knew the ski-mask kid, too. His name was Joe Something-or-other. He is a 
friend of Todd’s. 

Todd brushed his coppery hair back off his forehead. His hair was wet, his 
face was red, and he was sweating. I guess it was hot inside that rubber mask. 

Joe tossed his ski mask to the floor. He shook his head, laughing at us. “All 
a joke, guys!” he called out. “Happy Halloween!” 

All the other kids had stopped the push-ups. But no one had moved from 
the floor. I guess we were too shocked to stand up. 

“Just a party joke!” Lee chimed in, grinning. 

“Did we scare you?” Tabby asked coyly. 



“Grrrrrr!” I let out the loudest growl I ever growled. I wanted to leap up, 
grab the tiara off Princess Tabby’s head, and wrap it around her neck! 

Todd and Joe slapped each other a high five. They picked up cans of Pepsi 
and tilted them up over their mouths. 

“You can get up now!” Lee announced, snickering. 

“Wow! You guys looked so scared !” Tabby cried gleefully. “I guess we 
really fooled you!” 

“I don’t believe this,” Walker muttered, shaking his head. The wrapping had 
fallen from his face. Bandages drooped loosely over his shoulders. “I really 
don’t believe this. What a mean, rotten joke.” 

I climbed up shakily and helped Walker to his feet. I heard Shane and Shana 
grumbling behind us. Their costumes were totally wrecked. 

Kids were grumbling and complaining. Tabby and Lee were the only ones 
laughing. No one else thought the joke was the least bit funny. 

I started across the room to tell the two creeps what I thought of their dumb 
joke. But Lee’s parents burst into the room, pulling off their coats. 

“We went next door to the Jeffreys’,” Lee’s mom announced. Then she saw 
Todd. “Oh, hi, Todd. We were just at your house, visiting your parents. What are 
you doing over here? Helping Lee out with the party?” 

“Kind of,” Todd replied, grinning. 

“How’s the party going?” Lee’s dad asked. 

“Great,” Lee told him. “Just great, Dad.” 

And that’s how Tabby and Lee ruined Halloween two years ago. 

Walker and I—and Shane and Shana, too—were all really upset. 

No. We were more than upset. We were furious. 

Halloween is our favorite holiday. And we don’t like to see it ruined 
because of a mean practical joke. 

So, last year we decided to get even. 



6 


“We need special decorations,” Shana said. “Not the same old pumpkins and 
skeletons.” 

“Yeah. Something scarier,” Shane chimed in. 

“I think jack-o’-lanterns are plenty scary,” I insisted. “Especially when you 
put candles in them. And their dark faces light up with those jagged, evil grins.” 

“Jack-o’-lanterns are babyish,” Walker argued. “No one is afraid of a jack- 
o’-lantern. Shana is right. If we’re going to scare Tabby and Lee, we need 
something better.” 

It was a week before Halloween. The four of us were hard at work at my 
house. We were working on my Halloween party. 

Yes. Last year, the party was at my house. 

Why did I decide to have the party? Lor only one reason. 

Lor revenge. 

Lor revenge on Tabby and Lee. 

Walker, Shane, Shana, and I had spent the entire year talking about it, 
dreaming up plans. Dreaming up the most frightening scares we could imagine. 

We didn’t want to pull a mean joke like having people break into the house. 

That was too mean. And too frightening. 

Some of my friends still have bad dreams about guys in ski masks and 
gorilla masks. 

The four of us didn’t want to terrify all of our guests. We just wanted to 
embarrass Tabby and Lee—and scare them out of their skins! 

Now, a week before the big night, we were sitting around my living room 
after dinner. We should have been doing homework. But Halloween was too 
near. 

We had no time for homework. We had to spend all of our time making evil 
plans. 

Shane and Shana had a lot of really frightening ideas. They both look so 
sweet and innocent. But once you get to know them, they’re pretty weird. 

Walker and I wanted to keep our scares simple. The simpler, the scarier. 
That’s what we thought. 

I wanted to drop fake cobwebs over Tabby and Lee from the stairway. I 



know a store that sells really sticky, scratchy cobwebs. 

Walker has a tarantula that he keeps in a glass cage in his room. A live 
tarantula. He thought maybe we could tangle the tarantula in the cobwebs and 
then drop it in Tabby’s hair. 

Not a bad idea. 

Walker also wanted to cut a trapdoor in the living room floor. When Tabby 
and Lee stepped on the spot, we’d open the trapdoor, and they would disappear 
into the basement. 

I had to reject that idea. I liked it. But I wasn’t sure how Mom and Dad 
would react when they discovered us sawing up the floor. 

Also, I just wanted to terrify the two creeps. I didn’t want to break their 
necks. 

“Where are we going to put the fake blood puddles?” Shane asked. 

He held a red plastic puddle of blood in each hand. He and his sister had 
bought a dozen fake blood puddles at a costume store. They came in different 
sizes, and looked very real. 

“And don’t forget the green slime,” Shana reminded us. She had three 
plastic bags of slime beside her. 

Walker and I opened one of the bags and felt the slimy, sticky, oozy gunk. 
“Where did you buy this?” I asked. “At the same store?” 

“No. It came out of Shana’s nose!” Shane joked. 

With an angry cry, Shana hoisted up one of the bags. She swung it in front 
of her, threatening to smack her brother with it. 

He laughed and bounced off the couch. 

“Whoa! Careful!” I cried. “If that bag breaks—” 

“Maybe we can hang the slime from the ceiling,” Walker suggested. 

“Yeah! Cool!” Shane cried excitedly. “And it could drip down onto Tabby 
and Lee.” 

“Maybe we could cover them in it!” Walker added excitedly. “And they’d 
look like two sticky green blobs.” 

“Glub glub glub!” Shana thrashed out her arms and pretended she was 
drowning under a puddle of slime. 

“Will it stick to the ceiling?” I asked. “How will we keep it up there long 
enough? How will we get the two of them to stand under it?” 

I’m the practical one in the group. They have a lot of wild ideas. But they 
never know how to make them work. 



That’s my job. 

“I’m not sure,” Walker replied. He jumped up from his chair. “I’m going to 
get something to drink.” 

“What if the slime started to spew out of the jack-o’-lanterns?” Shane 
suggested. “That would be kind of scary—wouldn’t it?” 

“What if we had fake blood gush out of the jack-o’-lanterns?” Shana said. 
“That would be even scarier.” 

“We have to trap Tabby and Lee somehow,” Shane suggested, thinking 
hard. “All this slime and cobwebs and blood is good. But we have to make them 
think they’re really in danger. We have to make them think that something 
terrible is really going to happen to them.” 

I started to agree—but the lights went out. 

“Oh—!” I uttered a cry of surprise, blinking in the sudden darkness. “What 
happened?” 

Shane and Shana didn’t reply. 

The curtains were drawn. So no light entered the living room from outside. 
The room was so dark, I couldn’t see my two friends sitting right across from 
me! 

And then, I heard a dry, whispered voice. A frightening whisper, so close, 
so close to my ear: 

“Come with me. 

Come home with me now. 

Come home to where you belong. 

Come home—to the grave. ” 



7 


Staring into the darkness, the whispered words sent a shiver down my back. 

“Come with me. 

Come home with me now. 

Come home to where you belong. 

Come to your grave, Tabby and Lee. 

I have come for you and you alone. 

Come, Tabby and Lee. Come with me now. ” 

“That’s excellent!” I cried. 

The lights flashed back on. Across from me, Shane and Shana clapped and 
cheered. 

“Good job, Walker!” I turned to congratulate him. 

He set his portable tape player on the coffee table in front of us and 
rewound the tape. “I think it will scare them,” he said. 

“It scared me!” I told him. “And I knew what it was.” 

“When the lights go out and that voice starts to whisper, it will creep 
everyone out!” Shana exclaimed. “Especially with the tape player right under the 
couch.” 

“Who recorded the voice?” Shane asked Walker. “Did you do it?” 

Walker nodded. 

“Cool,” Shane said. He turned to me. “But, Drew, I still think you should let 
Shana and me do some of our scares on Tabby and Lee.” 

“Let’s save those for when we really need them,” I replied. 

I bent down and opened one of the plastic bags. I dug a hand in and pulled 
out a big chunk of green slime. It felt cold and gooey in my hand. 

I worked it around in my palm, squeezing it and shaping it. Then I rolled it 
into a ball. 

“Think it’s sticky enough to hang from the ceiling?” I asked. “It would be a 
nice effect to have it running down the walls. I think—” 

“No. I’ve got a better idea,” Walker interrupted. “The lights all go out— 



right? And the creepy voice starts to whisper. And when it whispers their names 
—when it whispers, ‘Come to your grave, Tabby and Lee’—then someone 
sneaks up behind each of them and drops a huge glob of slime on their heads.” 

“That’s cool!” Shane declared. We all laughed and cheered. 

We had some good ideas. But we needed more. 

I didn’t want to slip up. I didn’t want Tabby and Lee to think it was funny, 
all a big joke. 

I wanted them to be SCARED—with a capital S-C-A-R-E-D. 

So we thought of more scary ideas. And more ideas. 

We worked all week. From after school until late at night. Setting traps. 
Hiding little creepy surprises all over the living room. 

We carved the ugliest jack-o’-lanterns you ever saw. And we filled them 
with real-looking plastic cockroaches. 

We made an eight-foot-tall, papier-mache monster. And we rigged it to fall 
out of the coat closet when we pulled a string. 

We bought real-looking rubber snakes and worms and spiders and hid them 
all around the house. 

We didn’t eat or sleep. We dragged ourselves through school, thinking only 
about more ways to terrify our two special guests. 

Finally, Halloween arrived. 

The four of us gathered at my house. We were too tense to sit still or even 
stand still. We moved around the house, barely speaking to each other. And we 
carefully checked and rechecked all of the frightening traps and tricks we had 
prepared. 

I had never worked so hard in all my life. Never! 

I spent so much time getting ready for the party—and our revenge—that I 
didn’t even think of my Halloween costume until the very last minute. 

And so I ended up wearing the same Klingon costume I had worn the year 
before. 

Walker was a pirate that year. He had a patch over one eye and wore a 
striped shirt and a parrot on one shoulder. 

Shane and Shana had dressed as some kind of blobby creatures. I couldn’t 
really tell what they were supposed to be. 

We didn’t care about our costumes. We only cared about scaring Tabby and 

Lee. 

And then, as we paced the living room nervously, one hour before the party 



was to start, the phone rang. 

And we received a call that filled us all with horror. 



8 


I was standing right next to the phone when it rang. The harsh buzz nearly made 
me jump out of my skin. Was I a little tense? YES! 

I grabbed the phone in the middle of the first ring. “Hello?” 

I heard a familiar voice on the other end. “Hi, Drew. It’s Tabby.” 

“Tabby!” I cried. I decided she was calling to find out what time the party 
started. “The party starts at eight,” I said. “But if you and Lee—” 

“That’s why I’m calling,” Tabby interrupted. “Lee and I can’t come 
tonight.” 

“Huh?” 

The phone dropped out of my hand. It clattered to the floor. 

I dove to pick up the receiver, stumbled, and nearly knocked the whole 
table over. 

“What? What did you say?” I demanded. 

“Lee and I can’t come.” Tabby repeated the chilling words. “We’re going to 
Lee’s cousin’s instead. His cousin gets to trick-or-treat until midnight. He does 
four different neighborhoods. He promised we’ll get bags and bags of candy. 
Sorry.” 

“But, Tabby—” I started to protest weakly. 

“Sorry,” she said. “See you. ’Bye.” 

She hung up. 

I let out a hoarse wail and sank to my knees on the floor. 

“What’s wrong?” Walker demanded. 

“They—they—they—” I couldn’t get the words out. 

My three friends huddled around me. Walker tried to pull me to my feet. 
But my head was spinning. I didn’t want to stand up. 

“They’re not coming !” I finally managed to choke out. “Not coming.” 

“Oh,” Walker replied softly. Shane and Shana shook their heads glumly, but 
didn’t say a word. 

We all stayed frozen in place, stunned, too miserable to talk. Thinking about 
all the work... all the planning and all the hard work. 

A whole year of planning and work. 



I’m not going to cry, I told myself. I feel like crying, but I’m not going to. 

I climbed shakily to my feet. And glanced at the couch. 

“What is that?” I shrieked. 

Everyone turned and saw what I saw. A huge, ugly hole in one of the brown 
leather couch cushions. 

“Oh no!” Shana wailed. “I was playing with a ball of green slime. I must 
have dropped it onto the couch when I stood up. It—it burned a hole in the 
cushion!” 

“Quick—cover it up before Mom and Dad see—” I started. 

Of course Mom and Dad came strolling into the living room. “How’s it 
going?” Dad asked. “All ready for your guests?” 

I crossed my fingers and prayed they wouldn’t see the huge hole in the 
couch. 

“Good heavens! What happened to the couch?” Mom shrieked. 

It took Mom and Dad a long time to get over the ruined couch. 

And it took me even longer to get over the ruined party. 

That’s how it went last Halloween. Two years. Two years of ruined 
Halloweens. 

Now it’s a year later. 

Halloween time again. This year, we have twice as much reason to get 
revenge on Tabby and Lee. 

If only we had a plan... 



9 


“This year I’m a space princess,” Tabby announced. 

She had her blond hair piled high once again, with the same rhinestone tiara 
in it. And she wore the same long, lacy dress. 

The same costume as two years ago. But to add the outer-space look, Tabby 
had painted her face bright green. 

She always has to be a princess, I thought bitterly. Green or not green, she’s 
still a princess. 

Lee showed up in a cape and tights and said he was Superman. He said it 
was his little brother’s costume. He told us why he didn’t have time to get a 
costume of his own. But I couldn’t understand him because of the big wad of 
bubble gum in his mouth. 

Walker and I had decided to be ghosts. We cut eyeholes in bedsheets, and 
armholes, and that was that. 

My sheet dragged behind me on the grass. I should have cut it shorter. But 
it was too late. We were already on our way to trick-or-treat. 

“Where are Shane and Shana?” Lee asked. 

“I guess we’ll catch up with them,” I replied. I raised my trick-or-treat bag 
in front of me. “Let’s get going.” 

The four of us stepped out into a clear, cold night. A pale half-moon floated 
low over the houses. The grass shone gray under a light blanket of frost. 

We stopped at the bottom of my driveway. A minivan rumbled by. I saw 
two big dogs peering out the back window. The driver slowed to stare at us as 
she passed by. 

“Where shall we start?” Tabby asked. 

Lee mumbled something I didn’t understand. 

“I want to trick-or-treat all night!” Walker exclaimed. “This may be our last 
trick-or-treat night ever.” 

“Excuse me? What do you mean?” Tabby demanded, turning her green face 
to him. 

“Next year, we’ll be teenagers,” Walker explained. “We’ll be too old to 
trick-or-treat.” 

Kind of a sad thought. 



I tried to take a deep breath of cool air. But I had forgotten to cut a nose or 
mouth hole in the sheet. We hadn’t even left my front yard, and I was already 
starting to feel hot! 

“Let’s start at The Willows,” I suggested. 

The Willows is a neighborhood of small houses. It starts on the other side of 
a small woods, just two blocks away. 

“Why The Willows?” Tabby demanded, fiddling with her tiara. 

“Because the houses are real close together,” I told her. “We won’t have to 
walk much, and we’ll get a lot of candy. No long driveways to walk up and 
down.” 

“Sounds good,” Lee agreed. 

We started walking along the curb. Across the street, I saw two monsters 
and a skeleton making their way across a front yard. Little kids, followed by a 
father. 

The wind fluttered my costume as we walked. My shoes crunched over 
frost-covered dead leaves. The sky seemed to grow darker as we made our way 
past the bare black trees of the woods. 

A few minutes later, we reached the first block of The Willows. Streetlights 
cast a warm yellow glow over the neighborhood. A lot of the houses were 
decorated with orange and green lights, cutouts of witches and goblins, and 
flickering jack-o’-lanterns. 

The four of us began walking from house to house, gleefully yelling “Trick 
or treat!” and collecting all kinds of candy. 

People oohed and aahed over Tabby’s princess costume. She was the only 
one in our group who had bothered to put on a decent costume. So I guess she 
stood out. 

We passed by a lot of other kids as we made our way down the block. Most 
of them appeared younger than us. One kid was dressed as a milk carton. He 
even had all the nutritional information printed on one side. 

It took us about half an hour to do both sides of the street. The Willows 
ended in a cul-de-sac. Kind of a dead end. 

“Where to next?” Tabby asked. 

“Whoa. Wait. One more house,” Walker said. He pointed to a small brick 
house set back in the trees. 

“I didn’t see that one,” I said. “I guess because it’s the only house that isn’t 
right on the street.” 



“The lights are on, and they’ve got a pumpkin in the window,” Walker 
announced. “Let’s check it out.” 

We trooped up to the front stoop and pushed the doorbell. The front door 
swung open instantly. A small, white-haired woman poked out her head. She 
squinted through thick eyeglasses at us. 

“Trick or treat!” the four of us chanted. 

“Oh my goodness!” she exclaimed. She pressed wrinkled hands against her 
cheeks. “What wonderful costumes!” 

Huh? Wonderful costumes? I thought. Two bedsheets and a borrowed 
Superman suit from last year? 

The old woman turned back into the house. “Forrest, come see this!” she 
called. “You’ve got to see these costumes.” 

I heard a man cough from somewhere deep inside the house. 

“Come in. Please come in,” the old woman pleaded. “I want my husband to 
see you.” She stepped back to make room for us to enter. 

The four of us hesitated. 

“Come in!” she insisted. “Forrest has to see your costumes. But it’s hard for 
him to get up. Please!” 

Tabby led the way into the house. We stepped into a tiny, dimly lit living 
room. A fire blazed in a small brick fireplace against one wall. The room felt like 
a blast furnace. It had to be five hundred degrees in there! 

The woman shut the front door behind us. “Forrest! Forrest!” she called. 
She turned to us and smiled. “He’s in the back room. Follow me.” 

She opened the door and let us enter. To my surprise, the back room was 
enormous. 

And jammed with kids in costumes. 

“Whoa!” I cried out, startled. My eyes quickly swept the room. 

Most of the kids had taken off their masks. Some of them were crying. 
Some were red-faced and angry. Several kids sat cross-legged on the floor, their 
expressions glum. 

“What’s going on?” Tabby demanded shrilly. Her eyes bulged wide with 

fear. 

“What are they all doing here?” Lee asked, swallowing hard. 

A red-faced little man with shaggy white hair came hobbling out from the 
corner, leaning on a white cane. “I like your costumes,” he said, grinning at us. 

“We—we have to go now,” Tabby stammered. 



We all turned to the door. The old woman had shut it behind her. 

I glanced back at the kids in costumes. There were at least two dozen of 
them. They all looked so frightened and unhappy. 

“We have to go,” Tabby repeated shrilly. 

“Yeah. Let us out of here,” Lee insisted. 

The old man smiled. The woman stepped up beside him. “You have to 
stay,” she said. “We like to look at your costumes.” 

“You can’t go,” the man added, leaning heavily on his cane. “We have to 
look at your costumes.” 

“Huh? What are you saying? How long are you going to keep us here?” 
Tabby cried. 

“Forever,” the old couple replied in unison. 



10 


That was my daydream. 

I was down by the street in front of my house, waiting for my friends to 
show up. And daydreaming about Tabby and Lee being trapped by a weird old 
couple who liked to collect trick-or-treaters and keep them forever. 

Of course, in my daydream, Walker and I sneaked out a side door. 

But Tabby and Lee were caught before they could escape. And they were 
never seen again. 

Nice daydream, huh? 

I was still picturing the whole thing when Walker, Shane, and Shana finally 
arrived. And we eagerly trooped inside and up to my room. 

“Drew, why are you grinning like that?” Shana demanded, dropping down 
onto the edge of my bed. 

“I was just having a very funny daydream,” I told her. “About Tabby and 
Lee.” 

“What could be funny about those two creeps?” Walker demanded. He 
picked up a tennis ball from the floor and tossed it to Shane. The two of them 
started tossing the ball back and forth across my room. 

“It was very funny,” I replied, sitting up and stretching. “Especially the 
ending.” 

I told them the whole daydream. I could see from the smiles on their faces 
that they enjoyed it. 

But Shana scolded me. “We don’t have time for daydreams, Drew. We need 
a real plan. It’s almost Halloween.” 

Walker tossed the tennis ball too high. It smashed into my dresser lamp and 
knocked it over. 

Shane hurtled toward the lamp and made a diving catch before it hit the 

floor. 

“Way to go!” Walker cried. “Catch of the Month!” He slapped Shane a high 
five. He hit Shane so hard, the poor guy almost dropped the lamp. 

“Grrrrrrr!” I growled at Walker and pointed to the desk chair. “Sit down. 
We have serious thinking to do.” 

“She’s right,” Shana agreed. “We have to scare Tabby and Lee out of their 



skins this year. We have to pay them back for the last two years. We have to!” 

“So what are we going to do?” Walker demanded, dropping his long, lanky 
body into the desk chair. “Hide behind some bushes and yell ‘Boo!’?” 

Bad attitude. 

“I’ve been thinking of some really scary things we could do at a party,” I 
started. “I think—” 

“No party!” Shana interrupted. 

“Right. No party,” her twin agreed. “We worked so hard on last year’s 
party. And then Tabby and Lee didn’t show up.” 

“Grrrrr.” Just thinking about last year made me growl. 

“Well, if we don’t scare them at a Halloween party, where do we scare 
them?” Walker asked, tapping out a rhythm with his fingers on the desk. 

“Shane and I have some really good ideas,” Shana said. 

“Yeah. I think you have to listen to Shana and me this year,” Shane chimed 
in. “We have a really good plan. It will have them shaking for a year. Really!” 

Walker pulled the desk chair closer. Shane sat on the floor beside him. I 
leaned closer to Shana on the bed. 

Speaking in a low voice just above a whisper, Shana told Walker and me 
their plan. A very scary plan. 

It gave me a chill just hearing Shana describe it. 

“It’s very simple,” Shana finished. “Very easy to do. And there’s no way it 
won’t work.” 

“We’ll give Tabby and Lee a Halloween they’ll never forget!” Shane 
boasted. 

“It’s really mean,” Walker murmured. 

I gazed at the chubby, pink-cheeked twins. They were so cute-looking. So 
sweet and innocent. But their plan to frighten Tabby and Lee really was truly 
horrifying! 

“It’s mean,” I agreed. “And it’s cruel. And it’s terribly gross and shocking.” 
I grinned. “I like it!” 

We all laughed. 

“So we agree?” Shane asked. “We’re doing it?” 

We all agreed. We all solemnly shook hands. 

“Great,” Shana declared. “So Drew, all you have to do is invite them to 
come trick-or-treating with you. Shane and I will do the rest.” 

“No problem,” I replied, still grinning. “No problem.” 



We all cheered and congratulated each other. We knew this was the year 
—our year. 

Shana started to say something else—but my mom poked her head into the 
room. 

“What are you four plotting so seriously?” Mom asked. 

“Uh... nothing,” Walker answered quickly. 

“Just making plans for Halloween, Mom,” I told her. 

Mom bit her lower lip. Her expression turned serious. “You know, Drew,” 
she said, shaking her head, “I don’t think I can let you go trick-or-treating this 
year.” 



11 


“Mom—you have to let me go trick-or-treating! You have to! Or else you’ll spoil 
all of our plans for revenge!” 

Those words almost burst from my mouth. 

But somehow I held them in. 

I choked back the words and stared hard at her, trying to decide if she was 
serious. 

She was. 

“Mom—what’s wrong?” I finally cried. “What did I do? Why am I 
grounded?” 

“Drew, you’re not grounded.” Mom laughed. “I just don’t think trick-or- 
treating is a good idea this year. Haven’t you seen the news stories? About the 
people in town who disappeared?” 

“Huh? Disappeared?” 

My mind flashed back to my daydream. I pictured the old couple again, 
locking kids up in their back room. 

“You mean kids have disappeared?” I asked. 

Mom shook her head. “No. Not kids. Adults. A fourth person was reported 
missing yesterday. Here. Look.” 

Mom had the newspaper rolled up under her arm. She pulled it out and 
unrolled it. She held the front page up so we all could see it. 

I could read the bold, black headline from across the room: 

LOCAL MYSTERY: 4 HAVE VANISHED 

I climbed up from the bed and made my way over to Mom. I saw Shane and 
Shana exchange worried glances. Walker’s expression had turned solemn. He 
drummed his fingers tensely on the desktop. 

I took the newspaper from Mom and stared at the photos of the four people 
who had disappeared. Three men and one woman. 

“The police are warning people to be very careful,” Mom said softly. 

Walker walked over and took the newspaper from my hands. He studied the 
photos for a moment. “Hey—these people are all fat!” he exclaimed. 

Now we all clustered around the paper and stared at the gray photos. 
Walker was right. All four people were very overweight. The first one, a bald 



man in a bulging turtleneck sweater, had at least six chins! 

“Weird,” I murmured. 

Shane and Shana had grown strangely silent. I guessed they were 
frightened. 

“Why would four fat people disappear into thin air?” Walker asked. 

Mom sighed. “That’s what the police would like to know,” she said. 

“But, Mom, if only adults are disappearing, why can’t I go trick-or- 
treating?” I asked. 

“Please let Drew go,” Shana pleaded. “It’s our last year to go out on 
Halloween night.” 

“No. I don’t think so,” Mom replied, biting her bottom lip again. 

“But we’ll be really really really careful!” I promised her. 

“I don’t think so,” Mom repeated. “I don’t think so.” 

Once again, Halloween was completely ruined. 



12 


But then Dad thought maybe trick-or-treating would be okay. 

It was two days later. He and Mom had been discussing it nonstop. 

“You can go out if you go in a group,” Dad said. “Stay in the neighborhood. 
And don’t wander away from the others. Okay, Elf?” 

“Thanks, Dad!” I cried. I was so happy, I didn’t remind him to stop calling 
me Elf! Instead, I surprised him with a big hug. 

“Are you sure about this?” Mom asked. 

“Of course he is!” I cried. 

No way was I going to let them change their minds. I was already halfway 
to the phone to tell Walker that our plan was back on! 

“There will be a thousand kids trick-or-treating in the neighborhood,” Dad 
argued. “Besides, Drew and her friends are old enough and smart enough to keep 
out of trouble.” 

“Thanks, Dad!” I cried again. 

Mom wanted to keep the discussion going. But I ran out of the kitchen and 
up to my room before she could get a word out. 

I called Walker and told him the good news. He said he would call Shane 
and Shana and tell them to get ready for trick-or-treat night. 

Everything was set. I had just one little problem left. 

I had to convince Tabby and Lee that they should go trick-or-treating with 
us. 

I took a deep breath and called Tabby’s house. Her mother said she was 
over at Lee’s, helping him get his Halloween costume ready. 

So I hurried over to Lee’s house. It was a gray Saturday afternoon. It had 
rained all morning, and the storm clouds still floated overhead. 

The front lawns shimmered from the clinging rainwater. I jumped over wide 
puddles on the sidewalk. I wore a heavy gray sweatsuit. But the air felt damp 
and cold, and I wished I had put on a jacket over it. 

I jogged the last block to Lee’s house, partly to warm up. I stopped to catch 
my breath on the front stoop. Then I pushed the doorbell. 

A few seconds later, Lee answered the door. 

“Whoa!” I cried out when I saw his costume. He had bobbing antennas on 



his head. He wore a fuzzy yellow vest, pulled over a black-and-yellow-striped 
girl’s swimsuit. 

“You—you’re a bee?” I stammered. 

He nodded. “Tabby and I are still working on it. We bought black tights for 
my legs this morning.” 

“Cool,” I said. He looked really stupid. 

But why should I tell him? 

Tabby greeted me as I stepped into the den. She had opened the package 
containing the tights and was stretching them out, tugging them hard between 
her hands. 

“Drew—have you lost weight?” she asked. 

“Excuse me? No.” 

“Oh. I guess you like your sweatsuit baggy like that—huh?” 

She’s so mean. 

She turned her head away. But I saw her snicker to herself. She thinks she’s 
really funny. 

“Is that your costume?” she asked. 

I decided to ignore her nasty jokes. “No. I’m going to be some kind of 
superhero, I think,” I told her. “You know. Wear a cape and tights. What are you 
going to be?” 

“A ballerina,” she replied. She handed the tights to Lee. “Here are your bee 
legs. Do you have some heavy construction paper?” 

“What for?” Lee asked. 

“We need to make the stinger. You know. To glue to the back of your 
tights.” 

“No way!” Lee protested. “No stinger. I don’t need a stinger. I’ll only sit on 
it anyway.” 

I let them argue for a few minutes. I kept out of it. 

Lee finally won. No stinger. 

Tabby pouted for a while and made faces at him. She hates it when she 
doesn’t get her way. But he’s even more stubborn than she is. 

“Listen, guys,” I started. “Walker and Shane and Shana and I are all going 
to trick-or-treat together this year.” I took a deep breath, then asked my question. 
“Want to come with us?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Lee replied. 

“Okay,” Tabby agreed. 



And that was that. 

The trap was set. 

Tabby and Lee were in for the most frightening Halloween of their lives. 
Unfortunately, we were, too. 



13 


The week dragged by. I counted the hours till Halloween. 

Finally, the big night arrived. I was so nervous, I could barely get my 
superhero costume together. 

It wasn’t much of a costume. I wore bright blue tights and a blue top. I 
pulled a pair of red boxer shorts over the tights. 

For my cape, I cut up a red tablecloth we didn’t use anymore and tied it 
around my shoulders. Then I pulled on a pair of white vinyl boots. I had a red 
cardboard mask that just covered my eyes. 

“Super Drew!” I proclaimed to the mirror. 

I knew the costume was lame. But I didn’t care. Tonight wasn’t about 
costumes. It was about terror. It was about scaring two kids to death! 

I grabbed a large brown shopping bag from the closet to use as a trick-or- 
treat bag. Then I scrambled down the stairs, hoping to get out of the house 
before running into my parents. I hoped to avoid a last-minute lecture about how 
I had to be careful outside. 

No such luck. 

Dad stopped me at the bottom of the stairs. “Wow! Great costume, Elf!” he 
exclaimed. “What are you supposed to be?” 

“Please don’t call me Elf,” I muttered. I tried to get past him to the front 
door, but he blocked my way. 

“Just let me take one photo,” he said. 

“I’m kind of late,” I told him. I was supposed to meet Walker on the corner 
at seven-thirty. It was already a quarter to eight. 

“Be careful out there! ” my mother called from the den. 

Dad disappeared to get his camera. I waited at the bottom of the stairs, 
tapping my hand on the banister. 

“Don’t talk to any strangers!” Mom called. 

Very helpful. 

“Okay. One quick shot,” Dad said, returning with his camera raised to his 
eye. “Stand against the door. You look great, Drew. Are you Wonder Woman or 
something?” 

“Just a superhero,” I mumbled. “I’ve really got to go, Dad.” 



He steadied the camera over his eye. “How about a smile?” 

I gave him a toothy grin. 

He clicked the shutter. 

“Oh. Wait. Did it flash?” he asked. “I don’t think I had the flash on.” He 
examined the camera. 

“Dad—” I started. I thought about Walker, standing by himself on the 
corner. Walker hated to wait. I knew how tense he’d be. 

As tense as me. 

“Dad, I’ve got to meet my friends.” 

“If you see anyone suspicious, run away!” Mom called from the den. 

“Let’s try again, Elf.” Dad raised the camera again. “Smile.” 

He clicked the shutter. No flash. 

“Whoa—” He checked the camera again. 

“Dad, please—” I begged. 

“Oh, wow,” he murmured. “Would you believe it? No film.” He shook his 
head. “I thought I had film in here. I’ll go upstairs and get a roll. It will only take 
a second.” 

“Dad—!” I screamed. 

The doorbell rang. It startled us both. 

“Probably some trick-or-treaters,” Dad said. 

I leaped to the door and pulled it open. I squinted into the yellow porch 
light. A boy stood there all in black. He wore a black sweater and black pants. A 
black wool ski cap was pulled down over his forehead. He had black makeup 
covering his face. And he wore black gloves. 

“Cute costume,” Dad declared. “Get him a candy bar, Drew.” 

I groaned. “Dad, it’s not a trick-or-treater. It’s Walker.” I pushed open the 
storm door so that Walker could come in. 

“I thought you were going to meet me,” he said. 

Dad stared at Walker’s all-black costume. “What are you supposed to be?” 
he asked. 

“A dark and stormy night,” Walker replied. 

“Huh? Where’s the stormy part?” I asked. 

“Here,” Walker replied. He raised a black plastic water pistol and squirted 
me in the face. 

Dad burst out laughing. He thought that was a riot. He called Mom in from 
the den to take a look. 



“We’re never getting out of here,” I whispered to Walker. “We’re going to 
miss Tabby and Lee.” 

We had the night all planned out, down to the minute. But now the whole 
plan could be ruined. 

I had a knot in my stomach. I could feel it tightening. The cape suddenly 
felt as if it were choking me. 

Mom and Dad were admiring Walker’s costume. “A dark and stormy night! 
Very clever,” Mom said. “But how will anyone see you in the dark? You’d better 
be very careful crossing the street.” 

Mom had advice for everyone tonight. 

I couldn’t take it anymore. “We’ve got to go. ’Bye,” I said. I shoved Walker 
out the door and followed right behind him. 

Mom called out more warnings from the house. But I couldn’t hear her. I 
pulled Walker down the driveway, and we hurried toward the corner. That’s 
where we were supposed to meet Tabby and Lee. 

Our two victims. 

“You should have stayed on the corner,” I scolded Walker. “Maybe Tabby 
and Lee were here already and left.” 

“But you were so late,” Walker protested. “I thought maybe something was 
wrong.” 

My heart was thumping. The knot in my stomach grew even tighter. “Okay, 
okay,” I urged. “Let’s just calm down.” 

It was a clear, cold night. A light frost made the lawns silvery. Overhead, a 
sliver of moon rested near a cluster of bright stars. 

Most of the houses on the block had their lights on. I saw two groups of 
little trick-or-treaters across the street. They were all hurrying up to the same 
house. A dog barked excitedly in the house next door. 

I turned my eyes to the corner where we were supposed to meet Tabby and 
Lee. No one there. 

Walker and I stopped under the street light. I adjusted my cape. It was really 
choking me. I saw that I hadn’t cut it short enough. The bottom was soaked from 
dragging along the ground. 

“Where are they?” I demanded. 

“You know they’re always late,” Walker replied. 

He was right. Tabby and Lee loved to keep people waiting for them. 

“They will be here any second,” Walker said. 



A tall hedge ran along the corner yard. Walker started pacing back and forth 
from the hedge to the curb. His outfit was so black, when he stepped into the 
shadow of the hedge, he completely disappeared! 

“Could you stop pacing—?” I started. 

But my voice caught in my throat when I heard a cough. From the other 
side of the hedge. 

A low, gruff cough. 

Not a human cough. More like an animal growl. 

I turned and saw that Walker had heard it, too. He stopped pacing and 
stared at the hedge. 

I heard a scraping sound. The hedge appeared to shiver. 

“Wh-who’s back there?” I choked out. 

The hedge shook again. Shook and cracked. 

“Hey—who is it?” Walker cried. 

Silence. 

The hedge shook. Harder this time. 

“Is this a joke or something?” Walker demanded in a trembling voice. 

Another low animal growl. 

“Noooo—!” I cried out as two ugly creatures came snarling through the 
hedge. 

I saw only a blur of ragged fur. Open jaws. Saliva-covered teeth. 

Before I could move, one of the creatures leaped onto me, snarling and 
growling. It shoved me roughly down to the grass. And dug its fangs into my 
shoulder. 



14 


I let out a shrill wail of pain. 

I tried to scramble to my feet. But the snarling creature had me pinned to 
the ground. 

“Stop! Stop!” I struggled to squirm free as the creature tugged my cape 
over me, covering me like a blanket. 

“Hey —\” I heard Walker’s angry shout. But I couldn’t see what was 
happening to him. 

“Noooooo! Let me go!” I shrieked. 

With a frantic burst of energy, I reached up one hand—and swiped at the 
creature’s drooling face. 

To my shock, the whole face pulled off easily. 

A mask. I held a rubber mask in my hand. 

I stared up at a grinning face. 

It took me a few moments to recognize the boy. Todd Jeffrey. Yes. Todd 
Jeffrey, the high-school kid who had frightened us all at Lee’s party two years 
ago. 

“Todd,” I murmured. I frantically pulled the cape away from my face. 

“Gotcha! Gotcha good!” he whispered. He let go of me and stood up. 

“You creep!” I cried angrily. I tossed the rubber mask in his face. 

He caught it in one hand and laughed. “Drew, can’t you take a joke?” 

“Huh? A joke? A joke?” I screamed. 

I climbed to my feet and furiously began brushing myself off. My cape was 
totally tangled and covered with wet brown leaves. 

Walker had been wrestling with the other creature. The guy pulled off his 
mask. Of course it was Joe, Todd’s disgusting friend. 

“Hope we didn’t scare you!” he teased. He and Todd laughed like hyenas. 
They fell all over each other, slapping high fives and low fives. 

Before I could tell them what jerks they were, I heard more laughter. To my 
surprise, Tabby and Lee came stepping out from behind the hedge. And all four 
of them enjoyed a good laugh together. 

“Grrrrrrr!” I uttered a furious growl. At that moment, I wished I really were 
a superhero. I wanted to plow my superfists into their laughing faces. 



Or maybe spread my cape and fly away—far away, so I wouldn’t have to 
see any of them anymore. 

“Happy Halloween, Drew!” Tabby called smugly. 

“Happy Halloween!” Tabby and Lee repeated in unison, grinning their 
disgusting grins. 

“How long were you and Lee standing back there?” I demanded angrily. 

“Long enough!” Lee snickered. He and Tabby both burst out laughing 
again. 

“We were standing back there the whole time,” Tabby declared. “I love 
Halloween—don’t you?” 

I growled under my breath. But I didn’t say anything. 

Keep cool, Drew, I instructed myself. Tabby and Lee and their two high- 
school buddies played a little joke on you. 

But they won’t have the last laugh. 

When the night is over, I told myself, Walker and I will be the ones who are 
laughing. 

When Shane and Shana arrive, we are going to terrify them. Truly terrify 
them. 

Todd and Joe had pulled their monster masks back on. They tilted back 
their heads and howled like wolves. Todd’s mask was really gross. It had rubber 
saliva dripping over the long, pointy fangs. 

“They’re not coming trick-or-treating with us—are they?” I asked Tabby. 

Tabby shook her head. She adjusted the tiara on top of her blond hair. 

“No way!” Todd replied from behind the ugly mask. “Joe and I are too old 
to trick-or-treat. Especially with you crybabies.” 

“Then why are you wearing those monster costumes?” Walker demanded. 

“Just to scare kids,” Joe replied. He and Todd laughed again, loud, cruel 
laughs. 

Joe grabbed my mask and pulled it down to my chin. Todd rubbed the back 
of his hand over Walker’s cheek, smearing the black makeup. Then they ran off 
to find some other victims. 

What creeps. 

I was glad to see them go. I stood watching them, making sure they didn’t 
change their minds and come back. 

“Nice guys,” Lee said. He set his orange and black trick-or-treat bag down 
on the grass. Then he adjusted his bee antennas. 



I heard kids laughing across the street. I turned and saw a group of four kids 
—all monsters and goblins—running up the driveway to a house. 

“Let’s get going,” Tabby said. “It’s kind of cold.” 

“Aren’t Shane and Shana supposed to meet us?” Lee asked. 

“Yeah. They’ll catch up to us,” I said. 

We crossed the street and started toward the first house, a tall, brightly lit 
brick house with a smiling pumpkin cutout in the front window. 

As we made our way up the gravel driveway, I glanced at my watch. 

And gasped. Nearly eight-fifteen. 

Shane and Shana were supposed to meet us on the corner at eight. Where 
were they? They were never late. Never. I swallowed hard. 

Was this Halloween about to be ruined, too? Had something gone wrong? 



15 


We stepped up onto the front stoop and peered through the glass storm door. A 
big orange cat with bright blue eyes stared back at us from the other side of the 
door. 

I rang the doorbell. 

A few seconds later, a smiling young woman in jeans and a yellow 
turtleneck came hurrying to the door. She carried a basket of Snickers bars and 
Milky Ways. 

“You all look great,” she declared, dropping a candy bar in each bag. 

“Drew—hold up your bag!” Tabby ordered shrilly. 

“Oh. Sorry.” I was still worrying about Shane and Shana. I held up my bag 
for the woman. The cat narrowed its amazing blue eyes at me. 

“Are you supposed to be a princess?” the woman asked Tabby. 

“No. A ballerina,” Tabby replied. 

“And you’re a lump of coal?” the woman asked Walker. 

“Something like that,” Walker muttered. He didn’t do his dark-and-stormy- 
night routine. I guessed he was worried about Shane and Shana, too. 

“Have fun,” the woman said. She pulled the storm door shut. 

The four of us jumped off her stoop and started across the frost-covered 
grass to the next yard. When I glanced back to the door, I saw the cat still staring 
out at us. 

The next house was dark. So we crossed the lawn to the house next door to 
it. A group of kids was already on the front stoop, shouting, “Trick or treat! Trick 
or treat!” 

“Where are they?” I whispered to Walker. 

He shrugged. 

“If they don’t show up...” I started. But I saw Tabby watching me. So I 
didn’t finish my sentence. 

We waited for the kids to leave, then climbed up to the stoop. Two little 
kids—probably three or four years old—were handing out little bags of candy 
corn to everyone. 

They laughed at Lee’s bee costume. They wanted to feel the antennas. The 
little boy asked Lee where his stinger was. 



“I stuck it in someone,” Lee told him. 

They stared hard at Walker’s all-black outfit. I think it kind of frightened 
them. “Are you supposed to be a monster?” the little girl asked Walker timidly. 

“No. I’m a lump of coal,” Walker told her. 

She nodded seriously. 

We hurried away and did three more houses to the end of the block. I saw 
two kids that I babysit for. They were in matching robot costumes. I stopped to 
talk with them for a minute. 

Then I had to run to catch up to the others. They had crossed the street and 
had started doing the houses on the other side. 

A strong gust of wind fluttered my cape. I shivered—and glanced nervously 
at my watch again. 

Where were they? Where were Shane and Shana? 

The whole plan depended on them.... 

“Wow! Pretty good haul so far!” Lee declared. He held his bag open, 
studying the contents as we crossed the street. 

“Did you get any Kit Kats?” Tabby demanded. “I’ll trade anyone for Kit 
Kats.” 

“Only one person gave out apples,” Lee said, making a disgusted face. He 
reached into his bag and pulled out the apple. Then he heaved it as hard as he 
could across the yard. 

The apple hit a tree trunk with a loud thunk. Then it bounced into the next 
driveway. 

“Why do people give out apples?” Lee grumbled. “Don’t they know we 
only want candy?” 

“Some people are just cheap,” Tabby said. She pulled out her apple and 
dropped it in the grass. Then she kicked it with the toe of her ballet slipper. 

They both really deserve what they’re going to get, I thought. They’re both 
really jerks. 

But where are Shane and Shana? 

We trick-or-treated our way down the block. It was getting pretty late, and 
there were fewer little kids out. 

The streetlight near the corner was broken. We stepped into a patch of deep 
shadow. 

One of Lee’s antennas kept slipping off. He slid it back into place for the 
tenth time. 



As we neared the corner, a tall tree blocked the moonlight, and it grew even 
darker. 

“Oh—!” I let out a cry as two figures leaped out at us from behind the tree. 

I thought that Todd and Joe had returned. 

But I quickly saw that it wasn’t those guys. 

In a gray blur, the two figures turned their backs on us, blocking our way. 
They wore dark robes that flowed straight down to the ground. And over their 
heads... 

Over their heads... 

They wore pumpkins! 

Large, round pumpkins, perfectly balanced on their shoulders. 

“Whoa—!” Walker let out a startled cry. He backed up and stumbled into 
me. 

Tabby and Lee gaped in surprise. 

But the most horrifying surprise was yet to come. 

As they slowly turned to face us, their jack-o’-lantern faces came into view. 

Eerie, jagged grins cut into their pumpkin heads. 

Flashing triangle eyes. 

Lit by flames! 

Bright orange and yellow flames danced inside their heads! 

And as the pumpkin heads turned their fiery, ragged grins on us, Walker and 
I opened our mouths and screamed in terror. 



16 


Our screams echoed down the block. 

The fire flashed in the pumpkin heads’ eyes. 

I turned to Tabby and Lee. The light from the fiery jack-o’-lantern faces 
flickered over their faces. They stood calmly, staring at the grinning pumpkin 
heads. 

Tabby turned to me. “Is this your idea of a joke? Were you trying to scare 

us?” 

“We know it’s Shane and Shana,” Lee said. He tugged at one of the dark, 
loose, flowing costumes. “Hey, Shane—how’s it going?” 

The two pumpkin heads remained silent. 

“How did you get the fire to work? Do you have candles in there?” Tabby 
demanded. “How can you see?” 

The pumpkin heads grinned back in silence. A lick of fire darted out from 
one of the jagged mouths. 

I shivered. These costumes were too good. I could hear the flames hiss 
inside the big orange heads. The costumes were dark green, like pumpkin vines. 

Why aren’t Tabby and Lee frightened? I wondered. 

I expected Shane and Shana to appear in something frightening. But I didn’t 
expect anything as good as these fiery jack-o’-lantern heads. 

The costumes were great. But I felt so disappointed. Tabby and Lee were 
definitely not frightened. 

This Halloween is going to be a disaster—like the others, I thought. 

I stepped up beside Walker. I couldn’t see his expression under all that 
black makeup. 

“How do they do the fire?” he whispered. “It’s really awesome!” 

I nodded. “But it didn’t scare Tabby and Lee,” I whispered back. 

“It’s early,” Walker whispered. “Shane and Shana have just started.” 

My cape had become tangled around my legs. I tugged it free and tossed it 
behind me. 

The two pumpkin heads still hadn’t said a word. 

Tabby picked up her trick-or-treat bag and turned to me. “You’ll have to do 
better than this if you want to scare Lee and me,” she said with a sneer. 



“We’re not scaredy-cats like you two,” Lee boasted. 

Flames darted out of the pumpkin heads’ eyes. They both tilted their big 
heads as they stared at Tabby and Lee. 

How do they do that? I wondered. How do they control the flames? Do they 
have some kind of remote control? 

“Well, are we going to stand here and freeze? Or are we going to trick-or- 
treat?” Tabby demanded. 

“Let’s do your block,” I suggested to her. 

Tabby started to reply—but a hiss of fire from the nearest pumpkin head 
made her stop. 

“Let’s go somewhere else,” the jack-o’-lantern said from somewhere inside 
the pumpkin head. His voice came out in a hoarse crackle. Too harsh to be a 
whisper. A dry, choked sound. 

“Somewhere else, ” his partner echoed. Her voice also came out in a hoarse 
crackle. Like dry, dead leaves being crinkled together. 

“Excuse me?” Lee cried. 

“We know a better neighborhood,” the first pumpkin head crackled. The 
jagged mouth, cut through the thick pumpkin flesh, didn’t move. The voice 
hissed from inside. The orange and yellow flames tossed in rhythm to the words. 

“We know a better neighborhood. ” 

“A neighborhood you won’t forget. ” 

Tabby laughed. She rolled her eyes. “Oh, wow. Scary voices!” she said 
sarcastically. 

“Oooh, I’m shaking! I’m shaking!” Lee teased. 

He and Tabby laughed together. 

“Give us a break, guys,” Tabby said to the pumpkin heads. “Your costumes 
are pretty good. But they didn’t scare us. So lose the creepy voices, okay?” 

“Yeah,” Lee agreed. “Let’s go do some houses. It’s getting late.” 

“Follow ussss, ” one of the pumpkin heads hissed. 

“Follow us to a new neighborhood. A better neighborhood. ” 

They led the way down the street. Their big heads bounced on their 
shoulders as they walked. The fire flickered from their heads, casting a glow like 
lighted torches. 

“What are they doing?” Walker whispered in my ear. “This isn’t in the plan. 
Where are they taking us?” 

I didn’t know. 



17 


We walked three blocks, heading away from our houses. We passed a row of big 
stone houses set back on wide lawns behind tall hedges. The next block had an 
empty lot where someone had started to build a house, and then stopped. 

The two pumpkin heads walked quickly, taking long strides. Their heads 
bounced on their shoulders. They kept their fiery faces straight ahead and didn’t 
glance back at us. 

“Where are we going?” Lee demanded, jogging to catch up to them. He 
tugged at one of their shoulders. “You’re passing a lot of good houses across the 
street.” 

The jack-o’-lantern creature didn’t slow down. “Let’s try a new 
neighborhood, ” he crackled. 

“Yessssss,” his partner hissed. “A new neighborhood. A better 
neighborhood. You’ll see.” 

They led us past the empty lot. Past a row of small, dark houses. 

“Where are we going?” Walker whispered. He motioned to Shane and 
Shana. “What is their problem? Why are they doing this? They’re starting to 
scare me\” 

“I’m sure they know what they’re doing,” I whispered back. 

I gazed around the block. I didn’t see many other trick-or-treaters. It was 
getting late, and most of the little kids had already gone home. 

In the next driveway, two tall kids—a gorilla and a chubby clown—were 
pawing through their trick-or-treat bags. They had their heads lowered to the 
bags. We passed by them, and they didn’t even look up. 

“Hey—we’re missing a lot of good houses!” Lee protested. He pointed to a 
brick house on the corner. “Can we stop there? Those people always give out 
handfuls of candy bars. Really. Handfuls!” 

The pumpkin heads ignored him and kept walking. 

“Hey—whoa! Stop!” Tabby demanded. 

She and Lee both trotted up in front of the pumpkin heads. 

“Stop! Come on—whoa!” 

“A new neighborhood, ” one of them croaked. 

“Let’s try a new neighborhood,” the other one echoed. 



“A better neighborhood. ” 

A chill ran down my back. Shane and Shana were acting so weird. 

I tugged my cape off a clump of weeds. The air suddenly felt colder, and 
damp. I wrapped the cape around me. 

Up ahead, Lee fiddled with his bee antenna. I saw that Tabby’s ballet 
slippers were soaked with mud. 

We followed the pumpkin heads across the street. And then they stepped off 
the sidewalk and started into a dark woods. 

Walker hurried up beside me. Even through his heavy makeup, I could see 
the worried expression on his face. “Why are they taking us into the woods?” he 
whispered. 

I shrugged. “I guess they’re getting ready to scare Tabby and Lee.” 

Twigs and dead leaves crackled under our shoes as we made our way 
between the trees. 

A frightening thought flashed into my mind. I suddenly pictured the four fat 
people who had disappeared. 

Four people. Vanished into thin air. Never seen again. 

I remembered all of my mother’s warnings. I remembered how she told us 
to stay where there were a lot of kids and a lot of bright lights. 

I remembered how she didn’t even want me to go trick-or-treating tonight. 

This is wrong, I realized. 

Mom’s advice was smart. We shouldn’t be walking through the woods 
tonight, I knew. 

We shouldn’t be away from the street, away from the brightly lit houses. 

We shouldn’t go off by ourselves like this in the dark, creepy woods. 

“A new neighborhood, ” a pumpkin head crackled from up ahead. 

“Just past these woods,” the other one whispered. “A really good 
neighborhood. You’ll see.” 

The light from inside their heads flickered over the dark tangles of bare 
trees and tall weeds. 

My heart began to thud. I hurried to keep up with the others. 

Shane and Shana are good friends, I told myself. 

I’m sure they know where they’re going. 

But this isn’t what we planned. This isn’t what we planned at all. 

Why do I have such a bad feeling about this? 



18 


“Shane! Shana! Give us a break!” Tabby complained shrilly. “Look at me! Look 
at my ballerina skirt!” 

She held up the front of the skirt. Even in the dim light, I could see the mud 
stain on the front. 

“We have to get out of these woods!” Tabby wailed angrily. 

“Yeah. It’s too dark. And we’re wasting too much time,” Lee agreed. 

His trick-or-treat bag got caught on a low tree limb. He tugged it hard to 
pull it loose. 

Shane and Shana ignored the complaints. The big, fiery pumpkins bouncing 
on their shoulders, they made their way steadily and quickly through the 
darkness of the woods. 

A few minutes later, we stepped out onto a narrow street. Seeing the bright 
street lights and rows of little houses, we all let out a happy cheer. 

“Now we can trick-or-treat, ” one of the pumpkin heads croaked. 

I turned my eyes up and down the street. I saw house after house, all small, 
all on tiny lawns. Most of them had lights on in front. Many of them were 
decorated for Halloween. 

The houses stretched for blocks. Two rows of brightly lit little houses—as 
far as I could see. 

“This is an awesome neighborhood for trick-or-treating!” I declared, 
starting to feel a lot better. A lot less frightened. 

“Excellent!” Lee agreed. “We’ll clean up here!” 

“Where are we?” Walker demanded. “How come I’ve never seen this 
neighborhood before?” 

No one answered him. We were all too eager to get started. 

I pulled some wet leaves off my cape and straightened my mask. Tromping 
through the woods had messed all of us up. We took a few seconds to get our 
costumes in better shape. 

Then the six of us hurried up to the first house. 

A young woman carrying a baby in one arm came to the door. She dropped 
miniature candy bars into our bags. The baby stared at the flaming pumpkin 
heads and smiled. 



At the next house, an elderly couple took forever getting to the door. “Trick 
or treat!” we shouted at the top of our lungs. They raised their hands to their 
ears. I guess they couldn’t stand the noise. 

Tm sorry. But we don’t have any candy,” the old woman said. She 
dropped nickels into our bags. A nickel per bag. 

We hurried across the small yard to the next house. Two girls, about seven 
or eight, greeted us at the door. “Awesome costumes!” one of them said to Shane 
and Shana. They gave us little bags of M&M’s. 

“This is cool!” Lee declared as we hurried to the next house. 

“The houses are so close together,” Tabby added. “We can do a hundred 
houses in no time!” 

“Why didn’t we ever come here before?” Walker asked. 

“Trick or treat!” we screamed as we rang the doorbell on the next house. 

A teenaged boy with long blond hair and an earring in one ear answered the 
door. He snickered at our costumes. “Cool,” he muttered. Then he dropped 
packages of candy corn into our bags. 

On to the next house. And the next and the next. 

We did the next block, stopping at every house. Then we covered two more 
blocks. The little houses seemed to stretch on forever. 

My trick-or-treat bag was nearly full. We stopped at the corner because 
Walker’s shoe had come untied. While he bent down to tie it, we all stopped to 
catch our breath. 

“Hurry up!” a pumpkin urged Walker. Flames leaped angrily from his 
eyeholes. 

“Yesssss, hurry,” the other one hissed. “No time to wasssssste. ” 

“Give me a break,” Walker murmured. “I have a knot.” 

As he struggled with his shoe, the two pumpkin heads bobbed and squirmed 
impatiently. 

Finally, Walker climbed to his feet and picked up his bulging trick-or-treat 
bag. The pumpkin heads were already leading the way to the next block of 
houses. 

“I’m getting a little tired,” I heard Lee whisper to Tabby. “What time is it?” 

“My bag is nearly full,” Tabby replied. With a groan, she shifted the heavy 
bag to her other hand. 

“Hurry, ” a pumpkin head insisted. “Lots more houses to do. ” 

“Lotssssss, ” the other one hissed. 



We did two more blocks. Both sides of the street. About twenty houses. 

My bag was filled to the top. I had to carry it in both hands. 

Walker’s shoelace had come undone again. When he bent to tie it, it ripped 
in his hand. “Now what am I going to do?” he muttered. 

“Hurry, ” a pumpkin head insisted. 

“More houses. ” 

“I’m getting tired,” Tabby complained, loud enough for everyone to hear 
this time. 

“Me, too,” Lee agreed. “And this trick-or-treat bag is getting heavy.” 

“Stupid shoelace,” Walker muttered, still bent over his shoe. 

“I guess it is getting pretty late,” I said, gazing around. “I don’t see any 
other trick-or-treaters. I think they’ve all gone home.” 

I pulled off my cape. It was all tangled, and it was starting to choke me. I 
balled it up and tucked it under my arm. 

“More houses, ” one of the pumpkin heads whispered. 

“Hurry. Lots more to do, ” the other one insisted in her dry, crackling voice. 
The yellow flames danced inside her head. 

“But we want to quit!” Lee whined. 

“Yes. We’re done,” Tabby agreed shrilly. 

“You can’t quit!” a pumpkin head snapped. 

“Huh?” Lee’s mouth dropped open. 

“Keep going! You can’t quit!” the pumpkin head insisted. 

They both appeared to float up, to rise up over us. The fires raged in their 
triangle eyes. The heads floated up over the dark, caped bodies. 

“You can’t quit! You can’t EVER quit! ” 



19 


“Ha-ha. Very funny.” Tabby rolled her eyes. 

But I saw Lee step back in fear. His knees seemed to buckle, and he nearly 
dropped his trick-or-treat bag. 

“Another block, ” a pumpkin head insisted. 

“Another block. And then another. ” 

“Whoa. Wait a minute!” Tabby protested. “You can’t boss us around like 
that. I’m going home.” 

She turned and started to walk away. But the two pumpkin heads moved 
quickly to block her path. 

“Let me go!” Tabby protested. 

She darted sharply to the right. But the big pumpkin creatures floated with 
her. Their fiery grins appeared to grow wider. Brighter. 

The two of them began circling us, floating silently. They swirled around 
us, faster and faster—until it looked as if we were surrounded by flames. 

A wall of leaping flames all around us! 

“You will obey!” came the crackling command. 

The flames pushed us from behind. Forced us forward. 

We had no choice but to obey them. We were prisoners. Prisoners of their 

fire. 

An old man was standing at the door to the first house. He grinned at us as 
we stepped onto his front stoop. “You kids are out kind of late—aren’t you?” he 
asked. 

“Kind of,” I replied. 

He dropped packages of Chuckles into our bags. 

“Hurry,” a pumpkin head urged as we crossed the wet grass to the next 
house. “Hurry!” 

Lee’s trick-or-treat bag was so heavy, he dragged it along the ground. I 
carried mine in both hands. Tabby complained to herself, muttering and shaking 
her head. 

We did both sides of the block. I didn’t see any other kids out. No cars came 
by. Some of the houses were turning out their lights. 

“Hurry! ” a pumpkin head insisted. 



“Lots more houses. Lots more blocks. ” 

“No way!” Lee cried. 

“No way!” Tabby repeated. She tried to sound strong. But I heard a tremble 
in her voice. 

The jack-o’-lantern faces loomed over us once again. The fiery eyes stared 
out at us. 

“Hurry. You can’t stop now! You CAN’T! ” 

“But it’s too late!” I protested. 

“And my shoe keeps coming off,” Walker chimed in. 

“We don’t want to trick-or-treat anymore,” Tabby told them shrilly. 

“You can’t stop now! Hurry! ” 

“Lots more houses. This is the BEST neighborhood!” 

“No way!” Tabby and Lee repeated together. They started to chant. “No 
way! No way! No way!” 

“Our bags are full,” I said. 

“Mine is starting to tear,” Walker complained. 

“No way! No way!” Tabby and Lee chanted. 

The two jack-o’-lanterns began to swirl around us again, circling faster and 
faster, rebuilding the wall of flames. “You mussssst not ssssstop!” one of them 
hissed. 

“You musssst keep going!” 

They swirled closer. So close I could feel the scorching heat of their flames. 

And as they swirled, they began to hiss, like snakes about to strike. 

The hissing grew louder, louder—until it sounded as if we were surrounded 
by snakes! 

My heavy trick-or-treat bag fell from my hands. “Stop—!” I screamed up at 
them. “Stop it! You’re not Shane and Shana!” 

Fire leaped from their eyes. Their hisses became a high wail. 

“You’re not Shane and Shana!” I shrieked. “Who are you?” 



20 


They swirled to a stop. Bright flames licked out of their grinning mouths. Their 
shrill wails bounced off the bare trees, cutting through the heavy night silence. 

“Who are you?” I demanded again, my voice trembling. My whole body 
shook. I suddenly felt as if the cold of the night had seeped inside me. 

“Who are you? Have you done something to our friends?” 

No reply. 

I turned to Walker. The light of the flames flickered over his face. Through 
his black makeup, I could see his frightened expression. 

I swallowed hard and turned to Tabby and Lee. They were both sneering 
and shaking their heads. 

“Is this your idea of a dumb Halloween joke?” Tabby demanded. She rolled 
her eyes. “Wow. Did you really think Lee and I would fall for this?” 

“Ooh—I’m scared! I’m scared!” Lee cried sarcastically. He made his knees 
knock together. “Look—I’m shaking like a leaf!” 

He and Tabby let out loud laughs. 

“These are real clever costumes. Great fire effects. But we know it’s Shane 
and Shana,” Lee declared. “No way you’re going to scare us, Drew.” 

“No way,” Tabby repeated. “Look—!” 

She and Lee reached out their hands. They each grabbed a pumpkin head— 
and tugged. 

“Whoa!” 

They pulled the fiery pumpkin heads off the creatures’ shoulders. 

And then all four of us screamed—because the two costumed figures had 
no heads underneath! 



21 


Our screams rose up shrilly, cutting through the night air like wailing sirens. 

The pumpkin head fell from Tabby’s hand and bounced heavily on the 
ground. Bright orange flames shot out of its eyes and mouth. 

Lee still gripped the other pumpkin head between his hands. But he 
dropped it when the jagged mouth began to move. 

The fiery heads grinned up at us from the grass. 

“Ohhh.” I uttered a low moan of terror and staggered back. I wanted to run 
away to run as fast as I could and not look back. 

But I couldn’t take my eyes off the two heads, grinning up at us from the 
wet grass. 

As I stared, my heart pounded and my legs began to shake. Someone 
grabbed my arm. 

“Walker!” 

He held on to me. His hand was as cold as ice. 

With his other hand, he pointed to the two headless bodies. 

They stood in their dark, flowing costumes. They hadn’t moved. The spot 
between their shoulders where their heads had rested was flat and smooth. 

As if the pumpkin heads had been balanced there. But never attached. 

Never attached. 

Tabby and Lee huddled together beside me. Tabby’s tiara was missing. Her 
hair had come unpinned. It fell in wet tangles over her face. 

Lee’s trick-or-treat bag had toppled onto its side. A pile of candy had spilled 
over the grass, inches away from one of the pumpkin heads. 

The flames inside the heads danced and flickered. And then the jagged 
mouths began to move. 

The smiles grew wider. The triangle eyes narrowed. 

“Hee hee hee heeeeee. ” 

An ugly laugh escaped their mouths. An evil, dry sound. More like a throat 
clearing, more like a cough than a laugh. 

“Hee hee heeeeeeeee. ” 

“Noooo!” I moaned. Beside me, I heard Walker gasp. 



Lee swallowed hard. Tabby was holding on to the sleeve of his bee costume 
with both hands. 

She pulled him back until they were standing behind Walker and me. 

“Hee hee heeeeeeeee. ” 

The heads laughed together, flames flickering inside them. 

Their two bodies moved quickly. They reached out long arms and grabbed 
the heads up from the grass. 

I expected them to place the heads back on their shoulders. But they didn’t. 
They held the heads in front of their chests. 

“Hee heeeeeee. ” 

Another dry laugh. The pumpkin mouths twisted on the dark, round faces. 
The eyes stared blankly at us, bright orange, then shadowy, flickering with the 
flames. 

I realized I was squeezing Walker’s arm. He didn’t even seem to notice. 

I let go. And took a deep breath. 

“Who are you?” I called to the two creatures. My voice came out high and 
tiny. “Who are you? And what do you want?” 

“Hee heee heeeee. ” They laughed their ugly laughs again. 



22 


“Who are you?” I choked out again, shouting over their dry, crackling laughter. 
“Where are Shane and Shana? Where are our friends?” 

Flames hissed from the two heads. Their ragged orange grins grew wider. 

“Drew—let’s try one more time to run away,” Walker whispered. “Maybe if 
we catch them by surprise...” 

We both spun around and started to run. Tabby and Lee came stumbling 
after us. 

My legs felt so wobbly and weak, I didn’t think I could run. My heart 
pounded so hard, I struggled to breathe. 

“Run!” Walker cried breathlessly, pulling my arm. “Drew—faster!” 

We didn’t get far. 

Uttering their shrill, frightening hisses, the creatures whirled around us once 
again. Trapping us. Holding us prisoner inside their circle of flames. 

No way we could run away. No way we could escape from them. 

Peering over the flying flames, I searched desperately up and down the 
street. 

No one in sight. Nothing moved. No cars. No people. Not even a dog or a 
cat. 

Holding their heads at their waists, the two creatures stepped up to us. They 
stood over us menacingly, raising the red, glowing heads high above their bare 
shoulders. 

“More houses. More houses . ” The jack-o’-lantern lips pushed out the 
words. The red eyes stared down at us. 

“More houses. More houses. ” 

“You cannot stop. You must keep on trick-or-treating!” 

“Pick up your bags. Pick them up — now! ” one of them growled. Her head 
held up between two hands, she gazed down at us, her jagged lips forming an 
evil sneer. 

“We—we don’t want to trick-or-treat!” Lee wailed, holding onto Tabby. 

“We want to go home!” Tabby cried. 

“More houses. More houses. More houses. ” The pumpkin heads continued 
their hissing chant. 



They bumped us together. They bumped and pushed us. 

We had no choice. Wearily, we picked up our trick-or-treat bags from where 
they had fallen on the grass. 

They moved behind us, chanting, chanting in their low, dry whispers. 
“More houses. More houses. ” 

They pushed us to the first house on the block. They pushed us onto the 
front stoop. Then they hovered close behind. 

“How—how long do we have to trick-or-treat?” Tabby demanded. 

The pumpkin heads grinned together. “Forever! ” they declared. 



23 


A woman came to the door and dropped packages of Hershey’s kisses into our 
bags. “You kids are out awfully late,” she said. “Do you live around here?” 

“No,” I replied. “We don’t really know where we are. We’re in a strange 
neighborhood, and we’re being forced to trick-or-treat by two headless pumpkin 
creatures. And they say they’re going to make us trick-or-treat forever. Help us 
—please! You’ve got to help us!” 

“Ha-ha! That’s good!” the woman laughed. “That’s very funny. You have a 
very good imagination.” She closed the door before I could get out another 
word. 

At the next house, we didn’t even bother to ask for help. We knew no one 
would believe us. 

“Your bags are so full!” the woman exclaimed. “You must have been trick- 
or-treating for hours! ” 

“We... we like candy a lot,” Walker replied wearily. 

I glanced back at the pumpkin heads. They were motioning impatiently. 
They wanted us to move on to the next house. 

We said good-bye to the woman and made our way across the front yard. 
Our trick-or-treat bags were heavy, so we dragged them along the grass. 

As we headed to the next driveway, Tabby hurried up beside me. “What are 
we going to do?” she whispered in my ear. “How are we going to get away from 
these... these monsters ?” 

I shrugged. I didn’t know how to answer her. 

“I’m so scared,” Tabby confessed. “You don’t think these pumpkin 
creatures really plan to make us trick-or-treat forever —do you? What do they 
really want? Why are they doing this to us?” 

“I don’t know,” I said, swallowing hard. I could see that Tabby was about to 
cry. 

Lee was walking with his head down. He dragged his bulging trick-or-treat 
bag behind him. He was shaking his head, muttering to himself. 

We stepped up to the next porch and rang the bell. A middle-aged man in 
bright yellow pajamas opened the door. “Trick or treat!” we cried wearily. 

He dropped little Tootsie Rolls into our bags. “Very late,” he muttered. “Do 



your parents know you’re still out?” 

We dragged on to the next house. And the next. 

I kept waiting for a chance to escape. But the two creatures never let us out 
of their sight. They stayed right with us, keeping in the shadows. Their eyes 
glowed red from the deepening fire inside their heads. 

“More houses, ” they chanted, forcing us to cross the street and do the long 
row of houses on the other side. 

“More houses. ” 

“I’m so scared,” Tabby repeated to me in a trembling whisper. “So is Lee. 
We’re so scared, we feel sick.” 

I started to tell her I felt the same way. 

But we both gasped when we saw someone walking along the street. 

A man in a blue uniform! 

At first I thought he was a policeman. But as he stepped under a streetlight, 
I saw that he wore a blue work uniform. He had a blue baseball cap on his head. 
He carried a large black lunch box in one hand. 

He must be coming home from work, I told myself. He was whistling softly 
to himself, walking with his head down. I don’t think he saw us. 

Tabby changed that. “Helllllp!” she screamed. “Sir—please! Help us!” 

The man raised his head, startled. He squinted at us. 

Tabby began running across the grass to him. The rest of us followed, 
dragging our heavy trick-or-treat bags. 

“Help us—please!” Tabby pleaded shrilly. “You’ve got to save us!” 

The four of us hurtled breathlessly into the street. We surrounded the 
startled man. He narrowed his eyes at us and scratched his brown, curly hair. 

“What’s wrong, kids? Are you lost?” he asked. 

“Monsters!” Lee exploded. “Headless jack-o’-lantern monsters! They’ve 
captured us! They’re forcing us to trick-or-treat!” 

The man started to laugh. 

“No—it’s true!” Tabby insisted. “You’ve got to believe us! You’ve got to 
help us!” 

“Hurry!” Lee cried. 

The man scratched his hair again. He squinted at us hard, studying our 
faces. 

“Hurry! Please hurry!” Lee wailed. 

I stared back at the startled man. 



Would he help us? 



24 


“You’ve got to help us!” Lee pleaded. 

“Okay. I’ll go along with the joke,” the man said, rolling his eyes. “Where 
are your monsters?” 

“There!” I cried. 

We all turned back to the front yard. 

No one there. The pumpkin heads were gone. 

Disappeared. 

Tabby gasped. Lee’s mouth dropped open. 

“Where did they go?” Walker murmured. 

“They were standing right there!” Tabby insisted. “Both of them. Holding 
their heads in their hands! Really!” 

The man let out a long sigh. “You kids have a good Halloween,” he said 
wearily. “But give me a break, okay? I just got off work, and I’m beat.” 

He shifted his black lunch box to the other hand. Then we watched him 
make his way up the driveway. He disappeared around the back of the house. 

“Let’s get out of here!” Lee cried. 

But before we could run, the two pumpkin heads leaped out from behind a 
low hedge. The red flames hissed inside their heads. Their jagged mouths were 
turned down in angry snarls. 

“More houses,” they insisted, rasping the words together. “More houses. 
You can ’t stop trick-or-treating. ” 

“But we’re so tired!” Tabby protested. Her voice cracked. Again, I saw 
tears wetting her eyes. 

“Let us go—please!” Lee begged. 

“More houses. More!” 

“You can never stop! NEVER!” 

“I can’t!” Lee cried. “My bag is full. Look!” He held out the bulging trick- 
or-treat bag to the pumpkin heads. Candy bars spilled over the top. 

“Mine is full, too!” Walker declared. “It’s filled to the top. I can’t squeeze 
another piece of candy corn in it!” 

“We have to go home!” Tabby cried. “Our bags are totally full.” 



“That’s no problem,” one of the pumpkin heads replied. 

“No problem?” Tabby wailed. “No problem?” 

“Start eating, ” the pumpkin head ordered. 

“Huh?” We all gasped. 

“Start eating, ” he insisted. “Start eating. ” 

“Hey—no way!” Lee protested. “We’re not going to stand here and—” 

The creatures appeared to rise up. Bright yellow flames shot out from their 
eyes. A roar of hot wind escaped their jagged, snarling mouths. The wind burned 
my face. 

We all knew what would happen if we refused to do as they said. We’d end 
up inside the flames. 

Lee grabbed a chocolate bar from the top of his trick-or-treat bag. He tore 
off the wrapper with a trembling hand. And he shoved the candy into his mouth. 

We all started to eat candy. We had no choice. 

I shoved a Hershey bar into my mouth and started to chew. I couldn’t even 
taste it. A big gob stuck to my teeth. But I shoved in more and kept chewing. 

“Faster! Faster! ” the pumpkin heads ordered. 

“Please—!” Tabby begged, with a mouthful of red licorice. “We can’t—” 

“Faster! Eat! Eat! ” 

I shoved an entire bag of candy corn into my mouth and struggled to chew. 
I saw Walker pawing through his bag, looking for something he could eat 
quickly. 

“Faster! Eat! ” the fiery heads demanded, floating over us. “Eat! Eat! ” 

Lee choked down his fourth Musketeer bar. He grabbed a Milky Way and 
started to unwrap it. 

“I—I’m going to be sick!” Tabby declared. 

“Faster! Faster! ” came the raspy command. 

“No. Really. I feel sick!” she cried. 

“Eat more! Eat — faster! ” 

Lee started to choke. A gob of pink taffy shot out of his mouth. Tabby 
slapped him on the back until he stopped coughing. 

“More! Faster!” the pumpkin heads ordered. 

“I—I can’t!” Lee cried in a hoarse whisper. 

The creatures leaned over him, angry flames shooting from their eyes. 

Lee grabbed a Crunch bar, tore off the wrapper, and bit into it. 

All four of us huddled there on the curb, gobbling down candy. Chewing as 



fast as we could. Forcing it down, then shoving in some more. 
Trembling. Frightened. Feeling sick. 

We had no idea that the biggest horror was still to come. 



25 


“I... can’t... eat... any more,” Tabby choked out. 

We had been stuffing ourselves with candy for several minutes. Tabby had 
chocolate running down her chin. And I saw chocolate stuck in the tangles of her 
blond hair. 

Lee was bent over on the grass. He held his stomach and groaned. “I don’t 
feel so hot,” he murmured. He let out a long, loud burp. And groaned again. 

“I never want to see another candy bar in my life,” Walker whispered to me. 

I tried to reply. But my mouth was full. 

“More houses /” one of the pumpkin heads ordered. 

“More houses! More trick-or-treating!” 

“No—please!” Tabby begged. 

Bent over on the grass, Lee let out another long burp. 

“It’s almost midnight!” Tabby protested. “We have to go home!” 

“There are many houses to go,” a pumpkin head told her, narrowing its 
fiery eyes. “Houses forever. Trick-or-treat forever! ” 

“But we feel sick!” Lee moaned, holding his stomach. “We can’t do any 
more houses tonight!” 

“Everyone has gone to sleep,” Walker told the pumpkin heads. “No one will 
answer the door this late.” 

“They WILL in this neighborhood!” the pumpkin head replied. 

“No problem in THIS neighborhood,” the other creature agreed. “In this 
neighborhood, you can trick-or-treat FOREVER! ” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

I knew it was no use. The fiery creatures were going to force us to keep 
going. They weren’t going to listen to our complaints. 

And they weren’t going to let us go home. 

“More houses! More! Trick-or-treat forever! ” 

Tabby helped Lee to his feet. She picked up his trick-or-treat bag and placed 
it in his hand. Then she brushed her hair out of her face and picked up her own 
bag. 

The four of us trooped across the street, dragging the bags beside us. The 



night air had grown cold and heavy. A strong breeze rattled the trees and sent 
brown leaves scuttling past our feet. 

“Our parents must be so worried,” Lee murmured. “It’s really late.” 

“They should be worried!” Tabby declared in a trembling voice. “We may 
never see them again.” 

The porch light at the first house was still on. The pumpkin heads forced us 
onto the porch. 

“It’s too late to trick-or-treat,” Lee protested. 

But we had no choice. I rang the bell. 

We waited. Shivering. Feeling heavy and sick from all the candy we had 
forced down. 

Slowly, the front door opened. 

And we all gasped in shock. 



26 


“Ohhh!” Alow cry escaped Walker’s throat. 

Lee jumped off the porch. 

I stared at the creature in the yellow porch light. A woman. A woman with a 
grinning jack-o’-lantern head. 

“Trick or treat?” she asked, turning her jagged smile on us. Orange flames 
danced and flickered inside her head. 

“Uh—uh—uh—” Walker hopped off the porch and stumbled into Lee. 

I stared at the grinning pumpkin head. This is a nightmare! I told myself. A 
living nightmare! 

The woman dropped some kind of candy into my bag. I didn’t even see 
what it was. I couldn’t take my eyes off her pumpkin head. 

“Are you—?” I started to ask. 

But she closed the front door before I could get the words out. 

“More houses /” the pumpkin heads commanded. “More trick-or-treating!” 

We dragged ourselves to the next little house. The door swung open as we 
climbed onto the front stoop. 

And we stared at another pumpkin-head creature. 

This one wore jeans and a maroon sweatshirt. The flames hissed and 
crackled behind his eyes and mouth. Two wide, crooked teeth were carved into 
his mouth—one on top, one below—giving him a silly expression. 

But my friends and I were too terrified to laugh. 

At the next house, we were greeted by two jack-o’-lantern creatures. We 
crossed the street and found another fiery-headed creature waiting for us at the 
next house. 

Where are we? I wondered. 

What is this strange neighborhood? 

The two pumpkin heads forced us on to the next block. The houses here all 
had jack-o’-lantern creatures living in them. 

At the end of the block, Tabby set down her trick-or-treat bag and turned to 
face the pumpkin heads. “Please—let us stop!” she begged. “Please!” 

“We can’t do any more houses!” Lee exclaimed weakly. “I—I’m so tired. 
And I really feel sick.” 



“Please—?” Walker pleaded. “Please—?” 

“I can’t do another house. I really can’t,” Tabby said, shaking her head. 
“I’m so frightened. Those creatures... in every house...” She uttered a sob and 
her voice trailed off. 

Lee crossed his arms over the front of his striped costume. “I’m not taking 
another step,” he insisted. “I don’t care what you do. I’m not moving.” 

“Me neither,” Tabby agreed, stepping close beside him. 

The two pumpkin heads didn’t reply. Instead, they rose up high in the air. 

I took a step back as their triangle eyes bulged wide and their mouths 
stretched open. Bright orange flames flew from their eyes. 

And then their mouths stretched even wider. And they both let out high 
wails. The shrill sound rose and fell through the heavy night air. Rose and fell, 
like police sirens. 

The pumpkin heads tilted back until their flames shot straight up to the sky. 
And their siren wails grew louder. Louder. Until I had to hold my hands over my 
ears. 

I saw a flash of light. And turned to see another pumpkin head floating 
toward us from across the street. 

“Oh!” I uttered a hoarse cry as two more pumpkin-head creatures hurried 
out of their houses. 

And then two more. And another creature. And another. 

All down the block, doors flew open. 

Creatures floated out. Floated toward us. Hissing and wailing. 

Flickering, dancing flames shot out from their jack-o’-lantern eyes and 
mouths, sending orange light into the black sky. They floated and bobbed down 
the street, across the dark lawns, wailing like sirens, hissing like snakes. 

Closer. Closer. 

Dozens of them. Dozens and dozens. 

Walker, Tabby, Lee, and I pressed close together in the middle of the street 
as the pumpkin-head creatures drew near. 

They formed a circle around us. A circle of grinning, fiery jack-o’-lantern 
faces over dark-robed bodies. 

The circle of creatures spun around us slowly. And as they spun, their heads 
bobbed and tilted on their shoulders. 

Slowly, slowly, they spun around us. And then they began to chant in their 
hoarse, crackly voices: 



“Trick or treat! Trick or treat! Trick or treat!” 

“What do they want?” Tabby cried. “What are they going to do?” 

I didn’t have a chance to answer her. 

Four creatures stepped quickly into the middle of the circle. 

And when I saw what they carried in their hands, I started to scream. 



27 


“Trick or treat! Trick or treat! Trick or treat!” 

My scream drowned out the chanting pumpkin heads. 

And as the four creatures stepped forward, the chanting stopped. Their jack- 
o’-lantern heads bobbed on their shoulders. Their ragged smiles grew wider as 
they came near. 

They held their hands waist high. In their hands, they each held a pumpkin 
head. 

Four extra pumpkin heads! 

“Oh, no!” Lee cried out when he saw them. 

Tabby grabbed Lee’s arm in terror. “What are they going to do with those 
heads?” 

Bright yellow flames flickered from the eyes and grinning mouths of the 
four extra heads. 

“These are for you!” a pumpkin head announced in a voice that sounded 
like sharp pieces of gravel being rubbed together. 

“Ohhh!” A low moan escaped my throat. 

I stared at the empty heads, stared at their fiery eyes, their ugly grins. 

“These are for you,” the pumpkin head repeated, stepping closer. “These 
will be your new heads!” 

“No! You can’t! You can’t!” Tabby screamed. “You—” 

Her cry was cut off as one of the creatures raised a pumpkin head over her. 
It had a hole cut in the bottom. The creature slammed the pumpkin head over 
Tabby’s head. 

Lee tried to run. 

But a creature moved quickly to block his way—and then slammed a 
pumpkin head onto Lee’s head. 

I stumbled back, my mouth open in amazement. 

Hands pressed helplessly against the sides of their pumpkin heads, Tabby 
and Lee ran down the street. Ran blindly. Ran screaming. Screaming into the 
darkness. 

And then the creatures turned to Walker and me. And raised the empty 
pumpkin heads high. 



“Please—!” I begged. “Please—no!” 



28 


“Please—!” I cried. “Please don’t give me a pumpkin head!” 

“Please—” Walker joined in. 

And then we both burst out laughing. 

The two creatures set the empty pumpkin heads down on the ground. And 
then their own pumpkin heads started to change. The flames died out. The heads 
began to shrink. And change shape. 

A few seconds later, Shane and Shana had their own heads back. 

And then all four of us started to laugh. We hugged each other and spun 
around. We danced wildly, crazily, up and down the street. We tossed back our 
heads and laughed at the moon and stars. Laughed till it hurt. 

“It worked, guys!” I exclaimed when we finally stopped celebrating. “It 
worked! It worked! We really scared Tabby and Lee this time!” 

“They’ll be scared for the rest of their lives!” 

Walker declared. He slapped Shane on the back. Then he danced another 
happy dance, waving his hands gleefully above his head. 

“We did it! We did it!” I chanted joyfully. “We really scared them! We 
finally scared them!” 

“That was so much fun!” Walker exclaimed. “And so easy!” 

I stepped up to Shane and Shana and hugged them both. “Of course,” I 
exclaimed, “it helps to have two aliens from another planet as friends!” 



29 


“Whoa! Take it easy!” Shane warned, lowering his voice. He glanced around 
nervously. 

“We don’t want any strangers to know that we’re not from Earth,” Shana 

said. 

“I know, I know!” I replied. “That’s why we didn’t use your weird powers 
to scare Tabby and Lee before.” 

“This year, we were desperate!” Walker declared. 

“But we’ve got to be very careful,” Shana said. 

Shane rose up and turned to all the other pumpkin-head creatures who still 
circled us. “Thanks for your help, brothers and sisters!” Shane called to them. 
“You’d better hurry home before anyone sees that we have invaded this whole 
neighborhood!” 

Waving and laughing, murmuring happily to each other, the other pumpkin 
heads hurried back to their houses. In a few seconds, the street stood empty 
again—except for us four friends. 

We started walking down the middle of the street, making our way home. 
Walker and I dragged our heavy trick-or-treat bags beside us. 

Walker turned to Shane and Shana. A smile spread over his face. “When do 
you think Tabby and Lee will discover they can just pull off their pumpkin 
heads?” Walker asked. 

“Maybe never!” Shana replied. 

And we all started laughing all over again. 

We didn’t stop until we reached the bottom of my driveway. 

“Thanks again,” I told Shane and Shana. “You guys were great.” 

“You were greater than great! You were awesome!” Walker declared. “A 
couple of times, you even scared me! And I knew it was you!” 

“And do you know what else is great about having aliens from another 
planet as friends?” I said. “You two don’t eat candy.” 

“That’s right,” Shane and Shana agreed. 

“That means Walker and I get to keep it all!” I exclaimed, laughing. 

I suddenly had a serious thought. I stopped laughing. “You know, I’ve never 
seen you two eat,” I told the two aliens. “What do you eat?” 



Shana reached out and pinched my arm. “You’re still really bony, Drew,” 
she replied. “You’ll find out what Shane and I eat when you fill out a bit.” 

“Yeah,” Shane chimed in. “People from our planet only like to eat very 
plump adults. So you don’t have to worry for now.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Hey—you’re kidding, right?” I demanded. 
“Shane? Shana? You’re not serious—right? That’s a joke. Right? Right?” 




VAMPIRE BREATH 


Goosebumps - 49 
R.L. Stine 



1 


“When a werewolf creeps up behind you at night, he steps so silently you can’t 
hear a thing. You don’t know the werewolf is there until you feel his hot, sour 
breath on the back of your neck.” 

I leaned over and blew a big blast of hot air onto the back of Tyler Brown’s 
neck. The kid’s eyes bulged out and he made a sick, choking sound. 

I love baby-sitting for Tyler. He scares so easily. 

“The werewolf’s breath freezes you so you can’t move,” I said in a whisper. 
“You can’t run away. You can’t kick your legs or move your arms. That makes it 
easy for the werewolf to rip your skin off.” 

I sent another hot blast of werewolf breath onto Tyler’s neck. I could see 
him shiver. He made a soft whimpering noise. 

“Stop it, Freddy. You’re really scaring him!” my friend Cara Simonetti 
scolded me. She flashed me a stern scowl from the chair across the room. 

Tyler and I were on the couch. I sat real close to him so I could whisper and 
scare him good. 

“Freddy—he’s only six,” Cara reminded me. “Look at him. He’s shaking all 
over.” 

“He loves it,” I told her. I turned back to Tyler. “When you are out late at 
night, and you feel the hot werewolf breath on the back of your neck—don’t turn 
around,” I whispered. “Don’t turn around. Don’t let him know that you see him 
—because that’s when he’ll attack !” 

I shouted the word attack. And then I leaped on Tyler and began tickling 
him with both hands as hard as I could. 

He let out a shout. He was crying and laughing at the same time. 

I tickled him until he couldn’t breathe. Then I stopped. I’m a very good 
baby-sitter. I always know when to stop tickling. 

Cara climbed to her feet. She grabbed me by the shoulders and tugged me 
away from Tyler. “He’s only six, Freddy!” she repeated. 

I grabbed Cara, wrestled her to the floor, and started tickling her. “The 
werewolf attacks again'.” I shouted. I tossed back my head in an evil laugh. 

Wrestling with Cara is always a big mistake. She punched me in the 
stomach, so hard I saw stars. Really. Red and yellow stars. I rolled away, gasping 



for air. 

Did you ever have the breath knocked out of you? It’s not a good feeling. 
You really think you’ll never breathe again. 

Making me see stars is Cara’s hobby. She does it all the time. She can do it 
with one punch. 

Cara is tough. 

That’s why she’s my best friend. We’re both tough. When the going gets 
tough, we never crumble! 

Ask anyone. Freddy Martinez and Cara Simonetti. Two tough kids. 

A lot of people think we’re brother and sister. I guess it’s because we look a 
little alike. We’re both pretty big for twelve. She’s an inch taller, but I’m 
catching up. We both have wavy black hair, dark eyes, and round faces. 

We’ve been friends ever since I beat her up in fourth grade. She tells 
everyone that she beat me up in fourth grade. 

No way. 

Want to know how tough we are? We like it when our teacher squeaks the 
chalk against the chalkboard! 

That’s tough. 

Anyway, Tyler lives across the street from me. Whenever I baby-sit for him, 
I call Cara, and she usually comes along. Tyler likes Cara better than me. She 
always calms him down after I tell him stories to scare him to death. 

“It’s a full moon tonight, Tyler,” I said, leaning close to him on the green 
leather couch in his den. 

“Did you look out the window? Did you see the full moon?” 

Tyler shook his head. He scratched one side of his short, blond hair. 

His blue eyes were wide. He was waiting for the rest of the werewolf story. 

I leaned closer and lowered my voice. “When a werewolf steps out under 
the full moon, hair starts to grow on his face,” I told him. “His teeth grow longer 
and longer, and pointier. They don’t stop until they reach under his chin. Fur 
covers his body like a wolf. And claws grow out from his fingers.” 

I raked my fingernails down the front of Tyler’s T-shirt. He gasped. 

“You’re really scaring him,” Cara warned. “He isn’t going to sleep at all 
tonight.” 

I ignored her. “And then the werewolf starts to walk,” I whispered, leaning 
over Tyler. “The werewolf walks through the forest, searching for a victim. 
Searching... hungry... walking... walking...” 



I heard the footsteps in the living room. Heavy footsteps thudding over the 


At first I thought I was imagining them. 

But Tyler heard them, too. 

“Walking... walking...” I whispered. 

Tyler’s mouth dropped open. 

The heavy footsteps thudded closer. 

Cara turned in her chair to the doorway. 

Tyler swallowed hard. 

We all heard them now. 

The heavy, thudding footsteps. 

“A real one!” I shrieked. “It’s a real werewolf!” 
All three of us screamed. 



2 


“Give me a break,” the werewolf said. 

Of course it wasn’t a real werewolf. It was Tyler’s dad. 

“What are the three of you doing?” Mr. Brown asked, pulling off his 
overcoat. He had blond hair and blue eyes like Tyler. 

“Scaring Tyler to death,” Cara told him. 

He rolled his eyes. “Didn’t you do that last time?” 

“We do it every time,” I replied. “Tyler loves it.” I patted the kid on the 
back. “You love it—right?” 

“I guess,” he said in a tiny voice. 

Tyler’s mom stepped into the room, straightening her sweater. “Were you 
telling werewolf stories to Tyler again, Freddy?” she demanded. “Last time, he 
had nightmares all night.” 

“No, I didn’t!” Tyler protested. 

Mrs. Brown tsk-tsked. Mr. Brown handed Cara and me each a five-dollar 
bill. “Thanks for baby-sitting. Do you want me to walk you home?” 

“No way,” I replied. Did he think I was some kind of wimp? “It’s just 
across the street.” 

Cara and I said good night to the Browns. I didn’t really feel like going 
home yet. So I walked Cara home. She lives on the next block. 

The full moon shone down on us. It appeared to follow us as we walked, 
floating low over the dark houses. 

We laughed about my werewolf story. And we laughed about how scared it 
made Tyler. 

We didn’t know that it would be our turn to be scared next. 

Really scared. 

Saturday afternoon, Cara came over. We hurried down to my basement to play 
air hockey. 

A few years ago, my parents cleaned the basement up and turned it into a 
great playroom. We have a full-sized pool table and a beautiful, old jukebox 
down there. Mom and Dad filled the jukebox with old rock-and-roll records. 

Last Christmas, they bought me an air hockey game. A big, table-sized one. 



Cara and I have some major hockey battles. We spend hours slapping the 
plastic puck back and forth at each other. We really get into it. 

Our air hockey games usually end in wrestling matches. Just like real 
hockey games on TV! 

We leaned over the air hockey game and started to warm up, shoving the 
puck slowly back and forth across the table. Not trying to score. 

“Where are your parents?” Cara asked. 

I shrugged. “Beats me.” 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “You don’t know where they went? Didn’t 
they leave you a note or something?” 

I made a face at her. “They go out a lot.” 

“Probably to get away from you!” Cara exclaimed. She laughed. 

I had just come from karate class. I stepped around the hockey table and 
made a few karate moves on her. One of my kicks accidentally landed on the 
back of her ankle. 

“Hey—!” she cried angrily. “Freddy—you jerk!” 

When she bent over to rub her ankle, I shoved her into the wall. I meant it 
as a joke. 

I was just goofing. But I guess I don’t know my own strength. 

She lost her balance and slammed hard into an antique china cabinet filled 
with old dishes. The dishes rattled and shook. But nothing broke. 

I laughed. I knew that Cara wasn’t really hurt. 

I reached out to help pull her off the front of the cabinet. But she let out a 
roar of attack—and came hurtling into me. 

Her shoulder caught me in the chest. I uttered a hoarse choking sound. 
Once again, I saw stars. 

While I gasped for air, she grabbed the hockey puck off the game table. She 
pulled her hand back to heave it at me. 

But I wrapped my hand around hers and struggled to wrestle the puck away. 

We were laughing. But this was a pretty serious fight. 

Don’t get me wrong. Cara and I do this all the time. Especially when my 
parents are out. 

I pulled the puck from her hand—and it went flying across the room. With a 
loud karate cry, I swung free of her. 

We were both laughing so hard, we could barely move. But Cara took a 
mnning start and plowed into me once again. 



This time she sent me sailing back... back. I lost my balance. My hands 
shot up as I crashed into the side of the tall china cabinet. 

“Whooooa!” 

I landed hard. My back smashed into the wooden cabinet’s side. 

And the whole cabinet toppled over! 

I heard the crash of broken plates. 

A second later, I fell on top of the cabinet, sprawling helplessly on my back. 

“Ohhhh.” My cry turned to a painful moan. 

Then silence. 

I just lay there on top of the fallen cabinet, like a turtle on its back. My 
hands and legs thrashed the air. My whole body hurt. 

“Uh-oh.” 

That’s all I heard Cara say. 

A simple “Uh-oh.” 

And then she hurried over. She reached down, grabbed my hands, and 
tugged me to my feet. 

We both stepped away from the fallen cabinet. 

“Sorry,” Cara murmured. “I didn’t mean to do that.” 

“I know,” I said. I swallowed hard, rubbing my aching shoulder. “I think 
we’re in major trouble.” 

We both turned to check out the damage. 

And we both cried out in surprise when we saw what the old wooden 
cabinet had been hiding. 



3 


“A secret doorway!” I cried excitedly. 

We stared at the door. It was made of smooth, dark wood. The doorknob 
was covered with a thick layer of dust. 

I had no idea there was a door back there. And I was pretty sure that Mom 
and Dad didn’t know about it, either. 

Cara and I stepped up to the doorway. I rubbed my hand over the doorknob, 
wiping away some of the dust. 

“Where does this lead?” Cara asked, smoothing her black hair back off her 

face. 

I shrugged. “Beats me. Maybe it’s a closet or something. Mom and Dad 
never mentioned another room down here.” 

I knocked on the door with my fist. “Anyone in there?” I called. 

Cara laughed. “Wouldn’t you be surprised if someone answered you!” she 
exclaimed. 

I laughed, too. It was a pretty funny idea. 

“Why would someone hide the door behind a cabinet?” Cara asked. “It 
doesn’t make any sense.” 

“Maybe there’s pirate treasure hidden back there,” I said. “Maybe there’s a 
room filled with gold coins.” 

Cara rolled her eyes. “That’s really lame,” she muttered. “Pirates in the 
middle of Ohio?” 

Cara turned the knob and tried to tug open the door. 

I guess some kids would hesitate. Some kids probably wouldn’t be so eager 
to pull open a mysterious, hidden door in their basement. Some kids might be a 
little afraid. 

But not Cara and me. 

We’re not wimps. We don’t think about danger. 

We’re tough. 

The door didn’t open. 

“Is it locked?” I asked her. 

She shook her head. “No. The cabinet is blocking the way.” 



The cabinet lay on its side in front of the door. We both grabbed hold of it. 
Cara took the top. I took the bottom. 

It was heavier than I thought. Mainly because of all the broken dishes 
inside. But we pushed it and pulled it, and slid it away from the doorway. 

“Okay,” Cara said, wiping her hands off on the legs of her jeans. 

“Okay,” I repeated. “Let’s check it out.” 

The doorknob felt cool in my hand. I turned it and pulled open the wooden 

door. 

The door moved slowly. It was heavy, and the rusted hinges made an eerie 
squeeeeeeak squeeeeeeak as I strained to open it. 

Then, standing close together, Cara and I leaned into the doorway and 
peered inside. 



4 


I expected to find a room in there. A storage room or an old furnace room. Some 
old houses—like my aunt Harriet’s—have coal rooms where coal was stored to 
feed the furnace. 

But that’s not what we saw. 

Squinting into total darkness, I realized I was staring into a tunnel. 

A dark tunnel. 

I reached out and touched the wall. Stone. Cold stone. Cold and damp. 

“We need flashlights,” Cara said softly. 

I rubbed the cold, damp stone again. Then I turned to Cara. “You mean 
we’re going into the tunnel?” I asked. 

Silly question. Of course we were going into the tunnel. If you find a 
hidden tunnel in your basement, what do you do? 

You don’t stand around at the entrance and wonder about it. You explore it. 

She followed me over to my dad’s workbench. I started pulling open 
drawers, searching for flashlights. 

“Where could that tunnel lead?” Cara asked, frowning thoughtfully. 
“Maybe it goes to the house next door. Maybe it connects the two houses 
together.” 

“There is no house next door on that side,” I reminded her. “It’s an empty 
lot. It’s been empty for as long as I’ve been living here.” 

“Well, it has to lead somewhere,” she replied. “You can’t just have a tunnel 
that goes nowhere.” 

“Good thinking,” I replied sarcastically. 

She shoved me. 

I shoved her back. 

Then I spotted a plastic flashlight at the bottom of a tool drawer. Cara and I 
both grabbed for it at the same time. We had another battle, a short one this time. 
I wrestled the flashlight away from her. 

“What’s the big idea?” she demanded. 

“I saw this one first,” I said. “Get your own.” 

A few seconds later, she found another flashlight on a shelf above the 
workbench. She tested it by shining it in my eyes till I screamed at her. 



“Okay. Ready,” she said. 

We hurried back to the door, our flashlight beams criss-crossing each other 
over the basement floor. I stopped at the open door and shot the light into the 
tunnel. 

Cara’s light bounced off the stone walls. They were covered with a layer of 
green moss. On the smooth stone floor, small puddles of water glimmered in the 
darting rays of our flashlights. 

“Damp in there,” I murmured. I took a step into the tunnel, moving my light 
along the walls. The air instantly felt colder. I shivered, startled by the change in 
temperature. 

“Brrrr,” Cara agreed. “It’s like a freezer in here.” 

I raised my light and aimed it straight ahead. “I can’t see where the tunnel 
ends,” I said. “It could stretch on for miles and miles!” 

“Only one way to find out,” Cara replied. She raised her light and blinded 
me with it once again. “Ha-ha! Gotcha!” 

“Not funny!” I protested. I beamed my light into her eyes. We had a short 
flashlight battle. Neither of us won. Now we both had bright yellow spots in our 
eyes. 

I turned back into the tunnel. “Helllloooooooooo!” I shouted. My voice 
echoed again and again. “Annnnnnybody hommmmmmmme?” I called. 

Cara shoved me against the damp stone wall. “Shut up, Freddy. Why can’t 
you get serious?” 

“I am serious,” I told her. “Come on. Let’s go.” I bumped her with my 
shoulder. I wanted to knock her into the wall. But her feet were planted hard. She 
didn’t budge. 

I lowered my light to the floor so we could see where we were walking. 
Cara kept her light aimed straight ahead. 

We made our way slowly, stepping around puddles. The air grew even 
colder as we walked deeper into the passageway. 

Our shoes made soft, scraping sounds. The sounds echoed eerily off the 
stone walls. After about a minute, I turned back and glanced to the basement 
doorway. It was a narrow rectangle of yellow light, very far away. 

The tunnel curved, and the stone walls appeared to close in on us. I felt a 
shiver of fear, but I shook it away. 

Nothing to be afraid of, I told myself. It’s just an old, empty tunnel. 

“This is so weird,” Cara murmured. “Where can it lead?” 



“We must be under the empty lot next door,” I guessed. “But why would 
someone build a tunnel under an empty lot?” 

Cara raised the flashlight to my face. She grabbed my shoulder to stop me. 
“Want to turn back?” 

“Of course not,” I shot back. 

“I don’t, either,” she said quickly. “I just wanted to see if you wanted to.” 
Our lights played over the damp stone walls as we followed the curve of the 
tunnel. We leaped over a wide puddle of water that covered the entire tunnel 
floor. 

Then the tunnel curved one more time. And a door came into view. 

Another dark wood door. 

Our flashlight beams slid up and down the door as we hurried up to it. 
“Hello, in there!” I called. “Helllooooo!” I pounded on the door. 

No reply. 

I grabbed the doorknob. 

Cara held me back again. “What if your parents get home?” she asked. 
“They’ll be really worried. They won’t know where you are.” 

“Well, if they come down to the basement, they’ll see the cabinet on the 
floor,” I replied. “And they’ll see the open door that leads into the tunnel. 
They’ll figure out what happened. And they’ll probably follow us in here.” 
“Probably,” Cara agreed. 

“We’ve got to see what’s on the other side of this door,” I said eagerly. I 
turned the knob and pulled the door open. This door was heavy, too. And it 
creaked eerily as it opened, just like the first door. 

We raised our flashlights and sent our pale beams of light ahead of us. 

“It’s a room!” I whispered. “A room at the end of the tunnel!” 

Our lights danced over the smooth, dark walls. Bare walls. 

We stepped side by side into the small, square room. 

“What’s the big deal? It’s empty,” Cara said. “It’s just an empty room.” 

“No, it isn’t,” I replied softly. 

I aimed my flashlight at a large object on the floor in the middle of the 
room. 

We both stared straight ahead at it. Stared at it in silence. 

“What is it?” Cara demanded finally. 

“A coffin,” I replied. 



5 


I felt my heart skip a beat. 

I wasn’t scared. But my body started to tingle all over. A cold tingling. 
Excitement, I guess. 

Cara and I both aimed our flashlight beams at the coffin in the middle of the 
floor. The light circles bounced up and down over the dark wood. Our hands 
were shaking. 

“I’ve never seen a coffin before,” Cara murmured. 

“Neither have I,” I confessed. “Except on TV.” 

The light reflected off the polished wood. I saw brass handles at both ends 
of the long box. 

“What if there is a dead person inside it?” Cara asked in a tiny voice. 

My heart leaped again. My skin tingled even colder. 

“I don’t know,” I whispered. “Who would be buried in a secret room under 
my house?” 

I raised my light and swept it around the room. Four bare walls. Smooth 
and gray. No windows. 

No closet. The one and only door led back into the tunnel. 

A hidden room at the end of a twisting tunnel. A coffin in a hidden, 
underground room... 

“I’m sure Mom and Dad don’t know anything about this,” I told Cara. I 
took a deep breath and made my way closer to the coffin. 

“Where are you going?” Cara demanded sharply. She hung back near the 
open doorway. 

“Let’s check it out,” I replied, ignoring my pounding heart. “Let’s take a 
look inside.” 

“Whoa!” Cara cried. “I... uh... I don’t think we should.” 

I turned back to her. The light from my flashlight caught her face. I saw her 
chin quiver. Her dark eyes narrowed at the coffin. 

“You’re afraid?” I demanded. I couldn’t keep a grin from spreading over 
my face. Cara afraid of something? This was a moment to remember! 

“No way!” she insisted. “I’m not afraid. But I think maybe we should get 
your parents.” 



“Why?” I asked. “Why do we need my parents around to open up an old 
coffin?” 

I kept the light on her face. I saw her chin quiver again. 

“Because you don’t just go around opening coffins,” she replied. She 
crossed her arms tightly in front of her. 

“Well... if you won’t help me, I’ll do it myself,” I declared. I turned to the 
coffin and brushed my hand over the lid. The polished wood felt smooth and 
cool. 

“No—wait!” Cara cried. She hurried up beside me. “I’m not scared. But... 
this could be a big mistake.” 

“You’re scared,” I told her. “You’re scared big time.” 

“I am not!” she insisted. 

“I saw your chin tremble. Twice,” I told her. 

“So?” 

“So you’re scared.” 

“No way.” She let out a disgusted sigh. “Here. I’ll prove it to you.” 

She handed me her flashlight. Then she grabbed the coffin lid with both 
hands and started to lift it open. 

“Whoa. It’s really heavy,” she groaned. “Help me.” 

A shiver ran down my back. 

I shook it off and set the flashlights down on the floor. Then I placed both 
hands on the coffin lid. 

I leaned forward. Started to push up. 

Cara and I both pushed with all our strength. 

The heavy wooden lid didn’t budge at first. 

But then I heard a creaking sound as it started to lift. 

Slowly, slowly, it raised up in our hands. 

Leaning over the open coffin, we pushed it, pushed it, until it stood straight 
up and came to a rest. 

We let go of the lid. 

I shut my eyes. I didn’t really want to look inside. 

But I had to. 

I squinted down into the open coffin. 

Too dark. I couldn’t see a thing. 

Good, I told myself. I let out a sigh of relief. 

But then Cara bent down and picked up the flashlights from the floor. She 



slipped mine into my hand. 

We aimed our lights into the coffin and stared inside. 



6 


The coffin was lined in purple velvet. The velvet glowed under the light from 
our flashlights. We swept our flashlights up and down the inside of the coffin. 

“It—it’s empty]” Cara stammered. 

“No, it isn’t,” I replied. 

My light locked on an object at the foot of the coffin. A spot of blue against 
the purple velvet. 

As I moved closer, it came into focus. 

A bottle. A blue glass bottle. 

“Weird!” Cara exclaimed. Now she saw it, too. 

“Yes. Totally weird,” I agreed. 

We both moved to the foot of the coffin to see it better. I pressed against the 
side of the coffin as I leaned close to the bottle. My hands felt frozen now. 

Cara reached past me and picked up the bottle. She held it in the white 
beam of light from my flashlight, and we both studied it carefully. 

The bottle was round and dark blue. It fit easily in Cara’s hand. The glass 
was smooth. The bottle was closed by a blue glass stopper. 

Cara shook it. “It’s empty,” she said softly. 

“An empty bottle inside a coffin? Definitely weird!” I cried. “Who could 
have left it here?” 

“Hey—there’s a label.” Cara pointed to a tiny square of paper glued to the 
glass. “Can you read it?” she asked. She raised the blue bottle to my face. 

The tiny label had faded, old-fashioned-looking letters on it. I squinted 

hard. 

The words had been rubbed until they were little more than smudges. 

I held my light steady and finally managed to make out the words: 
“VAMPIRE BREATH. ” 

“Huh?” Cara’s mouth opened in shock. “Did you say Vampire Breath ?” 

I nodded. “That’s what it says.” 

“But what could that be?” she asked. “What is Vampire Breath ?” 

“Beats me,” I replied, staring into the bottle. “I’ve never seen it advertised 
on TV!” 



Cara didn’t laugh at my joke. 

She turned the bottle in her hands. She was looking for more information. 
But the label had only two words printed on it: “VAMPIRE BREATH”. 

I turned my light back into the coffin to see if we had missed anything 
inside it. I swept the light back and forth. Then I leaned over the side and rubbed 
my hand over the purple velvet. It felt smooth and soft. 

When I looked back at Cara, she had tucked her flashlight under her arm. 
And she was twisting the glass stopper on top of the bottle. 

“Hey—what are you doing?” I cried. 

“Opening it,” she replied. “But the top is stuck and I can’t seem to—” 

“No—!” I shouted. “Stop!” 

Her dark eyes flashed. She locked them on mine. “Scared, Freddy?” 

“Yes. I mean—no!” I stammered. “I—uh—I agree with you, Cara. We 
should wait for my parents to get home. We should show this to them. We can’t 
just go around opening coffins and taking out bottles and—” 

I gasped as she tugged at the stopper. 

I wasn’t afraid or anything. I just didn’t want to do anything stupid. 

“Give me that!” I shouted. I grabbed for the bottle. 

“No way!” She swung around to keep me from getting it. 

And the bottle fell out of her hand. 

We both watched it hit the floor. 

It landed on its side. Bounced once. Didn’t break. 

But the glass top popped off. Cara and I both stared down at the bottle. Not 
breathing. Waiting. Wondering what would happen. 



7 


Ssssssssssssssss. 

It took me a few seconds to figure out what was making that hissing sound. 
Then I saw a smoky green mist shooting up from the bottle. 

The thick mist rose up like a geyser, chilly and wet. I felt it float against my 

face. 

“Ohhhh.” I groaned when its sour smell reached my nose. 

I staggered back, choking. I started to gag. 

I thrashed both hands wildly, trying to bmsh the mist away. 

“Yuck!” Cara cried, making a sick face. She pressed her fingers over her 
nose. “It stinksl” 

The sickening fog swept around us. In seconds, the mist billowed all over 
the room. 

“I—I can’t breathe!” I gasped. 

I couldn’t see, either. The fog blocked the light from our flashlights! 

“Ohhh,” Cara groaned. “It smells so bad!” My eyes burned. I could taste 
the sour fog on my tongue. I felt sick. My stomach gurgled. My throat tightened. 

I’ve got to plug up the bottle, I decided. If I close the bottle, this disgusting 
mist will stop spurting up. 

I dropped to my knees and my flashlight clattered to the floor. I felt blindly 
along the floor till I found the bottle. Then I swept my other hand in a circle till 
my fingers curled around the stopper. 

Struggling not to gag, I shoved the stopper into the top of the bottle. 

I jumped to my feet and held the bottle up so that Cara could see that I 
closed it. 

She didn’t see me. She had both hands over her face. Her shoulders were 
heaving up and down. 

As I set the bottle down, I started to gag. I swallowed hard. Again. Again. I 
couldn’t get the disgusting taste from my mouth. 

The sour fog swirled around us for a few seconds more. Then it lowered 
itself to the floor, fading away. 

“Cara—?” I finally choked out. “Cara—are you okay?” 

She slowly lowered her hands from her face. She blinked several times, 



then turned to me. “Yuck,” she murmured. “It was so gross! Why did you grab 
the bottle like that? That was all your fault.” 

“Huh?” I gasped. “My fault? My fault?” 

She nodded. “Yes. If you hadn’t grabbed at the bottle, I never would have 
dropped it. And—” 

“But you ’re the one who wanted to open it!” I shrieked. “Remember? You 
were pulling off the top!” 

“Oh.” She remembered. 

She brushed at her sweater and jeans with both hands. She tried to wipe the 
awful smell away. “Freddy, let’s get out of here,” she demanded. 

“Yeah. Let’s go.” For once we agreed on something. 

I followed her to the door. Halfway across the room, I turned back. 

Gazed at the coffin. 

And gasped. 

“Cara—look!” I whispered. 

Someone was lying in the coffin. 



8 


Cara screamed. She grabbed my arm and squeezed it so hard, I cried out. 

We huddled together in the doorway, staring back into the dark room. 

Staring at the pale form in the coffin. 

“Are you scared?” Cara whispered. 

“Who—me?” I choked out. 

I had to show her I wasn’t scared. I took a step toward the coffin. Then 
another. She stayed close by my side. The beams of light from our flashlights 
darted shakily ahead of us. 

My heart started to pound. My mouth suddenly felt dry. It was impossible 
to hold the flashlight steady. 

“It’s an old man,” I whispered. 

“But how did he get there?” Cara whispered back. “He wasn’t there a 
second ago.” She squeezed my arm again. 

But I didn’t really feel the pain. I was too excited, too amazed, too confused 
to feel anything. 

How did he get there? 

Who was he? 

“Is he dead?” Cara asked. 

I didn’t answer. I crept up to the coffin and shone my light in. 

The man was old and completely bald. His skin stretched tight against his 
skull, smooth as a lightbulb. 

His eyes were shut. His lips were as pale as his skin, drawn tightly together. 

He had tiny, white hands. Thin as bones. They were crossed over his chest. 

He was dressed in a black tuxedo. Very old-fashioned-looking. The stiff 
collar of his white shirt pressed up against his pale cheeks. His shiny black shoes 
were buttoned instead of laced. 

“Is he dead?” Cara repeated. 

“I guess so,” I choked out. I had never seen a dead person before. 

Again, I felt Cara’s hand on my arm. “Let’s go,” she whispered. “Let’s get 
out of here!” 


“Okay.” 



I wanted to leave. I wanted to get away from there as fast as I could. 

But something held me there. Something froze me in place, staring at the 
pale, old face. At the old man lying so still, so silent in the purple coffin. 

And as I stared, the old man opened his eyes. 

Blinked. 

And started to sit up. 



9 


I gasped and stumbled backward. If I hadn’t hit the wall, I think I would have 
fallen over. 

The flashlight fell from my hand. It clattered loudly to the floor. 

The sound made the old man turn in our direction. 

In the trembling beam from Cara’s flashlight, he blinked several times. 
Then his tiny pale hands rubbed his eyes, as if rubbing the sleep from them. 

He groaned softly. And tried to focus on us, squinting and rubbing his eyes. 

My heart pounded so hard I thought it was about to explode through my 
shirt. My temples throbbed, and I let out sharp, wheezing breaths. 

“I—I—” Cara stammered. I could see her whole body shaking as she stood 
in front of me, training the light on the old man in the coffin. 

“Where am I?” the old man croaked. He shook his head. He appeared 
dazed. “Where am I? What am I doing here?” He squinted in the flashlight 
beam. 

His pale, bald head glowed in the light. Even his eyes were pale, sort of 
silvery. 

He licked his white lips. His mouth made a dry, smacking sound. 

“I’m so thirsty,” he moaned in a hoarse whisper. “I’m so terribly—thirsty.” 

He sat up slowly, with a loud groan. As he pulled himself up, I saw that he 
wore a cape, a silky, purple cape that matched the purple of the coffin. 

He licked his pale lips again. “So thirsty...” 

And then he saw Cara and me. 

He blinked again. And squinted at us. “Where am I?” he asked, staring hard 
at me with those eerie, silver eyes. “What room is this?” 

“It’s my house,” I replied. But the words tumbled out in a weak whisper. 

“So thirsty...” he murmured again. Groaning and muttering to himself, he 
lifted one leg over the coffin, then the other. 

He slid out onto the floor. He didn’t make a sound when he landed. He 
seemed so light, as if he didn’t weigh anything at all. 

A chill of fear froze the back of my neck. I tried to back up. But I was 
already pressed against the wall. 

I glanced to the open doorway. It seemed a hundred miles away. 



The old man licked his dry lips. Still squinting hard, he took a step toward 
Cara and me. He smoothed his cape with both hands as he walked. 

“Who—are—you?” Cara managed to choke out. 

“How did you get here?” I cried, finding my voice. “What are you doing in 
my basement? How did you get in that coffin?” The questions burst out of me. 
“Who are you?” 

He stopped and scratched his bald head. For a moment, he appeared to be 
struggling to remember who he was. 

Then he replied, “I am Count Nightwing.” He nodded, as if reminding 
himself. “Yes. I am Count Nightwing.” 

Cara and I both uttered gasps. Then we started talking at the same time. 

“How did you get here?” 

“What do you want?” 

“Are you—are you—a vampire?” 

He covered his ears with his hands. He shut his eyes. “The noise...” he 
complained. “Please, speak softly. I’ve been asleep for so long.” 

“Are you a vampire?” I asked softly. 

“Yes. A vampire. Count Nightwing.” He nodded. And opened his eyes. He 
gazed at Cara, then at me, as if seeing us for the first time. 

“Yessss,” he hissed. He raised his arms and began to move toward us. 

“And I’m so thirsty. So very thirsty. I’ve been asleep for so long. And now 
I’m thirsty. And I must drink now.” 



10 


The count raised his arms and gripped the purple cape. The cape spread out 
behind him like wings, and he rose up into the air. 

“So thirsty...” he murmured, licking his dry lips. “So thirsty.” His silvery 
eyes locked onto Cara, as if trying to hypnotize her and hold her in place. 

I was never so frightened in all my life. I admit it. 

I don’t scare easily. And neither does Cara. 

We’ve watched a hundred vampire movies on TV. We laugh at them. We 
think the idea of a guy with fangs who flies around drinking human blood is 
funny. 

We have never been the least bit scared. 

But that was movies. This was real life ! 

We had just watched this guy—who called himself Count Nightwing—rise 
up from a coffin. A coffin practically in my basement! 

And now, he had his arms spread out and he was floating across the room 
toward us. Muttering about how thirsty he was. Narrowing his weird, frightening 
eyes at Cara’s throat! 

So, yes—I admit I was scared. But not too scared to move. 

“Hey—!” I gasped and grabbed Cara’s arm. “Come on!” I cried. “Let’s go!” 

She didn’t budge. 

“Cara—come on!” I screamed, tugging her. 

She stared up at the pale face of the vampire. 

She didn’t move. She didn’t blink. 

I grabbed her arm with both hands. I tried to drag her away. But she stood 
rooted to the floor. As frozen as a statue. 

“So thirsty...” the old man croaked. “I must drink now!” 

“Cara—snap out of it!” I cried. “Snap out of it! Please!” 

I pulled with all my strength—and dragged her to the door. 

As we reached the tunnel, Cara blinked and shook her head. Letting out a 
startled cry, she tugged her arm free and started to run. 

We both burst out of the little room and ran through the curving tunnel. Our 
shoes clapped loudly on the hard stone floor. The noise echoed off the walls. It 



sounded as if a thousand kids were running from the vampire! 

My legs felt rubbery and weak. But I forced myself to run. 

We ran through the dark tunnel, following the curve of the stone walls. Cara 
leaned forward, her arms stretched in front of her as she ran. 

She gripped the flashlight tightly in one hand. The light bounced all over. 
But we didn’t need it. We knew where we were running. 

Cara is a very fast runner—faster than me. As we turned again, her long 
legs were pumping hard, and she was pretty far ahead of me. 

I glanced back. 

Was the vampire following us? 

Yes. 

He was close behind, floating near the ceiling, his cape flapping behind 

him. 

“Cara—wait up!” I called breathlessly. 

A yellow rectangle of light came into view up ahead. 

The door! The door to my basement! 

If we can just get to the door, I thought. 

If we can get to my basement, we can slam the door behind us. And trap 
Count Nightwing in the tunnel. 

If we can get to the basement, we’ll be safe. 

Mom and Dad must be home by now, I decided. Please be home! Please! 

Up ahead, the rectangle of light from the open doorway grew larger. 

Cara was running hard, uttering a low gasp with each step. I was several 
feet behind her now. Running as fast as I could. Struggling to catch up. 

I didn’t turn around. But I could hear the flap of the vampire’s cape close 
behind me. 

Cara had nearly reached the door. 

Go, Cara, go! I thought. My chest felt about to burst. But I ran harder, 
desperate to catch up. To reach the door. To leap into the basement to safety. 

“Ohhhh!” I cried out as I saw the rectangle of light start to grow smaller. 
“The door—it’s closing!” I shrieked. 

“Nooooooo!” Cara and I both wailed. 

The door slammed shut with a crash. 

Cara couldn’t stop in time. She hit the door. And bounced off, stunned. 

I grabbed her by the shoulders to steady her. “Are you okay?” 

She didn’t answer. Her eyes went to the closed door. She grabbed for the 



doorknob. 

“Freddy—” she murmured. “Look!” 

No doorknob! There was no knob on this side of the door. 

With a frantic cry, I lowered my shoulder to the wooden door—and heaved 
my body against it. Again. Again. 

Nothing happened. 

My shoulder throbbed with pain. But the door didn’t budge. 

“Help!” I shouted. “Somebody—help! Let us out!” 

Too late. 

Count Nightwing had us trapped. 

He landed silently, his cape lowering around him. A thin smile spread over 
his pale face. His silvery eyes opened wide with excitement. His tongue darted 
back and forth over his caked, dry lips. 

“Run past him,” Cara whispered in my ear. “Run back into the tunnel. 
Maybe we can keep him chasing after us and wear him out.” 

But the vampire raised his cape to block our way. 

Could he read our minds? 

Holding his cape high, he stepped up to Cara. “So thirsty...” he murmured. 
“So thirsty.” 

Then he lowered his face to Cara’s throat. 



11 


“Let her go! Let her go!” I screamed. 

I grasped at his waist, desperate to pull him away. 

But I grabbed only cape. 

“Let her go! Stop!” I pleaded, tugging on the cape. 

I couldn’t see Cara at all. I could see only the vampire’s cape and shoulders 
as he lowered his head to drink her blood. 

“Please—!” I begged. “I’ll get you something else to drink! Please—let 
Cara go!” 

To my surprise, Count Nightwing raised his head. He stood up straight and 
took a step back from Cara. 

Cara raised her hand to her throat. She rubbed her neck. Her eyes were wide 
with fear, and her chin was quivering. 

“Something is wrong,” Count Nightwing said, shaking his head. He 
frowned. “Something is terribly wrong.” 

I turned to Cara. “Did he bite you?” I choked out. 

Cara rubbed her neck. “No,” she whispered. 

“Something is wrong,” the vampire repeated softly. He raised a hand to his 
mouth. 

I watched him open his mouth and stick a finger inside. He shut his eyes 
and poked around in there. 

“My fangs!” he cried finally. His strange eyes bulged and his mouth 
dropped open. “My fangs! They’re gone!” 

He turned away and started examining his mouth again. 

I saw my chance. I pounded on the door to the basement with both fists. 
“Mom! Dad! Can you hear me?” I shouted. 

Count Nightwing paid no attention to me. I heard him moan behind me. 
“My beautiful fangs!” he cried. “Gone. Gone. I’ll starve to death without my 
fangs!” 

He opened his mouth wide, showing Cara and me. He had no fangs. No 
teeth at all. Only gums. 

“We’re safe!” I whispered to Cara. 

He’s too old and weak to hurt us, I told myself. Without his fangs, the old 



vampire can’t harm us. 

“We’re safe! We’re safe!” I cried. 
How wrong could a person be? 



12 


The old vampire poked a finger around in his mouth, shaking his head sadly the 
whole while. Finally, he sighed and dropped his hands to his sides. 

“Doomed,” he whispered. “Doomed. Unless...” 

“Sorry we can’t help you,” I said. “Now, will you open the door and let me 
back in my house?” 

Count Nightwing rubbed his chin. He shut his eyes, thinking hard. 

“Yes. Let us out!” Cara insisted. “We can’t help you. So—” 

The old vampire’s eyes shot open. “But you can help me!” he declared. 
“You will help me!” 

I took a deep breath. “No. We won’t,” I told him. “Let us go—now.” 

He floated up over us. He moved his gaze from Cara to me. His silvery eyes 
suddenly appeared cold, icy. “You will help me,” he said softly. “Both of you. If 
you ever hope to return to your homes again.” 

I shivered. The tunnel suddenly felt so cold, as if a freezing wind was 
blowing through it. 

I glanced at the door. So close, I thought. We’re so close to being safe and 
sound in my house. 

On the other side of the door we would be out of danger. But we can’t get 
there. We can’t. We could be a thousand miles away. 

I turned back to the icy stare of the old vampire. 

He’s evil, I realized. Even without his fangs, he is evil. 

“Wh-what do we have to do?” Cara stammered. 

“Yes. What can we do?” I repeated. 

He lowered himself to the floor. His expression softened. 

“The bottle of Vampire Breath,” he said. “Did you see it?” 

“Yes,” I replied. “We found it. In your coffin.” 

“Do you have it?” he demanded eagerly. He reached out a hand. “Do you 
have it? Give it to me.” 

“No,” Cara and I answered together. 

“We didn’t take it,” I told him. “I think I left it on the floor.” 

“We—we dropped it,” Cara stammered. 



The old vampire gasped. “You what ? Did you break it? Did you spill the 
Vampire Breath ?” 

“It—it poured out,” I replied. “The room filled with smoke. We put the cap 
back on. But—” 

“We must find it!” Count Nightwing declared. “I must have that bottle. If 
there is a little bit of Vampire Breath left in the bottle, it will take me back to my 
time.” 

“Your time?” I asked. 

He squinted at me. “Your clothing. Your hair. You two are not of my time,” 
he said. “What year is this?” 

I told him. 

His mouth dropped open. A startled squeak escaped his throat. “I have been 
asleep for over a hundred years!” he exclaimed. “I must find the Vampire Breath. 
It will take me back in time. Back to when I had my fangs.” 

I stared hard at him, trying to understand what he was telling us. “Does that 
mean you will go away?” I asked. “If there is Vampire Breath left in the bottle, 
you will go back a hundred years?” 

The old vampire nodded. “Yessss,” he hissed. “I will go back to my time.” 
But then his eyes turned cold again, “If there is any of the precious Vampire 
Breath left,” he said bitterly. “If you didn’t spill it all.” 

“There’s got to be some left!” I cried. 

Cara and I followed Count Nightwing back through the tunnel. He floated 
silently ahead of us, his cape fluttering behind him. “So thirsty...” he kept 
muttering. “So terribly thirsty.” 

“I can’t believe we’re going back into that room,” I whispered to Cara as 
we jogged over the smooth stone floor. “I can’t believe we’re going to help a 
vampire!” 

“We have no choice,” she replied. “We want to get rid of him—don’t we?” 

My shoes splashed through a puddle on the floor. I felt cold water on my 
ankles. The tunnel curved, and we followed it. Into the small, square room. 

Count Nightwing stepped up to his coffin, then turned back to us. “Where is 
the bottle?” he demanded. 

I picked up my flashlight from the floor. I clicked it. Once. Twice. No light. 
It must have broken when I dropped it. I set it back down on the floor. 

“The bottle,” the old vampire repeated. “I must have it.” 

“I think Freddy dropped it into the coffin,” Cara told him. She stepped to 



the center of the room and flashed her light up and down the purple velvet of the 
coffin. 

“No. It is not there,” Count Nightwing said impatiently. “Where is it? You 
must find it. You have no idea how thirsty I am. It’s been at least one hundred 
years!” 

He’s a good sleeper! I thought. 

“It must be somewhere on the floor,” Cara told him. 

“Well, find it! Find it!” the vampire shrieked. 

Cara and I began to search the floor. I walked beside her since she had the 
only light. 

She swept the flashlight up and down the bare floors. No sign of the blue 
bottle. 

“Where is it?” I whispered. “Where?” 

“It shouldn’t be so hard to find in an empty room!” Cara declared. 

“Do you think maybe it rolled out into the tunnel?” I suggested. 

Cara bit her bottom lip. “I don’t think so.” She raised her eyes from the 
floor and gazed at me. “We didn’t break it—did we?” 

“No. When I put the cap back on it, I set it down somewhere,” I replied. 

I glanced up to see the vampire glaring at us angrily. “I’m losing my 
patience,” he warned. He licked his dry lips. His icy eyes moved from me to 
Cara. 

“There it is!” Cara cried. Her beam of light froze at the base of the coffin. 
The blue bottle lay there on its side. 

I charged across the room, bent quickly, and picked up the Vampire Breath. 

Count Nightwing’s eyes flashed in excitement. A pale smile spread over his 
face. “Open it—now!” he ordered. “Open it, and I will be gone. Back to my 
time. Back to my beautiful castle. Good-bye, children. Good-bye. Open it! 
Quickly!” 

My hands trembled. I gripped the blue bottle tightly in my left hand. I 
lowered my right hand to the glass stopper on top of the bottle. 

I grabbed the stopper—and pulled it off the bottle. 

And waited. 

And waited. 

Nothing happened. 



13 


And then I heard a whoosh. 

I nearly dropped the bottle as a green mist sprayed up through the top. 
“Yessss!” I cried happily. The bottle wasn’t empty! 

The sickening odor made me gasp, then hold my breath. But I didn’t care 
about the smell. 

I watched the fog thicken, thicken until I couldn’t see the coffin in the 
middle of the room. Couldn’t see Cara. Couldn’t see the old vampire. 

The dark mist billowed and swirled. 

I wanted to cheer and jump up and down. Because I knew that Count 
Nightwing would disappear into the fog. And we would be safe. We would never 
see him again. 

“Cara—are you okay?” I called. My voice sounded hollow, muffled by the 
swirling fog. 

“It stinks !” she choked out. 

“Hold your breath,” I told her. “The last time, it faded away in a few 
seconds.” 

“It’s soooo disgusting!” she wailed. 

Cara was standing close beside me. But I couldn’t see her in the waves of 

mist. 

So damp and cold. I suddenly felt as if I were standing under water. 
Standing under the ocean as wave after wave rolled over me. 

I held my breath as long as I could. When my chest started to burn, I let it 
out in a long whoosh. 

I shut my eyes and prayed. Prayed for the fog to fade, for the mist to lower 
to the floor and disappear, as it had before. 

Please, please—I thought. Don’t let Cara and me drown in this disgusting 

mist. 

A few seconds later, I opened my eyes. 

Darkness all around. 

I blinked several times. A square of pale yellow light glowed in the 
distance. 

Moonlight pouring in through a window. 



Window? There is no window in this room! I told myself. 

I turned and saw Cara. She was swallowing hard, her eyes wide, glancing 
nervously around the room. “He—he’s gone,” she murmured. “Freddy—the 
vampire is gone.” 

I squinted into the dim light. “But where are we?” I whispered. I pointed to 
the open window far away, at the other end of the room. “There was no window 
before.” 

Cara chewed her bottom lip. “We’re not in the same room,” she said softly. 
“This room is so big and—” She stopped. 

“Coffins!” I cried. 

As my eyes adjusted to the light, the low, solid shapes formed out of the 
shadows. And I realized I was staring at two long, straight rows of coffins. 

“Where are we?” Cara cried, unable to hide the fear in her voice. “It must 
be some sort of graveyard or something!” 

“But we’re indoors,” I said. “We’re not in a graveyard. We’re in a room. A 
very long room.” 

I gazed up to the high ceilings. Two glass chandeliers hung down, their 
crystals gleaming dully in the pale moonlight. 

The dark walls were covered with huge paintings. Even in the dim light, I 
could see that they were portraits, portraits of stern-faced men and women in 
formal, old-fashioned, black clothes. 

I turned back to the rows of coffins—and silently started to count them. 
“There must be two dozen coffins in this room!” I whispered to Cara. 

“All lined up so perfectly in two straight rows,” she added. “Freddy, do you 
think—?” 

“He took us with him,” I murmured. 

“Huh?” Cara chewed her lip. 

“Count Nightwing. He took us with him,” I repeated. “He was supposed to 
go back to his castle—by himself. He said he would go and never see us again. 
But he took us with him, Cara. I’m sure he did.” 

Cara stared straight ahead at the rows of coffins. “But he can’t do that!” she 
cried. “He can’t!” 

I started to reply. But a sound made me stop. 

A creaking sound. 

I felt a chill sweep down my back as I heard another creaking, closer this 

time. 



Cara grabbed my arm. She heard it too. “Freddy—look!” she whispered. 
I squinted into the dim light. “The coffins—!” I whispered. 

They were all creaking open. 



14 


The coffin lids raised up slowly. I could see pale hands pushing them up from 
inside. Creaking, the lids swung open, then stopped. 

Cara and I huddled together, unable to move. Unable to take our eyes off 
the terrifying sight. 

I heard low moans and groans as the vampires sat up. Bony hands gripped 
the sides of the coffins. I heard coughing. Dry throats being cleared. 

The vampires pulled themselves up slowly. Their faces were yellow in the 
moonlight. Their eyes gleamed dully, a pale silver. 

“Ohhhhhhh.” Groans echoed off the high walls. Bones creaked and cracked. 

They looked so old. Older than the oldest people you see on the street. 
Their skin appeared so thin and was wrapped so tight, you could see the bones 
underneath. 

Living skeletons, I thought. Their ancient bones snapped as they moved. 

“Ohhhhhh.” They pulled themselves up. Legs, thin as spider legs, reached 
over the coffin sides. 

Cara and I finally moved. We backed into the deep shadows against the 

wall. 

I heard more coughing. Near the window, a white-haired vampire leaned 
over the edge of his coffin, making ugly choking sounds. 

“So thirsty...” I heard one of them whisper. 

“So thirsty... so thirsty...” others repeated. 

They lowered themselves from their coffins, stretching and groaning. 

“So thirsty... so thirsty...” they chanted. Their voices were dry and raspy, 
as if their throats were sore, as if their voices were only air. 

They were all dressed in black. Formal black suits. White shirt collars stiff 
and high over their chins. Some of them wore long, shiny capes. They adjusted 
their capes with bony, white fingers, sweeping them back over bent, skinny 
shoulders. 

“So thirsty... so thirsty...” Their silver eyes glowed brighter as they began 
to wake up. 

And then, standing in the aisle between the two rows of coffins, they began 
to flap their bony arms. Slowly at first. Their arms creaked as they pulled them 



up, then down. 

The silver eyes glowed in the pale, old faces. 

Up, then down. Up, then down. They flapped their arms faster, groaning 
and grunting. The sound echoed off the walls and the high ceiling. 

Flapping faster now. Flapping. Flapping. 

And as Cara and I gaped in amazement, the sickly, groaning old men began 
to shrink. The flapping arms became the flutter of black wings. The red eyes 
glowed from rodent-like faces. 

In seconds, they shrank and transformed. They all became fluttering, black 

bats. 

And turned their red eyes to Cara and me. 



15 


Did they see us? 

Could they see us in the deep darkness, our backs pressed against the stone 
wall? 

The bats fluttered up over the open coffins. Their flapping wings glistened, 
silvery in the moonlight. 

I heard a rattling, like the warning sound of a snake. But the rattling quickly 
became a hiss. 

The bats opened their mouths, revealing pointed yellow fangs—and hissed. 
What a sound! A shrill, angry whistle that rose higher, higher, until it drowned 
out the patter of their fluttering wings. 

A hiss of attack. 

They were awake and ready now. Ready to swoop at me, to knock me to the 
floor, to dig those pointed fangs deep into my skin. And drink... drink... 

“Freddy—!” Cara cried. She raised her hands in front of her to shield her 
face. “Freddy—!” 

The shrill hissing surrounded me. Seemed to be coming from inside my 
head. I covered my ears, trying to shut it out. 

Covered my ears. Watched their red, glowing eyes—and waited for the 
attack. 

But to my shock, the hissing bats didn’t swoop toward us. 

They fluttered up, up. Turned. And flapped in a line out the open window at 
the other end of the room. 

My mouth hung open. I realized I had stopped breathing. 

I watched them fade into the moonlight, shiny wings fluttering rapidly, the 
shrill hissing fading with them. 

Then I took a deep breath and slowly let it out. “Cara,” I whispered. “We’re 
okay. They didn’t see us back here.” 

She nodded but didn’t reply. A thick strand of her black hair had become 
matted to her forehead. She brushed it back with a trembling hand. 

“Wow,” she murmured, shaking her head. “Wow.” 

“We’re okay,” I repeated. My eyes checked out the long room. The open 
coffins stretched to the window. Their dark wood gleamed in the moonlight. 



Their long shadows crept along the floor. 

“We’re okay now,” I repeated to Cara. “We’re all alone.” 

Footsteps behind us made us both cry out. 

I heard a throat being cleared. 

I spun around so hard, I nearly toppled over. 

Count Nightwing strode into the room carrying a flaming torch. The 
torchlight flickered over his smooth face. His silvery eyes were wide with 
surprise. 

“What are you two doing here?” he demanded. 

I opened my mouth to reply. But a sputtering, choking sound was all I could 
force out. 

“You do not belong here,” the old vampire boomed. He waved the fiery 
torch in front of him. It left a trail of orange light as he swung it. “You have no 
right to be here. This is my time. And this is my castle.” 

He floated off the floor. His eyes suddenly glowed as brightly as the torch 
flame. “You do not belong here!” he repeated menacingly. 

“But—but—” I stammered, frightened and angry and confused—all at the 
same time. 

“But you brought us here!” Cara protested angrily. She waved her finger at 
him, accusing him. “We didn’t follow you!” 

“She’s right!” I finally found my voice. “You promised us you would go 
away and leave us alone. But you brought us back to your castle with you.” 

Still floating a few feet above the floor, Count Nightwing held the torch in 
one hand and rubbed his frail-looking chin with the other. “Hmmmmmm,” he 
murmured. His eyes glowed at us. “Hmmmmm.” 

“You have to send us home,” Cara told him, pressing her hands against her 
waist. 

“Yes!” I agreed. “Send us home—now.” 

Count Nightwing lowered himself silently to the floor. In the flickering 
torchlight, he suddenly looked weary. The light in his eyes dulled. He sighed. 

“Just send us home,” Cara insisted. “We won’t tell anyone we saw you. 
We’ll forget this whole thing happened.” 

The old vampire brushed back his cape. He shook his head. “I can’t send 
you home,” he whispered. 

“Why not?” I demanded. 

He sighed again. “I don’t know how.” 



“Huh?” Cara and I both gasped. 

“I don’t know how to send you home,” Count Nightwing repeated. “I’m a 
vampire—not a magician.” 

“But—but—but—” I started sputtering again. My whole body shook in 
total panic. 

“Then what are we going to do?” Cara demanded shrilly. 

The old vampire shrugged again. “It’s really no problem,” he replied softly. 
“No problem at all. As soon as I find my fangs, I’ll drink your blood. And I’ll 
turn you both into vampires.” 



16 


“But we want to go home!” I screamed. 

“We don’t want to be vampires!” Cara wailed. “This isn’t fair! We helped 
you. Now you have to help us!” 

The old vampire didn’t hear us. In the flickering orange light from the 
torch, I saw his eyes go all dreamy. His whole body appeared to flicker in and 
out with the light. 

“The Vampire Breath,” he whispered. “I need it—now.” 

“Send us home—now!” Cara ordered him. “I mean it. Send us home!” 

I balled my hands into fists. I felt so angry! 

I mean, we helped him return to his castle. And how was he going to pay us 
back? 

By biting our necks and turning us into vampires. By keeping us here 
forever. 

I tried to imagine what it would be like living here in this castle. Sleeping 
all day in a coffin. 

Rising up at night and turning into a bat. Flying out night after night in 
search of necks to bite. 

Forever. 

Just thinking about it made me shake with horror. 

I’ll never complain about having to baby-sit for Tyler Brown again, I 
decided. 

And then the horrifying thought made my heart skip: I may never see Tyler 
Brown again. 

Or Mom and Dad. Or any of my friends. 

“You’ve got to send us home!” I cried to Count Night wing. “You’ve got 

to!” 

He was pacing back and forth in front of us now, the torchlight dipping and 
darting. He didn’t pay any attention to us. I don’t think he even remembered that 
Cara and I were in the room. 

“Vampire Breath,” he repeated. “I must find the Vampire Breath” 

Where is the bottle of Vampire Breath ? I wondered. I was holding it in my 
hand when we opened it back in the little room. 



My eyes searched the floor. No sign of the little blue bottle. 

It must have disappeared when we traveled back in time, I realized. 

“Why do you need it?” Cara asked. 

The old vampire narrowed his eyes at her. “When he is awake, a vampire 
needs Vampire Breath every day,” he said softly. “We cannot live by blood 
alone.” 

Cara and I both stared at him, waiting for him to continue. “We all live 
together, here in my castle,” he explained in his hoarse, whispery voice. “We live 
here so we can be close to our supply of Vampire Breath. We each have our own 
bottles. We guard them closely.” 

He sighed. “But now I remember—the supply was running low. I was down 
to my last bottle. I must find it. I must!” 

“But what does it do for you?” I demanded. 

“Everything!” Count Nightwing shouted. “Vampire Breath does everything 
for a vampire! It allows us to travel in time. It can make us invisible and 
reappear again. It keeps our skin smooth and clear. It gives us energy. It helps us 
sleep. It keeps our bones from drying to powder. It freshens our breath!” 

“Wow,” I murmured, shaking my head. 

“But how will it help you find your fangs?” Cara demanded. 

“Vampire Breath restores the memory,” the old vampire told her. “When 
you live for hundreds of years, it’s hard to remember things. The Vampire Breath 
will help me remember where I put my fangs.” 

He spun around. His eyes locked on me. “The bottle. Do you still have it?” 

I could feel the power of his silvery eyes. I could feel them burning into me, 
searching my mind. 

“N-no—!” I stammered. “I don’t have it.” 

“But it won’t do you any good!” Cara cried. “We emptied it, remember? We 
emptied the whole bottle to get you back here.” 

Count Nightwing shook his head impatiently. “That was in the future,” he 
snapped. “That was over a hundred years in the future. This is 1880, remember? 
In 1880, the bottle is still full.” 

My head was spinning. I leaned against a coffin and tried to make sense of 
what he was saying. 

The old vampire started to pace again, rubbing his chin thoughtfully. “I hid 
the bottle somewhere,” he muttered. “I hid it so that the others couldn’t find it 
and use it while I took my nap. But where? Where did I hide it? I must find it. I 



must” 

He spun away from us, his long purple cape swirling behind him. The 
orange torchlight bounced ahead of him as he floated toward the doorway. 
“Where? Where?” he asked himself, shaking his head. 

A few seconds later, he vanished. 

Cara and I were left alone with the rows of coffins in the long room. Cara 
sighed unhappily. She motioned to the coffins. “I hope I get one near the 
window,” she joked. “I like a lot of fresh air.” 

I was still leaning against the nearest coffin. I stood up and slapped the side 
angrily with my hand. “I don’t believe this!” I cried. 

“I’m only twelve,” Cara moaned. “I’m not ready to die and then live 
forever!” 

I swallowed hard. “You know what we have to do—don’t you?” I said 
softly. “We have to find the Vampire Breath before Count Nightwing does. If he 
finds it first and gets his fangs back, we’re doomed.” 

“I don’t agree,” Cara replied sharply. “I have a much better plan.” 

“A better plan? What is it?” I demanded. 



17 


Cara glanced to the doorway, then back to me. “We have to get out of here,” she 
whispered. 

“That’s your plan?” I exclaimed. “That’s it? That’s a plan?” 

She nodded and raised a finger to her lips. “Maybe if we run away from the 
castle, we can find help,” she explained. “If we stay here, we’re doomed no 
matter what we do. If we stay here, we’re in his power.” 

“How is anyone going to help us?” I argued. “This is over a hundred years 
ago—remember? How will anyone outside the castle help us get back home to 
the future?” 

“I don’t know,” Cara replied unhappily. “I only know that if we stay here in 
this creepy castle, we don’t stand a chance.” 

I opened my mouth to argue some more. But I couldn’t think of anything 
else to say. 

Cara was probably right. Our only chance was to escape. 

“Come on,” she whispered. She grabbed my hand and started to pull me 
along the rows of coffins. 

I held back. “Where are we going?” 

She pointed. “To the window. Let’s see if we can climb out.” 

The room was as long as our school gym. We walked quickly between the 
two rows of open coffins. I couldn’t take my eyes off the old wooden coffins. 

Vampires sleep inside them. 

Those were the words that floated through my mind as we hurried past 
them. 

Cara and I may soon sleep in them, too. 

I shivered. And stopped. “Cara, look.” I pointed to the window up ahead. 
“This is a waste of time.” 

She sighed. She saw what I meant. The big window was set very high up in 
the wall. It stood way over our heads. 

We couldn’t reach it even if we had a ladder. 

“The only way to get through that window is to fly,” I said softly. 

Cara frowned and stared up at the window. “I hope you and I don’t spend 
the rest of our lives flapping our bat wings and flying in and out of that 



window,” she said. 

“There’s got to be a way out of this castle,” I told her, forcing myself to 
sound cheerful. “Come on. Let’s find the front door.” 

“Freddy—no.” Cara pulled me back. “We can’t just go running down the 
halls. Count Nightwing will see us.” 

“We’ll be careful,” I said. “Come on, Cara. We’ll find a way out.” 

We turned and jogged side by side past the empty coffins. Through the 
door. And into a long, dimly lit hallway. 

The hall appeared to stretch for miles. Dark wood doors lined both sides. 
The doors were all closed. Above each door, a gas lamp provided a soft glow of 
yellow light. 

My shoes sank into the thick, blue carpet. The air smelled sour. I glanced 
back at the coffin room. An ugly stone gargoyle leered down at me, perched 
above the door. 

I turned away from its evil stare and gazed up and down the long hall. The 
rows of doors stretched in both directions. “Which way?” I whispered. 

Cara shrugged. “It doesn’t really matter. We just have to find a door or 
window that will take us outside.” 

We made our way silently over the thick carpet. The gas lamps cast a 
gloomy, dim light. Our shadows seemed to hide behind us as we walked. 

Cara and I stopped at the first door we came to. I grabbed the brass knob 
and turned it. The heavy door creaked as it opened. 

We peered into a large, square room filled with furniture. The furniture was 
all covered with white sheets. Chairs rose up like ghosts beside a long, covered 
couch. In a corner beside a darkened fireplace, a grandfather clock stood 
guarding the room. 

Cara pointed to the heavy black drapes that stretched over the far wall. 
“There must be a window behind there. Let’s check it out.” 

We raced across the room. My shoes slipped on the floor. Glancing down, I 
saw nearly an inch of dust spread over the floor. 

“I don’t think this room has been used for a while,” I said. 

Cara didn’t reply. She grabbed an end of the heavy drape and tugged. I 
reached to help her. The drape slid back. A dust-smeared window stood behind 
it. 

“Great!” I cried. 

“Not so great,” Cara replied glumly. 



I saw instantly what she meant. The window had thick black bars across it. 

“Uggggh.” With a disgusted groan, Cara shoved the drape back into place. 
We hurried back into the hall and tried the door across the hall. We stepped into 
a small room filled with luggage trunks. The trunks were stacked on top of each 
other up to the high ceiling. 

No window in this room. 

The next room had an enormous, old dark wood desk in its center and 
shelves of ancient-looking books from floor to ceiling. Another heavy, black 
drape covered the window. 

I eagerly pulled the drape back—to find another dust-covered window. And 
more thick, black bars. “Weird,” I muttered. 

“This castle is like a prison,” Cara said in a shaky whisper. Her dark eyes 
glowed with fear. “But there has got to be a way out.” 

We crept back into the long hall. I stopped when I heard a soft fluttering 
sound. 

Bat wings? 

Were the vampires returning? 

Cara heard it, too. “Hurry,” she whispered. 

We pushed open the next door and darted inside. I carefully closed the door 
behind us. Then I turned and saw that we had entered a big dining room. 

The long table filled most of the room. It was bare except for a tall 
candelabra in its center. Stubs of white candles poked up in the candelabra. Wax 
had dripped in small puddles onto the tabletop. The puddles were buried in a 
gray layer of dust. 

“No one has been in here in a long time,” I muttered. 

Cara was already at the window. She pulled back the drape to reveal 
another barred window. 

“Aaaggggh!” She tore at her hair in frustration. “Every window! Every 
window has bars!” she wailed. “And we can’t keep walking through these halls. 
Someone will find us.” 

Staring at the long, dust-covered dining room table, I had an idea. 
“Vampires don’t eat,” I said. 

“So what?” Cara cried. She slammed her fist against the heavy black drape. 

“So they probably never go in the kitchen,” I continued. “We’ll be safe in 
the kitchen. And maybe there is a kitchen door. Maybe...” 

Cara sighed. “Maybe. Maybe. Maybe.” She shook her head glumly. “There 



are a thousand rooms in this creepy old castle. How will we even find the 
kitchen?” 

I took her by the shoulders and guided her to the door. “Well, this is the 
dining room, right? Maybe the kitchen is close to the dining room.” 

“Maybe maybe maybe,” she repeated bitterly. 

I guided her into the hall, then led the way to the next door. We pushed it 
open and peeked inside. 

No. Not the kitchen. 

We quickly crept down the hall, trying door after door. 

No kitchen. No kitchen. 

We kept glancing back, watching for Count Nightwing, hoping we wouldn’t 
bump into him. 

We turned a corner. Found ourselves in a narrower, darker hallway. I tried 
the first door. 

Yes! 

An old-fashioned kitchen with a wide fireplace hearth, a wood-burning 
stove, and blackened pots and pans hanging on the wall beside the hearth. 

My eyes glanced quickly around the room. And landed at the broad kitchen 
window. 

No black drape. And no bars! 

“Yaaaay!” Cara cheered. 

We both dove for the window. Could we open it? 

We tried pushing it up from the bottom. But there were no handles, no place 
to grip the frame. 

“Smash it!” Cara cried. “Smash the window open!” 

I ran to the wall and pulled down a heavy metal skillet. I lugged it to the 
window. Pulled back my arm. Prepared to swing. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I heard a cough. 

Behind us. From the hallway. 

“It’s him!” I whispered. “It’s Count Nightwing!” 

“Smash the window!” Cara insisted. 

“No. He’ll hear us! He’ll find us!” I whispered back. 

I lowered the skillet to the floor. And turned back to study the window. 

Another cough. Closer this time. 

“Look,” I whispered to Cara. “It pushes out, I think.” I reached with both 
hands and pushed at the dust-smeared windowpane. 



Leaned into it. Pushed with all my strength. 

Slowly, slowly, the window slid out. With a groan, I pushed it open as far as 
it would go. 

A gust of cool night air swept over me. I grabbed Cara’s hand and started to 
give her a boost. 

A noise behind us at the doorway made me jump. “Hurry—!” I whispered. 
“He’s coming!” 

My heart pounding, I pushed Cara up to the window. Then we both 
scrambled frantically out onto the ledge. 



18 


“Did he see us? Was he in the kitchen?” Cara whispered. 

“I don’t know,” I told her. “I didn’t see. But he was definitely in the hall.” 

“If he saw us...” Cara started. A gust of wind drowned out the rest of her 
words. 

The night wind felt cool and refreshing on my skin. Heavy clouds floated 
over the full moon, plunging us into total darkness. 

We were both on our knees, our backs to the kitchen. Huddled close beside 
Cara, I struggled to keep my balance on the narrow stone window ledge. 

“Let’s get going,” I urged. 

We both turned and faced the window. Then, gripping the stone ledge with 
both hands, we began lowering our legs down the wall, lowering ourselves to the 
ground. 

Lower. Lower... 

“Hey—!” I cried out when my feet didn’t touch anything solid. 

A shaft of moonlight broke through the clouds. 

I looked down. 

And opened my mouth in a hoarse scream. 

My feet kicked the air. My hands gripped the ledge above me. 

I stared down into empty space. 

Far below I could see dark, jagged rocks glowing dully in the moonlight. 

Far below! 

Miles below! 

“We—we’re on top of a cliff!” Cara stammered. “The castle—it’s built on a 
cliff!” 

“Ohhhhh.” I uttered a terrified moan. 

The castle was built on top of a sheer rock cliff. And we were now dangling 
over the side. Dangling by our arms. Dangling... 

My arms started to ache. I could feel my hands slipping, losing their grip on 
the stone window ledge above me. 

“Cara—!” I gasped. 



19 


My hands scraped the dark stones of the wall. 

I struggled to grab on to something— anything ! 

But I was falling too fast. 

My feet kicked. I thrashed my arms. The wind rushed up at me as if trying 
to push me back up. 

Was that me howling like that? 

I was falling too fast to hear my own scream. 

And then suddenly I stopped. 

Stopped screaming. Stopped falling. 

A black shadow swept around me. I felt something sharp dig into my 
shoulders. Hot breath grazed the back of my neck. 

I heard a loud flapping sound. A fluttering heartbeat. 

Gripped inside this shadow, I felt myself being pulled up. 

I twisted my head back—and saw two glowing red eyes. The hot breath 
poured from its dark gaping mouth. 

It’s going to eat me! I realized. 

I’m trapped inside this red-eyed shadow. Trapped in its talons as it carries 
me higher. Higher. 

And then darkness surrounded me. 

I landed somewhere. Landed hard on my feet with a loud thud. 

The darkness lifted. I opened my eyes and saw Cara. Her mouth dropped 
open in amazement. “Freddy—!” she choked out. “Freddy—?” 

I spun toward the big open window to see the giant bat that had carried me 
back to the kitchen. Its wings flapped against the floor. The red eyes glowed 
angrily from its big, ugly face. 

It saved our lives! I realized. 

I collapsed to my knees. I grabbed the side of the stove to hold myself up. 

I’m okay. I’m going to be okay, I told myself. 

I raised my eyes to the enormous bat. 

It started to shrink. It tucked itself inside its black wings. Wrapped the 
wings around its body. 



The wings melted into a cape. A purple cape. And as the cape swept back, 
Count Nightwing appeared. 

“You made a serious mistake, young man,” he scolded sternly. His strange, 
silver eyes burned angrily into mine. “Did you think you could fly?” he 
demanded with a sneer. “You are not ready to fly—yet!” 

“I—I—I—” I was still shaking too hard to speak. 

“When I turn you into a vampire, you can fly every night,” Count 
Nightwing snarled. He lowered his face close to mine, so close I could smell the 
decay of his pale skin. “Don’t try to escape again,” he growled. “It is a waste of 
time. And the next time... I won’t catch you.” 

I swallowed hard. I held my breath, trying to force my heart to stop 
pounding so hard. 

Count Nightwing turned away from me. Swirling the purple cape behind 
him, he floated past Cara, through the kitchen. 

He stopped at the door and swung back to us. “Don’t just stand there,” he 
ordered. “Come help me find the Vampire Breath. I know it’s somewhere in this 
wing of the castle.” 

He grabbed his pale throat. “I’m so thirsty... so thirsty.” His silvery eyes 
locked on Cara, then on me. “I must remember where I hid my fangs. Hurry. 
Help find the Vampire Breath. It’s somewhere nearby. I’m certain of it.” 

Cara and I had no choice. He stood at the doorway, waiting for us to follow 

him. 

Holding on to the stove, I pulled myself to my feet. Then I followed Cara 
through the kitchen to the hall. 

“Perhaps I hid the bottle in the royal guest room,” Count Nightwing said, 
talking to himself. He pushed open a door and vanished inside the room. 

Cara and I kept walking. The hallways appeared to stretch for miles ahead 
of us. Door after door after door. And this was only one wing of the old 
vampire’s castle. 

“Are you okay?” Cara asked, studying me as we walked. “You still look 
kind of shaky.” 

“I am kind of shaky,” I confessed. “After all, I fell off a cliff!” 

Cara shook her head. “It isn’t going to be easy to escape.” 

“We can’t escape,” I replied. “The castle was built up here on top of the 
cliff to keep anyone from escaping.” 

She brushed a strand of black hair from her eyes. “We can’t give up, 



Freddy. We have to keep trying. As soon as he finds his fangs, he’s going to turn 
us into vampires.” 

“That’s why my first plan is the best,” I insisted. “We have to find the bottle 
of Vampire Breath before he does. Maybe we’ll get lucky. Maybe we’ll find it 
first.” 

“But what will we do with it once we have it?” Cara demanded. 

“Mainly keep it from him!” I declared. 

I pulled her into the next room. We both gasped when we saw the coffins. 

Dozens of them. All lined up perfectly in four rows, the length of the room. 
All open. 

“Another vampire bedroom!” Cara cried. She shivered. “It’s so creepy, 
Freddy. Look how many there are!” 

“The vampires are all out somewhere, swooping around, searching for 
blood to drink,” I said. “But soon they’ll be flying home. And when they see 
us...” 

Cara gulped. “We’ll be their dessert!” 

“Uh... maybe we should search for the Vampire Breath in another room,” I 
suggested. “Somewhere away from these coffins.” 

But then my eye fell on something. A coffin against the wall. 

A closed coffin. 

“Cara—look at that!” I whispered, pointing. “All the other coffins were left 
open. That’s the only one with a closed lid. Do you think—?” 

Cara squinted at the closed coffin. “Weird,” she murmured. “Very weird.” 

My brain whirred with crazy ideas. “Maybe it’s an empty coffin,” I 
suggested excitedly. “Maybe no one sleeps in that coffin. That would make it the 
perfect place. The perfect place to hide a bottle of Vampire Breath.” 

Cara held me back. “Or maybe a vampire is sleeping in the coffin,” she 
warned. “If we open the coffin and wake him up...” Her voice trailed off. 

“We have to look inside!” I exclaimed. “We have to take that chance.” 

We made our way to the coffin. I stared at the polished, dark wood of the 
lid. I cautiously ran a hand over the smooth wood. 

Then, without saying a word, Cara grabbed one handle, and I grabbed the 
other. And slowly, slowly, we began to lift the coffin lid. 



20 


The lid was solid and heavy. Cara and I leaned into it and pushed. Finally, it 
dropped to the other side of the coffin. 

I turned to the door to make sure Count Nightwing hadn’t heard. 

No sign of him. 

I pulled myself up straight and peered into the open coffin. The inside was 
covered with dark green felt. It reminded me of the pool table in our basement. 

I sighed. I wondered if I’d ever see my basement again. 

“It’s empty,” Cara murmured sadly. “Just an empty coffin.” 

“We’ve got to keep searching,” I said. I started to back away from the coffin 
when I saw the pocket. 

A green pocket in the side of the coffin. Like the pockets on the sides of 
suitcases. It bulged out a little from the side. 

“Whoa. Hold on a minute,” I told Cara. She was already halfway to the 
door, I reached into the pocket. 

And pulled out a blue glass bottle. 

“Cara—look!” I cried. I forgot that we didn’t want Count Nightwing to hear 
us. “I found it! The Vampire Breathl” 

A smile broke out over Cara’s face. Her dark eyes flashed with excitement. 
“Excellent!” she exclaimed. “Excellent! Now we’ve got to hide it from Count 
Nightwing. Somewhere he’ll never find it.” 

I held the bottle up close to my face and studied it. “Maybe we should open 
it and pour it all out,” I said. 

Cara rushed up beside me. She took the bottle from my hand. “When we 
opened it before, it took us back in time,” she said excitedly. “Maybe if we 
opened it now...” 

“It will take us forward in time! ” I finished her thought for her. “Yes! Count 
Nightwing said it can be used for time travel. Maybe if we open it—and think 
real hard about where we want to go—it will take us home to my basement.” 

We both stared at the blue bottle. 

Should we hide it and keep it away from the old vampire to stop him from 
getting back his fangs? 

Or should we open it up and hope that the smelly mist would carry us 



home? 

Cara gripped the bottle tightly in one hand. 

She raised her other hand to the glass stopper on the top. 

She started to pull it open—then stopped. 

We stared at each other. We didn’t speak. 

“Go ahead. Do it,” I whispered. 

Cara nodded in agreement. She squeezed the stopper again and started to 

pull. 

But she stopped once again. And gasped. 

Out of the corner of my eye, I saw something move. I heard a soft footstep. 
And I realized that we were no longer alone. 



21 


I spun around, expecting to find Count Nightwing. 

“Oh!” I cried out when a girl stepped out of the shadows. 

Her pale blue eyes were wide with shock. I think she was as surprised to see 
us as we were to see her! 

As she stepped toward us, I saw that she had ringlets of blond curls that fell 
past her shoulders. She wore a gray jumper, very long and old-fashioned, with a 
white blouse underneath. 

She’s about our age, I realized. But definitely from a different time. 

She stopped several coffins away. “Who are you?” she asked, eyeing us 
suspiciously. “What are you doing here?” 

“We—we don’t really know,” I stammered. 

“We know who we are. But we don’t really know what we’re doing here!” 
Cara corrected me. 

“We got here by accident,” I added. 

The girl’s confused expression didn’t change. She tucked her hands into the 
pockets of her jumper. 

“Who are you?” Cara demanded. 

The girl didn’t answer right away. Keeping her distance, she continued to 
study us with her pale blue eyes. “Gwendolyn,” she said finally. “My name is 
Gwendolyn.” 

“Are you one of them?” The question popped out of my mouth. 

Gwendolyn shuddered. “No,” she answered quickly. Her mouth curled into 
an angry sneer. “No. I hate them!” she declared. “I hate them all!” 

Cara shifted her weight tensely. I could see that she was really nervous. She 
handed the bottle of Vampire Breath to me. The bottle felt cold and damp from 
Cara’s hands. I lowered it to my side, out of Gwendolyn’s sight. 

“Do you live here?” Cara asked Gwendolyn. “Are you related to Count 
Nightwing?” 

Gwendolyn’s sneer grew more bitter. “No,” she choked out. Tears welled in 
her eyes. “I’m a prisoner here. I’m only twelve. But they treat me as a slave.” 

She let the tears run down her pale cheeks. “A slave,” she repeated in a 
trembling voice. “Do you know what they force me to do? Clean and polish their 



coffins, night and day.” 

“Yuck,” Cara murmured. 

Gwendolyn sighed. She brushed her blond ringlets off her face and wiped 
away a tear. “Night and day. There are a dozen coffin rooms in this castle. All 
filled with row after row of coffins. And I must keep them smooth and shiny and 
clean for the vampires.” 

“What if you refuse?” I asked. “What if you tell Count Nightwing you 
won’t do it anymore?” 

Gwendolyn uttered a dry laugh. “Then he’ll turn me into a vampire.” She 
shuddered again. “I’d rather clean their coffins,” she murmured bitterly. 

“Can’t you escape?” I asked. 

Another dry laugh escaped her lips. “Escape? If I did, they would track me 
down. They would turn into bats and fly after me. And they would drink my 
blood until I was one of them.” 

I swallowed hard. I felt so bad for her. I didn’t know what to say. 

“We don’t belong here,” Cara told her, glancing to the door. “Count 
Nightwing brought us here by accident. Can you help us? Is there any way for us 
to escape?” 

Gwendolyn lowered her gaze to the floor, thinking hard. “There may be a 
way,” she said finally. “But we’ll have to be very careful. If he catches us...” 

“We’ll be careful,” I promised. 

Gwendolyn glanced to the front of the room. 

“Follow me,” she whispered. “Hurry. It is almost dawn. If the vampires 
return and see you—it will be too late. They will pounce on you and drink your 
blood. You will never see daylight again.” 

She led us into the hall. Clinging to the wall, we stopped and looked in both 
directions. 

No sign of Count Nightwing. But we knew he was nearby. Searching for 
the bottle of Vampire Breath. The bottle I held tightly in my hand. 

“This way,” Gwendolyn whispered. 

We followed her through another door. It led to a narrow stairway. Gas 
lamps on the wall cast a dim glow, lighting the stairs as we made our way down. 

We found ourselves in a long, twisting tunnel. Gwendolyn led us through it, 
walking rapidly, silently. The tunnel was so narrow, we had to walk single file. It 
twisted and curved, and took us down, deeper into the castle. 

“Is there really a way out down here?” Cara asked Gwendolyn. Cara’s voice 



echoed in the narrow tunnel. 

Gwendolyn nodded. “Yes. Follow me. There is a secret exit through the 
castle cellar.” 

Our footsteps thudded on the hard tunnel floor. Up ahead of us, 
Gwendolyn’s blond hair glowed like a torch leading the way. 

The way to freedom. The way to safety. 

I leaned close to Cara and whispered. “This is great! We’re getting out of 
here—and we’re taking the Vampire Breath with us!” 

Cara raised a finger to her lips. “We’re not out yet,” she reminded me. 

The tunnel emptied into a huge, dark cellar. Gwendolyn pulled a flaming 
torch off the wall and carried it high in front of her to light our way. 

“Follow me,” she whispered. “Hurry.” 

The flickering torch cast a narrow path of light through the cellar. I couldn’t 
see anything on either side of us. Total blackness. 

Gwendolyn led us deeper into the darkness. It smelled damp and sour down 
here. Somewhere in the distance I heard water dripping. 

Cara and I huddled close together, trying to stay in the light of the torch. I 
squeezed the bottle of Vampire Breath tightly in my hand. 

Gwendolyn stopped so suddenly, we nearly walked into her. 

She turned slowly. The torchlight revealed a smile on her face. 

“Are we here?” Cara demanded. “Where is the door?” 

“Yes. We’re here,” Gwendolyn replied in a whisper. “We’re all alone here.” 

“Huh?” I cried. I didn’t understand. 

“I have you all to myself here,” Gwendolyn continued. Her smile grew 
wider. Her eyes were half-shut. “We won’t be interrupted by Count Nightwing or 
the others.” 

“But—where do we escape?” I demanded. 

Gwendolyn didn’t reply. 

“Why have we stopped here?” Cara cried. 

“I’m so thirsssssty....” Gwendolyn hissed. “So thirssssty...” 

As she lowered the torch, I saw long, pointed fangs slide down her chin. 

“I’m so thirsty....” She sighed. “So terribly thirsty...” 

She grabbed me by the shoulders. And I felt the scratch of her fangs against 
my throat. 



22 


“No—!” I screamed. 

I grabbed her arms and shoved her off me. 

“No! Get away! Get away from me!” I howled. 

Her eyes flashed excitedly. Saliva dripped from her pointed fangs. “So 
thirssssty...” she hissed. 

“Get away! Get away!” I pleaded. 

“You want to escape, don’t you?” she teased. “This is the only way to 
escape!” 

She tossed back her head and opened her mouth wide. Then she dove for 
me. 

“No way!” I cried. I ducked away. Her long, curly hair slapped against my 
face. I staggered back. Caught my balance. 

She prepared to attack again. 

“Freddy—the Vampire BreathV’ Cara cried. “Use the Vampire Breathl 
Maybe it will take us to the future!” 

“Huh?” I had forgotten I had it in my hand. 

“So thirsty...” Gwendolyn murmured, licking her dry lips. “So thirsty...” 

I raised the Vampire Breath high. The blue glass bottle caught the light from 
the torch. 

Gwendolyn gasped and drew back in fear. 

I grabbed the top. And started to pull. 

“No—please!” Gwendolyn begged. “Put that down! Don’t open it! Please 
—don’t open it!” 

I squeezed the glass top—and pulled open the bottle. 



23 


Nothing happened. 

All three of us stared at the open blue bottle in my hand. 

“It takes a few seconds,” I told Cara. My voice came out high and shaky. 
“Remember? Back in my basement, it took a few seconds. Then it came 
whooshing out.” 

Gwendolyn’s eyes were wide, locked on the bottle. 

We stared in tense silence. 

A few seconds went by. Then a few more seconds. 

Gwendolyn broke the silence with a gleeful laugh. “It’s empty!” she 
declared through her laughter. “The castle is filled with empties! There’s a whole 
room of them over there.” She pointed into the darkness. 

I raised the bottle to my face and squinted inside. Too dark to see anything. 
But Gwendolyn was right. It was definitely empty. 

I let it fall to the floor. 

Gwendolyn’s grin was so evil in the shadowy light from the torch. I tried to 
back away. But I bumped into a stone column. 

Trapped. 

As she grinned so hungrily at me, Gwendolyn’s fangs shone in the pale 
light. “So thirsty...” she whispered. “Freddy—don’t run away. Help me. I’m so 
thirsty....” 

“I’m thirsty, too!” a voice boomed from behind me. 

I spun around to see a flash of orange torchlight. The light bounced toward 
us. And inside it, I saw the angry face of Count Nightwing. 

He floated to us, his eyes narrowed at Gwendolyn. 

Her mouth dropped open. She raised both hands in front of her, as if to 
shield herself. 

“Gwendolyn—what are you doing down here with my prisoners?” Count 
Nightwing demanded angrily. 

He didn’t give her a chance to reply. He floated up off the floor, floated 
over her. His cape floated out like bat wings. His silvery eyes locked on hers. 
And he opened his mouth in a furious hiss. 

Gwendolyn’s fangs glistened wetly in the torchlight. She tossed back her 



blond ringlets and, still shielding herself with both hands, hissed up at the old 
vampire. 

Oh, wow! I thought, They’re going to fight! 

I leaned forward, horrified—but eager to watch. 

The two vampires floated off the floor. They hissed at each other again, like 
two snakes about to strike. 

“Freddy—come on!” Cara whispered. She grabbed my arm and pulled. 
“This is our chance.” 

Cara was right. While the two vampires hissed at each other, we had to try 
to get away. 

My heart pounding, I grabbed Gwendolyn’s torch off the floor and darted 
after Cara. 

We ran blindly through the dark basement. 

There’s got to be a way out! I repeated to myself. There’s got to be a way to 
escape! 

Finally, I saw an open door. 

Cara and I burst through the door. I glanced back. I saw Count Nightwing 
floating high off the floor. His cape swirled behind him. Gwendolyn hissed up at 
him weakly from the cellar floor. 

No time to watch their fight. I followed Cara into the room. “Where are 
we?” I whispered. 

I raised the torch in front of us. 

“Wow,” Cara murmured as the shelves against the wall came into the light. 
“I don’t believe it!” 

We had found the room of empty Vampire Breath bottles that Gwendolyn 
had told us about. Shelves covered every wall from floor to ceiling. And each 
shelf was crammed with blue bottles. Stacks and stacks of blue glass bottles. 

“There must be a million empty bottles in here!” I whispered. 

We gazed around the room. The bottles sparkled like blue jewels, caught in 
the light from the torch. 

Cara shook her head hard, as if trying to shake the amazing sight from her 
eyes. She turned to me, her expression solemn. “This isn’t helping us escape,” 
she whispered. 

“Escape?” a hoarse voice rasped from the doorway. 

Count Nightwing moved quickly into the room. “There is no need to talk of 
escape,” he said, narrowing his strange silver eyes at Cara, then at me. “For there 



is no escape from Count Nightwing’s castle.” 

He raised his cape and floated off the floor. 

“What are you g-going to do?” I stammered. 

He tossed back his bald head and uttered a frightening hiss. 

I felt myself pushed back, back, deeper into the room. He was using some 
kind of force, some kind of ancient power. 

He floated higher. The cape billowed around him. He looked like a frail 
insect inside a purple cocoon. But I could feel his power. 

Pushing me back.... Holding me.... Pushing me.... 

And then, suddenly, I felt him let go. 

He dropped heavily to the floor. His eyes flashed. He snapped his bony 
fingers. 

A thin-lipped smile creased his face. “Yesssss!” he hissed. 

Cara and I backed up to the shelves at the far wall. My legs were trembling 
now. He had gripped me in some kind of ancient force. And now I felt totally 
shaky. I struggled to catch my breath. 

“Yessss!” he hissed again. “I remember now!” 



24 


Cara and I stared at the old vampire in silence. He turned to the shelves of blue 
bottles. 

“This is where I hid my full bottle of Vampire Breath,” he told us. “I hid it 
here in the empties room. I knew the others would never look here.” 

As he smiled, I could see his gums, soft and smooth inside the dry-lipped 
mouth. His smile faded. And his silvery eyes narrowed. 

“I’m so thirsty,” he whispered, eyeing Cara and me. “I must find the full 
bottle—refresh my memory—and get back my fangs.” 

He dove for the nearest shelf and began pawing through the blue bottles. 
“Which one? Which one?” he muttered to himself. “Thousands of bottles, and 
only one is full.” 

His small, bony hands moved quickly over the shelf. He pushed aside 
empties, muttering to himself. Bottles crashed to the floor, shattering into pieces. 

“Cara—quick!” I pointed to the far shelf. “Let’s move!” 

She understood me instantly. We had to find the full bottle first. We had to 
find it before Count Nightwing did. 

I dropped to my knees and began sifting through the bottles on the bottom 
shelf. Empty... empty... empty... empty... 

I pushed them aside one by one. My fingers moved quickly over the glass 
tops. I squinted hard in the dim light, searching, searching for the only full 
bottle. 

Glass shattered on the hard floor. Bottles rolled and spun all around me. 

Beside me, Cara worked frantically over a low shelf. “No. No. No. No.” 
She muttered to herself as she moved her hands over the empty bottles. 

“You two—” Count Nightwing called from across the room. “Get away 
from there! ” 

We ignored him. We kept pawing through the bottles, working faster, faster. 
Desperate to find the full one first. 

And then—my hand landed on it. 

I sucked in a deep breath when I realized it felt heavier than the others. My 
hand trembled as I carefully lifted it out from the others. 

Yes! It definitely felt heavy. Yes! It was still sealed shut. Yes! 



“I found it!” I cried, jumping to my feet. “Cara—look! I’ve got it!” 

I raised the full bottle up to show it to her—and Count Nightwing grabbed 
it from my hand. 

“Thank you,” he said. 



25 


With an eager smile, the old vampire raised the bottle and reached to open it. 

“Noooo!” I howled. 

I leaped at him. Caught him by surprise. 

I shoved my shoulder into his chest. He felt light and feathery, as if he had 
no bones at all. 

He uttered a startled choking sound. 

The bottle of Vampire Breath flew from his hand. 

I reached out—and grabbed it in the air. 

Holding it tightly in both hands, I backed toward the shelves. 

Count Nightwing recovered quickly. He narrowed his eyes at me, and once 
again, I felt his strange power holding me, holding me in place. 

“Freddy, you will hand the bottle to me now,” he ordered in a soft, calm 
voice. 

I didn’t move. I couldn’t. 

“Hand the bottle to me now,” the old vampire insisted, floating toward me, 
his bony hand outstretched. “You will hand it to me, Freddy.” 

I swallowed hard. I couldn’t give him the Vampire Breath. I knew that Cara 
and I were doomed if Count Nightwing opened it. 

But I couldn’t move. He had frozen me there. I was helpless! 

“Hand it to me,” he insisted. He reached for the bottle. 

“Monkey in the Middle!” I heard Cara call. 

She seemed far away. And at first, her words didn’t make any sense to me. 

“Monkey in the Middle!” she called again. 

This time, I understood. 

I sucked in a deep breath. It took all my strength to move my arm. 

Count Nightwing swiped at the bottle. His bony fingertips brushed against 
it. 

But I tossed the bottle high over his shoulder. 

Cara hobbled it, fumbled it into the air—and then grabbed it. “The catch of 
the day!” she cried. 

With an angry groan, Count Nightwing spun around. “Give me that!” he 



rasped. He dove toward Cara. 

She pulled her arm back and heaved the bottle to me. A low toss which 
zipped past the old vampire’s knees. I caught it at my shoelaces. 

Count Nightwing whirled back to me. His strange eyes narrowed in fury. “I 
want that bottle!” he snarled. 

I tossed it high, over his head. Cara caught it in one hand. 

When we baby-sat for Tyler Brown, Cara and I played Monkey in the 
Middle all the time. That little shrimp could never take the ball away from us. 
We could keep him running back and forth for hours! 

But I knew Count Nightwing would soon run out of patience. There was no 
way Cara and I could win this game. 

But what else could we do? 

The old vampire dove for Cara, his hands outstretched, his cape flying. 

Cara tossed off-balance. I stretched for the bottle. But it sailed past my open 
hand. 

And crashed into a shelf. 

Bottles toppled and broke. 

Count Nightwing flew to the shelf. He grabbed blindly at the bottles. 

But I got there first. I picked up the bottle and tossed it to Cara. 

“No—!” Count Nightwing rasped. “Enough!” 

He hurtled toward Cara. 

She tossed the bottle to me, a high throw over the old vampire’s head. 

I raised my hands to catch it. 

But to my surprise, Count Nightwing flew straight up—and caught the 
bottle in both hands. 

As he sailed slowly back to the floor, a pleased smile spread over his face. 
“I win,” he said softly, his eyes flashing. “I win. It helps to be able to fly.” 

He raised the bottle in front of him. 

“No—don’t!” I begged. 

His smile grew even wider. He reached out—and pulled the top off the 
bottle. 



26 


All three of us froze. And stared at the open bottle in Count Nightwing’s hand. 

“No,” Cara murmured. “No—please.” 

A few seconds passed. A few more seconds. 

“Nothing is happening,” Count Nightwing whispered. His smile faded. He 
raised the bottle to his face and tilted it to see inside. 

Beneath the purple cape, his slender shoulders slumped. He sighed, a long, 
dry sigh. “Empty,” he said. “This bottle is empty, too.” 

Cara and I exchanged glances. I suddenly knew what had happened. In my 
wild scramble to pick up the bottle, I had grabbed the wrong one off the shelf. 

Sure enough. I turned to the shelf—and spotted the full bottle right in front 
of me. 

“I have it!” I cried. I picked it up carefully from the shelf. “I have it!” 

The old vampire let out a furious growl. He leaped at me. 

“Cara—catch!” I screamed. 

I heaved the bottle to her. 

But Count Nightwing swung his arm. His hand slapped the bottle in midair. 

“Oh—!” I gasped as the bottle sailed into the wall. 

It bounced off. Crashed to the floor. Cracked open. 

And the sour, dark mist poured up into the room. 

“We’ve lost,” I murmured. “We’re doomed.” 



27 


I tried to hold my breath, but it didn’t help. The foul odor of the rising fog 
seemed to seep into my skin. 

Across the room, I saw Cara cup a hand tightly over her nose and mouth. 
Her dark eyes grew wide in fright. She waved her other hand frantically, trying 
to fan the smelly fog away from her. 

I choked on it. My eyes started to burn. I closed them. Felt hot tears seep 
down my cheeks. 

When I opened my eyes, I couldn’t see Cara anymore. The fog had grown 
too thick. 

I could see Count Nightwing’s purple cape, dark inside the mist. Then it 
disappeared, too. 

And I was alone. Alone inside a thick, billowing cloud. 

I dropped to my knees. Covered my face with both hands. I tried not to 
breathe. I could taste the foul mist on my tongue! 

How long did I kneel there? I’m not sure. 

But when I finally opened my burning eyes, the fog was fading. 

Count Nightwing’s purple cape came back into view as the mist lowered 
itself to the floor. And I saw Cara across the room, shielding her face with one 
arm. 

The fog continued to melt away. 

The room came back into focus. 

And I realized I was staring at an air hockey game. 

I blinked several times. A pool table stood in the center of the room. 

Pool table? Air hockey? 

Cara came running over to me, her dark eyes flashing with excitement. 
“We’re back, Freddy!” she cried happily. “We’re back in your basement!” 

“Yesssss!” I cheered. I pumped both fists in the air. “Yessss!” 

I staggered across the room and hugged the air hockey game. Then I kissed 
the wall. I actually kissed the wall! 

“We’re back! We’re back!” Cara chanted, jumping up and down. “The 
Vampire Breath —it brought us back to your house, Freddy!” 

“Noooooo!” 



I turned to see Count Nightwing toss back his head in a long, angry wail. 
He swirled his cape behind him, then clasped his hands into tight fists. 

“Noooooo! Noooooo! This can’t be happening!” he cried hoarsely. 

Cara and I huddled together as the vampire advanced on us. 

“I don’t want to be here!” he declared. “I must go back. I must find my 
fangs! Without my fangs, I will not survive. I will perish!” 

He rose up over us. His eyes burned angrily down at us. His dry lips 
quivered. He stretched out his cape as if to trap us inside it. 

“I must go back!” he rasped. “Where is the Vampire Breath ? Where is the 
blue bottle?” 

My eyes glanced quickly around the room. 

No sign of it. 

“It didn’t come back with us,” Cara announced. 

The old vampire tossed back his head in another angry wail. 

Then, raising his cape even higher, he swooped down to attack us. 

Cara and I staggered back against the pool table. 

The vampire moved quickly, wrapping his heavy, purple cape around us 

both. 

We were trapped. Nowhere to move. 

Then, suddenly, the cape slid off. Count Nightwing took a step back. His 
mouth dropped open in surprise. 

I followed his gaze—and saw Mom and Dad hurrying into the basement. 
“Mom!” I cried. “Dad! Look out! He’s a vampire! He’s a real vampire!” 



28 


Count Nightwing squinted at my parents, his mouth still open in shock. He 
locked his stare on my mom. “Cynthia—?” he cried. “Cynthia, what are you 
doing here?” 

Mom smiled at him. “Daddy, you finally woke up!” she exclaimed. 

“Huh?” Cara and I both gasped in shock. 

Mom rushed forward and threw her arms around the old vampire. She 
hugged him for a long time. 

“Daddy, you’ve been napping down here for at least a hundred years,” she 
said. “We didn’t know whether to wake you or let you sleep.” 

Dad came rushing over, too, a big smile on his face. He rested a hand on my 
shoulder. “Did you meet our son Freddy?” he asked Count Nightwing. “This is 
Freddy—your grandson.” 

Grandson? 

Me? 

I’m the vampire’s grandson? 

Count Nightwing stared down at me, shaking his head. I could see that he 
was as confused as I was! 

“Cynthia—?” he said to my mom. “Cynthia—my fangs. I’ve lost my 
fangs.” 

Mom slid her arm around the vampire’s waist. “Daddy, your fangs aren’t 
lost,” she told him. “They’re in the glass in the bathroom. Right where you left 
them.” 

“Here. Over here,” Dad said. He led the way to the little bathroom in the 
corner that we never use. 

A few seconds later, Count Nightwing stepped out, adjusting the fangs over 
his gums with both of his thumbs. “There. That’s better,” he said. “Now let’s fly 
out of here. I’m so thirsty! It’s been a hundred years!” 

Mom and Dad turned to me. “We’ll be home soon,” Dad said. “Make 
yourself a sandwich upstairs, okay? Make one for Cara, too.” 

I stared back at him, unable to get over my shock. “But if you and Mom are 
vampires, am I a vampire, too?” I asked in a trembling voice. 

“Of course,” Mom replied. “But you’re way too young to get your fangs, 



Freddy. You have to wait at least another hundred years!” 

I wanted to ask a million more questions. But the three of them began to 
flap their arms. Up and down. In seconds, they changed into bats and flew out 
the basement window. 

I stared at the window for a long while, trying to calm down, trying to slow 
my racing heart. When I started to feel a little more normal, I turned to Cara. 

“Wow,” she said, shaking her head. “Wow.” 

“I don’t believe it, either,” I replied softly. 

She grinned at me. “I knew you were weird, Freddy. But I didn’t know you 
were that weird!” 

I wanted to laugh at that. But I was still too shocked to laugh, or cry, or 
scream—or do anything! 

I turned away from Cara and counted to twenty, trying to get myself 
together. 

It isn’t easy to find out that you’re a vampire. 

I really think Mom and Dad could have broken the news to me in a little 
better way. 

But I guess they didn’t think it was any big deal... 

The door to the bathroom stood open. I stepped inside. “We never use this 
bathroom,” I muttered. “We use the one across the basement.” 

Cara followed me in. The mirrored door to the medicine chest was partly 
open. She pulled it open the rest of the way. 

The shelves were jammed with all kinds of jars and bottles. Strange 
medicines and tubes of ointments. 

I saw a green glass bottle on the top shelf. “What’s that?” I wondered. I 
stretched my hand up to pull it down. 

But Cara grabbed it first. 

“Give it back!” I cried. I shoved her. 

She shoved me back. 

She turned the glass bottle in her hand and read the name on the label to 
me: “WEREWOLF SWEAT’. 

“Cara—put it back!” I ordered. “No. Really. Put it back. Leave it alone, 
Cara. Don’t open it. Don’t—” 

She teased me. Grinning, she pretended to pull off the top. 

“No—!” I cried. 

I swiped at it. Tried to pull it from her hand. 



But I missed—and tugged off the top instead. 

“Whooooa!” Cara cried out as a yellow liquid squirted over both of us. 

I rolled my eyes. “Now what?” I cried. “Now what do you think is going to 
happen?” 

“Grrrrrrrrowwwwwrrrrrrrrr! ” Cara replied. 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats

= 


□ 


SCHOLASTIC 






CALLING ALL CREEPS! 


Goosebumps - 50 
R. L. Stine 





1 


At a little after eight o’clock at night, I tiptoed from my bedroom and crept 
as silently as I could down the stairs. Three steps from the bottom, I tripped 
over a stack of laundry—and fell headfirst the rest of the way. 

I landed hard on my elbows and knees, but I didn’t make a sound. I’m 
used to falling. I do it all the time. 

I jumped quickly to my feet and peeked into the front hallway. Had 
Mom and Dad heard me? 

They had the TV on in the den. They were watching the Weather 
Channel. They can watch the Weather Channel for hours. 

What’s so interesting about the weather? 

I could hear the woman on TV talking about the wind chill in Nova 
Scotia. I pulled on my blue down parka and made my way silently to the 
front door. 

A few seconds later, I was outside, jogging along the sidewalk. I kept 
in the shadows, ducked my head low—and headed for school. 

Don’t get the wrong idea about me. I don’t usually sneak out of the 
house at night. I’m not a problem child or anything. In fact, my parents are 
always telling me to be braver, to be more adventurous. 

I never go out without telling my parents where I’m going. But tonight 
was a special night. Tonight I had a special mission. 

The mission was spelled r-e-v-e-n-g-e. 

I slipped as I reached the corner and had to grab a lamppost to keep 
myself from falling. Most of the snow from the weekend had melted. But 
there were still slick patches of ice on the sidewalk. 

I hadn’t bothered to zip up my parka. The wind blew it behind me as I 
jogged across the street and past the small houses on the next block. The air 
felt cold against my warm cheeks, and wet, as if it might snow again. 

Hey—enough about the weather! 

Ricky Beamer—that’s me—had more important things on his mind 
tonight. Tonight I planned to do a little spying. And then a little nasty 
mischief. 

A few minutes later, I made my way across the deserted playground 



next to the school. Harding Middle School. That’s what the sign beside the 
bare flagpole read. Except that someone had spray-painted over all the first 
letters. So the sign actually read: ARDING IDDLE CHOOL. 

We have a lot of school pride here at Harding. 

Actually, most kids like the school. It’s really new and everything is 
modern and clean. 

I’d like our school too—if the kids would give me a break. If they’d all 
get out of my face and stop calling me Ricky Rat and Sicky Ricky, I’d be a 
real happy guy. 

Maybe you think I sound a little bitter. 

Maybe you’re right! 

But all the kids think I’m a nerd. They make fun of me every chance 
they get. 

I stared at the school building. It’s kind of low and flat and curves 
around like a snake. The elementary school is at one end, and the middle 
school is at the other. I’m in sixth grade, so my classroom is right in the 
middle. 

A spotlight shone down on the bare flagpole in front of the building. 
Behind it, most of the classrooms were dark. I saw lighted windows at the 
eighth-grade end—and that’s where I headed. 

A car rumbled past slowly. Its headlights washed over the front of the 
building. I ducked behind a tall evergreen bush. I didn’t want to be seen. 

In my rush to hide, I stumbled into the bush. A clump of cold, wet 
snow plopped onto my head. With a shiver, I shook my wavy black hair to 
toss it off. 

When the car had passed, I crept up to the lighted classroom window. 
My sneakers made squishing sounds in the soft ground. I glanced down. I 
had stepped into a deep, muddy rut. 

Ignoring the mud, I leaned against the low window ledge and pressed 
my face to the glass. Were the lights on because the night janitor was 
cleaning in there? Or was Tasha McClain hard at work? 

Tasha McClain. Just saying her name made my teeth itch! 

The windowpane was steamed up. I squinted through the glass. Yes! 
Tasha sat at the desk against the wall. She leaned over her computer, typing 
away. Her long, curly red hair fell over the keyboard as she typed with two 
fingers. 



Ms. Richards, the newspaper advisor, stood beside her, one hand on 
the back of Tasha’s chair. Ms. Richards is young and very pretty. She had 
her blond hair pulled back in a ponytail. In her baggy gray sweatshirt and 
faded jeans, she looked more like a student than a teacher. 

Ms. Richards was nice to me last September when I signed up for the 
school newspaper staff. But she’s been pretty mean lately. I think Tasha 
turned her against me. 

Tasha is an eighth-grader, so she thinks she’s hot stuff. Sixth-graders 
are nothing at Harding. Believe me. We’re nothing. Maybe even less. 

I knew Tasha and Ms. Richards would be working late on the Harding 
Herald tonight. Because tomorrow is Tuesday, the day the paper comes out. 

Ms. Richards leaned over Tasha and pointed to something on the 
computer monitor. I squinted harder to see the screen. I could see a headline 
with a photo beneath it. 

Tasha was laying out the Herald front page. 

Once she had the front page finished, she would save it on a disk. Then 
Ms. Richards would take the disk to the laser printer in the main office and 
print out two hundred copies. 

Ms. Richards turned suddenly to the window. I dropped to the ground. 

Had she seen me? 

I waited a few seconds, then pulled myself up. Tasha was typing away. 
She stopped every few seconds to click the mouse and move things around 
on the screen. 

Ms. Richards walked out of the room. 

I shivered. The wind swirled, fluttering my parka hood. I hadn’t 
brushed all the snow from my hair. Cold water dripped down the back of 
my neck. I heard a dog howling sadly in the distance. 

Please get up! I silently urged Tasha. 

Please leave the room too—so I can play my little joke. 

On the street behind me, another car rumbled past. I pressed myself 
against the dark wall, trying to make myself invisible. 

When I moved back to the window, the classroom stood empty. Tasha 
had also left the room. 

“Yesss!” I cheered softly. 

My heart pounded with excitement. I raised both hands to the 
windowsill. I struggled to push up the window so that I could climb inside. 



I knew I had to be quick. Tasha probably had gone down the hall to the 
juice machine. I had only a few seconds to get in the room—do my damage 
—and get out of there. 

I pushed and strained. The window didn’t budge. 

At first I thought it might be frozen shut. But finally, on the fourth try, 
it started to slide up. I pushed with all my strength—and opened the 
window just enough to squeeze through. 

My wet sneakers slid on the linoleum floor. I was leaving a trail of 
muddy footprints, but I didn’t care. 

I crept across the room and hunched down in front of the computer. 
My hand shook as I grabbed the mouse and moved to the bottom of the 
newspaper page. 

I heard voices. Tasha and Ms. Richards talking out in the hall. 

Taking a deep breath, I frantically studied the page. 

Then I typed a few words—in tiny, tiny type—at the bottom of the 
front page. Giggling softly to myself, I wrote: 

Calling All Creeps. Calling All Creeps. If you’re a real Creep, call 
Tasha at 555-6709 after midnight. 

Why did I add this little message to the front page of my school 
newspaper? 

Why did I sneak in at night and risk getting caught? 

Why did I desperately need to get revenge against Tasha? 

Well... it’s sort of a long story.... 



2 


A few days ago, a new girl started at our school. Her name is Iris Candler. 
She walked into my class and stood awkwardly at the front of the room, 
waiting for Ms. Williamson to assign her a seat. 

I was busy trying to do the math homework assignment before the bell 
rang. Somehow I forgot all about it the night before. 

I took a few seconds from my furious scribbling to check out the new 
girl. Kind of cute, I thought. She had a round face with big blue eyes and 
short blond hair parted in the middle. She wore long, red plastic earrings 
that jangled when she moved her head. 

Ms. Williamson gave Iris a seat near the back. Then she asked me to 
show Iris around the school during the day. You know. Point out where the 
lunchroom is and all the bathrooms and everything. 

I nearly cried out in surprise. Why did Ms. Williamson pick me? I 
guess it was because Iris just happened to be sitting right next to me. 

I heard a couple of kids laugh. And I heard someone mutter, “Sicky 
Ricky.” 

Kids in my class are always on my case. I hoped that Iris didn’t hear 
them. 

I admit it. I wanted to impress her. I liked having someone new to talk 
to, someone who didn’t know that everyone thought I was a loser. 

At lunchtime I walked Iris downstairs to the lunchroom. I told her 
about how new the school was. And how when we moved in for the first 
time, hot water came out of all the cold water faucets, and cold water came 
out of the hot. 

She thought that was pretty funny. I liked the way her earrings jangled 
when she laughed. 

She asked me if I was on any sports teams. 

“Not yet,” I answered. 

Not in a million years! I thought. 

Whenever guys are choosing up teams on the playground, the captains 
always fight over who gets me. It’s always: 

“You take him!” 



“No fair! You have to take him!” 

“No. You take him! We had him last time!” 

I’m not exactly a super jock. 

“This is the lunchroom,” I told Iris, leading the way through the door. I 
instantly felt really dumb. I mean, what else could it be? The band room? 

As soon as I entered, I saw my four enemies at their usual table in the 
middle of the room. I call them my four enemies because... they’re my four 
enemies! 

Their names are Jared, David, Brenda, and Wart. Wart’s name is really 
Richard Wartman. But everyone calls him Wart—even the teachers. 

These four seventh-graders are always making fun of me. When 
they’re not making fun of me, they’re trying to injure me! 

I don’t know what their problem is. I never did anything to them. I 
guess they pick on me because I’m easy to pick on. 

I grabbed two food trays and guided Iris to the food counter. “This is 
hot food over here,” I explained. “No one ever eats the hot food unless it’s 
pizza or hamburgers.” 

Iris flashed me a nice smile. “Just like at my old school,” she said. 

“Be sure to stay away from the macaroni,” I warned. “No one ever eats 
the macaroni. We think they serve the same macaroni all year. See that crust 
on top? Whoever heard of macaroni with a crust?” 

Iris laughed. I brushed back my hair. I wondered if she liked me. 

We both picked up sandwiches and bags of potato chips. I put a bowl 
of red and green Jell-0 and a bottle of kiwi-strawberry drink on my tray. 
“The cashier is over here,” I told Iris. 

I showed Iris how you hand your food ticket to the cashier and get it 
punched. I was feeling pretty good. I think Iris was impressed by all my 
helpful instructions. 

I spotted a couple of seats at a table near the window. I motioned to 
them with my head. Then I started through the crowded, noisy room, 
holding my tray high in both hands. 

Of course I didn’t see Wart stick his foot out. 

I tripped over it. Fell forward. And my whole tray went flying. 

I hit the floor in time to look up and see the red and green Jell-0 bound 
across a table and onto a girl’s lap. The rest of my food slid over the floor. 

Kids laughed and cheered and clapped. 



“There goes Ricky!” someone exclaimed. “Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!” 
Wart and his three pals started chanting: “Sicky Ricky... Sicky 
Ricky!” 

I glanced up and saw Iris laughing too. 

I just wanted to disappear. 

My face suddenly felt burning hot. I knew I was blushing. 

What am I going to do? 1 thought, lying there on my stomach. I really 
can’t take this any longer. 

What can I do? 



3 


After school I made my way to the eighth-grade classrooms at the end of 
the building. The school newspaper office is in Ms. Richards’ room. 

Ms. Richards sat at her desk, grading papers. As I stepped into the 
doorway, she glanced up and frowned. Then she returned to her work. 

I saw Tasha typing furiously at the computer in the corner. Her lips 
moved as she wrote. Her forehead furrowed in heavy concentration. 

I walked over to the assistant editor, an eighth-grader named Melly. 
Melly has short, straight brown hair and wears glasses with brown frames 
that match her hair. She was leaning over a long news story, running her 
finger down the page as she read. 

“Hi, Melly,” I said. 

She glanced up and frowned too. “Ricky—you made me lose my 
place.” 

“Sorry,” I said. “Any stories for me today?” 

You probably wonder why I signed up to be a reporter on the Harding 
Herald. It’s not that I’m a great writer or anything. 

Every kid at Harding needs twenty activity points a year. That means 
you have to try out for sports or join clubs or other after-school activities. 

No way I was going to try out for a sport. So I signed up for the 
newspaper. I thought it would be easy. 

That’s because I hadn’t met Tasha yet. 

Tasha treats all sixth-graders like bugs. She makes a disgusted face 
when a sixth-grader walks into the room. Then she tries to step on us. 

She gives all the good story assignments to eighth-graders. Do you 
know the first story she asked me to write? She asked me to count the dirt 
patches in the playground and write about why grass didn’t grow there. 

I knew she was just trying to get me out of the office. But I wrote the 
story anyway. It’s hard to write a good story about dirt patches. But I did a 
really good job. My story was five pages long! 

She never printed it in the paper. 

When I asked her why, she said, “Who cares about dirt patches?” 

My next assignment was to interview the night janitor about the 



differences between working days and nights. 

That one didn’t get into the paper, either. 

I wanted to quit. But I really needed the activity points. If I didn’t earn 
twenty activity points, I couldn’t graduate from sixth grade. I’d have to go 
to summer school. Really. 

So I kept coming to the Harding Herald office two or three afternoons 
a week after school, asking Tasha for more news stories to write. 

“Anything for me?” I asked Melly. 

She shrugged. “I don’t know. Ask Tasha.” 

I moved over to Tasha’s desk. Her face reflected the blue monitor as 
she typed away. “Any stories for me?” I asked her. 

She kept typing. She didn’t glance up. “Wait till I’m finished,” she 
snarled. 

I backed away. I turned and saw Ms. Richards walk out of the room. 
Some kids were talking by the table near the window, so I crossed over to 
them. 

David and Wart—two of my enemies—were arguing about something. 
They’re both sports reporters for the paper. They write about all the 
Harding games. The rest of the time they hang around the office, making 
trouble. 

David is tall and blond. Wart is short and lumpy and red-faced. He 
looks a little like a wart! 

I saw some cookies and cans of soda on the table. I tried to walk 
around David and Wart to get to the drinks. But Wart stepped in front of 
me. 

He and David both grinned. “How was your lunch, Ricky?” Wart 
asked. 

They laughed and slapped each other a high five. 

I glared at Wart. I wanted to wipe the grin off his face. “Why did you 
trip me?” I could feel my face growing hot. 

“I didn’t,” he lied. 

David laughed. 

“You did too!” I insisted. “You stuck out your foot—” 

“No way,” he said. “I didn’t touch you.” 

“You tripped over a crack in the floor,” David chimed in. “Or maybe it 
was an air pocket.” 



They both laughed. 

They’re so lame. 

I grabbed a can of Pepsi off the table, popped it open, and started to 
walk away. 

“Hey, wait—” Wart held me by the shoulder. 

I spun around. “What’s your problem?” 

“That’s the can I wanted,” he said. 

“Too bad. Get your own,” I told him. 

“No. I want that one.” He swiped at the can. 

I swung my hand out of his reach. 

Lost my grip. And the can went flying across the room. 

It sprayed Pepsi as it flew. Then landed in the middle of Tasha’s 
keyboard. 

She let out a squeal. Jumped up. Knocked her chair over. 

I quickly grabbed up a handful of paper napkins from the table and 
darted across the room. 

“Don’t worry. I’ll clean it up!” I told Tasha. The keyboard was soaked. 
I frantically started to mop the keys. “No—Ricky—stop!” Tasha shrieked. 
Too late. I stared in horror at what I had done. 



4 


“Aaaaiiiiii!” Tasha opened her mouth in an angry scream. She tugged at her 
red hair with both hands. 

“You creep! Ricky, you creep!” she cried. 

She shouldn’t call people names. But she had good reason to be angry 
at me. 

I had erased the whole front page. 

The screen glowed at us. Bright blue. Solid blue. 

No words. No pictures. 

“Uh... sorry,” I murmured. 

“Maybe I can get it back,” Tasha told Melly. “Maybe there is a way to 
find it and pull it back up.” 

Tasha shoved me out of the way, picked up her chair, and sat down. 
“Oh!” She let out another cry when she realized she had sat in a puddle of 
soda. 

Staring at the solid blue screen, she began typing furiously. 

I could see that the keys were still wet and sticky. She kept making 
mistakes. Backing up. Typing again. Typing. Typing. Muttering under her 
breath the whole time. 

No use. No good. 

The front page refused to come back. 

Finally, she gave up with a loud groan. She tossed her hair in the air 
with both hands. And turned to me with a growl. 

“You creep!” she cried. “All that work! All that work—lost!” 

I swallowed hard. “Tasha, it was an accident,” I muttered. “Really. It 
was just an accident.” 

“You little creep!” Tasha shrieked. Melly stood beside her, glaring at 
me angrily, shaking her head. 

“Wart pushed me!” I cried. I turned to the table. Wart and David had 
vanished from the room. 

“You’re off the paper!” Tasha screamed. “Get out, Ricky. You’re out of 
here!” 

“Huh?” My heart stopped for a second. “No, Tasha—wait!” I pleaded. 




“Get out! Get out!” She made shooing motions with both hands. The 
way you shoo away a dog. “You’re off the paper! I mean it!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered like an outboard motor. “But I need the 
activity points! Please give me a second chance! Please !” I begged. 

“Out!” Tasha insisted. 

Melly tsk-tsked and shook her head. 

“You’re so unfair !” I wailed. 

I know, I know. I sounded like a baby. But, give me a break. It really 
was unfair. 

I turned and slunk to the door. And guess who was standing there. 
Guess who had watched the whole ugly scene. 

You’re right. 

Iris. 

Her first day of school. And she already knew what a loser I was. 

“What are you doing here?” I asked glumly. 

“They said I needed an after-school activity. So I thought I’d try the 
newspaper,” Iris replied. She followed me down the empty hall. “But I 
don’t think I want to join the newspaper. That red-haired girl is really 
mean.” 

“Tell me about it,” I muttered, rolling my eyes. 

“She shouldn’t have called you a creep,” Iris continued. “It was just an 
accident. She’s horrible! She should give you another chance.” 

Maybe Iris and I will become good friends, I thought. 

I pulled my blue parka from my locker. Then Iris and I made our way 
out of the building. 

The afternoon sun was already dropping behind the houses and bare 
trees. It gets dark so early here in the winter. Patches of snow on the lawns 
and sidewalk gleamed dully as we walked toward the street. 

“Which way is your house?” I asked, shifting my backpack over my 
parka. 

Iris pointed. 

“Mine too,” I said. We started walking together. I didn’t really feel like 
talking. I was still totally upset about getting kicked off the newspaper. 

But I felt glad that Iris was on my side. 

We crossed the street and made our way up the next block. A tall 
hedge stretched along the entire block, broken only by driveways. 



Some kids had marked off the street for a street hockey game. They 
were skating back and forth, leaning on their sticks, cheering and shouting. 
“Do you skate?” Iris asked. 

“A little,” I told her. “My Rollerblades are kind of broken. The brakes 
came loose and—” 

“I always take off the brakes,” she said. “It’s a lot more fun without the 
brakes—don’t you think?” 

I started to answer. But a sound from behind the tall hedge made me 

stop. 

Was someone whispering? 

Did I hear someone giggling? 

Iris and I kept walking. She was telling me something about how kids 
skated in the town she moved from. I didn’t really listen. 

I kept hearing footsteps. Whispers. Scraping sounds. From the other 
side of the hedge. 

Finally, I raised a finger to my lips. “Iris—shhh,” I whispered. 

Her blue eyes widened in surprise. “Ricky—what’s the matter?” 

“I think we’re being followed,” I told her. 



5 


“I don’t hear anything,” Iris whispered. She narrowed her eyes at me. 

We both listened. 

Silence. Except for the cheers of the street hockey players behind us 
down the block. 

We started walking. 

I heard a giggle. Some whispers. 

I turned into the next driveway and darted behind the hedge. 

“Who’s there?” Iris called. She came running up behind me. Her eyes 
searched the hedge, then the front yard. 

“No one here,” I said. 

She laughed, “Ricky, why do you look so worried? You probably 
heard a bird or something.” 

“Yeah. A bird,” I repeated. I led the way around the hedge to the 
sidewalk. I didn’t want Iris to think I was crazy. But I knew I’d heard 
something. 

We walked past a few more houses. Then I heard a whispered chant 
from behind the hedge: “Sicky Ricky... Sicky Ricky...” 

“Did you hear that?” I asked Iris. 

She shook her head. I heard the distant hum of a plane, high overhead. 
“Do you mean that plane?” she asked. 

“No,” I replied. “I heard a voice.” 

A soft giggle floated out from the hedge. 

I ran to check it out. Nearly slipped on a slick patch of ice. 

I grabbed the hedge to catch my balance. No one back there. An empty 
front yard. 

Straightening my backpack, I hurried to Iris on the sidewalk. 

“Ricky, you’re a little weird,” she said. She laughed. But I could tell 
she was starting to wonder about me. Starting to think maybe I was too 
weird to be her friend. 

“I heard someone back there. Really,” I insisted. “They must be hiding 
in the hedge or—” 



“AAAAAIIIIIII!” I heard a scream of attack! 

The hedge shook. 

I staggered backwards toward the street. 

And four figures came leaping out of the hedge. Four kids shrieking 
and cheering. 

My four enemies! 

I saw Iris’ face twist in surprise. And then Wart grabbed me. David 
grabbed me too. Brenda and Jared joined them. 

They pushed me one way. Then pulled me back. 

Laughing and shouting, they spun me around. 

Then David tackled me to the ground. 

They swarmed around me. Pushed me down. Held me in the cold, wet 

mud. 

“Let go of me!” I shrieked. 

I tried to kick and thrash and squirm free. But the four of them held me 
firmly. 

“Let go of me!” I wailed. “What are you going to do?” 



6 


“Let him go!” I heard Iris cry. 

“Okay,” Wart replied. “No problem.” The big chubby wart had been 
sitting on my chest. He climbed to his feet. 

I took a deep breath. 

The other three let go of me and took a step back. 

I sat up, rubbing mud off my parka sleeve. I glanced at Iris. She stood 
near the curb, hands balled into fists, her eyes wide with alarm. 

With a groan, I started to stand up. 

But Wart and Jared shoved me back down. “Not so fast,” Jared said. 
Jared is short and skinny, but he’s real mean. 

“What do you want?” I demanded. 

Wart leaned over me. “Why did you tell Tasha that the soda can 
accident was my fault?” he asked. 

“Because it was your fault,” I shot back. I pulled a dead brown leaf 
from my hair. 

“But why did you tell Tasha?” Wart asked nastily. 

“Because he’s a wimp,” David chimed in. 

“Because he was scared,” Brenda said. 

“Because you’re a snitch,” Wart accused. 

“But it was your fault!” I cried. I tried to climb up, but they pushed me 
down again. 

Iris let out a short cry, then covered her mouth with both hands. I could 
see she was really scared. “Don’t worry,” I called to her. “They’re not really 
going to hurt me.” 

I turned to Wart. “Right?” 

All four of them laughed. 

“What should we do to Ricky Rat?” Brenda said. 

“Hurt him,” David replied. 

They laughed again. 

“No. Let’s make him sing,” Wart said, grinning at me. 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “Not again!” 



They think it’s a riot to make me sing songs to them. They force me to 
sing all the time. It’s because I have a terrible voice, and I can’t carry a 
tune. “Please—” I begged. 

“Yes. Sing a song—for your new friend,” Brenda said, motioning to 

Iris. 

“No. No way!” I insisted. 

David and Jared bent down and grabbed my shoulders. They started to 
push me deeper into the mud. “Sing a song,” Jared ordered. 

“Sing The Star-Spangled Banner, ” Wart said. 

The others cheered and clapped. “Yes! The Star-Spangled Banner ! 
That’s the best!” 

“Noooo,” I groaned. “Not again. Please, guys! Please! I don’t know 
the words. Really. Don’t make me sing that song again!” 

I begged and pleaded. Iris begged and pleaded. 

But the four of them stood over me, staring me down, not letting me 
up from the mud. 

What choice did I have? I knew only one way to get them to leave. So, 
sitting there on the cold, muddy ground, I started to sing. 

“Oh, say can you see ... ?” 

They burst into loud laughter. They hooted and howled. They shoved 
each other and slapped each other high fives. They practically fell down in 
the mud themselves, they were laughing so hard. 

“.. .and the hooooome of the brave. ” 

Somehow I made it through the whole song. Of course, I forgot most 
of the words. And of course my voice cracked at the high parts. 

And of course I’d never been so embarrassed in all my life. 

Iris must think I’m the biggest jerk on the planet, I told myself. She 
must think I’m a total loser. 

I wanted to sink into the mud like a worm and never come back up. 

I took off. I just started to run. 

I didn’t glance back. Not at my four enemies. Not at Iris. 

Especially not at Iris. I didn’t want to see her laughing at me too. 

Or feeling sorry for me. 

I ran all the way home without slowing down. Then I burst into the 
house. Slammed the door behind me. And ran up to my room. 

This is all Tasha’s fault, I decided. 



First Tasha kicked me off the newspaper staff—because of an accident. 
Then Tasha told Wart that I had blamed him. 

So Wart and his pals had no choice. They had to chase after me and 
embarrass me in front of Iris. 

All Tasha’s fault... all Tasha’s fault... 

I was still thinking about her as I struggled to fall asleep that night. 
Still thinking about how I’d pay Tasha back some day. 

It took hours and hours to fall asleep. 

The phone beside my bed rang and woke me up Saturday morning. 
Sleepily, I grabbed up the receiver. 

Guess who was on the other end? 

Tasha. 

Yes. A surprise call from Tasha. 

A call that would change my life. 



7 


“Huh?” I managed to choke out, still half asleep. I cleared my throat. 

“I need your help,” Tasha said. 

“Huh?” I sat straight up in bed. Tasha needed my help? Was I totally 
asleep? Was I dreaming this? 

“I need you to cover a story for me,” Tasha continued. “For the 
newspaper. I’ve tried everyone else I know. They couldn’t do it. You are the 
last person I wanted to call. But you’re my only hope.” 

“Huh?” I replied. 

“Ricky—is that all you can say?” Tasha demanded shrilly. “Did I wake 
you up or something?” 

“Huh? Uh... no.” I cleared my throat again. I shook my head, trying to 
force myself to be alert. 

Tasha needed my help? 

“I need you to come to school and cover the Midwinter Car Wash,” 
Tasha said. “I need a story and photos. Right away.” 

“Huh?” I replied. Why couldn’t I stop saying that? I guess I was in 
shock or something. “A car wash in winter?” 

Tasha sighed. “You don’t know about the school car wash? Didn’t you 
see all the signs? Don’t you read the newspaper?” 

“Oh. Right. I just forgot,” I lied. I peeked out the window. Golden 
sunshine. Nice day for a car wash. 

“Great! I’ll come right to school, Tasha,” I told her. “Thanks for giving 
me another chance.” 

“I didn’t want to call you,” she said coldly. “But most of my reporters 
went on a field trip. And the others are working at the car wash. If my dog 
could take pictures, I would have used him.” 

“Thanks a lot!” I cried. 

I know. I know. She was trying to insult me. 

But she was also giving me a chance. Maybe I wouldn’t have to take 
summer school after all. 

I pulled on a pair of faded jeans and a sweatshirt. Gulped down a fast 
breakfast—some kind of pink, blue, and green cereal and a glass of orange 



juice. Then I ran all the way to school. 

It was a warm day. On the radio, they said it would snow tonight and 
tomorrow. But it felt too warm to snow. 

As I crossed the street to the school, I saw kids setting up the car wash 
on the playground. A white banner, fluttering in the morning breeze, 
proclaimed: HARDING CAR WASH—$5. 

Kids were stretching long hoses from the back of the school building. 
Several buckets were set on a long wooden table, along with sponges and a 
stack of white towels. A blue Pontiac and a mini-van were already in line to 
be washed. 

I hurried into the building and down the hall to the newspaper room. I 
found Tasha all alone in the classroom. She leaned over her computer, 
typing away. 

She frowned when she saw me run in. “I’d do the story myself,” she 
said. “But I have to finish up the features page. I’ve never been this 
desperate.” 

Nice greeting, huh? 

“I’ll do a good job. I promise,” I said. 

She crossed the room and picked up a camera from Ms. Richards’ 
desk. “Here. Take this, Ricky.” She handed it to me. “And be careful with 
it. It’s my dad’s Pentax. It’s really expensive, and it’s his favorite camera.” 

I held the camera carefully in both hands and examined it. I raised it to 
my eye. “Say cheese,” I said. 

Tasha didn’t smile. “I’m warning you, Ricky,” she said sternly. “Don’t 
let anything happen to that camera. Take four or five different shots of kids 
washing cars. Then bring it right back to me.” 

“No problem,” I told her. 

“I want the story to be six or eight paragraphs,” she continued. “You’ll 
have to write it today and get it to me by tomorrow at the latest. Ms. 
Richards and I are going to finish laying out the paper and print it Monday 
night.” 

“No problem,” I repeated. 

“I’m saving a column on page two,” Tasha said. “So promise me you 
won’t mess up this time.” 

“I promise,” I said. 

Then I turned and hurried out to the playground. 



I can do this, I told myself. I can handle it. 

I can turn my life around this morning. Everything will be great after I 
do this assignment. 

That’s what I told myself. 

But as soon as I arrived at the car wash, my life was ruined. 



8 


Squinting into the bright morning sun, I jogged across the playground. My 
sneakers slipped in the wet grass. I carried the camera carefully in front of 
me in both hands. 

As I came closer, I shielded my eyes from the sun with one hand. I 
recognized the blue Pontiac. It belonged to Wart’s parents. Kids with hoses 
surrounded it, spraying it on all sides. 

Raising the camera, I ran toward the car. “Hold it right there! ” I called. 
“Let me take a picture for the Heraldl” 

The first spray of water shocked me. 

I felt something hit the front of my sweatshirt. Something cold. 

I let out a startled cry. 

The next two sprays hit me in the face and the chest—and sent me 
sprawling backwards. 

“Hey—!” I managed to shout. “Stop it! Are you crazy?” 

I tried scrambling out of the way. But now there were four hoses 
trained on me. 

“Ohhhh.” The water was freezing cold! 

Ducking out of the way, I recognized the four grinning faces aiming 
the hoses. Brenda, Wart, David, and Jared. 

Who else? 

Sputtering, I turned and tried to run out of range. Cold water sprayed 
down on me like a shower. Another hose caught me in the back. 

“Stop it! Hey—stop it, you guys!” I cried. 

And then I remembered the camera. 

Ducking my head from another hard blast of water, I raised the 
camera. 

Drenched. Totally drenched. 

“Aaaaaiiiiii!” An angry scream tore from my throat. 

Staring in horror at the dripping wet camera, I lost it. For the first time 
in my life, I totally lost it. 

I strapped the camera around my neck. Then I spun around and hurtled 
toward my four attackers. 




My last chance! I told myself. 

My last chance on the newspaper—and they’re ruining it! 

Howling and giggling, the four seventh-graders tried to blast me back 
with their hoses. But I lowered my head and came at them. 

Sputtering, shaking off water, I leaped on Wart. I tackled him around 
the waist and dragged him to the ground. 

He cut his laugh short with a startled gasp. 

I grabbed the hose from his hand. Pulled open the door to his parents’ 
car. And sent a spray of water into the car. 

“Hey—noooooo!” Wart wailed. 

Water from David’s hose shot against my back. Water sprayed the air 
like a fountain. At the next car, I heard kids laughing and shouting in 
surprise. 

I drenched the backseat and then the front. 

When I saw Brenda, David, and Jared drop their hoses, I dropped mine 
too. And started to run. 

They all chased after me. 

I didn’t get far. 

The grass was so slippery and wet. I ran a few steps—and then my 
sneakers slid out from under me. 

I went down hard. 

Fell facedown into the grass. 

On top of the camera. 



9 


“Does this mean I’m off the paper?” I asked meekly. 

Tasha scowled and turned the camera over in her hands. “The lens is 
cracked,” she murmured, shaking her head. “The whole camera is soaked 
and bent.” Her voice trembled. “It—it’s wrecked.” 

“It really wasn’t my fault,” I said softly. 

She angrily blew a strand of red hair off her forehead. “You’ll pay for 
it!” she cried. “You’ll pay for the camera, Ricky. If you don’t, my father 
will sue you!” 

“But, Tasha—” I pleaded. “You know it wasn’t my fault!” 

“Go away,” she snapped. “Just go away. Nothing is ever your fault— 
right?” 

“Well... it wasn’t,” I insisted. “If you’d listen to me, Tasha—” 

“You’re just bad news, Ricky,” she said, scowling at me again. She 
examined the broken camera one more time, then dropped it onto a desk. 

“You don’t take anything seriously,” she accused. “You think 
everything is a goof.” 

“But, Tasha—” I started to plead. 

“Go away,” she said. “That was your last chance. You didn’t deserve 
it. You’re just a creep. Why do you think all the kids call you Ricky Rat? 
Because that’s what you are—a little rodent!” 

Those words really stung. 

I felt a stab of pain in my chest. I struggled to breathe. 

I spun around so that Tasha couldn’t see how upset I was. And I 
hurried out of the room and out of the school. 

As I ran across the playground, I heard kids at the car wash singing 
and laughing. They were soaping up cars, spraying them clean, having a 
great time. 

As I passed by, I heard some kids start to chant, “Sicky Ricky, Sicky 
Ricky.” And I heard some other kids laugh. 

I turned my head away and kept running. I knew that by Monday, 
Tasha would have told everyone about how I ruined her father’s camera. 

The story would be all over school. Everyone would know how Ricky 



Rat had messed up again. 

Running home with Tasha’s words still in my ears, I felt more angry 
with each step. I wanted to scream. I wanted to explode! 

That’s when I decided to pay Tasha back. 

That’s when I decided to play a mean joke. 

Creep ... creep... creep... 

The word repeated and repeated in my mind. 

Ricky, you’re just a creep. Just a little rodent. 

You’ll pay, Ricky. If you don’t, my father will SUE you! 

Rodent. Rodent. Rodent. 

She had no right to call me that. It wasn’t fair. 

I had been so hurt, so angry. But by the time I reached home, I was 
smiling. I knew what I wanted to do. I knew how I was going to take my 
revenge. 

I had my plan all worked out in my mind. 

It couldn’t fail. It couldn’t. 

So, here I am. 

Monday night. I sneaked into the classroom where Tasha and Ms. 
Richards were working. 

I gleefully typed my little message on the bottom of the front page of 
the newspaper. 

I knew I had to hurry. Tasha and Ms. Richards would return any 
second. 

I listened tensely for any sound, for any sign that they were near. 

I had never been so nervous in all my life. But I also had a smile on 
my face. 

Ricky, they all think you’re a loser. But you’re a genius! I 
congratulated myself. 

Only you could have dreamed up such a wonderful, nasty revenge. 

Glancing up at the doorway every two seconds, I finished typing in my 
message for Harding Middle School newspaper readers: 

Calling All Creeps. Calling All Creeps. If you’re a real Creep, call 
Tasha at 555-6709 after midnight. 

I read it over. It made me smile again. 

I felt like jumping up and down and laughing out loud. 



But I knew I couldn’t make a sound. 

I stood up. Turned to the window. Started to make my escape. 
Halfway to the window, I heard Tasha cough and step into the room. 
I was caught. 



10 


I froze. 

So close, I thought. So close. The window stood only five steps away. 
Five steps—and I would have been out of there. 

But the five steps seemed as far as five miles now! 

I shut my eyes and waited for Tasha to cry out. 

Instead, I heard Ms. Richards’ voice from out in the hall. “Tasha— 
would you come here for a moment?” 

I opened my eyes in time to see Tasha disappear back out the door. 

Had she seen me? No. No way. She would have screamed. 

Whewwwwww! I let out a long sigh—and dove out the window. 

I landed on my elbows and knees. Scrambled frantically to my feet. 
And started running. 

I didn’t even bother to close the window. Too risky, I decided. 

For the third time in four days, I ran all the way home. 

On Friday and Saturday I ran home a disgrace, a loser, a creep. 

Tonight I ran home a winner. A champion! A genius! 

I let myself silently into the house. I could hear voices from the TV in 
the den. Mom and Dad were still watching the Weather Channel. 

I listened for a moment in the front hallway, catching my breath. Bad 
storms in the Pacific Northwest... flood warnings... 

A few weeks ago, I tried to get Mom and Dad to switch channels to 
MTV. But they hated MTV because it never gave the weather. 

I felt so happy, so excited. I wanted to rush into the den and tell them 
about my great joke. 

But, of course, I couldn’t do that. 

Instead, I made my way silently up to my room and closed the door. 

Who could I call? I had to call someone. I had to share my little secret 
with someone. But who? 

Iris. 

Yes. Iris. She would appreciate it. Iris would understand. 

My heart pounding, I reached for my phone. It took me a while to 



remember Iris’ last name. I had only heard it once. Chandler? Candle? 
Candler. Yes. Iris Candler. 

I got the phone number from information and called her. The phone 
rang once. Twice. Iris picked it up after the third ring. 

We both said hello. She sounded surprised to hear from me. 

“Guess where I went tonight?” I asked her. But I didn’t wait for her to 
guess. I blurted out the whole story. It all just burst out of me. I don’t think I 
took a breath! 

“Is that great or what?” I demanded when I had told her every detail. I 
laughed. “The paper comes out tomorrow,” I said. “Tasha won’t be sleeping 
much tomorrow night. She’ll be getting calls all night from every kid in 
school!” 

I waited for Iris to laugh. But I heard only a long silence on her end of 
the line. 

“Don’t you think it’s funny?” I asked finally. 

“Kind of,” she replied. “But I have a bad feeling about it, Ricky. A 
very bad feeling.” 

“Iris, it’s just a joke,” I told her. “What could go wrong?” 



11 


When I arrived at school the next morning, guess who I saw first. 

You’re right. Tasha. 

She turned her nose up as if she smelled rotten fish. Then she hurried 
past me without saying a word. 

I didn’t care. I thought about my little surprise for Tasha on the bottom 
of the Herald’s front page. I knew it would keep me smiling all day. 

Believe me, I needed something to smile about. 

As I turned the corner to go to my locker, Josh and Greg, two kids 
from my class, deliberately bumped into me. “Ricky, stop bumping into 
me,” Josh said. 

Greg bumped me again. Then he pushed me into Josh. 

“Hey—give me a break! I said stop bumping into me!” Josh cried. 

“Get a life,” I muttered. I dodged away from them. 

They walked off laughing, bumping each other from one side of the 
hall to the other. 

Funny guys, huh? About as funny as a broken arm. 

I pulled open my locker and started unloading books from my 
backpack. 

“Hey, Ricky—want to wash my dad’s car?” a kid named Tony shouted 
from across the hall. 

I had my head in my locker. I didn’t look around. 

I heard kids laughing at Tony’s hilarious joke. 

“Hey, Ricky—want to wash something?” Tony called. “Wash your 
face!” 

What a joker. 

Everyone laughed again. 

I slammed my locker door and walked past them without saying a 
word. This is all Tasha’s fault, I told myself. But I’m going to have the last 
laugh tonight. 

I turned the corner and headed to class. I saw Brenda and Wart at the 
water fountain against the wall. I tried to run past them. But I wasn’t fast 
enough. 



Brenda pressed her hand over the fountain—and shot a spray of cold 
water onto the front of my shirt. 

“Have a squirt—Squirt!” Wart called. 

Big laughter, up and down the hall. 

“My dad is suing you for wrecking his car!” 

Wart called. “He’s suing your family for every penny they’ve got!” 
“Tell him to get in line,” I muttered under my breath. 

“Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!” someone chanted. 

Welcome to “Pick on Ricky Day” at Harding Middle School. 
Unfortunately, every day is “Pick on Ricky Day.” 

But today I didn’t care. Today I knew I’d end up a winner. 

Today the joke was on Tasha. The student newspaper would be handed 
out this afternoon. And Tasha would be up all night, answering phone calls. 
Sweet, sweet revenge was mine. 

That night I had to go out for dinner with my parents and my cousins who 
live across town. Mom and Dad didn’t bring me home until nine thirty, and 
I had about two hours of homework to do. 

So I didn’t tuck myself into bed until nearly twelve—very late for a 
school night. 

I just started to drift off to sleep when the phone beside my bed rang. 

I squinted at my clock radio—two minutes until twelve. 

“Now who would call this late?” I asked myself. 



12 


I fumbled for the phone in the dark. Knocked it off the bed table. It clattered 
loudly onto the floor. 

I dove out of bed and grabbed the receiver. Then I hunched on my 
knees, listening for Mom and Dad. Did they hear the phone ring? I’m not 
allowed to get calls after ten o’clock. 

I cleared my throat and raised the phone to my ear. “Hello?” 

“Ricky—it’s me. Iris.” 

I glanced at my clock radio again. “Iris? It’s midnight. How come 
you’re calling so late?” I asked. “Are you okay?” 

“My father was on the phone practically the whole night. Ricky—did 
you see the school paper?” she demanded in an urgent whisper. 

“Huh? No,” I replied, climbing onto the edge of my bed. “When they 
started to pass out the newspapers, I got called to the library. The librarian 
wanted to ask me about a bunch of books I lost. When I came back to the 
room, all the papers were gone.” 

“So you didn’t see the paper?” Iris asked shrilly. 

“No,” I repeated. “I didn’t get my copy. Is it great? Can you read the 
message at the bottom okay?” 

“Well...” Iris hesitated. 

“Is it great?” I asked excitedly. 

“Not exactly,” Iris replied softly. “Actually, Ricky, you’re in... major 
trouble.” 

“I’m what?” I squeezed the phone to my ear. She was talking so softly, 
I could barely hear her. “Iris.. .I’m what?” 

“In major trouble,” she repeated. 

A chill swept down my back. “Major trouble? But—why, Iris? What 
do you m-mean?” I sputtered. 

“The message—” she started. 

Then she stopped. Silence on the other end. 

“Iris—I can’t hear you!” I said. “Iris—?” 

“Uh-oh,” she murmured. “I’ve got to get off. My dad is screaming at 

me.” 



“But, Iris—” I insisted. “Why am I in trouble? You’ve got to tell me!” 

“I’m getting off!” I heard her call to her father. “It was only a short 
call, Dad. I know it’s midnight!” 

“Iris, please—tell me. Tell me before you hang up!” I begged. 

“Got to go. Bye,” she said. I heard a click. The line went dead. 

I slammed the receiver down angrily. What was her problem? Why 
couldn’t she tell me why I was in trouble? 

I slid the phone back in place beside the clock radio and climbed into 
bed. I punched my pillow a few times, puffing it up. Then I pulled the 
blankets up to my chin. 

I shut my eyes and tried to calm down enough to fall asleep. 

The phone rang again. 

I sat straight up with a startled gasp. This time I managed to pick up 
the phone without knocking it to the floor. 

“Iris, thanks for calling me back,” I whispered. 

“I saw your message in the school newspaper,” a voice whispered. 

“Iris—?” I swallowed hard. I knew it wasn’t Iris. 

“I saw your message,” the voice whispered. “I am calling as you 
instructed.” 

“Huh? You’re calling me?” I cried. 

“Yes. I’m following your instructions,” came the whispered reply. 

“Hey—who is this?” I demanded. 

“I’m a Creep.” 



13 


I slammed down the phone. 

Then I settled back into my bed. I puffed up my pillows again, and 
pulled the blanket over my shoulders. 

The wind howled outside my bedroom window. Shadows cast by the 
street lamp in front of our house danced over my wall. 

My brain was spinning. 

Who was that? 

I couldn’t be sure, but it sounded like a boy. Why did he call me? The 
message I put in the newspaper gave Tasha ’s phone number. 

I didn’t have long to think about it. The phone rang again. 

I grabbed up the receiver before the first ring ended. My eyes shot to 
the bedroom door. If Mom or Dad heard me getting these calls, I’d really be 
in major trouble! 

“Hello? Who is it?” I demanded. 

“Hi. I’m a Creep.” A different voice. A boy. Speaking softly. 

“Huh?” I gasped. 

“I’m a Creep. I called as soon as I saw your orders.” 

“Give me a break!” I cried. I slammed down the phone. 

“What is going on?” I muttered out loud. I sat staring at the phone. 
Watching it in the dim light. Waiting. 

Was it going to ring again? 

“Ricky—!” a voice boomed. 

I jumped a mile. 

The ceiling light clicked on. Dad stood in the doorway in his blue-and- 
white striped pajamas. He scratched his cheek. “Ricky—what are all those 
calls about?” he demanded. 

I shrugged. “Calls?” 

He narrowed his eyes at me suspiciously. “I heard the phone ring three 
times,” he growled. 

“Oh. You mean those calls!” I tried to sound innocent. But I knew I 
didn’t stand a chance. 



“You know you’re not allowed to get calls after ten,” Dad said sharply. 
He yawned. “It is after midnight. Now who is calling so late?” 

“It’s some kind of a joke,” I told him. “You know. Kids from school.” 

He brushed his sandy hair off his forehead. “I don’t think it’s funny,” 
he said. 

I lowered my head. “I know. But it isn’t my fault—” 

He raised a hand to silence me. “Tell your friends to stop,” he said. “I 
mean it. If they keep calling so late, I’ll have to take your phone away.” 

“I’ll tell them,” I promised. 

I’d tell them to stop, I thought, if I knew who they were! 

Dad yawned again. He has the loudest yawn in the world. It sounds 
more like a roar. 

When he finished yawning, he clicked off the light and disappeared 
back to his room. 

As soon as he left, the phone rang again. 

“Please—” I started. 

“I’m a Creep,” a whispered voice told me. A girl this time. “I saw your 
message. I’m ready. Ready to plant. Ready to rule. When will the Creeps 
meet?” 

“Huh? Meet?” I didn’t wait for an answer. I hung up the phone. 

Staring at the phone, I felt totally confused. 

Why am / getting all these calls? I wondered. 

Is there some kind of a mix-up? 

And why are the calls so strange? Why did that girl say she’s ready to 
plant? Ready to rule? 

What is going on ? 

The phone rang again... 



14 


The next morning, I dragged myself to school. The phone hadn’t stopped 
ringing until two in the morning. That’s when I took it off the hook. I spent 
the rest of the night twisting and turning, thinking about all the weird calls. 

I didn’t fall asleep until seven. Which is the time my alarm goes off to 
wake me up! 

At breakfast, my head nearly dropped into my corn flakes. I just 
wanted to go back to bed. But Mom and Dad didn’t feel sorry for me at all. 

They were furious. The ringing phone had kept them awake too. 

“You tell those kids not to call again,” Mom warned. “Or else I’ll go in 
to your school and tell them myself!” 

“No—please!” I begged. “I’ll tell them. I’ll tell them this morning! 
They won’t call again. I promise!” 

Can you think of anything more embarrassing than having your mom 
come to school, barge into your classroom, and lecture the kids in your 
class? 

They already make fun of me every day and call me “Sicky Ricky.” 
Can you imagine what they would call me if my mom came to school and 
yelled at them all? 

Whoa! 

Just thinking about it gave me icy chills. 

It took all my strength to pull myself to school and slump through the 
crowded hall to my locker. 

“There you are!” Iris cried. 

I saw her waiting across from my locker. She wore a loose plaid shirt 
over navy blue corduroy pants. Her long plastic earrings jangled softly. 

She had been leaning against the tile wall. Now she pushed through a 
group of girls to get to me. “Here, Ricky. Take a look.” 

She handed me the latest copy of the Harding Herald. I grabbed it 
eagerly and lowered my eyes to the bottom of the front page. 

Yes. There it was. In tiny type across the whole bottom margin. My 
message. 

Except it had been changed a little. 



I moved my lips, reading it softly to myself: 

“Calling All Creeps. Calling All Creeps. If you’re a real Creep, call 
Ricky after midnight. ” Then it gave my phone number. 

My phone number. Not Tasha’s. 

My name and number. 

I let out a low moan and weakly handed the paper back to Iris. 

She shook her head and tsk-tsked. “You look terrible. Did you get any 
sleep at all?” she asked. 

“No,” I murmured. 

I grabbed the newspaper back and read it again. “How did this 
happen?” I cried. 

Tasha’s grinning face flashed into my mind. 

“Tasha!” I screamed her name. And then I took off, pushing my way 
through groups of kids, hurtling over someone’s backpack. 

I ran down the long, curving hall to the eighth-grade classrooms. And 
burst into Tasha’s room just as the early bell rang. 

My eyes frantically swept the room. I spotted her near the front, 
handing a notebook to another girl. 

“Tasha—” I called, running up to her. I waved the newspaper in her 
face. “I—I—” I sputtered breathlessly. 

She tossed back her red curls and laughed. “I caught your little joke 
just in time,” she said. “Did you get any calls last night, Ricky?” 

“A few,” I muttered angrily. 

The whole class burst out laughing at me. Even the teacher. 

All morning, I had the feeling that everyone was watching me. Laughing at 
me. Maybe I imagined it. Maybe I didn’t. 

I kept thinking about the calls I’d received the night before. I knew 
they were all from kids at school. But why were they saying such strange 
things? 

I saw your instructions... 

I’m ready to plant. Ready to rule. 

When will the Creeps meet? 

At lunch, I carried my tray toward the back corner of the lunchroom. I 
didn’t feel like eating with anyone. I didn’t feel like hearing more jokes, 
more kids laughing at me. 



I had to walk past the table where my four seventh-grade enemies 
always sit. 

Uh-oh, I thought. Wart and David were squirting their milk cartons at 
each other. Brenda laughed so hard, chocolate milk ran out of her nose. 

They see me. I’m going to get a milk shower, I realized. Too late to go 
the other way. 

To my shock, I passed right by the table without getting splashed or hit 
by anything. Wart didn’t call out any nasty jokes. David and Jared didn’t try 
to trip me. 

What’s going on? I wondered as I hurried to the far corner of the room. 
I know they saw me. 

Why didn’t they chant “Sicky Ricky” and toss their drink cartons at 
me the way they always do? They let me pass by as if they didn’t know me. 

I slid my tray across the back table. No one ever sits in that corner. It’s 
next to the furnace duct. Hot air blows out over the table while you eat. 

I had picked up a sandwich of some kind of lunchmeat and a bowl of 
tomato soup. I tilted my chair back against the wall and sat chewing on the 
sandwich, watching the other kids. 

Waiting. Waiting for someone to come over and make a joke about 
how my tomato soup looked like clotted blood. Or make a joke about all the 
calls I got after midnight. 

Waiting for kids to start chanting “Sicky Ricky.” Or for Wart or one of 
my other pals at his table to start throwing food at me. 

But no. 

No one paid any attention to me. I leaned back and ate my lunch in 
peace. 

I finished the soup and half the sandwich. I had picked up a bowl of 
chocolate pudding for dessert. But the crust was too thick to force my spoon 
through. 

I gathered up my tray and stood up to leave. 

And someone hit me in the forehead with a wadded-up piece of paper. 

“Hey—!” I called out angrily. But secretly I felt glad. I mean, I just 
didn’t feel normal going a whole lunch hour without anyone getting on my 
case. 

Rubbing my forehead, I glanced down at the paper. And realized it had 
writing on it. A note. Someone had passed me a note. 



I unfolded it and quickly read the scribbled words: 
When will the Creeps meet? 



15 


I glanced around the room, trying to see who tossed the note to me. But no 
one seemed to be looking at me. Wart and his three friends were pushing in 
their chairs, carrying their trays to the tray deposit window. 

Did one of them throw it? I wondered. 

I read the note again, folded it up, and shoved it into my jeans pocket. 
Then I carried my tray to the window and hurried out of the lunch room. 

I bumped into Iris in the hall. “What’s up?” she asked. 

I shrugged. “More Creeps,” I told her. “They seem to be following 
me.” I sighed. “I guess I asked for it.” 

“I told you I had a bad feeling about that joke of yours,” Iris replied. 
“No way Tasha was going to let you get away with it.” 

“Don’t rub it in,” I murmured unhappily. “If kids start calling me again 
tonight, my parents will go totally ballistic. I’ll lose my phone for sure.” 

“Maybe you should take it off the hook when you go to bed,” Iris 
suggested. 

Smart. Iris is very smart, I realized. I’m not sure I would have thought 
of that. 

I led the way upstairs. Lockers were banging all around us. Kids were 
shoving in coats, pulling out books and notebooks, jamming stuff into their 
backpacks. It was almost time for the bell to ring. 

Iris stopped at her locker and turned to me. Her cheeks suddenly had 
pink circles on them. “Would you do me a favor?” she asked. 

“Sure,” I told her. 

Was she blushing? What was she going to ask? 

“It’s so hard being the new girl in school,” she said. “I thought I’d try 
to make something really special for the school bake sale on Saturday. You 
know. Try to impress everyone with my school spirit. Rah rah!” She shot up 
both hands like a cheerleader. 

I laughed and waited for her to continue. 

“Well...” she hesitated. “Would you come with me after school 
tomorrow to help me buy supplies? Flour and sugar and stuff? We could go 

55 



“Of course!” I interrupted. 

I felt so excited, I almost blurted out, “No girl ever asked me to go 
anywhere before! ” 

But somehow I managed to stay cool enough not to tell her that. 

“I’ll meet you behind the playground after school tomorrow,” I said. 
“We can shop for whatever you need, and I’ll help you carry it all home.” 

Big man, huh? 

She thanked me, and I jogged down the hall to my locker. I actually 
felt like skipping—or flying! Iris likes me, I decided. A girl in my school 
likes me. 

You probably think this is no big deal. But it was a very big deal to me. 

It changed my whole mood. It made me forget about all the trouble I’d 
been having. It made me forget I was me! 

What a great day! I told myself. What an awesome day! 

My happy mood lasted until I opened my locker. 



16 


Humming to myself, I slipped open the locker door. I squatted down and 
started to pull some notebooks from the locker floor—when a flash of red 
caught my eye. 

Dripping red. Thick, dripping, red liquid oozing down the side of the 
locker door. 

I gasped. At first I thought it was blood. 

Then I quickly realized I was staring at paint. Bright red paint. 

I scrambled to my feet—and read the scrawled message someone had 
painted on the door: 

WHEN WILL THE CREEPS MEET? 

“Whoa!” I cried out. I poked a finger in the paint and pulled it out 
smeared with red. 

The paint was fresh. The letters dripped down the locker door. 
Someone had painted it just moments ago. 

But who? 

And why? Was it supposed to be a joke? What was the funny part? 

It was all a mystery to me. 

The bright red words glowed angrily out at me. I picked up my 
backpack and slammed the door. 

I didn’t have time to think about it all now. I had to get to class. 

That night, the calls started early. 

I finished my homework by eight thirty. I was in the den watching a 
basketball game on TV with my dad. The phone rang, and Dad picked up 
the cordless phone from the table beside him. 

He muttered a few words, then shoved the phone toward me. “It’s for 
you, Ricky.” 

I carried the phone out into the hall to get away from the noise of the 
basketball game. “Hello?” 

“This is a Creep,” a whispered voice replied. “When will the Creeps 
meet?” 

I didn’t say another word. I clicked the phone off and carried it back 



into the den. 

I tried to watch the basketball game. But the phone kept ringing. One 
whispered voice after another. 

“I’m a Creep. I saw your message. ” 

“Are we ready to plant the seeds?” 

“I’m a Creep. When are we meeting?” 

This isn’t funny, I thought. This is too strange to be funny. 



17 


As soon as school let out the next day, I ran to my locker. I stuffed the 
books I needed for homework into my backpack. Pulled on my blue parka. 
And ran out to the playground to meet Iris. 

Was I a little pumped up? 

You guessed it. I couldn’t wait to take Iris shopping for baking 
supplies. I’ll help her carry it all back to her house, I told myself. And then 
maybe she’ll ask me to help her bake things for the bake sale. 

Iris and I will work together. No girl had ever wanted to work together 
with me. When Brittany Hopper found out I was going to be her lab partner 
for frog dissection, she stayed home from school for two weeks! 

I had to cut up my frog all by myself. And of course I made a 
disgusting mess of it. 

But Iris was different. Iris was new. 

Do they give prizes at bake sales? 

Probably not. But if they did, I’m sure Iris and I could win one. And 
then the other kids in the school would see that I’m not such a loser. 

These were my thoughts as I made my way to the back of the 
playground. I had big plans. Big, BIG plans. 

But my plans never came true. No chance. 

Because I never met Iris. 

I turned to the school to look for her—and Wart, David, Jared, and 
Brenda jumped me from behind. 

“Hey—let go!” I cried. I tried to squirm free. 

But they swarmed over me and dragged me off the playground. 

“Let go! What are you doing? Give me a break!” I screamed. I twisted 
and kicked. But I wasn’t strong enough to break free. 

They dragged me into the woods across from the playground. My 
sneakers scraped and slid over the carpet of wet, dead leaves. 

They pulled me between the bare trees, trembling in the soft afternoon 
breeze. A scrawny squirrel scampered in front of us, searching the wintry 
ground for food. 

“What are you going to do?” I cried. “Let me go! I mean it!” 



They ignored my cries and dragged me through a clump of tall white 
weeds. “This way,” David muttered. 

He guided us to a line of high evergreen shrubs. Clumps of gray snow 
clung to the limbs of the shmbs. 

Behind the evergreens, we were completely hidden from the street. 
With a hard tug, I pulled free. 

Actually, I think they let me pull free. 

I spun around. My eyes searched for the best way to escape. It 
wouldn’t be easy. The snow-covered evergreen shrubs surrounded us on all 
four sides. 

Wart and his friends stood tensely around me. They stared at me, as if 
waiting for me to speak. 

“Why did you drag me here?” I demanded. I tried to sound calm, but 
my voice cracked. “What are you going to do to me?” 

Their faces remained blank. Stern and serious. They didn’t even laugh 
when my voice cracked. 

Finally, Wart broke the tense silence. “We wouldn’t harm you, 
Commander,” he said. 

I was sure I hadn’t heard him correctly. “Excuse me?” I cried. 

“We are the Creeps,” Wart continued. 

My mouth dropped open. “So you’re the ones who have been calling 
me? And sending me messages?” 

All four of them nodded solemnly. “Yes, Commander,” Brenda said. 
She shook off some wet snowflakes that had fallen from the trees onto her 
long black hair. 

“I should have known it was you,” I muttered through clenched teeth. 

“Yes. You should have known,” Jared repeated. 

“We called as soon as we got your message, Commander,” David 
chimed in. 

“What is this ‘Commander’ stuff?” I snapped. “Why are you calling 
me that?” 

“We didn’t guess that you were the Commander,” Wart replied. “If we 
had known who you were, we never would have teased you and played 
mean jokes.” 

“Please accept our apology, Commander,” Brenda added. “We are so 
sorry.” 



“You should have made yourself known to us sooner,” David said. 

“Yes. Now we must act quickly,” Wart added. 

“What are you talking about?” I screamed. “What is your problem?” 

Were they trying to drive me crazy? What was this stupid new game 
about? 

“I have to meet someone,” I told them impatiently. “I don’t have time 
for dumb games.” 

Some kids in my school were into fantasy games. They spent hours 
and hours role-playing characters in different fantasy worlds. You know. 
With dragons and elves and things. 

But I never saw Wart and his pals playing those games. 

So what on earth did they think they were doing now? 

I knew it was all a stupid joke. It had to be a joke. 

So why weren’t they laughing? Why did they appear so grim? 

Brenda trained her round dark eyes on me. “You no longer have to 
pretend,” she said. “Now that we know you are the Commander, we must 
act quickly.” 

“We Creeps have so little time,” Wart said, his eyes also locked on 
mine. 

“It is urgent,” David added. “That is why we have been calling you. To 
meet as soon as possible.” 

I saw the squirrel poking its head out from behind the evergreen shrub 
on the end. I wondered if I made a run for it, could I escape? 

“Commander, we cannot understand why you have been delaying,” 
Brenda said. 

“Guys, this isn’t funny—” I started. 

They nodded solemnly. “We know,” Jared said softly. “We have so 
little time to complete our mission.” 

Mission? Had they all totally lost it? 

How long had it taken them to dream up this dumb joke? Did they 
really think I would buy it? 

“What is the point of this?” I demanded. 

“The Identity Seeds will grow stale in one week,” Brenda said. 

“We have so little time to plant them,” David added fretfully. “So little 
time to turn everyone in the school into Creeps.” 

“Seeds? Plant seeds?” I laughed. What else could I do? I laughed in 



their faces. “Am I going crazy, or are you?” I asked. 

“If we do not plant the seeds in time...” Wart started. But his voice 
trailed off before he finished his sentence. 

Brenda picked up where Wart left off. “If we fail to plant the Identity 
Seeds,” she said, keeping her eyes on me, “our mission will fail.” 

Wart placed a hand on my shoulder and gazed at me solemnly. “And of 
course, Commander, you know what will happen to you if the mission 
fails.” He made a slicing motion across his throat. 

A heavy silence fell over the woods. A burst of wind shook snow off 
the evergreens. I suddenly felt cold all over. 

Brenda reached into her backpack. She pulled out a clear plastic bag 
and raised it toward me. “I have the Identity Seeds with me, Commander,” 
she announced. 

I studied the seeds inside the bag. They looked exactly like chocolate 
chips. 

“As you know, Commander, every student must eat a seed,” Wart said. 
“It takes only one seed to turn a human into a Creep.” 

“The Creeps must rule!” Jared declared loudly. 

“Humans are the past!” Brenda cried, raising the bag of seeds high. 
“Creeps are the future!” 

All four of them cheered. And as they cheered, they began to change— 
into MONSTERS! 



18 


“Creeps rule! Creeps rule!” they chanted. 

I stared in horror as their faces twisted and their bodies began to 
transform. 

Bumps popped out all over their heads. Bumps about the size of 
quarters rose up on their arms and hands. 

Their skin began to darken. In seconds, they were all bright purple. 
The big purple bumps trembled and shook on their skin. 

Their faces stretched. Their hair disappeared into their purple skulls. 
Their eyes sank into their flat, purple heads. 

Long, ropy tongues flicked from between jagged rows of teeth. Bumpy 
purple tongues, glistening as they whipped them from side to side. 

I stared at them, unable to move, unable to run. Unable to take my 
eyes off the four creatures. Bumpy lizard creatures. 

Creeps. 

They grunted and wheezed. Their eyes rolled wetly. Their long snouts 
dripped. Their lizardy jaws snapped open and shut. 

“NOOOO!” I cried out as Wart sprang at me. 

I thought he was attacking. 

But he scrambled past me—and grabbed the scrawny squirrel between 
both purple hands. Instantly, his jaws flew open, and he stuffed the squirrel 
inside. 

He swallowed it without chewing. The furry tail slid down last. 

His bumpy tongue licked his wet lips. “Sorry there wasn’t enough to 
share.” He grinned at the others. 

“How was it?” Brenda hissed. 

“A little dry,” Wart replied. 

“I don’t like them with the skin on,” Jared chimed in. 

For some reason, that made them all laugh. Ugly, dry laughs that 
sounded like choking. 

All four of them flicked out their long, bumpy tongues and slapped 
each other’s tongues, as if slapping high fives. 

I took a deep breath. My legs felt so weak, I thought I might fall to the 



ground. “I—I have to go now,” I stammered. 

In her purple fingers, Brenda raised the bag of seeds in front of my 
face. “Only one week left, Commander,” she said. “How will we plant them 
inside the students? We have waited so long for you. Do you have a plan?” 

“Yes. My plan is to get out of here—now!” I replied. 

I turned to leave. But they had me surrounded. Their wet eyes studied 
me. Their purple chests heaved noisily in and out. The bumps on their skin 
quivered. 

Wart made a little bow, like a servant. “But if you leave, Commander, 
when will the Creeps meet again?” he asked softly. 

“Yes. We must meet again soon. We must make a plan,” David added 
solemnly. 

“Before the week is out, every student at Harding Middle School must 
eat an Identity Seed,” Brenda declared. 

The others nodded. 

“The Creeps will rule,” Wart said softly. “The student humans will all 
become Creeps!” 

Their tongues flicked out again and slapped each other in a four- 
tongued high five. 

I’ve got to get away from them—now! I told myself. 

I’ve got to report them. I’ve got to tell someone at school who they are 
—and what they’re planning to do. 

But—how? 



19 


I decided to play along with them. To stall. To act as serious as they were. 

If they figure out that I’m not their Commander, they’ll do something 
horrible to me! I realized. 

I pictured the squirrel tail sliding down Wart’s throat. 

And I started to gag. 

How can I get away from them? I wondered. 

As soon as I escaped, I could report them to someone—to anyone who 
would listen! 

“Brenda, let me see those seeds,” I said, trying to sound as if I were 
giving an order. My voice came out strong and steady. But my hand 
trembled as I reached for the bag. 

I took the bag and carefully unwrapped the twist-tie on top. Then I 
raised the bag to my face, studied the seeds for a long time, and took a deep 
sniff. 

No. Definitely not chocolate chips. 

The seeds had a faintly sour smell. Not terrible. But not sweet or 
chocolatey either. 

“One for each kid,” I murmured, eyeing them carefully. “One seed for 
each.” 

The four Creeps nodded their purple heads. “At least one for each 
student,” Brenda said. “That’s all it will take to turn them all into Creeps.” 
She snapped her long rows of jagged teeth. 

It’s not going to happen, I decided. 

No way. 

I’m not going to let it happen. I’m going to get help. I’m going to stop 
them. 

But first I had to get out of the woods. 

“Well, we Creeps will meet again soon,” I said. I handed the seed bag 
back to Brenda. “We must all think of the best plan. And then we will call 
each other, and pick a good time, and meet again.” 

I turned and took two steps toward the street. 

That’s as far as I got. 



Wart’s long, bumpy tongue wrapped around my neck. He turned me 
around by pulling in his tongue. “But, Commander—I have a good plan!” 
he declared. 

“Good,” I said, trying not to gag again. I could still feel the wet, 
bumpy tongue on my skin. “We will meet soon and talk about your plan.” 

“No—now!” Wart insisted. “Commander, we must talk now. We can 
put my plan into action tomorrow morning!” 

“Huh? Tomorrow?” I gasped. “I think we’d better wait a day,” I 
started. “You see, if we all wait—” 

They eyed me suspiciously. Their purple jaws opened and closed. 

I turned back to Wart. “What’s your plan?” 

He took a deep, wheezing breath and began. “Tomorrow morning, we 
get to school very early. The lunchroom cooks all arrive early. They prepare 
lunch first thing in the morning.” 

“Yes. That gives the chocolate pudding plenty of time for the crust to 
harden!” I joked. 

No one laughed. 

“I’ve been studying the kitchen carefully,” Wart continued. “After the 
cooks set out the food in the morning, they take a ten-minute break. That’s 
our chance. If we sneak in during their break, we can plant the seeds in the 
lunchroom food.” 

“Everyone eats in the lunchroom. It’s a school rule,” David chimed in. 
“So every student will eat at least one seed.” 

“And by nighttime, they will no longer be humans. They will all be 
Creeps like us,” Jared added. 

“What do you think of my plan? Will it work?” Wart asked. 

They all stared at me, waiting for my answer. 

“The plan sounds pretty good,” I said finally. I rubbed my chin, 
pretended I was thinking hard about it. “I will talk to you all tomorrow and 
let you know my decision.” 

Their lizardy faces drooped with disappointment. “Tomorrow?” Wart 
cried unhappily. “But we could do it tomorrow morning, Commander. We 
could plant the seeds, and by tomorrow night—” 

I raised a hand to cut him off. “Tomorrow,” I said firmly. 

They were still grumbling to each other as I turned and hurried away. I 
expected one of them to grab me and pull me back. But this time, they let 



me go. 

I edged through an opening in the evergreen shrubs. Then I started to 
jog. Between the bare, trembling trees. Across the street. And down the 
block toward my house. 

What am I going to do? I asked myself as I ran. 

I can’t let them turn everyone in school into Creeps. I can’t let them 
drop their Identity Seeds in the lunchroom food. 

But how can I stop them? 

If I tell them not to do it, they will figure out that I’m not their 
Commander. They will figure out that they made a mistake. 

And then what? What will they do to me if they find out I’m not a 
Creep? Will they gobble me up the way Wart swallowed that poor squirrel? 

My side started to ache, but I kept running. I pictured all the kids in 
my school turning into bumpy, purple lizard creatures. I pictured them all in 
the woods, grabbing squirrels and swallowing them whole. 

I pictured us all slouching around, slapping high fives with our 
tongues. 

Yuck! 

“What am I going to do?” I asked myself out loud. 

I was the only one who knew about the Creeps—and the only one who 
could stop them. 

And I had to act fast. 



20 


“Pass the mashed potatoes,” Dad said with a mouthful of chicken. “And the 
biscuits, please.” 

I passed the food down the table. I took another drumstick from the 
bucket. Mom and Dad both work hard, so they don’t have time to cook. 
They usually pick up something on the way home. Tonight it was a fried 
chicken bucket, with a bunch of side dishes. 

They are always starving when they get home. There’s no point in 
talking to them until they’ve finished their first helping. They can’t even 
hear you over the sound of their chewing! 

I really wasn’t hungry. My stomach felt as if it were tied in tight knots. 
I kept staring at the chicken and picturing squirrel. 

I waited until most of the chicken had been gobbled up. Then I took a 
deep breath and started my story. 

“There’s something I have to tell you,” I said softly. 

They both raised their eyes from their plates. Dad had a swirl of 
mashed potatoes on his cheek. Mom reached over and brushed it off with 
her fingers. 

“Are you in trouble at school again, Ricky?” she asked sternly. “Have 
the kids been picking on you?” 

“No. That’s not it,” I replied quickly. “I have to tell you something. I 
mean, I need your help. You see—these four kids—” 

“Take a deep breath,” Dad said. “Start at the beginning.” 

“Calm down,” Mom added. “What’s gotten you so wired?” 

“Please—let me tell it!” I cried. 

They both settled back and lowered their forks to the table. 

“These four kids,” I started again. “They’re not really kids. I thought 
they were seventh-graders. But they’re not. They’re Creeps. They’re not 
kids at all. I mean, they’re new to the school. I never saw them before this 
year. But I thought...” 

Mom and Dad exchanged glances. Dad opened his mouth to say 
something—then changed his mind. 

“They came here with a mission,” I told them. “They want to turn all 



the kids in school into Creeps. They have these Identity Seeds, a big bag of 
them. They’re going to feed the seeds to all the kids.” 

I ran out of air. I hadn’t taken a breath. I took a long one now, and 
continued my story. 

“They think I’m a Creep, too. They think I’m their Commander. 
Because of a message I typed on the bottom of the school newspaper. They 
want me to help them turn all the kids into Creeps. Horrible monsters!” 

I took another breath. I was so excited, so nervous, I felt as if my heart 
had jumped to my throat. 

I leaned across the table and stared first at Mom, then at Dad. “We 
have to stop them!” I cried. “You have to help me. We can’t let them turn 
everyone into Creeps. But what can we do? How can we let people know 
that they’re not really kids? How can we stop them? You’ve got to help me. 
You’ve got to!” 

I let out a long whoosh of air and dropped against the back of the chair. 
I struggled to slow down my racing heart. 

My parents glanced at each other again. I could see the troubled 
expressions on their faces. 

Dad was the first to speak. “Ricky,” he said softly, “your mom and I 
are Creeps too.” 



21 


I gasped and nearly tumbled off my chair. 

Mom and Dad burst out laughing. 

“No. Actually we’re Martians!” Dad declared. 

“No way. We’re not Martians,” Mom argued. “We’re werewolves!” 
She picked up a chicken bone and pretended to chomp on it like a wolf. 

“We’re Martian werewolves!” Dad cried. He tossed back his head and 
howled like a wolf. 

Then they both laughed loudly again. They really thought they were a 

riot. 

“You’ve got to take me seriously!” I pleaded. 

For some reason, that made them laugh even harder. Dad actually had 
tears in his eyes from laughing so hard. He raised his napkin and dabbed at 
his eyes. 

“Ricky, sometimes you come up with the greatest things,” he said. He 
reached over and slapped my shoulder. 

“What an imagination,” Mom commented. She shook her head. “You 
really should write that story down, Ricky. It could win a prize.” 

“But it isn’t a story!” I cried. I jumped to my feet and angrily tossed 
my napkin onto my plate. “Why don’t you believe me?” 

“Oh, we believe you—Commander!” Dad exclaimed. “Commander of 
the Creeps!” 

They both burst out laughing again. 

I uttered an angry cry, turned, and stomped out of the dining room. I 
could still hear them laughing as I stormed up the stairs to my bedroom. 

I slammed the door behind me. And shook my fists in the air. 

I had to find some help. I had to make someone believe me. 

I slumped onto my bed and just sat there for a long while, staring at the 
darkness outside the window. I waited for my heart to stop racing, for my 
mind to calm down. 

But I couldn’t get calm. My whole body tingled. My brain spun. 

I grabbed the phone off my bedtable and punched in Iris’ number. Iris 
will listen to me, I told myself. Iris will know I’m not making up a wild 



story. 

The phone rang three times. Four. Five. 

No one home? 

“Come on, Iris!” I begged into the ringing receiver. “Be there!” 

I let it ring twelve times before I hung up. 

I slammed the phone back onto the bed table. After I calmed down a 
little, I sat down at my desk and tried to do my homework. 

But I couldn’t keep my mind on it. 

At least the phone isn’t ringing and ringing tonight, I told myself. The 
Creeps weren’t calling me tonight. 

They were waiting to hear from me. They were waiting to hear if I 
okayed Wart’s plan to go to school early and plant the seeds in the 
lunchroom food. 

I slammed my science textbook shut. 

“I will go to school early,” I said out loud. 

But not to meet the four Creeps. Not to drop Identity Seeds into 
everyone’s lunch. 

I’ll go to school early and talk to Ms. Crawford, the principal. I’ll tell 
her the whole story. I’ll tell her what the Creeps are planning to do at her 
school. 

She’ll help me stop them. I know she will. 

My clock radio woke me half an hour earlier than usual. I clicked it off and 
listened to a soft patter against my bedroom window. 

Staggering across the room, I peeked through the blinds. A gloomy 
gray day outside. Frozen rain dribbling down. 

I yawned. I had tossed and twisted all night. 

I got dressed quickly, pulling on a large red and brown flannel shirt 
and baggy brown corduroy pants. I gulped down a fast breakfast of orange 
juice and corn flakes. 

“You’re up early this morning,” Mom commented sleepily. She stood 
waiting for the coffeemaker to drip. 

“Yeah. Got to go,” I mumbled. I grabbed my parka and backpack and 
hurried out the back door. 

I pulled my baseball cap down over my eyes and jogged through the 
cold, drizzling rain. Such a dreary day. Everything looked gray this 



morning. No bright color anywhere. 

As I made my way to school, I practiced my speech to Ms. Crawford. I 
wanted to tell the story right. I wanted everything in the right order. I didn’t 
want to leave out any important parts. 

I passed a man in a gray rain slicker, out walking his Dalmatian. I 
didn’t see anyone else on the street. 

The school appeared empty when I arrived. The halls were silent. My 
wet shoes skidded over the floor. 

I stepped into the front office. The room was empty. The two 
secretaries hadn’t arrived yet. But I saw a light from the principal’s office in 
back. And I heard a cough. 

“Ms. Crawford, are you back there?” I called. 

“Yes,” she called back. “Who is it?” 

I heard her chair scrape. And then she poked her white-haired head out 
of the office door. “Ricky?” She squinted at me in surprise. “You startled 
me. You’re here awfully early, aren’t you?” 

“I—I need to talk to you,” I stammered. 

She motioned for me to step around the front counter and into her 
office. “What is the problem?” she asked, closing the door behind me. 

“It’s kind of a long story,” I began. 

Would she believe me? 



22 


Ms. Crawford always reminds me of a black-and-white movie. She has 
short, curly white hair, gray eyes, and a very pale face. And she always 
wears black—black pants suits and black skirts and tops. 

I don’t know how old she is. I think she’s pretty old. But she’s very 
lively and athletic. Sometimes she joins in during volleyball games in the 

gym. 

I sat down in the stiff-backed chair in front of her desk. She moved 
some files aside and leaned across the desk toward me. “I’m glad you came 
by,” she said, her smile fading. 

“Huh? Really?” 

“I’ve been meaning to talk to you, Ricky,” she continued. “I 
understand there was some trouble at the car wash last Saturday.” 

She waited for me to say something. But I didn’t know what to say. 

“I’ve been told that you started a water fight last Saturday,” Ms. 
Crawford said sternly. 

“Me?” I cried. “I didn’t start it! I—I—” 

She motioned with one hand for me to be silent. “Mr. Wartman— 
Richard’s father—called me to complain. He said that the inside of his car 
was totally soaked. He told me that—” 

“That’s who I want to talk to you about,” I interrupted. I could see that 
this conversation was not going as I had planned. I decided I’d better jump 
in as fast as possible. 

“I want to talk to you about Wart,” I said. “I mean, Richard. He’s not a 
kid, see. He told me. He’s a Creep.” 

Ms. Crawford’s mouth dropped open. She blinked at me. 

“And you know his three friends?” I blurted out. “They’re Creeps too. 
They’re monsters. Purple monsters.” 

Ms. Crawford twisted her face into a frown. “Ricky—” she started. 

“No—really!” I insisted. “They’re monsters. They call themselves 
Creeps! They told me so themselves. I saw them! Wart ate a squirrel! He’s a 
Creep!” 

This wasn’t going over well. I could see that by the deepening furrows 



in Ms. Crawford’s forehead. It wasn’t the way I’d planned to tell the story. 
But it was too late now. I had to get it all out. 

“I’m their Commander,” I told the principal. “At least, they think I’m 
their Commander. But I’m not really. And they—” 

Ms. Crawford jumped to her feet. “Ricky—are you okay?” she asked. 

“They want to plant seeds and turn the whole school into Creeps,” I 
continued frantically. “They want...” 

She stepped around her desk and placed a hand on my forehead. “Do 
you have a temperature? You feel a little warm.” 

She moved back and studied my face. “Would you like to see the 
nurse? She usually comes in early.” 

“No. Not the nurse!” I cried. “You don’t understand. We can’t let 
anyone eat the lunchroom food! Because they’re monsters!” 

Ms. Crawford scratched the top of her head. “Should I send you 
home?” she asked. “Do you feel sick? I could have someone take you 
home.” She reached for the phone. “Are your parents still home? I could 
call them.” 

“No—please!” I jumped to my feet. “I’m okay. Really.” 

She wasn’t going to believe me. No way I could get her to listen to me. 

“Just a joke,” I said, backing to the door. “Just a joke. Really. I’m sorry 
about Mr. Wartman’s car. It was an accident. The hose just slipped.” 

I fumbled for the door. Pushed it open. Backed out. 

“Ricky, wait,” Ms. Crawford called. “I really think you should see the 
nurse. Just talk to her. You seem very excited. Perhaps if you talk to her...” 

“I’m fine. Really,” I insisted. 

I turned and ran through the front office and out the door. 

Into the long, empty hallway. 

My heart flip-flopping in my chest, I turned the corner—and bumped 
into Wart and his three friends. 

“Ohh!” I let out a startled cry. “What are you doing here?” 

“Glad you joined us, Commander,” Wart said in a whisper. His eyes 
glanced up and down the hall. “Let’s go.” 

“Go? Go where?” I demanded. 

“To the lunchroom,” he replied. 



23 


I turned and looked for Ms. Crawford. But she had stayed in her office. The 
long hall stood empty. 

Wart and David moved to my sides. Brenda led the way to the stairs 
that went down to the lunchroom and the kitchen. Jared walked close 
behind me. 

They had me surrounded. I had no choice. I had to go with them. 

When we reached the bottom of the stairs, I could see the open doors 
to the kitchen. Bright white light poured out to the hall. 

I took a deep breath. 

What was that smell? Tuna casserole? 

I could hear women’s voices, the cooks working away at the stoves. 

With Brenda leading the way, the five of us moved silently to the 
kitchen doorway. Now I could hear the clatter of pots and the hiss of 
something cooking on the stove. A woman coughed. Another one laughed. 

Brenda turned suddenly, and I nearly walked into her. She shoved 
something into my hand. 

The plastic bag of seeds. 

“You may have the honor, Commander,” she whispered solemnly. 
“You may hide the seeds in the food.” 

“Uh... well...” I pressed my back against the tile wall. I didn’t want to 
go in there. I didn’t want the honor of planting the seeds. 

“Maybe we should come back later,” I suggested. “Remember I 
suggested that we wait? I told you to wait until—” 

“We have no choice,” Jared whispered. “We know you want the 
mission to succeed.” 

“Good luck,” Brenda said softly. 

David and Jared gave me a hard push into the kitchen. 

Squeezing the bag of seeds between my hands, I blinked in the bright 
light. I could see three women in white uniforms and white aprons. They 
stood across the big room at the stoves against the wall. 

They had their backs to me. Tall soup pots bubbled and steamed on the 
stoves. 



I swallowed hard. If one of them turned around, she’d see me instantly. 

I slid beside a cabinet near the doorway. Ahead of me stood a long, 
shiny aluminum counter. Enormous trays of food stood cooling on the 
counter. I saw a big tray of macaroni and cheese, a tray of steamed broccoli, 
a huge tray of tuna casserole. 

I guessed it would take about ten steps to reach the counter. So close! 

I could probably dive to the counter, pour the seeds out into one of the 
big food trays, and run out the door in less than ten seconds. 

Even if one of the cooks turned around, I could accomplish the 
mission and be out of there before she could even cry out. 

What am I thinking? I asked myself, pressing against the side of the 
cabinet. 

I don’t WANT to accomplish the mission! 

I glanced back to the kitchen doorway. All four Creeps huddled there, 
watching me. They waved their hands frantically, motioning me to get on 
with it. 

I had no choice. No way to escape. 

I had to go ahead and plant the seeds. 

I sucked in a deep breath and held it. Then, my eyes on the white- 
uniformed backs of the three cooks, I crept up quickly to the long food 
counter. 

I stopped a few feet away. In front of me on the counter stood an 
enormous square metal pan of macaroni and cheese. It was steaming hot, 
fresh from the oven. The tangy cheese smell floated up to me. 

I can’t do this! I decided. I can’t! 

I turned back. The four Creeps leaned into the doorway, blocking my 
escape. All four of them were signaling wildly for me to pour the seeds. 

I turned back to the macaroni tray. 

I raised the seed bag. 

I pulled open the top. 

They’re watching me, I knew. They’re all watching. I have to do this. 
Or else they will know that I’m not their Commander. 

I have to go ahead with it. 

But then—in a flash—I had an idea. 



24 


I held the seed bag in one hand from the bottom. I raised it in front of me. 

I turned and flashed the four Creeps a thumbs-up sign. Then I took a 
step toward the food counter. 

Another step. 

And I pretended to trip over something. 

I stumbled forward. My hands shot up. And the seed bag flew into the 
air. 

I faked a frantic attempt to catch it as I went down. 

But the bag hit the side of the aluminum counter. Turned upside down. 
And dropped to the floor, spilling the seeds all over the floor. I watched 
them roll in all directions. 

The bag lay on its side in front of me. Empty. 

Yessss! I thought happily. I’ve done it! I’ve destroyed their plan! 

I forced an unhappy expression on my face. 

And scrambled on my hands and knees out the kitchen door. 

Wart pulled me up and dragged me away from the open doorway. 

I shook my head sadly. “Sorry,” I murmured. “I’m so sorry. I have 
failed you all.” I pretended to be near tears. “Really. I’m so sorry.” 

“No problem,” Jared replied. 

He pulled another bag of seeds from his coat pocket and slapped it into 
my hand. 

“We always carry a spare,” Brenda whispered. “You never know when 
you’ll need more Identity Seeds.” 

“Uh... that’s lucky,” I replied. 

“Now go do it!” Wart cried softly, slapping me on the back. “This time 
you will not fail, Commander.” 

The four of them pushed me back through the doorway. 

I blinked, waiting for my eyes to adjust to the bright kitchen lights. 
The three cooks were still working at the stoves. They still had their backs 
to me. 

I crept up to the food counter and peered down at the huge tray of 



simmering macaroni. I had the seed bag gripped tightly in my right hand. 
The little bag felt as if it weighed a hundred pounds! 

I raised the seed bag over the steaming macaroni. 

Glanced back to the doorway. All four of the Creeps leaned into the 
opening, their eyes locked on me. 

I turned back to the food counter. Raised the bag higher over the 
macaroni tray. 

I have no choice, I told myself. I have to do this now. 

I poured the whole bag of seeds over the top of the macaroni and 
cheese. Then I turned quickly to the door. And tiptoeing silently, started to 
sneak out of the kitchen. 

“Stir them!” Brenda whispered. She made a stirring motion with her 
hand. 

“Huh?” I stopped a few feet from the door. 

“Stir the seeds in!” she whispered urgently. “You’ve got to hide them!” 

“Oh. Right.” 

I turned and crept back up to the big tray of macaroni and cheese. I 
picked up a long wooden spoon and stirred the seeds into the macaroni. 
Then I turned to sneak back out. 

I took three steps—when two strong hands grabbed my shoulders 
roughly from behind. “What are you doing in here, young man?” a woman 
barked. 



25 


The hands spun me around. I stared up into the angry face of Mrs. Marshall. 
“What are you doing in here?” she repeated. 

Mrs. Marshall is the nice cook. She’s our favorite. She always kids 
around with everyone at lunchtime when she dishes out the food. 

But she wasn’t kidding around now. She knew I didn’t belong in the 
kitchen. 

Her black curls pressed against her hair net. She tilted her head, hands 
in her white apron pocket, waiting for me to answer her question. 

I glanced to the door. Saw the four Creeps peeking in. 

“Mrs. Marshall,” I whispered. “Don’t serve the macaroni.” 

She squinted at me. “Huh? Speak up, young man.” 

“Don’t serve the macaroni,” I whispered, a little louder. I couldn’t say 
it much louder. Wart and his three friends would hear me. “Please—don’t 
let anyone eat the macaroni,” I begged. 

“What are you saying?” she demanded loudly. “Why are you 
whispering?” 

“Don’t serve the macaroni,” I repeated, still in a whisper. “It’s 
poisoned!” 

She uttered an angry groan. “Young man, our macaroni is delicious,” 
she declared. “I’m so sick and tired of jokes about our food.” 

“She’s right!” Another cook, Mrs. Davis, chimed in from across the 
room. She waved a long mixing spoon at me. “We make good, wholesome 
food here. It’s like home-cooked. And we’re tired of all the horrible jokes.” 

“We have feelings, you know,” Mrs. Marshall added. 

“We use real cheese in the macaroni,” Mrs. Davis called, still waving 
her spoon. “None of that artificial stuff. And real macaroni noodles.” 

“That’s right!” the third cook called. She was new. I didn’t know her 
name. “Give him a taste, Alice. Give him a taste of the macaroni. He’ll see 
how good it is.” 

Mrs. Marshall leaned over me. “Good idea. Would you like a little 
bowl of macaroni?” She stepped over to the food counter. 

“Try it. You won’t make any more jokes,” Mrs. Davis said. 



Mrs. Marshall started to spoon out a little bowl of macaroni for me. 

I backed up toward the door. “No. Please. No thank you,” I sputtered. 

I reached the doorway. “I... I had a big breakfast,” I told them. 

I turned and ran out. And bumped into the four Creeps. They all 
cheered. 

“Commander... you have done it!” Wart cried happily. “You have 
planted the seeds!” 

They cheered again, and clapped and slapped me on the back. All four 
of them were grinning their heads off. 

“Now we just have to wait till this afternoon,” Brenda declared. “This 
school will be crawling with Creeps!” 



26 


I didn’t go near the lunchroom at lunchtime. I hid in a stairwell instead. My 
stomach was growling, but I didn’t care. 

I couldn’t bear to see all the kids gobbling down the macaroni. 
Swallowing the little seeds that would turn them into squirrel-eating 
Creeps. 

A school full of purple lizard monsters, I thought miserably. And all 
my fault... my fault. 

All afternoon, I didn’t hear a word my teacher said. Iris tried to talk to 
me, but I pretended to be listening really hard to the teacher. 

I sat at my desk, studying the other kids. Watching for signs that they 
were changing. Waiting for the seeds I had planted to do their evil. 

But I didn’t see anything odd. No bumpy purple skin. No long, flicking 
tongues. 

The kids all appeared normal. 

After school, the four Creeps were waiting for me in the playground. 
They surrounded me and led me to our hiding place in the woods across the 
street. 

Wart angrily kicked a stone out of his way. David and Jared were 
muttering unhappily and shaking their heads. 

“It didn’t work,” Brenda said softly. “The seeds didn’t work. No one 
changed.” 

“What went wrong?” Wart asked. “What could have gone wrong?” 

They all stared at me. 

Suddenly, I knew the answer. I knew exactly why none of the kids had 
turned into Creeps. “No one ate the macaroni,” I blurted out. 

I could have kicked myself. Why did I tell them? Why did I tip them 
off? 

They narrowed their eyes at me. “Huh?” 

“No one ever eats the macaroni,” I said. I’d already started. I had to 
explain. “It’s sort of a school rule. The macaroni hasn’t been touched by 
anyone in years and years!” 

All four of them groaned. 



Wart stepped up to me and stared at me suspiciously. “How do you 
know that, Commander?” he demanded. “You arrived here only a few days 
before we did. So how do you know that the macaroni hasn’t been eaten in 
years?” 

I had to think fast. If they discovered that I wasn’t a Creep, they’d 
probably disintegrate me—or eat me—or something! 

“Uh... one of the kids in my class told me,” I replied. I lowered my 
head. “I should have remembered sooner. I have failed you. Our mission is 
a failure.” 

“No, it isn’t,” Brenda chimed in. “I have more seeds—and a new plan. 
Abetter plan.” 

The other Creeps turned to her. “Tell us your plan,” Jared demanded. 
“We don’t have much time before the seeds lose their power.” 

“It’s simple,” Brenda replied with a shrug. “We bake the seeds into 
cookies. Then we hand out the cookies for free at the school bake sale on 
Saturday.” 

“Excellent idea!” David cried. 

“Yaaaay!” Wart and Jared cheered. 

“Everyone gets a free cookie,” Brenda said, grinning an evil grin. 
“And everyone becomes a Creep.” 

Brenda’s grin made me feel cold all over. I swallowed hard. My mouth 
suddenly felt so dry. 

I knew that her plan would work. I knew that no one in my school 
could pass up a free cookie. 

What can I do? I asked myself. How can I stop them? 

They all turned to me. “Shall we bake the cookies, Commander?” Wart 
demanded. “Shall we put Brenda’s plan into action?” 

I stared back at them. They were eagerly waiting for my answer. I 
wondered if they could see my knees shaking. 

“Well...” I took a deep breath. I had to try something. I had to think of 
something to stop them. 

“I don’t like Brenda’s plan,” I said, trying to keep my voice low and 
steady. “I think we must prepare the seeds for a later time. I think we should 
bury the seeds in the ground and see if they sprout. That way, we’ll have 
lots and lots of seeds!” 

I know. I know. It was a really lame idea. 



But it was the only thing that popped into my mind. 

Would they buy it? I wondered. 

Would they forget about Brenda’s plan and go along with it? 

Would they agree to bury the seeds? 

No way. 

It took me only a few seconds to realize I had made the worst mistake 
of my life. 



27 


“Bury the seeds?” Brenda cried. “Bury them?” 

The four of them moved in closer. They formed a tight circle around 
me. 

I glanced nervously around, searching the woods for the best path to 
escape. But they had me trapped. 

“Are you sure you are our Commander?” Wart demanded. 

David and Jared sneered at me. “A Creep Commander would never tell 
us to bury the Identity Seeds,” Jared said menacingly. 

Wart stuck his face up close to mine. “Prove you are our Commander,” 
he ordered. 

“Yes. Prove you are a Creep!” David cried. 

“Prove it! Prove it!” All four of them began to chant. 

I gasped and tried to back away. But they had me surrounded. 

“Prove it! Prove it!” 

And as they chanted, they began to change once again. Their skin grew 
bumpy and turned bright purple. Their hair slid into their heads, and their 
jaws stretched into long, toothy snouts. 

“Prove it! Prove it!” they chanted. “Prove that you’re a Creep!” 

I stared at them, unable to move, unable to run. What could I do? 

“Prove you’re a Creep!” they demanded. “Prove it—now!” 

Eyes flashing wildly, purple bumps quivering all over their bodies, 
they slithered toward me. 

And I knew I was doomed. 



28 


“Prove it! Prove it!” 

Their long, bumpy tongues flicked at me as they chanted. 

“Prove that you’re one of us! Change now! Let us see you change like 

us!” 

I swallowed hard. They were chanting for me to change, staring, 
waiting. 

They’d have to wait a long, long time! 

“Change! Change! Change!” 

They were about to learn the truth about me. 

I decided I had to confess. And beg them for mercy. “Uh... guys...?” I 
started. 

But then a girl’s shout rose over the chanting of the Creeps. “Stop at 
once!” she cried. 

We all turned to see Iris come running out from behind a tall 
evergreen. The four Creeps uttered grunts of surprise. Their eyes rolled 
wildly in their purple lizard heads. 

“I am the Commander’s second-in-command!” 

Iris declared, her long earrings jangling wildly. “I am his sergeant!” 

The Creeps pulled their long, bumpy tongues into their snouts. They 
stared at Iris, suddenly silent. 

“The Commander and I do not choose to transform now,” Iris told 
them sternly. “We do not have time. We must bake the cookies now. We 
must prepare the seeds for the bake sale.” 

“Yaaaay!” The Creeps cheered Iris. 

“Thank you, Sergeant,” Brenda said. “I am glad you like my plan.” 

“Your plan will work,” Iris replied. “We will turn the whole school 
into Creeps like us. Quickly. Let us hurry to my house and bake the 
cookies.” 

The four lizard creatures offered up another cheer. They slapped 
tongues. Then they quickly began to change back into kids. 

The purple on their skin faded. The quivering bumps slid into their 
skin. Their snouts shrunk and their faces twisted back into the faces of the 



kids I knew. 

As they changed back, I leaned close to Iris and whispered in her ear. 
“Iris—you’re really one of them?” 

“Yes, Commander,” she replied, keeping her eyes on the four Creeps. 
“Do not worry. This new plan will not fail.” 

I opened my mouth to say something, but no sound came out. I 
couldn’t believe it. Iris—a Creep! 

We began making our way through the woods. Iris led the way to her 
house. 

The afternoon sun was sinking behind the bare trees. The air suddenly 
felt cold and heavy. I couldn’t stop the chills that rolled down my back. 

I’d had a close call in the woods. Iris had saved me. But I knew my 
troubles weren’t over. 

I was in terrible danger. 

So were all the kids at school. 

We stepped into Iris’ kitchen. Why did Iris save me? I wondered. She 
knows I’m not one of them. She knows I’m not a Creep. 

So, why did she rescue me from the other four Creeps? 

As the four of them took out flour and eggs and other ingredients, I 
pulled Iris aside. “You know I’m not a Creep,” I whispered. “Why did you 
rescue me?” 

“I’m not a Creep either,” she whispered back. “But I saw you were in 
big trouble.” 

“How did you know—?” I started. I glanced back into the kitchen to 
make sure the Creeps weren’t watching us. 

“You were supposed to meet me on the playground—remember?” Iris 
whispered. “I saw them drag you into the woods. I followed you. I heard 
everything. And I saw everything.” 

“Well, thanks for saving me,” I replied. “But now you are in danger 

too.” 

She nodded. “I know. But I had to save you—didn’t I?” 

“How are we going to save the rest of the school?” I whispered. 

“Good question,” Iris replied. “We have to bake the cookies now. We 
don’t have a choice. When we get to the bake sale, we’ll figure out a way to 
keep kids from eating them.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes. 



How would we keep kids from grabbing up free cookies? 
How? 



29 


On Saturday morning, Iris and I and the four Creeps carried our big trays of 
cookies into the gym. 

What a crowd! 

Every kid in school was there. They were running back and forth, 
carrying trays of baked goods to the tables. Talking and laughing and 
kidding around. 

A podium with a microphone had been set up under the basket at one 
end of the gym. The long row of tables stretched from one wall to the other. 

As Iris and I walked to the tables, the four Creeps stayed close at our 
sides. Protecting the cookies. Watching our every move. 

The cookies with the Identity Seeds inside were piled high on the two 
trays. We had baked hundreds of them. More than enough for every kid in 
school. 

We passed by a group of kids gobbling down brownies. At the near 
table, Ms. Williamson, our teacher, was busy cutting slices in a cheesecake. 
I saw dozens of plates of cookies spread over the tables. 

Signs were posted, giving the prices. Just about everything cost a 
dollar. Nothing was free. 

Our cookies were the only free items. 

How could I stop kids from taking them? How could I make sure that 
no one ate them? 

We headed to the tables. But Wart stepped in front of us. “Start giving 
them out now,” he urged. 

“Yes. There’s no reason to wait,” Brenda agreed. “Let’s pass out the 
cookies. The gym is totally jammed with kids. In a few minutes, we’ll have 
dozens of new Creeps.” 

Wart grabbed for the tray. 

David and Jared pulled the plastic wrapping off the cookies. 

I’ve got to act—now! I knew. 

But what could I do? 

As Wart lifted the cookie tray from my hands, I had an idea. 

I dodged past him. Swung my way around a group of chocolate cake 



eaters. Leaped behind the podium where Tasha was about to make a 
welcoming speech. And grabbed the microphone. 

“Attention! Attention, everyone!” I screamed. 

Aloud squeal from the speakers got everyone’s attention. My panicky 
voice echoed off the high gym walls. 

“Don’t eat the free cookies!” I shouted. “Please—listen to me, 
everyone! Don’t eat the free cookies! You will all become monsters! Bumps 
will grow all over you, and you’ll look like purple lizard creatures! And... 
and... you’ll eat squirrels whole!” 

Everyone laughed. The laughter drowned out my desperate words. 

“You’ve got to believe me!” I shrieked into the microphone. I could 
see Wart and David running toward the podium. “You’ve got to! Stay away 
from the free cookies! ” 

The laughter rose up until I couldn’t hear myself. 

“Get away from that mike!” Tasha screamed. She tried to grab the 
microphone from my hands. 

Two teachers rushed up to pull me away. 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” Tasha started to chant. And then the rest 
of the huge crowd of kids joined in. 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” The gym rang with their chanting and 
wild laughter. 

I could feel my heart sink to my stomach. 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” The chanting made me feel as if my head 
was about to burst. 

I wanted to cover my ears. I wanted to run. I wanted to disappear. 

How can I save them if they’re just going to laugh at me? I wondered. 
What can I do if they refuse to listen to me? 

And then I had another idea. An even more desperate plan than 
grabbing the microphone and begging them. 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” Tasha led the chanting. 

I tried to ignore the laughing, shouting voices. I knew I had only a few 
seconds to act. 

Would my plan work? 

Probably not. But it was the only thing my panicked brain could come 
up with. 

I’ll gobble down all the cookies myself, I decided. 



I’ll grab the trays and eat all the cookies—and save everyone in the 
school. 

With a wild leap, I pushed past a bunch of chanting kids. I grabbed the 
tray of cookies from Wart’s hands. And I opened my mouth to start 
swallowing them down. 



30 


“Ow!” 

I cried out when something smacked me in the forehead. 

I wasn’t hurt. Just startled. 

I reached a hand up and felt something wet and gooey. Someone had 
thrown a piece of chocolate pie. 

Kids laughed. Tasha ran up and flashed my picture. 

“Hey—!” I cried out angrily. 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” some kids chanted. 

“Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!” I heard other kids sing. 

Someone threw a brownie. I ducked and it sailed over my shoulder. I 
nearly dropped the tray of cookies. Laughing, Tasha snapped another photo. 

“What’s wrong with you?” I shouted. “I’m trying to save you!” 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” 

“Ricky Rat! Ricky Rat!” 

Don’t they realize what danger they’re in? I asked myself. Why are 
they making fun of me? Why do they always make fun of me? I’m only 
trying to save them! 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” 

Someone hit me in the chest with a gooey slice of cheesecake. 

I raised the cookie tray. I’ve got to save them, I told myself. I have to 
ignore all the teasing and chanting and laughing. I’ve got to save them all! 

Wart and Brenda closed in on me. “Commander, what are you waiting 
for?” Wart asked. “Pass out the cookies.” 

“Ignore their chanting,” Brenda said. “Once they eat the cookies, they 
will all be Creeps. You will be their leader. They will all be your slaves!” 

I’ve got to save them, I repeated to myself. Got to save them. Got to 
save them... 

I turned to Brenda. “Huh? What did you say?” 

“I said they will all be your slaves!” Brenda shouted over the chanting 
and laughter. 

My slaves? 



My slaves ? 

My slaves??? 

I ducked as someone tossed another slice of cheesecake at me. 

“Sicky Ricky! Sicky Ricky!” they chanted. 

“Here—Tasha—have a cookie!” I cried. I held the tray out to her and 
watched her take it. 

“Have a cookie! Free cookies!” I shouted at the top of my lungs. 

Hands grabbed eagerly for the cookies. I moved quickly, happily 
around the gym, handing out cookies to every kid. 

“Plenty for everyone!” I shouted. “That’s right—they’re free! And 
they’re the best! Free cookies! Free cookies! That’s it, everyone! Gobble 
them up! One for everyone! Free cookies!” 

I flashed my four friends a thumbs-up. And I took a cookie for myself. 

Not bad. A little chewy, but very sweet. 

I gazed around the gym. Watched everyone chewing up the free 
cookies. 

From now on, I told myself, things are going to be very different 
around here. 

And I can ’t wait! 







Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats






BEWARE, THE SNOWMAN 


Goosebumps - 51 
R.L. Stine 





1 


When the snows blow wild 
And the day grows old, 

Beware, the snowman, my child. 

Beware, the snowman. 

He brings the cold. 

Why did that rhyme return to me? 

It was a rhyme my mother used to whisper to me when I was a little 
girl. I could almost hear Mom’s soft voice, a voice I haven’t heard since I 
was five.... 

Beware, the snowman. 

He brings the cold. 

Mom died when I was five, and I went to live with my aunt Greta. I’m 
twelve now, and my aunt never read that rhyme to me. 

So what made it run through my mind as Aunt Greta and I climbed out 
of the van and gazed at our snow-covered new home? 

“Jaclyn, you look troubled,” Aunt Greta said, placing a hand on the 
shoulder of my blue parka. “What are you thinking about, dear?” 

I shivered. Not from Aunt Greta’s touch, but from the chill of the 
steady wind that blew down from the mountain. I stared at the flat-roofed 
cabin that was to be our new home. 

Beware, the snowman. 

There is a second verse to that rhyme, I thought. Why can’t I 
remember it? 

I wondered if we still had the old poetry book that Mom used to read 
to me from. 

“What a cozy little home,” Aunt Greta said. She still had her hand on 
my shoulder. 

I felt so sad, so terribly unhappy. But I forced a smile to my face. “Yes. 
Cozy,” I murmured. Snow clung to the windowsills and filled the cracks 
between the shingles. A mound of snow rested on the low, flat roof. 

Aunt Greta’s normally pale cheeks were red from the cold. She isn’t 



very old, but she has had white hair for as long as I can remember. She 
wears it long, always tied behind her head in a single braid that falls nearly 
all the way down her back. 

She is tall and skinny. And kind of pretty, with a delicate round face 
and big, sad dark eyes. 

I don’t look at all like my aunt. I don’t know who I look like. I don’t 
remember my mom that well. And I never knew my father. Aunt Greta told 
me he disappeared soon after I was born. 

I have wavy, dark brown hair and brown eyes. I am tall and athletic. I 
was the star basketball player on the girls’ team at my school back in 
Chicago. 

I like to talk a lot and dance and sing. Aunt Greta can go a whole day 
without barely saying a word. I love her, but she’s so stern and silent.... 
Sometimes I wish she were easier to talk to. 

I’m going to need someone to talk to, I thought sadly. We had left 
Chicago only yesterday. But I already missed my friends. 

How am I going to make friends in this tiny village on the edge of the 
Arctic Circle? I wondered. 

I helped my aunt pull bags from the van. My boots crunched over the 
hard snow. 

I gazed up at the snow-covered mountain. Snow, snow everywhere. I 
couldn’t tell where the mountain ended and the clouds began. 

The little square houses along the road didn’t look real to me. They 
looked as if they were made of gingerbread. 

As if I had stepped into some kind of fairy tale. 

Except it wasn’t a fairy tale. It was my life. 

My totally weird life. 

I mean, why did we have to move from the United States to this tiny, 
frozen mountain village? 

Aunt Greta never really explained. “Time for a change,” she muttered. 
“Time to move on.” It was so hard to get her to say more than a few words 
at a time. 

I knew that she and Mom grew up in a village like this one. But why 
did we have to move here now? Why did I have to leave my school and all 
of my friends? 

Sherpia. 



What kind of a name is Sherpia? Can you imagine moving from 
Chicago to Sherpia ? 

Lucky, huh? 

No way. 

It isn’t even a skiing town. The whole village is practically deserted! I 
wondered if there was anyone here my age. 

Aunt Greta kicked snow away from the front door of our new house. 
Then she struggled to open the door. “The wood is warped,” she grunted. 
She lowered her shoulder to the door—and pushed it open. 

She’s thin, but she’s tough. 

I started to carry the bags into the house. But something standing in the 
snowy yard across the road caught my eye. Curious, I turned and stared at 
it. 

I gasped as it came into focus. 

What is that? 

A snowman? 

A snowman with a scar ? 

As I squinted across the road at it, the snowman started to move. 



2 


I blinked. 

No. The snowman wasn’t moving. 

Its red scarf was fluttering in the swirling breeze. 

My boots crunched loudly as I stepped up to the snowman and 
examined it carefully. 

What a weird snowman. It had slender tree limbs for arms. One arm 
poked out to the side. The other arm stood straight up, as if waving to me. 
Each tree limb had three twig fingers poking out from it. 

The snowman had two dark, round stones for eyes. A crooked carrot 
nose. And a down-turned, sneering mouth of smaller pebbles. 

Why did they make it so mean looking? I wondered. 

I couldn’t take my eyes off the scar. It was long and deep, cut down the 
right side of the snowman’s face. 

“Weird,” I muttered out loud. My favorite word. Aunt Greta is always 
saying I need a bigger vocabulary. 

But how else would you describe a nasty-looking, sneering snowman 
with a scar on its face? 

“Jaclyn—come help!” Aunt Greta’s call made me turn away from the 
snowman. I hurried back across the road to my new house. 

It took a long while to unpack the van. When we lugged the final 
carton into the cabin, Aunt Greta found a pot. Then she made us hot 
chocolate on the little, old-fashioned stove in the kitchen. 

“Cozy,” she repeated. She smiled. But her dark eyes studied my face. I 
think she was trying to see if I was unhappy. 

“At least it’s warm in here,” she said, wrapping her bony fingers 
around the white hot-chocolate mug. Her cheeks were still red from the 
cold. 

I nodded sullenly. I wanted to cheer up. But I just couldn’t. I kept 
thinking about my friends back home. I wondered if they were going to a 
Bulls game tonight. My friends were all into basketball. 

I won’t be playing much basketball here, I thought unhappily. Even if 
they play basketball, there probably aren’t enough kids in the village for a 



team! 

“You’ll be warm up there,” Aunt Greta said, cutting into my thoughts. 
She pointed up to the low ceiling. 

The house had only one bedroom. That was my aunt’s room. My room 
was the low attic beneath the roof. 

“I’m going to check it out,” I said, pushing back my chair. It scraped 
on the hardwood floor. 

The only way to reach my room was a metal ladder that stood against 
the wall. I climbed the ladder, then pushed away the flat board in the ceiling 
and pulled myself into the low attic. 

It was cozy, all right. My aunt had picked the right word. 

The ceiling was so low, I couldn’t stand up. Pale, white light streamed 
in through the one small, round window at the far end of the room. 

Crouching, I made my way to the window and peered out. Snow 
speckled the windowpane. But I could see the road and the two rows of 
little houses curving up the mountainside. 

I didn’t see anyone out there. Not a soul. 

I’ll bet they’ve ah gone to Florida, I thought glumly. 

It was midwinter break. The school here was closed. Aunt Greta and I 
had passed it on our way through the village. A small, gray stone building, 
not much bigger than a two-car garage. 

How many kids will be in my class? I wondered. Three or four? Just 
me? And will they all speak English? 

I swallowed hard. And scolded myself for being so down. 

Cheer up, Jaclyn, I thought. Sherpia is a beautiful little village. You 
might meet some really neat kids here. 

Ducking my head, I made my way back to the ladder. I’m going to 
cover the ceiling with posters, I decided. That will brighten this attic a lot. 

And maybe help cheer me up, too. 

“Can I help unpack?” I asked Aunt Greta as I climbed down the ladder. 

She pushed her long, white braid off her shoulder. “No. I want to work 
in the kitchen first. Why don’t you take a walk or something? Do a little 
exploring.” 

A few minutes later, I found myself outside, pulling the drawstrings of 
my parka hood tight. I adjusted my fur-lined gloves and waited for my eyes 
to adjust to the white glare of the snow. 



Which way should I walk? I wondered. 

I had already seen the school, the general store, a small church, and the 
post office down the road. So I decided to head up the road, toward the 
mountaintop. 

The snow was hard and crusty. My boots hardly made a dent in it as I 
leaned into the wind and started to walk. Tire tracks cut twin ruts down the 
middle of the road. I decided to walk in one of them. 

I passed a couple of houses about the same size as ours. They both 
appeared dark and empty. A tall, stone house had a Jeep parked in the 
driveway. 

I saw a kid’s sled in the front yard. An old-fashioned wooden sled. A 
yellow-eyed, black cat stared out at me from the living-room window. 

I waved a gloved hand at it. It didn’t move. 

I still hadn’t seen any other humans. 

The wind whistled and grew colder as I climbed. The road grew 
steeper as it curved up. The houses were set farther apart. 

The snow sparkled as clouds rolled away from the sun. It was 
suddenly so beautiful! I turned and gazed down at the houses I had passed, 
little gingerbread houses nestled in the snow. 

It’s so pretty, I thought. Maybe I will get to like it here. 

“Ohh!” I cried out as I felt icy fingers wrap themselves around my 


neck. 



3 


I spun around and pulled free of the frozen grip. 

And stared at a grinning boy in a brown sheepskin jacket and a red- 
and-green wool ski cap. “Did I scare you?” he asked. His grin grew wider. 

Before I could answer, a girl about my age stepped out from behind a 
broad evergreen bush. She wore a purple down coat and purple gloves. 

“Don’t mind Eli,” she said, tossing her hair off her face. “He’s a total 
creep.” 

“Thanks for the compliment,” Eli grinned. 

I decided they must be brother and sister. They both had round faces, 
straight black hair, and bright, sky-blue eyes. 

“You’re new,” Eli said, squinting at me. 

“Eli thinks it’s funny to scare any new kids,” his sister told me, rolling 
her eyes. “My little brother is a riot, isn’t he?” 

“Being scared is about all there is to do in Sherpia,” Eli said. His grin 
faded. 

What a weird thing to say, I thought. 

I introduced myself. “I’m Jaclyn DeForest,” I told them. Their names 
were Rolonda and Eli Browning. 

“We live there,” Eli said, pointing to the white house. “Where do you 
live?” 

I pointed down the road. “Farther down,” I replied. I started to ask 
them something—but stopped when I saw the snowman they were building. 

It had one arm out and one arm up. It had a red scarf wrapped under its 
head. And it had a deep scar cut down the right side of its face. 

“That s-snowman—” I stammered. “It looks just like one I saw across 
the street from me.” 

Rolonda’s smile faded. Eli lowered his eyes to the snow. “Really?” he 
muttered. 

“Why did you make it like that?” I demanded. “It’s so strange looking. 
Why did you put that scar on its face?” 

They glanced at each other tensely. 

They didn’t reply. 



Finally, Rolonda shrugged. “I really don’t know,” she murmured. She 
blushed. 

Was she lying? Why didn’t she want to answer me? 

“Where are you walking?” Eli asked, tightening the snowman’s red 
scarf. 

“Just walking,” I told him. “Do you guys want to come with me? I 
thought I’d walk up to the top of the mountain.” 

“No!” Eli gasped. His blue eyes widened in fear. 

“You can’t!” Rolonda cried. “You can’tl” 



4 


“Excuse me?” 

I gaped at them in shock. What was their problem ? 

“Why can’t I go up to the top?” I demanded. 

The fear faded quickly from their faces. Rolonda tossed back her black 
hair. Eli pretended to be busy with the red snowman scarf. 

“You can’t go because it’s closed for repairs,” Eli finally replied. 

“Ha ha. Remind me to laugh later,” Rolonda sneered. 

“So what’s the real reason?” I demanded. 

“Uh... well... we just never go up there,” Rolonda stammered, 
glancing at her brother. She waited for Eli to add something. But he didn’t. 

“It’s kind of like a tradition,” Rolonda continued, avoiding my eyes. “I 
mean... well... we just don’t go up there.” 

“It’s too cold,” Eli added. “That’s why. It’s just too cold up there for 
humans to survive. You would turn to ice in thirty seconds.” 

I knew he was lying. I knew that wasn’t the real reason. But I decided 
to drop the subject. They suddenly seemed so tense and worried. 

“Where are you from?” Rolonda asked. She dug her gloved hands 
deep into her coat pockets. “The next village?” 

“No. Chicago,” I told her. “We lived in an apartment right on the lake.” 

“And you moved here?” Eli cried. “From Chicago to Sherpia? Why?” 

“Good question,” I muttered, rolling my eyes. “I live with my aunt, 
see. And Aunt Greta decided to move here. So...” I couldn’t keep the 
sadness from my voice. 

We talked for a few more minutes. I learned that they had lived in 
Sherpia their entire lives. “It isn’t so bad. You get used to not seeing many 
people,” Rolonda told me. 

“And it’s nice if you like snow,” Eli added. “Lots and lots of snow!” 

We all laughed. 

I said, “See you guys later,” and started walking up the road. 

“You’re not going to the top—are you?” Eli called. He sounded really 
frightened again. 



“No,” I called back. I pulled my hood tight. “It’s getting kind of windy. 
I’ll just go a little farther.” 

The road curved higher. I crunched my way past a wide, woodsy lot 
filled with pine trees nearly as thin as pencils. The trees tilted at all angles. 
Not one of them stood straight up. 

I saw animal tracks in the snow. Raccoon or squirrel? No. Too big. 
Deer tracks? I couldn’t tell. 

I raised my eyes—and cried out in surprise. 

Another sneering snowman stared back at me with its twisted carrot 
nose and coal-black eyes. 

Its red scarf fluttered in the strong wind. 

I stared at the long scar cut deep in its face. 

Its twig arms waved in the wind, as if greeting me. 

“Why do they build these creepy snowmen?” I asked out loud. 

I turned—and saw another one in the front yard across the street. Same 
tree-branch arms. Same red scarf. Same scar. 

It must be some kind of village decoration, I decided. 

But why didn’t Rolonda and Eli want to tell me about it? 

Heavy gray clouds rolled over the sun. The snowman’s shadow 
appeared to stretch until it swept over me. 

I felt a sudden chill. I stepped back. 

The sky quickly turned evening dark. I gazed up to the top of the 
mountain. Clumps of pine trees hid the top from view. 

Should I head back or keep going? 

I remembered the fear on Eli’s face when I said I was climbing to the 
top. And I remembered Rolonda’s cry: “You can’tl” 

It only made me more curious. 

What were they afraid of? What was up there? 

I decided to keep going. 

A van in the next driveway was buried under a thick sheet of snow. It 
looked as if it hadn’t been driven all winter. 

I followed the road as it curved away from the houses. The snow 
became deeper and softer. My boots sank in as I walked. 

I imagined that I was walking on another planet, a planet never 
explored before. 



The road climbed steeper. Large white rocks jutted up from the snow. 
Clumps of slender pine trees tilted in every direction. 

There were no houses up this high. I could see only trees and snow- 
covered shrubs and jutting rocks. 

The road curved again. The wind whistled. I rubbed my cheeks and 
nose to warm them. Then I leaned into the wind and kept walking. 

I stopped when a small log cabin came into view. I shielded my eyes 
with a gloved hand and stared at it. 

A cabin way up here? 

Why would anyone want to live this high up, away from everyone? 

The cabin stood in a square, cleared-out area, surrounded by scraggly, 
tilting pine trees. I didn’t see any car or sled. I didn’t see any boot-prints in 
the snow. 

I crept closer to the cabin. 

The windows were steamed over. I couldn’t tell if there were lights on 
inside or not. 

I stepped closer, my heart pounding. I leaned my arms on a windowsill 
and pressed my nose against the glass. But I couldn’t see in. 

“Anyone home?” I called. 

Silence. The wind whistled around the corner of the cabin. 

I knocked on the door. “Hello?” 

No reply. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

I tried the door. I just pushed it lightly. 

Maybe I shouldn’t have. But I did. 

The door slid open. 

I felt a rush of warm air from inside. 

“Anyone home?” I called in. 

I peeked beyond the door. Dark in there. 

“Hello?” 

I stepped inside. Just to take a look. 

The snow had been so bright outside. My eyes adjusted slowly to the 
dim light. 

And before I could focus, I saw a white blur. 

A growling white blur. It leaped on me. 

Hot breath. Hot breath on my face. 



And a snarling, white creature tackled me to the floor. 



5 


“Down! Down, Wolfbane!” 

The snarling stopped instantly. 

The creature backed off. 

“Down, Wolfbane!” a man’s voice ordered sternly. 

Gasping for breath, I wiped hot saliva off my face. And realized I was 
staring up at a white-furred wolf. 

The wolf was breathing hard, too, jaws open, tongue snaking down 
nearly to the cabin floor. Its head was lowered as if preparing to attack 
again. Its round, dark brown eyes locked on me suspiciously. 

“Down, Wolfbane. It’s okay, boy.” 

I rolled away from the panting creature and climbed to my knees. Two 
hands reached down to grab my hands and tug me to my feet. 

“Are you okay?” The man studied me with round, silver-gray eyes. He 
was tall and thin, dressed all in denim. He had long, gray hair tied back in a 
short ponytail. And a thick, pure-white beard. 

His eyes glowed like steel marbles. I could almost feel them burning 
into me. 

“Is that... really a wolf?” I demanded. 

He nodded, his expression stern, his eerie eyes not moving, not 
blinking. “He won’t hurt you. Wolfbane is well trained.” 

“But he—” My mouth suddenly felt so dry it was hard to talk. 

“You startled us,” the man said, still not blinking, not looking away. 
“We were in the back room.” He motioned toward a doorway in the back 
wall. 

“Sorry,” I murmured. “I didn’t know anyone was in here. I thought—” 

“Who are you?” the man demanded angrily. He narrowed his silvery 
eyes at me. Behind the bushy white beard, his slender face reddened. 

“I didn’t mean to—” 

“Who are you?” he repeated. 

“I was taking a walk,” I struggled to explain. If only my heart weren’t 
pounding so hard. If only my mouth weren’t so dry. 

The white wolf uttered a low growl. It stood tensely, head lowered, 



eyes locked on me, as if waiting for a command to attack. 

“Why did you break into my house?” the man demanded, taking a step 
toward me. 

He’s dangerous, I realized. 

There’s something very strange about him. Something very angry. 

“I didn’t break in,” I started. “I just—” 

“You broke into my house,” he insisted. “Don’t you realize how 
dangerous that is? Wolfbane is trained to attack strangers.” 

“S-sorry—!” I choked out. 

He took another step toward me. He still hadn’t blinked those weird, 
round eyes. 

My chest tightened in fright. 

What did he plan to do? 

I didn’t want to find out. 

I took a deep breath. Then I spun around—and ran out the door. 

Could I get away? 



6 


Behind me, the door slammed hard against the cabin wall. 

I glanced back—and saw him burst out of the cabin after me. “Where 
are you going?” he cried. “Hey—stop! Where are you going?” 

I pointed. “Up to the top!” I cried. 

“No, you’re not!” he shouted back furiously. “You will not go up 
there!” 

He ’s crazy! I realized. 

He has no right to shout at me like that! 

I can go anywhere I want to! 

He’s crazy. 

It had started to snow, large wet flakes, blowing hard in swirls of wind. 

I brushed a snowflake from my forehead and ran to the road. 

To my horror, the bearded man followed me, half-walking, half¬ 
running over the deep snow. 

“Beware, the snowman!” he called. 

“Huh?” I turned back to face him. “What did you say?” I cried 
breathlessly. 

The old rhyme flew through my mind for the second time that day... 

When the snows blow wild 

And the day grows old, 

Beware, the snowman, my child. 

Beware, the snowman. 

He brings the cold. 

I don’t believe this! I thought. I haven’t thought about that rhyme since 
I was five. And now it has run through my mind twice in one day! 

We stood staring at each other from opposite sides of the road. I saw 
the man shiver. He wore only his denim workshirt, no coat. Big snowflakes 
clung to his gray hair and his shoulders. 

“What did you say?” I asked. 



“The snowman lives in the ice cave,” he called, cupping his hands 
around his mouth to be heard over the wind. 

“Huh? A snowman?” 

He’s really nuts! I decided. Why am I standing here listening to him? 

The man lives in a cabin on a mountaintop all by himself except for a 
white wolf! And now he’s yelling insane things about a snowman! 

“Beware, the snowman!” he repeated. “You cannot go up to the top! 
You cannot!” 

“Why not?” I demanded. My voice came out higher and more shrill 
than I had intended. 

“You do not want to meet the snowman!” the man cried. The big 
snowflakes covered his beard. His silvery eyes glowed eerily. 

“If you meet the snowman,” he called, “you will never return!” 

Totally nuts, I realized. 

That’s why he lives all alone up here. 

I spun away. I knew I had stayed too long. 

Slipping and sliding, I ran through the deep snow. 

Ran as fast as I could. Cold snowflakes slapping my hot face. Heart 
pounding. 

Down the road. Down the curving mountain road. 

Panting... panting. 

Was that me breathing so hard? 

Were those my thudding footsteps? 

No. 

Glancing back, I saw the white wolf chasing me. Gaining fast. 

Teeth bared. Head lowered to attack. 

“Noooo!” I wailed. The big snowflakes stung my eyes as I ran. The 
white ground tilted. I stumbled but kept running. 

I suddenly felt as if I were trapped in one of those glass balls that 
snows inside when you shake them. 

I tumbled downhill. The snowflakes flew at me in all directions. The 
whole mountainside seemed to quiver and shake. 

The road! Where was the road? 

I lost it in the falling snow. My boots sank into deep drifts. 

But I kept running. Down... down. 

The steady thud of the wolf’s heavy paws in my ears. 



I glanced back and saw it gaining on me, moving rhythmically, easily 
over the snowdrifts. Its teeth were bared. Puffs of steam rose from its open 
mouth. 

Running hard, I didn’t see the smooth rocks jutting up along the side 
of the road. 

My boot caught on one. 

“Ohhhh!” I let out a cry as pain shot up my leg. I lost my balance. 
Stumbled forward. 

Landed hard on my stomach in the deep snow. 

I gasped for breath. The fall knocked the wind out of me. 

Scrambling to my knees, I watched helplessly as the white wolf closed 
in on me. 



7 


To my surprise, the wolf stopped a few feet away. 

It lowered its head and stared, breathing hard. Beneath the thick, white 
fur, its chest heaved up and down. Snowflakes melted on its tongue. 

Staring at it in fear, I pushed myself to my feet. I brushed my hair 
back, and brushed snow off the front of my parka. 

Was the wolf just catching its breath? Would it attack the moment I 
tried to run? 

“Go home, boy,” I whispered. “Go home.” 

My voice barely carried over the wind and snow. The white wolf 
stared up at me, still panting. 

I started to back up. I was afraid to take my eyes off it. 

I took one step back. Then another. 

The wolf watched me but didn’t move. 

My boots crunched onto the road. Yes! I had found the road! I kept 
backing up. 

The wolf stood taller. Lowered its tail. Tensed its back. 

Its brown eyes followed me. Such human eyes. 

What was it thinking? Why did it chase after me? 

Was it just making sure that I went down the mountain? Did the 
strange man send it to keep me from heading to the mountaintop? 

I took another step back. Then another. 

The wolf didn’t move. 

The snow-covered road curved away. I kept backing up until I was out 
of the creature’s sight. 

“Whew!” I uttered a loud sigh of relief. Turned. And continued 
walking fast toward the village and my new house. 

Every few seconds, I glanced back. But the wolf didn’t follow me. 

The snow came down hard. I pulled my parka hood over my hair. I 
held it with both hands and started to trot along the road. 

I wondered if Aunt Greta would be worried about me. I had been gone 
a lot longer than I had planned. 



Low snow clouds hid the sun. The sky became nearly as black as 
night. 

I started to pass houses on both sides of the road. I could see lights on 
in some of them. One house had a blazing fire going in a fireplace. Black 
smoke curled up from the chimney. 

I passed one of the strange, scar-faced snowmen. His tree-limb arms 
trembled in the wind. He appeared to be waving at me as I passed. 

I broke into a run. 

Another snowman greeted me as I rounded the next curve. 

I hate this village! I thought. 

It’s too weird. Too weird! 

I’m never going to be happy here. Never! 

Why did Aunt Greta bring us here? 

A thudding sound behind me forced away my unhappy thoughts. 

I’m being followed! I realized. 

The wolf? 

No. These heavy footsteps were different. 

Human footsteps. 

The crazy, bearded man—he followed me! 

“Ohhh!” A frightened moan escaped my lips. 

Taking a deep breath, I spun around to face him. 



8 


“Jaclyn—hi!” 

I gasped—and stared through the falling snow at Rolonda. She jogged 
across the road to me. Snowflakes dotted her black hair. 

“You ran right past our house,” she said breathlessly, pointing to her 
yard. “Didn’t you see us?” 

I glanced over her shoulder and saw her brother, Eli, waving to me 
from their driveway. 

“No. I... uh... the snow was falling so hard, and—” I stammered. 

“Are you okay?” Rolonda demanded. 

“Well...” I hesitated. “A white wolf chased me,” I blurted out. “A 
crazy man. He has a cabin near the top. His wolf chased me and he—” 

“You ran into Conrad?” Rolonda cried. 

“Huh? Conrad?” The wind blew my hood off my head. I squinted hard 
at Rolonda. “Is that his name?” 

She nodded. “He has a cabin that he built himself. And he keeps a 
white wolf named Wolfbane. I meant to warn you before, Jaclyn—” 

“Warn me?” I interrupted. 

“Yeah. To stay away from him. He and that animal he keeps—they’re 
both really strange.” 

“Tell me about it!” I groaned. I rolled my eyes. “Is that why you and 
Eli never go up to the mountaintop?” 

Rolonda lowered her eyes. “Well... it’s one of the reasons.” 

I waited for her to go on. But she didn’t. She continued to stare down 
at the snow. She kicked a clump of wet snow off one boot with the other. 
Behind her, Eli stood watching us, his hands jammed into his coat pockets. 

“Well, why does Conrad live up there so far away from everyone?” I 
demanded. 

Rolonda hesitated. She glanced back tensely at her brother. “No one 
knows for sure,” she answered finally. “He—maybe he works for the 
snowman. I mean...” Her voice trailed off. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. I was sure I hadn’t heard her correctly. “What 
did you say, Rolonda? He works for the snowman? What do you mean? 



What does that mean?” 

She didn’t answer. Again, she glanced back nervously at Eli. 

“Come on, Rolonda. What do you mean?” I insisted. “What do you 
mean, he works for the snowman?” 

She backed away, brushing snowflakes from her hair. “I’ve got to go 
inside,” she said. “It’s almost dinnertime.” 

I followed after her. “But first you have to explain,” I demanded. 

“I can’t,” she whispered. “Because of Eli. He’s too frightened.” 

“But, Rolonda—” I started. I saw Eli watching us intently from the 
driveway. 

“Go home,” Rolonda snapped. “Just go home, Jaclyn.” 

“Not until you tell me what you meant.” I can be stubborn when I want 
to be. 

“Okay, okay,” she whispered, glancing over her shoulder at Eli. “Meet 
me tomorrow night, okay? Meet me tomorrow night at the church—and I’ll 
tell you everything.” 



9 


“Hi—I’m back!” 

I burst into the house. Aunt Greta was bending over a carton in the 
small kitchen, pulling out coffee mugs and placing them in a cabinet. She 
spun around as I walked in. 

“Is it snowing?” she asked. 

I nodded my head furiously, tossing snowflakes from my hair. “The 
biggest flakes I ever saw,” I replied breathlessly. 

Aunt Greta frowned. “I’ve been so busy in here, I didn’t even look out 
the window.” 

I pulled off my coat and carried it to the front closet. But there were no 
hangers in the closet yet. So I tossed the wet coat on top of a stack of 
cartons. 

Then I walked back into the kitchen, rubbing the sleeves of my 
sweater. “Aunt Greta, do you know anything about a snowman?” I asked. 

I heard her gasp. 

But when she turned to me, her face was a blank. “Snowman?” 

“Do you know anything about a snowman on top of the mountain?” I 
asked. 

Aunt Greta bit her bottom lip. “No. No, I don’t, Jaclyn.” Her voice 
trembled. Why did she look so tense? 

She bent down to pull more mugs from the carton. I crossed the room 
to help her unpack them. 

“Someone told me I shouldn’t go to the top of the mountain because of 
a snowman,” I told her. “A snowman who lives up there.” 

Aunt Greta didn’t say anything. She handed me two mugs. I lifted 
them onto the cabinet shelf. 

“This man told me that if I met the snowman up there, I would never 
return,” I continued. 

My aunt let out a short, dry laugh. “Village superstition,” she muttered. 

I squinted at her. “Really?” 

“Of course,” she replied. “These tiny villages all have their scary 
stories. Someone was just having fun, giving you a little scare.” 



“Fun?” I frowned. “I don’t think so.” 

That weird, white-bearded guy, Conrad, had screamed at me that I 
couldn’t go up to the mountaintop. He wasn’t joking. I knew he wasn’t 
joking. 

He was serious. He was threatening me. He wasn’t having a little fun. 
No way. 

“Aunt Greta, do you remember a rhyme about a snowman?” I asked. 

She straightened up and stretched, pushing her hands against her back. 
“Rhyme?” 

“I remembered a rhyme today. From when I was little. It just popped 
into my head.” 

Aunt Greta chewed her lip again fretfully. “I don’t think I remember 
any rhyme,” she said. She glanced away, avoiding my eyes. 

“I only remember the first verse,” I told her. And then I recited it: 

“When the snows blow wild 

And the day grows old, 

Beware, the snowman, my child. 

Beware, the snowman. 

He brings the cold. ” 

When I finished, I looked up to find the strangest expression on Aunt 
Greta’s face. Her eyes had gone all watery. And her chin trembled. Her 
cheeks were even paler than usual. 

“Aunt Greta—are you okay?” I asked. “What’s wrong?” 

“Nothing,” she replied sharply, turning her face away from me. 
“Nothing at all, Jaclyn. But I don’t remember that rhyme. I don’t think I’ve 
ever heard it before.” 

She fiddled nervously with her long, white braid. 

“Are you sure?” I asked timidly. 

“Of course I’m sure,” she snapped. “Now, come on. Help me finish up 
in here so I can begin dinner.” 

What is wrong? I wondered. Why is she suddenly angry at me? 

And why do I have the feeling that she isn’t telling the truth? 

Aunt Greta has never lied to me before. 

Why is she acting so strange now? 



10 


I couldn’t sleep that night. 

My new bed felt hard. I kept imagining that the low ceiling was 
sinking, dropping down on me. 

The snow clouds had drifted away, and a half moon appeared, low in 
the sky. The moonlight washed in through my round window, casting long, 
shifting shadows over my room. 

I shuddered under my quilt. It was all so new and strange. I wondered 
if I’d ever be able to sleep up here. 

I shut my eyes and tried to think nice, soothing thoughts. I pictured my 
friends back in Chicago. I called up their faces one by one. I wondered what 
they were all doing today while I was having my frightening adventure on 
the mountain. 

I wondered if they missed me. 

I had just about fallen asleep when the howls began. 

Wolf howls? 

I climbed out of bed and made my way to the window. Down below, 
the moonlight made the snow sparkle, almost as bright as during the day. 

Bushes trembled in a soft breeze. The wind carried another frightening 
howl. I raised my eyes to the mountain. But I could see only houses, dark 
and silent, and the silvery road that curved its way to the top. 

My whole body tingled. I knew I couldn’t fall asleep. It was chilly up 
here in my little attic room, and the air felt heavy and damp. 

I decided to take a walk. Maybe it will help me relax, I told myself. 

I pulled on a pair of jeans and a sweatshirt. Then I crept downstairs— 
careful not to wake Aunt Greta—and found my parka and boots. 

Stepping out into the night, I silently closed the front door behind me. 
My eyes swept over the glittering snow of the small front yard. 

I made my way to the road, my breath streaming up in wisps of fog. 
“Wow!” I murmured. “Wow!” 

The cold, fresh air felt so good on my face. 

The wind had stopped. The whole world seemed still and silent. 

No cars, I realized. No horns honking. No buses roaring past. No 



people laughing and shouting on the street. 

I’m all alone out here, I told myself. The whole world is mine. 

A long, frightening howl brought me out of my crazy thoughts. 

I shivered and raised my eyes to the mountaintop. Was the white wolf 
howling up there? Did it howl like that every night? 

Why did the howls sound so human? 

I took a deep breath of cold air and held it. Then I began walking 
slowly along the road. My boots cmnched on the hard, crusty snow. I 
passed a few houses and kept walking. 

I stopped as a shadow slid over my path. 



11 


I gasped. At first, I thought someone was following me. 

But then I realized I was staring at a long shadow of a snowman. The 
shadow tilted over the road. The tree branch arms, one raised, one out to the 
side, appeared long and menacing. 

I stepped over the shadow and crossed the street. But another shadow 
fell over me. 

Another snowman. An identical snowman. 

The shadows of the strange snowmen fell over each other. I suddenly 
felt as if I were walking in a black-and-white world of shadowy heads, 
fluttering scarves, and sticklike arms—all saluting, all waving. 

Why were there so many of them? 

Why did the people in this village build them all alike? 

Another howl made me raise my eyes from the crisscrossing shadows 
over the snow. This howl sounded closer. And it definitely sounded human! 

A chill ran down my back. 

I turned. Time to head home, I decided. 

My heart was pounding now. The howl—so near—had really 
frightened me. 

I started to walk fast, swinging my arms as I walked, leaning into the 
gusting wind. 

But I stopped when I saw the scarfaced snowman in the driveway up 
ahead. 

And I gasped when it nodded its head at me. 

“Noooo!” A low cry escaped my lips. 

It nodded. The snowman nodded! 

Then the head rolled to the ground. And cracked apart with a soft thud. 

And I realized the wind had made its head nod. The wind had blown 
the scarred head off the body. 

What am I doing out here? I asked myself. It’s late and it’s cold. 

And it’s weird. 

And some kind of creature nearby is howling its head off. 



I gazed across the yard at the headless snowman. The head was a 
shattered clump of white at the snowman’s base. But the scarf had remained 
on top of the round body. It flapped in a gust of cold wind. 

I felt another shiver. I turned and ran toward home. 

Ran through the blue-black shadows of snowmen. My boots crunched 
over the shadows of their waving arms, their scarred heads. 

A snowman in each yard. Snowmen lining the street like night 
watchmen. 

This walk was a crazy idea, I thought, feeling panic tighten my chest. I 
want to be home now. I want to be back in the safety of my new home. 

A snowman waved its three-fingered limb at me and sneered its coal- 
dark sneer as I ran past. And as I scrambled for home, the rhyme forced its 
way back into my mind.... 

“When the snows blow wild 

And the day grows old, 

Beware, the snowman, my child. 

Beware, the snowman. 

He brings the cold. ” 

My house came into view down the road. I sucked in a deep breath and 
ran harder. 

The old rhyme had been haunting me ever since I arrived in the 
village. The old rhyme had followed me from my childhood, followed me 
to my strange, new home. 

Why did I suddenly remember it today? 

What was it trying to tell me? Why had the cold words returned after 
being forgotten for so many years? 

I had to find the rest of it. I had to find the second verse of the poem. 

An eerie howl, rising like an ambulance siren, sounded so close behind 
me I spun around. 

I searched the road and the frozen yards. No one there. No wolf. No 
human. 

Another howl sounded even closer. 

Was someone following me? 

I held my hands over my ears to keep out the frightening sounds—and 



I flew over the snow, flew the rest of the way home. 

I reached the narrow front door as another long howl sent a chill down 
my body. 

Closer. It’s so close, I realized. 

Someone is following me! 

I grabbed the doorknob. Twisted it. Pushed. 

No! 

The door didn’t budge. 

I twisted again. This way. The other way. 

Pushed the door. Pulled it. 

Locked. 

I had locked myself out! 



12 


Another frightening howl. 

So close. From the side of my house! 

My whole body trembled. Panic tightened my throat. I stumbled back 
from the front door. 

And saw that the front window—the only window on this side of the 
house—was open a crack. Snow streaked the windowpanes and clumped on 
the narrow sill. 

I stared at the tiny opening at the window bottom. 

Then I sucked in a deep breath—and hurtled to the window. 

I grabbed the snowy wooden frame. Uttering a loud groan, I pushed. 
Pushed up with all my strength. 

To my surprise, the window slid up easily. 

I pushed it all the way up. Then I grabbed the sill with both hands. I 
hoisted myself up, up—as another howl rang through the night air. 

So close. 

So close and frightening. 

I tumbled headfirst into the house. Landed hard on my hands and 
knees on the wooden floor. 

With a gasp, I scrambled to my feet. Grabbed the window and pulled it 

shut. 

Then I stood, leaning against the wall, listening. Waiting to catch my 
breath. 

Had I awakened Aunt Greta? 

No. The house stood dark and silent. The only sound I could hear was 
my rapid, shallow breathing. 

Another howl, distant this time. 

Had I only imagined that I was being followed? Were the terrifying 
howls rolling down from the mountaintop, carried by the wind? 

Still breathing hard, I stepped away from the front wall. Making my 
way slowly through the darkness, I headed to the little back room where we 
had piled all of the packing cartons. 

My books were still stuffed in one of the cartons. 



I was sure that I had packed the old poetry book Mom used to read to 
me. 

White moonlight flooded in from the window against the back wall. I 
found the book carton on top of a stack and pulled it down to the floor. 

My hands trembled as I struggled to pull off the heavy packing tape 
and open the box. 

I have to find that poem, I told myself. I have to read the second verse 
of that rhyme. 

I tugged open the carton and began pulling out books. I had packed a 
bunch of paperbacks on the top. Underneath them, I found some textbooks 
and anthologies I had used at school. 

As I pulled them out and stacked them carefully on the floor, I heard a 
cough. 

And then a footstep. 

Someone else is in here! I realized. 

“Aunt Greta? Is that you?” I cried. 

But the voice that replied wasn’t Aunt Greta’s. 

“What are you doing?” a strange voice demanded in a raspy whisper. 



13 


The ceiling light flashed on. 

I blinked. 

Swallowed hard. 

And stared up at Aunt Greta. 

“You frightened me, Jaclyn!” she croaked. 

I jumped to my feet. “You frightened me, too!” I replied, waiting for 
my heart to stop pounding. “What happened to your voice?” 

Aunt Greta mbbed her pale throat. “I’ve lost it,” she rasped. “Horrible 
sore throat. It must be the cold. I’m not used to the cold of this village yet.” 

Her straight, white hair hung loose behind her. She tugged it off the 
collar of her flannel nightshirt, brushing out tangles with one hand. “What 
are you doing, Jaclyn? Why are you down here in the middle of the night?” 
she croaked. 

“That old poem,” I replied. “I want to find it. I can’t remember the 
second verse. I—” 

“We’ll unpack the books tomorrow,” she cut in. 

She yawned. “I’m so tired. And my throat hurts so badly. Let’s try to 
get some sleep.” 

She suddenly appeared so tiny and frail. 

“I’m sorry,” I said, following her from the room. “I didn’t mean to 
wake you up. I couldn’t sleep, so...” 

Her eyes fell on my parka, which I had tossed onto a living room chair. 
“You went out?” she cried, spinning to face me. I could see alarm on her 
face. 

“Well... yes,” I confessed. “I thought maybe a short walk...” 

“You shouldn’t go out in the middle of the night,” she scolded. She 
mbbed her sore throat. Her eyes narrowed at me. 

“Sorry,” I muttered. “What’s the big deal, anyway? What’s so terrible 
about going out at night?” 

She hesitated, chewing her lower lip the way she always does when 
she’s thinking hard. “It’s just dangerous. That’s all,” she whispered finally. 
“What if you fell in the snow or something? What if you broke your leg? 



There is no one outside to help you.” 

“I’d roll home!” I joked. I laughed but she didn’t join in. 

I had the strong feeling she had something else on her mind. She 
wasn’t worried about me falling down. She was worried about something 
else. 

But she didn’t want to say it. 

Did it have anything to do with the animal howls? 

Did it have something to do with the snowman on the mountain that 
Conrad had warned me about? The snowman that Aunt Greta said was just 
a village superstition? 

I yawned. I finally felt sleepy. Too sleepy to think any more about 
these questions. 

I put my arm around Aunt Greta’s slender shoulders and walked her 
across the hall to her room. “Sorry I woke you,” I whispered. Then I said 
good night and climbed the ladder to my attic bedroom. 

Yawning, I pulled off my jeans and sweatshirt and tossed them on the 
floor. Then I jumped into bed and pulled the quilt up to my chin. 

Pale moonlight washed in from the round window at the other end of 
the room. I shut my eyes. No howls outside. No sounds at all. 

I snuggled my head into my soft pillow. My new bed still felt hard. But 
I was too tired to care. 

I had just about drifted off to sleep when the whispered words floated 
into the room.... 

“Beware, the snowman, Jaclyn.... Beware, the snowman....” 



14 


I sat straight up with a gasp. “Huh? Who’s there?” I choked out. 

I stared across the room at the window. The unfamiliar shapes of my 
furniture appeared silvery, ghostlike in the white moonlight. 

“Beware, the snowman...” the whispered words were repeated. 
“Jaclyn, beware, the snowman. ” 

“Who are you?” I cried. “How do you know my name?” 

Sitting up in the strange bed, I grabbed the end of the quilt, gripping it 
tightly in both hands, squeezing it. 

And I listened. 

Silence now. 

“Who are you?” My cry so tiny and shrill. 

Silence. 

“Who are you?” 

Silence... 

I don’t know how long I sat there, waiting for a reply. But after a 
while, I somehow drifted off to sleep. 

The next morning I told Aunt Greta about the whispered warning. 

She sipped her coffee before replying. Then she reached across the 
table and squeezed my hand. “I had bad dreams, too, last night,” she said, 
still whispering because of her sore throat. 

“Dream?” I replied. “Do you think it was a dream?” 

Aunt Greta nodded and took another long sip of coffee. “Of course,” 
she croaked. 

I spent the day helping my aunt unpack the cartons and arrange our 
new house. I searched every carton for the poetry book, but I couldn’t find 
it. I didn’t realize how much stuff we had brought from our apartment in 
Chicago. Such a small house. It was a real struggle to find a place for 
everything. 

As we worked, I found myself thinking about Rolonda. She had 
promised to meet me at the little village church after dinner. She said she 
would tell me the truth about the snowman tonight. 



The truth... 

I pictured her brother Eli’s frightened expression as he stood in the 
snowy driveway, watching Rolonda and me. And I remembered how 
frightened they became when I told them I was walking to the mountaintop. 

So much fear here in this village. Was it all because of silly 
superstitions? 

After I washed and dried the dinner dishes, I pulled on my parka and 
my boots and prepared to meet Rolonda. I told Aunt Greta the truth. I told 
her I was meeting a village girl my age I’d met during my walk. 

“It’s snowing really hard,” Aunt Greta said in her raspy whisper. 
“Don’t stay out late, Jaclyn.” 

I promised I’d be home before nine. Then I pulled up my hood, tugged 
on my gloves, and stepped outside. 

Does it snow here every day? I asked myself, shaking my head. 

I’ve always liked snow. But enough already! 

The snow came down hard, in sheets driven by a strong wind. I 
lowered my head and trudged down the road toward the church. Snowflakes 
blew into my face and stung my eyes. I could barely see. 

What a blizzard! 

I wondered if Rolonda would show up. 

The little stone church stood across from the post office. It wasn’t far 
down the road from my house. But walking into the blowing snow, it 
seemed miles away. 

Keeping my head down, I stepped into a deep drift. Cold snow 
dropped into my boot, soaking my sock. “Ohhh.” I let out a shuddering 
groan. “I’m going to freeze!” I cried out loud. 

There was no one around to hear me. The road stood empty. Nothing 
moved. I passed a brightly-lit house, but I couldn’t see anyone inside. 

The snow blew against my face, my coat, as if trying to push me back. 
As if trying to make me turn around. 

“This is crazy,” I murmured. “Crazy. No way Rolonda will meet me 
tonight.” 

Squinting into the gray evening light, I saw the steeple of the church, 
white against the falling snow. “I hope it’s open,” I said out loud. 

Ducking my head, I ran across the road—and thudded into something 
hard. And very cold. 



Evil black eyes glared into mine. 
And I started to scream. 



15 


A second later, hands jerked me away. 

And a voice cried, “Jaclyn—what’s wrong?” 

My scream caught in my throat. I stumbled back, my boots slipping in 
the slick, wet snow. 

I turned to see Rolonda, tugging on my coat sleeve. “I saw you run 
right into that snowman,” she said. “But why did you scream?” 

“I—I—” I sputtered. I squinted through the falling snow at the 
snowman, at his dark eyes, at the scar down his round face. “I—I just 
freaked,” I stammered. 

I scolded myself for acting so stupid. Now Rolonda must think I’m a 
real jerk, I thought unhappily. 

What is wrong with me, anyway? Screaming because I bumped into a 
snowman! 

“Why did someone build a snowman like that in front of the church?” 
I asked. 

Rolonda didn’t reply. Her dark eyes peered into mine. “Are you 
okay?” she asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. Fine. Let’s get out of this snow.” 

I took one last glance at the sneering snowman. Then I followed 
Rolonda to a wooden door on the side of the small church. We stepped 
inside and stamped the snow off our boots on a straw mat. 

“Does it ever stop snowing here?” I grumbled, pulling back my hood 
and unzipping my parka. 

“Sure. It stopped once for ten minutes. We all took a summer 
vacation!” Rolonda joked. She shook out her long, black hair. 

I glanced around. We were in some kind of waiting room. A long 
wooden bench stood against the back wall. Two lights shaped like old- 
fashioned gas lamps hung on the wall beside the bench, giving off a soft 
glow. 

We dropped our coats beside the bench and sat down. I rubbed my 
hands, trying to warm them. My cheeks burned. 

“It’s nice and warm in here,” Rolonda said, keeping her voice low. 



“The pastor keeps the heat up really high. He doesn’t like to be cold.” 

“Who does?” I murmured, rubbing my ears, trying to return some 
feeling to them. 

“It’s a nice, quiet place to talk,” Rolonda continued. “Especially to talk 
about things that are... kind of scary.” 

“Scary?” I replied. 

She glanced around the small, white-walled room. She suddenly 
seemed tense. Uncomfortable. 

“Did your aunt tell you anything about the village?” Rolonda 
whispered. “Anything about the history of the village?” 

I had to lean closer to hear her. She was whispering so softly. 

Why is she so nervous? I wondered. We’re the only ones in the entire 
church. 

“No,” I replied. “Not a thing. I really don’t think Aunt Greta knows 
much about this village at all.” 

“Then why did you move here?” Rolonda demanded. 

I shrugged. “Beats me. Aunt Greta never explained. She said it was 
time for us to leave Chicago.” 

Rolonda leaned forward tensely and brought her face close to mine. 
“I’ll tell you the story,” she whispered. “The history of this village is very 
strange. People don’t talk about it much.” 

“Why not?” I interrupted. 

“Because it’s so frightening,” Rolonda replied. “My brother, Eli, is 
terrified all the time. That’s why I met you here at the church. He doesn’t 
like for me to talk about any of this. He doesn’t like for me to talk about the 
snowman.” 

“Snowman?” I demanded. I stared at her eagerly. “What about the 
snowman?” 



16 


Rolonda shifted her weight. The wooden bench creaked beneath us. She 
took a deep breath and began her story. 

“Years ago, two sorcerers lived in this village. A man and a woman. 
Everyone knew they were sorcerers. But everyone left them alone.” 

“Were they evil sorcerers?” I interrupted. 

Rolonda shook her head. “No. I don’t think they were evil. At least, I 
don’t think they meant to be.” 

She glanced around the room again. I settled back against the bench 
and waited impatiently for her to continue. 

“One day, the two sorcerers were fooling around, having fun. They 
cast a spell on a snowman. And the snowman came to life.” 

I gasped. “Really?” 

Rolonda narrowed her eyes at me. “Please, don’t interrupt, Jaclyn. 
Please let me tell the whole story first.” 

I apologized. 

Leaning close to me, she continued her story in a whisper. 

“The sorcerers used their magic to bring the snowman to life. But then 
they lost control of it. 

“The snowman was powerful. And it was evil. The sorcerers had given 
it life. But they didn’t really know what they were doing. And they didn’t 
know that the snowman would try to destroy the village and everyone in it. 

“The sorcerers tried to use magic to put the snowman back to sleep. 
But their magic wasn’t powerful enough. 

“The villagers all gathered together. Somehow they managed to force 
the snowman up to the top of the mountain. 

“There is a big cave at the very top of the mountain. The cave is cut in 
ice. Everyone calls it the ice cave. 

“The villagers chased the evil snowman into the ice cave. Then most 
people moved away from the village. Few people wanted to stay, knowing 
that the evil creature was alive at the top of the mountain. 

“So most people left,” Rolonda continued, whispering so softly I could 
barely hear her. “The two sorcerers probably left, too. No one really knows 



what happened to them. 

“And that’s when Conrad comes into the story,” Rolonda said. 

I stared at her. “Conrad? The weird guy with the white beard?” 

Rolonda nodded. “After the evil snowman was chased into the ice 
cave, Conrad moved up there. He built a cabin just beneath the ice cave. No 
one could figure out why. 

“Is Conrad trying to protect the town?” Rolonda continued. “Does he 
work for the snowman? Does he help the snowman? Or does he think that 
living so close to the evil snowman will keep him safe? 

“No one knows. Conrad very seldom comes down from the 
mountaintop. And when he does come into the village, he doesn’t talk to 
anyone. 

“No one knows for sure who he is or why he stays up there,” Rolonda 
continued. “No one has anything to do with Conrad. We don’t know if he’s 
crazy or evil.” 

She sighed. Once again, her eyes darted around the room. She seemed 
so nervous, as if she didn’t want anyone else to know that she was telling 
me the history of the village. 

“Some nights,” she continued, “we can hear the snowman up there on 
top of the mountain. Some nights we can hear him roaring and bellowing 
with rage. Some nights, we can hear him howling, howling like a wolf. 

“We’ve all built snowmen. Snowmen that look like him. Everyone in 
the village builds them.” 

I jumped to my feet. “So that’s why I see those weird snowmen 
everywhere!” I cried. 

Rolonda raised a finger to her lips. She motioned for me to sit back 
down. 

I dropped back onto the bench. “Why do you build the snowmen?” I 
demanded. “Why is there one in just about every single yard?” 

“To honor him,” Rolonda replied. 

“Huh? Honor him?” I cried. 

“You know what I mean,” she said sharply. “People hope that if the 
evil snowman comes down from the ice cave, he’ll see the little snowmen 
that look like him. It will make him happy and keep him from doing any 
harm.” 

Rolonda squeezed my hand. Her dark eyes burned into mine. “Now do 



you understand?” she whispered. “Now do you understand why we’re all so 
afraid?” 

I stared back at her—and burst out laughing. 



17 


I shouldn’t have laughed. But I just couldn’t help it. 

I mean, Rolonda seemed like a really smart girl. She couldn’t really 
believe that story —could she? 

It’s a joke, I decided. A story the villagers tell to scare people who 
move here. 

I stopped laughing when I saw the startled expression on Rolonda’s 
face. “Hey, come on,” I said. “You’re kidding—right?” 

She shook her head solemnly. Her dark eyes glowed in the dim light. 
Such serious eyes. 

“You don’t really believe that a snowman can walk, do you?” I 
demanded. My voice echoed shrilly in the small room. “You don’t really 
believe that a snowman can be alive!” 

“I believe it,” Rolonda replied in a low, trembling voice. “It’s not a 
joke, Jaclyn. I believe it. And everyone in the village believes it.” 

I stared at her. The ceiling creaked, probably from the weight of the 
snow on the roof. I shifted my weight on the hard wooden bench. 

“But have you ever seen it?” I asked. “Have you ever seen the 
snowman walk?” 

She blinked. “Well... no,” she confessed. “But I’ve heard him late at 
night, Jaclyn. I’ve heard his howls and his angry cries.” 

She climbed to her feet. “I won’t go close enough to see him. I’m too 
afraid,” she said. “I won’t go up to the ice cave. No one will.” 

“But, Rolonda—” I started. 

Then I stopped. Her chin trembled. I could see the fear in her eyes. 

Just talking about the snowman had frightened her. 

I wanted to tell her that the story couldn’t be true. I wanted to tell her 
that it sounded like a silly superstition. A fairy tale. 

But I didn’t want to insult her. 

She might be my only friend here, I thought. 

I stood up and pulled on my coat. Then the two of us made our way 
out of the church. 

The snow had stopped. But a gusting wind blew down from the 



mountain. The wind made the fresh snow swirl and dance around our boots. 

I pulled my hood over my hair and lowered my head into the wind. No 
way I could ever believe such a wild story, I thought. Why doesn’t Rolonda 
see how crazy it is? 

We made our way up the road, our boots sinking into the powdery, 
fresh snow. We didn’t talk. Our voices wouldn’t carry over the loud msh of 
the wind. 

I walked Rolonda home. We stopped at the bottom of her snow- 
covered driveway. “Thanks for telling me about the snowman,” I said. 

Her eyes locked on mine. “You had to be told,” she said solemnly. And 
then she added, “You’ve got to believe me, Jaclyn. It’s true. All of it.” 

I didn’t reply. I said good night. Then I turned and, leaning into the 
wind, headed for my house. 

I was nearly there when I heard a sound over the roaring wind. 

A heavy THUD THUD THUD coming up rapidly behind me. 



18 


I froze. 

For a moment, I thought it was my imagination. 

I pictured an enormous, evil snowman, as tall as a house, lumbering 
after me. 

“No!” I murmured. And spun around. And saw Rolonda’s brother, Eli, 
mnning up to me. 

His heavy workboots thudded over the snow. His sheepskin coat was 
open, flapping out as he ran. 

“Eli—it’s late!” I cried. “What are you doing out here?” 

He didn’t reply. Breathing hard, his chest heaving up and down under 
his sweater, he eyed me suspiciously. 

“She told you—didn’t she?” he demanded breathlessly. 

“Huh?” We moved behind a wide tree, out of the wind. “Eli—what is 
your problem?” I demanded. 

“Rolonda told you—didn’t she?” he repeated. “She told you about the 
snowman.” He pointed toward the mountaintop. 

“Well... yeah,” I replied. A clump of snow dropped from the tree onto 
the front of my parka. I brushed it away. 

“Eli, are you crazy? It’s freezing out here! Zip up your coat,” I 
scolded. 

“Rolonda doesn’t know one thing,” Eli continued, still breathing hard. 
“She doesn’t know that I saw it. I saw the snowman.” 

I stared at him. “You saw the snowman? You saw the living 
snowman?” 

Eli nodded. “Yes. I saw him. But that’s not the scary part.” 

“Eli—what is the scary part?” I demanded. 



19 


He stared at me. The wind ruffled his dark hair, but his eyes remained 
steady, hard. 

“What is the scary part?” I repeated. 

“The scary part,” Eli replied, “is that the snowman saw me!” 

The wind howled around the tree. I dragged Eli to the side of the 
nearest house. We pressed against the wall. Shivering, he finally zipped up 
his coat. 

“Eli—the story is crazy,” I insisted. “I really don’t think—” 

“Just let me tell you what happened,” he pleaded. “Then you can 
decide if it’s crazy or not.” 

He shivered again. “It saw me, Jaclyn. The snowman stared at me. It 
saw me. It knows who I am. It knows that I saw it. And that’s why I’m so 
afraid of it.” 

“But, Eli—” I started. 

He raised a gloved hand to silence me. “Wait. Please.” He took a deep 
breath. “It happened a few weeks ago. My two friends and I—we climbed 
up the mountain. We wanted to see the ice cave. So we sneaked around 
Conrad’s cabin.” 

“I don’t get it,” I said. “What does Conrad have to do with it?” 

“He won’t let anyone near the ice cave,” Eli replied. “He keeps 
everyone away. Conrad is so weird. Some people think he works for the 
snowman. He protects the snowman by keeping everyone from the village 
away.” 

“But you sneaked past Conrad?” I asked. 

Eli nodded. “Yeah. My friends and I. And we climbed up close to the 
ice cave. I had never seen the cave before.” 

“What does it look like?” I asked. 

Eli made a sweeping motion with both hands, outlining the shape of 
the cave for me. “It’s a huge cave, cut into the side of the mountain,” he 
said. “It’s made of ice. All smooth and shiny. It looks like glass. 

“The cave entrance is wide and totally black. And it has huge icicles 
hanging down all along the front. With points as sharp as knives.” 



“Wow,” I murmured. “It sounds kind of pretty.” 

“Yeah. In a way,” Eli agreed. “But we didn’t think it was pretty when 
the snowman came out.” 

I stared hard at Eli, studying his face. “You really saw a snowman 
walking?” I demanded. 

Eli nodded. “We heard a rumbling sound. The ground started to shake. 
My friends and I got scared. We thought it was an earthquake or an 
avalanche or something. 

“My friends started to run down the mountain. But I stayed. And I saw 
it. The snowman poked his head out of the cave. He was as big as a grizzly 
bear. And he had a scar cut deep into his face. 

“His eyes searched around. Then they stopped on me. And his mouth 
opened in an angry roar. He—he—” 

Eli took a deep breath. Then he started again. “The snowman stepped 
out of the cave. The ground shook. It really did. Snow blew all over the 
place. 

“The snowman stared at me. And he roared again. And—and I took 
off,” Eli continued breathlessly. “I ran past Conrad’s cabin. I ran all the way 
down the mountain. And I never looked back.” 

“What about your friends?” I asked. 

“They were waiting for me down at the bottom,” Eli replied. “We just 
went to our houses. We never talked about it.” 

“Why not?” I demanded. 

“Too afraid, I guess,” Eli said, glancing down. “We never talked about 
it. We never mentioned it. I never even told Rolonda. It was just too 
frightening to talk about.” 

He raised his eyes to me. “But now I have dreams,” he confessed. 
“Bad dreams about the snowman. Every night.” 

I stared at him, unsure of what to say. His whole body was trembling. 
From the cold? I wondered. Or from being so afraid? 

He gazed back at me, waiting for me to say something. “Eli, you didn’t 
tell Rolonda about this. Why are you telling me?” I asked. 

“So you will believe the story,” he replied solemnly. “You’re new, 
Jaclyn. You probably think it’s all silly. But you have to stay away from the 
ice cave.” 

“But, Eli—” I started. 



“You didn’t believe my sister —did you!” he accused. “You didn’t 
believe her story.” 

“Well...” I hesitated. 

“That’s why I waited for you,” he explained. “I waited to tell you my 
story. Do you believe me, Jaclyn? Do you believe that I saw the snowman?” 

“I—I don’t know,” I told him. 

The wind swirled around the wall of the house. I felt my nose and 
cheeks. My whole face was numb. “I’ve got to get home,” I said. 

Eli grabbed my parka sleeve. “Jaclyn, don’t go up to the ice cave,” he 
pleaded. “Please, believe my story. It’s true.” 

I pulled my arm away. Then I started to jog over the snow toward my 
house. “Go home, Eli,” I called back. “Go home before you freeze.” 

I jogged all the way home. It felt good to run and not think about 
anything. 

Jogging on fresh, powdery snow was difficult. My boots kept slipping 
on the slick, hard surface underneath. By the time I reached home, my legs 
ached. 

Breathing hard, I pushed open the front door. To my surprise, the 
house was totally dark. 

I pulled off a glove and squinted at my wrist-watch. Only nine o’clock. 

Did Aunt Greta go to bed so early? She usually stays up until at least 
midnight. 

I clicked on the ceiling light and glanced around the small living room. 
A magazine lay open on the couch. Nothing else was out of place. 

Leaning against the front door, I pulled off my wet boots and stood 
them in the corner. Then I tugged off my parka and dropped it onto the 
couch. 

My eyes stopped at the door to Aunt Greta’s bedroom. 

The door stood open. Darkness beyond the door. 

I quickly made my way across the room and peeked into my aunt’s 
bedroom. “Aunt Greta?” I called softly. 

No reply. 

I stepped into the room. “Aunt Greta? Are you in here?” 

I fumbled at the lamp on her dresser and finally managed to click it on. 

“Aunt Greta—?” 

No. Not in bed. Not in her room. 



“Aunt Greta—are you home?” I called loudly. 

I headed out of her room. “Ohh!” I cried out when I stepped in 
something. 

Something cold and wet soaked through my sock. 

“Huh?” I lowered my gaze to see a wide puddle of cold water on the 
bedroom floor. 

“How did that get there?” I murmured. 

I suddenly felt worried. 

“Aunt Greta?” I called, hurrying back into the living room. “Aunt 
Greta? Where are you?” 



20 


Panic swept over me. 

Where could she be? 

I started for the kitchen—when a rattling at the front door made me 

stop. 

Was someone breaking in? 

I gasped as the door slowly creaked open. 

And Aunt Greta came bustling in, brushing snow off her long, black 
coat. She smiled at me. But her smile instantly died when she saw my 
expression. 

“Jaclyn—what’s wrong?” 

“I—I—I—” I sputtered. “Aunt Greta—where were you? I got so 
scared.” 

She pulled off her coat. “Didn’t you see my note?” 

“Huh? Note?” 

“I left it for you on the refrigerator,” she said. “I met a nice couple this 
morning at the general store. They came by and invited me over for dessert 
and coffee.” 

“Oh. That’s nice,” I choked out. My heart still pounded in my chest. 

“Why did you get scared?” Aunt Greta demanded, hanging her coat in 
the front closet. She straightened her long, white braid behind her sweater. 

“Well, I was in your room. Looking for you. And I stepped in a cold 
puddle on the floor,” I replied. 

“Puddle? Show me,” Aunt Greta demanded. 

I led the way to the bedroom and pointed to the wide wet spot on the 
floor. Aunt Greta gazed up at the ceiling. “Maybe the roof leaks,” she 
murmured. “We’ll have to examine it tomorrow morning.” 

“I—I thought it was the snowman,” I blurted out. “I know it’s crazy, 
but I thought he had been here. I thought he’d broken into the house and—” 

I stopped when I saw the shock on my aunt’s face. Her mouth dropped 
open and she uttered a silent gasp. 

“Jaclyn—what are you talking about?” she demanded. “What have 
your friends been telling you? More nonsense about a snowman?” 



“Yes,” I confessed. “Rolonda and Eli, the two village kids I met. They 
both told me a crazy story about a living snowman who stays in an ice cave 
at the top of the mountain. They said—” 

“It’s all superstition,” Aunt Greta interrupted. “It’s all old tales that 
have been handed down. None of it is true. You’re smart enough to know 
that, Jaclyn.” 

“Yes,” I agreed. “But Rolonda and Eli seem so frightened. They really 
believe the story. And Eli begged me not to go up to the ice cave.” 

“Probably good advice,” Aunt Greta said. She crossed the room and 
placed a hand tenderly on my shoulder. “You probably shouldn’t go up to 
the mountaintop, dear,” she said softly. 

“Why not?” I demanded. 

“There must be some kind of real danger up there,” she replied. “Not a 
living snowman. But something else dangerous.” 

She sighed. “That’s how these old stories get started. Something bad 
happened on the mountaintop. Then the story changed each time it was told. 
Years later, no one remembers what really happened. And now everyone 
believes a crazy story about a living snowman.” 

She shook her head. 

“Have you seen all the strange snowmen in this village?” I asked her. 
“All the snowmen with scars on their faces and red scarves? Don’t you 
think they’re spooky?” 

“It’s a strange village tradition,” Aunt Greta confessed. “Very quaint. I 
think they’re very interesting looking.” 

“Interesting?” I frowned at her. 

“Well, make me a promise,” she said, yawning. 

“Promise?” 

“Promise me you won’t go running up to the mountaintop to explore 
the ice cave. It probably is a very dangerous place.” 

“Well...” I hesitated. 

“Promise,” Aunt Greta urged sternly. 

“Okay. I promise,” I agreed, rolling my eyes. 

But a few minutes later, I decided to break that promise. 

I was lying in my attic bed, my eyes shut tight. Listening. Listening to 
the strange howls from the mountaintop. 

Were they animal? Were they human? 



I hate mysteries. I have to know the answers to things. 

I’m going up there, I decided. 

I don’t care what I promised my aunt. I’m climbing up to the ice cave. 
Tomorrow. 



21 


I didn’t dream of snowmen that night. I dreamed about fluffy white kittens 
with sky-blue eyes. Dozens of them. The whitest kittens I ever saw. 

They began climbing over one another. Silently at first. And then they 
started to screech and hiss. A frightening, ugly sound. 

Suddenly they all wore red scarves around their necks. 

They clawed at each other, arching their pure white backs. Hissing and 
screeching. 

Until I woke up. 

Yellow morning sunlight poured through the round window at the 
other end of my bedroom. I could smell bacon frying downstairs. Aunt 
Greta was already up and about. 

I decided to climb the mountain right after breakfast. I didn’t want to 
think about it anymore. I wanted to go up there and solve the mystery. 

I knew that strange, white-bearded guy Conrad was a problem. If he 
saw me, he’d try to stop me. He and his wolf. 

But I had a plan to take care of Conrad. 

If only Rolonda and Eli would help... 

As it turned out, I didn’t get out of the house till after lunch. Aunt 
Greta needed me to hang curtains with her. And then we put up the 
paintings and posters she had brought from Chicago. 

The house was tiny and cramped. But it was starting to feel a little 
more like home. 

“Where are you going?” Aunt Greta called as I pulled on my parka and 
gloves and started out the door. 

“Uh... nowhere really,” I lied. “Just going to hang out with Rolonda 
and Eli.” 

As I said their names, I saw them walking up my front yard. 

I closed the front door behind me and hurried out to greet them. Eli 
carried a snow shovel. Rolonda dragged two slender tree branches. She 
dropped them at my feet. 

“What’s that for?” I asked. “What are you guys doing here?” 

“We have to build your snowman,” Rolonda replied solemnly. 



“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“You won’t be safe until you have a snowman in your yard,” Eli said. 

“Listen, guys...” I started. 

“The snow is very wet,” Rolonda reported. 

“Good packing snow. It shouldn’t take long. Eli and I brought 
everything we need.” 

“But I don’t have time to build a snowman,” I protested. “I want to 
climb up to the ice cave this morning.” 

They both gasped. Eli gripped the shovel handle and gaped at me. 

“You can’t—!” Eli cried. 

“Jaclyn, I warned you—” Rolonda said. 

“I have to see it for myself,” I told them. And then I added, “I want 
you to come with me.” 

“No!” Eli gasped. 

Rolonda just shook her head. “You know we won’t go up to the ice 
cave, Jaclyn. And we don’t want you to go, either.” 

“But if we all go together...” I urged. 

“No!” they both cried. 

I could see real fear on their faces. Staring at them, I suddenly had an 

idea. 

“Okay, okay,” I said. “I’ll make a deal with you.” 

They eyed me suspiciously. “What kind of deal?” Rolonda demanded. 

“I’ll stay here and build the snowman—if you will help me when 
we’re done,” I said. 

“No. We won’t go with you,” Rolonda insisted. “You can’t get us to go 
up to the ice cave, Jaclyn.” 

“No deal,” Eli added sternly. 

“You don’t have to go up to the ice cave,” I told them. “You just have 
to keep Conrad busy so I can sneak past him.” 

“Huh? How are we going to do that?” Eli asked, leaning on the shovel. 

“We’ll think of something when we get up there,” I replied. “If you 
can keep him talking to you, maybe I can sneak past and get up to the 
cave.” 

“But we don’t want you to go to the ice cave!” Rolonda insisted. 

“I’m going to do it one way or the other,” I told her. “With or without 
you. So are you going to help me or not?” 



They glanced tensely at each other. Eli whispered something to his 
sister. Rolonda whispered something back. 

Then Rolonda turned to me. “Will you build the snowman first?” she 
asked. 

“You won’t be safe without the snowman,” Eli added. 

I wanted to tell them that building a snowman wouldn’t protect me 
against anything. I wanted to tell them how silly the whole thing was. 

But I needed their help. I knew I could never get past Conrad and his 
wolf without them. 

“Okay. Fine. First, we’ll build the snowman,” I agreed. 

“Then Eli and I will help you,” Rolonda promised. 

“But we won’t go any farther than Conrad’s cabin,” Eli insisted in a 
trembling voice. 

“Great!” I replied. “Let’s get started.” 

I bent down and started rolling a snowball for the snowman’s body. 
Rolonda was right. It was good packing snow. I rolled the ball across my 
snowy yard until it was big enough for two of us to roll. Rolonda and I 
worked on the body. Eli worked on the snowball for the head. 

Building one of the strange snowmen gave me a creepy feeling. I felt 
as if I had become part of the superstition. I was taking part in some kind of 
ancient village tradition. A tradition built on fear. 

The people of the village all built these snowmen because they were 
afraid. And now here I was, building one, too. 

Should I be afraid? I wondered. 

I felt glad when the snowman was finished. Rolonda pulled a red scarf 
from her coat pocket, and we wrapped it under the scarred head. 

The snowman’s dark eyes seemed to glare at me. The mouth was 
turned down in an angry sneer. The arms bobbed softly in the wind. 

“Okay. Good job,” I told my two new friends. “Now let’s get going.” I 
motioned toward the mountaintop. 

“Are you sure you want to do this?” Eli asked in a tiny voice. 

“Sure, I’m sure!” I declared loudly. 

But as we started making our way along the road, I didn’t feel as sure 
as I pretended. 

The road curved up the mountain. Soon the houses ended and we were 
walking through snowy woods. 



We didn’t talk. We kept our eyes straight ahead. 

The afternoon sun was slowly lowering itself behind the trees. Blue 
shadows stretched over the snow. The air grew colder as we climbed. 

When Conrad’s low cabin came into view, my heart began to pound. 

I tried to keep my mind calm and clear. But question after question 
whirred through my brain. 

Was Conrad inside the cabin? 

Where was the white wolf? 

Would my plan work? 



22 


All three of us stopped at the end of the road and stared at the cabin up 
ahead. The late afternoon sun had fallen behind the trees. The snow 
billowed in front of us in shades of gray. 

To the left of the cabin, I saw a row of low evergreen shrubs, covered 
in snow. 

“Til hide behind those shrubs,” I told Rolonda and Eli. “You run up to 
the cabin and keep Conrad and the wolf from seeing me.” 

“This isn’t going to work,” Eli muttered, his eyes on the cabin. 

“It’s getting kind of dark,” Rolonda fretted. “Maybe we should come 
back in the morning.” 

“Maybe we should forget the whole idea,” Eli suggested. I saw his 
chin quiver. He shuddered. 

“Hey—you promised!” I exclaimed. “Apromise is a promise—right?” 

They didn’t reply. They both stared across the gray snow at the dark 
cabin up ahead. 

“I came this far. I’m not going back,” I said sharply. “Are you going to 
help me or not?” 

I gasped when I heard a low growl from the cabin. The wolf must have 
heard or smelled us. 

I knew it would come running out any second. 

“Come on!” I urged in a loud whisper. And I took off for the snow- 
covered shrubs. 

I ducked out of view just as Conrad and the wolf burst out of the cabin. 

“Hello!” Rolonda cried to Conrad. 

“Hi!” Eli echoed. 

I watched Rolonda and Eli go running up to Conrad. 

The wolf lowered its head, watching them carefully. 

I saw Rolonda and Eli, both talking at once, chattering with Conrad. I 
couldn’t hear what they were saying. 

They’re doing it! I told myself, my heart pounding. They’re keeping 
his attention. 

Time for me to move. 



Time for me to make a run for it. 

I could hear Rolonda talking to Conrad. I glanced over the top of the 
bush. The wolf had its back to me. 

Conrad was scratching his gray hair, listening to Rolonda. I couldn’t 
see his expression. But I imagined he was very confused and surprised. 

I knew he didn’t get any visitors. 

He must be wondering what Rolonda and Eli were doing up here! 

I forced all of these thoughts from my mind. 

It was time for me to make a run for it. 

I took a deep breath. 

Then, still crouching, I began to run. 

My legs felt like Jell-O. My boots sank into the deep snow. 

Ducking my head, I darted up the steep mountainside. 

Up, up. 

I had just passed the bushes when I heard Conrad’s angry shout 
—“Hey, wait!” 



23 


I stopped so suddenly, I fell over backward! 

I landed hard. The snow seemed to fly up in my face, sweep over me, 
surround me. Everything went white. 

I’m caught, I realized. 

My plan didn’t work. 

I stood up and turned to face Conrad. 

To my shock, he wasn’t coming after me. He and the wolf were 
mnning downhill. Chasing after Rolonda and Eli. 

I heard the wolf utter a high growl. Then they disappeared around a 
curve. 

I stood frozen in place, staring at the spot where they had just been. 

Would Conrad harm Rolonda and Eli? 

Should I run after them and try to help them? 

No. I had to keep going. 

This was the plan. This was my chance. 

Taking another deep breath, I turned and started to run up the 
mountainside. The climb was steep for a while. So steep I wasn’t sure I 
could make it. 

But then the ground leveled off. I found myself on a wide ledge. The 
ledge was slick. My boots slipped on the ice. 

I pressed my back against the mountain wall. 

And gazed up at the ice cave. 

Yes! 

There it stood above me. A cave as tall as a building. Smooth and 
glassy, it reflected the clouds in the sky above it. 

I couldn’t see the entrance from here. I was staring at one of the sides. 

The ledge narrowed as it curled up to the cave. 

I kept my back pressed against the wall and slowly—step by step— 
inched my way toward the top. 

“Don’t look down!” I murmured out loud. 

But as soon as I said it, I had to look. 



It was a deep drop from the ledge to the ground far, far below. 

If I slipped and fell... 

I’m not going to slip and fall! I told myself. 

A deep, rumbling sound made me jump! 

I grabbed the mountainside with both hands to keep from falling. 
The ledge trembled beneath me. 

Another low rumble made me cry out in fear. 

The ledge trembled again. The whole mountain seemed to shake! 
The sound came from the cave. 

Is something moving up there? I wondered. 

Or is it the normal sound of a mountaintop in the wind? 

I gathered my courage and moved forward. Inch by inch. 

I had come this far. I refused to retreat now. 

The ledge grew narrower, slipperier, as it curved around. 

Another rumbling noise made me gasp. 

Somehow I held on. And followed the ledge around. 

It seemed to take forever. But then the cave opening came into view. 
And after that, I saw the most terrifying sight of my life. 



24 


I didn’t see it at first. 

First, I saw the layer of solid ice that covered the ledge. The glassy 
cave rose up behind the ledge. The gaping entrance to the cave was blacker 
than the darkest night. 

I stood staring into the darkness. Trying to catch my breath. Trying to 
slow my pounding heart. 

Clouds reflected in the glassy ice drifted rapidly to the right. They 
made the cave appear to move. 

Sharply pointed icicles stabbed down from the roof of the cave 
opening. They reminded me of sharpened teeth about to close. 

I stared into the black cave opening and waited. Waited to see if 
anything would appear. 

I didn’t have to wait long. 

A rumble as loud as thunder made the ledge quake. 

Afraid I might slip off, I dropped to my knees. 

The rumble grew to a roar. 

And a tall, white figure lumbered out from the blackness of the cave 
entrance. An enormous snowman! 

I gasped—and stared in horror as the mountain of snow moved toward 
me. “Nooooo!” I wailed. 

I forgot where I was. Forgot I was perched on a narrow ice ledge. 

And started to back up, to back away from the tall creature. 

And I slipped. 

Slipped off the ledge. 

And felt myself fall. 



25 


My hands shot up. 

Shot up and dug into the ledge. 

I gripped the icy ledge. Held on. Held on. 

With a terrified groan, I scrambled back up to safety. Trembling. My 
entire body shaking. My breaths escaping in short, frantic gasps. 

I huddled on my knees on the icy ledge and watched the snowman as it 
glared down at me. Its blood-red scarf flapped in the wind. Its round, black 
eyes were as big as doorknobs. Its dark mouth turned down in a fierce, 
angry sneer. 

And the scar. The scar cut deeply into the side of its round head, long 
and curling, like a black snake. 

“Ohhhhhh.” I uttered another moan as its tree branch arms reached for 
me. 

I shivered in a sudden, deep cold. A cold I’d never felt before. I could 
see frozen waves floating from the snowman’s wide body. 

And then the big, round head tilted. The black eyes bulged even wider. 

And the snowman bellowed in a deep roar of a voice: “WHO ARE 
YOU?” 

I trembled in the waves of cold that floated off its body. 

It talks! 

The stories Rolonda and Eli told me are true. It’s all true. 

Its round eyes locked on mine, the big snowman moved closer. Closer. 

I wanted to stand up. I wanted to run. 

But it had me frozen there. 

I couldn’t stand. I couldn’t back up. I couldn’t escape from it. 

“WHO ARE YOU?” the snowman bellowed again. And the whole 
mountain shook. 

“I—I—” My voice came out in a quivering squeak. 

“Please—” I managed to choke out. “Please—I didn’t mean to bother 
you. I—” 

“WHO ARE YOU?” the huge snow creature thundered for the third 



time. 

“My name?” I squeaked. “My name is Jaclyn. Jaclyn DeForest.” 

The snowman’s tree branch arms shot up. Its dark mouth gaped open 
in surprise. 

“SAY IT AGAIN,” it ordered. 

I shivered in the waves of cold. “Jaclyn DeForest,” I repeated in my 
tiny, frightened voice. 

The snowman stared down at me in silence for a long while. It lowered 
its arms to its round, white sides. 

“DO YOU KNOW WHO I AM?” it demanded. 

I swallowed hard. The question took me totally by surprise. I opened 
my mouth to answer, but no sound came out. 

“DO YOU KNOW WHO I AM?” the snowman thundered. 

“No,” I squeaked. “Who are you?” 

“IAM YOUR FATHER!” the snowman cried. 



26 


“Nooooooo!” Along wail escaped my throat. 

I wanted to get away from there. I wanted to run. To slide down the 
mountain. To fly away. 

But I couldn’t move. 

The snowman trapped me in his icy grip. Held me there on the ledge. 
Froze me in wave after wave of cold. 

“Jaclyn—I am your father,” the snowman repeated, lowering his 
booming voice. He stared down at me with those frightening, round glassy 
eyes. “Believe me.” 

“Th-that’s impossible !” I stammered. I hugged myself, trying to stop 
my body from trembling. “You’re a snowman! You can’t be my father!” 

“Listen to me!” the snowman roared. “I am your father. Your mother 
was a sorceress. And so is your aunt. Your aunt practices all sorts of 
magic.” 

“No—!” I protested. His lies made me gather my courage. I climbed to 
my feet. 

“That’s not true!” I cried angrily. “I’ve never seen Aunt Greta do any 
magic. You’re lying!” 

The snowman bobbed from side to side. The ledge shook beneath me. 
I nearly lost my balance. 

“I do not lie, Jaclyn,” he insisted. His arms raised up, as if he were 
pleading with me. “I’m telling the truth.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Your mother did this to me,” the snowman said. “She used her magic 
and turned me into a snowman. You were two years old. She turned me into 
a snowman. She tried to turn me back. But she failed. Then she and your 
aunt Greta took you and ran away from the village.” 

“Your story doesn’t make any sense!” I cried. “If what you say is true, 
why did we move back here? Why did Aunt Greta bring us back to the 
village?” 

“Your aunt had a good reason for coming back,” the snowman 
explained. “She knows that after ten years, the magic spell starts to fade.” 



“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. My head felt frozen. It was hard 
to think. I struggled to make sense of what he was telling me. 

“After ten years, the spell fades,” the snowman repeated. “Your aunt 
came back to renew the spell. She wants me to stay a snowman. She wants 
to keep me prisoner up here forever. She wants to make sure I don’t tell the 
world what happened to me. And she wants to keep you to herself!” 

“Aunt Greta is not a sorceress!” I protested. “I’ve lived with her most 
of my life. And I’ve never seen her do any kind of magic. She doesn’t—” 

“PLEASE!” the snowman bellowed, raising a tree branch arm to 
silence me. “There isn’t much time. I’m your father, Jaclyn. Your real 
father. You’ve got to believe me.” 

“But, I—I—” I didn’t know what to say. I couldn’t think straight. It 
was all too... crazy. 

“You can get me out of this,” the snowman pleaded. “You can save 
me. But you’ve got to hurry. Your aunt Greta will renew the spell soon. If 
you don’t save me, I’ll be a snowman for another ten years.” 

“But what can I do?” I cried. “I’m not a sorceress. I can’t do magic. 
What can I do?” 

“You can save me,” the giant snow creature insisted. “But I cannot tell 
you how.” He uttered a bitter sigh. 

“If I tell you how to save me, it will only strengthen the spell,” he 
continued. “You’ve got to figure it out for yourself.” 

“Huh? But how?” I demanded. 

“I can give you a hint,” the snowman replied. “I cannot tell you how to 
save me. But I can give you a hint.” 

“Okay,” I said softly. I hugged myself more tightly. 

And I listened as, in his deep rumble of a voice, the snowman recited 
the familiar rhyme: 

“When the snows blow wild 

And the day grows old, 

Beware, the snowman, my child. 

Beware, the snowman. 

He brings the cold. ” 


I stared up at him in shock. “You—you know the poem!” I stammered. 



“That is your clue,” the snowman said softly. “That is the only hint I 
can give you. Now you must figure out how to rescue me.” 

I already knew how to rescue him. 

I knew instantly when he recited the old rhyme. 

The second verse. The secret had to be in the second verse. The verse I 
couldn’t remember. 

“Please, Jaclyn.” The snowman gazed down at me, pleading. “Please. 
Help me. I’m your father, Jaclyn. I’m really your father.” 

I stared back at him. Trying to decide. Trying so hard to decide. 

Should I believe him? 

Should I help him? 



27 


Yes, I decided. 

Yes. I’ll run home. I’ll find the old poetry book. And I’ll read the 
second verse of the rhyme. 

“I’m coming back!” I called up to the snowman. I spun away from 
him, pulled myself out of his invisible, cold grip. 

I started to run down the ledge. And gasped when I nearly ran into 
Aunt Greta! 

“Aunt Greta—!” I cried in shock. 

“I tried to warn you!” she called to me. “I tried to scare you, Jaclyn. To 
keep you from coming up here.” 

So, it was Aunt Greta who whispered up to my room late at night, who 
warned me to beware of the snowman! 

Her dark eyes were wild. Her normally pale face was bright red! Her 
long, black coat was open and flapped behind her in the wind. 

She raised a large, black book in one hand above her head. “Jaclyn—is 
this what you’re looking for?” she demanded shrilly. 

“The poetry book?” I cried. 

My aunt nodded. She held the book high above her. 

“Aunt Greta—is it true?” I asked, glancing back at the huge snowman. 
“Is he really my father?” 

My aunt’s face twisted in surprise. “Huh? Your father?” she cried. 
“What a lie! Is that what he told you? That he’s your father? It’s a lie. A 
horrible lie!” 

“NOOOOOO!” the snowman boomed. 

I jumped. But Aunt Greta ignored the thunderous cry. 

“It’s a lie, Jaclyn,” she repeated, glaring angrily at the snowman. “He 
isn’t your father. He’s an evil monster!” 

“NOOOOO!” the snowman bellowed again. The whole mountain 
shook from his protest. 

“Your mother and father were sorcerers,” Aunt Greta continued, 
ignoring him. “They practiced their magic night and day. But they went too 
far. They created him accidentally.” 



Aunt Greta pointed to the snowman, her face bitter. “He’s an evil 
monster,” she repeated through gritted teeth. “When your parents saw what 
they had done, they were horrified. They froze the monster inside the 
snowman body. Soon after, your father disappeared. Your mother and I took 
you and ran from the village. We ran to be safe from the monster’s horrible 
evil!” 

“YOU ARE A LIAR!” the snowman raged. He waved his stick arms 
wildly in the air. His scarf blew out at his sides like hawk wings. Wave after 
wave of cold shot off his bulging body. 

“Jaclyn, don’t believe her!” the snowman pleaded. “Save me—please! 
I am your father.” 

His arms reached out to me. “Please,” he begged. “I know it is hard for 
you to believe. But your aunt is the evil one. She is a sorceress. She and 
your mother and I—we were all sorcerers. I am not evil. I am not a monster. 
Please—” 

“Liar!” Aunt Greta shrieked. She gripped the big book angrily in both 
hands, as if ready to throw it at him. “I know no magic!” Aunt Greta cried. 
“I know no spells! I am not a sorceress!” 

She opened the book and began frantically shuffling through the pages. 
“I’m not a sorceress. But I brought this book because I know its secret. I 
know what I need to do to make sure you stay frozen in that snowman body 
forever!” 

The snowman continued to reach out to me. “Jaclyn, save me. Save me 
now,” he pleaded. 

I turned from him to my aunt, then back to him. 

Who should I believe? 

Which one was telling the truth? 

Suddenly, I had an idea. 



28 


I grabbed the open poetry book from my aunt’s hands. 

“What are you doing?” she shrieked. 

She moved quickly to wrestle it away from me. 

We both tugged at it. The old pages tore and flew out. The heavy cover 
cracked. 

Aunt Greta made a desperate swipe at it. 

But I pulled it away from her. Then I backed up against the wall of the 
ice cave. 

Aunt Greta took a step toward me. Then she gazed up at the snowman 
and decided not to come that close to him. 

“Jaclyn—you’re making a big mistake!” Aunt Greta warned. 

Leaning against the smooth cave wall, I flipped frantically through the 
pages of the old book. “I’m going to find the poem,” I told her. “I’m going 
to read the second verse. It’s the only way to know the truth.” 

“THANK YOU, DAUGHTER!” the snowman bellowed. 

Aunt Greta uttered a wail of protest. “I’m telling you the truth, 
Jaclyn!” she cried. “I have taken care of you all these years. I would not lie 
to you.” 

But I’d made up my mind. 

I had to read the second verse. It was the only way I could find out 
who was lying and who was telling the truth. 

“He’s a monster!” Aunt Greta cried. 

The snowman stood still and silent, watching me furiously shuffle 
through the pages. 

Where was that rhyme? Where? 

I glanced up. “Aunt Greta—?” 

She bent down and picked up a torn page from the snow. As her eyes 
moved over the page, a smile spread over her face. 

The wind blew her coat behind her. Her eyes were wild. The page 
fluttered in her hand. 

“Jaclyn, I can’t let you read the rhyme,” she said. 



“You—you have it in your hand?” I cried. 

“I can’t let you read it,” Aunt Greta repeated. 
And tossed the page over the ledge. 



29 


I let out a shriek. 

I watched the page float out over the ledge. I watched it fly up, then 
start to drop. 

It’s lost, I realized. 

The second verse is lost forever. 

The swirling wind will carry it down the mountain, down the steep 
drop. It will never be seen again. 

And then, I cried out again—as the wind carried the page up. Up. Back 
up. 

And into my hand! 

I grabbed it out of the air. 

I stared at it in amazement. 

And before Aunt Greta could grab it back, I raised the page to my face 
and started to read the second verse of the rhyme out loud: 

“When the snows melt 

And the warm sun is with thee, 

Beware, the snowman —” 

“Noooooo!” Aunt Greta wailed. She dove toward me. With a desperate 
swipe, she pulled the page from my hand. 

And ripped it to shreds. 

The snowman uttered a horrified groan. He bent. Reached out to grab 
Aunt Greta. 

Too late. 

The jagged strips of paper fluttered to the snow. 

“Aunt Greta—why?” I choked out. 

“I couldn’t let you do it,” she replied. “He’s a monster, Jaclyn. He’s 
not your father. I couldn’t let you free him.” 

“She’s lying,” the snowman insisted. “She does not want you to know 
me, Jaclyn. She doesn’t want you to know your own father. She wants to 



leave me trapped in this frozen cave forever.” 

I turned back to my aunt. Her face had grown stern and hard. She 
stared back at me coldly. 

I took a deep breath. “Aunt Greta, I have to know the truth,” I told her. 

“I’ve told you the truth,” she insisted. 

“I have to know for myself,” I replied. “I—I saw the last line of the 
poem. Before you grabbed it and tore it up. I know the whole poem, Aunt 
Greta.” 

“Don’t—” my aunt pleaded, reaching out to me. 

But I backed up against the icy cave wall, and I recited the rhyme from 
memory: 

“When the snows melt 

And the warm sun is with thee, 

Beware, the snowman — 

For the snowman shall go free!” 

“No, Jaclyn! No! No! No!” Aunt Greta wailed. She pressed her hands 
to the sides of her face and repeated her cry. “No! No! No!” 

I turned to the snowman and saw him begin to melt. 

The white snow oozed down his face and body like melting ice cream. 

The black eyes dropped to the snow. The face melted, melted onto the 
body. The snow poured off the round body. The tree branch arms thudded 
heavily to the ground. 

Slowly his real face came into view. 

Slowly his body emerged from under the snow. 

I stared as the snow dripped away. 

And then I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror. 



30 


A monster! 

An ugly, snarling, red-skinned monster stomped out from under the 
oozing snow. 

Aunt Greta had told the truth. A monster was trapped inside the 
snowman. Not my father. 

Not my father. 

A monster... such a hideous monster! 

Its head and body were covered with crusty red scales. Its yellow eyes 
rolled wildly in its bull-shaped head. A purple tongue flapped from its 
jagged-toothed mouth. 

“No! No! No! No!” Aunt Greta chanted, still pressing both hands 
against her face. Tears ran down her cheeks and over her hands. 

“What have I done?” I wailed. 

The monster tossed back its head in a throaty laugh. He picked the 
poetry book off the snow in his scaly, three-fingered hands. And he heaved 
it over the side of the mountain. 

“You’re next!” he roared at me. 

“No—please!” I begged. 

I grabbed Aunt Greta by the shoulders and tugged her away from the 
ledge. We pressed ourselves against the icy wall of the cave. 

“Good-bye,” the monster grunted. “Good-bye, all.” 

“But I saved you!” I pleaded. “Is that my reward? To be thrown over 
the side of the mountain?” 

The red-scaled beast nodded. An ugly grin revealed more jagged teeth. 
“Yes. That is your reward.” 

He picked me up in one powerful hand. Squeezing my waist. 
Squeezing it so tightly I couldn’t breathe. 

He picked Aunt Greta up in his other hand. 

Raised us above his head. 

Let out an ugly, raspy groan. 

And held us over the side of the mountain. 



31 


His powerful hands swung us out over the cliff edge. 

I peered down, down at the sheer drop, at the snowy ground that 
appeared to be miles below. 

To my surprise, the monster didn’t let go. 

He swung around and dropped my aunt and me back onto the ledge. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled gasp. 

The monster was staring down the ledge now. He had stopped paying 
attention to Aunt Greta and me. 

Struggling to catch my breath, I turned and followed his gaze. 

And saw what had startled the monster. And saved my life. 

A parade! 

A parade of snowmen. 

All of the snowmen of the village. They were marching up to the ice 
cave in a single line. 

Their red scarves waved in the wind. Their sticklike arms bobbed up 
and down as they rumbled up the mountainside. 

Like soldiers, they came marching up to us. Bouncing, thudding, 
mmbling forward. All identical. All scarred and stern-faced and sneering. 

“I—I don’t believe it!” I stammered. I grabbed Aunt Greta’s arm. 

We stared at the marching snowmen in horror. 

“They’re all coming to serve the monster,” Aunt Greta whispered. 
“We’re doomed, Jaclyn. Doomed.” 



32 


The snowmen rumbled up the icy ledge. The steady thud thud thud grew 
louder as they neared. The sound echoed off the snowy mountaintop until it 
sounded as if a thousand snowmen were marching to attack us. 

Aunt Greta and I shrank back against the glassy cave wall. 

We had nowhere to run. The monster blocked the cave entrance. The 
marching snowmen cut off any escape down the ledge. 

Closer came the snowmen. Closer. Close enough to see the anger in 
their round, black eyes. Close enough to see the snakelike scars cut into 
their faces. 

Aunt Greta and I couldn’t move. We raised our hands as if to shield 
ourselves. 

And then we gasped in surprise as the snowmen marched right past us. 

They rumbled up to the monster. Bouncing fast. Thudding over the ice. 
Arms waving, dark eyes glowing. 

Bounced up to the startled monster. And pushed him. Pushed him 
back. 

The snowmen crushed up against him. One snowman. Then two. Then 
ten. 

They crushed against his scaly, red body. Pushing him back. Back. 

The monster tossed its head in an angry roar. 

But the roar was smothered as a snowman rolled over the monster’s 
head. 

Aunt Greta and I gasped in amazement as the snowmen swarmed over 
the monster. 

Pushed him back against the cave wall. 

We saw the monster’s powerful arms flail the air, thrashing wildly. 
Helplessly. 

And then the monster disappeared behind a crush of snowmen. 

The snowmen pushed forward. Pushed hard. Pushed silently. 

Like a silent avalanche. 

And when they finally stepped back, the monster stood frozen, arms 
stretched out as if to attack. Not moving. Frozen inside the ice wall. 



A prisoner. 

The snowmen had pushed him into the wall. Trapped him inside the 
glassy wall of ice. 

Aunt Greta and I stood trembling beside the cave entrance. We were 
still holding on to each other. My legs felt weak and rubbery. I could feel 
Aunt Greta trembling beneath her coat. 

“What brought all the snowmen up here?” I asked her. “Did you do it, 
Aunt Greta?” 

She shook her head, her eyes still wide with amazement. “I didn’t 
bring them here, Jaclyn,” she said softly. “I told you the truth. I have no 
magic. Your mother and father were sorcerers. But not me.” 

“Then who made them climb the mountain to rescue us?” I demanded. 

“I did!” a voice cried. 



33 


I turned to the ledge—and saw Conrad standing there. His gray hair blew 
wildly in the wind. The white wolf stood at his side. 

“You made the snowmen march?” I cried. “You are a sorcerer, too?” 

Conrad nodded. He gazed at the monster trapped in the ice and a smile 
spread over his face. “Yes. I sent them to rescue you,” he said. 

Aunt Greta narrowed her eyes at Conrad. As she studied his face, her 
mouth dropped open. “You!” Aunt Greta cried. “It’s you!” 

Conrad’s smile grew even wider. “Yes,” he told my aunt. 

“Who—who is he?” I demanded. 

Aunt Greta turned to me and placed a hand on my shoulder. “Jaclyn,” 
she said softly, “I moved back here because I thought he might still be here. 
And yes, I was right. He is here.” 

She squeezed my shoulder and smiled at me, tears welling in her eyes. 
“Conrad is your father,” Aunt Greta whispered. 

Conrad and I both cried out at the same time. 

He rushed across the icy ledge and wrapped me in a hug. His long 
beard scratched my face as he pressed his cheek against mine. 

“I don’t believe it!” he cried, stepping back with tears in his eyes. “It’s 
been so many years—I didn’t recognize you, Jaclyn. I’m so glad that Greta 
brought you back to the village.” 

“You—you’re really my father?” I stammered. 

Conrad didn’t have a chance to answer. Rolonda and Eli came running 
up to us. “Are you okay?” they cried. 

Conrad pointed to Rolonda and Eli. “They saved your lives!” he told 
Aunt Greta and me. “They told me that you planned to climb to the ice 
cave. As soon as I heard that, I worked my magic. I sent the snowmen up to 
rescue you.” 

“Wow!” Eli exclaimed, seeing the monster frozen in the ice. “Look at 
that!” 

“That was the evil snowman,” Conrad explained to them. “He’ll never 
threaten the village again.” 

Rolonda and Eli stepped closer to view the frozen monster close up. 



I turned to my father. “I don’t understand,” I said. “Why did you stay 
behind in the village when Mom and Aunt Greta left? Why do you live up 
here near the ice cave?” 

He scratched his beard and sighed. “It’s kind of a long story. When 
you were little, your mother and I were practicing powerful magic. Our 
magic got out of control. We accidentally created this monster.” 

He motioned to the monster and shook his head. “We froze the 
monster inside the body of a snowman,” he explained. “Your mother—she 
wanted to leave. She was so frightened and upset. She wanted to move as 
far away from the village as she could. She wanted to forget it ever 
happened.” 

“And why did you stay?” I demanded. 

“I stayed because I thought I owed it to the people of the village,” he 
explained. “I owed it to them to keep the snowman in his cave. To keep him 
from harming people.” 

He uttered another sad sigh. “And so I stayed up here, close to the 
monster we created. But... but... leaving you, Jaclyn, was the hardest thing 
I ever had to do!” 

He wrapped his arm around my shoulders. Again, his beard scratched 
my face. 

“I always dreamed that someday I could leave the mountain and go 
find you,” he said softly. “And now the monster is dead. The horror is 
finally over. And Greta has brought you back. Perhaps...” 

His voice broke. He smiled at Aunt Greta and then at me. He took a 
breath and tried again. “Perhaps... we can try to be a family again.” 

He kept his arm around me as we turned to go down the mountain. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as I saw the snowmen move to block our path. 

In all the excitement of finding my father, Td completely forgotten 
about all the snowmen! 

Now they circled us. Surrounded us. 

Staring at us with their glowing coal eyes. Staring at us so coldly. 

“Wh-what are they going to do?” I stammered. 

Before my father could answer, one of the snowmen came thumping 
out of the group. He rumbled up to us, arms twitching, eyes flashing. 

I grabbed Dad’s arm. The snowmen had us totally surrounded. 

Nowhere to move. No chance to run away. 



The snowman stopped inches from my father—and opened his mouth 
to speak. 

“Can we go back down now?” the snowman asked. “It’s really cold up 
here!” 




HOW I LEARNED 
TO FLY 


Goosebumps - 52 
R.L. Stine 


1 


The day I learned how to fly, I was worried about Wilson Schlamme. 

I spend a lot of time worrying about Wilson. I’ve always had trouble 
with that guy. 

Do you know why? 

He thinks he’s better than me—and I know he isn’t. 

I’m Jack Johnson. And I’m not the kind of kid who likes to enter 
contests. Really. I don’t like to compete. 

I always let my dad win at chess. Just because it means so much to him 
to win. And I even let my dog Morty win our wrestling matches on the 
living room floor. 

But Wilson never gives me a break. He always has to prove that he’s 
the best at everything. 

If I’m chewing bubble gum, he tries to blow bigger bubbles. When my 
bubble is twice as big as Wilson’s, he says that his is rounder! 

If my bubble is bigger —and rounder—he sticks his finger in mine and 
pops it all over my face. 

He’s trouble, that guy. Real trouble. 

Especially when Mia Montez is around. 

Mia is the cutest girl at Malibu Middle School. Ask anybody. 
Everything about Mia is cute. 

She has big green eyes and a perfect, little nose. I think Mia’s nose is 
the first thing I noticed about her. I really admired that nose. I guess that’s 
because my nose is kind of big. 

And Mia has the prettiest hair. Short, straight black hair. Really shiny. 
My hair is dark—like Mia’s—but it’s curly. Way too curly. 

Know what Mia is totally crazy about? Hearts. It sort of makes sense. 
She was born on Valentine’s Day. 

She wears a heart necklace every day to school. And a charm bracelet 
with lots of silver and gold hearts dangling from it. 

On her right hand, she wears a ruby red heart ring. And she has 
earrings that match. She looks so cute in all those hearts. 

Anyway, when Mia is around, that’s when Wilson is at his worst! He 



has to show off in front of her. And he has to prove that he’s better than me. 
Wilson likes to compete. Wilson likes to win. 

So what choice do I have? I have to show Wilson that he’s wrong. I 
have to prove that I’m as good as he is. I don’t want Mia to think I’m a 
loser. 


* * * 


“Jack, can I borrow your eraser?” My friend Ethan Polke tapped me on the 
shoulder. Ethan sits behind me during free period in school. He never has 
erasers. He’s always losing them. 

“Sure.” I turned around and handed him the new one I bought 
yesterday. Because he lost my old one the day before. 

I hardly use my eraser anyway. At least not when I’m drawing 
superheroes. 

I love to draw superheroes. And I’m really good at it. I never have to 
fix a single line. 

“Hey—that’s awesome!” Ethan pointed over my shoulder to my sketch 
of The Incredible Laser Man. 

The Incredible Laser Man is my newest superhero. I draw superheroes 
every day. In the morning before I go to school. During free period. And at 
night after I finish my homework. And then, when I go to bed, I dream 
about them. 

One day I’m going to be a comic book artist. I have a folder at home 
packed with my superhero drawings. The Fearless Falcon. Shadow Boy. 
The Masked Mantis. They’re all going to be famous one day. I know it. 

I studied my sketch of The Incredible Laser Man. He wore a really 
cool jumpsuit. His huge muscles bulged against the tight material. 

A powerful lightning bolt streaked across his massive chest. Two more 
lightning bolts zigzagged down his muscular legs. 

I drew a pair of mysterious black goggles to hide his eyes—so no one 
would know his true identity. I didn’t know it either, yet. 

First I draw the character—then I make up the story. 

The Incredible Laser Man held his mighty arms up to the sky. I started 
to draw laser beams shooting from his fingertips. The bell rang just as I 
finished. 



I jumped up from my seat. I couldn’t wait to show The Incredible 
Laser Man to Mia. She was going to love it! 

“Hey, Mia!” I held my drawing out to her. “Want to see my—” 

“Out of my way, Jackie.” I turned and saw Wilson. He was carrying a 
drawing too. He shoved me hard from behind. 

I fell over Mia’s desk. My drawing flew from my hand and fluttered to 
the floor. 

“Thank you, Wilson!” Mia held Wilson’s drawing in her hand. She 
flashed him a big smile. “Look at this, Jack. Look what Wilson drew.” 

I glanced over Mia’s shoulder. Wilson had drawn a team of 
superheroes. FIVE of them. Colored in. 

In sparkly letters at the top he had written: MIA’S PROTECTORS. 

Yuck. 

“Look what Jackie drew!” Wilson cried. He snatched my drawing 
from the floor. 

“Wilson, don’t call me Jackie!” I declared. “I told you a million times, 
I really hate being called that.” 

“Sorry. I forgot.” Wilson smirked. “I won’t do it again— Jackie.” 

I glared at Wilson. “Give me back my drawing!” I snapped. I reached 
out for it. But Wilson was too fast for me. He shoved it in front of Mia’s 
face. 

“It’s The Incredible Lazy Man!” he hooted. 

Mia giggled at his dumb joke. 

I wanted to disappear. 

“It’s very cute, Jack,” Mia said, handing it back to me. Then she and 
Wilson slipped on their backpacks and headed outside. 

Okay—so Mia liked Wilson’s drawing better. No big deal, I told 
myself. I stuffed my drawing into my backpack. 

Just wait until we get outside. 

Just wait until Mia sees my new twenty-one-speed Silver Streak racing 

bike. 

She’s going to love it! 

I ran outside—just in time to see Mia circling my new bike. “Cool!” 
she said, trying to catch her reflection in the handlebars. “Maybe I’ll ask 
Mom and Dad for a bike like this for my birthday.” 

I knew Mia would be impressed. 



“You don’t want that for your birthday,” Wilson snickered. “You want 
this'.” 

Wilson pointed to his new bike. 

His new heavy-duty dirt bike. 

“Oh, wow!” Mia exclaimed. “WOW!” 

My stomach twisted into a knot. 

“I don’t like those skinny racing bikes,” Wilson sneered, shaking his 
head at my bike. “Too flimsy. I like a REAL bike.” 

I was so steamed! I wanted to take his big dirt bike and ride it back and 
forth over Wilson’s head. 

My new bike was awesome. It wasn’t flimsy at all. 

Why did everything have to be a contest? And why did Wilson always 

win? 

Little did I know as the three of us rode home that the contest was only 
beginning! 



2 


“I win!” Wilson shouted, jumping off his bike. He leaned it against the tree 
in front of my house. He pumped his fists in the air. “The Silver Snail 
comes in second!” he announced as I rode up, drenched in sweat. 

“Great race, guys,” Mia said, pedaling up to us. 

I wanted to ride home from school next to Mia. But Wilson wanted to 
race—and Mia thought it was a cool idea. 

The hills of Malibu are awesome for racing. They wind around and 
around. I love to climb those hills on my bike, then go speeding down. And 
I’m really great at taking some of the sharp turns. 

I gripped the handlebars of my bike. 

I was confident. 

I had twenty-one speeds. 

We raced. 

Wilson won. 

I leaned my bike next to Wilson’s, trying to catch my breath. Morty, 
my rust-colored cocker spaniel, trotted out from the backyard to greet us. 

“Hey, Morty!” The hearts on Mia’s bracelet clinked softly as she 
scratched Morty’s neck. Morty likes Mia as much as I do. His tail wagged 
like crazy. He jumped up to lick her face. Then he started on me. 

“Whoa. Here comes Wilson’s dog.” Mia pointed across the street to 
Wilson’s house. Wilson’s enormous Labrador charged full speed toward us. 

“Down, boy.” Wilson laughed as his dog leaped up on him. He nearly 
knocked Wilson over. 

“Terminator is TWICE as big as Morty,” Wilson bragged to Mia. 

“But Morty is smarter,” I boasted. “We taught Morty to carry his food 
dish to the sink when he’s finished eating.” 

“That’s pretty smart,” Mia agreed. 

“You call that smart?” Wilson sneered. “We taught Terminator to 
answer the phone when we’re not home.” 

“That’s definitely smarter,” Mia said. “That is really, really smart.” 

“That’s not so smart,” I argued. “Morty can roll over and—” 

“Oh, noooo!” 



We all heard a cry. 

Mrs. Green, my next-door neighbor, poked her head out of her front 
door and screamed. She stared in horror at the tree across the street. The 
tree in front of Wilson’s house. 

There was Olive—Mrs. Green’s new kitten—sitting on the edge of a 
high tree limb. Her fur stood on end. Her little body shook. She let out a 
soft whimper. 

“Oh, poor Olive!” Mia cried. “She’s going to fall! Someone has to 
save her!” 

“I will!” Wilson and I shouted together. 

Oh, no, you won’t, Wilson! I thought. You’re not going to win this 

time. 

With a burst of speed, I raced across the street. My sneakers pounded 
the sidewalk. I reached the tree first! 

“Give me a boost,” I ordered Wilson. Before he could argue, I 
wrapped my arms around the tree trunk and raised my foot. Wilson gave me 
a boost. 

I inched my way up the tmnk. I gazed out—over the hilltops. My eyes 
followed their winding path down, down, down. Right down to the beach. 
The beach stretched along the coast for miles. 

I glanced down and smiled at Mia. 

“Hurry, Jack!” she cried nervously. 

“Don’t worry, Mia,” I declared. “I’m on my way!” 

Yes! I am on my way to save Olive. And you’re not, Wilson. 

I climbed higher and higher—until I reached the limb where Olive sat. 
Her whole body shivered with fright. She let out a terrified squeak when 
she spotted me. 

I studied the tree limb. It was very slender. 

I didn’t know if it would hold my weight. 

“What are you waiting for, Jackie?” Wilson shook the tree trunk. “I’ll 
come up and get her if you’re afraid.” 

Ha! No way, Wilson! 

I crawled out on the limb. Very slowly. 

Olive whimpered. 

I stopped. 

I crawled out some more. 



Olive inched away from me. 

I stopped again. 

Olive stared into my eyes. Then she lifted her front paws—to jump! 
Down below, I could hear Mrs. Green and Mia gasp. 

“No, Olive,” I begged softly. “Stay.” 

I moved a little closer—close enough to grab her now. 

I slowly reached out to her. 

My fingertips brushed against her soft fur. 

Then my knee slipped off the branch. I lost my balance. I lurched to 
the left. 

“Noooo!” 

I let out a shrill cry as I dropped from the tree. 



3 


I shot my arms up. I groped frantically for the tree limb. 

And missed. 

My stomach flopped as I plunged down. Down. 

I closed my eyes tight, ready to smack down on the hard ground. 

“Huh?” 

Something soft broke my fall. 

“Gotcha, Jackie.” 

Wilson caught me in his arms. 

He held me like a baby. Great. Just great... 

I heard clapping. Mia clapping. 

Then Wilson dropped me on the pavement. 

“Owwww!” My head hit the cement with a thud. 

“Are you okay?” Mia’s voice sounded far away. 

“Yes, I’m—” I started to answer, struggling to sit up. That’s when I 
saw that Mia wasn’t paying any attention to me. 

She was bent over Wilson, studying a swollen finger he held out to her. 

“I’m okay,” Wilson assured her. “Jack doesn’t weigh much.” 

“Nooooo!” Mrs. Green shrieked. “Olive—nooooo!” 

Olive dangled from the tree limb by one little paw! 

Wilson scrambled up the tree and crawled across the limb. The tree 
groaned and creaked under his stocky legs. But Wilson didn’t care. 

He looked so sure of himself as he crossed the sagging branch. He 
scooped up Olive in one hand. Then he shimmied down the tree trunk. 

“Thank you! Thank you!” Mrs. Green threw her arms around Wilson’s 
wide shoulders and hugged him. 

My narrow shoulders drooped. I felt miserable. 

With Olive cradled safely in her arms, Mrs. Green returned to her 
house. 

I watched her walk across her lawn. My gaze shifted to my yard— 
where Morty and Terminator wrestled in the grass. Terminator batted Morty 
with his huge paw. He sent Morty into orbit over the hedges. 



Terminator charged across the lawn, jumped over the shrubs, and 
reached Morty before my poor dog landed. Terminator knocked him out of 
the air and pounced on him. 

Morty yelped helplessly as Terminator pinned him to the ground. 

“Terminator, stop!” I shouted, heading over to them. 

“Leave them alone. They’re just playing!” Wilson called. 

But I trudged across the lawn to rescue Morty. 

“Even Wilson’s dog wins all the time,” I grumbled. “Morty and I are 
losers. Total losers.” 

“Hey, guys, I’ve got to go home!” Mia jumped on her bike. “Don’t 
forget about my birthday party on Saturday!” 

“I’ll be there!” Wilson told her. “And I’m going to bring Terminator. 
He has a surprise for you.” 

I groaned. 

“Are you coming to my party, Jack?” Mia smiled brightly at me. 

“Well—maybe...” I tried to come up with a fast excuse. 

I hate parties. 

Don’t get me wrong. I like to see my friends—but not at parties. I 
never really have fun at them—especially if there are party games. I hate to 
play party games. Especially if Wilson is there. 

“I... uh... may have to go somewhere with my parents,” I lied. “I 
think I promised I’d go with them. And then I promised my dad I’d help 
clean out the basement.” 

“You did that last week,” Wilson declared. “Remember—I had to help 
you drag out the trash can. It was too heavy for you.” 

“Well, we didn’t finish,” I said, thinking quickly. I’m such a terrible 

liar. 

Mia grasped the gold heart around her neck. “You have to come, Jack. 
The party doesn’t start till six. I really want you to come.” 

“Well... I’ll try,” I told her. 

“Great, Jack. See you!” Mia hopped on her bike and pedaled up the 
hill toward her house. 

Should I go? I asked myself, heading up my driveway. 

Mia said she really wants me to come. 

So should I forget how much I hate parties—and go? 

Yes, I decided. 



Yes. Maybe I’ll actually have fun. 

Yes! 

So... on Saturday night, I went to Mia’s party. 

And wouldn’t you know it—it ruined my life forever! 



4 


Mia’s house is two blocks up the hill from mine. Her house juts out on 
stilts. It’s kind of dangerous—especially when we have mud slides. But she 
has an amazing view of the ocean down below. 

I stepped up to Mia’s front door. I felt really nervous. 

For one thing, I’d never met Mia’s new stepmother. Mia spends half 
the year with her real mother in Brentwood. And the other half here in 
Malibu with her dad and new stepmother. 

“Come on in! It’s so nice to meet you. I’m Angela Montez,” Mia’s 
stepmother greeted me at the door. “Everyone’s been waiting for you!” 

“Really?” I asked. “For me?” 

“Really!” Mrs. Montez exclaimed. 

Mia’s stepmom had the most beautiful smile. I liked her right away. 

I followed her to the rec room doorway. She waved to Mia across the 
room. “Mia—look who’s finally here,” she called. “Wilson!” 

“Angela—that’s not Wilson. That’s Jack!” Mia called back. 

“Oh. Sorry, Jack.” Mrs. Montez patted me on the shoulder. “Well, have 
a nice time anyway.” 

Mia grabbed my arm and tugged me forward. The room was jammed 
with kids. We pushed our way through the crowd. 

Red streamers hung from the ceiling. Red is Mia’s favorite color. I 
spotted my friends Ray and Ethan in the crowd. They were opening plastic 
bags filled with red balloons. 

“Hey—Jack. Help us blow these things up,” Ray called. 

“Okay. Be right there.” I liked Ethan and Ray. They were great guys. 
Fun to hang out with. 

I handed Mia her birthday present. I wanted to give her something she 
would really, really like. I had walked around the mall for hours searching 
for just the right thing. 

“Thanks, Jack. I can’t wait to open it!” Mia said, gazing at the red stars 
on the wrapping paper. “Look! The paper matches my outfit!” Mia pointed 
to the red stars on her white T-shirt and leggings. 

Mia liked the wrapping paper. That made me feel pretty good. 



Ray and Ethan tossed over some balloons—the long kind—and we 
started blowing them up. 

After we blew up about fifty of them, we batted them through the air. 
One after another. Real fast. A storm of red balloons whirled over our 
heads. 

The kids went wild. Leaping up. Batting them back. 

“Over here, Jack!” they screamed. “Hit some over here!” 

It was cool. 

Then Wilson walked in. 

“Hey, everyone. Watch this!” He snatched two balloons in flight. He 
twisted them so fast, his hands moved in a blur. “Ta-da!” He held his 
creation over his head for everyone to see. 

It was the figure of a man—with huge ears, stubby legs, and a fat 
belly. It looked exactly like our gym teacher, Mr. Grossman. 

“Hey! It’s The Gross Man!” one of the kids yelled out. 

Everyone laughed. 

“Awesome, Wilson!” Mia’s friend Kara shouted. 

“Isn’t Wilson a riot?” Mia said to me. “He can do anything.” 

“Yeah,” I said, slinking back into the corner of the room. “He’s a real 

riot.” 

“Make something else!” Mia clapped. 

Wilson grabbed some balloons and made a pig with antlers. 

And a tiny elephant with a four-foot trunk. 

And an enormous chicken. 

Everyone went crazy over that chicken. 

I was almost glad when Mia announced it was time to play Twister. 
Almost. 

I hate Twister. I told you—I hate all party games. 

Everyone cleared the center of the room so Mia could set the game 

out. 

I shrank farther back into my corner. I eased myself down to the floor. 
I did it slowly so no one would notice me. 

“Jackie!” Wilson dove over the playing mat and yanked me up. “It’s 
time to see if you can beat the champ!” 

Wilson is great at Twister. Of course. 

“Uh, Wilson. I don’t really feel like playing.” I wrestled free of his 



grip. “I’ll spin the spinner so everyone else can play.” 

“Not necessary, Jack.” Wilson’s mouth spread into the widest grin I’d 
ever seen. 

I knew that grin meant trouble. 

He placed his fingers in his mouth and let out a shrill whistle. 
Terminator bounded into the room. 

“Spin, boy!” Wilson ordered the dog. 

Terminator trotted over to the spinner on the floor. He gave it a hard 
nudge with his nose—and it spun. 

Everyone cheered. 

“Let’s see him read it!” I mumbled under my breath. 

Mia heard me. “Wilson will probably teach him that next week!” She 
laughed. 

“Right hand red!” someone called out. 

Everyone dove for the mat. 

Wilson got there first. Of course. 

Terminator spun. 

“Left foot blue.” Mia announced the next move. 

Only two moves and we were all a tangled mess. Wilson’s position 
was secure. He’s fast. He always finds the easiest spot to land on first. 

I’m not that fast. 

I had to stretch my left leg way back—over Ray’s head—to reach a 
blue dot. 

I felt a sharp pain in my side. 

Please, don ’t let me fall, I prayed. I don ’t want to be the first one out. If 
I am—Wilson will never let me forget it. 

My palms began to sweat. 

Three kids had their legs draped over my right arm. I felt my hand 
slipping off the red dot. 

My elbow sagged. 

I tried to stiffen it, but it wouldn’t stay. It slowly sagged some more. 

Wilson craned his neck to see me. “Jack’s elbow is touching!” he 
yelled. 

“No, it isn’t!” Ethan came to my defense. “Spin, Terminator!” 

Terminator spun. 

Right foot yellow. 



Yellow. Yellow. I searched frantically for a yellow circle. I spotted one. 
I hoisted my leg up and over Ray’s back. 

And that’s when I heard the riiiip. 

My shorts split wide open. 

I froze. 

“Superman boxers underneath! Cooool!” Wilson hooted. 

Everyone laughed. 

I glanced over at Mia. She had her head tossed back, laughing like a 
maniac. 

My face burned red. 

I jumped up from the game—and staggered from the room. 

“Wait, Jack!” Mia chased after me. “Don’t go!” 

No way I was going to stay. 

No way. 

I felt totally humiliated. 

Mia caught up to me and blocked the door. “Please?” she asked softly. 
“Please stay?” 

Could I say no? 

Of course not. 

Mrs. Montez gave me a pair of Mia’s brother’s shorts to wear, and I 
returned to the rec room. 

Everyone was seated at a long table, eating hot dogs. I had to take the 
only chair left—next to Wilson. 

I lifted up my hot dog. I opened my mouth to take a bite. 

“Whoa. Wait a minute!” Wilson pushed my hand away from my 
mouth. “You call that a hot dog?” 

He held his hot dog next to mine. He had a foot-long hot dog. TWICE 
as big as my regular one. 

He threw back his head and howled. Then he gulped down his hot dog 
in two bites. 

He grinned that big, horrible, Wilson grin. 

He was driving me CRAZY. 

A gross glob of mustard stuck to the corner of his mouth. I wanted to 
wipe it across his face. 

Should I do it? I asked myself. Should I give him a mustard bath? 
Before I could move, Mia announced it was time to open the presents. 



Wilson jumped up and headed into the living room—where the presents sat, 
piled high. Everyone followed. 

Mia opened Kara’s present first—a bunch of hair scrunchies with red 
hearts. Then she opened Ray and Ethan’s present. A butterfly jigsaw puzzle 
—with over a thousand pieces. 

Mia reached for my present next. 

I held my breath. 

She carefully untied the red ribbon. Then she ripped the paper open— 
and gasped. 

“Ohhh, Jack!” she exclaimed. “How did you know I wanted this one?” 
She held up my present for everyone to see. “It’s the new CD from my 
favorite group—Purple Rose.” 

I knew she would love it. 

“Thank you, Jack!” She set my present down on a table beside her. She 
reached for the next one. An envelope—just an envelope. No gift. 

“That’s mine,” Wilson leaned over and whispered to me. 

I can’t believe Wilson only brought Mia a card, I thought as I watched 
her tear open the flap. Only a card for her birthday. What kind of present is 
that? 

Mia stared into the envelope for a moment. Then she screamed. “Oh, 
wow! Oh, wow! Oh, wow!” 

She held up Wilson’s present. 

Two tickets. 

Two tickets to the Purple Rose concert at the Hollywood Bowl next 
month. 

Front row seats. 

“Oh, wow!” she shrieked again. “This is totally awesome!” 

Wilson shot me his big Wilson grin. 

I couldn’t take it any longer. I let out a furious scream—and ran out of 
the house. 



5 


I ran down the path from Mia’s house as fast as I could. 

Ran down the dark road. A single street lamp cast a weak glow over 
the houses. Trees and shrubs poked over the path as if reaching for me. 

I didn’t know where I was going—and I didn’t care. I just had to get 
away from the party. 

“Stop, Jack! Come back!” I heard Mia call. 

I glanced back and saw Mia charging after me. Ray, Ethan, and Kara 
were chasing me too. 

I didn’t slow down. I followed the winding path down the hill. I ran 
right past my house and kept on running. 

“Jack! Come back!” Mia shouted. 

I shot another glance over my shoulder. They were catching up. 

I ran harder. Past some darkened houses that were set back in the hill, 
hidden behind trees. 

I picked up speed as the road continued to curve downward. 
Practically flying down now. My toes jammed against the front of my 
sneakers as I ran. I couldn’t stop if I wanted to. 

I ran until the road leveled out at the bottom of the hill—where a fence 
stretched out for miles, separating the beach from the road. 

I darted across the road and charged through the fence. 

“Jack! Jack!” My friends’voices drifted down the hillside, over the 
steady roar of the ocean in front of me. 

I peered up and down the stretch of beach. Staring at house after 
house. They sprawled out on the high part of the beachfront, with steps that 
led down to the sand. Lights from the houses washed over the sand, making 
the beach bright and silvery. 

No place to hide. 

No place... 

Suddenly, an idea flashed into my mind. 

The abandoned Dorsey house. I could hide there. The Dorsey house 
used to be one of the most beautiful beach houses in Malibu. But no one 
had lived in it in years. Just a big, old wreck now. A great place to hide! 



“Jack! Where are you?” Mia’s voice floated over the fence. 

Better hurry. Before they catch up. 

I ran down the beach, past houses with swimming pools and tennis 
courts. I ran and ran—and finally, I came to the Dorsey house. 

I stopped and stared at it. What a wreck! 

The wide, two-story house once had a long awning that stretched all 
along the deck. But the awning had fallen from its poles. The torn canvas 
lay heaped on the deck, flapping in the ocean breeze. 

I stepped carefully. Several boards were missing from the deck. Others 
were cracked and broken. 

I leaped over a hole and made my way to the door. I turned the knob. 

The wooden door had swollen from the constant wetness. I had to ram 
my shoulder against it to get it to open. I ducked inside. 

“Jack! Where are you?” Ray’s voice rang out from the side of the 
house. 

I quietly closed the door behind me. 

An aroma of rotting wood and sour mold greeted me. I squinted in the 
darkness, trying to figure out what room I was in. 

I stood in an entranceway. Beyond it, in front of me, was a living 
room. Two chairs with ripped seat cushions stood against one wall. The 
back wall of the room was completely made of glass. Outside I could see 
the dark ocean waves crashing against the shore. 

To the left was a kitchen. To the right, a long hall. That’s where the 
bedrooms probably are, I thought, as I made my way slowly toward them, 
leaning one hand on the damp wall. 

“Jaaack. Jaaack.” My friends’shouts drifted through the closed 
windows. But they were fading now. Distant. 

I walked into a bedroom. Empty—except for a bare mattress on the 
floor that the Dorseys had left behind. 

Back in the hall, I groped the walls. Trying to find my way in the dark. 

I stumbled forward—and tripped. Over something big. It landed on the 
floor with a loud CRASH! 

I jumped back in fear. Then leaned over to see what it was. Just an old 
surfboard, I realized. I let out a long sigh. 

I moved back into the entranceway. Into the kitchen. The wooden floor 
creaked beneath my feet. 



A shaft of moonlight filtered in through the grimy windows. Some 
broken mugs lay on one of the counters. A child’s sand pail and shovel 
rested in a corner on the floor. 

I stood in the shaft of moonlight. 

I could hear the ocean waves pound against the shore. 

The wind began to howl outside. It whipped through the weathered 
boards of the old house. The wood creaked and groaned. 

I peered out the kitchen window and saw the clump of fallen awning 
shivering in the wind, like a ghost getting ready to rise. 

Something scampered across my feet. 

I let out a startled cry. 

A mouse? A rat? 

Something bigger? 

My entire body shuddered. 

This place was really creepy at night. 

It’s safe to leave now, I told myself. No more voices. They’re gone. 
They’re probably all back at Mia’s—eating birthday cake. 

I bet Wilson is on his third piece, I thought with disgust. 

I couldn’t wait to get home—to my nice, dry house. 

I walked slowly through the darkened kitchen, across the sagging 
floor. The planks groaned with each step I took. 

The door came into view. 

I was almost there. Almost out of this cold, creepy house. 

I took another step—and the floor broke away. 

The wooden planks crashed someplace below—as I plunged down into 
the gaping hole. 

My hands grabbed onto a jagged piece of floorboard. My legs dangled 
beneath me. 

“Help!” I screamed. 

But no one could hear me. 

I tried to pull myself up. Up out of the hole. The wooden planks under 
my hands creaked as I struggled to hoist myself up. And then the planks 
splintered. And broke. I dropped through the hole fast. Down. Straight 
down. 



6 


Into an underground pit? 

No. 

Into the basement. 

I landed hard on my hands and knees. 

Pain shot through my body. Then quickly faded. 

Luckily, the floor was soft and spongy from all the dampness, so I 
wasn’t really hurt. 

I took a deep breath—and choked on the bitter smell of mildew. Yuck! 
I could even taste it on my tongue. 

This was all Wilson’s fault! 

Wilson—always proving that he’s the best. 

Never giving me a break. 

Okay, okay. Forget about Wilson, I told myself. Calm down. You have 
to find a way out of this disgusting basement. 

I stood up and searched for stairs, a door, a window. But I couldn’t see 
a thing. Too dark. As if a heavy black blanket had been thrown over 
everything. 

My sneakers sank into the decaying floor as I made my way blindly 
through the room. 

My knee bumped into something. A chair? 

I reached down and ran my hands over it. Yes, a chair. 

Good. If there’s a chair down here, maybe I can stand on it. Climb 
back up into the kitchen. Or climb out a basement window. 

I moved slowly through the room. I sloshed through a deep puddle. 
The cold water seeped through my sneakers. 

I’m going to get you for this, Wilson. 

I tripped over a table—and something crashed to the floor. I heard 
glass shatter. 

And then I heard a splash. 

My heart skipped a beat. 

Another animal? Another mouse or rat? 



I didn’t want to think about it. My temples began to pound. 

How was I going to get out of here? 

Should I scream for help? 

Who would hear me down here? No one—that’s who. 

On trembling legs, I moved through the room. Hands out in front of 
me. Groping in the dark. 

I stumbled into another table. I ran my hands over it. No—not a table. 
More like a bench. A workbench. My hands brushed across its top. I felt a 
hammer, a screwdriver, and—a candle! 

My fingers scrambled over the workbench, searching for a match to 
light it. I groped my way across the entire workbench. 

No matches. 

I backed away from the bench—and my sneaker rolled over something 
round. Something round—like a flashlight! 

I picked it up. Yes! A flashlight! 

My fingers shook as I fumbled for the switch. 

Please work. Please work. Please work. 

I flicked it on. 

A pale yellow beam of light reached weakly into the gloom. 

The flashlight was dim—but I could see! 

“I’m out of here!” I cheered. 

I swept the weak beam of light in front of me. I had fallen into a small 
room. Thick cobwebs draped the peeling walls. 

A rusty washing machine and clothes dryer sat in one corner. A small, 
wooden table and a smashed lamp lay on the floor in front of them. 

I moved the light closer—and saw a battered camp trunk. I ran my 
hand over the lid. Yuck. It was covered with a thick layer of damp, smelly 
mold. 

The trunk’s rusted hinges creaked as I lifted the top. I pointed my 
flashlight beam inside. Nothing in there. Nothing but an old book. 

I read the title out loud —“Flying Lessons. ” 

I flipped through the yellowed pages, searching for pictures of 
airplanes. I love airplanes. But there wasn’t a single plane inside. 

The pages were filled with old-fashioned drawings—of humans flying 
through the air. 

People of all ages—men with white beards, women in long dresses, 



children in funny, old clothing—all soaring through the sky. 

What a strange, old book. 

I flipped through more pages—until I heard another splash. 

I swept my flashlight over the floor—and gasped. 

“Ohhhhh. Nooooo.” A low wail escaped my lips. 

I moved the pale light back and forth, hoping I wasn’t seeing what I 
was seeing. 

But even in the dim light, I could see the dark bodies, the tiny eyes 
glowing red, the open-toothed jaws. 

Rats! 

Dozens of rats. Scuttling across the floor. Moving in on me. 

I leaped back. 

I gaped in horror as they closed in. 

Sharp toenails clicked against the floor. Scraggly tails swished through 
the filthy puddles as they scurried forward. 

A gray sea of rats. 

I froze in terror. I gripped the flashlight tightly to stop it from shaking. 

The rats snapped their jaws. They began to hiss. The ugly sound 
echoed off the damp walls of the small room. 

Dozens of tiny red eyes glowed up at me. 

The hissing grew louder. Louder. Jaws snapped. Tails swished back 
and forth. The creatures scuttled over one another, eager to get to me. 

And then a big fat rat darted out to the front of the pack. It glared up at 
me hungrily with glowing red eyes. It bared sharp fangs. 

I tried to back away. But I hit the wall. 

Nowhere to run. 

The rat uttered a shrill cry. It pulled back on its hind legs—and sprang 
forward. 



7 


“Noooo!” I screamed and tried to dodge away. 

The rat clawed at the bottom of my shorts. 

It held on for a second, gnashing its teeth. Then it lost its hold and slid 
to the floor with a wet plop. 

Another rat leaped to attack. 

I thrashed my leg wildly—and kicked the rat across the room. 

Red eyes glowed up at me. The hissing grew to a shrill siren. 

I batted rats away with the old book. I swept my flashlight across the 
room, frantically searching for a way out. 

There! A narrow staircase across the room! 

I ran for it. Stepping into the sea of rats. Stomping hard on them— 
flattening their scraggly tails. 

Claws scraped against my bare legs as I ran. Two rats clung to my 
sneakers as I charged up the stairs. 

I kicked the rats off. Heard their bodies thumping wetly onto the floor. 

Then I staggered the rest of the way up. Hurtled to the door. And out. 
Out into the fresh air. Gasping. My heart pounding. Sucking in breath after 
breath of the salty, ocean air. 

I ran all the way home. I didn’t stop until I came to my house. Panting 
hard, I collapsed on the front lawn. 

I stared into the living-room window. The lamps glowed through the 
sheer white drapes. I could see Mom and Dad inside. 

I started to go in—when I realized that I still clutched the book. 

Uh-oh. I knew that Mom and Dad would be upset if they knew I took 
something that didn’t belong to me. Worse than that, they’d start asking me 
a thousand questions: 

Where did you get the book? 

What were you doing in that abandoned house? 

Why weren’t you at the party? 

I can’t let them see it, I decided. 

My wet sneakers squeaked across the lawn as I made my way around 



back to the garage. 

I stepped carefully inside. We have the most cluttered garage in town. 
My dad likes to collect things. Lots of things. We can’t get our car inside 
the garage anymore. We can’t even close the door. 

I made my way around a dentist’s spit-sink and the aluminum steps to 
Mrs. Green’s old swimming pool. I hid the book inside a torn mattress, then 
went into the house. 

“Jack, is that you?” Mom called from the kitchen. 

“Uh-huh,” I answered, jogging upstairs before she saw me. I didn’t 
want to explain my wet, muddy shorts. Shorts that weren’t even mine! 

“How was the party?” Mom called. 

“Um. Okay,” I called back. “I left a little early.” 

“We’ll be back tonight, Jack.” Dad met me on the front lawn. It was 
the next morning, and Mom and Dad were getting ready to leave on an all¬ 
day trip. 

Dad patted me on the shoulder. “This is going to be our lucky trip. The 
BIG one. The really BIG one. I can feel it.” 

Dad is always saying that. He’s a talent agent. But he doesn’t have any 
really big acts. Nobody famous. Just a few actors with small parts. One 
plays a train conductor on a TV show. Every week he has the same line. 
“All aboard.” That’s it. “All aboard.” Week after week. 

And he is Dad’s most famous client. 

So Dad spends most of his time searching for the BIG one. The act 
that will become famous and make Dad a lot of money. 

Today Mom and Dad were driving to Anaheim to listen to a new 
musical group. 

“I hope they aren’t crazy,” I said to Dad. Last week a real nut 
auditioned for Dad. She played a Beethoven symphony by banging on her 
head. After two notes, she knocked herself out—and Dad had to take her to 
the hospital. 

“No. This group sent me a tape.” Dad’s eyes lit up. “And they sound 
really great.” 

Mom hurried out of the house and headed toward the car. “Come on, 
Ted,” she called to Dad. “We don’t want to be late. I left dinner in the fridge 
for you, Jack. See you later!” 



Morty and I watched Mom and Dad drive off. We played catch with a 
Frisbee—until the phone rang. 

It was Mia. 

“I—I’m sorry I mined your party,” I stammered. 

“No problem,” she replied cheerfully. “You didn’t ruin my party at all. 
We all went back inside and had a great time.” 

“Oh. Okay. So—what are you doing today?” I asked. “Want to go 
Rollerblading?” 

I love Rollerblading. I can speed around sharp turns on one foot. And I 
skate faster than everyone in the whole neighborhood—including Wilson. 

“Sure! That’s why I called!” she exclaimed. “Wilson got these new 
blades. With balls underneath instead of wheels. They’re much faster than 
the regular kind.” 

“Oh. I just remembered. I can’t go skating,” I told her. “I have to stay 
home and—water the plants.” 

Mia hung up. 

I peeked out through the living room window. I watched Wilson’s 
house across the street. Waited for Wilson to leave—with his new, stupid 
in-line skates. 

A few seconds later, he sped down his driveway and rolled down the 
block in a blur. 

I let out a long sigh and shuffled outside. 

“Come on, Morty!” I snatched the Frisbee from the lawn. “Catch, 
boy!” 

I tossed the Frisbee. 

Morty let it soar over his head. 

He didn’t budge. 

Great. Now what? 

“Hey! Morty—I know. Let’s go find that big book I brought home.” 

Morty followed me to the garage. I slipped my hands into the lumpy 
mattress and pulled it out. I lugged the book into the kitchen. 

I started to read it—and gasped in amazement. 

“Morty—I don’t believe this!” 



8 


“Wow! Morty! I can fly!” 

Morty cocked his furry head at me. 

“I know it sounds weird, boy. But it says so right here!” I pointed to 
the page I was reading. “Humans can fly!” 

Wait a minute. Am I crazy? Have I totally lost it? People cannot fly. 

Morty jumped up on a kitchen chair. He stared down at the book. At a 
picture of a young girl. With arms stretched out to her sides, she sailed 
through the air—her long, blond hair flowing behind her. 

Morty glanced up at me. Peered back down at the page. Then he 
whimpered and bolted from the room. 

“Come back, Morty. Don’t you want to learn to fly?” I laughed. 
“Morty—The First and Only Flying Dog!” 

I turned back to the book and read: 

“For as long as humans have walked the earth, they have yearned to 
fly. To float like an angel. To glide like a bat. To soar like a mighty bird of 
prey. 

“All a dream. A hopeless dream—until now. 

“The ancient secret of human flight is a simple one. 

“You need only three things: the daring to try, an imagination that 
soars, and a good mixing bowl.” 

Hey—! I stared at the page. I had those things. Maybe I should give it 
a try. I had nothing better to do today. I read on. 

There, on the next page, the book told exactly what you needed to do 
to fly. 

It gave some exercises to practice. And a magical mixture you had to 
eat. 

Learn the Motion, Eat the Potion —that’s what it said. 

Finally it gave an ancient chant to recite. 

And that was it. The secret of flying—right there. 

Yeah, right. I rolled my eyes. 

I scanned the list of ingredients I would need to make the potion. The 
main ingredient was yeast—“because yeast rises.” 



Hmmm. Yeast does rise. Maybe this really would work. Maybe I really 
could learn to fly. 

If I could—it would be awesome. I would soar through the sky—just 
like my superheroes. 

I could fly, I thought dreamily as I searched the pantry for the yeast. 
Something Wilson couldn’t do in a million years! 

And, boy, would Mia be impressed. 

I could hear her now. “Oh, wow! Oh, wow! Oh, wow!” she would 
scream as I flew into the sky, leaving Wilson down on the ground—like a 
bug. 

I’m going to do it right now! I’m going to learn how to fly! 

Of course I knew it was crazy. But what if it worked? What if it really 
worked? 

I turned to the page with the exercises. “Step One,” I read out loud. 
“Hold your arms straight out in front of you. Bend your knees slightly. Now 
take fifty little hops in this position.” 

I did it. I felt like an idiot, but I did it. 

“Step Two. Sit on the floor. Place your left foot on your right shoulder. 
Then lift your right leg and tuck it behind your head.” 

This was harder to do. A lot harder. I tugged my left foot up until it 
reached my shoulder. A sharp pain shot down my side. But I wasn’t giving 
up. 

I lifted my right leg up, up, up to my chin—then I lost my balance and 
rolled onto my back! 

I tried it again. This time I rolled to the side. 

Learning to fly wasn’t going to be as easy as I thought. 

I tried one more time—and got it. 

But now I was stuck—all twisted up. My left foot perched on my right 
shoulder, with my toes jammed in my ears. My other foot pressed against 
the back of my head—shoving my face into my chest. 

I struggled to untangle myself. 

I stopped struggling when I heard someone laugh. 

And realized I wasn’t alone. 



9 


“What... are... you... doing?” 

“Ray, is that you?” I tried to look up, but I couldn’t. My chin was 
slammed tight against my chest. 

“Yes, it’s me. Ethan is here, too. What are you doing?” he repeated. 

“He must be practicing for Twister,” Ethan suggested. 

They both laughed. 

“Very funny, guys,” I said. “Can you pull me apart? I think I’m stuck.” 

Ray and Ethan untangled me. “Whoa, that feels better,” I said, 
stretching out my arms and legs. 

“So—what were you doing?” Ethan asked the question this time. 

“Exercising,” I mumbled. “I was exercising. To... uh... improve my 
tennis game.” 

“Whoa. Those were pretty weird exercises.” Ethan’s eyebrows arched 
way up. 

“He wasn’t exercising for tennis!” Ray exclaimed. “He doesn’t even 
play tennis!” 

“I’m thinking of taking it up,” I said quickly. 

Ray narrowed his eyes at me. He didn’t believe me. But he didn’t ask 
any more questions. 

“Want to shoot some hoops in the playground?” Ethan asked. 

I didn’t want to go anywhere. 

I wanted to stay home. Alone. And see if I could fly. 

“No, I have to stay home with Morty,” I lied. “He’s not feeling well.” 

Morty heard his name and charged full speed into the kitchen. He 
leaped on Ray and licked his face. 

“He looks okay to me,” Ray said, narrowing his eyes at me again. 

“No problem. We can stay here,” Ethan suggested. “Toss a football 
around or something.” 

Ethan glanced around the kitchen. His eyes fell on the book. 

“No. Sorry. I really can’t hang out,” I said, tossing the book in the 
trash can. “I have to clean up the kitchen.” I turned to the counter and 



wiped it with a sponge. Then I began lining up the spices in the spice rack 
—labels facing out. 

“And I have to stay inside anyway. To wait for Mom and Dad to call. 
They’re away. They said to sit by the phone.” 

“Why?” Ethan asked. “What’s so important?” 

“They wouldn’t tell me. They said it’s a surprise.” I shrugged my 
shoulders. 

“Okay, see you later—maybe,” Ray said. Both guys were shaking their 
heads as they left. 

I grabbed the book out of the garbage and flipped back to the exercise 
page. 

I read the flapping and leaping exercises next. I did them all. 

Now it was time to say the magic words. 

I read them to myself first. To make sure I got them right. Then I 
recited them out loud, slowly. 

Hishram hishmar shah shahrom shorn. 

I climbed up on the kitchen chair—and jumped off. To see if I felt 
different. Lighter. Floaty. 

I landed with a hard thud. 

Guess I need to eat the special flying food for the full effect, I decided. 
I turned back to the book. 

It was time to start mixing. 

In a cabinet next to the refrigerator, I found our good mixing bowl. I 
dumped all the ingredients into it: 10 egg yolks, 1 tablespoon of maple 
syrup, 2 cups of flour, 1/2 cup of seltzer, and 4 tablespoons of yeast. 

I stirred. A lumpy yellow blob of dough started to form. 

I turned the page to read the next step. 

“You are about to embark on the most glorious adventure in the history 
of time,” I read out loud. “You alone will fly with the falcons. You alone 
will sail toward the sun. Are you ready?” 

I nodded yes. 

“You say, yes?” 

I nodded yes again. 

“You are wrong. You are not ready. Turn the page.” 

I turned the page—to the last page in the book. 

“Empty one quarter of contents of envelope into bowl. Mix well.” 



Envelope! What envelope? 

The rest of the page was blank—except for a tiny spot of dried glue. 

I ran my finger over the glue spot. That’s where the envelope had 
been. 

But where was it now? 

I shook the book frantically. 

Nothing fell out. 

“Oh, no,” I groaned. “No envelope... no envelope...” 

Wait! I know! 

I ran over to the trash can. 

There it was! 

A small black envelope. It must have fallen out when I tossed the book 
into the trash. 

I opened it up. Measured one quarter of the bright blue powder inside 
—and dropped it into the bowl. 

I mixed well. 

The yellow blob of dough turned green. Then it began to grow and 
bubble. Small bubbles at first—popping lightly on the surface. Then larger 
ones—growing from deep inside the dough. Rising to the surface. Bursting 
open with a loud PLOP. 

PLOP PLOP PLOP 
Yuck! 

I stood back. 

The dough began to throb—like a beating heart. 

I watched in horror as it started to gurgle. 

I gulped. 

What was in that envelope? Maybe it was some kind of poison! 

Forget about flying. No way am I eating this gross garbage! I decided. 
No way. 



10 


I grabbed the sides of the bowl—to dump the mixture into the trash. But I 
snatched my hands back when the dough flopped over, all by itself. 

It flopped again and again, each time making a sickening sucking 
sound. 

My stomach lurched. 

I reached out again—and the phone rang. 

“We’re on our way home, Jack.” Dad was calling from the car. He 
sounded disappointed. 

“So soon?” I asked. “What happened?” 

“The band members had a big fight. They called us in the car. They 
said don’t bother coming to Anaheim. They broke up the act.” I heard Dad 
sigh. 

“Wow, Dad. I don’t know what to say.” 

“Not to worry, Jack. I still feel lucky. Don’t know why. But I do. The 
BIG one is coming. I can feel it. We’re on the freeway. Should be home in 
half an hour,” he said. Then he hung up. 

Ugh. I better dump this stuff before they get back, I told myself. 

I turned to the kitchen table—and shrieked in horror. “Morty—no! 
NO! What have you done?” 



11 


“Morty! DOWN!” I screamed. 

Morty stood on the kitchen chair. 

His front paws rested on the table. 

His head dipped into the mixing bowl—as he swallowed a big glob of 
green dough. 

“NO, Morty! DOWN!” I screamed again. 

Morty lifted his head. 

He licked his chops. 

Then dove into the bowl for another bite. 

I sprang across the room. 

I peered down into the bowl. 

“Oh, noooo!” I howled. Almost half the dough was gone! 

“Morty! What did you do!” I pulled his head out of the bowl. 

Morty stared up at me—his eyes wide with guilt. His ears drooped 

low. 

He whimpered softly. Then he dipped his head back into the bowl for 
another bite. 

I scooped him off the chair. 

Carried him into the living room—and gasped as he floated up out of 
my hands. 

I stared in disbelief as Morty floated through the room. Back into the 
kitchen. 

“Morty—you’re flying!” I cried. 

It worked! I couldn’t believe it! My cocker spaniel was FLYING! 

I followed him—in a daze. 

Followed him as he floated over the kitchen table. 

Watched in amazement as he flew out the open window. 

“Morty!” I cried, jolted back to reality. “Wait!” 

Morty let out a sharp yelp—then sailed up, up into the sky. 

I ran outside—and gazed up. 

Morty soared above the house. 



Floating higher and higher. 

“Morty—no! Morty!” I screamed. “Morty—come back!” 

His legs thrashed as he floated over the treetops. He started barking, 
shrill, sharp yelps of terror. 

“Morty—! Morty—!” 

I watched him sail up, his body rocked by the wind, his legs 
scrambling as if trying to grab hold of something. 

“Oh, nooooo!” I wailed, staring helplessly. 

I’ve got to get him back! I’ve got to rescue Morty! 

But how? 



12 


I knew how. 

I knew how to rescue my dog. And I knew I had no choice. 

I ran in to the house. 

I plunged my hand into the bowl. Grabbed up a big chunk of the 
disgusting mixture. 

Yuck! I can’t eat this! IT FEELS SO SLIMY! 

You have to eat it, I ordered myself. You have to save Morty. It’s the 
only way! 

The dough throbbed and gurgled in my palm. 

A thin mist of steam rose up from my fingers. 

“Ohhh,” I groaned as I shoved a fistful of the stuff into my mouth. 

I clutched my throat. I started to gag. 

It tasted sour and hot. It scorched my tongue. 

I choked it down. 

And grabbed up another glob. 

Shoved it into my mouth. Swallowed hard. 

My mouth and tongue swelled. Swelled with the horrible, bitter taste. 

I shoved in another handful. I had to make sure I could fly like Morty. 

I could feel the mixture throbbing as it slid down my throat. 

Gagging, I ran back outside. 

I gazed up into the sky. 

Morty flew high over the trees. His cries drifted down to the ground. 

I could see his legs still flailing wildly as he floated higher and higher. 
He looked so small up there. 

Just a dark speck in the sky now. 

“I’m coming, Morty!” I cupped my hands around my mouth and 
yelled. “Don’t worry, boy. I’ll save you!” 

I raised my arms up to the sky. 

“I WILL FLY!” I cried out. “FLY!” 

I took a strong leap. 

Nothing happened. 



13 


Speed. 

That’s it. 

I need to build up speed. 

I ran around my backyard. I circled it three times. 

Faster and faster. 

My sneakers ripped the grass. I ran hard, as hard as I could. 

Sweat poured down my face. 

I’m ready. I’m definitely ready now, I thought, gasping for air. 

I raised my arms over my head. 

I leaped high. 

And came down. 

Nothing. 

“I don’t get it!” I wailed. “Why can’t I—” 

I know! The exercises! 

The hopping exercises. That must be it! 

I stretched my arms straight in front of me. 

Then I took offhopping around the backyard on both feet at super warp 
speed. 

HOP. HOP. HOP. 

HOP. HOP. HOP. 

I hopped around the backyard like a crazed bunny. 

This is it. I’m ready. I know it, I thought, hopping frantically. 

“Morty! I’m coming!” 

Still hopping, I bent my knees to lower myself. 

Still hopping, I lifted my arms up over my head. 

Then, with one mighty hop, I launched myself off the ground. 

And came back down. 

“What’s wrong?” I struggled to breathe. “Why can’t I fly like Morty?” 
Morty! 

I gazed up. Morty drifted in front of a cloud—a tiny black speck now. 
“Oooh, Morty! Come back!” I cried—and a horrible taste flooded my 



mouth. The bitter taste of the dough. 

I could feel it throbbing in my stomach. Churning. 

I could hear it gurgling in there. 

Bubbling up. Up through my chest. Into my throat. Into my mouth. 

I burped— 

—and took off! 

My feet blasted off the ground—and I shot high into the air. 

I was flying! 

“I can’t believe it! I’m flying. I’m really flying! Like a superhero.” 
“Whooooa!” I thrashed my arms and legs wildly. I rose up and up— 
out of control! 

I floated over my house. 

Over the trees. 

Over the hills of Malibu. I could see the blue ocean, sparkling far 
below. 

Morty continued to sail up. Up and away from me. 

“Morty, I’m coming!” I shouted. 

I kept my eyes locked on Morty. I tried to aim my body in his 
direction. 

“Whooooa!” I did a somersault in the air. I whirled over and over. And 
stopped—with my head pointed down and my feet sticking up. 

The wind pulled me higher. I couldn’t flip around. My feet were still 
straight up. All the blood was rushing down to my head! 

I floated higher. Up through a cloud. 

I gasped for air. I struggled to turn. Suddenly, I felt faint. 

Superheroes don’t fly feet first! I scolded myself. Do something! 

I brought my knees to my chest—and my body spun around. 

It worked. I was right-side up. 

But now Morty was behind me. 

I twisted in the air—struggling to turn, struggling to catch sight of him. 
Yes! I could see Morty—floating even higher. 

I floated up, up—toward him. 

Closer... closer. 

“Hold on, Morty,” I called. “I’m almost there!” 

I felt a rush of wind in my face. 



Two robins soared past, swooping out of my path. 

I peered down. My house and garage looked like toys—so tiny. 
Wilson’s house looked even smaller than mine. Ha! 

I was flying! I couldn’t believe it! I was really, really flying. 

I floated up. Close to Morty. He stared at me, whimpering, his whole 
body trembling as he floated. 

“Hold on, boy.” I stretched out my hands. But I couldn’t reach him. 

I floated closer. I tried to pick up speed, but I didn’t know how. All I 
could do was float on the air currents. Float in the direction they carried me. 
I grabbed for the dog again. Missed. 

He floated two or three feet from my grasp. 

I’m going to lose Morty forever! I thought. 

A stiff breeze picked me up. 

I shot ahead on it. But so did Morty. 

I could hear his terrified whimpers as he floated up toward the blazing 

sun. 

I floated closer... closer. I stretched out my hands again. I could 
almost touch him now. Almost. 

It was so hot up here. I felt as if I were burning up. And poor Morty. 
His little body heaved in the heat. 

His head drooped limply. His tongue sagged out. 

He wasn’t going to make it! 

I floated closer. I reached out again... and... GOT HIM! 

I pulled Morty into my arms. His entire body shook. I held him snugly 
against my chest—and gazed down as I floated higher... higher. 

HIGHER. 

Oh, no! 

A terrifying thought suddenly gripped me. 

I’m just going to keep floating higher. And higher I don’t know how to 
get down! 



14 


I drifted higher. 

My temples pounded. 

The world beneath me began to shrink—smaller and smaller. 

I could barely make out my house now—it looked as if it could fit in 
the palm of my hand. In the distance, the ocean stretched like a blue carpet. 
The beach was a slender yellow ribbon. 

I felt dizzy. Sick. 

Morty gazed down and whimpered. 

“It’s okay, boy,” I told him. “We’re going home now.” 

But how? HOW? 

I shifted Morty into one arm. I stretched out my other arm. Pointed it 
to my right. 

I swerved to the right! 

Hey—not bad! 

I pointed to my left—and flew to the left! 

This was great! 

I pointed my arm down. 

Whoaaa! I started to dive. 

I brought my arm up quickly—and soared straight ahead. 

If I held my feet tightly together, I picked up speed. When I separated 
them slightly—I slowed down. 

Awesome! 

I sailed through the sky. I floated. Glided. Drifted. Soared. I even flew 
on my back! 

I let the breeze gently lift me up. Then I lowered my arm and swooped 
down, then up again. 

I gazed at the hills below. At the houses that nested in them. 

The houses seemed to dot the hills in a perfect pattern—right down to 
the beach front. 

I could see Mrs. Green’s pool—the size of a postage stamp from up 
here. A sparkling blue postage stamp. 



And the ocean—the ocean! I flew low over the waves, holding Morty 
tightly, feeling the cold, refreshing spray on my face. 

Then I soared back up to the hills. Funny, I thought. Gazing at the 
world from way up here should seem scary. But it isn’t scary at all. 

In fact, it feels safer. Calmer. Not as confusing as when you’re in it, 
down below. 

I held my feet tightly together and soared over my school. 

“Hey! Morty! Look who’s on the playground! There’s Ray and Ethan! 
Shooting baskets.” 

I swooped low behind some treetops, then flew toward home. I didn’t 
want Ray and Ethan to see me. I didn’t want to show them that I could fly 
—not yet. 

I wanted to show Mia first. Mia. Wait till she sees this, I thought, 
soaring higher. 

And wait till Wilson sees me fly. HA! This will shut him up— 
FOREVER! 

I floated through the air, dreaming about all the things I would do— 
now that I could fly. 

I gazed down at my house. 

And saw our car roll up the driveway. “Oh no, Morty! Mom and Dad 
are home! ” 

Did they see me? 

If they did, I was doomed. 

They would think it was way too dangerous up here. 

They would never let me fly. 

Please, please—don’t let them see me! I prayed. 

“Hey—look up there! ” I heard Dad cry. 



15 


I swooped down behind the garage. 

I placed Morty gently on the ground. 

“What did you see?” I heard Mom ask Dad. 

“A bird on the garage roof,” Dad replied. “I thought it was a condor.” 

“They’re so rare,” Mom commented, slamming the car door. 

Whew! I breathed a sigh of relief. They hadn’t seen me. 

“Hey—!” I gasped when I realized that Morty had started to rise up 
again. “Down, boy! Down!” I cried. I tied the end of his leash to a small 
rock. 

He took a few wobbly steps. He didn’t have any trouble walking with 
the rock. And it was just the right size to keep him grounded. He headed 
straight for his doghouse. 

I charged into the kitchen. 

What a mess. 

Powdery trails of yeast and flour stained the kitchen floor. Cracked 
eggshells sat in a slimy puddle of yolk on the table. And globs of the 
horrible green dough stuck to the kitchen chairs, the counters—everywhere. 

I could hear Mom and Dad unlocking the front door. 

No time to clean up. 

I tucked the small black envelope into the flying book. And I ran out 
the back door with the book. I tore out to the garage and slid the book back 
into the folds of the old mattress. 

“Jack! We’re home!” Dad shouted through the house. 

“Where are yoooou?” I heard Mom call. 

“Hi, Mom! Hi, Dad!” I burst through the back door, into the kitchen. 

“Whoa! What happened in here?” Dad gazed around the room, wide- 
eyed. 

Mom sniffed the air. “What is that horrible smell?” 

“In here?” I stalled, trying to come up with a good excuse. 

Mom and Dad nodded, staring at me. Waiting for an explanation. 

“Oooh, you mean in here,” I said, sweeping an arm through the air. 



“Uh... just a science experiment. For school. It didn’t quite work out.” 


I woke up really early the next morning. I wanted to try to fly again. 
Before school. Before Mom and Dad woke up. 

I dressed quickly. I walked silently into the kitchen. 

“Hey, Jack! You’re up early!” Dad sat at the kitchen table, eating 
breakfast. “It’s only five a.m.!” 

“I—I couldn’t sleep,” I said, shocked to find him there. “What are you 
doing up?” 

“The phone woke me up. It was a guy who said he had an act I had to 
see—‘ Nelson and His Amazing Needles’.” 

“Amazing Needles.” I gulped. “What does this guy do?” 

“Well, Nelson is not a guy,” Dad started to explain. “Nelson is a 
chimpanzee. And his needles are knitting needles. His owner says Nelson 
can knit a sweater in ten minutes. Sleeves and all.” 

A monkey that knits? I let out a long sigh. 

Dad sighed, too. 

“Well, the phone call wasn’t a total waste. At least I’ll get an early start 
today,” Dad said, finishing his breakfast. 

By the time he left, Mom was out of bed. Too late to try to fly now. 

I’ll have to wait till after school. Mom will be at work. Dad won’t be 
home either. That’s when I’ll fly for Mia, I decided. 

I couldn’t wait! 

When the last bell rang, I charged out of school before Mia and Wilson 
could catch up. 

I didn’t talk to them all day. I didn’t want to talk to them now. I was 
afraid I might give away my secret. Afraid I might tell them that I could fly. 
And I didn’t want to do that. 

I wanted to show them! 

I ran all the way home. I threw down my backpack. Poured myself a 
tall glass of orange juice. For strength. 

Then I phoned Mia. 

No answer. She wasn’t home yet. 

I’ll give her ten more minutes, I thought, heading into my bedroom. 
Then I’ll call again. 



I sat down at my desk and started sketching my newest superhero— 
ME! I drew myself soaring high over the Hollywood Hills. Sailing way 
above the big HOLLYWOOD sign. 

Maybe I should tell Mom and Dad I can fly, I thought as I sketched. 
That way I won’t have to hide. That way I can fly whenever I want. 

No. No way! I decided. They’ll think it’s way too dangerous. They’ll 
probably think I’m weird, that there is something wrong with me. And they 
won’t let me do it. I definitely cannot tell them. I have to keep this a secret. 

I held my drawing up and studied it. It needed one last thing. Then it 
would be perfect. A superhero cape. As I sketched in the cape, I thought 
about Wilson. 

Wilson—and the sick look on his face when he realized that our 
competition was over for all time. 

When he realized that he could never win against me again—ever! 

When he saw me flying! 

I jumped up from my desk and phoned Mia. 

Still no answer. 

I wandered over to my bedroom window and peered outside. 

Hey! There she was! In front of Wilson’s house. With Wilson. 

Wilson was skating down his driveway on his fancy, new in-line 
skates. At the end of the driveway, he had set up a small ramp—and he was 
rolling full-speed straight for it. 

He flew up the ramp—and soared into the air. “Yahoo!” he shouted, 
shooting his fists up as he swooped down for a perfect landing. 

Mia applauded. 

Ha! You think that’s flying, Wilson? I thought. Your days of showing 
off are over. Watch this! 

I opened my window as high as I could. 

I marched across my room—through the bedroom doorway and out 
into the hall. 

I inhaled deeply—and took a running start. 

I charged through my bedroom. 

I leaped out my bedroom window. 

I spread my arms wide. 

And fell like a rock. 



16 


“Oooof!” 

I landed on my back in the soft hedges below my window. 

The fall knocked the breath out of me. I lay there dazed for about a 
minute, my chest aching, struggling to breathe. 

I moved my arms and legs. They seemed to be okay. Nothing broken. 

What went wrong? Can I still fly? I wondered. 

Maybe the secret recipe lasts for only one flight. 

Or maybe I have to take off from the ground. That could be it. Maybe 
I’m not supposed to leap into flight. 

“Jack! Are you okay?” Mia ran over to me. “What happened? Did you 
fall out of the window?” 

“Nobody falls out a bedroom window—nobody, but Jack!” Wilson 
hooted. “How klutzy do you have to be to fall out a window?” 

“I did not fall out my bedroom window,” I protested. I didn’t know 
what else to say. 

“Yes, you did, Jack. We saw you. We saw the whole thing.” Wilson 
snickered. He turned to Mia with a smirk on his face. “Bet Jack was 
practicing Twister again.” 

I climbed to my feet. I stared down as I brushed myself off. Stared 
down so I wouldn’t have to look at either one of them. 

“Jack, come with me.” Wilson tugged my arm. “I want to show you 
something. Something really important. It could save your life one day. It’s 
called a door.” 

Mia giggled. 

I knocked Wilson’s hand away. 

I could feel the blood mshing to my face. 

Okay, Wilson. That’s it! I’ve had enough of you—you and your 
bragging and your stupid jokes. 

I took a deep breath. 

“I want to show you both something,” I announced. 

I placed my feet close together. 



I lifted my arms and pointed them in the air. 

I hope this works, I prayed. I hope I don’t look like a total jerk. 
I raised myself up on my toes. 

Here goes... 



17 


I bent my knees. 

I took a deep breath. I shut my eyes. 

Prepared to take off... 

“Jack? Jack? Where are you?” a voice called. 

“Huh?” I opened my eyes. I lowered my arms slowly. 

“Jack?” It was Mom. Home early from work. She poked her head out 
my bedroom window. 

I let out a long sigh. “What is it, Mom?” 

“Jack, I meant to catch you before you went out. This spring cleaning 
is too much for one person. I need some help cleaning Dad’s closet. Can 
you come in and give me a hand?” 

“Okay, Mom. Be right there.” 

Mom ducked back inside. “Jack?” Mom popped her head back out. 

“Yeah?” 

“Is Morty okay? He hasn’t left his doghouse since yesterday.” 

“Don’t worry, Mom. He’s okay. He got a lot of exercise yesterday. 
He’s just kind of pooped.” 

Actually, I tried to get Morty to come out of his doghouse this 
morning. But he wouldn’t budge. The poor dog was probably afraid he’d 
float away again. 

Wilson headed back to his house. Mia followed. She turned back to 
me. “Meet us after you’re finished helping your mom,” she suggested. 
“Over at Wilson’s.” 

“Yeah, sure,” I said, not really planning to. 

“You have to try his skating ramp,” Mia said. “He built it himself, and 
it’s really awesome. It really sends you flying through the air.” 

I watched them cross the street. 

Flying through the air —Mia’s words repeated in my mind. I shook my 
head. 

I’ll show you how to fly through the air, Wilson. Just wait. 



18 


The next afternoon, I ran all the way home from school. I told Mia and Jack 
to meet me in front of my house. They thought we were going to 
Rollerblade. 

Ha! I had something much better in mind for today. 

Today was the day I was going to show them that I could fly! 

I dropped my backpack in the hall and ran outside. I glanced up—at 
the dark, heavy clouds rolling in over the hills. 

By the time Mia and Jack showed up, it started to rain—really hard. A 
bolt of lightning snaked through the sky. 

“We’ll have to wait until tomorrow,” Mia said. 

“I guess,” I mumbled as I watched them hurry away. 

It rained the next day. And the day after that. And the day after that. 

No flying. 

No chance to show Wilson what a loser he is. I sat at the window, 
staring out at the falling raindrops. Was I ever going to get my chance to 

fly? 


On Friday, Mia had to go to the dentist after school. 

And on Saturday and Sunday, we couldn’t get together. I had to work 
on my term paper. It was due on Monday—and I hadn’t even started it. 

I wasn’t worried about it. I knew exactly what I was going to write 
about—the history of comic books in the United States. 

It was going to be excellent. I knew it. 

I got up early Saturday morning and started working on it right away. I 
sat at my computer for hours. It took me all day to write. Then, on Sunday, I 
set out my pens and inks and began to illustrate it. 

Superman. Spider-Man. Sub-Mariner. The X-Men. All my favorite 
superheroes. 

As I drew the big S on Superman’s costume, I thought about flying. 
About how awesome it felt when I soared on a strong current. Or sailed on 
a gentle breeze. 

I pictured myself zooming up from the ground and streaking over the 



trees. Then slowing down. Drifting lazily among the clouds. Then blasting 
off again, into the stratosphere—like Superman. 

I pictured myself performing all kinds of fancy feats—spirals, 
nosedives, back flips in the air. I pictured myself doing all these things—for 
Mia. And for Wilson... 

We handed in our term papers on Monday. A rainy Monday. 

No flying today either. I sighed. Who ever heard of so much rain in 
California? 

The rest of the week remained gray and stormy. The whole week—a 
total washout. 

On Friday, the teacher handed back our term papers. 

Yes! 

I got a 97! And she wrote “Good job!” across the top. 

“Hey, Wilson. Look—ninety-seven!” I held up my paper for him to 
see. “Pretty good, huh!” 

“That is pretty good,” Wilson agreed. “But it’s not excellent!” Wilson 
smiled gleefully. 

He held up his paper. 

It had a big, fat 98 written on it. 

And the words, “Excellent job!” 

I could feel my cheeks begin to burn. Stay calm, I told myself. It won’t 
rain forever. 

I woke up the next morning. I bolted to the window. Pushed the 
curtains aside. The warm rays of the sun splashed across my face. 

All right! I pumped both fists into the air. 

I called Wilson and Mia and told them to meet me in the park. Right 
away. 

Mia arrived first. Wilson showed up a few minutes later, waving, 
excitedly. 

“Hey, guys—big news!” He charged over to us. “Guess where I’m 
going on spring break.” 

“Where?” Mia asked eagerly. 

“New York City!” he exclaimed. “My parents are taking me to New... 
York... City. Can you believe it?” 



“That’s great!” Mia cheered. She slapped him a high five. 

“Where are you going for spring break, Jackie?” Wilson asked. 

“Uh... nowhere. My parents have to work,” I murmured. 

“Hey—bad break,” Wilson said. But I could tell he didn’t mean it. “Of 
course, my trip is no big deal,” he went on. “I’ve been to New York before. 
Four times.” 

“Four times!” Mia cried. “Really?” 

“Yeah,” Wilson replied. “Four times. And the last time I was there, I 
rode the subway—by myself!” 

You’re right, Wilson, I thought. New York City is no big deal. Because 
no one is going to care about your bragging in a few seconds. 

“Hey, Wilson. Want to race?” I asked. “You can practice running for 
the subway.” 

“Not funny, Jackie,” Wilson replied. “Anyway, what’s the point of a 
race? You know you can’t run as fast as I can.” 

“Come on,” I urged. “Race you to the flagpole and back. I’ll beat you 
this time, Wilson. Really.” 

“No way you can win.” He shrugged. “But—okay.” 

This was it. 

My big moment. 

My heart began to pound. 

I was going to win the race. And shock them both—because I was 
going to fly! 

Wilson and I stood side by side. 

“On your mark. Get set—” Mia announced. 

I raised my arms high. Pointed them to the sky. Wilson turned to me, 
staring at my odd racing position. 

“GO!” Mia cried. 

I took a running leap—and blasted off the ground. I soared up—up 
over the grass. Into the air. Up toward the treetops. 

Yes! Yes! I was flying! 

“WHOOOAAA!” Mia shrieked in amazement as I soared with the 
wind. 

Now for the best part. 

I peered down to the ground to see the sick look on Wilson’s face. 

I peered down—and screamed in surprise. 



Below me, I saw Wilson. 
He was RIGHT below me. 
Inches away from me. 
Wilson was flying, too. 



19 


“NOOOOO!” I shrieked. “NO WAAAAY!” 

I was so shocked—so totally horrified—I dropped my arms to my 
sides. 

Oh, no... 

I went into a steep dive. 

I uttered a weak cry as the ground shot up to meet me—fast. 

I kicked my legs. Swung my arms up frantically. 

And flew headfirst into a tree trunk. 

“Ohhh.” Pain shot through my body as I sank to the grass. 

Sprawled on my back, I raised my eyes to Wilson. I clutched my 
stomach, sickened at the sight of him. 

Wilson—flying. Wilson—soaring easily to the flagpole and back. 

I watched as he gently swooped down. “I win, Jackie!” he exclaimed, 
making a smooth landing beside me. 

“How did you DO THAT?” Mia screamed with excitement. 

Wilson planted his hands on his hips. “Aw. It’s easy,” he bragged. 
“Nothing to it.” 

I opened my mouth to speak—but only a tiny squeak came out. 

Wilson laughed. “Jackie, you need some propellers or something. Your 
jets are kind of slow!” 

My heart sank. 

“How—how—?” I sputtered. 

“Oh, I’ve always known how to fly,” Wilson said. 

“REALLY?” Mia cried. 

“Not really,” he laughed. “Jackie taught me how.” 

“No. No, I didn’t!” I managed to choke out. 

“Yes, you did, Jack. You just didn’t know it!” Wilson hooted. “I saw 
you flying the day I got my new Rollerblades.” 

“How did you see him flying?” Mia demanded. “I was with you. How 
come I didn’t see him?” 

“Don’t you remember?” Wilson replied. “I was skating way ahead of 



you—because you couldn’t keep up with me. So I skated over to Jack’s 
house to show him my new blades—and I saw him fly.” 

I stood up slowly. 

I faced Wilson. Ready to punch out his lights. I admit it. I was out of 
control. 

He had ruined my big moment. Ruined it. 

I wanted to punch him like a punching bag. But somehow I kept 
myself together. I clenched my fists until they ached. 

I had to find out exactly how he learned to fly. “So—you saw me.” I 
narrowed my eyes. “Then what?” 

“Then I followed you to your garage. I saw you hide the book in the 
mattress. And so I... borrowed it. And I followed the easy instructions.” 

He grinned at Mia. “I’m like a real superhero.” He puffed out his 
chest. “I love it!” 

He turned back to me. “Hey, Jack! You can be my sidekick.” 

I DON’T WANT TO BE YOUR SIDEKICK, WILSON! I want to win. 
Just once. Just once, I want to beat you. 

That’s what I thought—but I didn’t say it. I didn’t say anything. I just 
stomped away. 

Face it, I told myself glumly as I headed out of the park. You’ll never 
beat Wilson at anything. 

“Jack—come back!” Mia called. “I want to see you fly again.” 

No way, I thought. What was the point now? I kept walking. 

“Please, Jack!” Mia cried. “You looked so awesome up there. Please 
do it again!” 

I stopped. 

Maybe I should fly for Mia. Impress her with some fancy flying 
maneuvers. 

Okay, I decided. I’ll fly one more time—to impress her. 

I took a deep breath. Then, with my arms stretched out in front of me, I 
zoomed up. Up to the treetops. 

“Go, Jack! Go, Jack! Go, Jack!” Mia chanted, smiling and waving. 

I banked to the left and glided through a big fluffy cloud. When I 
broke through the other side, Wilson was there to meet me. 

We flew side by side—looping, diving, then soaring back up. We 
matched movement for movement—as if we’d practiced together a 



thousand times. 

Then Wilson swooped away from me. 

He rolled under me. Jetted behind me. Rolled under me again. 

“Yahoo!” I heard him scream from somewhere above me. 

I floundered in the air. I didn’t know where Wilson was. Where he was 
going to turn up next. 

He circled me—like a mad bird. 

“Wilson!” I yelled. “Cut it out!” 

“Lighten up, Jackie!” he laughed. 

Then, he moved in front of me—blocking my path. Blocking my view. 

“Get out of the way!” I screamed. “I’m going to crash into you!” 

Wilson let out a roar, like a plane. Then took a steep dive. Now I could 

see. 

Too late. 

I smacked hard into a flagpole. 

I could hear Wilson’s cruel laugh as I tumbled to the ground. 

“Excellent landing, Jackie!” he called. He dropped easily to the grass 
in front of Mia. 

Mia clapped and cheered. 

“Well, I have to go! I’m late for my tennis game. Want to come?” 
Wilson asked me. 

“I don’t play tennis,” I replied between clenched teeth. 

“Oh. I thought you did,” he said, puzzled. “Ray and Ethan told me you 
were taking lessons. Well, got to go!” 

Wilson hurried off. 

“Jack—I want to fly too! Please teach me how to fly!” Mia begged. 

“I don’t know, Mia...” I started. “I wanted to keep this kind of secret. I 
mean—nobody knows about it. Except you and Wilson. If we’re all flying 
around Malibu, somebody will find out.” 

I hated to admit it, but I really didn’t want Mia to learn how to fly. 

“Jack! You have to show me how. It isn’t fair that you and Wilson can 
fly and I can’t!” she wailed. “It isn’t fair!” 

Whoa. Wait a minute! I told myself. Maybe I should teach Mia how to 
fly. If I’m the one to teach her, she’ll really be impressed. This could be my 
big chance. 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I’ll teach you how to fly. Let’s go back to my 



house. We’ll get the flying book.” 

“Thank you! Thank you, Jack!” Mia was so excited, she hugged me. 

I led the way to our garage. 

“Oooh! I can’t wait!” Mia jumped with glee. 

I stopped in front of the garage door. 

“What are you waiting for, Jack? Open it!” she cried impatiently. 
“Weird. It’s closed,” I said, confused. “The garage door is never 
closed.” 

“So—open it!” Mia demanded. 

I reached for the handle. 

I tugged up the garage door—and cried out in shock. 



20 


Gone! 

Everything—gone. The dentist’s spit-sink. Mrs. Green’s pool steps. 
The old mattress. All gone. 

I stared at the empty garage in shock. 

“Ohhhh, noooo. Dad cleaned out the garage,” I moaned unhappily. 
“Mia—I can’t teach you how to fly. The book—is gone.” 

“You read the book, Jack. You have to remember what it said!” Mia 
protested. “I want to FLY! Think! You’ve got to remember!” 

“It’s no use,” I told her. “We need the secret ingredient. It was in an 
envelope. Inside the book. It’s gone.” 

Mia shook her head and uttered an angry groan. 

Then a look of calm came over her face. “That’s okay, Jack. Maybe it’s 
just as well. This flying thing is kind of scary.” 

“So—you’re not angry at me?” I asked her. 

“No,” she replied. “It really wasn’t your fault. You know what I think, 
Jack?” 

I shook my head. “No. What?” 

“I think you shouldn’t fly anymore. Or maybe you should tell your 
parents about it. I mean, it’s not normal. I have a very bad feeling about it.” 

I shrugged. 

“Jack—I’m not kidding. I don’t think you should fly anymore. It’s not 
safe.” 

“But I don’t want to stop,” I protested. “It’s so much fun. It’s 
awesome. Totally awesome up there. Besides, what could happen?” 

That night after dinner, I hurried to my room to work on a new 
superhero drawing. 

I drew the outline of his figure. I was going to call him Captain Arrow. 

I shoved my chair away from my desk. Stared out the window for a 
while. Returned to my drawing. 

I drew a purple leather quiver over Captain Arrow’s shoulder—to hold 
his powerful crimson arrows. 



I got up. Looked outside again. I don’t know—drawing superheros 
seemed kind of boring now. 

I left my room to find Dad. To ask him to shoot some baskets outside 
with me. 

I found Dad—and Mom—snoozing on the couch in the living room. 

I called Ethan and Ray to see if they wanted to play—but they 
couldn’t. They both had homework to do. 

Tiptoeing through the hall, I left the house through the back door. I 
stood in the backyard and gazed up at the stars. It was a perfect night. 
Warm. Not a cloud in the sky. 

A perfect night for a short flight over Malibu. 

I glanced around—to make sure no one was watching. Then I soared 
up into the night sky. 

Over the rooftops. Over the trees. Over the beach. 

I took a deep breath. The ocean air smelled so fresh, so sweet up here. 

A light breeze blew through my hair. 

So peaceful. So quiet. 

So free. Soaring high. Gazing out. Surrounded by nothing but 
twinkling stars. 

I picked up speed. The wind rushed at my face. My T-shirt rippled 
against my chest. 

The stars streamed by. The ocean rolled darkly beneath me. 

I gazed down at the Malibu Hills. Then headed toward Los Angeles. I 
flew over the city. The lights below sparkled for miles. 

I flew faster. Barrel-rolled to the left. Then to the right. Then headed 
into a loop, flying upside down. 

Awesome! 

Totally awesome! 

I’m so lucky! I can sail! Glide! Soar! 

“I can FLYYYY!” I whooped, spinning in the air. 

I glided for a while on my back, gazing up at the stars. Trying to 
identify the constellations. Then I spun around and peered down—into total 
darkness. 

No porch lights. No street lamps. No headlights from cars. 

No houses. No buildings. 

Total darkness. 



A wave of panic swept over me. How did this happen? Where is the 
city? Where am I? 

“How long have I been flying?” I groaned. “How far have I flown?” 

I didn’t know. 

I swooped down, searching for a dim light somewhere. But all I saw 
was darkness. Complete darkness. 

I turned around—heading back home, I hoped. 

Swooping lower. Searching for a familiar sight. 

Finally I spotted a string of lights. A freeway! But which freeway? I 
couldn’t tell! 

My heart pounded in my chest. Cold beads of sweat prickled my 
forehead. 

I’m lost, I realized, shivering in cold dread. 

I am miles and miles from home. 

Totally lost. 



21 


I landed in the tall grass on the side of the freeway. 

I started to walk. Searching for a sign to tell me where I was. 

I walked and walked. 

The night was quiet, except for the cars that roared by—and the creepy 
rustling sounds that escaped from the roadside bushes. 

I stared into the bushes. Saw them move. 

My heart began to beat faster. 

I broke into a jog. 

Cars and trucks whirred by me. 

A sharp cluttering noise rang out from the dense thicket beside the 
highway. I could see dark eyes glowing in the bushes. 

“Hey—!” 

A furry creature scuttled across my path. 

A raccoon? A skunk? 

I started to run. 

Up ahead I finally spotted a highway sign. 

I ran harder—panting now. Clouds of dirt rose up under my pounding 
sneakers. 

I could see the white letters on the sign—but I still couldn’t make out 
what it said. As I ran toward it, a car pulled alongside me—and stopped. 

I spun around—and gasped. 

A police cruiser. 

Yes! I thought happily. The police! They’ll help me get back home. 

“Do you need help?” One of the officers stepped out of the squad car. 
He tipped his cap back and stared into my eyes. 

“Yes. I do. I’m kind of lost,” I told him breathlessly. “Can you take me 
home—to Malibu?” 

“What is your name?” he asked. 

“Jack.” 

“Well, Jack. You’re pretty far from Malibu. How did you get here?” he 
asked. 



I didn’t answer. What could I say? I flew here? They’d take me back 
all right. And lock me up—with all the other crazy people in Los Angeles. 

“Jack. Did someone drive you here?” 

I shook my head no. 

“Well, did you just drop out of the sky?” He sounded as if he was 
losing his patience. 

I shrugged my shoulders lamely. 

“Get in the car, Jack,” the officer nodded toward the car door. “We’ll 
find your parents for you.” 

Oh, no! I suddenly changed my mind. I can’t let them take me back, I 
decided, shaking in panic. What will I tell Mom and Dad? How will I 
explain to them how I got here? 

I edged away. 

The officer reached out to me. “Get in, Jack. We’ll help you.” 

“Uh... no thanks,” I told him. 

I raised both arms over my head. 

And took off. 

Gazing down—I saw the other officer leap out of the car. 

The two of them stood side by side, gaping up at me with their mouths 
open wide. 

I followed the lights of the highway. I didn’t know what else to do. 
Finally the buildings of Los Angeles came back into view. I let out a long 
sigh of relief. Then I turned in midair and flew home to Malibu. 

I landed quietly behind the garage. I smoothed out my hair. 
Straightened my T-shirt. I took a deep breath and sneaked into the house. 

I could hear my parents in the living room, talking. I stopped in the 
kitchen and listened. 

Were they talking about me? 

Did they notice I was gone? 

“I don’t know where else to look,” I heard Dad say. “I’ve searched 
everywhere!” 

My heart began to pound. 

What am I going to tell them? 

I held my breath and listened some more. 

“I know! I know!” Mom exclaimed. “We have to stay calm. You’ll 
find a new client soon. Someone with real talent. I just know it.” 



I breathed a long sigh of relief. 

They didn’t notice. 

Next time, I have to be more careful, I promised myself. Much more 
careful. 

Mia is right. Flying can be really dangerous. Especially if you don’t 
know where you’re flying! 

I tiptoed to my room and closed the door. 

The phone rang. 

“Are you ready for the big race tomorrow?” It was Wilson. 

“Huh? What race?” I asked. 

“I told Mr. Grossman that we’re going to put on a race for the whole 
school tomorrow,” Wilson declared. 

“What kind of race?” I asked him. 

“A race they’ll never forget!” 



22 


“Are you crazy?” I yanked Wilson aside in gym class the next morning. 
“We can’t race! ” I screamed. 

“Aw. Come on. Be a good sport.” Wilson grinned. “You’re just 
steamed because you know you’re going to lose.” 

On the other side of the gym, I could hear Mr. Grossman announcing 
the race to the class. “A special race,” I heard him say. “Wilson promises 
we’re all in for a big surprise!” 

I ran my hand through my hair. 

“Wilson, don’t you see what you’ve done?” My voice grew high. 
“When everyone finds out that we can fly, our lives will be ruined!” 

Wilson shrugged, then bent down to tie his sneaker. “I don’t know 
what you’re so worried about. This is going to be way cool!” 

I glanced around the gym. The empty gym. The entire class had 
emptied outside, waiting for the race to begin. 

“Ready, boys?” Mr. Grossman popped his head in the doorway. 

“Ready!” Wilson called back. 

Wilson tugged me through the halls. The empty halls. 

“Come on, Jack. The whole school is out there!” 

The whole school. Out there. 

Every kid in Malibu Middle School was going to watch us fly. This 
was a total disaster. 

If we went ahead with this, I knew that my life would never be the 
same again. 

We stepped onto the playground. I squinted in the bright sunlight. 
Squinted at the crowd of kids, huddled along the running track—waiting for 
the race to start. 

Someone tugged on my T-shirt sleeve. 

It was Mia. “Jack, why are you doing this?” she asked, her eyes wide 
with fear. “Wilson told me you’re going to fly.” 

“I—I don’t want to,” I stammered. “But I can’t do anything about it. I 
have no choice.” 

Mia shielded her eyes with her hand and glanced over at Wilson. Her 



ruby-red heart ring sparkled in the sun. 

We both watched Wilson as he stretched out at the starting line. “I’m 
so worried about the two of you,” she said, her eyes locked on Wilson. 

I gazed into the crowd. 

Kids shifted restlessly from one foot to the other. Watching. Waiting. 

I wanted to run away. 

Run home and hide. 

“Hey, Jack!” Ray called out from the crowd. “Go for it! You can beat 
him!” Ethan stood next to him, pumping his fist in the air. 

“Wilson is ready.” Mr. Grossman jogged over to me. “How about you, 
Jack?” 

The kids began to chant. “Race! Race! Race! ” 

My temples were throbbing. 

My T-shirt felt wet against my skin—drenched with sweat. 

What was I going to do? 



23 


I had to race. 

I knew I had no choice. 

I had to race—and I had to win. 

I stepped up to Wilson. “Ready, Jackie?” He grinned his horrible 
Wilson grin. 

I nodded. 

Mr. Grossman raised the starting flag. “On your marks. Get set. GO!” 

Wilson and I took off. 

We shot into the air. 

With my arms straight out in front of me, I blasted ahead. I soared 
higher, higher—and zoomed to the other end of the playground, leaving 
Wilson far behind. 

Yes! 

I was winning! 

Finally! 

I was finally beating him! 

I turned in midair, dipped, and headed back to the other end of the 
playground. I glanced behind me. Wilson was soaring fast. Catching up. 

He sailed alongside me. “See you, Jackie!” he smirked. Then he flew 
ahead. 

Oh, no, you don’t, Wilson. Not again. 

I held my body straight as an arrow—and jetted forward. 

We flew side by side now. I could see the muscles in his face straining 
as he tried to pick up speed. 

But he couldn’t. He couldn’t pull ahead of me. 

The other end of the playground was coming up fast. With my eyes 
trained to the finish line, I soared with all my strength. 

We reached the line at the same time. I dropped to the ground. “A tie!” 
I cried out breathlessly. “It’s a tie!” 

Wilson hadn’t won! 

“Hey, Wilson? Wilson?” I searched the school grounds. 



Then I glanced up. 

There he was, hovering over my head. “Lap number two!” he cried. 
And took off. 

I sprinted into the air. 

Too late. 

Wilson finished the second lap—and won the race. 

“Nice going, Jackie,” Wilson clapped me on the shoulder. “I knew I 
could count on you—to lose!” he hooted. 

“That wasn’t fair—” I started. 

“Hey—what’s their problem?” he interrupted me, pointing to the 
crowd of kids. 

The quiet crowd. 

No cheers. 

No clapping. 

They stared at us in stunned silence. 

I turned to Mr. Grossman. His jaw hung open. He gaped at us— 
speechless. 

I slowly walked over to Ray and Ethan, staring into their unsmiling 
faces. “So, guys. What did you think?” 

“Why didn’t you tell us you could fly?” Ray’s face broke out into a 
wide grin. 

“I—I wanted to surprise you!” I said, relieved. 

“Awesome! Totally awesome!” Ethan shouted. “Can you teach us 
how?” 

“I’m sorry. I can’t,” I apologized. I told them the whole story—about 
how I found the book and lost it—as we headed back into school. 

“Our basketball team will win every game now!” Ray exclaimed. 
“Forget about slam dunks! You’ll be the first player ever to do a fly-dunk!” 

Ray and Ethan were really excited about my flying. 

But, later, as I walked to my classroom, I could feel the stares from the 
other kids. Hear their whispers. Everyone was talking about me. Some 
shrank back as I approached. 

They were afraid of me! 

That afternoon, I walked through the halls with my head down. I 
couldn’t stand all the whispers, all the stares. 



“Jack!” The school nurse darted from her office and snatched me out 
of the hall. “There are some people here who want to meet you.” 

Two men and two women stood stiffly in the nurse’s office. One man 
and one woman were dressed in business suits. The other two wore khaki 
pants and T-shirts. They smiled warmly at me. 

“These people are scientists from the university,” the nurse started to 
explain. “They’ve heard about your... uh... special talent. And they want to 
examine you and Wilson.” 

I took a step back. 

One of the men moved toward me. “If you really can fly, think of how 
useful you can be to our government—perhaps as a secret weapon against 
our enemies.” 

I swallowed hard. 

The woman in the khaki pants stuck out her hand. “Come with us, 
Jack.” She shot a nervous glance at the others. “Nothing bad will happen to 
you.” 

The others peered at me over their eyeglasses. They nodded eagerly in 
agreement. 

“We just want to look you over. You know. Do a few experiments on 
you. In our lab.” 



24 


“NO! I don’t want to be a lab specimen. I don’t want to be a secret 
weapon!” I shouted at them. 

Startled by my cries, the scientists leaped back—and I bolted from the 
room. 

“Jack, come back!” the school nurse called after me. 

I raced frantically through the halls. Smashing into kids. Shoving them 
out of my way. 

“Jack, we won’t hurt you!” I heard one of the scientists call. 

With my head down, I charged ahead, zigzagging through the crowded 
halls. Elbowing the kids who got in my way. 

“Hey, watch it!” Angry voices trailed me as I burst through the school 
doors and jumped down the steps. 

I ran all the way home. I didn’t stop. I didn’t glance back. I ran hard— 
even though my lungs felt as if they were about to burst. 

I opened my front door with a bang. Then slammed it shut and leaned 
against it, gasping for breath. 

“Jack?” Dad called from the living room. 

Why was Dad home in the middle of the afternoon? 

I walked in to the living room—and found both my parents waiting for 
me. 

Dad stood with his hands shoved deep into his pants pockets. “Jack, 
our phone has been ringing all afternoon,” he said sternly. “We heard about 
you. About what you did in school today.” 

I glanced over at Mom. She gave a solemn nod. 

“You are in a lot of trouble.” Dad sounded really angry now. 

I gulped. “Why? What—what are you going to do?” 



25 


“What do you think we should do, Jack?” Dad paced back and forth in front 
of me. “We can’t believe you didn’t tell us sooner.” 

“Sorry...” I muttered. “I mean, I wanted to tell you I could fly. But...” 

Dad’s expression changed. His eyes flashed with excitement. “If you 
really can fly, you’re going to be the hottest act in the country. You’re going 
to be a superstar, Jack. You’re going to make millions!” 

Mom’s face broke into a wide smile. 

“We finally found it!” Dad said to her. “I can’t believe it. All this time 
we’ve been searching everywhere—and it was right under our own roof. 
We finally found the BIG act!” 

“Step right up, ladies and gentlemen! Welcome to the grand opening of 
Marv’s Malibu Motors!” Marvin Milstein stood on a towering platform. 

He shouted into a bullhorn, gathering a huge crowd in front of his new 
car lot. 

I stood inside the showroom. I peeked outside—watching the crowd 
grow. Hundreds of people jammed into the parking lot. Hundreds more 
tried to shove their way in. 

They crammed in tightly. Shoulder to shoulder under the hot sun. And 
waited. 

Waited for me. 

The Amazing Flying Boy. 

“YES!” Marv continued to shout. “The Amazing Flying Boy is here! 
In just a moment, you will see him fly over our new shipment of Silver 
Hawks. 

“The Silver Hawk!” Marv pointed across the lot to a shiny, silver car 
turning slowly on a revolving platform. “The car that soars so smoothly, 
you’ll swear the wheels never touch the ground.” 

The people packed themselves in tighter—every inch of ground taken 
up by the crowd. 

I could hear the buzz of the crowd over Marv’s bullhorn. 

“Where is The Flying Boy? Can he really fly?” I heard a little kid cry. 

A lump formed in my throat. 



Mom came up behind me and placed a hand on my shoulder. “You 
look great, Jack!” 

I stared down at the costume Mom had made for me. A silvery 
superhero costume. Metallic sneakers. And a shiny silver cape. 

“Can you believe this crowd?” Dad exclaimed. “Ten TV stations are 
out there with their news crews. And tons of reporters—from every 
newspaper in the state. They’re all here to see you, Jack!” 

“I don’t know, Dad.” I stared out at the growing crowd. “Are you sure 
this is a good idea?” 

“A good idea? No. I don’t think this is a good idea. It’s a great idea! 
It’s an unbelievable idea!” he cried. “And it’s just the start, Jack. Soon 
you’ll have your own TV show. Your own movies. Your own action 
figures!” 

The mob outside grew impatient. 

“ARE... YOU... READY?” Malibu Marv shouted into the bullhorn, 
pumping up the crowd. 

“YES!” Their reply thundered in my ears. 

“It’s time, Jack!” Dad’s eyes lit up with excitement. 

I was supposed to fly over the car lot, carrying an advertising banner. 
Dad handed it to me. It read: FLY WITH THE SILVER HAWK, ONLY AT 
MALIBU MARV’S. 

I stepped outside and climbed the platform steps to take my place next 
to Marv. 

I stared down at the crowd. At their waiting faces. At the doubt in their 

eyes. 

Then I took off. 

And the crowd let out a startled gasp. 

I flew around the lot carrying the banner, staring down at the people as 
they gaped up at me. 

“He’s flying! He’s really flying!” I heard someone shout. 

I searched the faces below—trying to find Mia, Ethan, or Ray. I hadn’t 
seen them in days. I soared around the entire car lot, but I couldn’t spot 
them in the crowd. 

“You’re seeing a miracle, folks!” Marv’s amplified voice floated up to 
me. “And our Silver Hawk prices are a miracle, too!” 



The next morning, Dad brought in reporters from Time and Newsweek 
to interview me. The reporters asked me tons of questions: When did you 
learn to fly? Can you teach other kids how to do it? What was in the secret 
recipe you ate? What were the magic words you chanted? Then their 
photographers snapped pictures of me flying around the backyard. 

People and TV Guide showed up next. They asked the same questions. 
Took the same pictures. 

Mia called. She asked me to go skating with her that afternoon. I 
wanted to go, but I couldn’t. Someone from the Wall Street Journal was 
coming to interview me. 

I wanted to tell them to talk to TV Guide —get the answers from them. 
But I knew Mom and Dad wouldn’t like that. They were working really 
hard to get me all these interviews. 

“See you later!” I called to Mom and Dad the next morning. I was 
going to the park to shoot some hoops with Ray and Ethan. 

“Whoa! Wait up!” Dad charged in to the kitchen. “Where are you 
going?” 

“To play basketball with my friends. I won’t be home late,” I told him. 

“Sorry, Jack. But you can’t go.” 

“Why not?” I asked, confused. “I don’t have any interviews today.” 

“Because basketball isn’t the right kind of exercise for a flying 
superhero!” Dad patted me on the back. “You have to do sit-ups, push-ups, 
mn some laps—build up your strength and stamina to fly your best!” 

He pushed me toward the door. You have to work out every day, Jack. 
Every day. Now, lets get started. Ill work with you in the backyard.” 

I didn’t see Ray or Ethan or Mia that whole week. I had more 
interviews to do. And exercises. And costume fittings. And I did a flying 
appearance at the opening of a new restaurant in Santa Monica. 

Finally Saturday arrived. Mom and Dad said it was my day off. No 
interviews. No exercises. No jobs. I could do whatever I wanted. 

I got up early to go Rollerblading with Mia. As I headed out the door, 
Mom stopped me. “Jack, you can’t go out like that!” 

“Like what?” I asked, staring down at my T-shirt and cutoff jeans. 

“Like that,” she said, pointing to my clothes. “You’re a superstar now. 
You have to wear your flying costume when you go out. So your fans won’t 
be disappointed.” 



“But, Mom!” I protested. “I can’t wear my cape to go skating. No way 
I’m going to wear silver tights in the park!” 

I called Mia and told her I couldn’t go. I shuffled glumly into the 
living room and turned on the TV. 

I knew that flying in front of the whole school was a big mistake. 

I knew it would ruin my life. I knew it! 

I hadn’t seen my friends in weeks. I’d probably never see them again! 

I’m going to spend my whole life flying around in a dumb costume, 
never having any fun! I realized. 

I flipped aimlessly through the channels. 

I flipped and flipped, watching the programs flash by on the screen. 

And then I stopped—when I saw Wilson. 

Wilson on TV! 

Wilson—wearing a really cool superhero costume that sparkled with 
neon glitter. 

My eyes grew wide as I watched him. He soared around a 
mountaintop, rescuing people off its steep cliffs. 

“We will return to Wonder Wilson and His Amazing Rescues in just a 
moment!” the TV announcer said. 

Huh? Wonder Wilson and His Amazing Rescues ? 

I shook my head. 

“I’m doing restaurant openings—and Wilson already has his own TV 
show!” I wailed. 

Can’t I EVER beat Wilson? EVER? 

I heard a knock on the door. I was glad to leave the room before 
Wonder Wilson came back on TV. 

I opened the door—and saw three serious-looking men in green 
uniforms standing there. Army uniforms. 

“Jack Johnson?” one of them asked sternly. 

I nodded yes. 

“Good.” He reached out his hand. “You’ll have to come with us.” 



26 


I stood in the middle of a drab green room. 

An army lab. 

With no windows. 

The room smelled like a doctor’s office. You know. That heavy alcohol 
smell. 

I glanced over at the door. A solid steel bolt sealed it shut. 

A chair with suction cups stuck all over the back and seat stood in one 
corner of the room. Electrical wires streamed from each cup. 

I imagined that was what a prison electric chair looked like. No way 
I’d ever sit on it! 

My heart began to pound as a group of army scientists in white lab 
coats circled me. They stared at me, their eyes moving up and down my 
body. They wrote on clipboards they held in their hands. Then they stared at 
me some more. 

“Okay, Jack. We are going to perform a few tests. Are you ready?” one 
of the scientists asked. 

“No!” I shouted. “I am not ready. I want to go home!” 

“Sorry, Jack,” the scientist said. “We can’t let you go just yet. Now— 
please come with us.” 

They led me outside to a wide courtyard. The courtyard was covered 
with canvas. I felt as if I were in an enormous circus tent. 

As soon as we were closed in, the scientists began shouting commands 
at me: 

Fly on your back. 

Fly on your belly. 

Fly with your eyes closed. 

Fly with your legs crossed. 

Hold your breath and fly. 

Hold your ears and fly. 

Hold your thoughts and fly. 

They ordered me to fly a thousand different ways. 



They wouldn’t stop. 

They wouldn’t let me rest until I was panting like a dog. 

One scientist handed me a bottle of cold water. He motioned for me to 
sit down on the ground. They formed a circle around me. 

“Okay, Jack,” another scientist said. “Time for some questions. First 
tell us—how long have you been flying?” 

Same questions—all over again. 

“Only for a few weeks,” I replied. 

All the scientists scribbled down my answer. 

“How did you learn to fly?” he asked. 

“Didn’t you guys read Time or Newsweek or TV Guide?” I asked. 

“Just answer the question, Jack,” the scientist said sternly. 

“I ate a special formula,” I answered, rolling my eyes impatiently. 

The scientists’heads jerked up from their clipboards. “What was in the 
special formula?” 

“I don’t remember,” I replied. 

“Yes, you do, Jack.” The scientist stepped closer to me. He stared hard 
into my eyes. “Now tell us.” 

I thought hard, trying to recall what was in the recipe. But I couldn’t. 
“I—I really don’t remember,” I stammered. 

“Think harder, Jack,” he demanded. “You know what was in it. Tell 

us.” 

My heart pounded in my chest. “I—I don’t remember. I’m telling you 
the truth. I really don’t remember.” 

The scientists didn’t believe me. They waited. Stared at me with 
unblinking eyes. Waiting for my answer. 

I peered down at my sneakers to escape their hard stares. 

Where were my parents? Did they know I was here? 

I could feel a bead of sweat trickle down my back. 

“Please, let me go!” I begged. 

“Sorry, Jack,” one of the scientists said. “First you have to answer the 
question.” 

“But I can’t! I told you—I don’t remember!” I cried. 

“Okay. Then we’ll move on,” the scientist said. The others nodded in 
agreement. 

I let out a sigh of relief. 



“Jack—we’re going back in there.” The scientist led me to the little 
room. “Now—sit in that chair.” 

“Huh? What are you going to do to me?” I asked. 



27 


More questions. 

Then more flying demonstrations. 

Then they hooked me up to the suction cups on the chair. That was the 
worst. 

It measured how fast my heart beat. How fast my pulse raced. How 
fast my eyes blinked. Hours and hours of measuring the slightest 
movements in my body. Down to a slight twitch. 

Then they shut me up in a metal tank and took some kind of laser 
pictures of me. 

Then they asked more questions. 

Ten hours later, Dad sat next to me on the living room couch, 
apologizing. Tm really sorry, Jack. They gave us no choice. They said you 
had to go with them. But they didn’t tell us it would take so long.” 

Dad sighed. “I was so busy getting you flying jobs, I forgot to warn 
you they were coming. But forget about all that, Jack. I have great news. 
I’ve set up the race of a lifetime.” 

“Race? What kind of a race?” I demanded. 

“A race between you and Wilson!” Dad exclaimed. “The Amazing 
Flying Boy races Wonder Wilson—your first appearance together! The 
winner will receive a million dollars! Just think of it, Jack. ONE MILLION 
DOLLARS!” 

“A million dollars?” I couldn’t believe it. 

“The race will be on TV all around the world.” Dad stood and began 
pacing. “Two billion people will be watching.” 

Wow. A million dollars! And everyone in the world will see me fly 
like a superhero. And Wilson and I will become the two most famous kids 
on earth! 

This really was awesome ! 

“And if you win the race, son—it will be worth billions of dollars!” 
Dad’s hands flew up in the air as he talked. “Think of the TV commercials 
you’ll make! You’ll be a star all around the world!” 

I slowly got up from the couch. “I—I have to go out for a walk, Dad. I 



need some time to think about all of this.” 

I walked down the block, thinking about everything Dad said. 

“Hey, there’s The Amazing Flying Boy!” someone shouted from a 
passing car. 

“That’s him! There he is! The kid who flies!” 

Shouts from other cars now. People pointing. Cheering. Waving. From 
almost every car that drove by. 

I walked faster. With my head down. 

“Malibu Motors Flying Boy! Marv’s flying kid!” More shouts. “The 
flying Johnson kid!” 

I heard footsteps behind me. 

I glanced back. A group of kids were following me. I started to jog. 

“Flying Boy! Slow down!” They began chasing me. “Fly for us! Come 
on, take off. Fly around the block!” 

I broke into a run. I ducked behind some bushes until they passed. 
Then I walked some more—keeping in the shadows. 

I am going to be the most famous kid on earth, I thought, trying to 
cheer myself up. 

I am going to race in front of two billion people—and then my life will 
never be the same again. I am going to be rich and famous. 

Rich and famous. 

My stomach tightened. All my muscles tensed. 

Can I do it? 

Can I race in front of two billion people? 

And most important —can I finally beat Wilson ? 



28 


The day of the big race. 

Mom, Dad, and I rode to the bottom of the Hollywood Hills. That’s 
where the race would begin. 

Wilson and I would take off from there. Then fly up to the 
HOLLYWOOD sign. Then back down again. 

Dad inched our car up to the grandstand. 

Thousands of people had turned out to watch Wilson and me fly. 

Thousands of people watched as our car drove up. 

Their hands pressed against the car. Their staring eyes gawked at me 
through the windows. A mass of bodies and faces inching along with us. So 
many people, they blocked out the sunlight. 

I sat in the back seat in darkness. 

Staring at the faces gaping in at me. 

Listening to their shouts. 

That’s him! He’s here! 

Are you nervous ? 

Can we talk to you before the race? 

What did you eat for breakfast? 

What are you going to do with all the money? 

Will you come to our school and fly? 

Are you from another planet? 

“Hey!” Someone banged on the window—and I jumped. “Can I have 
your autograph?” He banged again. I shrank back in my seat. 

“Pretty exciting, huh?” Dad smiled in the rearview mirror. 

Jack, we love you! Jack, you’re amazing! Jack—teach me how to fly! 
Cries rang out all around me. 

Dad parked the car. 

The crowd pressed against the doors. Sealing us in. The car started to 
rock under their weight. 

My heart began to pound. 

I grabbed onto the seat so tightly my knuckles turned white. 



“Coming through. Stand aside.” A troop of policemen cleared a path to 
the car. 

The officers opened the door. 

I didn’t move. 

“Let’s go, Jack. It’s time!” Dad said. 

On shaky legs, I stepped out of the car. A deafening roar rose up from 
the crowd. 

“Jack. Jack. Jack.” The chant thundered in my ears. 

The policemen formed a barricade, holding the shouting, cheering, 
chanting people back. I made my way to a big concrete platform built 
especially for the race. 

Arms reached out—reached out to touch me. Hands grabbed at my 
sleeves. Grabbed at my cape. Grabbed. Grabbed frantically. Pulled me 
toward them. 

I struggled to walk. To pull free of the grasping hands. 

The policemen tried to hold the crowd back—but people surged 
forward in a heavy wave. 

They broke through the policemen’s barrier. 

Pressed against me. 

Started to crush me. 

I was drowning. Drowning in hands and legs and talking faces. A wave 
of panic washed over me. 

I lost Mom and Dad in the sea of bodies. 

The crowd swept over me. Carried me with it. 

Jack! Jack! Jack! They shouted my name over and over. 

“Mom! Dad!” I tried to cry out over the roar of the mob. 

I couldn’t see. 

I couldn’t breathe. 

I gasped for air. 

I—I’m not going to make it, I realized. 

The crowd—it’s swallowing me. Swallowing me up... 



29 


Then I felt someone grab me under my shoulders. “This way, Jack.” Two 
policemen guided me up the platform steps. Four other dark-uniformed 
officers surrounded me. 

When I reached the top, I took a deep breath—and gazed out at the 
people. Thousands of people—stretching out for miles and miles. 

“Jack!” Someone shoved a microphone in my face. 

“Jack! Over here.” Another microphone. 

Jack! Jack! Jack! Hundreds of microphones suddenly appeared before 
me. 

Cameras clicked. “Do you think you can win?” a reporter demanded. 

55 

“When did you learn to fly?” Another reporter. “Three months—” 
“What was in the secret recipe?” Another reporter. 

Everyone asking questions—all at once. Cameras clicking. 

JACK! JACK! JACK! Everyone calling to me. 

I broke into a heavy, cold sweat. 

I tugged at the collar of my silver costume. Choking, I thought. It’s... 
choking me. 

The mob of people continued to call out my name. 

And Wilson’s name. 

I glanced over to the other side of the platform. 

There he was. Wilson—in his glittering superhero outfit. Hands 
planted on his hips. Chest puffed out. Laughing with the newspaper 
reporters. Smiling for the magazine writers. Boasting to the TV cameras. 

He LOVES this! I realized. How could he? How could anyone like 

this? 

“We are about to begin,” the announcer said to me as he waved Wilson 

over. 

“This is it.” Wilson clapped me on the back. “I’m really sorry, Jackie.” 
“Sorry for what?” I asked. 

“Sorry to have to beat you in front of two billion people!” he hooted. 



“Good luck, Jackie. You’ll need it.” 

A striped-shirted referee asked us to shake hands before the race. 

I shook Wilson’s hand—and tried to crush his fingers. But Wilson just 
grinned his horrible Wilson grin. 

“The race is about to begin!” The announcer’s voice boomed over the 
enormous loudspeaker. 

The crowd had been roaring. But now the roar faded to a whisper of 
hushed voices. 

The referee lifted a starter’s pistol. 

I took a deep breath—and held it. 

I shut my eyes—and waited to hear the blast from the gun. 

BANG! 



30 


The gunshot echoed in my ears. 

I opened my eyes in time to watch Wilson take off. His cape swirled 
behind him as he lifted toward the sky. 

I raised my arms. 

I leaped into the air. 

And landed hard on my feet. 

A shocked gasp rose up from the crowd. 

I raised my arms again. They trembled as I pointed them to the sky. 

I bent my knees. Then took a strong leap. 

And landed with a loud thud on the concrete platform. 

I could hear the gasps of the crowd. I could see their open mouths, 
their wide eyes. Stunned. They were all stunned. 

I tried again. 

Nothing. 

I glanced up to see Wilson soaring high, nearing the big 
HOLLYWOOD sign. 

“I—I can’t fly!” I cried out. “I can’t fly anymore. I’ve lost it! It’s 
gone!” 

Dad jumped onto the stage. His face was frantic. “Try again! Try, Jack! 
Keep trying!” 

I took a long, deep breath. 

I planted my feet together. 

I bent my knees and with all my might—I sprang up. 

And came down. 

Nothing. 

No use. 

“I’ve lost it!” I cried. “I can’t fly anymore! I can’t fly!” 

I gazed up and saw Wilson soar over the HOLLYWOOD sign, turn, 
and start back. 

Wilson wins again, I told myself. Wilson wins again. 



31 


As the summer passed, we didn’t see much of Wilson. He was busy flying 
all the time. His TV show was on every week. And he made dozens of 
flying appearances all over the country. 

In the fall, he had to leave Malibu Middle School because he was 
always traveling. Always making flying appearances. Always working, 
working. On the run. 

I saw on the TV news that the army follows him wherever he goes, 
doing experiments on him. Trying to figure out how to get other people to 

fly- 

When Wilson is home, he’s too tired to see his old friends. Mia says it 
doesn’t matter. She says hanging out with me is much more fun. 

I’m back to my old normal life. Morty is too. He finally came out of 
his doghouse. And he doesn’t float off the ground anymore—not since I 
tied a two-pound dog tag to his collar. 

Ethan and Ray and I are going to a Lakers game tonight. And 
tomorrow, Mia invited me to go to a Purple Rose concert with her. Next 
weekend we’re taking tennis lessons together. 

We never talk about the big race and how Wilson won. 

We never talk about flying at all. 

I’ve kept my secret from Mia. I’ve kept my secret from everyone. 

I’ve never told anyone that I can still fly. 

And I’ve never told anyone that I only pretended to lose my flying 
ability that morning of the race. 

Yes. You heard me. I only pretended. 

I let Wilson win the race. 

Why? 

Because I knew that was the only way I could win. 

That was the only way I could get all those thousands of people out of 
my life. It was the only way I could get my friends back. The only way I 
could get my normal life back. The only way I could be happy. 

I told you. I’m not the kind of kid who likes to enter contests. I don’t 
like to compete. I don’t care about winning. 



So, I’m really lucky. Because even though I don’t care about winning 
—I won after all. 

Sometimes, very late at night, I sneak out of the house. And I fly over 
Malibu, high over the ocean. I gaze down on the waves sparkling in the 
moonlight. I soar with the winds and sail up toward the moon, feeling the 
cool ocean breezes on my face. 

And I think about how lucky I am. 

And how smart. 

And I wish Wonder Wilson a lot of luck. 

Really.... 






CHICKEN CHICKEN 


Goosebumps - 53 
R.L. Stine 


1 


I hate chickens. 

They are filthy creatures, and they smell like... like... chickens. 

“Crystal, it’s your turn to feed the chickens,” Mom says. My least favorite 
words. 

I carry the seed bucket out to the backyard, and they come scurrying over, 
clucking and squawking and flapping their greasy wings. I hate the way they 
brush up against my legs as they peck the seeds off the ground. Their feathers 
are so rough and scratchy. 

My brother, Cole, and I are always trying to convince my parents to get rid 
of the chickens. “Just because we live on a farm doesn’t mean we have to have 
chickens,” I always say. 

“Right! We’re not farmers!” Cole agrees. “So why do we have to have 
those smelly chickens?” 

“It’s always been our dream,” Mom always replies. Blah blah blah. 

Cole and I have heard the dream story a thousand times. 

We’ve heard how Mom and Dad grew up in the Bronx in New York City. 
How they hated the noise and the dirt and the concrete. How they dreamed of 
leaving the city for good and living on a farm near a small country town. 

So, when Cole was two and I was four, we moved to Goshen Falls. Lucky 
us! The whole town is three blocks long. We have a cute little farm with a cute 
little farmhouse. And even though Mom and Dad are computer programmers— 
not farmers—we have a backyard full of chickens. 

Cluck. Cluck. That’s their dream. 

My dream is that Cole gets punished for mouthing off the way he always 
does. And his punishment is that he has to feed the chickens for the rest of his 
life. 

Everyone has to have a dream—right? 

“OWW!” A chicken pecked my ankle. That hurt! Their beaks are so sharp. 

I tossed a final handful of seed on the ground and hopped backward, away 
from the gross, clucking creatures. Their little black eyes glinted in the sunlight 
as they strutted over the grass. Pecking each other. Bumping each other out of 
the way as they dipped their scrawny heads for the food. 



I dropped the bucket in the back of the little barn we also use as a garage. 
Then I washed my hands under the cold water spigot at the side of the barn. 

I heard a low roar. A shadow rolled over the barn. I gazed up to see a small 
plane dipping under the puffy afternoon clouds. 

I took a deep breath. The tangy aroma of potatoes floated in the air. 

That’s what the farmers grow around here. Mostly potatoes and corn. 

I dried my hands on the legs of my jeans and hurried off in search of my 
brother. It was a sunny Saturday afternoon. Most of my friends from school were 
away on a 4-H club trip. 

Mom asked me to keep an eye on Cole. He’s ten, two years younger than 
me. But sometimes he acts like a four-year-old. It seems like he’s always finding 
new ways to get into trouble. 

I wandered through town. No sign of him. I asked Mrs. Wagner at the 
bakery if she’d seen him. Cole likes to stop in there and beg her for free 
doughnuts. 

Mrs. Wagner said she saw Cole and his friend Anthony heading out of town 
in the direction of Pullman’s Pond. 

Uh-oh, I thought. What are they planning to do at the pond? I started to the 

door. 

“I just love your hair, Crystal,” Mrs. Wagner called. “It’s such a beautiful 
deep shade of red. You should be a model. Really. You’re so tall and thin.” 

“Thanks, Mrs. Wagner!” I called as the door closed behind me. I wasn’t 
thinking about my hair or being a model. I was thinking about Cole and Anthony 
and the pond. 

I trotted the rest of the way through town. Waved to Mr. Porter standing in 
the window of the Pic ’n’ Pay. Then I turned off the street and followed the dirt 
path that led to Pullman’s Pond. 

I didn’t have to go far to find Cole and Anthony. They were hiding behind 
the long hedge at the edge of Vanessa’s property. 

I gazed beyond the hedge to the falling-down old farmhouse where Vanessa 
lives. 

Who is Vanessa? I guess you might say she is the most interesting person in 
Goshen Falls. And the most weird. 

Actually, Vanessa is like someone from a horror movie. She is kind of 
pretty, with long, straight black hair and a pale, white face. She dresses all in 
black. She wears black lipstick and black fingernail polish. 



Vanessa is a mystery woman. No one knows if she’s young or old. 

She keeps to herself. I’ve hardly ever seen her in town. She lives in her old 
farmhouse right outside of town with her black cat. 

Naturally, everyone says she is some kind of sorceress. 

I’ve heard all kinds of stories about Vanessa. Frightening stories. Most of 
the kids in Goshen Falls are scared of her. But that doesn’t stop them from 
playing tricks on her. 

Kids are always daring each other to sneak up to Vanessa’s house. It’s kind 
of a game everyone plays. Sneak up to her house, tap on the window, make her 
cat screech. Then run away before Vanessa sees you. 

“Hey—Cole!” I called in a loud whisper. I ducked my head as I ran along 
the hedge. If Vanessa was home, I didn’t want her to see me. 

“Hey, Cole—what’s up?” 

As I came nearer, I saw that Cole and Anthony weren’t alone. Two other 
kids huddled behind the hedge. Franny Jowett and Jeremy Garth. 

Cole raised a finger to his lips. “Ssshhhh. Vanessa is in there.” 

“What are you doing?” I demanded. I saw that Franny and Jeremy held 
plastic water pitchers in their hands. “Is that lemonade or something?” 

They shook their heads solemnly. 

“Some kids dared them to fill Vanessa’s mailbox with water,” Cole 
explained. 

“Huh?” I gasped. I stared at Franny and Jeremy. “You’re not going to do it 
—are you?” 

“They have to,” Cole answered for them. “A dare is a dare.” 

“But that’s so mean!” I protested. 

My brother snickered. “The mailbox is right next to the front door. No way 
they won’t get caught.” 

Franny and Jeremy are blond and pale. Now they looked even paler than 
usual. Jeremy made a soft, choking sound. Franny gripped her pitcher tightly and 
peered over the hedge at the black metal mailbox on its tilted pole. 

“You accepted the dare. Are you going to wimp out?” Cole demanded. 

Franny and Jeremy glanced at each other nervously. They didn’t reply. 

“Don’t do it,” Anthony suddenly chimed in. 

We all turned to Anthony. He’s short and chubby and has a round face and 
very short black hair. He wears red-framed glasses that are always slipping down 
his little pug nose. 



“Don’t do it,” Anthony repeated. 

“Why n-not?” Franny stammered. 

“Didn’t you hear what happened when Vanessa caught Tommy Pottridge?” 
Anthony asked in a hushed whisper. “Didn’t you hear what she did to him?” 
“No!” Franny and Jeremy declared together. 

I felt a tremble of fear run down my back. “What did Vanessa do to 
Tommy?” I demanded. 



2 


I peered over the tall hedge. Did something move in Vanessa’s front window? 

No. Just a glint of sunlight on the windowpane. 

We huddled closer to Anthony. Even though it was a warm spring day, I 
suddenly felt chilled. “What did Vanessa do to Tommy?” I repeated in a whisper. 

“She caught him sneaking up to her house,” Anthony reported. “She did 
some kind of magic spell on him. She made his head blow up like a balloon.” 

“Oh, come on!” I exclaimed, rolling my eyes. 

“No—really!” Anthony protested. “His head was huge. And it got all soft 
and squishy. Like a sponge.” 

Cole laughed. 

Anthony clamped a hand over Cole’s mouth. “It’s true!” he insisted. 
“Vanessa gave him a big, soft, spongy head. That’s why we don’t see Tommy 
around anymore!” 

“But the Pottridges moved away!” Franny cried. 

“That’s why they moved,” Anthony replied. “Because of Tommy’s head.” 

We all froze for a moment, thinking about Anthony’s story. I tried to picture 
Tommy with a big, squishy head. 

Cole broke the silence. “Give me that!” he cried. He grabbed the water 
pitcher from Jeremy’s hands. “I’ll fill up her mailbox. I’m not scared.” 

“No way!” Jeremy protested. He wrestled the pitcher away from my 
brother. Then he turned to Franny. “We’re doing it—right? We were dared, so we 
have to do it—right?” 

Franny swallowed hard. “I guess,” she choked out. 

“All right!” Cole cheered, slapping them both on the back. Franny nearly 
dropped her pitcher. “You can do it! Lots of kids play tricks on Vanessa. And 
they don’t get squishy heads.” 

“I still think it’s mean to fill someone’s mailbox with water,” I protested. 
“And it’s not worth the risk.” 

No one wanted to listen to me or my warnings. 

Franny and Jeremy tiptoed to the end of the hedge. Then they began slowly 
making their way over the tall, weed-choked grass. 

They carried their plastic water pitchers in both hands in front of them. And 



they kept their eyes on the tilted mailbox to the right of the front door of 
Vanessa’s farmhouse. 

Cole, Anthony, and I crept out from behind the hedge to watch. I held my 
breath and stared at the front window, looking out for Vanessa. 

But the glare of yellow sunlight filled the windowpane. I couldn’t see a 
thing. 

Franny and Jeremy seemed to be moving in slow motion. It was taking 
them forever to cross the lawn to the mailbox! 

A million tiny white gnats flew over the tall grass. Swirling and dancing in 
the sunlight, the gnats sparkled like jewels. 

Franny and Jeremy walked right through them. Their eyes didn’t leave the 
mailbox. 

The two boys and I stepped a little closer, eager to see better. 

No sign of anyone inside the house. 

We stepped even closer. 

At last, Jeremy pulled down the metal mailbox lid. He and Franny raised 
their plastic pitchers. 

They both lowered the pitchers to the mailbox. 

And poured. 

The water made a soft splashing sound as it hit the metal mailbox. 

Franny emptied her pitcher. Jeremy had nearly emptied his. 

Then the front door swung open—and Vanessa burst out. 

She wore a flowing black dress. Her straight black hair flew wildly behind 
her. Her black-lipsticked lips were open in an angry cry. 

The cat screeched shrilly from somewhere in the house. 

Franny dropped her pitcher. She bent to pick it up. 

Changed her mind. 

Ran. 

Jeremy was already diving into the bushes at the far side of the house. 
Franny ran close behind him. 

Cole, Anthony, and I hadn’t moved. 

We stood in the grass. Frozen. Watching Vanessa. 

I gasped when I saw Vanessa’s furious stare. 

I turned to Cole and Anthony. “Why is she staring like that at us?” I choked 
out. “Does she think we did it?” 



3 


My whole body stiffened. As if Vanessa’s eyes were shooting out some kind of 
laser ray. 

I forced myself to spin away. And I started to run. 

Cole and Anthony were at my sides. Our sneakers thudded heavily over the 
dirt path. We kicked up clouds of dirt as we ran. A blur of green and brown, the 
fields appeared to tilt and sway around me. 

We ran through town without stopping. Without saying a word. Without 
even looking at each other! 

Mrs. Wagner stepped out of the bakery. She started to say hello. I caught the 
shocked expression on her face as the three of us ran past her without slowing 
down. 

We ran until we reached my house. We burst through the gate, slamming it 
open so hard, the whole fence shook. I pushed open the front door with my 
shoulder, and all three of us staggered into the living room. 

Gasping for breath, I dropped to my knees on the carpet. 

Cole and Anthony collapsed onto the couch. 

We struggled to catch our breath. I brushed my hair back off my sweaty 
forehead. The clock on the mantel chimed. Three o’clock. 

Cole and Anthony burst out laughing. 

I narrowed my eyes at them. “What’s so funny?” I demanded breathlessly. 

That made them laugh even harder. 

“What’s so funny, guys?” I repeated. I climbed to my feet and pressed my 
hands into my waist, waiting for an answer. “Why are you laughing?” 

“I don’t know!” Cole answered finally. 

“I don’t know, either!” Anthony echoed. 

And they both laughed again. 

“You’re crazy,” I muttered, shaking my head. “That wasn’t funny. It was 
scary.” 

Cole pulled himself up. His expression turned serious. “Did you see the 
way Vanessa stared at us?” 

“She didn’t see Franny and Jeremy,” Anthony said. “She only saw us.” He 
pulled off his glasses and cleaned them on his T-shirt sleeve. The short black hair 



on his round head glistened with sweat. 

I felt a chill. “What if Vanessa decides to do something terrible to us?” I 
demanded. “You two won’t be laughing then.” 

Cole pulled himself up even straighten He ran a hand back through his 
wavy blond hair. Cole is tall and even skinnier than me. Sometimes I think he 
looks like a grasshopper. 

“Crystal, what do you mean?” he demanded softly. 

“I mean, if Vanessa thinks we were the ones who filled her mailbox with 
water, maybe she’ll pay us back. You know. Make our heads swell up or 
something.” 

“But we didn’t do anything!” Anthony protested. “We have to tell her it was 
Franny and Jeremy.” 

“Snitch,” Cole muttered, grinning at his friend. 

“Maybe she won’t give us a chance to explain,” I said. “Maybe she’ll just 
do something horrible to us.” 

I started to the kitchen. “You guys want something to drink?” 

I didn’t hear their replies. 

I pulled open the fridge and took out a bottle of iced tea. 

A second later, I opened my mouth in a loud scream of pain. 



4 


“Crystal—what happened?” Cole came running into the kitchen. 

I shuddered in pain. “Ohhhh.” 

“What happened ?” he cried. 

I shook my hand, trying to shake away the throbbing. “The fridge door,” I 
managed to choke out. “I—slammed it on my hand.” 

I shook my hand some more. Then I tested each finger. I could move them. 
Nothing broken. 

I raised my eyes to Cole. “Why are you grinning?” I demanded. 

“You didn’t slam your hand,” he replied. “Vanessa did!” 

Anthony giggled from the doorway. 

“Cole—you’re not funny!” I screeched. I wrapped my fingers around his 
scrawny neck and pretended to strangle him. But my hand still hurt. I had to let 

go- 

“Vanessa cursed you,” Anthony said, picking up where Cole had left off. 
“Now your hand will probably swell up to the size of a cantaloupe.” 

“And it will get soft and squishy like Tommy’s head,” Cole added gleefully. 
“Soft and squishy—like your brainl” 

“Not funny! Not funny!” I insisted. I admit it. I felt a little afraid. I didn’t 
like kidding around about this stuff. 

My hand ached and burned. I opened the freezer and stuck it inside. “What 
if Vanessa really has powers?” I asked them. “What if she really did make me 
slam the door on my hand?” 

Cole and Anthony raised their hands in front of them and began moving 
them back and forth, as if casting spells on me. “You are a sponge head !” Cole 
cried, lowering his voice, trying to sound like a real sorcerer. “You will mop up 
the dinner dishes with your head!” 

That’s when Mom and Dad walked in. 

“What on earth—?” Mom cried. “Crystal—why do you have your hand in 
the freezer?” 

“Oh. Uh...” I slid my hand out and closed the freezer door. “Just cooling 
off,” I said. 

Mom narrowed her eyes at me. “Cooling off one hand?” 



“Actually, I slammed a door on it,” I told her. 

“Vanessa slammed a door on it,” Cole corrected. 

“Vanessa?” Dad asked, crossing to the sink. 

“You mean that strange woman who lives outside of town?” 

“Have you been pestering that poor woman again?” Mom demanded. 
“Don’t you kids have anything better to do than sneak around and play tricks on 
her?” 

“We didn’t do anything,” Cole said. “Really.” 

“That’s the truth,” Anthony chimed in. 

“Then why did you mention Vanessa?” Mom asked Cole. 

I decided I’d better change the subject. “Where were you two?” I asked my 
parents. 

“Out back. Trying to decide where to put the fence for the vegetable 
garden,” Dad replied. He was washing his hands in the kitchen sink, something 
Mom always scolds him for. 

“If we didn’t have chickens, you wouldn’t need a fence,” I grumbled. “I 
think you should get rid—” 

“That reminds me,” Mom interrupted. “Cole, some of the chickens 
wandered all the way to the back. Would you go out and round them up, please?” 

“Chicken Roundup!” I exclaimed gleefully. I slapped Cole on the back. 
“Congrats! Your favorite job!” 

“But that’s not fair! I did the chicken roundup last time!” Cole wailed. “It’s 
Crystal’s turn!” 

“I fed them this morning,” I declared. “And it wasn’t even my turn. 
Besides, it’s easier for you to round them up. Because you look like a big 
rooster!” 

Everyone laughed except Cole. He grumbled and shook his head. Then he 
grabbed Anthony and pulled him outside to help with the chicken roundup. 

A few seconds later, I could hear a lot of clucking and squawking back 
there. And I could hear the boys shouting and complaining. 

Did you ever try to herd chickens? 

It isn’t easy. 

My hand ached all day from slamming it in the fridge door. And every time it 
ached, I thought of Vanessa. 

And I pictured her cold eyes, staring at the boys and me. 



She isn’t going to do anything to us, I told myself. She can ’t do anything to 
us. Those stories about Vanessa can’t be true. 

I kept repeating this to myself. But that night, I had trouble falling asleep. 

I kept seeing a shadow move against my bedroom wall. The shadow of a 
cat. 

I climbed out of bed and pulled down the window blind. Now the room was 
bathed in total darkness. No shadows on the wall. 

I still couldn’t fall asleep. 

I stared wide-eyed into the blackness. 

“Crystal, go to sleep,” I instructed myself. “You are scaring yourself for no 
reason.” 

A creaking sound made me jump. 

A crack of gray light at my bedroom door. 

Another creak—and the streak of light grew wider. 

I swallowed hard. 

I watched the door slowly slide open. 

Staring in silence, I realized that someone was creeping into my bedroom. 

Someone wearing a black veil. And a long black dress. 

Vanessa! 



5 


I opened my mouth to scream. But only a low moan came out. 

I started to jump out of bed. But where could I run? 

She slid silently toward me, arms reaching out as if ready to grab me. Her 
face was hidden behind the heavy black veil. 

How did she get in the house? 

What is she going to do to me? 

The frightening questions fluttered through my mind. 

She leaned over my bed. Her hands moved to my throat. 

“No!” I choked out. 

I reached up. Pushed away her hands. Grasped her veil in both hands. And 
tugged it off. 

Cole! 

In the gray light from the open doorway, I could see his grin. 

“Cole—you jerk!” I shrieked. 

I tossed the veil down. Dove for him. Tried to tackle him to the floor. 

But I missed—and tumbled out of bed. 

“Cole—you creep! You scared me to death!” 

I don’t think he heard me over his gleeful laughter. 

I scrambled to my feet. He dodged away from me. Still cackling, he backed 
up to the doorway. “You really thought it was Vanessa!” he cried. 

“Did not!” I lied. “You just scared me, that’s all.” 

“Did too!” he insisted. “You thought it was Vanessa. You really thought she 
had come to pay you back!” 

“Did not! Did not!” I cried angrily. 

He made hand motions as if casting a spell. “Abracadabra! You’re a sponge 
head!” 

He started laughing again. He really thought he was a riot. 

“I’ll pay you back!” I promised him. “Really. I’m going to pay you back!” 

Shaking his head, he made his way out of the room, the long black skirt 
trailing over the floor. With an angry growl, I picked up the veil and heaved it 
after him. 



I punched my pillow furiously. Why did I let him fool me like that? Now 
he’d tell everyone in school that I thought Vanessa was sneaking into my room. 

My heart still pounding, I climbed back into bed. I felt so angry, it took me 
hours to fall asleep. And when I finally drifted off, I dreamed about a cat. 

An ugly black cat with bright yellow eyes and a blood-red tongue. 

The cat hunched in an all-white room. But then the room became my room. 

In the dream, the cat moved to the end of my bed. It opened its mouth wide. 
The bright red tongue darted over its yellow teeth. 

And then the cat began to screech. 

A sharp, painful sound—like fingernails dragged over a chalkboard. 

It screeched. And screeched. Its mouth opened wider. Its yellow eyes 
flamed. 

I couldn’t stand the sound. In the dream, I saw myself cover my ears with 
both hands. 

But the shrill screeching grew even louder. 

The cat floated closer. Closer. Opened its jaws wide, as if to swallow me. 

I woke up, stunned by the sudden silence. 

The dream had been so real. I expected to see the screeching cat standing 
on my bedcovers. 

Bars of yellow sunlight fell through the window blinds onto my floor. I saw 
the crumpled black veil beside the door. 

No cat. 

I stretched and climbed out of bed. Yawning, I got dressed for school. 

Mom was setting down a bowl of cornflakes and a glass of orange juice for 
me when I reached the kitchen. “Sleep well?” she asked. 

“Not at all,” I grumbled. I dropped into my seat at the breakfast table. “First 
I couldn’t get to sleep. Then I had an annoying nightmare.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. She crossed to the sink and began pouring water into the 
coffeemaker. 

I thought about telling her about Cole’s dumb joke. But I decided not to. 
Mom would only start asking us again about what we were doing at Vanessa’s 
house yesterday. 

“What are you doing after school, Crystal?” she asked, clicking on the 
coffeemaker. “Maybe you can come home and rest up then.” 

“No way,” I replied, swallowing a mouthful of cornflakes. “I’ve got 
basketball practice. Coach Clay says she’s going to give me extra playing time. I 



told her how tired I am of being the sixth girl. I want to be a starter. But I never 
get enough playing time to show how good I am.” 

Mom turned to me. She blew a strand of brown hair off her forehead. 
“Maybe that’s why you couldn’t sleep last night,” she said. “Maybe you were 
nervous about basketball practice.” 

I shrugged. I didn’t want to tell her the real reason. 

I heard Cole clomping down the stairs. Mom pulled out a cereal bowl for 

him. 

“When are you going to buy a birthday present for Lucy-Ann?” Mom asked 
me. “You know her birthday party is Saturday.” 

Lucy-Ann is one of my best friends. She has been talking about this 
birthday—her thirteenth!—for weeks. She’s so excited about becoming a 
teenager. 

“Maybe I’ll go shopping tomorrow after school,” I replied. 

“What are you going to get her?” 

I opened my mouth to answer, but Cole came charging into the room. 

One look at his face—and Mom and I both gasped. 

“Cole!” Mom cried. 

“My f-face...” he stammered. 

His cheeks and forehead were covered with big sores. Ugly red blotches. 
“It... hurts...” he groaned. He turned to me. “Vanessa,” he murmured. 
“Vanessa did this to me.” 



6 


Cole dropped to his knees and covered his face with his hands. 

I jumped up from my chair. “Cole—?” 

“I’ll call the doctor!” Mom cried. “Or should I dial 911?” She bent over 
Cole. “Does it really hurt? Are you really in pain?” 

Cole slowly lowered his hands. And as he did, I saw the broad grin on his 

face. 

And I saw that his hands had smeared the red blotches on his cheeks. 
“Cole!” I screamed furiously. 

Mom’s mouth dropped open. She had one hand on the phone, ready to call 
the doctor. 

“Red marker pen,” Cole said through his grin. Then he burst out laughing. 
“Aaaagggh!” I let out a furious cry—and heaved my cereal spoon at him. It 
bounced off his chest and clattered across the linoleum floor. 

“Not funny!” I screamed. 

Mom shook her head. “Cole, you really scared me.” She sighed. 

Cole stood up and pointed at me. “Crystal, you really believed Vanessa did 
it to me,” he accused. 

“Your jokes are just stupid!” I cried. “I’m never going to believe you again. 
Even if you get hit by a truck, I won’t believe you!” 

I spun around and stormed out of the kitchen. 

Behind me, I could hear Mom telling Cole, “You really have to stop scaring 
your sister.” 

“Why?” Cole asked. 

I grabbed my backpack, tore out of the house, and slammed the door behind 
me. 

I forced Vanessa from my mind. 

I didn’t think about her once that whole day. 

In fact, I didn’t think about her until the next time I saw her. 

And that’s when all the frightening stuff really started. 



7 


“Is that Lucy-Ann’s cake?” Cole asked. 

“Well, it says HAPPY BIRTHDAY, LUCY-ANN on it,” I replied. “So 
what’s your guess, genius?” 

Cole, Anthony, and I had our noses pressed against the window of the 
bakery. Several white-frosted birthday cakes were on display. Lucy-Ann’s stood 
in the middle of the shelf, ready to be picked up for her party on Saturday. 

I saw Mrs. Wagner waving to us from behind the counter inside the store. I 
waved back to her. Then I checked my watch. 

“Hey—I’m late,” I told the boys. “I’ve got to buy a present for Lucy-Ann. 
Then I’ve got to get home and study my math.” 

I hurried toward the Mini-Mart on the corner next to the grocery. My plan 
was to buy Lucy-Ann a new CD. At the end of the block, Mr. Horace’s old 
hound sprawled in the middle of Main Street, lazily scratching his mangy ear 
with a back paw, looking as if he owned the town. 

I heard Cole and Anthony laughing behind me. I turned and made a shooing 
motion with both hands. “Take a walk, guys. You don’t have to tag along with 
me.” 

They ignored me, as usual. 

Cole slipped an egg from his pocket. His eyes flashed mischievously. 
“Think fast!” he cried. He tossed the egg at Anthony. 

Anthony cupped his hands and caught the egg. Without a pause, he tossed it 
back to my brother. 

“Oh, please,” I begged. “Not this stupid game.” 

Cole had to stretch—but he caught the egg in one hand. 

This is one of their games that drives me crazy. They throw an egg back and 
forth, back and forth as they walk. Each time they throw it, they stand a little 
farther apart from each other. 

The idea is to see how far they can toss the egg without breaking it. 

The answer usually is: not too far. 

One of them always ends up with egg splattered all over him. Once I made 
the mistake of trying to dive between them and intercept the egg. Too bad I 
intercepted it with my forehead. 



“Please, guys,” I begged. “Go do your egg toss somewhere else—okay?” 

Cole backed up into the middle of the street. A few feet away, Mr. Horace’s 
old hound yawned and rolled onto his back. I saw two men in overalls pulling 
enormous burlap bags of feed from the Feed Store across the street. 

“Yo!” Cole called—and heaved the egg high in the air. 

Anthony raised a hand to shield his eyes from the sun. He backed up, back, 
back—nearly to the grocery store. 

And the egg plopped down on top of his head. 

What a disgusting craaack it made. Really gross. 

“Huh?” Anthony uttered a startled gasp. And yellow goo started to flow 
down his forehead and the sides of his hair. 

“Sorry. It got away from me!” Cole cried. But he couldn’t keep a straight 
face. He burst out laughing. 

Anthony let out an angry growl and charged at Cole. 

Cole dodged away from him and ran up onto the sidewalk. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” I shouted. 

Roaring like an angry lion, Anthony dove at my brother and pinned him 
against the grocery store window. “You did that on purpose!” he shouted. 

“No way! It was an accident!” Cole replied, laughing. 

Anthony lowered his egg-gloppy head and head-butted Cole in the chest. 

“Ooof!” My brother let out a groan. 

Anthony pulled back his head and prepared another head butt. 

Cole glanced down at his T-shirt. It was drenched in sticky egg yolk. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” Shrieking at them, I dove between them. I grabbed 
Anthony’s shoulders and tried to tug him off Cole. 

I didn’t see Vanessa step out of the grocery store. 

None of us did. 

“Get off 7” I begged Anthony. I gave him a hard tug. 

And all three of us bounced hard into Vanessa. 

First I saw her black dress. Then I saw her pale face. Saw her dark eyes go 
wide with surprise. 

I saw her mouth fall open. Her hands fly up. 

And two bags of groceries bounced to the sidewalk. 

I heard one bag rip. And I heard cans and bottles clatter onto the street. 

The sound of shattering glass made me turn to the street. I saw a puddle of 
deep red ketchup that had leaked from a broken ketchup bottle. A carton of eggs 



lay open and shattered in the gutter. 

I still had Anthony’s shoulders gripped in both hands. A shiver ran down his 
body. He pulled free of me with a hard jerk. 

“Sorry!” he cried to Vanessa. “I’m really sorry!” 

Then he jumped over some of her groceries—and went running into the 
street. 

“Whooooa!” Anthony cried out as he tripped over the hound dog. He went 
down face first on the pavement on top of the dog. 

The dog didn’t make a sound. It hardly moved. 

Anthony struggled to his feet. Then he roared off behind the Feed Store. He 
disappeared without ever looking back. 

“Oh, wow,” I murmured, staring down at the ruined groceries all over the 
street. “Oh, wow.” 

Cole stood beside me, breathing noisily, shaking his head. 

The dog loped over slowly, favoring one leg. He lowered his head and 
began licking egg yolk off the pavement. 

I turned to Vanessa and nearly gasped when I saw the look of fury on her 
cold, pale face. 

As her eyes locked on mine, I felt as if I’d been stabbed—by an icicle. 

A shiver of fear made me take a step back. I grabbed Cole’s arm. I started to 
pull him away. 

But Vanessa stepped forward, her long black dress sweeping along the 
sidewalk. She pointed to Cole with a slender finger tipped in black nail polish. 
Then she pointed at me. 

“Chicken chicken,” she whispered. 



8 


A smile spread over Vanessa’s black-lipsticked lips as she rasped those words at 
us. 

“Chicken chicken.” 

I gasped as if I’d been slapped. 

The street tilted in front of me. Then it started to spin. 

What on earth did she mean? Why did she say that? 

Cole and I didn’t wait to ask her. Our sneakers thudded the pavement as we 
took off, running at full speed. 

I glimpsed the old hound dog, still lapping up egg yolk from the street. And 
I glimpsed Vanessa’s angry face for one more brief second. 

And then Cole and I whipped around the corner, sped past the post office 
and the dry cleaner, and ran all the way home. 

I didn’t glance back once. And I didn’t say a word until we were safely in 
the kitchen. 

I collapsed onto a kitchen stool. Cole ran the cold water in the sink and 
splashed it over his face and hair. 

We were both panting and wheezing, too breathless to speak. I wiped the 
sweat off my forehead with my arm. Then I crossed to the fridge and pulled out a 
small bottle of water. Twisting off the cap, I tilted it to my mouth and drank it 
down. 

“We should have stayed,” I finally managed to sputter. 

“Huh?” Cole turned to me. He had water dripping down his red face. The 
front of his T-shirt was soaked. 

“We should have stayed and helped Vanessa pick up her groceries,” I told 

him. 

“No way!” Cole protested. “She’s crazy! Did you see the look on her face?” 

“Well... we knocked down all of her groceries,” I said. 

“So? It was an accident,” my brother insisted. “Accidents happen all the 
time, right? But she... she wanted to destroy us!” 

I rubbed the cool bottle against my pounding forehead. “Why did she say 
that to us?” I asked, thinking out loud. “Why did she whisper like that?” 

Cole changed his expression. He reached out his hand and pointed a finger 



at me. Then he did a pretty good Vanessa imitation. “Chicken chicken!” he 
rasped, shaking his finger at me. 

“Stop it!” I snapped. “I mean, really. Stop it, Cole. You’re giving me the 
creeps.” 

“Chicken chicken,” he whispered again. 

“Come on. Give me a break,” I pleaded. I crushed the plastic bottle in my 
hand. “It’s just so weird,” I murmured. “Why did she say that word? Why?” 

Cole shrugged. “Because she’s crazy?” 

I shook my head fretfully. “She isn’t crazy. She’s evil,” I said. I wrapped my 
arms around myself. “I just have this feeling that something horrible is going to 
happen now.” 

Cole rolled his eyes. “Crystal—what could happen?” 



9 


“Did you buy a present for Lucy-Ann?” Mom asked at dinner. 

I swallowed a forkful of spaghetti. “Well... actually... no.” 

She gazed up at me in surprise. “But I thought you went into town to buy 
her a CD.” 

“Pass the Parmesan cheese,” Dad interrupted. So far, those were his only 
words this evening. Guess he had a bad day at work. 

“I don’t understand,” Mom insisted. “What did you do after school, 
Crystal?” 

“Nothing, Mom.” I sighed. “Can we change the topic?” 

“You have spaghetti sauce all over your chin,” Cole pointed out. 

I made a face at him. “Very helpful,” I muttered. “Guess I’ve been sitting 
across the table from you for too long. I’m picking up your habits.” 

He stuck out his tongue at me. He had half a meatball on his tongue. Very 
mature. 

“I forgot to ask you about basketball practice yesterday,” Dad chimed in. 
“How did that—” 

“Bad topic!” I interrupted. 

Mom set down her fork. She blew a strand of hair off her forehead. “Guess 
every topic is a bad one tonight, huh?” 

“Maybe,” I grumbled, lowering my eyes to my plate. I shook my head. “I 
was terrible at practice. Coach Clay gave me a chance, and I played like a perfect 
klutz.” 

“No one’s perfect,” Cole chimed in. 

“Cole, be quiet,” Mom scolded. 

“Doesn’t anyone want to hear about my sprained thumb?” Cole whined. 

“No,” Mom shot back. “Be quiet.” She turned back to me. “You didn’t play 
well?” 

“I—I tripped over my own dribble. Twice,” I stammered. “And I missed an 
easy layup. The ball didn’t even touch the rim.” 

“Well... next time...” Dad started. 

“But this was my big chance to show I can be a starter!” I cried. “And I 
blew it. I just felt so tired. I hadn’t slept the night before. And... and...” 



“You’re still the sixth player,” Mom said soothingly. “You’ll get a chance.” 

“Do you have team practice tomorrow?” Dad asked, helping himself to 
more salad. 

I shook my head. “No. Tomorrow afternoon is chorus practice. Cole has it, 
too. You know. The chorus is performing for the junior high graduation next 
month.” 

“I get to sing two solos,” Cole bragged. “I’m the only fifth grader in the 
chorus—and I’m the only one with perfect pitch.” 

“No one’s perfect,” I reminded him. I know. It was a really lame joke. No 
one laughed. 

Mom lowered her eyes to Cole’s hand. “How did you sprain your thumb?” 
she asked. 

“I didn’t,” Cole replied. “I was just trying to get into the conversation.” 

Mrs. Mellon, the music teacher, was a tiny, birdlike woman. She always wore 
gray sweaters and gray skirts or pants. With her feathery gray hair and snipped 
beak of a nose, she always reminded me of a sparrow. Or maybe a chirping 
chickadee. 

She called us her canaries. 

Greene County Middle School wasn’t big enough to have a music room. So 
the chorus met after school in a corner of the auditorium stage. 

There were eight kids in the chorus. Four boys and four girls. Mostly sixth 
graders, with a few younger kids like Cole thrown in. It was hard to put a chorus 
together in such a small school. 

Mrs. Mellon was late. So the boys shot paper clips across the stage at each 
other with rubber bands. And the girls talked about how dumb the boys were. 

When Mrs. Mellon finally arrived, her hands fluttering tensely at her 
feathery hair, she wanted to get right down to business. “Our performance is two 
weeks from tonight,” she announced fretfully. “And we really don’t know what 
we’re doing—do we?” 

We all pretty much agreed that we needed a lot more rehearsal time. Lucy- 
Ann, who is our only soprano, raised her hand. “Maybe we could lip-synch some 
songs,” she suggested. “You know. From records.” 

Everyone laughed. 

I studied Lucy-Ann. I wasn’t so sure she was joking. 

“No fooling around this afternoon,” Mrs. Mellon said sternly. “Let’s see 



how much we can get done when we’re being serious.” 

We sang our warm-up scales. We were interrupted when a large black 
spider dropped from the rafters into Lucy-Ann’s curly blond hair. She shrieked 
and staggered back. And she began shaking her head wildly and tugging at her 
curls with both hands. 

Finally, the spider dropped onto the stage floor, and Cole tromped on it. 

“Isn’t that bad luck or something?” a boy named Larry called to my brother. 

Cole shrugged and scraped the sole of his shoe against the floor. 

“Let’s begin with ‘Beautiful Ohio’,” Mrs. Mellon suggested, ignoring the 
whole spider problem. She shuffled sheet music on her music stand. “That’s the 
one that gave us so much trouble last time.” 

“It’s the high part that’s the problem,” Lucy-Ann chimed in. 

“It’s your voice that’s the problem!” Larry teased Lucy-Ann. I think he has 
a crush on her. He’s always insulting her. 

Mrs. Mellon cleared her throat. “Please, folks. Serious. Serious.” She turned 
to Cole. “Have you been practicing your solo?” 

“Oh, yeah. Sure,” my brother lied. 

“Then let’s try it,” Mrs. Mellon suggested. “Remember, Cole—you wait 
three beats before you come in.” 

“No problem,” Cole told her. 

At the last rehearsal, he didn’t do it right once. 

Mrs. Mellon raised her arms. Smiled. And fluttered her hands, her signal for 
us to start. 

We began to sing “Beautiful Ohio”. It’s kind of a drippy song, but I like to 
sing the high part. 

“Very good. Very good,” Mrs. Mellon encouraged us as we sang, a tight 
smile on her face. 

It did sound pretty good. 

Until Cole began his solo. 

I saw him take a deep breath. He stepped forward. Waited for three beats. 
Opened his mouth. 

And sang: “BLUCK BUCK BUCK BLUUUCK BLUCK.” 

“Huh?” Mrs. Mellon gasped. 

We all stopped singing. I stared hard at my brother. 

He had a confused expression on his face. He kept clearing his throat. 

“Sing the words, Cole,” Mrs. Mellon instructed sternly. “You do know the 



words—right?” 

Cole nodded. 

“Let’s begin with the chorus just before Cole’s solo,” she told us. 

We began again. As I sang, I kept my eyes on my brother. 

I saw him count off the three beats. Then: 

“BLUCK BLUCK BLUCK CLUCK BUCK!” 

What was he trying to prove? 

Larry laughed. But no one else did. 

Cole kept rubbing his neck and clearing his throat. His face was bright red. 

“Areyou okay?” I mouthed the words to him. 

He didn’t answer me. 

“Cole—please!” Mrs. Mellon pleaded. “Stop fooling around. We really 
haven’t time.” She frowned at him. “You have a beautiful voice. I know you can 
sing this. Will you please do your part?” 

She raised her hands. “Begin on three,” she told him. “One... two... 
three...” She began conducting with one hand. “Now let’s hear your best,” she 
urged. 

“BLUCK BLUCK BUCK BUCK BUCK!” my brother clucked in a high, 
silly voice. 

I stepped away from the other girls and rushed up to him. “Cole—what is 
the big idea?” I cried furiously. “Why are you doing that?” 

“BLUCK BLUCK BUCK CLUCK BLUCK,” he replied. 



10 


Later, I was up in my room, wrapping Lucy-Ann’s birthday present. I glanced to 
the doorway and saw Cole standing there tensely. 

His blond hair stood up straight on top of his head. He was wiping his 
sweaty hands on the front of his T-shirt. 

“What do you want?” I asked sharply. “I’m busy.” I folded a corner of the 
birthday wrapping paper and taped it down over the CD case. 

Cole cleared his throat, but didn’t reply. 

I shook my head at him. “You ruined the whole rehearsal,” I told him. 

“It wasn’t my fault!” he cried shrilly. 

“Hah!” I slammed my scissors down on the desk. “You refused to sing. You 
stood there clucking like a hen! Whose fault was it?” 

“You don’t understand—” Cole croaked, tenderly rubbing his throat. 

“No, I don’t,” I interrupted angrily. “You know, we’re all tired of your 
dumb jokes. Especially me. You just think you’re so funny all the time, Cole. 
But you’re really such a pain.” 

“But I wasn’t being funny!” he protested, stepping into the room. He 
walked up to the desk and fiddled nervously with the tape dispenser. “I didn’t 
want to cluck like that. I—I couldn’t help it.” 

I rolled my eyes. “For sure,” I muttered. 

“No—really, Crystal. I—I think Vanessa made me do it! I think she made 
me cluck like that!” 

I laughed. “I’m not stupid, you know,” I told him. “I may fall for the same 
joke of yours once or twice. But I’m not going to fall for it again.” 

“But Crystal—” 

“It wasn’t funny,” I repeated. “And it wasn’t fair for you to ruin the whole 
rehearsal for everyone.” 

“You don’t understand!” Cole protested. “It wasn’t a joke. I really had to 
cluck. I—” 

“Out!” I shouted. I made shooing motions with both hands. “Out of my 
room—now!” 

His face turned bright red. He started to say something. Changed his mind 
with a defeated sigh. Turned and slumped out of my room. 



“Anything for a joke, huh, Cole?” I murmured to myself. 

I’m usually not that mean to my brother. But this time he deserved to be 
taught a lesson. 

I finished wrapping the present. Then I did homework until bedtime. 

I turned out the light and was climbing between the sheets when I heard a 
chicken clucking. 

That’s weird, I thought. I never hear the chickens at night. They’re all 
locked in their coop. 

“Cluuuuck bluuuuuck. ” 

Sitting up, I stared across the dark room to the open window. My curtains 
fluttered in a soft breeze. A triangle of pale moonlight slanted over the carpet. 

Did the chicken coop door come open? I wondered. 

Did a chicken escape somehow? 

“Bluuck bluuck buuck. ” 

The cry seemed to be coming from close to the house, beneath my bedroom 
window. 

Watching the fluttering curtains, I climbed out of bed and crossed the room 
to the window. The moonlight washed over me, cold and silvery. 

“Bluck bluck cluck. ” 

I leaned on the window ledge. Peered down to the ground. 

And gasped. 



11 


Nothing down there. 

No chicken. 

I stared at the silvery ground. Then moved my eyes to the long chicken 
coop beside the garage. It sort of looked like a long, low, wooden doghouse. The 
door was shut tight. Nothing moved inside its tiny round windows. 

“Bluuuuck bluuuck. ” 

Feeling confused, I pulled my head inside. Where was that clucking coming 
from? 

From inside? 

“Cluuck cluuuck. ” 

Yes. I could hear it through the wall. The wall to my brother’s room next 

door. 

Why is he doing that? I asked myself, climbing back into bed. Why is he in 
there clucking in the middle of the night? 

What is he trying to prove? 


* * * 


I knew Lucy-Ann’s birthday party would be fun. Lucy-Ann always throws great 
parties. 

She comes from a big farm family. She has seven brothers and sisters. 

Their big farmhouse is always filled with great smells—chickens roasting, 
pies baking. Lucy-Ann’s parents are the most successful farmers in Goshen 
Falls. And they’re really nice people, too. 

Lucy-Ann invited the whole class to her party, and about two dozen of her 
relatives. It was a beautiful spring afternoon. And a lot of people were already 
hanging out in the yard in front of the tall, white farmhouse when I arrived. 

Lucy-Ann has a lot of little cousins. As I hurried up the gravel drive, I saw 
a bunch of them hanging around the side of the utility barn. Lucy-Ann’s dad was 
giving tractor rides, and the little kids were jumping up and down, wrestling 
each other in excitement, waiting their turns. 

I met Lucy-Ann at the top of the drive and handed her the wrapped-up CD. 



She studied the square-shaped box and grinned. “Wow. I’ll never guess 
what this is!” she joked. 

“Okay, okay. So I’m not too original,” I replied with a shrug. 

“You don’t know what a perfect present it is,” she said as we began to walk 
across the grass to the others. “Mom and Dad got me a Discman for my birthday 
—but no CDs.” 

I laughed. “Well, now you’ve got one,” I said. “At least I know you don’t 
already have it!” 

Lucy-Ann’s expression turned serious. “Are you going to chorus rehearsal 
tomorrow morning?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. We really need to practice.” 

“I’ll be a little late,” Lucy-Ann said. “We usually don’t get back from 
church till after eleven-thirty.” She frowned. “Did you talk to your brother? Why 
did he act like such a total jerk yesterday? What was all that horrible clucking? 
Did he think it was funny or something?” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. I guess.” Then I added with a sigh, “No way I can 
explain my brother. Sometimes I think he’s from Mars.” 

Lucy-Ann laughed. “Tell me about it,” she muttered. “I’ve got four 
brothers!” 

I waved to a couple of girls from my class who were leaning against the 
broad trunk of an old maple tree. I walked over to talk to them. 

I like a lot of kids in my class, although I don’t get to see some of them 
outside of school. You see, Goshen Falls is so tiny, and we have the only middle 
school for miles. So kids are bussed to our school from all over the county. 

That means some of my friends live over thirty miles away. When I want to 
call them at night, it’s a long-distance call! 

It was a nice party. We stayed outside the whole time. Lucy-Ann cranked up 
the volume on her tape player, and we all danced. I mean, all the girls danced. A 
couple of the boys joined in. But most of them stood on the grass, making jokes 
about those who were dancing. 

I really had fun—until birthday cake time. 

And then the fun turned to horror. 



12 


As the afternoon sun started to lower itself behind the farmhouse, Lucy-Ann’s 
mom carried out the birthday cake. Actually, she carried out two cakes—one 
vanilla from the bakery and one chocolate that she baked herself. 

“With so many kids in our family,” Lucy-Ann explained to me, “no one 
could ever decide what kind of cake everyone liked best. So Mom always has to 
bake an extra for every birthday!” 

We all grabbed plates and gathered around the long, white-tableclothed 
table to sing “Happy Birthday” to Lucy-Ann. Beside the two cakes stood a 
blueberry pie about the size of a pizza! 

It took a long while to light the candles on both cakes. The wind kept 
gusting and blowing some of the candles out. 

Finally, Lucy-Ann’s parents got them all lighted, and we sang “Happy 
Birthday”. Lucy-Ann looked really pretty standing behind the cakes, the 
flickering candlelight dancing over her face and curly blond hair. 

She seemed to be staring at me as we sang. 

And I suddenly realized that something was wrong. 

That loud clicking sound I heard—it was coming from me! 

My lips were clicking together noisily as I sang. 

As soon as the song ended, I rubbed my lips with my finger. They felt very 
dry. Sort of cracked and dry. 

“Crystal—what kind of cake?” Lucy-Ann was asking. I gazed up to see her 
and her mother slicing the cakes. 

I held my plate up. “A little bit of both?” I couldn’t decide, either. 

Balancing my plate and fork in one hand, I walked off to join some friends. 
“Looks good,” I said. 

I mean, I tried to say it. But it came out, “Tcccck tccccck. ” Sort of a metal 
click. 

I ran my tongue over my lips. So dry. 

“Tcccck tcccccck. ” 

I tried to chew a forkful of cake. But each bite made that loud clicking 
sound. 

I licked my lips again. 



Tried to chew. 

I started to choke. I couldn’t chew the cake. 

“Ckkkkkkk tccccck. ” 

A few kids were staring at me. 

“Crystal, are you okay?” someone asked. 

I clicked a reply. Then I hurried to Lucy-Ann at the table. “Do you have any 
Chap Stick?” I demanded shrilly. 

My lips clicked as I talked. She struggled to understand me. 

“Chap Stick?” I repeated. “Chpsttttccck?” 

She nodded, narrowing her eyes to study me. “In the medicine chest. 
Downstairs bathroom on the left.” She pointed. 

I set down my cake plate and took off, running across the grass. I pulled 
open the screen door and flew into the house. It smelled sweet inside, from all 
the cake and pie baking. 

I turned to the left, into the hallway I knew my way. I’d spent a lot of hours 
with Lucy-Ann here. 

The bathroom door stood open. I stepped inside, clicked on the light, and 
shut the door behind me. 

Then I dove to the medicine cabinet and gazed into the mirror. 

It took my eyes a few seconds to adjust. But when I could finally focus on 
my lips—I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror. 



13 


Bright red, my lips poked out from my face. 

I ran a finger across them. Both lips were bumpy. Hard and bumpy. 

I tapped my lips with my finger. It made a soft click. 

My lips were hard. They didn’t feel like skin anymore! They felt as hard as 
fingernails! 

“Tcccck tcccck. ” 

I clicked them. Opened and closed my mouth. Staring hard at the ugly 
reflection in the mirror. 

Had my lips grown some sort of crust? Were my real lips underneath? 

I raised both hands and struggled to pull the crusty part off. 

But no. No crust. The hard lips were attached to my face. 

“Oww!” I gasped. My lips clicked shut. 

“What is happening to me? It—it’s like a bird beak! I can’t let anyone see 
me like this!” I cried out loud. 

I banged the mirror with both fists. This can’t be happening! I told myself 
in a complete panic. It can ’t\ 

I tried to pull the hard beak lips off one more time. 

“Crystal—calm down. Calm down!” I instructed myself. I took a deep 
breath and forced myself to turn away from the mirror. 

It’s an allergic reaction, I decided. 

That’s all. I ate something I am allergic to. 

It will disappear in a few hours. And if it doesn’t disappear, Dr. Macy will 
know how to shrink the lips back to normal and make them soft again. 

I took another deep breath. My whole body was shaking. I was trembling so 
hard, my lips were clicking. 

I shut my eyes. Then I turned back to the mirror. I opened them, praying my 
real lips would be back. 

But no. 

“A bird beak,” I murmured in a shaky whisper. “It looks like a bird beak.” 

Click click. 

I ran my tongue over the bumpy lips. 



Ow. The hard lips scratched my tongue. 

I can’t let anyone see me like this! I decided. I’ll sneak out the front door 
and run home. I’ll explain to Lucy-Ann later. 

I shut off the light and pulled the bathroom door open a crack. No one in the 
house, I saw. 

Everyone was still out in the back, enjoying the cakes and pie. 

Will I ever enjoy cake again? I wondered. 

Or will I have to pull up worms from the ground and suck them through my 
bird lips? 

Sickening thoughts. 

I crept along the living room. Then pushed open the front door—and 
escaped. 

As I ran to the road, I could hear the happy voices from behind the house. 
Kids were laughing and shouting over the boom of dance music. 

I turned and started running full speed toward home. I hoped no one could 
see me. 

The sun had sunk behind the trees. Evening shadows reached across the 
ground toward me. 

My lips clicked as I ran. My heart pounded. I ran all the way home without 
slowing down once. Luckily, I didn’t run into anyone I knew on the street. 

Mom and Dad’s car was gone. I ran up the driveway and into the house 
through the kitchen door. 

Cole turned shakily from the sink. “Crystal—!” he cried. I could tell 
instantly that something was wrong. 

I turned my face away. I didn’t want him to see my ugly bird mouth. 

But he rushed forward, grabbed my arm, and turned me around. “Mom and 
Dad aren’t home,” he murmured. “I—I have to show you something.” 

“Cole—what is it?” I demanded, my lips clicking. “Why are you —click 
click —wearing that bath towel around your neck?” 

“I... need help,” he replied, lowering his eyes. 

He slowly unwrapped the blue bath towel. Then he slid it off his neck. 
“Look,” he insisted. 

I gasped. 

Feathers! 

He had white feathers poking out from his neck and shoulders. 



14 


“Cole—when did this happen?” I shrieked. 

“BLUCCCK BLUUUCK BUCCCCK,” he clucked, his eyes wide with 
horror. 

“Stop it!” I cried angrily. “This is no time for your stupid clucking!” 

And then I realized that he had tricked me again. The feathers weren’t 
really growing from his body. He had glued them on or something. 

“BLUUUCK. I... can’t... stop the clucking!” he choked out, rubbing his 
throat. 

“Yeah. Sure,” I replied, rolling my eyes. I reached out and plucked a white 
feather from the back of his neck. 

I expected the fake feather to slide off easily. 

But my brother’s hands shot up. “OUCH!” he screamed. 

The tip of the feather left a small hole in his skin. I grabbed a big feather on 
his shoulder—and pulled it. 

“Hey—careful!” Cole cried, moving away from me. “BLUUUCK 
CLUUUCK. That really hurts!” 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “They’re real! You... you’re really growing —click 
click —feathers!” 

“Uh... uh... uh...” Cole started to whimper. His feathery shoulders shook 
up and down. 

“Take it easy,” I told him. I guided him gently into his room. “I’ll pull them 
off. I’ll be really careful. You’ll be okay.” 

I made him sit down on the edge of the bed. I leaned over him and started to 
pluck out the white feathers. I tried to be as gentle as I could. But he jumped 
each time I tugged one out. 

“We’ve got to tell Mom and Dad,” he said softly, his eyes lowered to the 
floor. “Ouch.” 

“They’re almost all out,” I told him. I plucked a long one off the back of his 
neck. He jumped. “No problem. You will look perfectly normal.” 

“But we’ve still got to tell Mom and Dad,” he insisted. 

“Do you think they’ll believe us?” I asked. My hard lips clicked with each 
word. 



Cole gazed up at me. “Hey—what’s up with your lips?” 

“Oh—I—uh...” I covered them with one hand. “Just chapped,” I said. 
“Very chapped.” 

I don’t know why. I didn’t want to let him know that weird things were 
happening to me, too. 

“You look disgusting!” Cole exclaimed. “Yuck!” 

It seemed to cheer him up a lot. 

I tugged the last two feathers out as hard as I could. 

“Hey—!” he cried out angrily. He rubbed a hand over the back of his neck. 

I stepped back. White feathers covered the bed and floor. “You’d better pick 
them up,” I clicked. 

He clucked in reply. 

I still had one hand over my mouth. I didn’t need any more comments from 
him about how disgusting my lips looked. I hurried to the bathroom to find some 
cream for them. 

Mom and Dad stayed out very late. Cole and I tried to stay awake because we 
wanted to talk to them. But finally, we gave up and went to bed. 

Sunday morning I woke up late. The sun was already high in the sky. 
Orange sunlight washed over my room from the open window. A soft breeze 
ruffled my feathers. 

Huh? Feathers? 

“Ohhhh.” I sat up with a groan. My neck itched like crazy. My arms itched, 

too. 

I blinked myself awake. And stared at the white feathers up and down my 
arms. 

I opened my mouth to scream. But all that came out was a choked “goggle 
goggle goggle. ” Like a clucking hen. 

I leaped out of bed and hurtled to the dresser mirror. I pulled down the top 
of my nightshirt and gasped. My shoulders and arms were covered with fluffy, 
white and brown feathers. 

I brushed my hand over my lips. They had grown even harder. Hard as 
bone. 

I saw something move in the mirror. I twirled around to find Cole in my 
bedroom doorway. 

“Crystal—” he clucked. He staggered into the room. White feathers bristled 



on his shoulders and under his chin. They had grown back. 

“Look at me!” I clicked. 

“BLUCCK BLUCCCCK,” Cole replied. 

I turned back to the mirror and started frantically pulling off my feathers. It 
hurt each time. But I didn’t care. I wanted them off! 

It didn’t take long. I plucked them all off. Then I gathered them up and 
tossed them into the wastebasket. Then I helped Cole remove his feathers. 

His lips had hardened during the night. His fingernails had grown. His 
hands suddenly looked sort of like claws. 

“Vanessa,” he murmured. 

I stared at him. I knew instantly what he meant. 

I had been thinking the same thing all along. Remembering the horrible 
moment we spilled Vanessa’s groceries. 

“Yes,” I agreed. “I didn’t want to admit it. I didn’t want to believe it. But 
Vanessa did this to us. Vanessa is BLUUUUCCK BLUCCCK turning us into 
chickens.” 

“Chicken chicken,” he clucked. 

I heard clattering sounds downstairs in the kitchen. Mom and Dad! 

“We have to BLUUUUCK tell them!” I cried. “We have to tell them 
everything!” 

Cole and I both bolted for the bedroom door at the same time. We squeezed 
through together. Then we ran side by side down the hall. 

I could hear Mom’s voice from the kitchen. 

Cole and I started calling to her as we hurried down the stairs. 

“Mom—we need BLUUUCCK help!” I cried. “It’s Vanessa. She really 
does have BLUUUCCK CLUUCK powers!” 

“She’s turning us into chickens!” Cole called to Mom as we reached the 
downstairs hall and went running to the kitchen. “We’re growing feathers and 
everything!” 

“It’s the truth!” I cried. “You’ve got to help us. Cole and I—BLUUUCK— 
we’re both turning into chickens!” 

“That’s good news,” Mom replied calmly “I need two more chickens for the 
barbecue this afternoon.” 



15 


“Huh?” 

“Barbecue us?” 

Cole and I both gasped. Was Mom joking? 

As soon as we burst into the kitchen, I realized that Mom wasn’t talking to 
us. She was on the phone. She had her back to us and was drumming her 
fingernails on the Formica counter beside the phone. 

My eyes swept over the kitchen. It was cluttered with pans and serving 
bowls, cut-up lettuce and tomatoes, a bag of potatoes, bottles of barbecue sauce, 
and a pile of chicken parts on a tray beside the sink. 

What a mess! 

“Mom—we... we CLUUUCK BLUUUCK have to talk to you!” I 
sputtered. 

She turned, still talking, and waved. She said a few more words, then hung 
up the phone. “You two slept so late,” she said, frowning at the wall clock. “It’s 
nearly noon, and our guests will be here in an hour or two.” 

“Mom—” I started. 

She wiped her forehead with the back of her hand and moved toward the 
sink. “Did you forget we’re having a big barbecue this afternoon? We’re having 
at least twenty guests, and—and—” She gestured to the pile of chicken parts. 

The sight of them made my stomach turn. 

“Cluuucck bluuuck,” Cole murmured. 

I stepped over to the sink. “We have to talk to you,” I said, taking Mom’s 
arm. “Cole and I—we have a problem. Areal problem.” 

“About the chorus practice you missed this morning?” Mom interrupted. 
She took a small brush and began slapping barbecue sauce on the chicken parts. 
Then she tossed each part in a big china bowl. 

“No, Mom. I—” 

“That was Mrs. Mellon on the phone,” Mom continued. “She wondered 
where you were. She was calling to make sure you two were okay.” 

“We’re not okay,” I said solemnly. 

“She’s such a nice woman. She’s bringing two barbecued chickens of her 
own this afternoon. For people who don’t like them hot and spicy the way I 



make them.” 

She turned to me. “Crystal, you can help me cut up the peppers.” 

“Mom—please!” Cole cried. “Stop talking about the chickens!” 

“We have something to tell you,” I said. 

“Your dad is out back, getting the barbecue grills ready,” Mom said, 
brushing red sauce on a wing. “Oh! Ice! We have to remember to buy ice!” 

“Mom—Cole and I are turning into chickens,” I told her. 

She laughed. “Ice and paper plates,” she murmured. “I don’t want to use 
real plates. Too much of a mess.” 

“No. Really!” I grabbed her arm. The brush fell into the chicken bowl. 

“Crystal—I really don’t have time,” Mom sighed. She blew a strand of hair 
off her forehead and picked up the brush. “You and Cole should get yourself 
some breakfast—or lunch. Then see if you can help your dad.” 

“BLUUUUCK!” Cole exclaimed. 

“Listen to me, Mom,” I begged. “Do you hear Cole clucking like that?” 

“Yes. Very nice clucking,” she murmured, tossing a leg into the bowl. 

“Do you see my lips?” I demanded. “Vanessa is doing this to us. We 
bumped Vanessa and spilled her groceries. So she is turning us CLUUUUCK 
into chickens.” 

“Please, you two,” Mom groaned. “Can’t you see how frantic I am? I don’t 
have time to—” 

She stopped when she glimpsed my lips. “Yuck! Those are really chapped.” 

“They’re not chapped!” I screamed. “I’m growing a beak!” 

“CLUUUCK BLUUUCK,” Cole added. 

Mom tossed up her hands. “Go put some cream on your lips, Crystal. And 
keep out of my way, okay? I don’t have time for jokes today. If you’re not going 
to help, just don’t make more trouble.” 

I turned to Cole. He shook his head unhappily. 

We both slumped out of the room. “Do you think Dad will listen to us?” 
Cole asked weakly. 

I clicked my lips. “I don’t think so,” I muttered. “He’s as busy as Mom is.” 

“Then what can we do?” Cole asked. He scratched his neck. Were the 
feathers growing back already? 

An idea popped into my head. “Anthony!” I cried. 

“Huh? What about him?” Cole demanded. 

“Anthony was with us!” I explained. “The same thing is probably 



happening to him. He’s probably changing into a chicken like us.” 

Cole rubbed his chin hard. “Cluuuuck. Bluuuuck. Yeah. Probably.” 

“So if all three of us tell our story to Mom and Dad, then maybe they’ll 
believe us!” I cried. 

“It’s worth a try,” Cole agreed excitedly. “Let’s hurry over to Anthony’s 
house.” 

We each grabbed a glass of orange juice. And a Pop-Tart, which we ate raw. 
Then we ran out the front door and headed to Anthony’s house. 

We had run less than a block when we bumped into Vanessa. 



16 


Well. This time we didn’t really bump into her. 

I saw her before Cole did, hurrying toward us on the other side of the street. 
Despite the heat, she was dressed all in black. She wore a black cotton shawl 
over the shoulders of her black dress. It fluttered behind her as she strode along 
the sidewalk. 

“Oh—it’s her!” Cole whispered, poking me in the side. 

We both stopped in the middle of the sidewalk and stared open-mouthed as 
she approached. 

Would she say something to us? 

Could I work up the nerve to say something to her? 

My heart pounded. My lips clicked nervously. 

Cole’s head started bobbing up and down on his neck. Just like a chicken. 
He let out a frightened cluck. 

My poor brother. 

Seeing him like that made me forget my fear. “Vanessa—!” I shouted. 

She kept walking, taking those long, gliding strides of hers. Her shawl 
fluttered behind her. 

“Vanessa—!” I repeated her name. 

She had a look of solemn concentration on her face. I don’t think she had 
even seen Cole and me. 

Finally, she stopped. She stared across the street at us as if she didn’t 
recognize us. 

“BLUUUUCK BLUUUCK!” my brother clucked angrily. 

That brought a smile to her black-lipsticked lips. She laughed, and her dark 
eyes flashed. 

She brushed back her straight, black hair. “Bluck bluck to you, too!” she 
called. “Chicken chicken!” Then she turned and hurried along the sidewalk. 

“Bluuuck—wait!” Cole called after her. His head bobbed frantically up and 
down. 

“You have to help us!” I cried, my hard lips clicking. 

Vanessa began walking faster. Her black hair flew behind her. She didn’t 
look back. 



We found Anthony fiddling around with a golf club in his front yard. He had 
borrowed one of his dad’s putters. And he had scooped out a hole in the middle 
of the grass. 

We watched him sink a long putt as we ran across the front lawn. He 
flashed us two thumbs up. “Awesome, huh? I’ve been practicing.” 

“Awesome,” I muttered. I was still thinking about Vanessa, still feeling 
really upset and frightened. 

“Bluuck buuck,” Cole said. 

Anthony narrowed his eyes at him. “What’s up, guys? My parents are going 
to your barbecue. But I have soccer practice.” 

Anthony pulled the ball from the hole and carried it a few feet away. He set 
it down, then leaned over the putter and prepared to putt again. 

“Anthony, has anything weird been happening to you?” I blurted out. 

“Yeah,” Cole chimed in. “In the last two days—anything really weird?” 

Anthony swung the golf club. It made a solid thwock as the club hit the ball. 
The ball sailed across the grass and stopped a few inches from the hole. 

Anthony raised his eyes to us. “Yeah,” he replied. “Something weird has 
been happening. How did you know?” 

“Because BLUUUCK the same weird thing has been happening to us,” I 
told him. 

He stared hard at me. “Huh?” 

Cole and I nodded. 

Anthony made a face. He pretended to study his golf club. “You mean you 
suddenly started putting really well, too?” he asked. 

It was our turn to be surprised. “Putting? What does putting have to do with 
it?” I cried. 

“Well, that’s what’s so weird,” Anthony replied. “Before this weekend, I 
was a lousy putter. Really bad news. I couldn’t even play mini-golf!” 

“So what?” Cole chimed in. 

“So this weekend I’m really good at it,” Anthony continued. He twirled the 
club in his hand. “All of a sudden, I’m not a bad putter. Don’t you think that’s 
weird?” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

“What about growing feathers?” Cole demanded. “And what about your 


lips?” 



Anthony’s face filled with confusion. Then he turned to me. “What’s with 
your brother? Is he going totally mental or what?” 

“Are you clucking all the time?” Cole asked Anthony. 

Anthony laughed. He cut it short quickly. “I don’t get it. Is this a joke or 
something, guys?” 

I pulled my brother to the driveway. “He doesn’t know what we’re talking 
about,” I whispered. “For some reason, it isn’t happening to him.” 

Cole’s head bobbed up and down. He let out a low cluck. 

“Let’s go,” I said. “Anthony isn’t going to be any help.” 

“I don’t get the joke,” Anthony repeated. 

“See you BLUUUCK later!” I called to him. I started pulling Cole down the 
street. “We’ve got to help out with the barbecue.” 

“Maybe I can come after soccer practice,” Anthony called. “Save me some 
chicken!” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I muttered unhappily. 

Guests were already arriving for the barbecue. I recognized my aunt Norma’s red 
Honda in the driveway. And I saw the Walker family from down the block, 
heading around the side of the house to the back. 

I ducked in through the front door and ran up to my room. I wanted to tell 
Mom what was happening to Cole and me. But I knew she was too busy. She 
wouldn’t listen. 

I closed the bedroom door carefully behind me. I didn’t want anyone to see 
me until I checked myself out. 

Sure enough, I found white and brown feathers sticking out from my neck 
and shoulders. 

The feathers had just poked through the skin. So it was really hard to pull 
them out. I had to use tweezers for the smaller ones. 

Pluck. 

Pluck. 

Pluck.... 

Ow. Did that hurt! 

I heard voices from down in the backyard. And through my bedroom 
window, I could see swirling smoke from the barbecue grills. 

Ugh. I had always loved the aroma of barbecuing chicken. But now it 
sickened me. I felt my stomach lurch. I gagged. I held my hand over my mouth 



—my beak!—and waited for the nausea to fade. 

I’ll stay up in my room, I decided. I won’t go downstairs. 

But then I heard Mom calling me from the kitchen. 

“Com-ing!” I yelled. I had no choice. I had to go down there. 

I crossed my fingers on both hands. My fingers suddenly felt so bony, so 
scraggly. My nails were long and pointed. Maybe no one will notice what is 
happening to me, I prayed. 

I made my way slowly downstairs to the kitchen. Mom had her hair tied up 
in a bun. She wore a long white apron, covered with barbecue sauce stains. 

She was mixing a big bowl of salad. But she stopped when I slipped into 
the room. “Crystal, where have you been? Guests are arriving. I need you to go 
out and be a hostess while I finish up in here.” 

“Okay, Mom. No problem,” I replied. I let out a couple of soft clucks. 

“See if there is enough ice,” Mom instructed. “And tell your dad he may 
need more charcoal. We—” 

She stopped suddenly, with a gasp. 

She stared out the window. “Crystal—what on earth is your brother doing 
out there?” 

I stepped up beside her and gazed out the window. “Oh, no!” I cried. 

I couldn’t believe what I saw. 



17 


Cole had climbed into the area fenced off for the chickens. He was down on his 
elbows and knees. There were chickens all around him. 

“What is he doing?” Mom repeated, raising a hand to one cheek. 

I knew what he was doing. But I knew this wasn’t the time to tell Mom. Not 
with twenty guests waiting for their dinner. 

I peered out the window. Cole was pecking seeds off the ground. 

I watched him lower his head to the gravel. I watched his lips open and his 
tongue slide out. I watched him suck up some chicken feed. His head bobbed up 
as he swallowed it down. 

“Why is your brother acting so dumb in front of company?” Mom asked, 
shaking her head. “Does he think that’s funny?” 

“I don’t know, Mom,” I replied. Cole’s head lowered, and he sucked up 
more seed from the gravel. 

People were laughing at him. Some just stared in confusion. 

“Well, go out there and stop him,” Mom ordered, turning back to the salad 
bowl. “Pull him away from the chickens and drag him into the house, Crystal. I 
want an explanation from him.” 

“Okay, Mom,” I murmured. 

I watched Cole pecking at seeds for a few seconds more. Then I made my 
way out the kitchen door and crossed the yard to the chicken area. 

“Cole?” I called softly. I stepped over the wire fence. “Cluuuck Cluuuck 
Cole?” 

I really did plan to bring him into the house to Mom. 

I really did plan to drag him away from there. 

But those seeds looked so delicious! 

I bumped some chickens out of the way. Then I dropped down on my 
knees, lowered my head—and started pecking away. 

The next day in school, I don’t think I heard a word anyone said. I couldn’t stop 
thinking about the barbecue. 

Of course, all of our guests thought what Cole and I did was some kind of a 
joke. They didn’t get the joke. But they knew it had to be a joke. 



Mom and Dad were really angry. They needed us to help out. But we were 
too busy pecking seeds with the chickens. 

Later, Mom was really upset when Cole and I refused to eat any of her 
barbecued chicken. “It was always your favorite!” she cried. 

Not anymore, I thought sadly. 

The idea of eating a chicken made my insides feel as if they were turning 
inside out! 

The next morning, I needed Cole’s help in pulling all the feathers from my 
neck and shoulders. Some big white feathers had poked out of my back, and I 
couldn’t reach them. 

It took us each twenty minutes to pluck out all the feathers that had grown 
during the night. We hid them in my sweater drawer. We didn’t want Mom or 
Dad to see them before we had a chance to explain. 

The school day went so slowly. My neck and back kept itching. I prayed 
that feathers wouldn’t grow while I was in school. 

And I prayed that none of my teachers would call on me in class. I was 
clucking more and more. It was becoming a real struggle to talk. 

My team had a basketball game in the gym after school against a girls’ team 
from the next county. I had looked forward to it all week. But now I just wanted 
to hurry home before any kids saw me clucking or pecking seeds from the 
playground. 

I dropped my books in my locker. And I was sneaking to the front door of 
the school—when Coach Clay turned the corner. “Crystal, I was looking for 
you!” she cried. 

“Cluck?” I replied. 

“Hilary has a bad cold. I’m going to let you start at forward today,” she told 
me. 

“Cluck—” I started. 

But she didn’t give me a chance to reply. She placed her hands on my 
shoulders, turned me around, and marched me to the locker room. “I know 
you’re going to be great,” she said. “Go get changed.” 

“Cluck,” I told her. Normally, I’d be totally pumped! I was going to be the 
starting forward. This is what I had dreamed about all year! 

As I changed into my uniform, the other girls all came over to slap me high 
fives and wish me good luck. 

Maybe I can do it, I told myself. Maybe I will play really well. Maybe I can 



show them just how good a player I am. 

But as soon as the game started, I knew I was in trouble. 
Big trouble. 



18 


Our team won the opening jump. I turned and began running to the other team’s 
basket. 

I leaned forward as I ran. My head bobbed up and down. 

Up and down. Up and down. 

Low clucks escaped my throat. 

I tried to straighten up. But I couldn’t. 

Our center took a shot. Missed. We all started to run back to the other 
basket. 

“Nooooo,” I moaned. 

To my horror, I realized that I couldn’t run without bobbing my head. 

I glanced to the sideline—and saw Coach Clay staring at me. “Crystal— 
what are you doing?” she called. 

I heard some kids laughing at me. 

“Crystal—stop goofing,” Gina, the other forward, scolded me. 

The action moved to our opponents’ basket, and I ran down court. My head 
bobbed up and down. I realized I was running stiff-legged. My knees no longer 
bent! 

The ball came sailing toward me. 

I couldn’t catch it. My hands were tucked under my armpits. My elbows 
were poked out like wings. 

I let out a loud cluck as the ball bounced off my shoulder. 

My head bobbed up and down. 

My teammates were yelling angrily at me. On the sideline, I saw Coach 
Clay shaking her head. Girls on the other team were laughing. 

Down the court. I tried to pry my hands from my armpits as I ran. My head 
bobbed. My lips clicked. 

I glanced down—and stopped. 

No! 

My legs. 

White feathers were sprouting up and down my legs. 

And everyone could see them. 



I heard a whistle blow. The referee called a time out. 

My teammates ran toward our bench. I took off in the other direction. I ran 
out of the gym and out of the school. 

I wanted to run and run and never stop. 

I hid in my room during dinner. I was so depressed—and frightened. I wanted to 
tell Mom and Dad everything. But what if they didn’t believe me? What if they 
thought it was all a joke? 

After dinner, Mom and Dad had to go to school for a Parents Association 
meeting. Cole and I waited until we heard the car pull away. Then we waddled 
downstairs to the living room. 

We were down on our knees, pecking crumbs in the rug. 

My body was covered with white and brown feathers. It would take hours 
to pull them all off. 

“I—CLUUUUCK—I’m so scared,” Cole stammered. 

“Me, too,” I confessed. I pecked at a big chunk of lint. 

“Crystal, what are we going to do?” Cole asked softly. 

I started to say, “I don’t know.” 

But I suddenly knew exactly what we had to do. 



19 


We crept out into a cool, windy night. The swirling wind ruffled my feathers. Up 
above, a pale half-moon kept sliding behind wispy clouds. 

Cole and I walked along the street that led to town. We tried to hurry. But 
our legs felt stiff, and our knees were hard to bend. 

Car headlights swept over the street toward us. We slipped behind a low 
hedge and hid, clucking softly. We didn’t want anyone to see us like this. And 
we didn’t want anyone to ask us where we were going. 

We passed through town, making our way along the backs of stores. Trees 
hissed and shook as the wind picked up. The air grew heavy and moist. I felt a 
few raindrops on my forehead. 

A sweet aroma made me take a deep breath. It came from the bakery. I 
realized that Mrs. Wagner must be baking doughnuts for tomorrow morning. 

A sad cry escaped my beak. Would I ever be able to taste a doughnut again? 
Or would I spend the rest of my life pecking my food off the ground? 

Cole and I turned onto the dirt path that led to Vanessa’s old farmhouse. 
The night grew darker—and colder—as soon as we moved away from town. 

Our shoes plodded heavily over the hard dirt path. A few minutes later, I 
could see the black outline of Vanessa’s house against the gray sky. 

“What are we CLUUUCK going to say to her?” Cole demanded softly. 

I brushed a raindrop off my eyebrow. My hand felt rough and scratchy, my 
fingers hard as bone. 

“I’m going to BLUUUCK tell her how sorry we are,” I replied. “I’m going 
to tell her we didn’t mean to knock over her groceries. That it was all a big 
accident. And we’re sorry we didn’t stay and help her pick them up. 
CLUUUUCK.” 

We stepped up to Vanessa’s wooden fence. The gate had been left open. It 
banged in the wind. 

I raised my eyes to the house. It hung over the tall grass like a low, dark 
creature. No lights on anywhere. 

Had she already gone to sleep? 

“I—I don’t bluuuck think she’s home,” Cole whispered. 

“Of course she’s home,” I replied sharply. “Where else would she cluuuuck 



be? There’s nowhere to go at night in Goshen Falls.” 

We stepped through the gate. I tried to latch it behind us to stop it from 
banging. But the latch was broken. 

“What do we say after we apologize?” Cole asked, hanging back. 

I placed a hand on his shoulder and guided him along with me to the front 

door. 

“Then we beg her to remove the spell,” I clucked. “We beg her to change us 
back to the way we were.” 

“Do you think she’ll do it?” he asked in a tiny voice. 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “But we’ll soon find out.” 

I knocked on the front door. 



20 


No answer. 

The gate banged behind us. Startled, Cole and I both jumped. 

I took a deep breath and pounded my scraggly fist on the door again. 

We waited, staring straight ahead. Listening to the harsh whisper of the 
trees, and to the banging gate. 

Silence in the house. 

I uttered a sigh of disappointment and turned to my brother. “You were 
right. Vanessa isn’t home.” 

We backed away from the house. Clouds floated away from the moon. The 
front window glinted with silvery moonlight. 

“Let’s peek inside,” I urged. 

We made our way to the window. Standing on tiptoes, we peered into the 
living room. 

In the silvery light, I stared at the dark shapes of furniture. Old-fashioned, 
high-back chairs. A long couch covered with pillows. Bookshelves from floor to 
ceiling. 

Everything was very old-looking. But I didn’t see anything strange or 
frightening. 

Then a stack of books caught my eye. They were piled on a small, square 
table beside the couch. The books were big and thick. And even in the pale light, 
I could see that their covers were old and cracked. 

Squinting into the room, I spotted two more of them, lying open on the low 
coffee table in front of the couch. 

“Cole—” I whispered, my heart starting to pound. “See those old books? 
Do you think they are books about magic?” 

“Huh?” He pressed his face against the glass. “What do you mean?” 

“You know. Bluuuck. Books about magic spells. Sorcery books. They look 
like they could be old spell books—don’t they?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. Maybe.” 

I plucked a white feather from under his chin. 

“Owww!” he yelped. “Why’d you do that?” 

I shrugged. “Sorry. It was bothering me.” I turned my face back to the 



window and stared at the old books. 

“Let’s go,” Cole urged, tugging my arm. “She isn’t here.” 

“But those books are here,” I replied, tugging myself free. “And if they are 
spell books, maybe we could find the right book. You know. Bluuuuck. With the 
right spell. And we could change ourselves back to normal!” 

Cole rolled his eyes. He clicked his beak. “Yeah. Sure. Then maybe I’ll flap 
my arms and lay an egg!” 

“Don’t be sarcastic,” I scolded him. “It may be a bad idea. But at least it’s 
an idea.” 

I pulled him to the front door. I turned the knob—and pushed. 

The heavy door creaked open. 

“Bluuuuck. Let’s just take a quick peek at those books,” I told my brother, 
stepping into the cool darkness of the house. “What have we got to lose?” 

I pulled Cole into the front hall. The house smelled of coffee and peppery 
spices. Sort of a sweet-sharp aroma. 

I led the way into the living room. Silvery light flooded in through the front 
window. 

The floorboards groaned beneath my shoes. I stopped beside the couch and 
stared at the pile of old books. 

I reached out for the book on top of the stack—when a furious shriek made 
me stop. 

“Ohhh!” I pulled my hand back. 

“Vanessa—!” Cole cried. 



21 


My breath caught in my chest. My heart skipped a beat. 

I spun around—and saw Vanessa’s cat leap onto the high back of an old 
armchair. 

The cat’s eyes flashed, golden in the pale light. It bared its teeth again in 
another angry hiss. 

“I—I thought it was Vanessa,” Cole murmured in a choked voice. “That cat 
cluuuuck doesn’t want us here.” 

“Well, we’re not staying long,” I told the cat. I motioned for Cole to come 
over to the couch. “Help me check out these books. If we find the right one...” 

As Cole passed by the chair, the cat swiped its claws at him. 

“Hey—!” Cole ducked away from it. 

“Cats don’t like chickens,” I whispered. 

I picked up one of the open books on the coffee table. I raised it close to my 
face and tried to read the title in the dim light. 

The print was smudged. The heavy cover was cracked with age and covered 
in a layer of dust. “I can’t read it,” I told Cole. 

I saw him move to the wall. “I’ll turn on a light,” he suggested. 

The cat hissed again. 

“No—don’t!” I called. “No light. If Vanessa comes back, we don’t want her 
to see us.” 

I rubbed my finger over the title. And tried to focus on it. 

“Hey—I don’t believe it!” I cried happily. 

“What is it, Crystal?” Cole called. “Did you find—” 

Before I could answer, the ceiling light flashed on. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out when I saw Vanessa standing by the wall. 



22 


I stumbled back. 

The book dropped from my hand. It thudded heavily on the floor at my feet. 

“Vanessa, I—” 

I swallowed hard. 

And realized I was staring at a painting. A huge oil portrait of Vanessa, 
hanging on the wall. 

“Oh, wow!” I cried. “That painting—it’s almost life-sized. I thought—” 

I turned to Cole. He stood by the light switch, staring at the big portrait. 

“Did you click on the light?” I demanded. 

“Yes,” he replied. “Sorry. I didn’t mean to bluuuck bluuuck scare you. I 
thought it would help you read the book title.” 

The book title! 

“Cole—I think I found the right book!” I cried. “The very first book I 
picked up.” 

I bent down and excitedly lifted the old book from the floor. 

Yes! 

“Cole—look!” I exclaimed, holding up the front cover. “It’s called Chicken 
Chicken Chicken. This has to be it! If I can find the spell that Vanessa used 
inside this book—” 

“Then maybe we can reverse it!” Cole cried. 

A loud bang from the front of the house made us both jump. The black cat 
screeched and jumped off the chair back. It scurried silently from the room. 

“Was that the gate—or was it Vanessa?” I cried. 

Cole clicked off the light. We listened, frozen in place. I gripped the old 
book closely to my chest. 

Silence now. Then another bang. Just the fence gate in the wind. 

“Let’s get out of here,” I whispered, raising my eyes to the front door. 

“Bluuuuck,” Cole replied. He turned and began walking stiff-legged to the 
door. Even in the dim light, I could see that a thick tuft of feathers had grown on 
the back of his neck. 

Vanessa’s cat stood on the hallway floor, arching its back as if ready to 



attack. We edged past it carefully. 

“Nice kitty. Nice kitty,” I murmured. 

Its angry expression didn’t change. 

I pushed open the door. The gusting wind caught it and nearly blew the 
door handle out of my hand. Cole and I stepped outside. I tugged the door shut. 

I carried the heavy book against my chest as we made our way home. We 
leaned into the wind. My hair fluttered up behind me like a pennant. 

Goshen Falls stood in darkness. All of the stores close early. The only 
bright lights were at the self-serve gas station on the first corner. 

Cole and I half-walked, half-trotted down the center of the street. I couldn’t 
wait to get home and find the spell that Vanessa had used on us. 

Finally, our house rose into view. The driveway was still empty. Mom and 
Dad hadn’t returned yet from their meeting at school. 

Good! I thought. Maybe I can find the spell and change Cole and me back 
to normal before they get home. 

I led the way up the stairs to my room, still clutching the book to my chest. 
Cole closed the door behind us. 

I dropped onto the edge of my bed and spread the big book on my lap. Cole 
stood beside me, clucking softly. Staring down at me as I rapidly flipped through 
the old pages, squinting hard at the tiny type. 

“Well?” Cole demanded impatiently. “Is it in there? Is the spell in there?” 

I didn’t reply. I turned the pages furiously, my eyes running down each 
column. Faster. Faster. I turned page after page, my heart pounding. 

“Well?” my brother demanded. “Well?” 

I slammed the book shut in disgust. 

“Noooooo!” I wailed. I tossed the book onto the bed. 

“Cole,” I cried, shaking my head sadly, “we’ve made a horrible mistake.” 



23 


Cole uttered a squawk of horror. The white and brown feathers on the back of his 
neck stood up on end. 

“Crystal—what’s wrong?” he choked out. 

“It’s the wrong book!” I cried, jumping up from the bed. I left a pile of 
feathers where I’d been sitting. “It’s a cookbook! It’s a whole book of chicken 
recipes!” 

“Yuck!” Cole cried. 

The idea sent a wave of nausea up from my stomach. My arms suddenly 
itched. I gazed down and saw white feathers curling up from the skin. 

“We have to go back there,” I told my brother. My beak clicked loudly. It 
stretched out in front of my chin now. My teeth were sinking into my gums, 
about to disappear completely. I really had to struggle to form words. 

Cole swallowed hard. “Go back?” 

“Before it’s too late,” I whispered. “Before we’re completely chicken—not 
human at all.” 

He gulped and didn’t reply. 

I hoisted up the book and started waddling to the bedroom door. I stopped 
in shock when I glimpsed my reflection in the dresser mirror. 

My eyes! My head! 

My eyes had changed into small, round circles. And the shape of my head 
was changing, too. Growing narrow. My eyes were far apart now, moving to the 
sides of my head. 

“No! Oh, noooooo!” I opened my beak in a mournful wail. 

“Come on—let’s hurry!” Cole urged. He grabbed my hand. Feathers 
brushed feathers. The backs of our hands had sprouted a thick layer of short, 
white feathers. 

“Yes. Hurry!” I repeated, bobbing my head up and down. 

We made our way down the stairs and out the door. Back out into the dark, 
wind-swirled night. 

I had a strong urge to bend down and peck some gravel from the driveway. 
But I fought it off and trotted to the street. 

We had to hurry back there. Back to Vanessa’s house. 



Would we make it in time? 


The trip was normally a ten-minute walk. But it took Cole and me much longer. 
Partly because our chicken legs were so stiff. And partly because it’s a lot harder 
to see where you’re going when your eyes are on different sides of your head! 

The gusting winds softened a little as we finally reached Vanessa’s 
farmhouse. Pale moonlight cast shadows over the broken shingled roof. 

The windows were still dark. We leaned on the fence, catching our breath 
and studying the house. No sign that she had returned home. 

Clutching the heavy recipe book to my chest, I pushed past the gate and led 
the way to the front door. Once again, it opened easily. Cole and I stepped inside, 
inhaling the strange, spicy fragrance of the house. 

“Cluuuuck, Vanessa?” I called. “Hello? Anyone home?” 

A pair of yellow eyes glared at us from the banister. The black cat let out a 
yawn. Not at all surprised to see us back. And from the way it stared at us, not at 
all pleased to have its home invaded once again. 

“She isn’t here,” Cole whispered. “Let’s bluuuck bluuuck hurry.” 

I dropped the recipe book on the coffee table and turned to the stack of 
books beside the couch. As I turned, a bowl on the coffee table caught my 
attention. 

Sunflower seeds! 

I couldn’t resist. I poked my head into the bowl and began sucking the tasty 
seeds into my beak. 

“Crystal—what are you doing?” Cole cried in a hoarse whisper. “Get away 
from there!” 

He grabbed a book from the stack and began frantically pawing through it. I 
pecked up a few more seeds. Then I grabbed a book, too. 

Cole let out a triumphant squawk. “These books—they’re all magic books!” 
he declared. 

“You’re bluuuck right,” I agreed. “Hundreds and hundreds of magic spells.” 

Cole flipped rapidly through the pages of his book. His eyes were 
practically spinning! “How will we ever find the right one?” he demanded. 

“I think I just found it,” I told him. 

I carried the book to the window and held it up to the moonlight to see it 
better. 

Yes! 



“What does it say?” Cole asked excitedly. He dropped his book and came 
bobbing across the room to me. 

“It’s a whole cluuuuck page of chicken spells,” I replied, holding the book 
up to the window. “This one is called 'Human into Chicken’. That sounds right 
—doesn’t it?” 

“No. Find ‘Chicken into Human’!” Cole exclaimed. 

My eyes swept over the pages. “No such thing,” I told him. “We’ll just have 
to reverse the ‘Human into Chicken’ spell.” 

“Well, go ahead!” he cried, his feathery head bobbing up and down 
excitedly. “Reverse it! Do it! What do we have to do?” 

I saw that he was so excited, he couldn’t stand still. He tucked his hands 
under his armpits, stuck out his elbows to form wings—and began clucking 
round and round in a circle. 

“Cole—bluuuck bluuck bluuuck!” I scolded. 

He ignored me and kept clucking away. Flapping his arms and making a 
small circle over the floor. 

I turned back to the book and carefully read the spell. It didn’t look too 
hard. It didn’t call for any special ingredients. It was just a bunch of words that 
had to be said rapidly. And the spell caster had to cluck a lot and do a simple 
dance. 

Then, according to the book, you point at the poor victims and whisper, 
“Chicken chicken!” 

Just as Vanessa had done to us. 

“It looks pretty easy,” I told Cole. “Stop dancing around, and I’ll bluuuck 
try it.” 

He stopped his frantic flapping and circling. He turned to me. “Don’t forget 
to cluuuck bluuck,” he called. 

I knew what he meant. He was reminding me to do the spell backwards. 

Hmm... I glanced over the spell. That wasn’t going to be so easy. But I had 
no choice. I had to try it. 

Balancing the heavy, old book in one hand, I pointed to Cole, then to 
myself, with my free hand. “Chicken chicken,” I whispered. 

Okay. That was the very end of the spell. 

I lowered my eyes to the bottom of the page. And I started to read the 
words, going up: “Cluck cluck chick. Chick cluck cluck chick.” 

The spell instructed me to take three steps forward and two to the right. Sol 



took two steps to the left, then three steps back. 

I moved my scrawny chicken finger over the words, being careful to read 
them in reverse order: 

“Chick cluck chick cluck. Cluck cluck chick.” 

Then, following the instructions backwards, I took two giant steps, then 
three steps to the right. I flapped my arms and clucked four times. 

Then I read the first words of the spell at the top of the page: “Cluck cluck 
chick cluck. Cluck chick cluck.” 

That was it. 

That was the whole spell. I had done it completely backwards. 

Would it work? Would reversing Vanessa’s spell turn Cole and me back to 
normal? 

Would it do anything at all? 

Yes. 

Suddenly, I began to feel strange. My arms and legs began to itch like crazy. 
The feathers up and down my arms shot straight out. 

The book fell from my hand and thudded loudly to the floor. 

Egg-shaped spots sparkled in front of my eyes. 

When the spots faded, the room turned purple and started to tilt. 

“Hey—something is happening!” Cole cried in a tiny voice. He sounded 
far, far away. 

Yes, something is happening, I agreed, grabbing the window ledge to keep 
from falling. 

Something is happening. 

But what? 



24 


I felt so dizzy. The room rocked and swayed. 

The floor suddenly appeared so far away. I blinked. Once. Twice. 

The floor still seemed a mile below. 

“Cluck cluck, Cole—?” I turned to my brother. Then I let out a shrill 
squawk of horror. 

Now I knew why the floor seemed so far down. Cole and I had GROWN! 

We weren’t chickens anymore. We were BIIIIIG chickens! 

“I—I’m as big as a horse!” I cried. 

I gazed up. The ceiling was only an inch or two above my head. 

Cole uttered a startled moan. His whole body trembled. Enormous feathers 
shook free and fell to the floor. He flapped his arms, and more feathers tumbled 
off him. 

I saw Vanessa’s black cat back into the hallway. Its yellow eyes were wide 
with fear. It arched its back and raised its tail and hissed at us furiously. 

I took a step toward Cole. My big, feathery body bobbed in front of me. “I 
—I must have bluuuuuck done something wrong!” I told my brother. 

Cole hopped up and down, bobbing his head. He clicked his beak, but no 
sound came out. Finally, he choked out, “Crystal—try again.” 

Yes. He was right. I had to try to reverse the spell again. 

Maybe I couldn’t turn us back into humans. But I might be able to shrink us 
back to our normal size. 

I bent over to find the book on the floor. It was hard to find. I was so tall, 
the book looked about the size of a CD case! 

It wasn’t easy to pick it up, either. It kept sliding out from my scraggly 
chicken fingers. 

It seemed like hours before I managed to find the spell again. Then I raised 
the little book up close to my right eye and began to perform the spell backwards 
once again. 

Please, please, I prayed. Let me get it right this time. Please, let Vanessa’s 
spell reverse itself. 

I finished up with the final: “Cluck cluck chick cluck. Cluck chick cluck.” 

Would it work? 



I heard Cole let out a choked cluck from across the room. 

Once again, I began to feel weird. The egg-shaped spots sparkled in front of 
my eyes, blinding me with their brightness. 

I shut my eyes. 

I could feel the room tilting and swaying. 

I tried to grab hold of something. But my hands grasped only air. 

“Ooooh!” I let out a low moan as I felt myself start to fall. Yes. I was 
falling... falling... 

When I opened my eyes, I didn’t know where I was. The room had 
disappeared. I was surrounded by darkness. Surrounded by... 

Whoa! 

I gazed up at the book. The book of spells—it rested beside me on the floor. 
But it had grown! The book was taller than me! 

“Cheep cheep!” I cried. 

“Cheep cheep cheep,” I heard Cole’s tiny reply. 

I spun around to find him. “Cheep?” 

“Cheep cheep!” 

He was a little yellow chick! I swallowed hard. I knew what that meant. 
That meant that I was also a tiny yellow chick! 

I had reversed the spell—too much! 

I struggled to speak—but I could only make a tiny cheep cheep sound. My 
tiny feet clicked on the wooden floor. 

“Cheep cheep?” Cole asked. The poor little guy sounded so frightened. 

My tiny heart was pounding in my feathery yellow chest. I suddenly felt so 
angry. Why was this happening to us? Why did Vanessa think she had a right to 
do this to us? 

I pecked my little beak furiously against the floor. I had no other way of 
letting out my anger. 

But I didn’t have much time to be angry. 

A dark blur of motion made me raise my eyes. 

I saw the giant shadow. No. It was Vanessa’s cat. The cat perched on the 
desk next to an old-fashioned-looking typewriter. 

Its tail smacked the typewriter as the cat dropped to the floor. 

It crossed the room quickly, silently—and rose up over me, its eyes glowing 
with excitement. 

It pulled back its lips, revealing its enormous teeth. 



“Cheep cheep!” I squeaked. I froze in fear. 

The cat pounced. 

I felt its front paws wrap around my tiny, soft body. 
Then the paws began to squeeze. 



25 


I tried to kick. I tried to thrash my arms. Tried to wriggle free. 

But I was helpless against the giant cat. 

Its big paws squeezed me until I could barely breathe. 

Then it grabbed my head in its paws. 

And lifted me—up. Up. 

The cat dangled me in the air for a few seconds. 

I wanted to scream. 

I wanted to break free. 

But I was helpless. Too weak and tiny to do anything. 

The cat’s eyes flashed as it dangled me in front of its face. Then it opened 
its mouth wide—and stuffed me inside. 

Ohhhh. The cat’s hot breath roared over me. The inside of its mouth felt so 
hot, so disgustingly sticky and wet. 

“Cheep cheep cheeeep!” I squealed. 

The cat bounced me around on its tongue. 

And then—to my surprise—spit me out. 

I fell hard onto my side on the floor. Behind me, I could hear Cole cheeping 
weakly. 

I scrambled to my feet. I wanted to run. 

But the cat grabbed me again. Lifted me high off the floor in its rough 
paws. 

I saw the cat’s head, tilted at an angle. I saw a gleam of silvery drool on its 
fangs. Felt its hot, sour breath roll over me once again. 

The cat raised me high. Higher. 

Is it going to swallow me this time? I wondered. 

Is it going to shove me into its mouth and swallow me? 

No. The purring creature let me drop back to the floor. 

I landed on my back. My tiny feet clawed the air. 

Before I could scramble to my feet, the cat picked me up again—this time 
by the foot. It swung me from side to side in front of its open mouth. 

It’s playing with me, I realized. 



The cat is playing with its food! 

And when it’s finished playing... then it will eat me! 

I could hear Cole cheeping down on the floor. The cat held me in one paw, 
dangling me in front of its face. Then it began batting me with its other paw, 
making me spin. 

The spinning made me dizzy. I shut my eyes as the cat dropped me once 
again to the floor. 

I landed on my side and lay there. I felt so weak, so frightened. I didn’t 
even try to move. 

Panting hard, I waited for the cat to pounce again. Waited to feel its claws 
wrap around me. Waited to be lifted into the air again. 

Waited... 

When it didn’t pounce, I lifted my head. I struggled to focus. 

Where was it? 

I could hear my brother cheeping in terror somewhere across the floor. 

I climbed slowly to my feet. I ruffled my feathers, which were wet and 
sticky from being inside the cat’s mouth. 

Where was the cat? Why did it stop torturing me? 

The lights flashed on. 

“Eeeeep!” I uttered a shrill shriek as a big face lowered itself toward me. 

Vanessa! 

“Well, well!” her voice boomed in my tiny ears. “What have we here?” 

Her hand swooped down and grabbed me off the floor. 



26 


She swooped me up, then picked up Cole, too. She perched us in the palm of her 
hand and held us close to her pale face. A pleased smile spread across her black- 
lipsticked lips. 

“I see you found my spell book, little duckies,” she teased. “Let me guess. 
You must be Crystal and Cole.” 

Cole and I cheeped loudly and hopped up and down in protest. 

Vanessa laughed. “You’re both so cute!” she exclaimed. “What a shame I 
had to teach you a lesson.” She tsk-tsked. 

“Cheep cheep!” I squeaked. 

I wanted to ask why she had done this to Cole and me. I wanted to promise 
her that no matter what it was we had done—we’d never do it again. I wanted to 
demand that she change us back—now. 

But all I could do was cheep ! 

“What should I do with you two?” Vanessa asked, her dark eyes flashing. 
“Should I send you back out? It’s a long way to your house from here. You’d 
probably be eaten before you got there.” 

“Cheeeeep!” Cole and I pleaded. 

How could we communicate with her? How could we talk to her? How? 

I suddenly had an idea. 

The old typewriter on the desk. Vanessa was holding Cole and me right 
above it. 

I glanced down. A sheet of white paper lay curled in the typewriter. Yes! I 
thought. Yes! Our only chance. 

I didn’t take another second to think about it. 

I leaped from Vanessa’s palm. And landed with a hard plop on the desktop. 

“Hey, chickie—!” I heard Vanessa’s startled cry. She lowered her hand to 
pick me up again. 

But I jumped onto the typewriter keys. Lowered my head. And began 
pecking away with my hard little beak. 

I pecked a V Then I hopped up to the left and pecked an A. As Vanessa’s 
hand swooped to grab me, I slid back down to the bottom row and pecked an N. 

Vanessa’s hand stopped inches above me. Could she see what I was doing? 



Did she figure out that I was typing her a message? 

The E was nearly at the top of the keyboard. I stumbled on the keys and 
nearly typed the wrong letter. But I hit the E, then backed up a step and pecked 
two S’s. 

I glanced up. Yes! She was watching. She had Cole resting in her palm. She 
leaned over the desk, and her dark eyes stared down at the sheet of paper. 

I was gasping for breath by the time I finished. My little heart was 
pounding. It was such hard work! But I typed the whole message: 

VANESSA, WE’RE REALLY SORRY. WE DIDN’T MEAN TO SPILL 
YOUR GROCERIES. WE CAME TO APOLOGIZE. 

I dropped weakly onto the desktop. So exhausted, I could barely move. 

I turned and raised my eyes to Vanessa. 

Would she help us? Would she accept our apology? Would she change us 
back to normal? 

Vanessa brought her face down close to me. “Your apology is a little too 
late,” she said coldly. “There’s nothing I can do.” 



27 


Cole uttered a pitiful “Cheep.” 

I raised myself up with a sigh. Then I stumbled back wearily onto the 
typewriter keys. 

PLEAS, I pecked out. 

I was so tired, I didn’t have the strength to push down the E at the end. 

I gazed up hopefully at Vanessa. She stared down at the word I had typed. 
She tapped her chin with her black fingernails. 

“Well...” she said finally. “I like the way you say ‘please’.” She lifted me 
up gently and set me down in her palm beside Cole. 

“Politeness is so important,” Vanessa said, holding us up to her face. 
“Especially for young people. That’s what I care about more than anything else 
in the world. Good manners.” 

Her dark eyes narrowed at us. “That day in front of the grocery,” she 
scolded, “you didn’t apologize for crashing into me. So I had no choice. I had to 
punish you.” She studied us, tsk-tsking. 

So that’s why Anthony wasn’t turned into a chicken, too! I realized. Before 
he ran away, Anthony had called out to Vanessa that he was sorry. 

If only Cole and I had apologized then! We wouldn’t be peeping little 
chicks today. 

But how were we to know that Vanessa was such a manners freak? 

She carried us over to a tall bookshelf and held us close to the books. “Do 
you see my collection?” she asked. “All etiquette books. Dozens and dozens of 
manners books. I have dedicated my life to manners.” 

She gazed at us sternly. “If only kids today weren’t so rude. I wish I could 
help you two. I really do. But your apology came too late. Far too late.” 

She set us both down on the desk. I guess her hand was getting tired. She 
mbbed it tenderly with her other hand. 

Now what? I wondered. 

Was she going to send us home like this? Vanessa was right. Cole and I 
would never make it. Some dog or cat or raccoon would turn us into dinner 
before we went a block or two. 

I cheeped in panic. My tiny feathers stood straight up. What could we do? 



I had one last, desperate idea. 

One more time, I climbed onto the typewriter keyboard. And I began to 
type... 

THANK YOU FOR EXPLAINING TO US. AND THANK YOU FOR 
TRYING TO TEACH US TO BE POLITE. YOURS TRULY, COLE AND 
CRYSTAL 

I said it was a desperate idea. About as desperate as a chicken can get. But I 
stared up at Vanessa, watching her read it. Hoping... hoping... 

“I don’t believe it!” Vanessa exclaimed. She tore the sheet of paper from the 
typewriter and read it again. “A thank-you note!” she cried. “You wrote me a 
thank-you note!” 

She gazed down at Cole and me with a broad smile. “No kids today ever 
write thank-you notes!” she cried. “This is the politest thing I ever saw!” 

She danced around with it. “A thank-you note! An actual thank-you note!” 

And then she turned. Pointed a finger at Cole, then at me. Mumbled some 
words. And pointed again. 

“Whooooa!” I cried, feeling my body grow. I felt like a balloon inflating. 
The little yellow feathers fell away. My hair grew back. My arms... my hands! 

“YAAAAAY!” I cried. Cole joined my happy cheer. 

We were back! Vanessa had changed us back—to us\ 

We pinched each other, just to make sure. Then we tossed back our heads 
and laughed. We were so happy! 

Vanessa laughed, too. We all laughed gleefully together. 

Then Vanessa turned and started toward the kitchen. “Let me get you both a 
drink,” she offered. “I know how thirsty these spells can make a person.” 

“Thank you!” I cried, remembering how important politeness was to 
Vanessa. 

“Yes—thank you!” Cole added loudly. 

We grinned at each other. We pinched each other again. Skin! Real skin— 
with no feathers! 

I moved my lips. I licked them with my tongue. Soft, human lips that didn’t 
click. 

Vanessa returned with two glasses of soda. “I know kids like cola,” she 
said. She handed a glass to me and a glass to Cole. “Drink up,” she urged. 
“You’ve been through a lot.” 

I did feel terribly thirsty. I took a few long sips of the cola. It felt cold and 



tingly on my tongue. Wonderful! Better than seeds off the carpet. 

Wow. I was so happy to be me again. 

I raised my eyes and saw Cole tilt his glass to his mouth and drink the soda 
down. He was really thirsty! 

When he finished, he lowered his glass—and let out the loudest burp I ever 
heard! 

Cole burst out laughing. 

I couldn’t help myself. 

It was such a funny burp, I started laughing, too. 

I was still laughing when Vanessa stepped in front of me. 

What is her problem? I wondered. 

Then she pointed her finger, first at Cole, then at me. And whispered, “Pig 

Pig-” 




DON’T GO TO 
SLEEP! 

Goosebumps - 54 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Klonk! “Ow! The Klingon got me!” 

I rubbed my head and kicked my life-sized photo of a Klingon—one of 
those warlike aliens on Star Trek —out of the way. I’d been reaching for one of 
my favorite books, Ant Attack on Pluto, when the big hunk of cardboard fell off 
the top shelf and klonked me on the head. 

I kicked the Klingon again. “Take that, you evil piece of cardboard!” 

I was fed up. My stuff kept attacking me. 

My room was packed with junk. Things were always leaping off the walls 
and whacking me on the head. This wasn’t the first time. 

“Uhn!” I gave the Klingon another kick for good measure. 

“Matthew Amsterdam, twelve-year-old geek.” My older brother, Greg, 
stood in my bedroom doorway, murmuring into a tape recorder. 

“Get out of my room!” I grumbled. 

Greg totally ignored me. He always does. 

“Matt is skinny, small for his age, with a round, piglike baby face,” he said. 
He was still talking into the tape recorder. 

“Matt’s hair is so blond that, from a distance, he almost looks bald.” Greg 
spoke in a deep, fake voice. He was trying to sound like the guy who describes 
animals on those nature shows. 

“At least I don’t have a Brillo pad sitting on my head,” I cracked. 

Greg and my sister, Pam, both have wiry brown hair. Mine is white-blond 
and really thin. Mom says my dad had the same hair as me. But I don’t 
remember him. He died when I was a baby. 

Greg smirked at me and went on in that Wild Kingdom voice. “Matt’s 
natural habitat is a small bedroom filled with science-fiction books, models of 
alien spacecraft, comic books, dirty socks, rotten pizza crusts, and other 
geekazoid stuff. How can Matt stand it? Scientists are puzzled by this. 
Remember, geeks have always been a mystery to normal humans.” 

“I’d rather be a geek than a nerd like you,” I said. 

“You’re not smart enough to be a nerd,” he shot back in his regular voice. 

My sister, Pam, appeared beside him in the doorway. “What’s happening 
here in Geek World?” she asked. “Did the mother ship finally come for you, 



Matt?” 

I threw Ant Attack on Pluto at her. 

Pam is in tenth grade. Greg is in eleventh. They gang up on me all the time. 

Greg spoke into his tape recorder again. “When threatened, the geek will 
attack. However, he is about as dangerous as a bowl of mashed potatoes.” 

“Get out!” I yelled. I tried to close the door, but they blocked it. 

“I can’t leave,” Greg protested. “I have a school project. I have to watch 
everybody in the family and write a paper about how they act. It’s for social 
studies.” 

“Go watch Pam pick her nose,” I snapped. 

Pam knocked Greg aside and pushed her way into the room. She grabbed 
me by the neck of my Star Trek T-shirt. 

“Take that back!” she ordered. 

“Let go!” I cried. “You’re stretching out my shirt!” 

“Matthew is very touchy about his geek clothes,” Greg mumbled into the 
recorder. 

“I said, take that back!” Pam shook me. “Or I’ll sic Biggie on you!” 

Biggie is our dog. He’s not big—he’s a dachshund. But he hates me for 
some reason. 

With everybody else—even total strangers—he wags his tail, licks their 
hands, the whole bit. With me, he growls and snaps. 

Once Biggie sneaked into my room and bit me in my sleep. I’m a heavy 
sleeper—it takes a lot to wake me up. But believe me, when a dog bites you, you 
wake up. 

“Here, Biggie!” Pam called. 

“Okay!” I cried. “I take it back.” 

“Good answer,” Pam said. “You win the noogie prize!” She started 
knocking me on the head. 

“Ow! Ow!” I gasped. 

“The geek’s sister gives him noogies to the head,” Greg commented. “Geek 
says, 'Ow’.” 

Finally Pam let me go. I stumbled and collapsed on my bed. The bed 
knocked against the wall. A pile of books rained down on me from the shelf over 
my head. 

“Give me that tape recorder for a second,” Pam said to Greg. She snatched 
it from him and yelled into the microphone. “The geek is down! Thanks to me, 



Pamela Amsterdam, the world is safe for cool people again! Woo! Woo! Woo!” 

I hate my life. 

Pam and Greg use me as their human punching bag. Maybe if Mom were 
around more, she’d be able to stop them. 

But she is hardly ever around. She works two jobs. Her day job is teaching 
people how to use computers. And her night job is typing at a law firm. 

Pam and Greg are supposed to be taking care of me. They take care of me, 
all right. 

They make sure I’m miserable twenty-four hours a day. 

“This room stinks,” Pam groaned. “Let’s get out of here, Greg.” 

They slammed the door behind them. My model space shuttle fell off the 
dresser and crashed to the floor. 

At least they left me alone. I didn’t care what mean things they said, as long 
as they went away. 

I settled on my bed to read Ant Attack on Pluto. I’d much rather be on the 
planet Pluto than in my own house—even with giant ants shooting spit rays at 
me. 

My bed felt lumpy. I shoved a bunch of books and clothes to the floor. 

I had the smallest bedroom in the house—of course. I always got the worst 
of everything. Even the guest room was bigger than my room. 

I didn’t understand it. I needed a big room more than anybody! I had so 
many books, posters, models, and other junk that there was barely room for me 
to sleep. 

I opened my book and started reading. I came to a really scary part. Justin 
Case, a human space traveler, was captured by the evil ant emperor. The ant 
emperor closed in on him, closer, closer... 

I shut my eyes for a second—just a second—but I guess I fell asleep. 
Suddenly I felt the ant emperor’s hot, stinking breath on my face! 

Ugh! It smelled exactly like dog food. Then I heard growling. I opened my 

eyes. 

It was worse than I thought. Worse than an ant emperor. It was Biggie— 
ready to spring! 



2 


“Biggie!” I screamed. “Get off me!” 

Snap! He attacked me with his gaping dachshund jaws. 

I dodged him—he missed me. I shoved him off the bed. 

He snarled at me and tried to jump back up. He was too short. He couldn’t 
reach the bed without taking a running leap. 

I stood on the bed. Biggie snapped at my feet. “Help!” I yelled. 

That’s when I saw Pam and Greg in the doorway, laughing their heads off. 

Biggie backed up to take his running jump. “Help me, you guys!” I begged. 

“Yeah, right,” Pam said. Greg doubled over laughing. 

“Come on,” I whined. “I can’t get down! He’ll bite me!” 

Greg gasped for breath. “Why do you think we put him on your bed in the 
first place? Ha-ha-ha-ha!” 

“You shouldn’t sleep so much, Matt,” Greg said. “We thought we had to 
wake you up.” 

“Besides, we were bored,” Pam added. “We wanted to have some fun.” 

Biggie galloped across the room and leaped onto the bed. As he jumped up, 
I jumped down. I scurried across the floor—slipping on comic books as I ran. 

Biggie raced after me. I ducked into the hallway and slammed the door just 
before he got out. 

Biggie barked like crazy. 

“Let him out, Matt!” Pam scolded me. “How can you be so mean to poor, 
sweet Biggie?” 

“Leave me alone!” I shouted. I ran downstairs to the living room. I plopped 
myself on the couch and flicked on the TV. I didn’t bother to surf—I always 
watch the same channel. The Sci-Fi channel. 

I heard Biggie bounding down the steps. I tensed, waiting for him to attack. 
But he waddled into the kitchen. 

Probably going to eat some disgusting doggie treats, I thought. The fat little 
monster. 

The front door opened. Mom came in, balancing a couple of bags of 
groceries. 



“Hi, Mom!” I cried. I was glad she was home. Pam and Greg cooled it a 
little when she was around. 

“Hi, honey.” She carried the bags into the kitchen. “There’s my little 
Biggie!” she cooed. “How’s my sweet little pup?” 

Everybody loves Biggie except for me. 

“Greg!” Mom called. “It’s your turn to make dinner tonight!” 

“I can’t!” Greg yelled from upstairs. “Mom—I’ve got so much homework 
to do! I can’t fix dinner tonight.” 

Sure. He was so busy doing his homework, he couldn’t stop driving me 
crazy. 

“Make Matt do it,” Pam shouted. “He’s not doing anything. He’s just 
watching TV.” 

“I have homework too, you know,” I protested. 

Greg came down the steps. “Right,” he said. “Seventh-grade homework is 
so tough.” 

“I’ll bet you didn’t think it was easy when you were in seventh grade.” 

“Boys, please don’t fight,” Mom said. “I’ve only got a couple of hours 
before I have to go back to work. Matt, start dinner. I’m going to go upstairs and 
lie down for a few minutes.” 

I stormed into the kitchen. “Mom! It’s not my turn!” 

“Greg will cook another night,” Mom promised. 

“What about Pam?” 

“Matt—that’s enough. You’re cooking. That’s final.” She dragged herself 
upstairs to her bedroom. 

“Rats!” I muttered. I opened a cabinet door and slammed it shut. “I never 
get my way around here!” 

“What are you making for dinner, Matt?” Greg asked. “Geek burgers?” 

“Matthew Amsterdam chews with his mouth open.” Greg was talking into his 
stupid tape recorder again. We were all in the kitchen, eating dinner. 

“Tonight the Amsterdams have tuna casserole for dinner,” he said. “Matt 
defrosted it. He left it in the oven too long. The noodles on the bottom are 
burned.” 

“Shut up,” I muttered. 

Nobody said anything for a few minutes. The only sounds were forks 
clicking against plates and Biggie’s toenails on the kitchen floor. 



“How was school today, kids?” Mom asked. 

“Mrs. Amsterdam asks her children about their day,” Greg said to the tape 
recorder. 

“Greg, do you have to do that at the dinner table?” Mom sighed. 

“Mrs. Amsterdam complains about her son Greg’s behavior,” Greg 
murmured. 

“Greg!” 

“Greg’s mother’s voice gets louder. Could she be angry?” 

“GREG!” 

“I have to do it, Mom,” Greg insisted in his normal voice. “It’s for school!” 

“It’s getting on my nerves,” Mom said. 

“Mine too,” I chimed in. 

“Who asked you, Matt?” Greg snapped. 

“So cut it out until after dinner, okay?” Mom asked. 

Greg didn’t say anything. But he set the tape recorder on the table and 
started to eat. 

Pam said, “Mom, can I put my winter clothes in the closet in the guest 
room? My closet is packed.” 

“I’ll think about it,” Mom said. 

“Hey!” I cried. “She has a huge closet! Her closet is almost as big as my 
whole room!” 

“So?” Pam sneered. 

“My room is the smallest one in the house!” I protested. “I can hardly walk 
through it.” 

“That’s because you’re a slob,” Pam cracked. 

“I’m not a slob! I’m neat! But I need a bigger bedroom. Mom, can I move 
into the guest room?” 

Mom shook her head. “No.” 

“But why not?” 

“I want to keep that room nice for guests,” Mom explained. 

“What guests?” I cried. “We never have any guests!” 

“Your grandparents come every Christmas.” 

“That’s once a year. Grandma and Grandpa won’t mind sleeping in my little 
room once a year. The rest of the time they’ve got a whole house to themselves!” 

“Your room is too small to sleep two people,” Mom said. “I’m sorry, Matt. 
You can’t have the guest room.” 



“Mom!” 

“What do you care where you sleep, anyway?” Pam said. “You are the best 
sleeper in the world. You could sleep through a hurricane! ” 

Greg picked up the tape recorder. “When Matt isn’t propped up in front of 
the TV, he is usually sleeping. He is asleep more than he’s awake.” 

“Mom, Greg talked into the tape recorder again,” I tattled. 

“I know,” Mom said wearily. “Greg, put it down.” 

“Mom, please let me switch rooms. I need a bigger room! I don’t just sleep 
in my room—I live there! I need a place to get away from Pam and Greg. Mom 
—you don’t know what it’s like when you’re not here! They’re so mean to me!” 

“Matt, stop it,” Mom replied. “You have a wonderful brother and sister, and 
they take good care of you. You should appreciate them.” 

“I hate them!” 

“Matt! I’ve had enough of this! Go to your room!” 

“There’s no room for me in there!” I cried. 

“Now!” 

As I ran upstairs to my room, I heard Greg say in his tape recorder voice, 
“Matt has been punished. His crime? Being a geek.” 

I slammed the door, stuffed my face in a pillow, and screamed. 

I spent the rest of the evening in my room. 

“It’s not fair!” I muttered to myself. “Pam and Greg get whatever they want 
—and I get punished!” 

Nobody is using the guest room, I thought. I don’t care what Mom says. I’m 
sleeping there from now on. 

Mom left for her night job. I waited until I heard Pam and Greg turn out the 
lights and go to their rooms. Then I slipped out of my room and into the guest 
room. 

I was going to sleep in that guest room. And nothing was going to stop me. 

I didn’t think it was that big a deal. What was the worst thing that could 
happen? Mom might get mad at me. So what? 

I had no idea that when I woke up in the morning, my life would be a 
complete disaster. 



3 


My feet were cold. That was the first thing I noticed when I woke up. 

They were sticking out from under the covers. I sat up and tossed the 
blanket down over them. 

Then I pulled the blanket back up. Were those my feet? 

They were huge. Not monster huge, but huge for me. Way bigger than 
they’d been the day before. 

Man, I thought. I’d heard about growth spurts. I knew kids grew fast at my 
age. But this was ridiculous! 

I crept out of the guest room. I could hear Mom and Pam and Greg 
downstairs, eating breakfast. 

Oh, no, I thought. I slept late. I hope no one noticed that I didn’t sleep in my 
room last night. 

I went to the bathroom to brush my teeth. Everything felt a little weird. 

When I touched the bathroom doorknob, it seemed to be in the wrong place. 
As if someone had lowered it during the night. The ceiling felt lower too. 

I turned on the light and glanced in the mirror. 

Was that me? 

I couldn’t stop staring at myself. I looked like myself—and I didn’t. 

My face wasn’t so round. I touched my upper lip. It was covered with blond 
fuzz. And I was about six inches taller than I’d been the day before! 

I—I was older. I looked about sixteen years old! 

No, no, I thought. This can’t be right. I’ve got to be imagining this. 

I’ll just close my eyes for a minute. When I open them, I’ll be twelve again. 

I squeezed my eyes shut. I counted to ten. 

I opened my eyes. 

Nothing had changed. 

I was a teenager! 

My heart began to pound. I’d read that old story about Rip Van Winkle. He 
goes to sleep for a hundred years. When he wakes up, everything is different. 

Did that happen to me? I wondered. Did I just sleep for four years straight? 

I hurried downstairs to find Mom. She’d tell me what was going on. 



I raced downstairs in my pajamas. I wasn’t used to having such big feet. On 
the third step, I tripped over my left foot. 

“Noooo!” 

THUD! 

I rolled the rest of the way down. 

I landed on my face in front of the kitchen. Greg and Pam cracked up—of 
course. 

“Nice one, Matt!” Greg said. “Ten points!” 

I dragged myself to my feet. I had no time for Greg’s jokes. I had to talk to 
Mom. 

She sat at the kitchen table, eating eggs. 

“Mom!” I cried. “Look at me!” 

She looked at me. “I see you. You’re not dressed yet. You’d better hurry or 
you’ll be late for school.” 

“But, Mom!” I insisted. “I’m—I’m a teenager!” 

“I’m all too aware of that,” Mom said. “Now hurry up. I’m leaving in 
fifteen minutes.” 

“Yeah, hurry up, Matt,” Pam piped up. “You’ll make us late for school.” 

I turned to snap back at her—but stopped. She and Greg sat at the table, 
munching cereal. 

Nothing weird about that, right? 

The only thing was, they looked different too. If I was sixteen, Pam and 
Greg should have been nineteen and twenty. 

But they weren’t. They weren’t even fifteen and sixteen. 

They looked eleven and twelve! 

They’d gotten younger! 

“This is impossible!” I screeched. 

“This is impossible!” Greg echoed, making fun of me. 

Pam started giggling. 

“Mom—listen to me!” I cried. “Something weird is going on. Yesterday I 
was twelve—and today I’m sixteen!” 

“You’re the weirdo!” Greg joked. He and Pam were cracking up. They were 
just as obnoxious now as they were when they were older. 

Mom was only half-listening to me. I shook her arm to get her attention. 

“Mom! Pam and Greg are my older brother and sister! But now suddenly 
they’re younger! Don’t you remember? Greg is the oldest!” 



“Matt has gone cuckoo!” Greg cracked. “Cuckoo! Cuckoo!” 

Pam fell on the floor laughing. 

Mom stood up and set her plate in the sink. “Matt, I don’t have time for 
this. Go upstairs and get dressed right now.” 

“But, Mom—” 

“Now!” 

What could I do? Nobody would listen to me. They all acted as if 
everything was normal. 

I went upstairs and got dressed for school. I couldn’t find my old clothes. 
My drawers were full of clothes I’d never seen before. They all fit my new, 
bigger body. 

Could this be some kind of joke? I wondered as I laced up my size-ten 
sneakers. 

Greg must be playing some crazy trick on me. 

But how? How could Greg get me to grow—and get himself to shrink? 

Even Greg couldn’t do that. 

Then Biggie trotted in. 

“Oh, no,” I cried. “Stay away, Biggie. Stay away!” 

Biggie didn’t listen. He ran right up to me—and licked me on the leg. 

He didn’t growl. He didn’t bite. He wagged his tail. 

That’s it! I realized. Everything has really gone crazy. 

“Matt! We’re leaving!” Mom called. 

I hurried downstairs and out the front door. Everybody else was already in 
the car. 

Mom drove us to school. She pulled up in front of my school, Madison 
Middle School. I started to get out of the car. 

“Matt!” Mom scolded. “Where are you going? Get back in here!” 

“I’m going to school!” I explained. “I thought you wanted me to go to 
school!” 

“Bye, Mom!” Pam chirped. She and Greg kissed Mom good-bye and 
hopped out of the car. 

They ran into the school building. 

“Stop fooling around, Matt,” Mom said. “I’m going to be late for work.” 

I got back into the car. Mom drove another couple of miles. She stopped... 
in front of the high school. 

“Here you are, Matt,” Mom said. 



I gulped. High school! 

“But I’m not ready for high school!” I protested. 

“What is your problem today?” Mom snapped. She reached across the front 
seat and opened my door. “Get going!” 

I had to get out. I had no choice. 

“Have a good day!” she called as she pulled away. 

One look at that school and I knew—I was not going to have a good day. 



4 


A bell rang. Big, scary-looking kids poured into the school building. 

“Come on, kid. Let’s move it.” A teacher pushed me toward the door. 

My stomach lurched. This was like the first day of school—times ten! 
Times a zillion! 

I wanted to scream: I can’t go to high school! I’m only in the seventh grade! 

I wandered through the halls with hundreds of other kids. Where do I go? I 
wondered. I don’t even know what class I’m in! 

A big guy wearing a football jacket marched up to me and stuck his face in 
my face. 

“Um, hello,” I said. Who was this guy? 

He didn’t move. He didn’t say a word. He just stood there, nose to nose 
with me. 

“Um, listen,” I began. “I don’t know what class to go to. Do you know 
where they keep the kids who are about—you know—my age?” 

The big—very, very big—guy opened his mouth. 

“You little creep,” he muttered. “I’m going to get you for what you did to 
me yesterday.” 

“Me?” My heart fluttered. What was he talking about? “I did something to 
you? I don’t think so. I didn’t do anything to you! I wasn’t even here yesterday!” 

He laid his huge paws on my shoulders—and squeezed. 

“Ow!” I cried. 

“Today, after school,” he said slowly, “you’re going to get it.” 

He let me go and walked slowly down the hall as if he owned the place. 

I was so scared, I dove into the first classroom I came to. 

I sat in the back. A tall woman with dark, curly hair stepped in front of the 
blackboard. 

“All right, people!” she yelled. Everybody quieted down. “Open your books 
to page one fifty-seven.” 

What class is this? I wondered. I watched as the girl next to me pulled a 
textbook out of her bag. I looked at the cover. 

No. Oh, no. 



It couldn’t be. 

The title of the book was Advanced Math: Calculus. 

Calculus! I’d never even heard of that! 

I was bad at math—even seventh-grade math. How could I do calculus? 

The teacher spotted me and narrowed her eyes. 

“Matt? Are you supposed to be in this class?” 

“No!” I cried, jumping up from my seat. “I’m not supposed to be in this 
class, that’s for sure!” 

The teacher added, “You’re in my two-thirty class, Matt. Unless you need 
to switch?” 

“No, no! That’s okay.” I started backing out of the room. “I got mixed up, 
that’s all!” 

I hurried out of there as fast as I could. Close one, I thought. I won’t be 
back at two-thirty, either. 

I think I’ll cut math class today. 

Now what do I do? I wondered. I wandered down the hall. Another bell 
rang. Another teacher—a short, dumpy man with glasses—stepped into the 
hallway to close his classroom door. He spotted me. 

“You’re late again, Amsterdam,” he barked at me. “Come on, come on.” 

I hurried into the classroom. I hoped this class would be something I could 
handle. Like maybe an English class where you read comic books. 

No such luck. 

It was an English class, all right. 

But we weren’t reading comic books. We were reading a book called Anna 
Karenina. 

First of all, this book is about ten thousand pages long. Second, everybody 
else had read it, and I hadn’t. Third, even if I tried to read it, I wouldn’t 
understand what was going on in a million years. 

“Since you were the last one to class, Amsterdam,” the teacher said, “you’ll 
be the first to read. Start on page forty-seven.” 

I sat down at a desk and fumbled around. “Um, sir”—I didn’t know the 
guy’s name—“um—I don’t have the book with me.” 

“No, of course you don’t,” the teacher sighed. “Robertson, would you 
please lend Amsterdam your book?” 

Robertson turned out to be the girl sitting next to me. What was with this 
teacher, anyway? Calling everybody by their last names. 



The girl passed her book to me. “Thanks, Robertson,” I said. She scowled 
at me. 

I guess she didn’t like being called Robertson. But I didn’t know her first 
name. I’d never seen her before in my life. 

“Page forty-seven, Amsterdam,” the teacher repeated. 

I opened the book to page forty-seven. I scanned the page and took a deep 
breath. 

That page was covered with big words. Hard words. Words I didn’t know. 

And then long Russian names. 

I’m about to make a big fool of myself, I realized. 

Just take it one sentence at a time, I told myself. 

The trouble was, those sentences were long. One sentence took up the 
whole page! 

“Are you going to read or aren’t you?” the teacher demanded. 

I took a deep breath and read the first sentence. 

“The young Princess Kitty Shcherb—Sherba—Sherbet—’” 

Robertson snickered. 

“Shckerbatskaya,” the teacher corrected. “Not Sherbet. We’ve been over all 
these names, Amsterdam. You should know them by now.” 

Shckerbatskaya? Even after the teacher pronounced it for me, I couldn’t say 
it. We never had words like that on our seventh-grade spelling tests. 

“Robertson, take over for Amsterdam,” the teacher commanded. 

Robertson took her book back from me and started reading out loud. I tried 
to follow the story. It was something about people going to balls and some guys 
wanting to marry Princess Kitty. Girl stuff. I yawned. 

“Bored, Amsterdam?” the teacher asked. “Maybe I can wake you up a bit. 
Why don’t you tell us what this passage means?” 

“Means?” I echoed. “You mean, what does it mean?” 

“That’s what I said.” 

I tried to stall for time. When would this stupid class be over, anyway? 

“Um—mean? What does it mean,” I murmured to myself, as if I were 
thinking really hard. “Like, what is the meaning of it? Wow, that’s a tough one 

All the other kids turned in their seats and stared at me. 

The teacher tapped his foot. “We’re waiting.” 

What could I do? I had no idea what was going on. I went for the foolproof 



escape. 

“I have to go to the bathroom,” I said. 

Everybody laughed except the teacher. He rolled his eyes. 

“Go ahead,” he said. “And stop by the principal’s office on your way back.” 

“What?” 

“You heard me,” the teacher said. “You’ve got a date with the principal. 
Now get out of my class.” 

I jumped up and ran out of the room. Man! High-school teachers were 
mean! 

Even though I was being punished, I was glad to get out of there. 

I never thought I’d say this, ever. But I wanted to go back to junior high! I 
wished everything would go back to normal. 

I wandered through the hall, looking for the principal’s office. I found a 
door with a frosted-glass window. Letters on the window said, MRS. MCNAB, 
PRINCIPAL. 

Should I go in? I wondered. Why should I? She’s only going to yell at me. 

I was about to turn around and leave. But someone was coming toward me 
down the hall. 

Someone I didn’t want to see. 

“There you are, you little creep!” It was the big guy from this morning. 
“I’m going to pound your face into the ground!” 



5 


Gulp. 

Suddenly the principal’s office didn’t seem so scary. This guy—whoever he 
was—would never hurt me in the principal’s office. 

“You’ll be needing plastic surgery when I’m finished with you!” the guy 
yelled. 

I opened the principal’s door and slipped inside. 

A big woman with steely gray hair sat behind a desk, writing something. 

“Yes?” she said. “What is it?” 

I paused to catch my breath. Why was I there again? 

Oh, yeah. English class. 

“My English teacher sent me,” I explained. “I guess I’m in trouble.” 

“Sit down, Matt.” She offered me a chair. She seemed kind of nice. She 
didn’t raise her voice. “What’s the problem?” 

“There’s been some kind of mistake,” I began. “I don’t belong here. I’m not 
supposed to be in high school!” 

She frowned. “What on earth are you talking about?” 

“I’m twelve years old!” I cried. “I’m a seventh grader! I can’t do this high 
school work. I’m supposed to be in middle school!” 

She looked confused. She reached out and pressed the back of her hand to 
my forehead. 

She’s checking to see if I have a fever, I realized. I must sound like a 
maniac. 

She spoke slowly and clearly. “Matt, you’re in eleventh grade. Not seventh 
grade. Can you understand me?” 

“I know I look like an eleventh grader,” I said. “I can’t do the work! Just 
now, in English class? They were reading a big, fat book called Anna something. 
I couldn’t read the first sentence!” 

“Calm down, Matt.” She stood up and went to a file cabinet. “You can do 
the work. I’ll prove it to you.” 

She pulled out a file and opened it. I stared at it. It was a school record, with 
grades and comments. 

My name was written at the top of the chart. And there were my grades, for 



seventh grade, eighth grade, ninth grade, tenth grade, and the first half of 
eleventh. 

“You see?” Mrs. McNab said. “You can do the work. You’ve gotten mostly 
B’s, every year.” 

There were even a few A’s. 

“But—but I haven’t done this yet,” I protested. What was going on? How 
did I end up so far in the future? What happened to all those years? 

“Mrs. McNab, you don’t understand,” I insisted. “Yesterday, I was twelve. 
Today I woke up—and I was sixteen! I mean, my body was sixteen. But my 
mind is still twelve!” 

“Yes, I know,” Mrs. McNab replied. 



6 


“Yes, I know you read a lot of science fiction,” Mrs. McNab said. “But you don’t 
expect me to believe that silly story—do you?” 

Mrs. McNab folded her arms and sighed. I could tell she was losing 
patience with me. 

“You have gym class next, don’t you,” she said. 

“What?” 

“This is all some kind of joke, right?” She glanced at my schedule, stapled 
to the file. 

“I knew it,” she muttered. “You do have gym next. And you’re trying to get 
out of it.” 

“No! I’m telling the truth!” 

“You’re going to that gym class, young man,” she said. “It starts in five 
minutes.” 

I stared at her. My feet felt glued to the floor. I should have known she 
wouldn’t believe me. 

“Are you going?” she asked gruffly. “Or do I have to take you to the gym 
myself?” 

“I’m going, I’m going!” I backed out of the office and ran down the hall. 
Mrs. McNab stuck her head out the door and called, “No running in the halls!” 

Pam and Greg always said that high school was bad, I thought as I trotted to 
the gym. But this is a nightmare! 

Tweet! The gym teacher blew his whistle. “Volleyball! Line up to pick teams.” 

The gym teacher was a stocky guy with a black toupee. He chose a couple 
of team captains, and they started picking teams. 

Don’t pick me. Don’t pick me, I silently prayed. 

One of the captains, a blond girl named Lisa, picked me. 

We lined up at the volleyball nets. The other team served. The ball flew at 
me like a bullet. 

“I got it! I got it!” I cried. 

I reached up to hit the ball back. 

Klonk! It knocked me on the head. 



“Ow!” I rubbed my sore head. I’d forgotten—my head was much higher 
now than it used to be. 

“Wake up, Matt!” Lisa yelled. 

I had a feeling I wasn’t going to be very good at volleyball. 

The ball came flying at us again. “Get it, Matt!” someone called. 

I reached up higher this time. But I tripped over my giant feet and fell 
— oof !—on top of the guy standing next to me. 

“Watch it, man!” the guy shouted. “Get off me!” Then he clutched his 
elbow. “Ow! I hurt my elbow!” 

The teacher blew his whistle and hurried over to the guy. “You’d better go 
to the nurse,” he said. 

The guy hobbled out of the gym. 

“Way to go, Matt,” Lisa said sarcastically. “Try to do something right this 
time, okay?” 

I turned red with embarrassment. I knew I looked like a jerk. But I wasn’t 
used to being so tall! And having such big feet and hands. I didn’t know how to 
control them. 

I got through a few rounds without messing up. Actually, the ball didn’t 
come near me. So I didn’t have the chance to mess up. Then Lisa said, “Your 
serve, Matt.” 

I knew this was coming. I’d been watching everybody else serve so I’d 
know what to do. 

This time I won’t mess up, I vowed. I’m going to serve this ball and get a 
point for my team. Then they won’t be angry at me for making us lose. 

I tossed the ball in the air. I punched it as hard as I could with my fist, 
trying to get it over the net. 

WHAM! I hit that ball harder than I’d ever hit anything. It whizzed through 
the air so fast, you could hardly see it. 

SMACK! 

“Ow!” 

Lisa doubled over, clutching the side of her head. 

“Why did you have to hit it so hard?” Lisa cried, rubbing her head. 

The teacher looked her over. “You’ll have a nasty bruise there,” he said. 
“You’d better go to the nurse too.” 

Lisa glared at me and stumbled away. 

The teacher gave me a funny look. “What’s the matter, kid?” he asked. 



“Don’t know your own strength? Or just out to get your classmates, one by 
one?” 

“I—I didn’t do it on purpose,” I stuttered. “I swear I didn’t!” 

“Hit the showers, kid,” the teacher said. 

I hung my head as I dragged myself to the locker room. 

This day can’t get any worse, I thought. There’s no way. 

Still, why take chances? 

It was lunchtime. I had half a day of school to go. 

But I wasn’t going to stick around. 

I didn’t know where to go or what to do. I only knew I couldn’t stay in that 
school. 

High school was horrible. If I ever got back to my normal life, I’d 
remember to skip this part. 

I left the gym and raced out of the school building as fast as I could. Down 
the hall. Out the door. 

I glanced back. Was that big guy chasing me? Did the principal see me 
sneak out? No sign of anyone. Coast clear. Then— oof! Oh, no. Not again! 



7 


I bumped into someone. I bounced backwards and landed with a thud on the 
ground. 

Ow! What happened? 

A girl sat sprawled on the sidewalk. Books were scattered around her. 

I helped her up. “Are you okay?” I asked. 

She nodded. 

“I’m really sorry,” I said. “I’ve been doing that all day.” 

“That’s all right.” The girl smiled. “I’m not hurt.” 

She wasn’t a high-school girl—she looked about my age. I mean, the age I 
thought I was. Which was twelve. 

She was pretty, with long, thick blond hair in a ponytail. Her blue eyes 
sparkled at me. 

She bent down to pick up her stuff. 

“I’ll help you,” I offered. I reached down to pick up a book. 

CLONK! My head bumped into hers. 

“I did it again!” I cried. I was getting sick of this. 

“Don’t worry about it,” the girl said. She picked up the rest of the books. 
“My name is Lacie,” she told me. 

“I’m Matt.” 

“What’s the matter, Matt?” she asked. “Why are you in such a hurry?” 

What could I tell her? That my whole life had turned inside out? 

Then the school door burst open. Mrs. McNab stepped outside. 

“I’ve got to get out of here,” I replied. “I’ve got to get home. See you.” 

I ran down the street before Mrs. McNab could spot me. 

I collapsed on the couch. It had been a terrible day. At least I made it home 
before that big guy beat me up. 

But what was I going to do tomorrow? 

I watched TV until Pam and Greg came home from school. 

Pam and Greg. I’d forgotten all about them. 

They were little kids now. And they seemed to expect me to take care of 



them. 

“Fix us a snack! Fix us a snack!” Pam chanted. 

“Fix your own snack,” I snapped back. 

“I’m telling Mommy!” Pam cried. “You’re supposed to fix us a snack! And 
I’m hungry!” 

I remembered the excuse Pam and Greg had always used to get out of doing 
stuff for me. 

“I’ve got homework to do,” I said. 

Oh, yeah, I realized. 

I probably really do have homework to do. 

High-school homework. 

It’s going to be impossible for me. 

But if I don’t do it, I’ll be in trouble tomorrow. 

In more ways than one, I thought, remembering that big guy. What did I 
ever do to him, anyway? 

When it was time for bed, I headed to my old room. But Pam was sleeping in 
there. 

So I went back to the guest room. I climbed into bed. 

What am I going to do? I worried as I let my eyes close. 

I don’t know what’s happening. 

I can’t do anything right. 

Is this what my life is going to be like—forever? 



8 


I opened my eyes. Sunlight poured in through the window. It was morning. 

Oh, great, I thought. Time for another fabulous day of high school. 

I shut my eyes again. I can’t face it, I thought. Maybe if I stay in bed, ah my 
problems will go away. 

“Matt! Time to get up!” Mom called. 

I sighed. Mom would never let me stay home from school. There was no 
way out. 

“Matt!” she shouted again. 

Her voice sounds funny, I thought. Higher than usual. 

Maybe she’s not so tired for once. 

I dragged myself out of bed. I set my feet on the floor. 

Wait a minute. 

My feet. 

I stared at them. They looked different. I mean, they looked the same. 

They weren’t big anymore. I had my old feet back! 

I looked at my hands. I wiggled my fingers. 

It was me! I was my old self again! 

I ran into the bathroom to check the mirror. I had to make sure. 

I flipped on the light. 

There I was—a puny little twelve year old! 

I hopped up and down. “Yippee! I’m twelve! I’m twelve!” 

All my problems were solved! I didn’t have to go to high school! 

I didn’t have to face that big bully! 

The nightmare was over! 

Everything was okay now. I was even looking forward to seeing Pam and 
Greg and Biggie as their crabby old selves again. 

“Matt! You’re going to be late!” Mom shouted. 

Does she have a cold or something? I wondered as I quickly dressed and 
ran downstairs. She really did sound different. 

I practically skipped into the kitchen. “I’ll have cereal today, Mom—” 

I stopped. 



Two people sat at the kitchen table. A man and a woman. 
I’d never seen them before. 



9 


“I fixed you some toast, Matt,” the woman said. 

“Where’s my mother?” I asked. “Where are Pam and Greg?” 

The man and woman stared blankly at me. 

“Feeling a little off today, son?” the man said. 

Son? 

The woman stood up and bustled around the kitchen. “Drink your juice, 
honey. Your dad will drop you off at school today.” 

My dad? 

“I don’t have a dad!” I insisted. “My father has been dead since I was a 
baby!” 

The man shook his head and bit into a piece of toast. “They told me he’d 
get weird at this age. But I didn’t know how weird.” 

“Where are they?” I demanded. “What did you do with my family?” 

“I’m not in the mood for jokes today, Matt,” the man said. “Now let’s get 
moving.” 

A cat crept into the kitchen. It rubbed against my legs. 

“What’s this cat doing here?” I asked. “Where’s Biggie?” 

“Who’s Biggie? What are you talking about?” the woman said. 

I was starting to get scared. My heart was pounding. My legs felt weak. 

I sank into a chair and gulped my juice. “Are you saying that—you’re my 
parents?” 

The woman kissed me on the head. “I’m your mother. This is your father. 
That’s your cat. Period.” 

“I have no brothers or sisters?” 

The woman raised an eyebrow and glanced at the man. “Brothers and 
sisters? No, darling.” 

I cringed. My real mother would never call me “darling”. 

“I know you want a brother,” the woman went on. “But you really wouldn’t 
like it. You’re just not good at sharing.” 

I couldn’t stand this any longer. 

“Okay, stop right there,” I demanded. “Stop fooling around. I want to know 



right now—why is this happening to me?” 

My “parents” exchanged looks. Then they turned back to me. 

“I want to know who you are!” I cried, trembling all over. “Where is my 
real family? I want answers—now!” 

The man stood up and grabbed me by the arm. “Get in the car, son,” he 
commanded. 

“No!” I screamed. 

“Joke is over. Now get in the car.” 

I had no choice. I followed him to a car—a shiny new one, not my real 
mother’s old piece of junk. I climbed in. 

The woman ran outside. “Don’t forget your books!” she called. She pushed 
a backpack through the open window at me. Then she kissed me again. 

“Ugh!” I cringed. “Stop it!” I didn’t know her well enough to let her kiss 
me. 

The man started the car and pulled out of the driveway. The woman waved. 
“Have a good day at school!” 

They’re serious, I realized. They really think they’re my parents. 

I shuddered. 

What was happening to me? 



10 


One day I’m a normal twelve year old. The next day I’m suddenly sixteen. 

Then the next day I’m twelve again—except I live in a completely different 
family! 

I stared out the window as “Dad” drove. We passed through a neighborhood 
I’d never seen before. 

“Where are we going?” I asked in a tiny voice. 

“I’m taking you to school. What did you think—we were going to the 
circus?” the man replied. 

“This isn’t the way to school,” I said. 

The man just snorted and shook his head. He didn’t believe me. 

He pulled up in front of a junior high school—but not mine. I’d never seen 
this place before. 

“Okay, son. Have a nice day.” The man reached across me and opened the 
car door. 

What could I do? I climbed out of the car. 

“Dad” drove off. 

Now what? I thought. I’m twelve again—but I’m at a totally different 
school. 

Am I awake? 

I kicked myself in the shin to test it. Ow! That hurt. 

I figured that meant I was awake. 

Kids poured into the school building. I followed them in. I didn’t know 
what else to do. 

Ahead of me I saw a girl with a long, thick blond ponytail. She turned 
around and smiled at me. 

She looked familiar. Where had I seen her before? 

“Hi,” I said to her. 

“Hi,” she said back. Her blue eyes sparkled at me. 

“I’m Matt.” I was still racking my brains trying to figure out where I’d met 
her before. 

“I’m Lacie.” 



Lacie! Of course. I’d crashed into her the day before—outside Horrible 
High. 

I started to say, “I met you yesterday—remember?” But I stopped. 

Did she recognize me? I couldn’t tell. But why should she? I looked 
completely different from the day before. How could she guess that the twelve- 
year-old kid standing next to her was also the clumsy teenager from yesterday? 

“What’s your first class?” she asked me. “I’ve got lunch.” 

“Lunch? But it’s eight-thirty in the morning!” 

“You’re new here, aren’t you?” she said. 

I nodded. 

“This stupid school is so crowded, they can’t fit everyone into the cafeteria 
at lunchtime,” she explained. “So I’ve got lunch now.” 

“I’ve got lunch too,” I lied. Or maybe it wasn’t a lie—what did I know? I 
had no idea what was going on anymore. School was beginning to seem like a 
lot more trouble than it was worth. 

I followed her to the cafeteria. They really were serving lunch there. The 
powerful smell of brussels sprouts stank up the air. I gagged. 

“It’s too early in the morning for brussels sprouts,” I noted. 

“Let’s eat out on the playground,” Lacie suggested. “It’s a nice day.” 

We slipped out of the cafeteria and settled under a tree. Lacie sipped a 
carton of chocolate milk. I rummaged through my backpack for some lunch. I 
figured my new “mom” must’ve packed me something. 

She did, all right. Baloney and ketchup on white bread. A little plastic bag 
full of carrot sticks. Vanilla pudding for dessert. 

Everything I hate. 

Lacie held out a chocolate cupcake. “Want this? I can’t face it this early in 
the morning.” 

“Thanks.” I took the cupcake. 

Lacie seemed like a really nice person. She was the nicest person I’d met 
since my life became a nightmare. She was the only nice person I’d met since 
then. 

Maybe she would understand. I really wanted to talk to somebody. I felt so 
alone. 

“Do I look familiar to you?” I asked her. 

She studied my face. 

“You do look kind of familiar,” she said. “I’m sure I’ve seen you around 



school....” 

“That’s not what I mean.” I decided to tell her what had happened to me. I 
knew it would sound weird to her. But I had to tell somebody. 

I started slowly. “Were you walking past the high school yesterday?” 

“Yes. I walk past it every day on my way home.” 

“Did someone bump into you yesterday? A teenager? In front of the high 
school?” 

She started to answer. But something caught her eye. I followed her gaze to 
the school door. 

Two guys were walking toward us. They were tough-looking guys in black 
jeans and black T-shirts. One wore a blue bandanna around his head. The other 
had ripped the sleeves of his T-shirt to show off his beefy arms. 

They had to be at least sixteen or seventeen. What were they doing here? 

They headed straight for us. 

My heart began to pound. Something told me to be afraid of them. 

Maybe it was the nasty looks on their faces. 

“Who are those guys?” I asked. 

Lacie didn’t answer. She didn’t have time. 

One of the guys in black pointed at me. 

“There he is!” he shouted. 

“Get him!” 



11 


The two guys ran straight for me. 

Who were they? I didn’t know. 

But I didn’t stop to think. I jumped to my feet and ran as fast as I could. 

I glanced back. Were they chasing me? 

“Stop him!” one of them shouted. 

Lacie stepped in front of them, blocking their path. 

“Thanks, Lacie,” I whispered. I hurried out of the playground. I raced 
through the strange neighborhood, trying to remember how to get home. 

A few blocks from school I stopped to catch my breath. 

No sign of the two guys. No sign of Lacie, either. 

I hope she’s all right, I thought. They didn’t seem to want to hurt her. 

They wanted to hurt me. 

But why? 

The day before, a bully had said he wanted to get me after school. 

But today, in my new, weird world, I hadn’t seen him. Neither of the guys 
in black was that bully. 

Just two new bullies. 

I’ve got to get help, I realized. 

I don’t know what’s happening. But it’s all too much for me. And it’s too 
frightening. I hardly know who I am. 

I drifted through the streets until I finally found my way home. “Mom” and 
“Dad” were out. The front door was locked. I climbed in through the kitchen 
window. 

My real mother was gone. My brother and sister and even my dog were 
gone. 

But there must be someone else I know, I thought. Somebody, somewhere, 
who can help me. 

Maybe my real mom went somewhere else. Maybe she’s visiting relatives 
or something. 

I decided to try Aunt Margaret and Uncle Andy. I dialed Aunt Margaret’s 
number. 



A man answered the phone. 

“Uncle Andy!” I cried. “It’s me, Matt!” 

The voice said, “Who is this?” 

“Matt!” I repeated. “Your nephew!” 

“I don’t know any Matt,” the man said gruffly. “You must have dialed the 
wrong number.” 

“No—Uncle Andy, wait!” I shouted. 

“My name isn’t Andy,” the man snarled. He hung up. 

I stared at the phone, stunned. The man didn’t sound like Uncle Andy at all. 
I guess I did dial wrong, I thought. I tried the number again. 

“Hello?” It was the same man again. 

This time I tried a new approach. “Is Andy Amsterdam there, please?” 

“You again! There’s no Andy here, kid,” the man said. “Wrong number.” 

He slammed the phone in my ear. 

I tried not to panic. But my hands were shaking. 

I dialed information. “What listing, please?” the operator asked. 

“Andrew Amsterdam,” I said. 

“Checking,” said the operator. 

A minute later she said, “I’m sorry. We have no listing under that name.” 
“Maybe if I spell it for you,” I insisted. “A-m-s—” 

“I’ve already checked, sir. There’s no one listed under that name.” 

“Could you try Margaret Amsterdam, then?” 

“There’s no one named Amsterdam listed at all, sir.” 

My heart started racing as I hung up. This can’t be happening, I thought. 
There must be somebody I know, somewhere! 

I won’t give up. I’ll try my cousin Chris. 

I called Chris’ number. Someone else answered. 

It was as if Chris didn’t exist. Or Uncle Andy, or my mother, or anybody I 
knew. 

How could my whole family disappear? 

The only person I knew was Lacie. But I couldn’t call her. 

I didn’t know her last name. 

The front door opened. The woman who called herself my mother bustled 
in, carrying shopping bags. 

“Matt, darling! What are you doing home in the middle of the day?” 



“None of your beeswax,” I snapped. 

“Matt! Don’t be so rude!” she scolded. 

I shouldn’t have been rude to her, I guess. But what difference did it make? 
She wasn’t my real mother, anyway. 

My real mother had disappeared off the face of the earth. 

I shuddered. I realized I was totally alone in the world. 

I didn’t know anyone—not even my parents! 



12 


“Bedtime, honey,” my fake mother chirped. 

I’d been sitting in front of the TV all evening. Just staring, not even really 
watching it. 

Maybe I should stop thinking of these people as my fake parents, I realized. 
They’re real enough now. I might be stuck with them forever. 

I’ll find out in the morning, I thought as I trudged upstairs. My old room 
was a sewing room now. I went back to the guest room to sleep. 

“Good night, darling.” “Mom” kissed me goodnight. Why did she have to 
keep kissing me? 

She turned out the light and said, “See you in the morning.” 

The morning. I dreaded the morning. 

So far, each morning was weirder than the last. I was scared to go to sleep. 

What would I wake up to? 

It would be great if these fake parents of mine were gone. But who would 
take their place? 

Maybe I’d wake up and the whole world would be gone! 

I struggled to stay awake. Please, I prayed. Please let everything be normal 
again. I’d even be glad to have Greg and Pam back, if everything could only be 
normal.... 

I must have fallen asleep. The next thing I knew, I opened my eyes—and it 
was morning. 

I lay perfectly still for a minute. Had anything changed? 

I heard noises in the house. There were definitely other people here. 

A lot of other people. 

My heart started pounding. Oh, no, I thought. What am I in for this time? 

I heard someone playing an accordion. That was a pretty sure sign my old 
family wasn’t back. 

But first things first. How old was I today? 

I held my hands up in front of my face. They looked a little on the small 

side. 

I got up and went to the bathroom, trying not to panic. I was really getting 



sick of this routine. 

The mirror seemed higher than usual. I stared at my face. 

I wasn’t twelve anymore, that was for sure. I looked about eight. 

Eight, I thought, sighing. 

That’s third grade. Well, at least I’ll be able to do the math. Suddenly, I felt 
a sharp pain in my back. Ow! Claws! Tiny claws digging into my back! The 
claws dug deeper. I screamed. 



13 


Something jumped on my back! 

A tiny, hairy face appeared in the mirror. Some kind of animal was standing 
on my shoulders! 

“Get it off! Get it off!” I shrieked. 

“Eeee! Eeee!” the animal screeched. 

I ran into the hallway—and almost crashed into a huge man. 

“Get this thing off me!” I cried. 

The man plucked the animal off my shoulder. He laughed loud and deep, 
like an evil Santa Claus. 

“What’s wrong with you, Matt?” he boomed. “Scared of Pansy all of a 
sudden?” 

Pansy? The man cuddled the animal in his arms. It was a monkey. 

The man roughed up my hair. “Get dressed, boy. We got a rehearsal this 
morning.” 

Rehearsal? What was that supposed to mean? 

I stared at the man. He was huge, with a round stomach, glossy black hair, 
and a long mustache. 

The weirdest part was what he wore: a bright red costume with gold trim 
and a gold belt. 

Oh, no! I thought, my heart sinking. This can’t be... my father? 

From downstairs a woman’s voice screamed, “Grub!” 

The man handed me a pile of clothes. “Put your costume on,” he said. 
“Then come on down to breakfast—son.” 

I knew it. He was my father. For today, at least. My “family” kept getting 
worse every day. 

“GRUUUUB!” the woman downstairs yelled again. 

I guess that’s Mom, I thought miserably. She sounds like a real sweetheart. 

Kids came pouring out of the other bedrooms. It seemed like there were 
dozens of them, all different ages. But I counted, and there were only six. 

I tried to get all the new facts straight. I was eight years old. I had six 
brothers and sisters and a pet monkey. I hadn’t seen my mother yet, but my 



father was a total wacko. 

And I’ve got to wear some kind of freaky costume, I thought, holding up 
the clothes the man had given me. It was a tight blue outfit, like a leotard. The 
bottom part was blue with white stripes. The top had white stars. 

What was that supposed to be? And what kind of rehearsal did I have? 

Was I in a play or something? 

I pulled on the costume. It fit me like a second skin. I felt like a total jerk. 

Then I went downstairs for breakfast. 

The kitchen was a madhouse. The other kids laughed and shouted and 
threw food. Pansy hopped around on the table, stealing bits of bacon. 

A tall, thin woman piled pancakes on plates. She wore a long, purple, 
sequined gown. A silver crown perched on top of her head. 

My new mom. 

“Hurry up and eat, Matt—before it’s all gone!” she shouted. 

I grabbed a plate and started eating. I had to keep swatting Pansy away. 

“Doesn’t Matt look cute in his little superhero suit?” a girl teased. She had 
to be one of my older sisters. 

“Cute as a button,” a boy said sarcastically. He looked about two years 
older than me. He grabbed my cheek and pinched it—hard. Too hard. “Cute little 
Matt,” he sneered. “Big-shot star of the circus.” 

The circus! I dropped my fork. Chills rippled down my back. Was I in the 
circus? 

The dopey costumes. The monkey. It all made sense now. 

I dropped my head into my hands. Matthew Amsterdam, circus boy. I 
almost wanted to cry. 

I had the feeling my brother was jealous. As if he wanted to be the star of 
the stupid circus. 

And he could be, for all I cared. / sure didn’t want to be the star of any 
circus. 

“Leave Matt alone or he’ll get stage fright again,” the mother scolded. 

I studied the rest of the family. Everyone was dressed in bright costumes. I 
was part of a circus family. 

The pancakes sank to the pit of my stomach. I never liked the circus. Even 
when I was little, I hated it. 

But now the circus was my life—and I was the star. Oh, goody. 

“Rehearsal time!” the father cried. He put a black top hat on his head and 



cracked a whip on the stairs. “Let’s roll!” 

We left our plates on the table and piled into a beat-up old van. Mom drove 
at about ninety miles an hour. 

My brothers and sisters fought the whole way. One little girl kept pinching 
me. Another one punched me. 

“Cut it out!” I snapped. Why couldn’t I wake up in a world with nice 
brothers and sisters? 

The van chugged into a fairground and stopped in front of a big circus tent. 

“Everybody out!” Dad ordered. 

I jostled with my brothers and sisters to get out of the van. Then I followed 
them into the tent. 

It was kind of awesome inside the tent. Other acts were already there, 
practicing. I saw a man on a high wire way up near the top of the tent. An 
elephant stood up on its hind legs and danced. Clowns rode around in dopey 
little cars, honking their horns. 

I wonder what my act is? I thought. Two of my sisters scurried up a ladder 
and started practicing a trapeze routine. 

I watched them, terrified. The trapeze! There was no way they could get me 
up there. No way. 

Please don’t make me do a trapeze act, I prayed. 

“Come on, Matt,” Dad said. “Let’s get to work.” 

Not the trapeze. Not the trapeze, I prayed. 

Dad led me away from the trapeze ladder. I began to relax. Whatever I had 
to do, it couldn’t be worse than swinging around on a trapeze. Right? 

Wrong. 

Dad led me to the back of the tent. I followed him through a maze of animal 
cages. 

Dad strode up to one of the cages and opened the door. 

“All right, son,” he bellowed. “Get in.” 

My jaw dropped. I couldn’t believe my ears. 

“G-g-g-get in?” I stuttered. “But—there’s a lion in that cage!” 

The lion opened his huge jaws and roared. I backed away, shivering. 

“Are you going to walk in?” Dad prodded me with the end of his whip. “Or 
do I have to push you?” 

I didn’t move. I couldn’t. 

So Dad pushed me into the lion’s cage—and shut the door. 



14 


I backed up against the cage wall. The cold steel bars pressed into my back. My 
legs were trembling so hard, I thought I would fall on my face. 

The lion stared at me. He sniffed the air. 

I’ve heard that animals can smell fear. This lion got a noseful. 

My “father”—the lion tamer—stood beside me in the cage. 

“We’re trying a new trick today, Matt,” he said. “You’re going to ride the 
lion.” 

He might as well have punched me in the stomach. I was going to ride the 

lion? 

Yeah. Right. 

Some father this guy is, I thought. Feeding his own son to a lion. 

The lion stood up. I kept my eyes on him. My whole body shook with fear. 
ROOOAAAR! 

The lion’s breath blew in my face like a hot wind. My hair stood on end. 

The lion stepped toward us. Dad cracked his whip. “Ha!” he shouted. 

The lion stepped back, licking his chops. 

“Go on, boy,” Dad boomed at me. “Climb on Hercules’ back. Then slide up 
to his shoulders. I’ll crack the whip to make him walk around the cage.” 

I couldn’t say a word. I just stared at the man in total disbelief. 

“Why are you looking at me like that? You’re not afraid of Hercules, are 
you?” 

“A-afraid?” I stammered. “Afraid” wasn’t the word. Petrified, maybe. 
Terrified, horrified, frozen with fear. But afraid? Nah. 

He cracked his whip again. “No son of mine is a coward!” he shouted. “You 
get on that lion’s back—NOW!” 

Then he leaned down and whispered, “Just watch that he doesn’t bite you. 
Remember your poor brother Tom. He’s still trying to learn how to write left- 
handed.” 

He cracked the whip again—right at my feet. 

I wasn’t going to ride the lion. No way. 

And I couldn’t stay in that cage another second. 



Dad cracked his whip at me again. I jumped. 

“Noooo!” I shrieked. 

I tugged the cage door open. I ran out of that cage so fast, Dad hardly knew 
what happened. 

I raced out of the tent. My brain screamed, “Hide! Find a hiding place— 
quick!” 

I spotted a couple of trailers in the parking lot. I darted behind one—and 
bumped right into Lacie. 

“You again!” I gasped. It was weird how she kept popping up. 

“I’ve got to hide,” I told her. “I’m in trouble!” 

“What’s wrong, Matt?” she asked. 

“I’m about to become lion food!” I cried. “Help me!” 

Lacie yanked on the trailer door. It was locked. 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “Look!” 

I pointed past the trailer. Two guys were running toward us. 

I’d seen them before. The two guys in black. 

They were coming after me! 

I ran. There was no place to go, no place to hide—except back inside the 

tent. 

I burst through the tent flap. I tried to catch my breath while my eyes 
adjusted to the dark. 

I heard one of the guys in black shout, “In there! He went inside the tent!” 

I stumbled through the darkness, searching for a place to hide. 

“Get him!” The boys were inside the tent now. 

I ran blindly—right back into the lion’s cage. 



15 


I slammed the cage door shut. The guys in black gripped the steel bars and shook 
them. 

“You won’t get away!” one shouted. 

My “dad”, the lion tamer, was gone. I was alone in the cage—with 
Hercules. 

“Easy, boy. Easy...” I murmured as I inched my way along the side of the 
cage. The lion stood in the center, eyeing me. 

The two guys rattled the cage door again. It swung open. They stepped 
inside, glaring at me. 

“You can’t escape that easily,” one of them warned. 

The lion growled at them. “It’s just an old circus lion,” one guy said. “He 
won’t hurt us.” 

But I could tell they weren’t as sure as they sounded. 

Hercules growled again, louder this time. The two guys stopped. 

I inched farther around the cage wall. 

I had to put that lion between me and the guys in black. It was my only 
chance. 

Carefully, one of the guys stepped forward. The lion roared at him. 

He stepped back. 

The lion’s eyes darted from the guys to me and back. I knew he was trying 
to decide who would make the tastier meal. 

“You’d better get out of here,” I warned. “Hercules hasn’t been fed yet.” 

The guys watched Hercules warily. 

“He won’t attack me,” I bluffed. “I’m his master. But if I tell him to, he’ll 
go right for your throats!” 

The guys glanced at each other. One of them said, “He’s lying.” 

The other guy didn’t look so sure. 

“I’m not lying,” I insisted. “Get out of here right now—or I’ll turn him on 
you!” 

One guy made a move for the cage door. The other guy grabbed his arm and 
pulled him back. “Don’t be chicken,” he snapped. 



“Get them, Hercules!” I shouted. “Get them!” 

Hercules let out his fiercest roar yet—and pounced. 

The guys in black scurried out of the cage. They slammed the door as 
Hercules tried to bound out. 

“You won’t get away!” one guy yelled through the bars. “We’ll be back!” 
“Why do you want me?” I screamed after them. “What did I do? What did I 

do?” 



16 


Hercules didn’t really want to eat anybody. He just wanted to get out of the cage. 

He didn’t try to stop me as I slipped out. I sneaked away to hide in the van 
until circus practice was over. 

“Where were you all day?” Dad grumbled when he found me. Everyone 
else piled into the van, and we drove home. 

“I felt sick,” I complained. “I had to lie down.” 

“You’re going to learn that trick tomorrow, Matt,” Dad insisted. “You won’t 
get out of it again.” 

I just yawned. I figured tomorrow would never come. At least not for my 
circus family. 

Tomorrow would bring some new horror. Or maybe for once something 
good would happen. 

I went to bed early that night. I didn’t like being an eight year old in a 
circus family. I couldn’t wait for it to be over. 

My circus brothers were climbing the walls in my old room. I’d never get 
any sleep in there. So I crept off to sleep in the guest room again. 

But I had trouble falling asleep. I couldn’t stop wondering what the next 
day would bring. It’s hard to relax when you don’t know what kind of world 
you’ll wake up to in the morning. 

I tried counting sheep, but that never works for me. So I tried to think of all 
the good things that could happen when I woke up. 

I could wake up as a major league baseball player. I could be the greatest 
pitcher in the history of baseball. 

Or I could be a very, very rich kid who gets everything he wants. 

Or I could be a space explorer five hundred years in the future. 

Why didn’t anything like that ever happen to me? 

Most of all, I wished I could wake up and find my family again. My real 
family. They drove me crazy. But at least I was used to them. I even missed 
them, a little bit. 

Okay, a lot. 

At last, just before dawn, I fell asleep. 



It was still very early when I woke up. I gazed around the room. Everything 
seemed a little blurry. 

Who am I now? I wondered. The room looked normal. I didn’t hear any 
noise, so I knew the circus family was gone. 

Might as well get it over with, I decided. I jumped out of bed. I felt a little 
shaky on my legs. 

I walked slowly into the bathroom. I looked in the mirror. 

No. Oh, no. 

This was the worst one yet. The worst ever. The worst possible ! 



17 


I was an old man! 

“No!” I screamed. I couldn’t take it anymore. I ran back to bed as fast as 
my rickety old legs would carry me. 

I got under the covers and closed my eyes. I was going right back to sleep. I 
wasn’t about to spend the whole day as an old man. Not when I’m really only 
twelve. 

I quickly dozed off. When I woke up, I knew right away I had changed. I 
wasn’t an old man anymore. 

I felt a surge of energy. Power. I felt strong. 

Maybe I’m a baseball player after all, I thought hopefully. 

I rubbed my eyes. That’s when I caught a glimpse of my hand. 

It—it was green. My skin was green. And instead of fingers, I had claws! 

I swallowed hard. I tried to shake away my panic. 

What had happened to me this time? 

I didn’t waste a second finding out. I lumbered to the bathroom mirror. 

When I saw my face, I let out a roar of horror and disgust. 

I had become a monster. A hideous, gross monster. 



18 


I tried to scream. I tried to shout, “This can’t be happening to me!” 

But all that came out was a terrifying snarl. 

No! I thought, in a total panic. I felt like tearing my horrible skin off. I was 
a hideous monster—and I couldn’t even talk! 

I was big—almost seven feet tall—and powerful. My skin was a scaly 
green with black stripes, like a lizard. I oozed slime all over. 

My head looked like a dinosaur’s, with warts all over it. Three spiky horns 
stuck out of the top of my head, between four pointy ears. 

My hands and feet had sharp claws. My toenails clicked on the bathroom 
floor when I walked. 

I was one ugly, ugly dude. 

I wished I’d stayed an old man. Each time I woke up, my life got worse! 
When was this ever going to end? How could I make it stop? 

I thought about Lacie. She seemed to pop up no matter where I went. 

And she had tried to help me escape from those guys in black, I 
remembered. She wants to help me. 

I’ve got to find her, I decided. I know she’s out there somewhere. 

She’s my only chance. 

I staggered through the house in my monster body. The house was empty. 
At least I didn’t have a family to deal with. A family full of monsters would have 
been a real nightmare! 

I had to be grateful for the little things. Especially when I had green skin 
and spikes growing out of my head. 

I lumbered out the door and down the street. I tried to shout, “Lacie! Lacie, 
where are you!” 

But my mouth couldn’t make the words. All that came out was a booming, 
terrifying roar. 

A car driving down the street stopped suddenly. The driver gaped at me 
through the windshield. 

“Don’t be afraid!” I cried. But that’s not what came out. Another roar 
ripped through the air. 

The man screamed and backed his car down the street at full speed. He 



crashed into another car. 

I went over to see if anyone was hurt. A woman and her kid were in the 
other car. 

They must have been all right. Because as soon as they saw me, they all 
jumped out of their cars and ran away, screaming their heads off. 

My giant lizard feet carried me to the center of town. I smashed through 
bushes, kicked garbage cans over. People screamed in terror as soon as they saw 
me. 

Lacie, I thought. I’ve got to find Lacie. 

I tried to keep this thought in my head. But I was getting hungry. Very, very 
hungry. 

Normally I like peanut butter and jelly for a snack. But that day I had a 
strong craving for metal. A nice, big, crunchy hunk of metal. 

The town was in a panic. People raced around, shrieking as if it were the 
end of the world. 

But I wasn’t going to hurt anybody. All I wanted was a little snack. 

I stepped in front of a tasty-looking compact car. The driver slammed on the 
brakes. 

ROOAARR! I beat my chest with my powerful monster arms. 

The driver cowered in the car. I reached out and snatched off a windshield 
wiper. Just for a taste. 

Mmmmm. Rubbery goodness. 

The man flung the car door open. “No!” he cried. “Don’t hurt me! L-leave 
me alone!” 

He ran away to hide somewhere. It was nice of him to leave me his car. 

I ripped the door off the car. I pulled the handle off and stuffed it into my 
mouth. 

Delicious. Nice cool chrome. 

Then I took a big bite out of the door. Chomp, chomp. My teeth were huge 
and sharp as a razor—they had no trouble chewing the metal. Yum—leather 
upholstery for extra flavor. I finished off the door and reached in to rip out a 
bucket seat. 

Bits of yellow foam rubber spewed out of my mouth as I ate. The leather 
was yummy. But the foam padding was kind of dry. It was like air-popped 
popcorn with no butter. Bleh. 

I was tearing out the steering wheel when I heard sirens. 



Uh-oh. 

I saw that a mob had gathered around me. People pointed at me. 

“It’s eating a car!” someone screeched. 

Well, duhhh, I thought. What do you expect a monster to eat—Rice 
Krispies? 

The sirens came closer. Police cars were pulling up all around me. 

“Clear the way,” came a voice over a loudspeaker. “Stand back. Clear the 
way.” 

I’d better get out of here, I decided. I dropped the steering wheel I was 
nibbling and began to run. People screamed and scattered out of the way. 

“Stop it! Get the monster!” 

The squeal of police sirens ripped through the air. If they caught me, I knew 
they’d try to lock me up—or worse. 

I had to get out of there. I had to hide. 

I stumbled through the crowds. I headed for the edge of town. 

Then I spotted her. Lacie. Mobs of people were running away from me. She 
was the only one running toward me. 

I snarled, trying to call Lacie. She grabbed me by my slimy arm and pulled 
me out of the crowd. 

She led me down an alley. We lost the mob. I wanted to ask her where we 
were going. But I knew the words wouldn’t come. I was afraid a roar might scare 
her. 

We ran and ran. We didn’t stop running until we reached the woods at the 
edge of town. Lacie pulled me into the woods, deeper and deeper. 

She’s hiding me, I thought gratefully. I wished I could thank her. 

I followed Lacie down a narrow path. Then the path ended. We pushed our 
way through the brush. 

At last we came to a small house. It was well hidden by trees and vines. 
You could hardly see it, even when you stood right in front of it. 

A hideout, I thought. How did Lacie find this place? 

I wondered if there was anything good to eat inside the house. I was getting 
hungry again. 

A couple of bicycles would taste good right now, I thought. 

Lacie opened the door of the house. She beckoned me to come inside. 

I went in. Two people stepped out of the shadows. 

No. Oh, no. 



Not them. 

But it was them. 

The guys in black. 

One of them spoke. 

“Thank you for bringing him to us,” he said. “You did your job well.” 



19 


RRRROOOOOOAAAAARRRR! 

I thrashed my arms. I was furious! 

Lacie betrayed me! 

I had to get out of there—fast. 

I dove for the door—but they dropped a net over me. 

They yanked on the net—and I tripped. 

I fell with a heavy thud. The two guys closed the net over me. 

I roared and thrashed with all my might. But I couldn’t get out. They tied 
the net tightly around me. 

“Get me out of here!” I wanted to scream. I slashed at the net with my 
claws. I bit it with my teeth. But it was made of some kind of strange material. I 
couldn’t break the strings. 

I snarled and kicked for a long time. But no matter what I did, I was still 
trapped. At last I got tired. I lay on my back on the floor. 

Lacie and the two guys in black stared down at me, perfectly calm. 

I wished I could talk. I couldn’t stop myself from trying. 

“How could you do this to me?” I tried to ask Lacie. “I thought you were 
my friend!” 

Nothing but snarls and growls came out of me. Lacie stared down at me. 
She couldn’t understand what I said. 

The guys in black just folded their arms across their chests and sneered at 
me. 

“Who are you?” I wanted to ask them. “What do you want? What is 
happening to me?” 

No one answered me. One of the guys, the taller one, said, “All right. Let’s 
lock him up in the back.” 

I roared again. I struggled as the three of them dragged my big, slimy body 
across the floor. They pushed me into a small room at the back of the house. 
They locked me inside. 

The room was dark. There was one small window with metal bars on it. 

I could eat those bars, I realized. If I could reach them. 



But I was stuck on the floor. I couldn’t move inside the tight net. 

I lay still for a long time, waiting for something to happen. But no one 
returned to the room. I couldn’t hear what they were doing in the other rooms. 
Through the window I saw the light fading. Night was coming. 

I knew there was nothing I could do but fall asleep—fall asleep and hope 
I’d wake up human again. 



20 


I woke up groggy. My stomach hurt. 

Man, I thought. What did I eat yesterday? It feels as if I’ve got a big lump 
of metal in my stomach! 

Then I remembered. I did have metal in my stomach. 

Oh, yeah. I had snacked on a compact car. Mom always told me not to eat 
too many snacks. 

I’ve got to remember not to do that again. 

I sat up. I checked myself out. 

Whew. I was human again. 

What a relief. 

The net lay open around me. Someone had cut it off while I was sleeping. 
But who was I now? 

My arms and legs were skinny. My feet were floppy and too big for my 

legs. 

But they weren’t that big. Not monster big. I was a boy again. But not my 
usual twelve-year-old self. 

I figured I was about fourteen. 

Well, I thought, it’s better than being a monster. 

A lot better. 

But I’m still in that house in the woods, I realized. I’m still a prisoner. 

Those two guys in black had finally caught me. 

What did they want? What were they going to do to me? 

I stood up and tried the door. Locked. 

I glanced at the window. There was no way I could break through those 

bars. 

I was trapped. 

I heard a key in the lock. They were coming! 

I cowered in a corner of the room. 

The door swung open. Lacie and the two guys stepped in. 

“Matt?” Lacie said. She spotted me in the corner. She took a step toward 


me. 



“What are you going to do to me?” I asked. 

It was good to hear words coming out of my mouth again. Instead of just 
roars. 

“Let me go!” I cried. 

The guys in black shook their heads. 

“We can’t do that,” the shorter guy said. “We can’t let you go.” 

They stepped closer. They balled their hands into fists. 

“No!” I shouted. “Stay away from me!” 

The tall guy slammed the door shut. Then they moved in on me. 



21 


They walked steadily toward me. I glanced frantically around the room for a way 
to escape. 

The guys blocked my path to the door. There was no way out. 

“We’re not going to hurt you, Matt,” Lacie said gently. “We want to help 
you. Really.” 

The guys took another step toward me. I shrank back. They sure didn’t look 
like they wanted to help me. 

“Don’t be afraid, Matt,” Lacie said. “We need to talk to you.” 

She sat down in front of me. She was trying to show me I shouldn’t be 
afraid. 

But the two guys stood guard on either side of her. 

“Tell me what’s happening to me,” I demanded. 

Lacie cleared her throat. “You’re trapped in a Reality Warp,” she explained. 

As if I’d know what she was talking about. 

“Oh, of course. A Reality Warp,” I cracked. “I knew something weird was 
going on.” 

“Cut the comedy,” the shorter guy snarled. “This is no joke. You’re causing 
us a lot of trouble.” 

Lacie hushed him. “Quiet, Wayne. I’ll handle this.” 

She turned back to me and asked in her soft voice, “You don’t know what a 
Reality Warp is, do you?” 

“No,” I replied. “But I know I don’t like it.” 

“When you fell asleep in your guest room, you fell into a hole in reality,” 
she said. 

The more she told me, the less it made sense. “There’s a hole in reality—in 
the guest room?” 

She nodded. “You fell asleep in one reality, and woke up in another. You’ve 
been stuck in that hole ever since. Now, whenever you go to sleep, you change 
what is real and what isn’t real.” 

“Well, make it stop!” I demanded. 

“I’ll stop you,” the tall guy threatened. 



“Bruce—please,” Lacie snapped. 

“What does all this have to do with you, anyway?” I asked. 

“You’re breaking the law, Matt,” she said. “Every time you change, you 
break the laws of reality.” 

“I’m not doing it on purpose!” I protested. “I never even heard of the laws 
of reality! I’m innocent!” 

Lacie tried to soothe me. “I know you’re not doing it on purpose. But it 
doesn’t matter. It’s happening. When you change bodies, you change what is real 
and what isn’t real for a lot of people. If you keep changing, you’ll throw the 
whole world into confusion.” 

“You don’t understand!” I cried. “I want to stop it! I’ll do anything to stop 
it! I just want to be normal again!” 

“Don’t worry,” Wayne murmured. “We’re going to stop it.” 

“We’re the Reality Police,” Lacie told me. “Our job is to keep reality under 
control. We’ve been trying to keep up with you, Matt. It hasn’t been easy, with 
all the changes you’ve made.” 

“But why?” I asked. “What are you going to do?” 

“We had to capture you,” Lacie said. “We can’t allow you to break the 
reality laws.” 

I thought quickly. “It’s the guest room, right? This all happened because I 
slept in the guest room?” 

“Well—” 

“I’ll never sleep in the guest room again!” I promised. “I don’t mind if I 
don’t change back to my old self. This skinny fourteen-year-old body is not so 
bad.” 

Lacie shook her head. “It’s too late for that, Matt. You’re trapped in the 
hole. It doesn’t matter whether you sleep in the guest room or not. Every time 
you go to sleep—and wake up—you change reality. No matter where you are.” 

“You mean—I can never fall asleep again?” 

“That’s not quite it.” Lacie glanced at the two guys. Then she trained her 
blue eyes on me. 

“I’m sorry, Matt. I really am. You seem like a nice guy.” 

An icy chill slithered down my spine. “What—what are you talking about?” 

She patted my hand. “We have no choice, Matt. We have to put you to sleep 
—forever.” 



22 


I stared at her in horror. 

“You—you can’t do that!” I stammered. 

“Oh, yes, we can,” Wayne said. 

“And we will,” Bruce added. 

“No!” I shouted. I leaped to my feet and dove for the door. But Bruce and 
Wayne were ready for me. They grabbed me and held my arms behind my back. 

“You’re not going anywhere, kid,” Wayne said. 

“Let go of me!” I screamed. 

I struggled and squirmed. But I wasn’t a gigantic monster anymore. I was a 
scrawny kid—no match for Bruce and Wayne. Even Lacie probably could have 
beaten me up if she wanted to. 

The guys tossed me against the back wall of the room. 

“We’ll be back later,” Lacie promised. “Try not to worry about it too much, 
Matt. It won’t hurt.” 

They left the room. I heard the key turn in the lock. 

I was trapped again. 

I searched the room for a way to escape. It was completely empty—no 
furniture at all, not even a chair. Just four bare walls, a locked door, and a small 
window with metal bars. 

I opened the window and rattled the bars. I hoped they might be loose or 
something. But they didn’t budge. 

It was like being in jail. Jailed by the Reality Police. 

I put my ear to the door, listening. I could hear Lacie, Bruce, and Wayne 
talking in the other room. 

“He’ll have to drink the sleeping potion,” Wayne said. “Make sure he 
drinks the whole cup—or he might wake up.” 

“But what if he spits it out?” Lacie asked. “What if he doesn’t swallow it?” 

“I’ll make him swallow it,” Bruce vowed. 

Yikes! I couldn’t listen anymore. I frantically paced the room. 

They were going to feed me a sleeping potion! To make me sleep forever! 

I’d been in trouble before. My day in high school had seemed scary at the 



time. Being a monster was scary too. But, now—now I was really done for. 

I’ve got to find a way out of this mess! I told myself. But how? How? 

Then it dawned on me. How did I get out of trouble before? 

I fell asleep. And the problem went away. 

True, I always woke up with new, worse problems. But nothing could be 
worse than this! 

Maybe, I hoped, if I fall asleep, I’ll wake up somewhere else. And that’s 
how I can escape! 

I paced some more. 

The only trouble was—how could I fall asleep? I was so terrified! 

I knew I had to try, anyway. So I lay down on the floor. There was no bed, 
no pillow, no blanket. Daylight streamed in through the barred window. 

Falling asleep wasn’t going to be easy. 

You can do it, I told myself. I remembered how my mom—my real mom— 
used to say I could fall asleep in a hurricane. I’m a good sleeper, it’s true. 

I missed my mom. It seemed like I hadn’t seen her in a long, long time. 

If only there were some way I could bring her back, I thought as I closed 
my eyes. 

When I was very little, she used to sing me to sleep. I remembered the 
lullaby she sang. It was all about pretty ponies.... 

I hummed the song to myself. Before I knew it, I drifted off to sleep. 



23 


I opened my eyes. I rubbed them. Had I fallen asleep? 

Yes. 

Where was I? 

I looked up. Plain ceiling. 

I looked around. Bare walls. 

A door. 

A window. With bars on it. 

“No!” I cried, furious. “No!” 

I was still in the same room, in the same house in the woods. 

I was still a prisoner. 

My plan didn’t work. 

Now what could I do? 

“Nooooooo!” 

I was so angry, so frustrated, so scared, I jumped up and down in a rage. 

My plan hadn’t worked. I had no more ideas. I didn’t know what to do. 

Now I knew for sure there was no escape for me. 

I was doomed. 

I heard Lacie and the two guys in the other room. They were getting the 
sleeping potion ready. 

They’d put me to sleep forever. I’d never see my mother, or Greg, or Pam 
again. 

How could they do this to me? It wasn’t fair! 

I didn’t do anything wrong. Not on purpose, anyway! 

Thinking about all this made me angrier and angrier. I screamed, 
“NOOOOOOOOOOO!” 

And it sounded strange to me. 

I screamed again, not so loud this time. 

“Nooooo!” 

I thought I was saying, “No.” But that’s not what I heard. 

I heard a squeak. 

“No!” I said again. 



“Eee!” I heard. 

It was my voice. But it wasn’t a human voice. 

I looked at myself. I’d forgotten to do that. I’d been so terrified to find 
myself still trapped—I didn’t think that maybe I had changed. 

But I had changed. 

I was small. About eight inches tall. 

I had tiny little paws. Gray fur. A big bushy tail. 

I was a squirrel! 

My eyes went to the window. I could easily squeeze through the bars now. 

I didn’t waste a second. I scampered up the wall and wriggled through the 

bars. 

I was free! 

Yippee! I did a little squirrel somersault to celebrate. 

Then I ran through the woods as fast as I could. I found the path to town. 

I scurried through town on my little squirrel feet. It seemed to take a long 
time. Short distances felt longer to me. 

All was quiet in town. Normal. No sign that a monster had ever stomped 
through, chomping on cars. 

I guess that reality disappeared, I thought. 

This is the new reality. I’m a squirrel. 

But at least I’m an awake squirrel. It’s better than being a boy who has to 
sleep forever. 

I sniffed the air. I had an amazing sense of smell. I thought I could smell my 
house from the middle of town. 

I raced across the street. But I forgot what my mother always told me. 

Look both ways before you cross. 

A car peeled around the corner. The driver couldn’t see me. 

Huge black tires bore down on me. I tried to scurry out of the way. 

But I didn’t have time. 

I shut my eyes. Is this how I’ll end up? I wondered. 

As roadkill? 



24 


SCREECH! 

The driver slammed on the brakes. The car squealed to a stop. 

Then everything was quiet. 

I opened my eyes. One tire came so close, it touched my ear. 

I zipped out from under the tire and across the street. The car sped away. 

I reached the sidewalk. A dog stood guard in a yard. He barked at me. 

Whoops! I dodged him and ran up a tree. The dog chased me, barking 
furiously. 

I camped out in that tree until the dog got bored. His owner called him. He 
trotted away. 

I sneaked out of the tree and dashed through the yard. 

The rest of the way home I dodged cars, bikes, people, dogs, cats... 

Then, at last, I found myself staring up at my house. It was nothing special, 
my house. Just a white square house with peeling paint. 

But it looked beautiful to me. 

I had a new plan. An idea that would stop this craziness once and for all. 

I hoped. 

My whole problem had started when I slept in the guest room, I knew. 
That’s where the hole in reality was—Lacie had said so. 

But ever since then—ever since I slept in the guest room—I hadn’t slept in 
my own room. Not once. 

Something always stopped me. Either someone else was sleeping there, or 
it was being used for something else. 

My own room was where I slept when my life was normal. My tiny old 
room. I never thought I’d miss it. 

I decided I had to sleep in my old room again. Maybe that way, I could turn 
everything back to normal. The way it used to be. 

I knew it sounded stupid. But it was worth a try. 

And, anyway, I didn’t have any other ideas. 

I scampered up the rain gutter to the second floor. I peeked through my old 
bedroom window. 



There it was! My old room. With my bed in it and everything! 

But the window was closed. I tried to push it with my tiny squirrel paws. 
No luck. 

I checked the other windows in the house. They were all shut. 

There had to be another way to get in. Maybe I could sneak through the 
door somehow. 

Was anyone home? I peered through the living room window. 

Mom! And Pam and Greg! 

They were back! 

I got so excited, I hopped up and down. I chirruped and chittered. 

Then Biggie waddled into the room. 

Oh, yeah. I’d forgotten about Biggie. I wasn’t too glad to see him right 

then. 

Biggie loved to chase squirrels. 

He saw me right away and started barking. 

Pam looked up. She smiled and pointed at me. 

Yes! I thought. Come and get me, Pam. Open the window and let me in! 

She gently opened the window. “Here, little squirrel,” she cooed. “You’re 
so cute!” 

I hesitated. I wanted to go inside. But Biggie was barking like crazy. 

“Put Biggie in the basement!” Pam told Greg. “He’s scaring the squirrel.” 
She was being nicer to me as a squirrel than she ever was to her little 
brother. But I let that slide for now. 

Greg led Biggie to the basement and shut the door. 

“Come on, squirrel,” Pam chirped. “It’s safe now.” 

I hopped into the house. 

“Look!” Pam cried. “He wants to come in! It’s almost like he’s tame!” 
“Don’t let him in here!” Mom warned. “Those animals have rabies! Or 
bugs, at the very least.” 

I tried not to listen. It’s hard to hear your own mother insult you that way. 

I focused on getting upstairs. If I could only get up to my room and fall 
asleep, just for a few minutes.... 

“He’s getting away!” Greg shouted. “Catch him!” 

Pam pounced at me. I skittered away. 

“If that squirrel gets lost in this house, Pamela,” Mom warned, “you’re 
going to be in big, big trouble.” 



“I’ll catch him,” Pam promised. 

Not if I can help it, I silently vowed. 

Pam cut me off at the stairs. I darted into the kitchen. 

Pam followed. She closed the kitchen door behind her. 

I was trapped. 

“Here, little squirrel,” she called. “Here, boy.” 

I twitched my tail. I searched the room for a way out. 

Pam inched her way toward me. She was trying not to scare me away. 

I scurried under the table. She dove for me. Missed. 

But when I scampered away, she cornered me. 

And snatched me up. 

I never knew she was so speedy. 

She grabbed me by the neck and held my feet together. “I got him!” she 
shouted. 

Greg threw open the kitchen door. Mom stood behind him. 

“Take him outside—quick!” Mom ordered. 

“Can’t I keep him, Mom?” Pam begged. “He’d be such a cute pet!” 

I shuddered. Me, as Pam’s pet! What a nightmare! 

But it might be my best chance to get back to my room. 

“No!” Mom insisted. “You absolutely cannot keep him. Put him outside— 
now.” 

Pam’s mouth drooped. “Okay, Mom,” she said sadly. “Whatever you say.” 
She carried me out of the kitchen. “Mom is so mean,” she said loudly so 
Mom could hear her. “All I wanted to do was pet you and cuddle you for a 
while. What’s wrong with that?” 

A lot, I thought. Pam was the last person I wanted petting and cuddling me. 
Except for Greg. 

She opened the front door. “Bye, you cute little squirrel,” she said. 

Then she slammed the door shut. 

But she didn’t let me go. She held me tightly in her arms. 

Then she slipped upstairs to her room. 

“Don’t worry, squirrel,” she whispered. “I won’t keep you very long. Just a 
little while.” 

She pulled something out from under her bed. Her old hamster cage. 

She opened the door of the cage. She shoved me inside. 



“No!” I protested. But all I could do was squeak. 
She locked the latch. 

I was a prisoner again! 



25 


Now what am I going to do? I thought frantically. I’m stuck in this stupid cage. I 
can’t talk. 

How will I ever get to my old room? 

Another bad thought came to me. 

If I fell asleep in this tiny hamster cage—what would happen when I woke 
up? 

Pam’s big face loomed over the cage. “Are you hungry, squirrely-kins? I’ll 
go get you some nuts or something.” 

She left the room for a minute. I paced the cage, thinking hard. The next 
thing I knew, I was running on the hamster wheel. 

Stop it! I told myself. I made myself get off the wheel. I didn’t want to get 
used to being a rodent. 

“Here you go, squirrel.” Pam had returned to the room with a handful of 
nuts. She opened the door to the cage and sprinkled the nuts inside. 

“Yum yum!” she squealed. 

Oh, brother. 

I ate the nuts. I was very hungry after all my adventures. But I would have 
enjoyed them more if Pam hadn’t watched me the whole time. 

The phone rang. A moment later I heard Greg call, “Pam! Telephone!” 

“Excellent!” Pam cried. She jumped up and ran out of the room. 

Like a moron, I sat there gobbling nuts. It took me five minutes to notice 
that Pam had left the cage door unlatched. 

“Yes!” I squeaked. For once I was glad that Pam was no genius. 

I pushed the door open with my paws. I crept toward the bedroom door, 
listening for footsteps. 

The coast was clear. Now was my chance! 

I dashed out the door. Down the hall. To my room. 

The door was shut. I threw my tiny squirrel body against it, trying to open 
it. 

No way. It was closed tight. 

Rats! 



I heard footsteps down the hall. Pam was coming back! 

I knew I had to get out of there before Pam put me back in that cage. 

Or before my mother swatted me with a broom. 

I scurried down the steps and into the living room. 

Was the window still open? Yes. 

I ran behind the couch, along the wall, under a chair... 

Then I leaped up to the windowsill and out into the yard. 

I climbed a tree and curled up on a branch to rest. 

I couldn’t get into my old room as a squirrel. There was only one thing I 
could do. 

I had to go to sleep again. And this time, I’d better wake up as a human. 
Because I had to get to my old room. If I didn’t, I’d be in trouble. 

Big trouble. 

The Reality Police were on my trail. It was only a matter of time before 
they’d find me. 

If they did, nothing could save me. 



26 


CRASH! THUD! 

OOF! 

I landed hard on the ground. What a way to wake up. 

Who was I this time? 

What a relief. I was a twelve-year-old boy again. 

But I still wasn’t my old self. 

I was a very, very chubby boy. A real blimp. No wonder the tree branch 
didn’t hold me. 

But that didn’t matter. I was a human again. I could talk. 

And maybe now I could get to my old room at last. 

I marched straight up to the front door and tried the knob. 

Locked. 

So I knocked. 

I had no idea who would answer. I hoped it wasn’t a monster family. 

The door opened. 

“Mom!” I cried. I was so glad to see her. “Mom—it’s me! Matt!” 

Mom stared at me. “Who are you?” she asked. 

“Matt! Matt, Mom! Your son!” 

She squinted at me. “Matt? I don’t know anyone named Matt,” she said. 
“Sure you do, Mom! Don’t you remember me? Remember that lullaby you 
used to sing to me when I was a baby?” 

She narrowed her eyes suspiciously. 

Greg and Pam appeared behind her. “Who is it, Mom?” Pam asked. 

“Greg!” I shouted. “Pam! It’s me, Matt! I’m back!” 

“Who is this kid?” Greg asked. 

“I don’t know him,” Pam said. 

Oh, no, I thought. Please don’t let this be happening. I’m so close.... 

“I need to sleep in my old room,” I begged. “Please, Mom. Let me go 
upstairs and sleep in my room. It’s a matter of life and death!” 

“I don’t know you,” Mom said. “And I don’t know any Matt. You have the 
wrong house.” 



“This kid is some kind of wacko,” Greg said. 

“Mom! Wait!” I cried. 

Mom slammed the door in my face. 

I turned around and started down the walk. What do I do now? I wondered. 
Then I stopped. I glanced down the block. Three people were running 
toward me. The last three people I wanted to see. Lacie, Bruce, and Wayne. The 
Reality Police! They’d found me! 



27 


“There he is!” Lacie pointed at me. The three of them started to run. 

“Get him!” 

I turned and ran. It wasn’t easy. I couldn’t run very fast. 

Why did I have to wake up chubby this time? 

I did have one advantage. I knew the neighborhood inside out—and they 
didn’t. I ran across the yard to the next-door neighbor’s house. 

I glanced back. The Reality Police were gaining on me. They were half a 
block away. 

I disappeared behind the neighbor’s house. Then I sneaked back around to 
my house. 

At the back of the garage is a line of thick shrubs. I threw myself behind the 
shrubs and held my breath. 

A few minutes later, three pairs of feet hurried past me. 

“Where’d he go?” I heard Lacie ask. 

“He must’ve gone the other way,” Wayne said. “Come on!” 

They ran off. 

Whew. I could breathe again. I let out a whoosh of air. 

Safe for now. But I knew the Reality Police would find me again. 

I had to get back to my room. But there was no way Mom would let me in. 
She thought I was a total nutcase. 

There was only one thing to do. I had to break into the house. 

I’d wait until nighttime. Till everyone was asleep. 

Then I’d find an open window somewhere—or break one if I had to. 

I’d sneak into my room and sleep there. I hoped I wouldn’t find someone 
else sleeping there. 

In the meantime, I had to wait for night. I stayed hidden behind the shrubs. I 
lay as still as I could. 

And I struggled to stay awake. I didn’t want to fall asleep again. 

If I fell asleep, who knew what I’d be? I might never get to my room. 

The hours ticked slowly by. At last night came. The neighborhood got 
quiet. 



I pulled myself out of the shrubs. My legs and arms ached from hiding. 

I looked at the house. Everyone had gone to bed, except for Mom. Her 
bedroom light was still on. 

I waited until it went off. I waited another half hour to give her time to fall 
sound asleep. 

Then I crept around to the front of the house. My room was on the second 
floor. 

I knew Mom had locked all the doors. I knew she’d locked all the first-floor 
windows. She did that every night. 

I had to climb to the second floor and sneak in through my window. It was 
the only way. 

I had to climb up the tree that grew by my window. Then reach out and grab 
the rain gutter. 

Then set myself down on the narrow ledge outside my window. I’d have to 
cling to the gutter for balance. 

If I could make it to the ledge, I might be able to open the window and 
crawl in. 

That was the plan, anyway. The more I thought about it, the more stupid it 
sounded. 

Better not think about it, then, I decided. Just do it. 

I stood up on my toes, stretching toward the lowest branch of the tree. It 
was just out of reach. I’d have to jump. 

I bent my knees and sprang up. My fingertips grazed the branch, but I 
couldn’t get a grip on it. 

If only I weren’t so chubby! I could barely get off the ground. 

I won’t give up, I vowed. If this doesn’t work, I’m doomed. 

So I took a deep breath. I gathered all my strength. 

I crouched down. I sprang up as high as I could. 

Yes! I grabbed the branch! 

I hung there for a second, wriggling. I kicked my legs. They were so heavy! 

I twisted around and walked my legs up the tree trunk. With a grunt of 
effort, I hoisted myself onto the branch. 

Whew. 

The rest of the tree was pretty easy. I climbed up until I reached the branch 
just outside my window. 

I grabbed a branch over my head as I stood up. I could just reach the rain 



gutter. I sure hoped it would hold. 

I grasped the gutter. I tried to put my foot on the window ledge. 

I missed. 

I was hanging by my fingertips from the gutter! 

I looked down. The ground seemed far away. 

I squeezed my lips shut to keep myself from screaming. 

I panted, hanging there. I had to get my foot on that ledge—or I’d fall. 

I wriggled to the left, trying to get closer to the ledge. CRACK! What was 
that? CRACK! The gutter! It wasn’t going to hold! 



28 


CRACK! 

I felt myself sink. The gutter was about to give way. 

I mustered all my strength. Clinging to the gutter, I stretched one leg out as 
far as it would go. My toes touched the window ledge. 

I set one foot down. Then the other. 

I made it! 

I crouched on the ledge. I clung to the gutter with one hand, for balance. 

I didn’t move. I tried to catch my breath. The night was cool. But I felt 
drops of sweat trickle down my face. I wiped them away with my free hand. 

I peered through the window. My room was dark. Was anybody in there? 

I couldn’t tell. 

The window was shut. 

Please don’t let it be locked, I prayed. 

If I couldn’t get in, I’d be stuck up on the ledge. I’d have no way to get 
down. 

Unless I fell down, of course. 

I carefully tried the window. It slid up. It wasn’t locked! 

I pushed it open. Then I crawled into the room. I tumbled onto the floor. 

I froze. Did anyone hear me? 

No sounds. Everyone was still asleep. 

I pulled myself to my feet. There was my bed! My old bed! And it was 
empty! 

I was so happy, I wanted to jump up and shout. But I didn’t. 

I’ll save the celebration for tomorrow, I decided. If my plan works. 

I took off my shoes and crawled into bed. I sighed. Clean sheets. 

It felt good to be back. Everything was almost normal. 

I was sleeping in my own bed. Mom and Pam and Greg were all asleep in 
their rooms. 

Okay, I didn’t look like myself. I didn’t have my old body back yet. 

And my family didn’t recognize me. If they saw me now, they’d think I was 
a burglar. Or a maniac. 



I pushed those things out of my mind. I wanted to think about the morning. 
What will happen tomorrow? I wondered sleepily. 

Who will I be when I wake up? Will my life be normal again? 

Or will I find Lacie and those two guys standing over me, ready to pounce? 
There was only one way to find out. I closed my eyes and drifted off to 
sleep. 



29 


I felt something warm on my face. Sunlight. 

I opened my eyes. Where was I? 

I glanced around. I was in a small, cramped, messy room full of junk. 

My old room! 

My heart skipped a beat. Did my plan work? Was I back to normal? 

I couldn’t wait to find out. I threw off the covers and jumped out of bed. I 
hurried to the mirror on the back of my bedroom door. 

I saw a skinny, blond, twelve-year-old boy. Yes! I was back! 

I was me again! 

“Woo-hoo!” I cried. 

Biggie nosed the door open and waddled into the room. He growled at me. 
He barked. 

“Biggie!” I cried happily. I bent down and hugged him. He snapped at me. 
Good old Biggie. 

“Matt!” I heard Mom’s voice call from the kitchen. My real mom’s voice. 
“Matt! Leave Biggie alone! Stop teasing him!” 

“I’m not teasing him!” I yelled back. She always blames me for everything. 
But I didn’t care! I was so glad to be back! 

I scrambled downstairs for breakfast. 

There they sat. Mom. Pam. Greg. Just the way I left them. 

“The geek enters the kitchen for his morning feeding,” Greg spoke into his 
tape recorder. “What does a geek eat? Let’s watch and find out.” 

“Greg!” I sang. I threw my arms around his neck and hugged him. 

“Hey!” He swatted me away. “Get off me, geek!” 

“And Pam!” I gave her a big hug too. 

“What’s your problem, pea-brain?” she snapped. “I know—you got 
kidnapped by aliens last night! Am I right? And they brainwashed you!” 

I ignored her jokes. I patted the top of her Brillo pad hair. 

“Cut it out!” she whined. 

I gave my mom the biggest hug of all. 

“Thanks, honey.” She patted me on the back. At least she was on my side, 



once in a while. 

“Get some cereal, Matt,” she said. “I’m running late.” 

I sighed happily and fixed myself some cereal. Everything was back to 
normal. No one even noticed I’d been gone. 

I’m never going into that stupid guest room again, I vowed. Never. I’m 
going to stay in my little room from now on—no matter how cramped it gets. 

THWACK! Something stung me on the back of the neck. 

I whirled around. Greg grinned at me. He held a straw in one hand. 

He spoke into the tape recorder. “What happens if you shoot a paper wad at 
the geek? How does he respond?” 

“I bet he cries like a baby,” Pam said. 

I shmgged and went back to my cereal. “You can’t bother me,” I said. “I’m 
too happy.” 

Pam and Greg exchanged glances. Pam twirled one finger at the side of her 
head. It was the international signal for “He’s nuts.” 

“Something has happened to the geek,” Greg announced. 

“Yeah,” Pam agreed. “The geek has changed.” 

School was so much fun that day. It was great to be in seventh grade again. So 
much easier than high school. 

We played soccer in gym. I even scored a goal. 

But on my way to my last class, I saw something that made my heart stop. 

A girl walking down the hall. About my age. Long, thick blond hair in a 
ponytail. 

Oh, no. 

Lacie! 

I froze. What should I do? 

Were the Reality Police still after me? I had fixed everything! They didn’t 
need to put me to sleep anymore! 

I’ve got to get out of here, I decided. I got ready to run. 

Then the girl turned around. She grinned at me. 

It wasn’t Lacie. Just some girl with long blond hair. 

I took a deep breath. I need to relax, I thought. 

It’s over now. It was all a bad dream. Sort of. 

The girl walked away. I went to my last class. No sign of Lacie, Bruce, or 
Wayne anywhere. 



I whistled all the way home, thinking about how easy my homework was going 
to be. 

I walked into the house. “Hi, Matt!” Mom called. 

“Mom?” I was surprised to see her. She was usually at work when I got 
home. “What are you doing home so early?” 

She smiled at me. “I took the day off,” she explained. “I had a few things to 
do around the house.” 

“Oh.” I shrugged and turned on the TV. 

Mom switched it off. “Matt—aren’t you curious?” 

“Curious? About what?” 

“About what I’ve been doing all day?” 

I glanced around the living room. Everything looked the same. 

“I don’t know,” I said. “What have you been doing?” 

She smiled again. She looked excited about something. 

“Have you forgotten?” she said. “It’s your birthday this week!” 

Actually, I had forgotten. So much weird stuff had been going on. 

When you’re running for your life, you don’t think much about your 
birthday. 

“I have a special surprise for you,” Mom said. “Come upstairs and I’ll show 
you.” 

I followed her upstairs. I started getting excited. What could the surprise 
be? 

It wasn’t like Mom to make such a big deal about my birthday. The surprise 
must be something really great, I decided. 

She stopped in front of my bedroom door. 

“Is the surprise in my room?” I asked. 

“Look.” She pushed open the door. 

I peered inside. My room was filled with cartons. Big boxes from floor to 
ceiling. 

Wow! 

“Are all those presents for me?” I asked. 

Mom laughed. “Presents? All those boxes? Of course not!” She cracked up. 

I knew it had to be too good to be true. 

“Well—what’s the surprise, then?” I asked. 

“Matt,” she began, “I’ve been thinking about what you said the other day. 



And I decided you were right. Your room is too small for you. So I’ve turned it 
into a storage closet.” 

“You—you what?” 

“That’s right.” She walked across the hall. 

She threw open the guest room door. “Ta-da!” 

No. Oh, no. 

It can’t be. Not that. 

“Happy Birthday, Matt!” Mom shouted. “Welcome to your new room!” 

“Uh... uh... uh...” I couldn’t say a word. 

My bed, my dresser, all my posters and books—they were all set up in the 
guest room. 

“Matt? What’s the matter?” Mom cried. “This is what you said you 
wanted!” 

My mouth fell open. I started to scream. 






THE BLOB THAT 
ATE EVERYONE 

Goosebumps - 55 
R.L. Stine 



1 


“I used to believe in monsters,” Alex said. She pushed her glasses up on her 
nose. Her nose twitched. With her pink face and round cheeks, she looked like a 
tall, blonde bunny rabbit. 

“When I was little, I thought that a monster lived in my sock drawer,” Alex 
told me. “You won’t believe this, Zackie. But I never opened that drawer. I used 
to wear my sneakers without socks. Sometimes I tried to go barefoot to 
kindergarten. I was too scared to open that drawer. I knew the sock monster 
would bite my hand off! ” 

She laughed. Alex has the strangest laugh. It sounds more like a whistle 
than a laugh. “Wheeeeeeh! Wheeeeeh!” 

She shook her head, and her blonde ponytail shook with her. “Now that I’m 
twelve, I’m a lot smarter,” she said. “Now I know that there is no such thing as 
monsters.” 

That’s what Alex said to me two seconds before we were attacked by the 
monster. 


* * * 


It was spring vacation, and Alex and I were out collecting things. That’s what we 
do when we can’t think of anything better. 

Sometimes we collect weird-looking weeds. Sometimes we collect bugs. Or 
odd-shaped leaves. 

Once, we collected stones that looked like famous people. That didn’t last 
long. We couldn’t find too many. 

If you get the idea that Norwood Village is a boring town—you’re right! 

I mean, it was boring until the monster attacked. 

Alex Iarocci lives next door to me. And she is my best friend. 

Adam Levin, who lives across town, is my best friend too. I think a person 
should have a lot of best friends! 

I’m not sure why Alex has a boy’s name. I think it’s short for Alexandria. 
But she won’t tell me. 



She complains about her name all the time. It gives her a lot of trouble. 

Last year at school, Alex was assigned to a boys’ gym class. And she gets 
mail addressed to Mr. Alex Iarocci. 

Sometimes people have trouble with my name too. Zackie Beauchamp. My 
last name is pronounced BEECH-am. But no one ever knows how to say it. 

Why am I going on about names like this? I think I know why. 

You see, when the Blob Monster attacked, I was so scared, I forgot my own 
name! 

Alex and I had decided to collect worms. Only purple worms—no brown ones. 

That made the search more interesting. 

It had rained the day before, a long, steady, spring rain. Our backyards were 
still soft and spongy. 

The worms were coming up for air. They poked through the wet grass. And 
wriggled onto the driveway. 

We were both crouched down, searching for purple ones—when I heard a 
loud, squishy sound behind me. 

I spun around quickly. 

And gasped when I saw the monster. “Alex—look!” 

She turned too. And a whistling sound escaped her mouth. “Wheeeeh!” 
Only this time, she wasn’t laughing. 

I dropped the worm I had been carrying and took a biiig step back. 

“It—it looks like a giant human heart!” Alex cried. 

She was right. 

The monster made another loud squish as it bounced over the grass toward 
us. It bounced like a giant beach ball, taller than Alex and me. Nearly as tall as 
the garage! 

It was pink and wet. And throbbing. 

BRUM BRRUUM BRUMMM. It pulsed like a heart. 

It had two tiny black eyes. The eyes glowed and stared straight ahead. 

On top of the pink blob, I thought I saw curled-up snakes. But as I stared in 
horror, I realized they weren’t snakes. They were thick, purple veins—arteries 
tied together in a knot. 

BRRUUUM BRUM BRUMM. 

The monster throbbed and bounced. 

“Ohhhhhh!” I groaned as I saw the sticky trail of white slime it left behind 



on the grass. 

Alex and I were taking giant steps—backwards. We didn’t want to turn our 
backs on the ugly thing. 

“Unh unh unh!” Terrified groans escaped my throat. My heart had to be 
pounding at a hundred miles an hour! 

I took another step back. Then another. 

And as I backed away, I saw a crack open up in the creature’s middle. 

At first I thought the pink blob was cracking apart. 

But as the crack grew wider, I realized I was staring at its mouth. 

The mouth opened wider. Wider. 

Wide enough to swallow a human! 

And then a fat purple tongue plopped out. The tongue made a wet SPLAT as 
it hit the grass. 

“Ohhhhh. ” I groaned again. My stomach lurched. I nearly lost my lunch. 

The end of the tongue was shaped like a shovel. A fat, sticky, purple shovel. 

To shovel people into the gaping mouth? 

Thick, white slime poured from the monster’s mouth. “It—it’s drooling !” I 
choked out. 

“Run!” Alex cried. 

I turned—and tripped on the edge of the driveway. 

I landed hard on my elbows and knees. 

And looked back—in time to see the drooling, pink mouth open wider as 
the tongue wrapped around me... pulling me, pulling me in. 



2 


Alex stared at me, her mouth open wide. “Zackie, that is awesomel” she 
declared. 

Adam scratched his curly, black hair and made a face. “You call that 
scary?” He rolled his eyes. “That’s about as scary as Goldilocks and the Three 
Bears. ” 

I held the pages of my story in one hand. I rolled them up and took a swing 
at Adam with them. 

He laughed and ducked out of my reach. 

“That is an awesome story!” Alex repeated. “What do you call it?” 

“ ‘Adventure of the Blob Monster’,” I told her. 

“Oh, wow,” Adam exclaimed sarcastically. “Did you think that up all by 
yourself?” 

Alex gave Adam a hard shove that sent him tumbling onto the couch. “Give 
Zackie a break,” she muttered. 

The three of us were hanging out in Adam’s house. We were squeezed into 
what his parents call the rec room. 

The room is so small. Only a couch and a TV fit. 

It was spring vacation, and we were hanging out because we didn’t know 
what else to do. The night before, I stayed up till midnight, working on my scary 
story about the Blob Monster. 

I want to be a writer when I grow up. I write scary stories all the time. Then 
I read them to Alex and Adam. 

They always react in the same way. Alex always likes my stories. She 
thinks they’re really scary. She says that my stories are so good, they give her 
nightmares. 

Adam always says my stories aren’t scary at all. He says he can write better 
stories with one hand tied behind his back. 

But he never does. 

Adam is big and red-cheeked and chubby. He looks a little like a bear. He 
likes to punch people and wrestle around. Just for fun. He’s actually a good guy. 

He just never likes my stories. 

“What’s wrong with this story?” I asked him. 



The three of us were crammed onto the couch now. There was nowhere else 
to sit. 

“Stories never scare me,” Adam replied. He picked an ant off the couch 
arm, put it between his thumb and finger, and shot it at me. 

He missed. 

“I thought the story was really scary,” Alex said. “I thought you had really 
good description.” 

“I never get scared by books or stories,” Adam insisted. “Especially stories 
about dumb monsters.” 

“Well—what does scare you?” Alex demanded. 

“Nothing,” Adam bragged. “I don’t get scared by movies, either. Nothing 
ever scares me.” 

And then he opened his mouth wide in a scream of horror. 

All three of us did. 

We leaped off the couch—as a terrifying screech rang through the room. 

And a black shadow swept over the floor. 



3 


The shadow swooped by our feet, so fast I could barely see it. 

I felt something brush my ankle. Something soft—and ghostlike. 

“Whoooa!” Adam cried. 

I heard hurried footsteps from the living room. Mr. Levin—Adam’s dad— 
burst into the doorway. With his curly black hair and bearlike, round body, Mr. 
Levin looks a lot like Adam. 

“Sorry about that!” he exclaimed. “I stepped on the cat. Did it run past 
here?” 

We didn’t answer him. 

We were so stunned, we all burst out laughing. 

Mr. Levin frowned at us. “I don’t see what’s so funny,” he muttered. He 
spotted the cat, hiding beside the couch. He picked it up and hurried away. 

The three of us dropped back onto the couch. I was still breathing hard. And 
I could still feel the brush of the cat on my ankle. 

“See, Zackie?” Adam cried. He slapped me hard on the back—so hard I 
nearly fell off the couch. “That was a lot scarier than any story you could write.” 

“No way!” I insisted. “I can write a scarier story than that. The dumb cat 
just surprised us.” 

Alex pulled off her glasses and wiped the lenses on her T-shirt. “What a 
screech that cat made!” she exclaimed, shaking her head. 

“I wasn’t scared at all,” Adam claimed. “I was just trying to scare you 
guys.” He reached over and rubbed the palm of his hand back and forth over my 
head. 

Don’t you hate it when people do that? 

I slugged him as hard as I could. 

He only laughed. 

Alex and I stayed for dinner. Mrs. Levin is a great cook. We always try to be 
around Adam’s house at dinnertime because she always invites us to stay. 

It was dark by the time Alex and I started to walk home. We’d had 
thunderstorms the day before and most of today. The lawns glistened from the 
rain. The wet street reflected the glow of street lights. 



I could hear the crackle of thunder somewhere faraway. As Alex and I made 
our way along the sidewalk, cold rainwater dripped on us from the trees. 

Adam lives on the other side of Norwood Village. But it isn’t a very long 
walk—only about fifteen minutes. 

We walked for about five minutes when we came to a row of little shops. 

“Hey—!” I cried out when the antique store on the corner came into view. 
“It—it’s been totaled!” 

“It looks as if a bomb hit it!” Alex exclaimed. 

We stayed on the corner, staring across the street at it. Part of the roof had 
fallen in. All the windows were shattered. One wall had nearly caved in. The 
shingles on the walls and the roof had been burned black. 

“Was it a fire?” I wondered, leading the way across the street. 

“Lightning,” a woman’s voice replied. 

I turned to see two young women on the sidewalk beside the store. “It was 
struck by lightning,” one of them said. “Yesterday. During the big storm. The 
lightning started a huge fire.” 

“What a mess,” the other woman sighed. She pulled car keys from her 
pocketbook. 

The two women disappeared around the corner, tsk-tsking about the store. 

Alex and I stepped up to the front. 

“Ooh, it stinks,” Alex groaned, holding her nose. 

“It just smells burned,” I replied. I glanced down and saw that I had stepped 
into a deep puddle. 

I jumped back. 

“It’s soaked everywhere,” Alex murmured. “From the fire hoses, I guess.” 

A gust of wind made the front door bang. 

“It’s open!” I exclaimed. 

The door had been taped shut. But the tape had broken off. A large yellow 
sign on the door declared in big black letters: DANGER—KEEP OUT. 

“Alex—let’s take a peek,” I urged. 

“No way! Zackie—stop!” Alex cried. 

Too late. I was already inside. 



4 


I took a couple of steps into the shop and waited for my eyes to adjust to the 
darkness. Water dripped everywhere. An entire wall of shelves had toppled over. 
Broken vases, and lamps, and small statues lay scattered over the puddled floor. 

“Zackie—!” Alex grabbed my shoulder. “Zackie—get out of here!” she 
whispered. “This is really dangerous.” 

“Leave the door open,” I told her. “We need the light from the street.” 

“But what do you want to see?” Her voice echoed over the PLUNK PLUNK 
PLUNK of dripping water. 

She grabbed my other arm and started to tug me out. “Come on. You saw 
the sign. The whole building may fall in on us.” 

I jerked my arm away. My sneakers squished as I walked. The carpet was 
soaked. 

“I just want to look around for one second,” I told Alex impatiently. “This 
is cool!” 

“It isn’t cool,” she argued. “It’s really stupid.” 

A row of ugly antique masks stared at us from one wall. The masks were 
tilted at odd angles. Other masks stared up from where they had fallen on the 
floor. 

A tall wooden clock had its face burned black. Wooden duck decoys lay on 
their sides, burned and cracked. 

A creaking sound overhead made me jump. I heard Alex gasp. 

I raised my eyes to the ceiling. Part of it had fallen in. Was the rest about to 
collapse on top of us? 

“Zackie—let’s go!” Alex urged. She backed up toward the door. Her shoes 
squished over the soaked carpet. 

The door banged shut behind us. I turned and saw the wind blow it back 
open. 

PLINK PLINK Cold water dripped onto my shoulder. 

“If you don’t come, I’m going without you!” Alex called. “I mean it, 
Zackie.” 

“Okay, okay,” I muttered. “I’m coming. I just wanted to check out what 
happened.” 



“Hurry!” Alex urged. She was halfway out the door. 

I turned and started to follow her. 

But I stopped when something on a high shelf caught my eye. 

“Hey, Alex—” I called. “Look!” 

I pointed up to an old typewriter. “Wow. My dad used to have one like that 
when I was real little,” I said. 

“Zackie—I’m leaving,” Alex warned. 

“I love old typewriters!” I cried. “Look, Alex. I don’t think the fire hurt it. I 
think it’s in good shape. I just have to check it out. Okay?” 

I didn’t wait for her to reply. 

I crossed the room. Stepped up to the shelf. Stood on tiptoe and reached for 
the old typewriter. 

“OWWWWWWW!” 

I felt a hard shock of pain. It shot through my body. 

Stunned me. 

Took away my breath. 

Over my stunned cry, I heard the sharp crackle of electricity. 

And I bent over—helpless—as a bright blue flame shot around my body. 



5 


Blue. 

I saw only blue. 

The deepest blue I’d ever seen. 

I’m floating in the sky, I realized. I’m weightless. And I’m floating. 
Floating in the blue, blue sky. 

The blue faded to white. 

Was I still floating? Was I moving at all? 

Was I breathing? 

I struggled to speak. To shout. To make any kind of a sound. 

The white faded quickly. To gray. Then black. 

“Ohhhh,” I heard myself moan. 

Dark. So dark now. I was surrounded by darkness. 

I blinked. Blinked again. And realized I was staring into the darkness of the 
mined antique shop. 

“Zackie? Zackie?” 

I heard my name. Heard Alex repeating my name. 

I cleared my throat. I sat up. My eyes darted around the store. 

“Zackie? Zackie? Are you okay?” 

I tried to shake my dizziness away. My whole body tingled. Tingled and 
hummed, as if an electrical current were running through me. 

“How did I get on the floor?” I asked weakly. 

Alex leaned over me, one hand on my shoulder. “You got a shock,” she 
said, squinting hard at me through her glasses. “There must be a wire down or 
something.” 

I rubbed the back of my neck. I couldn’t stop the strange tingling or the 
steady hum in my ears. 

“Wow,” I murmured. 

“It was a real bad shock,” Alex said softly. “I—I was so scared. You were 
inside a blue flame. Your whole body—it turned bright blue.” 

“Wow,” I repeated, still fighting the dizziness. 

“Your hands shot up in the air,” Alex continued. “And then you bent in two. 



And fell to the floor. I—I thought...” Her voice trailed off. 

PLINKPLINK. 

I could hear the drip of water again. The hum in my ears had faded. 

I pulled myself shakily to my feet. I stretched my arms over my head, trying 
to stop the strange tingling. 

The old typewriter caught my eye again. 

“Zackie—what are you doing?” Alex cried. 

I moved carefully to the shelf, stepping around a puddle of water on the 
carpet. I took a deep breath. Stretched up on tiptoe. And pulled the old 
typewriter down. 

“Whoa—! It weighs a ton!” I cried. “It’s solid metal!” 

I held it in my arms and examined it. The sleek black surface caught the 
glow of the streetlight outside the door. The round keys poked up toward me. 

“It’s awesome!” I exclaimed. “This typewriter, Alex—it’s perfect for 
writing scary stories on.” 

“Are you crazy?” Alex declared. “Zackie, I think that electric shock messed 
up your brain!” 

“But look at it!” I insisted excitedly. “It’s perfect. Perfect!” 

Alex rolled her eyes. “You have a brand-new computer at home,” she 
reminded me. “And your mom gave you her old laser printer—remember?” 

“I know, I know,” I muttered. 

“You can print eight pages a minute,” Alex continued. “So what do you 
need a creaky old typewriter for?” 

“I need it because it’s perfect,” I told her. “Perfect! Perfect!” 

“Stop repeating that word,” she snapped. “Are you sure you’re feeling 
okay? That was a horrible shock. Maybe I should call your parents.” 

“No. No, I’m fine,” I insisted. The typewriter was growing heavy in my 
arms. “Let’s just go.” 

Lugging the typewriter, I started to the door. But Alex blocked my path. 

“You can’t just take it!” she scolded. “It doesn’t belong to you. That’s 
stealing.” 

I made a face at her. “Alex, don’t be dumb. Everything in this store is 
wrecked. Nobody will care if I take—” 

I stopped with a gasp when I heard the squish of shoes on the wet carpet. 

Then I heard a cough. 

I turned to Alex. Caught the fear on her face. 



She heard the sounds too. 

“Zackie, we’re not alone in here,” she whispered. 



6 


Another squishy footstep. Closer. 

A chill swept down my back. I nearly dropped the typewriter. 

“Hide,” I whispered. I didn’t need to suggest it. Alex was already slipping 
behind a tall display shelf. 

I set the typewriter down on the floor. Then I crept behind the shelf and 
huddled close to Alex. 

I heard another cough. And then a circle of light moved across the wet 
carpet. The pale yellow beam of a flashlight. 

The light slid over the floor. Then it started to climb the display case. Alex 
and I ducked low. The circle of light washed over our heads. 

My legs were trembling. I gripped the back of the case with both hands to 
keep myself from falling over. 

“Hello?” a voice called. A woman’s voice. “Hello? Is someone in here?” 

Alex turned to me. She motioned with her head. 

She was silently asking if we should step out and show ourselves. 

I shook my head no. 

How could we explain what we were doing inside the shop? How could we 
explain why we were hiding? 

Maybe the woman will leave, I told myself. Maybe she won’t find us. 

Who is she? I wondered. Does she own the store? 

I peered out around the bottom shelf. I could see the woman from the side. 
She was African-American. She had very short, dark hair. She wore a long 
raincoat. 

She moved the flashlight beam along the back wall. It lit up the fallen shelf, 
the broken antiques. 

Her footsteps slogged over the wet carpet. 

“Hello?” she called. “Did someone come in here?” 

I held my breath. 

Please leave, I begged silently. Please don’t catch us here. 

The woman turned. Her light stopped on the typewriter in the middle of the 
floor. She kept the light steady, staring at the typewriter. 



I knew what she was thinking: How did the typewriter get on the floor? 
Slowly, she raised the light. Raised it back to the display shelf. 

She stared right at us! 

Could she see us hiding behind the display case? 

I froze. I pretended to be a statue. 

Did she see us? 

No. 

She muttered something to herself. The light went out. 

I blinked in the sudden darkness. Her footsteps moved away. 

I realized I was still holding my breath. I let it out slowly, trying not to 
make a sound. 

Silence now. And darkness. 

No footsteps. No beam of yellow light. 

The front door banged shut. 

Alex and I exchanged glances. 

Was the woman gone? Did she leave the shop? 

We didn’t move. 

We waited. And listened. 

Silence... 

Then Alex sneezed. 

“Gotcha!” the woman cried from somewhere behind us. 



7 


A hand grabbed my shoulder. Hard. 

The sleeve of the raincoat brushed my face as the woman tugged me out 
from behind the shelf. I nearly tripped over the typewriter. The woman held me 
up by one arm. 

Alex stepped up beside me. Her ponytail had come undone. Her blonde hair 
was wild around her face. She kept swallowing hard, making dry, clicking 
sounds with her tongue. 

I guessed she was as frightened as I was. 

The woman switched her flashlight on. She raised it to my face, then to 
Alex’s. 

“Were you doing some late shopping?” she demanded. 

“Huh?” I managed to choke out. 

“The store is closed. Couldn’t you tell?” the woman snapped. 

She was young and pretty. She locked her dark eyes on me. 

“What are you doing in here?” she asked. 

I opened my mouth to answer, but no sound came out. 

“Uh... nothing,” Alex said weakly. “We weren’t doing anything.” 

The woman narrowed her eyes at Alex. “Then why were you hiding?” 

“You f-frightened us,” I stammered, finally finding my voice. 

“Well, you frightened me too!” the woman exclaimed. “You frightened me 
plenty. I was in the back room, and...” 

“We were walking home. We saw the store. How it was wrecked,” I 
explained. “We just wanted to see what it looked like inside. So we came in. 
That’s all.” 

The woman lowered the light to the floor. “I see,” she said softly. 

Her shoe made a squishing sound on the carpet. Water dripped steadily 
from the ceiling behind us. 

“What a mess,” the woman sighed. Her eyes traveled around the ruined 
shop. “I’m Mrs. Carter. I own this store. What’s left of it.” 

“We—we’re sorry,” Alex stammered. 

“You shouldn’t be in here,” Mrs. Carter scolded. “It’s very dangerous. 



Some of the electrical wires are down. You didn’t touch anything—did you?” 

“No. Not really,” Alex replied. 

“Well... just this old typewriter,” I said, gazing down at it. 

“I wondered how it got down there,” Mrs. Carter said. “Why did you move 

it?” 

“I... like it,” I told her. “It’s really cool.” 

“Zackie writes stories,” Alex told Mrs. Carter. “Scary stories.” 

Mrs. Carter let out a bitter laugh. “Well, you could certainly write a scary 
story about this place!” 

“I’ll bet I could write awesome scary stories on that old typewriter,” I said, 
staring down at it. 

“You want it?” Mrs. Carter asked quickly. 

“Yes,” I answered. “Is it for sale? How much does it cost?” 

Mrs. Carter motioned with one hand. “Take it,” she said. 

“Excuse me?” I didn’t think I’d heard her correctly. 

“Go ahead. Take it,” she repeated. “It’s yours. For free.” 

“Do you mean it?” I cried excitedly. “I can have it?” 

She nodded. 

“Thank you!” I could feel a grin spreading over my face. “Thanks a lot!” 

Mrs. Carter bent down and picked up something from the floor. “Here,” she 
said. She handed me a fountain pen. A very old-fashioned-looking fountain pen. 
Heavy and black with silvery chrome on it. 

“For me?” I asked, studying the pen. 

Mrs. Carter nodded again. She smiled at me. “It’s my Going-Out-of- 
Business Special Offer. You get a free pen with every typewriter.” 

“Wow!” I exclaimed. 

Mrs. Carter moved to the door and held it open. “Now, get out of here. Both 
of you,” she ordered. “It really is dangerous in here. I’m leaving too.” 

I hoisted the heavy, old typewriter into my arms. Balancing it against my 
chest, I followed Alex to the door. 

I felt so happy! I thanked Mrs. Carter five more times. Then Alex and I said 
good-bye and headed for our homes. 

The street was still wet. It glowed under the streetlights like a mirror. It 
didn’t look real. 

The walk home seemed to take forever. The typewriter grew heavier with 
each step I took. 



“Weird,” Alex muttered when we finally crossed onto our block. 

“Huh?” I groaned. My arms were about to fall off! The typewriter weighed 
a ton! 

“What’s weird, Alex?” 

“The way she gave you that valuable typewriter,” Alex replied thoughtfully. 
“Why is that so weird?” I demanded. 

“She seemed so eager to give it away. It’s almost as if she wanted to get rid 
of it,” Alex said. She headed toward her house, which is next door to mine. 

My knees buckled as I started up my driveway. My arms ached. My whole 
body ached. I struggled to hold on to the typewriter. 

“That’s crazy,” I muttered. 

Of course, I didn’t know how right Alex was. 

I didn’t know that carrying the old typewriter home would totally ruin my 

life. 



8 


I dragged the typewriter into the ranch house where I live. I was gasping for 
breath. My arms had gone numb. 

Mom and Dad were in the living room. They sat side by side on the couch, 
doing a crossword puzzle together. 

They love crossword puzzles. I’m not sure why. Both of them are terrible 
spellers. They can never finish a puzzle. 

Lots of times, they end up fighting about how to spell a word. Usually, they 
give up and rip the puzzle to pieces. 

Then a few days later, they start a new one. 

They both looked up as I lugged the typewriter toward my room. 

“What’s that?” Mom demanded. 

“It’s a typewriter,” I groaned. 

“I know that!” Mom protested. “I meant—where did you get it?” 

“It’s... a long story,” I choked out. 

Dad climbed up from the couch and hurried over to help me. “Wow. It 
weighs a ton,” he said. “How did you ever carry it home?” 

I shrugged. “It wasn’t so bad,” I lied. 

We carried it to my room and set it down on my desk. I wanted to try it out 
right away. But Dad insisted that I return to the living room. 

I told them the whole story. About lightning hitting the store. About going 
in to explore. About Mrs. Carter and how she gave me the typewriter. 

I left out the part about the bad electrical shock that knocked me to the 
floor. 

My parents are the kind of people who get upset very easily. I mean, they 
start yelling and screaming over crossword puzzles! 

So I never tell them much. I mean, why ruin their day—or mine? 

“Why do you need an old typewriter?” Mom asked, frowning at me. “No 
one uses typewriters anymore. You only see them in antique shops.” 

“I want to write my scary stories on it,” I explained. 

“What about your new computer?” Dad demanded. “What about the laser 
printer we gave you?” 



“I’ll use that too,” I said. “You know. For school-work and stuff like that.” 
Mom rolled her eyes. “Next Zackie will be writing with a feather quill and 
an inkwell,” she said. 

They both laughed. 

“Very funny,” I muttered. I said good-night and hurried down the hall to my 
room. 

I turned the corner that led to my bedroom—and stopped. 

What was that strange crackling sound? 

It seemed to be coming from my room. A steady, crackling buzz. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

I stepped into the doorway, peered into my room—and gasped! 



9 


“My typewriter!” I cried. 

The typewriter was bathed in a bright blue glow. Blue sparks buzzed and 
crackled off and flew in all directions. 

I stared in amazement as the blue current snapped and hummed over the 
typewriter. 

I thought about the shock that had knocked me to the floor in the antique 
shop. Had the typewriter stored up some of that electricity? 

No. That was impossible. 

But then why was the typewriter glowing under a crackling, blue current 
now? 

“Mom! Dad!” I called. “Come here! You have to see this!” 

They didn’t reply. 

I hurtled down the hall to the living room. “Quick! Come quick!” I shouted. 
“You won’t believe this!” 

They had returned to their crossword puzzle. Dad glanced up as I burst into 
the room. “How do you spell 'peregrine’?” he asked. “It’s a kind of falcon.” 

“Who cares?” I cried. “My typewriter—it’s going to blow up or 
something!” 

That got them off the couch. 

I led the way, running full speed down the hall. They followed close behind. 

I stopped at my doorway and pointed to my desk. “Look—!” I cried. 

All three of us peered across the room. 

At the typewriter. The black metal typewriter with its black roller and rows 
of black keys ringed with silver. 

No blue. 

No blue electrical current. No sparks. No crackle or buzz. 

Just an old typewriter sitting on a desk. 

“Funny joke,” Dad muttered, rolling his eyes at me. 

Mom shook her head. “I don’t know where Zackie gets his sense of humor. 
Not from my side of the family.” 

“Your side of the family doesn’t need a sense of humor. They’re already a 



joke!” Dad snapped. 

They walked off arguing. 

I edged slowly, carefully, into my room. I crept up to the typewriter. 
I reached out a hand. I lowered it toward the typewriter. 

Lowered it until it was less than an inch away. 

Then I stopped. 

My hand started to shake. 

I stared down at the solid, dark machine. 

Should I touch it? 

Would it shock me again? 

Slowly... slowly, I lowered my hand. 



10 


Alex slammed her locker shut. She adjusted her backpack and turned to me. “So 
what happened? Did the typewriter zap you?” 

It was the next morning. Spring vacation was over. School had started 
again. 

I had hurried down the hall to our lockers to tell Alex the whole typewriter 
story. I knew she was the only person in the world who would believe me. 

“No. It didn’t zap me,” I told her. “I touched it, and nothing happened. I 
pushed down some of the keys. I turned the roller. Nothing happened.” 

Alex stared hard at me. “Nothing?” 

“Nothing.” 

“That isn’t a very good story,” she teased. “It has a very weak ending.” 

I laughed. “Do you think it would be a better ending if I got fried?” 

“Much better,” she replied. 

It was late. The first bell had already rung. The hall was nearly empty. 

“I’m going to rewrite the Blob Monster story,” I told her. “I have a lot of 
new ideas. I can’t wait to start working on it.” 

She turned to me. “On the old typewriter?” 

I nodded. “I’m going to make the story longer—and scarier. That old 
typewriter is so weird. I know it’s going to help me write scarier than ever!” I 
exclaimed. 

I heard giggling. 

I spun around and saw Emmy and Annie Bell. They’re twins, and they’re in 
our class. Adam came trailing after them. He punched me in the shoulder—so 
hard, I bounced against the lockers. 

Emmy and Annie are good friends with Adam. But not with Alex and me. 

They both have curly red hair, lots of freckles, and lots of dimples. The only 
way to tell Emmy from Annie is to ask, “Which one are you?” 

Emmy grinned at me. I mean, I think it was Emmy. “Do you really believe 
in monsters?” she asked. 

They both giggled again, as if Emmy had asked something really funny. 

“Maybe,” I replied. “But I wasn’t talking about real monsters. I was talking 
about a scary story I’m writing.” 



And then I added nastily, “You two wouldn’t understand—since you 
haven’t learned to write yet!” 

“Ha-ha,” they both said sarcastically. “You’re so funny, Zackie.” 

“Funny-looking!” Adam added. The oldest joke in the universe. 

“But do you believe in monsters?” Emmy insisted. 

“Adam says you do,” her sister added. “Adam says you think a monster 
lives under your bed!” 

“I do not!” I screamed. 

They both giggled. 

“Adam is a liar!” I cried. I tried to grab him, but he dodged away from me, 
laughing his head off. 

“Zackie sees monsters everywhere,” Adam teased, grinning at Emmy and 
Annie. “He thinks when he opens his locker door, a monster will jump out at 
him.” 

They giggled again. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. “We’re going to be late.” 

I turned away from their grinning faces. I turned the lock on my locker and 
pulled open the door. 

Then I knelt down to pull out my books. 

And something leaped out of my locker! 

I saw a white flash. 

“Huh?” I cried out in surprise. 

Another one jumped out. 

And then I gasped when something plopped onto my head. Something 
alive! 

I fell to my knees. Reached up to grab for it. I felt its claws tangle in my 
hair. “Help!” I cried. “Help me!” 



11 


The creature moved across my head. 

And dropped down the back of my shirt! 

Its hot body slid down my skin. Its claws prickled and pinched. 

“Help me! Help!” I jumped up, kicking and stomping and squirming. 

I frantically slapped at my back. 

Adam stepped up to me. He grabbed me by the shoulders. Then he tugged 
open the back of my shirt. 

And plucked the creature off my back. 

He held his hand in front of my face. “Wow! What a monster!” he 
exclaimed. “That’s scaaaaaaryl” 

Still trembling, I stared at the creature. 

A white mouse. 

A little white mouse. 

Emmy and Annie were doubled over beside Adam, laughing their heads off. 

Even Alex was laughing. Great friend, huh? 

“Zackie, I guess you really do see monsters everywhere!” Annie exclaimed. 
“Even teeny white ones!” 

That got them all laughing again. 

“Did you see that awesome dance he did?” Adam asked. Adam did an 
imitation of my frantic dance. He slapped at his head and neck and stomped 
wildly on the floor. 

“Excellent!” Emmy and Annie declared together. 

They all laughed again. 

Alex stopped laughing and stepped up beside me. She brushed something 
off my shoulder. 

“Mouse hair,” she murmured. 

Then she turned to the others. “We should give Zackie a break,” she told 
them. “Someday he’s going to be a famous horror writer.” 

“Someday he’s going to be a famous chicken !” Annie exclaimed. 

Emmy made clucking sounds and flapped her elbows. 

“Do you believe it? The famous horror writer is afraid of mice!” Adam 



cried. 

Emmy and Annie thought that was really funny. Their red hair bobbed up 
and down as they laughed. 

Emmy glanced at her watch—and gasped. “We’re really late!” 

She and her sister spun around and ran down the hall. Adam put the mouse 
in his pocket and went tearing after them. 

I knelt down to pull my books from the bottom of my locker. I reached in 
carefully. I had to make sure there were no more mice. 

Alex stood over me. “You okay?” she asked softly. 

“Go away,” I snapped. 

“What did I do?” Alex demanded. 

“Just go away,” I muttered. 

I didn’t want her around. I didn’t want anyone around. 

I felt like a total jerk. 

Why did I let little mice scare me like that? Why did I have to freak out in 
front of everyone? 

Because I’m a total jerk, I decided. 

I shoved books and a Trapper Keeper into my backpack. Then I stood up 
and started to close my locker. 

Alex leaned against the wall. “I told you to go away,” I snapped at her 
again. 

She started to reply, but stopped when Mr. Conklin, the principal, turned the 
corner. 

Mr. Conklin is a tall, pencil-thin man, with a narrow, red face and big ears 
that stick out like jug handles. He talks really fast. Always runs instead of 
walking. And always seems to be moving in eight directions at once. 

He eyed Alex, then me. “Who let the mice out of the science lab?” he 
demanded breathlessly. 

“Th-they were in Zackie’s locker—” Alex started. 

Before she could explain the rest, Mr. Conklin narrowed his eyes at me. His 
face grew even redder. 

“Zackie, I’d like to see you in my office,” he ordered. “Right now.” 



12 


I didn’t say much at dinner. 

I kept wondering if I should tell Mom and Dad about my adventures at 
school that day. But I decided to keep silent. 

I didn’t need them laughing at me too. 

And I didn’t need them asking a million questions about what Mr. Conklin 
said to me. 

He had been pretty nice about it, actually. He just warned me to try to keep 
live creatures out of my locker. 

After dinner, Dad and I loaded the dishwasher and cleaned up. I was 
sponging off the dinner table when Alex appeared. “How’s it going?” she asked. 
“Did Mr. Conklin—” 

I slapped a hand over her mouth to shut her up. 

I could see Mom and Dad watching from the other room. “What about Mr. 
Conklin?” Mom demanded. 

“He’s a nice guy,” I replied. 

I dragged Alex to the den. “So? How’s it going?” she repeated. 

“How’s it going?” I cried shrilly. “How’s it going? How can you ask me 
‘how’s it going’?” 

“Well...” she started. 

“It’s going terrible !” I cried. “I had the worst day! Kids were laughing at 
me all day. Everywhere I went, kids made mouse faces at me and squeaked at 
me.” 

She started to smile, but cut it off. 

“I don’t know why I lost it like that this morning,” I continued. “I felt so 
dumb. I—” 

“It was just a joke,” Alex interrupted. “No big deal.” 

“Easy for you to say,” I grumbled. “You didn’t have a hundred disgusting 
rodents crawling all over your body.” 

“A hundred?” Alex said. “How about one?” 

“It seemed like a hundred,” I mumbled. I decided to change the subject. 
“Look at this,” I said. 

I walked over to the desk by the window. After school, I had worked there 



for three hours. I picked up a stack of pages. 

“What are those?” Alex asked, following me to the desk. 

“My new Blob Monster story,” I replied, holding up the handwritten pages. 
“I’m making it even scarier.” 

Alex took the pages from my hand and shuffled through them. Then she 
narrowed her eyes at me. “You didn’t type them on the old typewriter?” 

“Of course not.” I took the pages back. “I always write the first draft by 
hand. I don’t type my stories until I’ve got them just right.” 

I picked up the pen from the desk. “I used the antique pen that woman gave 
me in the shop,” I told Alex. “What a great pen. It writes so smoothly. I can’t 
believe she gave it to me for free!” 

Alex laughed. “You’re such a weird guy, Zackie. You get so excited about 
things like pens and typewriters.” And then she added, “I think that’s cool.” 

I glanced over my story. “Now it’s time to type it,” I said. “I’m so excited. I 
can’t wait to use the old typewriter.” 

I led the way into my room. I was halfway to my desk when I stopped. 

And let out a startled cry. 

The typewriter was gone. 



13 


Alex and I both gaped at the empty spot on the front of my desktop. Alex pushed 
up her glasses and squinted. 

“It—it’s gone,” I murmured weakly. My knees started to buckle. I grabbed 
my dresser to hold myself up. 

“Weird,” Alex muttered, shaking her head. “Are you sure—” 

“It just disappeared into thin air!” I interrupted. “I don’t believe this! How? 
How could it disappear?” 

“How could what disappear?” a voice called from the doorway. 

I whirled around—to see Dad lumber heavily into the room. He carried the 
old typewriter in his arms. 

“Dad—why... ?” I started. 

He set it down on the desk. Then he pushed his curly black hair off his 
forehead and grinned at me. “I cleaned it for you, Zackie,” he said. “And put in a 
new ribbon.” 

He wiped sweat off his forehead with the back of his hand. “Ribbons are 
hard to find these days,” he added. “No one uses typewriters anymore.” 

Alex laughed. “Zackie thought the typewriter disappeared into thin air!” 

I flashed Alex an angry look. “Alex—give me a break,” I whispered. 

She made a face at me. 

Dad shook his head. “It’s a little too heavy to disappear into thin air,” he 
sighed. “It weighs a ton! More than a computer!” 

I walked over to the typewriter and ran my hand over the smooth, dark 
metal. “Thanks for cleaning it up, Dad,” I said. “It looks awesome.” 

“A few of the keys were sticking,” Dad added. “So I oiled them up. I think 
the old machine is working fine now, Zackie. You should be able to write some 
great stories on it.” 

“Thanks, Dad,” I repeated. 

I couldn’t wait to get started. I reached into my top drawer for some paper. 
Then I noticed that Dad hadn’t left. He was lingering by the door, watching Alex 
and me. 

“Your mom went across the street to visit Janet Hawkins, our new 
neighbor,” he said. “It’s such a beautiful spring night. I thought maybe you two 



would like to take a walk into town to get some ice cream.” 

“Uh... no thanks,” Alex replied. “I already had dessert at home. Before I 
came over.” 

“And I really want to get started typing my new scary story,” I told him. 

He sighed and looked disappointed. I think he really wanted an excuse to 
get ice cream. 

As soon as he left, I dropped into my desk chair. I slid a fresh, white sheet 
of paper into the typewriter roller. 

Alex pulled up a chair and sat beside me. “Can I try the typewriter after 
you?” she asked. 

“Yes. After me,” I replied impatiently. 

I really wanted to get my story typed. 

I let my eyes wander over the round, black keys. Then I leaned forward and 
started to type. 

Typing on a typewriter is a lot different from typing on a keyboard. For one 
thing, you have to press the keys a lot harder. 

It took me a few tries to get the feel of the thing. 

Then I typed the first words of the story: 

IT WAS A DARK AND STORMY NIGHT. 

“Hey—!” I uttered a cry as lightning flashed in my bedroom window. 

Rain pounded on the glass. 

A sharp roar of thunder shook the house. 

Darkness swept over me as all the lights went out. 

“Zackie—?” Alex cried in a tiny voice. “Zackie? Zackie? Are you all 
right?” 



14 


I swallowed hard. “Yes. I’m okay,” I said quietly. 

Alex is the only person in the world who knows that I’m afraid of the dark. 

I’m afraid of mice. And I’m afraid of the dark. 

I admit it. 

And I’m afraid of a lot of other things. 

I’m afraid of big dogs. I’m afraid of going down to the basement when I’m 
all alone in the house. I’m afraid of jumping into the deep end of the swimming 
pool. 

I’ve told Alex about some of my fears. But not all of them. 

I mean, it’s kind of embarrassing. 

Why do I write scary stories if I’m afraid of so many things? 

I don’t know. Maybe I write better stories because I know what being 
scared feels like. 

“The lights went off so suddenly,” Alex said. She stood beside me, leaning 
over my desk to see out the window. “Usually they flicker or something.” 

Sheets of rain pounded against the windowpane. Jagged streaks of lightning 
crackled across the sky. 

I stayed in my desk chair, gripping the arms tightly. “I’m glad Adam isn’t 
here,” I murmured. “He’d just make fun of me.” 

“But you’re not very scared now—are you?” Alex asked. 

An explosion of thunder made me nearly jump out of the chair. 

“A little,” I confessed. 

And then I heard the footsteps. Heavy, thudding footsteps from out in the 

hall. 

Thunder roared again. 

I spun away from the window. And listened to the footsteps, thudding 
heavily on the carpet. 

“Who’s there?” I called through the darkness. 

I saw a flicker of yellow light in the doorway. A shadow swept over the 
wallpaper in the hall. 

Dad stepped into the room. “This is so weird,” he said. He was carrying two 



candles in candlesticks. Their flames bent and nearly went out as he carried them 
to my desk. 

“Where did that storm come from?” Dad asked, setting the candles beside 
my typewriter. “Are you okay, Zackie?” 

I forgot. Dad also knows I’m scared of the dark. 

“I’m fine,” I told him. “Thanks for the candles.” 

Dad stared out the window. We couldn’t really see anything out there. The 
rain was coming down too hard. 

“The sky was clear a few seconds ago,” Dad said, leaning over me to get a 
better view. “I can’t believe such a big storm could blow in so quickly.” 

“It’s weird,” I agreed. 

We stared at the rain for a minute or so. Sheets of lightning made the 
backyard glow like silver. 

“I’m going to call your mother,” Dad said. “I’m going to tell her to wait out 
the storm.” He patted me on the back, then headed to the door. 

“Don’t you want a candle?” I called after him. 

“No. I’ll find my way,” he replied. “I have a flashlight in the basement.” He 
disappeared down the hall. 

“What do you want to do now?” Alex asked. Her face looked orange in the 
candlelight. Her eyes glowed like cat eyes. 

I turned back to the typewriter. “It would be cool to write by candlelight,” I 
said. “Scary stories should always be written by candlelight. I’ll bet that’s how 
all the famous horror writers write their stories.” 

“Cool,” Alex replied. “Go ahead.” 

I slid the candlesticks closer. The yellow light flickered over the typewriter 

keys. 

I leaned forward and read over the first sentence of my story: 

IT WAS A DARK AND STORMY NIGHT. 

Then I hit the space bar and typed the next sentence: 

THE WIND BEGAN TO HOWL. 

I hit the space bar again. And raised my fingers to type the next sentence. 

But a rattling noise made me jump. 

“What is that?” I gasped. 

“The window.” Alex pointed. 

Outside, the wind blew hard, rattling the windowpane. 

Over the steady roar of the rain, I heard another sound. A strange howl. 



I gripped the arms of my desk chair. “Do you hear that?” I asked Alex. 

She nodded. Her eyes squinted out the window. 

“It’s just the wind,” she said softly. “It’s howling through the trees.” 

Outside, the howling grew louder as the wind swirled around my house. 
The window rattled and shook. 

The howling grew high and shrill, almost like a human voice, a human wail. 
I felt a chill run down my back. 

Gripping the chair arms tightly, I struggled to keep my fear down. 

It’s just a storm, I told myself. Just a rainstorm. Just a lot of rain and wind. 

I glanced at the words I had typed. In the flickering, orange light, the black 
type jumped out at me: 

THE WIND BEGAN TO HOWL. 

I listened to the shrill howl outside. It seemed to surround me, surround the 
house. “How strange,” I muttered. And then, things got a lot stranger. 



15 


“You’re not getting very far with the story,” Alex said. 

“Well, the storm—” I started. 

She put a hand on my shoulder. “You’re shaking!” she exclaimed. 

“No, I’m not!” I lied. 

“Yes, you are. You’re shaking,” she insisted. 

“No way. I’m okay. Really,” I said, trying to keep my voice calm and 
steady. “I’m not that afraid, Alex.” 

“Maybe if you work on the story, you won’t think about the storm so 
much,” she suggested. 

“Right. The story,” I agreed. 

An explosion of thunder shook the house. 

I let out a sharp cry. “Why does it seem so close?” I exclaimed. “The 
lightning and thunder—it sounds as if it’s all right in the backyard!” 

Alex grabbed my shoulders and turned me to the typewriter. “Type,” she 
ordered. “Pretend there is no storm. Just type.” 

I obediently raised my hands to the keys of the old typewriter. The candles 
had burned down a little, and the page was shadowy and dark. 

I typed the next sentence: 

ALEX AND ZACKIE WERE ALONE IN THE DARK HOUSE, 
LISTENING TO THE STORM. 

Rain pounded hard against the window. In a white flash of lightning, I 
could see the trees in the backyard, bending and trembling in the howling wind. 

“The story is about us?” Alex asked, leaning over my shoulder to read what 
I had typed. 

“Of course,” I replied. “You know that I always write about us and the other 
kids at school. It makes it easier to describe everyone.” 

“Well, don’t let the Blob Monster eat me!” she instructed. “I want to be the 
hero. Not the dinner!” 

I laughed. 

A crash of thunder made me jump. 

I turned back to the typewriter. I squinted to read over the sentences I had 



typed. 

“The candles aren’t giving enough light,” I complained. “How did writers 
do it in the old days? They must have all gone blind!” 

“Let’s go and get more candles,” Alex suggested. 

“Good idea,” I agreed. 

We each picked up a candlestick. Holding them in front of us, we made our 
way down the hall. 

The candles bent and flickered. Our footsteps were drowned out by the 
steady roar of rain on the roof. 

“Dad?” I called. “Hey, Dad—we need more candles!” 

No reply. 

We stepped into the living room. Two candles glowed on the mantelpiece. 
Two more stood side by side on the coffee table in front of the couch. 

“Dad?” I called. “Where are you?” 

Holding our candles high, Alex and I made our way to the den. Then the 
kitchen. Then Mom and Dad’s bedroom. 

No Dad. 

Holding my candle tightly in one hand, I pulled open the door to the 
basement. “Dad? Are you down there?” 

Silence. 

I felt another tingling chill run down my back. I turned to Alex. “He—he’s 
gone!” I stammered. “We’re all alone!” 



16 


“He has to be here,” Alex insisted. “Why would he go out in this storm?” 

“For ice cream?” I suggested. “He really wanted some ice cream.” 

Alex frowned. “Your dad would go out in this storm to get a cup of ice 
cream? That’s impossible.” 

“You don’t know my dad!” I replied. 

“He’s here,” Alex insisted. She set down the candle and cupped her hands 
around her mouth. “Mr. Beauchamp? Mr. Beauchamp?” she called. 

No reply. 

Wind howled outside the living-room window. Lightning flickered. 

“Hey—!” I cried. 

In the flash of bright light, I saw a car in the driveway. Dad’s car. 

I made my way to the window and peered out. “Dad didn’t drive 
anywhere,” I told Alex. “His car is still here. And he wouldn’t walk.” 

“Mr. Beauchamp? Mr. Beauchamp?” Alex tried again. 

“Weird,” I muttered. “He wouldn’t go out without telling us—would he? He 
—he just disappeared.” 

Alex’s eyes flashed. Her expression changed. She narrowed her eyes at me. 

“What’s wrong?” I asked. “Why are you staring at me like that?” 

“Zackie—what was the last sentence you typed?” she demanded, still 
squinting at me. 

“Huh?” 

“In your story,” she said impatiently. “What was the last sentence?” 

I thought hard. Then I recited it: 

“ALEX AND ZACKIE WERE ALONE IN THE DARK HOUSE, 
LISTENING TO THE STORM.” 

Alex nodded her head solemnly. 

“So what?” I asked. “What does the story have to do with anything?” 

“Don’t you see?” Alex replied. “You wrote that we were all alone in the 
house—and now we’re all a/one!” 

I stared back at her. I still didn’t know what she was talking about. 

“Zackie—this is amazing!” she cried. “What is the first sentence of the 



story?” 

I told it to her: 

“IT WAS A DARK AND STORMY NIGHT.” 

“Yes!” Alex cried excitedly. Her eyes went wide. The candle shook in her 
hand. “Yes! A dark and stormy night! But it had been a nice night—right?” 

“Huh?” I struggled to follow her. 

“Your dad said there wasn’t a cloud in the sky. Remember? That’s why he 
wanted to walk into town.” 

“Yeah. Right. So what?” I demanded. 

She let out an impatient sigh. “So then you typed that it was dark and 
stormy—and guess what? It became dark and stormy.” 

“But, Alex—” I started. 

She raised a finger to her lips to silence me. “And then you typed that we 
were all alone in the dark house. And that came true too!” 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “You’re not going to tell me that my story is coming 
true—are you?” 

“So far it has,” she insisted. “Every word of it.” 

“That’s really dumb,” I told her. “I think this storm has freaked you out 
more than me!” 

“Then how else do you explain it?” Alex shot back. 

“Explain it? A big rainstorm came up. That’s how I explain it.” 

I picked up a candlestick from the mantel. Now I had one in each hand. I 
started back to my room. 

Alex followed me. “How do you explain your dad disappearing into thin 

air?” 

Our shadows edged along the wall, bending in the flickering light. I wished 
the electricity would come back on. 

I stepped into my room. “Dad didn’t disappear. He went out,” I told Alex. I 
sighed. “Your idea is crazy. Just because I typed that it was stormy out...” 

“Let’s test it,” Alex urged. 

“Excuse me?” 

She dragged me to the desk chair. She pushed me into it. 

“Hey—” I protested. “I almost dropped the candles.” 

“Type something,” Alex instructed. “Go ahead, Zackie. Type something— 
and we’ll see if it comes true.” 



17 


The wind howled outside the house, rattling the windowpane. I set my candles 
down, one on each side of the old typewriter. 

I leaned forward and read the story so far. 

Alex was right. 

Everything I had typed had come true. 

But her idea was totally dumb. 

“Type!” she ordered, standing behind me, her hands on my shoulders. 

I glanced back at her. “Alex—haven’t you ever heard of coincidence ?” 

“Oooh—big word!” she replied sarcastically. “Are you sure you’re ready 
for such a big word?” 

I ignored her remark. “A coincidence is when two things happen by 
accident,” I explained. “For example, I type that it’s stormy out—and then it 
starts to storm. That’s called a coincidence.” 

She shoved me toward the typewriter. “Prove it,” she insisted. “Go ahead, 
Zackie. Type the next sentence, and let’s see if it comes true.” 

She squeezed my shoulders. And then added, “Or are you chicken?” 

I wriggled out from under her hands. “Okay, okay,” I groaned. “I’ll prove 
just how dumb you are.” 

I reached for the handwritten pages of the story. And I found the next 
sentence. 

Then I raised my hands to the old typewriter keyboard and typed it in: 

THEY HEARD A KNOCK ON THE DOOR. 

I lowered my hands to my lap. And sat back. 

“See?” I sneered. “Any more bright ideas?” 

Then I heard a knock on the door! 

I gasped. 

Alex let out a startled cry. 

“That didn’t h-happen,” I stammered. “I didn’t hear that. I imagined it.” 

“But we both heard it,” Alex replied, her eyes wide. “We both couldn’t 
imagine it!” 

“But it’s impossible !” I insisted. I picked up a candle. Then I jumped up 



from the desk chair and hurried across the bedroom. 

“Where are you going?” Alex demanded, chasing after me. 

“To answer the door,” I told her. 

“No—!” she gasped. 

I was already jogging through the dark hall. My heart pounded. The candle 
flame seemed to throb in rhythm with my heart. 

I glanced back and saw Alex running after me. “Zackie—wait!” 

I didn’t stop. I ran to the front door. 

“No! Please—don’t open it!” Alex pleaded. 

“I have to,” I told her. “We have to see who’s there.” 

“Zackie—don’t!” Alex begged. 

But I ignored her. And pulled open the door. 



18 


Alex gasped. 

I stared out into the rain. 

No one there. 

No one. 

Rain pattered the front stoop. The big raindrops bounced like balls in every 
direction. 

I pushed the door shut. And brushed a cold raindrop off my forehead. 

“Weird,” Alex muttered, tugging at her blonde ponytail. She pushed her 
glasses up on her nose. “Weird.” 

“It had to be a tree branch,” I said. “The wind blew a tree branch against the 
door. That’s all.” 

“No way,” Alex insisted. “Tree branches don’t knock. I heard a knock on 
the door—and so did you.” 

We stared at each other for a long moment. Then we stared at the door. 

“I know!” Alex declared. Behind her glasses, her eyes flashed excitedly. “I 
know why there was no one at the door!” 

“I don’t want to know!” I groaned. “I don’t want to hear any more crazy 
ideas about my story coming true.” 

“But don’t you see?” she cried. “There was no one at the door because you 
didn’t write someone at the door!” 

“AAAAAGGH!” I screamed. “Alex, please—give me a break. You don’t 
really believe that I am controlling everything that happens—do you?” 

She twisted her face, thinking hard. 

“No,” she finally replied. 

“Good!” I exclaimed. 

“I think the old typewriter is controlling everything,” she said. 

“Alex—go lie down,” I instructed. “I’m calling your parents to come get 
you. You are sick. Definitely sick.” 

She ignored me. “Maybe that’s why the woman in the burned-out shop gave 
you the typewriter,” she continued. “Maybe she knew it had strange powers. And 
she couldn’t wait to get rid of it.” 



“I can’t wait to get rid of you!” I snapped. “Alex, please tell me you’re not 
serious. You’re scaring me with this nutty talk. Really.” 

“But, Zackie, I’m right. Everything you type—it comes true!” Alex grabbed 
my arm and started to pull me down the hall. 

I pulled back. “Where are you taking me?” I demanded. 

“One more test,” she insisted. 

I followed her into my room. “One more?” I asked. “One more test—and 
then you’ll shut up about this?” 

She raised her right hand. “Promise.” She lowered her hand. “But, you’ll 
see, Zackie. You’ll see that I’m not crazy. Whatever you type on that old 
typewriter comes true.” 

I sat down at the desk and slid the candles closer to the typewriter. I stared 
into the flickering orange light, reading the words of the story. 

“Hurry up,” Alex urged. “Type that someone is standing on the other side of 
the door.” 

“Okay, okay,” I muttered. “But this is crazy.” I raised my hands to the old 
typewriter keys and typed: 

DRENCHED WITH RAIN, ADAM STOOD ON THE FRONT PORCH. 

I lowered my hands to my lap. 

I listened for a knock on the front door. 

But all I heard was the steady rush of the wind and the patter of rain against 
the house. 

I waited, listening hard. 

No knock. 

I realized I was holding my breath. I let it out slowly, listening. Listening. 

“No knock,” I told Alex. I couldn’t keep a grin from spreading across my 
face. A triumphant grin. “See? It didn’t work.” 

She frowned. She leaned over my shoulder and read the words again. “Of 
course it didn’t work,” she said. “You didn’t write that Adam knocked. You put 
him on the porch. But you didn’t make him knock.” 

I sighed. “Okay. If it will make you happy...” 

I turned back to the typewriter and typed: 

ADAM KNOCKED ON THE FRONT DOOR. 

As I lowered my hands from the keys, I heard a loud knock on the front 

door. 

“See?” Alex cried. It was her turn to grin. 



“This can’t be happening!” I gasped. 

We didn’t bother with candles. We both ran full speed through the hall to 
the front door. 

Alex reached it first. She grabbed the knob and pulled open the door. 

“Is it really Adam?” I called. 



19 


I gaped in shock as Alex pulled Adam in from the rain. 

He was drenched! His curly black hair was matted to his forehead. He 
wasn’t wearing a rain slicker or jacket. His soaked T-shirt stuck to his body. 

“Whoooa!” he exclaimed, shivering. He wrapped his arms around his 
chubby body as if trying to warm himself. 

Water poured off him and puddled on the floor. 

“Adam—!” I opened my mouth to say something—but I was too shocked to 
form words. 

“It—it’s true!” Alex stammered. “It really works!” 

“Huh?” Adam appeared dazed. 

“What are you doing here?” I demanded, feeling dazed myself. 

His eyes wandered around the living room. “I’m not sure!” he exclaimed. “I 
—I know I came here for a reason. But I don’t remember what it is.” 

“Zackie made you come here!” Alex declared. 

Adam shook his head hard, shaking water off himself like a dog. He 
narrowed his eyes at Alex. “Excuse me?” 

Alex studied Adam. “Did you stand on the front porch for a while before 
you knocked?” she demanded. 

Adam nodded. “Yeah. I did! I’m not sure why. I just stood there. I guess I 
was trying to remember why I came over here. How did you know that?” 

Alex grinned at me. “See? I was right all along.” 

I swallowed hard. My head was spinning. “Yes. You were right,” I 
murmured. 

The old typewriter... 

Whatever I typed on it came true. 

“What’s going on?” Adam demanded impatiently. He shook more water 
onto the rug. “Why are we in the dark?” 

“The storm knocked out the lights,” I told him. “Follow me.” 

I led the way to my room. On the way, I stopped at the linen closet and gave 
Adam a bath towel. He dried himself off as we walked to my room. 

I couldn’t wait to tell him about my amazing typewriter. “You’re not going 



to believe this!” I started. 

I took him over to the typewriter. He stared at it in the orange candlelight. 

Then Alex and I told him the whole story. 

When we finished, Adam burst out laughing. “Very funny,” he said. 

He shook his head. His curly hair was still soaked. Water dripped down his 
forehead. 

“I know you want to pay me back, Zackie,” he said. “I know you want to 
pay me back for putting the mice in your locker. I know I embarrassed you in 
school.” 

He put a moist hand on my shoulder. “But there is no way I’m going to fall 
for a dumb story like that. No way.” 

“Zackie will prove it to you,” Alex chimed in. 

Adam sneered and rolled his eyes. “I can hardly wait.” 

“No. Really,” I insisted. “It’s not a joke, Adam. It’s real. Come here. I’ll 
show you.” 

I pulled him up to the desk. Then I dropped into the chair and quickly typed 
the next lines of my scary story: 

THE STORM STOPPED SUDDENLY. ALL WAS QUIET. TOO QUIET. 

Adam and Alex read the words over my shoulder. 

I jumped up and pulled Adam to the window. “Go ahead. Check it out,” I 
urged. 



20 


All three of us slid around my desk and pressed our faces to the window. 

“Yes!” I cried, shaking my fists above my head. “Yes!” 

The rain had stopped. 

I edged between my two friends and pushed up the window. “Listen,” I 
instructed. 

We all listened. 

Not a sound outside. Not even the drip of rain from the trees. Not even a 
whisper of wind. 

“Yes!” Alex cried happily. She and I slapped a high five. 

I turned to Adam. “Do you see?” I cried. “Do you believe us now?” 

“Do you see?” Alex repeated. 

Adam backed away from the window. “See what?” he demanded. “Do I see 
that the rain has stopped? Yes. I see it.” 

“But—but—” I pointed to the typewriter. 

Adam laughed. “Have you both lost it?” he cried. 

“Do you really think you stopped the rain? You two are totally messed up!” 

“It’s true!” I insisted. “Adam, I just proved it to you.” 

He laughed and rolled his eyes. 

I wanted to punch his laughing face. I really did. 

Here was the most amazing thing that ever happened to anyone in the 
history of the world—and he thought it was a big joke! 

I grabbed his arm. “Here,” I said breathlessly. “HI prove it again. Watch.” 

I dragged him to the typewriter. 

I didn’t bother to sit down. I leaned over the desk and started to type 
something. 

But before I had typed two words, Alex tugged me away. 

“What are you doing?” I cried. I struggled to break away. But she pulled me 
out to the hall. 

“He’s not going to believe us, Zackie,” she whispered. “You can prove it to 
him a dozen times, and he won’t believe it.” 

“Of course he will!” I insisted. “He’ll—” 



“No way,” Alex interrupted. “Go ahead. Type ADAM HAS TWO HEADS. 
If you do it, both of his heads won’t believe you!” 

I had to think about that one. 

“One more try,” I said. “Let me type one more sentence. When Adam sees 
it come true, maybe he’ll change his mind. Maybe he’ll see it isn’t a joke.” 

Alex shrugged. “Go ahead. But he has his mind made up, Zackie. He thinks 
you’re trying to pay him back for the mice in your locker.” 

“One more try,” I insisted. 

I glanced into the room. “No—! Adam—stop!” I shrieked. 

He had his back turned to us. But I could see that he was leaning over the 
typewriter. 

He was typing something onto the page! 

“Adam—stop!” Alex and I both wailed. 

We dove into the room. 

He spun around, a wide grin on his face. “I’ve got to go!” he exclaimed. 

He swept past us and out into the hall. “So long, suckers!” he called. He 
disappeared down the hall. 

I hurtled to the desk. My heart pounding, I stared down at the typewriter. 

What did Adam type? 



21 


I heard the front door slam. Adam had run out of the house. 

I didn’t care about Adam now. I only cared about one thing. 

What did he type on the old typewriter? 

I grabbed the sheet of paper—and pulled it from the roller. Then I held it 
close to a candle flame to read it. 

“Careful! You’ll set it on fire!” Alex warned. 

I moved it back from the flame. Orange light flickered over the page. My 
hand was trembling so hard, I struggled to read it. 

“Well? What did he type?” Alex asked impatiently. 

“He—he—he—” I sputtered. 

She grabbed the paper from my hand and read Adam’s sentence out loud: 

“THE BLOB MONSTER HID IN ZACKIE’S BASEMENT, WAITING 
FOR FRESH MEAT.” 

“What a jerk!” I cried. “I don’t believe him! Why did he type that on my 
story?” 

Alex stared unhappily at the page. “He thought it was funny.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said weakly. I grabbed the page back from her. “He ruined my 
story. Now I have to start it all over again.” 

“Forget your story. What about the Blob Monster?” Alex cried. 

“Huh?” A chill tightened the back of my neck. The sheet of paper slipped 
from my hand. 

“Everything typed on the old typewriter comes true,” Alex murmured. 

I was so upset about Adam ruining my story that I had forgotten! 

“You mean—?” I started. My mouth suddenly felt very dry. 

“There is a Blob Monster waiting in the basement,” Alex said in a low 
whisper. “Waiting for fresh meat.” 

“Fresh meat,” I repeated. I gulped. 

Alex and I froze for a moment, staring at each other in the darting 
candlelight. 

“But there is no such thing as a Blob Monster,” I said finally. “I made it up. 
So how can a Blob Monster be hiding in my basement?” 



Alex’s eyes flashed behind her glasses. “You’re right!” she cried. “They 
don’t exist! So... no problem!” She smiled. 

But her smile faded when we heard a noise. 

A heavy THUD THUD. 

I gasped. “What was that?” 

We both turned to the door. 

And heard the sound again. THUD THUD. 

Heavy and slow. Like footsteps. 

“Is it... is it coming from the b-b-b-?” I was so scared I was stuttering. 

Alex nodded. “The basement,” she whispered, finishing the word for me. 

I picked up a candlestick. The light bounced over the wall and floor. I 
couldn’t stop my hand from shaking. 

Holding it in front of me, I made my way into the hall. 

Alex huddled close, keeping with me step for step. 

THUD THUD. 

We both stopped. The sounds were closer. Louder. 

Taking a deep breath, I stepped up to the basement door. 

Alex hung back, her hands pressed to her face. Behind her glasses, her eyes 
were wide with fear. 

THUD THUD. 

“It’s coming up the stairs!” I cried. “Run!” 

Too late. 

I heard another THUD —and the door crashed open. 



22 


Abeam of white light made me shut my eyes. 

My hands shot up to shield myself. 

Behind the beam of light, a large, dark figure lumbered heavily through the 

door. 

“Dad!” I gasped. 

My dad lowered the flashlight to the floor. 

“Dad! What were you doing down there?” I demanded in a high, shrill 
voice. 

“Are you two okay?” Dad asked, narrowing his eyes at us. “Why do you 
look so frightened?” 

“We... uh... well...” I didn’t know how to explain. I couldn’t tell him we 
thought he was a Blob Monster! 

Dad pointed to the basement with the flashlight. “I’ve been down there 
checking the circuit breakers,” he explained. “I can’t figure out why the lights 
haven’t come back on.” He scratched his head. 

“We were looking for you,” Alex said. “We shouted down to the basement 
for you.” 

“I went across the street to check on your mother. Then I went into the back 
room of the basement,” Dad replied. “I guess I couldn’t hear you.” 

He shook his head. “What a strange storm. It came up so suddenly. And 
then it just stopped. As if someone turned it on, then turned it off.” 

Alex and I glanced at each other. “Yes. It was weird,” Alex agreed. 

I took a deep breath. “Uh... Dad?” I started. 

He beamed the light at my feet. “Yes, Zackie?” 

“Dad... when you were down in the basement... was there anything else 
down there with you?” 

His heavy eyebrows rose up on his forehead. He stared hard at me. “Excuse 
me?” 

“Did you see anything strange down there? Or hear anything strange?” 

He shook his head. “No. Nothing.” His eyes locked on mine. “Are you 
afraid, Zackie? I know you have problems with being in the dark like this. 
Would you like to hang out with me for a while?” 



“No. I’m fine. Really,” I insisted. “I just wondered...” 

Dad stepped past us and started toward the kitchen. “I’m going to call the 
electric company,” he said. “They should have fixed the lines by now.” 

I watched him make his way down the hall. The white beam of light 
bounced in front of him. 

I held my candle up to the basement door. “I guess the typewriter didn’t 
work this time,” I told Alex happily. “No Blob Monster.” 

“Let’s go downstairs and check it out!” she replied. 

“Huh?” I backed away from the open doorway. “Are you crazy?” 

“We have to know if the old typewriter has powers or not,” Alex said. “We 
have no choice, Zackie. We have to check out the basement.” 

“But—but—” 

She pushed past me onto the basement stairway. She walked down the first 
two steps. 

Then she turned back to me. “Are you coming with me, or not?” 



23 


Did I have a choice? 

No. 

For one thing, I had the candle. I couldn’t let Alex go down there by herself 
—in total darkness. 

But I held back, my heart pounding, my mouth dry as cotton. “Dad said he 
didn’t hear anything,” I said. “So there is no reason for us to go.” 

“That’s lame and you know it,” Alex replied. She took another step down. 
“Am I going down alone?” 

I forced my rubbery legs to move. “No. Wait up. I’m coming,” I said. 

I lowered my foot to the first stair. “But we’ll only stay down for a second 
—right?” 

“Just long enough to see if there is a Blob Monster hiding down there,” 
Alex replied. 

Waiting for fresh meat, I added silently. 

I stumbled on the next step. But caught myself on the railing. 

The candle flame dipped low, but didn’t blow out. 

The basement spread in front of us like a black pit. 

We both stopped at the bottom of the steps—and listened. 

Silence. 

I raised the candle high. Tall stacks of cartons came into view. Behind them, 
I could see the two wooden wardrobe closets where Mom and Dad store our 
winter clothes. 

“The Blob Monster could be hiding behind those tall cartons,” Alex 
whispered. “Or in those closets.” 

I swallowed hard. “Alex—give me a break,” I whispered back. 

We made our way slowly to the stacks of cartons. I raised the candle high. 
We peeked behind the first stack. 

Nothing hiding there. 

“Can we go now?” I pleaded. 

Alex rolled her eyes. “Don’t you want to know the truth? Don’t you want to 
know if your typewriter really has powers or not?” 



“No. Not really,” I whispered. 

She ignored me. She grabbed the candle from my hand and moved behind 
the next stack of cartons. 

“Hey—give that back!” I cried. 

“You’re too slow,” she snapped. “Keep close behind me. You’ll be okay.” 

“I’m not okay,” I insisted. “I want to go back upstairs.” 

Alex moved quickly between the stacks of cartons. I had to hurry to keep 
up. 

I never liked the basement. In fact, I was afraid of the basement even in the 
daytime. 

I knew there really wasn’t anything to be afraid of. But sometimes, telling 
yourself that doesn’t do any good at all. 

“Alex—” I whispered. “Can we—?” 

I stopped when I heard the sound. A soft slapping, from somewhere against 
the wall. 

Slap ... slap... slap... slap... 

Steady as a heartbeat. 

Alex had moved away from me. I saw her walking quickly toward the 
laundry room. 

“Alex—!” I hurtled across the room to her—so fast, I bumped into her. 

“Hey—watch it!” she exclaimed. 

“Alex—it’s down here!” I shrieked. “It’s here! It’s really here! Listen! Do 
you hear it?” 



24 


We both froze. 

The steady, rhythmic sound rose up from the far wall. 

Slap ... slap... slap... slap... 

“Do you hear it?” I whispered. 

Alex nodded. Her mouth had dropped open in shock. She gripped the 
candlestick in both hands. 

Slap... slap... 

“What are we going to do?” I whispered. 

“It’s waiting for fresh meat,” Alex murmured. 

“I know. I know!” I groaned. “You don’t have to say it.” I pulled her arm. 
“Come on. We have to tell Dad.” 

I gazed through the darkness to the stairway. The steps seemed a million 
miles away. 

“We’ll never make it,” I choked out. “We have to run past the Blob Monster 
to reach the stairs.” 

Slap... slap... 

“What’s our choice?” Alex shot back. “Pick one, Zackie. Choice one: We 
stay here. Choice two: We don’t stay here.” 

She was right, of course. We had to make a run for it. 

Maybe if we ran fast enough, we’d take it by surprise. 

Maybe the Blob Monster was too big to run fast. 

Slap... slap... slap... slap... 

“Let’s go,” Alex urged. “I’ll go first since I have the light.” 

“Uh... can we run side by side?” I asked softly. 

She nodded. 

Without another word, we took off. 



25 


Our shoes thudded over the concrete basement floor. 

I struggled to keep at Alex’s side. My legs felt so heavy, as if I were 
running uphill! 

“Whoooa!” I cried out when the lights flashed on. 

Startled, we both stopped running. 

I blinked hard, waiting for my eyes to adjust to the bright ceiling light. 

Slap... slap... 

We both turned to the far wall to see the Blob Monster. 

And stared at a pale white hand slapping against the wall beneath the open 
basement window. 

A hand? 

Slap... slap... 

“It—it’s a rubber glove!” Alex exclaimed. 

“It’s one of Dad’s gardening gloves,” I choked out. 

Dad usually leaves his heavy gardening gloves on that window ledge. One 
of the gloves was hanging from a nail. And the wind kept slapping it against the 
wall. 

Alex laughed first. Then I joined in. 

It felt good to laugh. And it felt especially good to know that no Blob 
Monster was hiding in the basement. 

What a relief! 

Alex and I climbed happily up the stairs. Then she made her way to the 
front door. “Thanks for the awesome entertainment!” she teased. “It was better 
than a movie! See you tomorrow.” 

She started out the door, then turned back. “We definitely got a little crazy 
tonight, Zackie. I mean, about that old typewriter.” 

“Yeah. I guess,” I admitted. “It doesn’t have any special powers. It didn’t 
make a Blob Monster appear in the basement. And all the lights came back on 
without me having to type that they came on.” 

“The typewriter didn’t cause anything to happen tonight. It was all 
coincidence,” Alex said. 



“Oooh. Big word!” I teased. 

She slammed the door behind her. 


“Are you doing anything, Zackie?” Mom asked. 

“Not really.” 

It was Saturday afternoon, and I was just hanging out. I had a ton of 
homework to do. So I was lying on the couch, staring up at the ceiling, thinking 
up excuses not to do it. 

“Can you run to the store for me?” Mom asked. “The Enderbys are coming 
for dinner, and I need a few things.” She held up a slip of paper. “It’s a short 
list.” 

“No problem,” I said, climbing up from the couch. 

Maybe I can add a few items to the list, I thought, taking it from her hand. 
Like maybe a few candy bars. Or a box of Pop-Tarts.... 

I love to eat Pop-Tarts raw. 

“Ride your bike, okay?” Mom asked. “I’m kind of in a hurry. Come straight 
back—okay?” 

“No problem,” I repeated. I tucked the list into the back pocket of my jeans 
and headed to the garage to get my bike. 

The afternoon sun poured down. The air felt hot and dry. More like summer 
than spring. 

I jumped onto my bike and pedaled down the driveway standing up. I 
turned toward town and sat down, pedaling fast, riding no-hands. 

A few minutes later, I leaned my bike against the brick wall of Jack’s. 
Jack’s is mainly a meat market, but they sell fruits, and vegetables, and other 
groceries too. 

The bell over the glass door clanged as I stepped inside. Mrs. Jack was at 
her usual spot, leaning her elbows on the counter beside the cash register. 

Mrs. Jack is a big, platinum-haired woman with about a dozen chins. She 
wears bright red lipstick and long, dangling earrings. 

She is really nice to everyone—except kids. 

She hates kids. I guess she thinks we only come into her store to steal. 
When a kid comes in, she follows him up and down the aisles and never takes 
her eyes off him. 

I closed the door behind me and reached into my back pocket for my 
shopping list. 



Mrs. Jack had the newspaper spread out in front of her on the counter. She 
raised her eyes slowly and made a disgusted face at me. “Help you?” she 
muttered. 

I waved the list. “Just buying a few things for my mom.” 

She grabbed the list out of my hand and squinted at it. Then she handed it 
back with a grunt. “Tuna is in the back on the bottom,” she said. 

“Thanks.” I picked up a shopping basket and hurried to the back of the 
store. 

A big air conditioner rattled against the wall. A fan in front of it blew cold 
air down the narrow aisle. 

I found the tuna quickly and dropped two cans into my basket. 

The long, white display counter of the meat department stretched in front of 
me. Behind the glass, cuts of red meat were lined up in perfect rows. 

Beside the counter, an enormous side of beef hung from the ceiling. 

That is really gross! I thought. 

It looked like an entire cow—stripped of its hide—hanging upside down. 

Yuck. 

I started to turn away from it—when the dead cow moved. 

It swung to the right, then swung back. 

I stared in surprise. 

The cow swung further, to the right, then back. 

I watched it swinging on its rope, swinging heavily from side to side. 

And then I heard a harsh, whispered voice: 

“Fresh meat... Fresh meat...” 



26 


“Ohhh.” A low moan escaped my throat as I gaped at the side of beef, swinging 
so slowly, back and forth, back and forth. 

“Fresh meat .. ” came the raspy whisper again. “Fresh meat .. ” 

“No—!” I blurted out. 

I dropped my shopping basket. 

And started to step back. 

I let out another cry as Adam stood up and stepped out from behind the 
meat counter. He had a gleeful grin on his face. 

“Fresh meat...” he whispered. And burst out laughing. 

Annie and Emmy climbed out from behind the counter, giggling and 
shaking their heads. 

“Awesome!” Annie exclaimed. 

“Zackie, you’re bright red!” her sister laughed. 

My face burned as hot as the sun. I felt so embarrassed. How could I fall for 
such a dumb joke? 

Now, I knew, they would tell everyone in school that I freaked out over a 
side of beef! 

“What are you doing here?” I shrieked. 

“We saw you on your bike,” Adam replied. “We followed you into the 
store. Didn’t you see us? We were right behind you.” 

“AAAAGFL!” I let out a furious cry and balled my hands into fists. 

“What’s going on back there?” Mrs. Jack’s harsh voice rattled the shelves. 
“What are you kids doing?” 

“Nothing!” I called. “I—I found the tuna!” 

I turned back to Adam and the twins. “Give me a break,” I muttered. 

For some reason, that struck them funny. They giggled and slapped one 
another high fives. 

Then Adam stuck out both arms. He held them stiffly in front of him, like a 
sleepwalker. And began marching stiff-legged across the aisle toward me. 

“You’re controlling me, Zackie!” he declared in a machinelike voice. “I’m 
in your power.” 



He staggered toward me like some kind of zombie. “Your typewriter 
controls me, Zackie. Your typewriter has the power! I am your slave!” 

“Adam—you’re not funny!” I cried. 

The girls giggled. They closed their eyes, stuck out their arms, and started 
marching toward me too. 

“We’re in your power,” Emmy chanted. 

“You’re controlling our every move,” Annie said. 

“This isn’t funny!” I shouted furiously. “Get lost, you guys! You—” 

I turned and saw Mrs. Jack bouncing toward us, her face as red as her 
lipstick. “What are you doing back here?” she bellowed. “This isn’t a 
clubhouse!” 

Adam and the girls instantly lowered their sleepwalker arms. Annie and 
Emmy backed up against the meat counter. 

“Are you buying anything?” Mrs. Jack demanded, huffing and puffing from 
her long journey from the cash register. “If you’re not buying anything, get out. 
Go to the playground.” 

“We’re going,” Adam murmured. He couldn’t get past Mrs. Jack. She filled 
the aisle. So he scooted down the next aisle. 

Annie and Emmy hurried after him. 

Mrs. Jack glared at me. 

“I—I’m almost finished,” I stammered. I picked up the basket. I searched 
for my list, but couldn’t find it. 

No problem. I remembered what was on it. 

I found the other items and dropped them into the basket. Mrs. Jack stayed 
with me the whole while. 

Then she walked me to the front of the store. 

I paid and hurried out. I was so angry at Adam and the girls, I forgot all 
about the candy bars. 

They are always making fun of me, I griped to myself. 

Always playing mean tricks. Always trying to make me look like a jerk. 

Always. Always. 

And I’m sick of it. I’m sick to death of it! 

“Sick sick sick!” I chanted the word all the way home. I hopped off my bike 
and let it crash to the driveway. Then I ran inside and tossed the grocery bag onto 
the kitchen counter. 

“Sick sick sick.” 



I’m going to totally lose it if I don’t cool down, I decided. 

I ran up to my room and shoved a fresh sheet of paper into the old 
typewriter. 

Then I plopped into the desk chair and furiously started typing. A third Blob 
Monster story. The scariest one of all. 

I typed as fast as I could. I didn’t think about it. I let my anger do the 
thinking. 

I didn’t write it out first. I didn’t plan it. I didn’t know what was going to 
happen next. 

I leaned over the old typewriter and typed. 

In the story, the ugly pink Blob Monster attacks the whole town. People are 
screaming. Running in every direction. Running for their lives. 

Two police officers step forward to fight the Blob Monster off. It opens its 
huge mouth—and swallows them whole! 

Shrieks of terror fill the town. The enormous Blob Monster is eating 
everyone alive! 

“Yes!” I cried out loud. “Yes!” 

I was paying everyone back. Paying the whole town back. 

“Yes!” 

It was the most exciting, most terrifying story I ever wrote. I wrote page 
after page. 

“Zackie—you forgot something!” a voice called. 

I started to type those words into the story. Then I recognized Mom’s voice. 

Breathing hard, I spun away from the typewriter. I found Mom leaning in 
the doorway, shaking her head fretfully. 

“You have to go back to the store,” she said. “You forgot the loaf of Italian 
bread. We need bread for dinner tonight.” 

“Oh. Sorry,” I replied. 

I glanced back at my story and sighed. It was going so well. I was having 
such a good time. 

I’ll get right back to it after I go to the store, I decided. 

I took more money from Mom. Then I picked up my bike from the 
driveway. 

I thought about my Blob Monster story as I pedaled to town. It’s the best 
story I ever wrote, I decided. 

I can’t wait to read it to Alex. 



I heard the thud of footsteps on the sidewalk. A man in a business suit came 
mnning by. A dark blur. He ran so fast, I couldn’t see his face. 

What’s his problem? I wondered. He’s too dressed up to be jogging! 

“Whoa!” I had to swerve to the curb as a blue station wagon roared toward 
me. The woman at the wheel honked her horn and waved frantically to me. Her 
tires squealed as she shot around the corner. 

“Everyone is in such a hurry today,” I muttered to myself. 

Then I heard a scream. A man’s scream. 

I pedaled faster. I was a block from town. I could see the awning over the 
doorway of Jack’s grocery on the corner. 

I saw two people running past the store. Running at top speed, waving their 
hands. 

I screeched to a halt when I heard another scream. 

“Look out!” someone shrieked. 

“Run! Call the police!” 

Two little kids ran past me. One of them was sobbing. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I called to them. 

But they kept running. They didn’t answer. 

I started pedaling again, standing up. I leaned over my handlebars, trying to 
see what all the fuss was about. 

As I reached town, I saw people running down the center of the street. Cars 
honked. People were screaming. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I called. “Is there a fire or something? Hey— 
somebody tell me what’s happening. Somebody—” 

And then I saw what was happening. 

And I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror—and fell off my bike. 



27 


“OW!” 

I landed hard on my right side. The bike slammed on top of me. The 
handlebar jabbed me in the neck. 

A man ran past. “Get away, kid!” he shouted. “Hurry! Get away!” 

I shoved the bike off me and climbed to my feet. 

My heart pounding in my chest, I brushed myself off. 

And gaped at the enormous, pink Blob Monster throbbing on the next 
corner. 

“Ohhh.” A horrified moan escaped my throat. 

It looks just as I described it in my story! I realized. 

Like a huge, slimy human heart. Pink and wet. With tiny black eyes. And 
purple veins knotted on top of its head. And a mouth cut into its belly. 

Throbbing. Throbbing... 

“It—it’s my monster!” I cried. 

Two little girls frowned at me as their mother tugged them away. I 
recognized her. Mrs. Willow, who lives across the street. 

“Zackie—run!” she cried, pulling each girl by a hand. “It’s a horrible 
monster!” 

“I know,” I murmured. 

She pulled her daughters across the street. But I didn’t follow them. 

I took a deep breath and made my way slowly down the street toward the 
throbbing Blob Monster. 

I wrote this, I realized. 

Just before I came to town, I typed this scene. I wrote that the Blob Monster 
attacked the town. 

And I’ll bet I know what happens next. 

As I stepped closer, I saw the trail of thick slime the monster left behind it. 
Its belly pulled open, and I saw its purple tongue darting from side to side. 

My legs trembled as I stepped even closer. 

People screamed and ran. Cars and vans roared past, horns honking. 

Everyone was running, desperate to escape. But I couldn’t leave. I couldn’t 



take my eyes off it. 

I made you! I thought. Horrified and curious and amazed—all at the same 

time. 

I created you! 

I wrote this story! 

The Blob Monster stared back at me through its tiny, black eyes. 

Did it know who I was? Did it know that I created it? 

As I stared in amazement, its mouth opened wider. It made sick, sucking 
sounds, and the purple tongue scraped the sides of its mouth. 

Thick, yellow drool poured out of the open mouth. 

And the Blob Monster bounced forward. 

Its purple tongue leaped out at me. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. I struggled to back away. 

The hot, sticky tongue wrapped around my leg. Started to pull me toward 
the slimy, open mouth. 

“Let go!” I tugged on the tongue as hard as I could. “Help me!” 

Two dark-uniformed police officers leaped in front of me. They had their 
nightsticks raised. 

With angry cries, they both began pounding the throbbing creature. 

POUND. POUND. POUND. 

The nightsticks made a soft plopping sound with each hit. 

The Blob Monster uttered a sickening gurgle. And its tongue slid off my 
leg. 

“Run!” one of the officers screamed. “Get going!” 

My legs were shaking so hard, I nearly fell. I could still feel the slimy, hot 
tongue on my leg. 

I stumbled back. 

And gaped in horror as the Blob Monster pulled open its mouth. The fat 
purple tongue swung around both police officers. 

They beat it with their sticks. They shoved it. They tried to wrestle free. 

But the tongue tightened, tightened around them—and pulled them. Pulled 
them into the huge, open mouth in the creature’s belly. 

Pulled them both inside. 

And then the mouth slammed shut with a disgusting SPLAT. 

“No! Noooooo!” I wailed. 

I wanted to pound my fists against the monster. Pound it until it melted to 



the ground. 

“It’s all my fault!” I screamed. 

I wrote that scene with the policemen. 

It was all in the story I had just typed. I wrote that the Blob Monster ate 
them both. 

And now it had come true! 

My frightening story had come true. Every scene of it. 

The Blob Monster uttered disgusting gulping sounds as it digested its 
human meal. Its tiny black eyes locked on mine as it gulped. 

What happens next? 

What happens next in my story? I asked myself. 

Trembling all over, my heart pounding, I struggled to think. 

What happens next? 

And then—with a shudder—I remembered what I had written. 

The Blob Monster follows me home! 



28 


The Blob Monster made a final gulp. Then it opened its mouth in a disgusting, 
gassy burp. 

Sickened by the sour odor, I staggered back. 

I’ve got to think of something, I told myself. I’ve got to stop this monster. 

Or it will eat me next. 

The Blob Monster began to slide forward, plopping wetly on the sidewalk 
as it moved. 

I knew I couldn’t stand there another second. I spun away and forced my 
mbbery legs to run. 

I picked up my bike off the street and jumped on. I began pedaling before I 
had my balance—and nearly crashed into a brick wall. 

I struggled frantically to turn myself around, to calm down enough to ride. 
Finally, I pedaled away, groaning with each thrust of my foot. 

I sped out of town. Halfway down the next block, I glanced back. 

Yes. Just as I had written. The Blob Monster was following me. Bouncing 
rapidly over the pavement. The purple veins on top of its head bouncing with it. 
Behind it, a trail of slime thickened on the street. 

It’s so fast! I realized. It’s keeping up with me! 

What happens next? What did I type next? 

“Oh, no!” I shrieked when I remembered. 

This is the part where I fall off my bike! 

“AIIIII! ” My front tire hit a rock—and I went flying over the handlebars. 

Once again, I hit the pavement hard. Once again, I shoved my bike off me 
and jumped to my feet. 

I turned to see the Blob Monster catching up. Plopping quickly up the 
street, its mouth gaping open, its tongue stretching... reaching out for me. 

I spun away—and ran into Alex and Adam. 

“Run! Don’t just stand there!” I screeched. “It—it’s catching up!” 

“Zackie—are you okay?” Alex asked. 

“No time for questions!” I gasped, shoving them both. “Run! The Blob 
Monster is real! I wrote it—and now it’s doing everything I wrote!” 



Adam laughed. He turned to the Blob Monster. “Do you think I’m stupid, 
Zackie? This is a joke—right? What is that? Some kind of a balloon?” 

“Adam—don’t!” I cried. 

I grabbed for him. And missed. 

He went running up to the Blob Monster. 

“Yeah. It’s some kind of big balloon!” Adam repeated, grinning. 

The monster’s purple tongue slid quickly around Adam’s waist. 

It pulled Adam easily into the open mouth. And then the Blob Monster 
swallowed him with a sickening gulp. 

Alex and I both screamed. 

Alex turned to me. “Did you write that?” she demanded in a trembling 
voice. 

I nodded. “Yes. It’s in my story,” I confessed. 

Alex grabbed my shoulder. “Well, what happens next? Tell me. What comes 
next?” 

“I—I don’t know,” I stammered. “That’s where I stopped writing!” 



29 


Alex and I never ran so fast in our lives. By the time we reached my house, my 
head was throbbing and my side was aching. 

We both gasped for breath as I pushed open the front door. “Anyone 
home?” I shouted into the house. “Mom? Mom?” 

No reply. She must have gone out. 

I turned and glimpsed the Blob Monster bouncing hard over Alex’s front 

yard. 

“No time!” I cried to Alex. “No time! Hurry!” 

She slipped inside the house, and I slammed the door behind us and locked 
it. Then I lurched toward my room, holding my aching side, forcing my rubbery 
legs to move. 

I mopped the sweat off my forehead with my arm. Then I dropped into the 
desk chair and raised my hands over the typewriter keys. 

Alex hurried up beside me. “What are you going to do?” she asked 
breathlessly. 

“No time to explain,” I choked out. 

I heard a thumping at the front door. Then I heard a loud CRAAAACK. 

And I knew the huge pink Blob had broken down the door. 

“No time. No time!” I declared. I furiously started to type. 

“I’m typing an ending,” I told Alex. “I’m going to type that the Blob 
Monster disappears. That it never existed. That Adam and the two policemen are 
okay.” 

SQUISSSSH... SQUISSSSH. 

Alex and I both gasped. We heard the Blob Monster’s slimy body, so close 
now, moving quickly toward us through the hall. 

I knew I had only a few seconds to type the ending. 

SQUISSSSSH. 

Right outside my bedroom door. 

I held my breath and pounded the keys. 

Pounded as hard and fast as I could until— 

“NOOOOO!” 



“What’s wrong?” Alex shrieked. 

“The keys are jammed!” 

We both screamed again as the Blob Monster bounced into the room. 



30 


The Blob Monster’s body heaved up and down. The creature panted, its entire 
body bouncing. White slime puddled on the floor around it. 

The slash of a mouth in the belly opened and closed, opened and closed. 
The purple tongue licked the mouth as the monster’s eyes narrowed on me. 

Alex gasped and backed up against the wall. “Zackie—type the ending!” 
she screamed breathlessly. “Make that thing disappear!” 

“I can’tl” I cried. I frantically pulled at the keys. “They’re jammed. I can’t 
untangle them!” 

“Zackie— please !” Alex pleaded. 

And then I saw the fat purple tongue leap. 

It rolled out of the Blob Monster’s open belly like a garden hose. 

“NOOOOOO!” I opened my mouth in a terrified wail as the tongue 
stretched across the room. Reached for me... 

Reached for me... 

No! 

The tongue wrapped around the typewriter. Lifted it easily. 

I grabbed for it with both hands. 

And missed. 

My hands slid across the tongue. So hot. Burning hot. And sticky. 

The tongue pulled back, snapped back like elastic. And carried the 
typewriter into the monster’s gaping mouth. 

As I stared in horror, the Blob Monster swallowed the typewriter with a 
single gulp. 

I leaped up from the desk chair. And stepped up beside Alex. We pressed 
our backs against the wall and watched helplessly as the Blob Monster throbbed 
and heaved. Digesting the typewriter. 

“We’re doomed,” Alex murmured. “The typewriter—it’s gone. Now there 
is no way you can destroy the monster.” 

“Wait!” I cried. “I have an idea!” 



31 


I dove back to the desk. I searched the desktop. 

“What are you doing?” Alex cried. 

The Blob Monster let out sick gurgling sounds as it digested the typewriter. 
Its body heaved up and down in the puddle of slime it had left on the rug. 

“The pen,” I told Alex. “The pen—” 

I pulled open the desk drawer and saw the old pen in front. I grabbed it and 
slammed the drawer shut. 

I held it up to show Alex. “The old pen the woman gave me. Maybe it has 
the same powers as the typewriter. Maybe I can write an ending with the pen— 
and make the Blob Monster disappear!” 

“Hurry—!” Alex warned. 

The Blob Monster had stopped its gurgling. The purple tongue came darting 
out again. 

I grabbed a sheet of paper and leaned over the desk. I pulled off the cap on 
the pen and lowered the point to the paper. 

“THE—” 

I wrote one word—and felt something hot and wet slap against the side of 
my face. 

The fat purple tongue slid against me. 

“Ow!” I cried out. And dropped the pen. 

My hand shot up to my cheek, and I felt hot, sticky slime. 

My stomach heaved. 

The tongue curled around the old pen. And carried it to the Blob Monster’s 
mouth. 

“Noooo!” Alex and I shrieked together. 

The creature sucked the pen into its open belly, and began its digesting 
gurgles. 

“Now what?” Alex asked in a whisper. “What can we do? It’s going to eat 
us next!” 

I jumped to my feet. The desk chair toppled over. 

I stepped away from it, my eyes on the doorway. “Make a run for it!” I 



cried. 

Alex held back. “We can’t,” she sighed. “That thing—it’s blocking the way. 
We’ll never get past it.” 

She was right. The Blob Monster would stick out its tongue and pull us 
easily into its drooling mouth. 

“Try the window!” I cried desperately. 

We both turned to the window. 

No way. It was bolted shut because of the air conditioner. 

“Doomed,” Alex whispered. “Doomed.” 

We both turned back to the throbbing, pink monster. 

And then I had one more idea. 

“Alex—remember when Adam typed something on my story? And it didn’t 
come true?” 

She nodded, keeping her eyes on the gurgling Blob Monster. “Yes, I 
remember. But so what?” 

“Well,” I continued, “maybe that’s because it’s me that has the power. 
Maybe the power isn’t in the typewriter or the pen. Maybe I got the power that 
night in that antique shop when I was zapped by that electrical shock.” 

Alex swallowed hard. “Maybe...” 

“Maybe it’s been in me the whole time!” I cried excitedly. “All I have to do 
is think what I want to happen—and it will come true. I don’t have to type it or 
write it. I just have to think it!” 

“Maybe...” Alex repeated. 

She started to say something else. But the Blob suddenly bounced forward, 
squishing over the rug. And its tongue rolled out toward us. 

“Ohhhh...” Alex backed up against the wall. 

The fat tongue licked her arm. It left a thick smear of sticky drool on her 

skin. 

“Think fast, Zackie!” Alex cried. 

The tongue curled and started to wrap itself around Alex. 

“Make it disappear!” Alex pleaded. “Think! Think it away!” 

I froze in horror as the fat tongue wrapped around Alex. It lifted her off the 
floor. 

Screaming, she thrashed her arms and kicked. Squirming frantically, she 
wrapped her hands around the sticky tongue—and shoved with all her strength. 

But the disgusting tongue squeezed tighter, held her in its slimy grip. 



I shut my eyes. 

Think! I instructed myself. Think hard! 

Think that the Blob Monster is gone. 

Gone... gone... gone. 

I held my breath. And thought with all my might. 
Would it work? 



32 


The monster is gone. 

That’s what I thought. 

The monster is gone... gone... gone... 

I silently chanted the word, over and over. Then I opened my eyes. 

And the Blob Monster was gone! 

Alex stood in the center of the floor, a dazed expression on her face. “It... it 
worked,” she choked out. 

I do have the power! I realized. 

I closed my eyes again and started to think. Adam is back, I thought. 

Adam is back... 

I opened my eyes—and Adam stood beside Alex. 

He blinked several times, then squinted at me. “What’s happening?” he 
asked. 

“I have it!” I cried happily. “I have the power—not the typewriter!” 

“What are you talking about?” Adam demanded. “What power?” 

I shook my head. “You wouldn’t understand,” I told him. 

Alex started to laugh. 

Before I realized it, I was laughing too. 

Joyful laughter. Relieved laughter. 

All three of us stood there, laughing, laughing, laughing—laughing happily 
ever after. 



33 


“Well? Did you like my story?” 

The pink Blob Monster neatened the pages he had just read and set them 
down on the desk. He turned to his friend, a green-skinned Blob Monster. 

“Did you just write that?” the green monster asked. 

The pink Blob Monster gurgled with pride. “Yes. Did you enjoy it?” 

“I did,” his friend replied. “Thank you for reading it to me. It’s very 
exciting. Very well written. What do you call it?” 

“I call it ‘Attack of the Humans’,” the Blob Monster replied. “Did you 
really like it?” 

“Yes. Those humans are really gross,” his friend replied. “Do you know my 
favorite part?” 

“What part?” 

“When the Blob Monster ate Adam. That was really fun!” the green 
creature declared. “But I have just one problem with your story.” 

The pink Blob Monster bobbed up and down. The veins on top of his head 
turned a darker purple. “A problem with my story? What is it?” 

“Well...” his green friend replied. “Why did you give it such an unhappy 
ending? I hated it when the human shut his eyes, and the Blob Monster 
disappeared. That was so sad.” 

“Do you think so?” the pink monster asked, gazing down thoughtfully at 
the pages he had written. 

“Yes,” his friend replied. “You should have a happy ending, instead. 
Everyone likes a happy ending.” 

The pink Blob Monster picked up his story. “Okay. You’re right. I’ll change 
the ending. I’ll have the Blob Monster eat them all!” 

“Great! I love it!” his friend declared. “Now, that’s a great ending!” 





THE CURSE OF 
CAMP COLD LAKE 

Goosebumps - 56 
R.L. Stine 



1 


I got off to a bad start at Camp Cold Lake. 

I was nervous when I arrived. And I guess I did some dumb things. 

Well, I didn’t want to go to a water sports camp. 

I don’t like to be outdoors. I hate the feeling of grass brushing against my 
ankles. I don’t even like to touch trees. And I certainly don’t like getting wet. 

Sure, I like to go swimming once in a while. But not every day! What’s the 
point of that? 

I like to swim in a nice, clean pool. I took one look at the lake here—and I 
was sick. I knew there had to be horrible things swimming around in that water. 

Ugly creatures, waiting below the surface. Thinking to themselves: “Sarah 
Maas, we’re waiting for you. Sarah, we’re going to rub our slimy bodies on your 
legs when you swim. And we’re going to chew off your toes, one by one.” 

Yuck. Why do I have to swim in slime ? 

Of course, Aaron was so excited, he nearly exploded. 

When we climbed off the camp bus, he was jumping up and down and 
talking a mile a minute. He was so crazed. I thought he was going to burst out of 
his clothes and go running into the lake! 

My brother likes camp. He likes sports and the outdoors. He likes just about 
everything and everyone. 

And everyone always likes Aaron. He’s so enthusiastic. He’s so much fun. 

Hey—I like to have fun too. But how can you have fun when there are no 
malls, no movie theaters, no restaurants to get a slice of pizza or a bag of french 
fries? 

How can you have fun up to your neck in a freezing cold lake every day? In 
a camp miles from any town? Surrounded on all sides by thick woods? 

“This is going to be awesome!” Aaron declared. Dragging his duffel bag, he 
hurried off to find his cabin. 

“Yeah. Awesome,” I muttered glumly. The bright sun was already making 
me sweat. 

Do I like to sweat? Of course not. 

So why did I come to Camp Cold Lake? I can answer that in three words: 
Mom and Dad. 



They said that a water sports camp would give me confidence. They said it 
would help make me more comfortable with the outdoors. 

And they said it would give me a chance to make new friends. 

Okay, I admit it. I don’t make friends easily. I’m not like Aaron. I can’t just 
walk up to someone and start talking and kidding around. 

I’m a little shy. Maybe it’s because I’m so much taller than everyone else. 
I’m a whole head taller than Aaron. And he’s only a year younger than I am. 
He’s eleven. 

I’m tall and very skinny. Sometimes Dad calls me “Grasshopper”. 

Guess how much I like that. 

About as much as I like swimming in a cold lake filled with hidden 
creatures. 

“Be a good sport about it, Sarah,” Mom said. 

I rolled my eyes. 

“Give camp a chance,” Dad added. “You might surprise yourself and have a 
good time.” 

I rolled my eyes again. 

“When you come home at the end of summer, you’ll probably beg us to 
take you camping!” Dad joked. 

I wanted to roll my eyes again—but they were getting tired from all that 
rolling. 

I gave my parents a glum sigh. Quick hugs. Then I followed Aaron onto the 
camp bus. 

He grinned the whole way to camp. He was really excited about learning 
how to water-ski. And he kept asking everyone if the camp had a high diving 
board over the lake. 

Aaron made three or four good friends on the bus ride to camp. 

I stared out the window, watching the endless blur of trees and farms. 
Thinking about my lucky friends who got to stay home and hang out at the mall. 

Then here we were at Camp Cold Lake. Kids pulling their bags off the bus. 
Laughing and joking. Counselors in dark green T-shirts greeting everyone, 
pointing them in the right direction. 

I began to cheer up a little bit. 

Maybe I will make some new friends, I thought. Maybe I’ll meet some kids 
who are a lot like me—and we’ll have a great summer. 

But then I stepped into my cabin. I saw my three bunk mates. I looked 



around. 

And I let out a cry. “Oh, no! No way!” 



2 


I guess I shouldn’t have freaked like that. 

It made a very bad first impression. 

But what was I supposed to do? 

There were two bunk beds in the cabin. The three other girls had already 
chosen their beds. There was only one bed left—right in front of the window. 

And the window had no screens. 

Which meant that my bed would be crawling with bugs. I took one glance 
—and I knew I’d be swatting mosquitoes every night for the whole summer. 

Besides, I can’t sleep in a top bunk. I toss and turn a lot at night. If I slept 
on top, I’d fall on my head. 

I had to sleep on the bottom. In the bed against the far wall, away from the 
open window. 

“I—I can’t do this!” I blurted out. 

My three bunk mates turned to look at me. One had blond hair pulled back 
in a ponytail. Near her was a short, chubby girl with long brown hair. In the 
bottom bunk against the wall, an African-American girl with long cornrows 
stared across the cabin at me. 

I guess they wanted to say hi and introduce themselves. But I didn’t give 
them a chance. 

“Someone has to trade beds with me!” I cried. I didn’t mean to sound so 
shrill. But I was really upset. 

Before they could answer, the cabin door swung open. A sandy-haired 
young guy in a dark green camp T-shirt poked his head in. 

“I’m Richard,” he said. “I’m the boss guy, the head dude. Everything okay 
in here?” 

“No!” I cried. 

I couldn’t stop myself. I was just so nervous and unhappy. “I can’t sleep in 
this bunk!” I told him. “I don’t want to be near the window. And I need to sleep 
on the bottom.” 

I could see that the other girls were shocked by my outburst. 

Richard turned to the girl who was sitting on the bottom bunk against the 
wall. “Briana, would you trade beds with—” 



“Sarah,” I told him. 

“Would you trade bunks with Sarah?” Richard asked Briana. 

She shook her head so hard, the beads in her cornrows rattled against each 
other. “I really don’t want to,” she said softly. 

She pointed to the chubby girl with long brown hair, who sat on a camp 
trunk. “Meg and I were bunk mates last year,” Briana told Richard. “And we 
kind of wanted to be together.” 

Meg nodded. She had a round, baby face. Squirrel cheeks out to here. And 
she wore blue and red braces on her teeth. 

“I can’t sleep in front of the window,” I insisted. “I really can’t. I hate 
bugs.” 

Richard stared hard at Briana. “How about it?” 

Briana groaned. “Oh... all right.” She made a face at me. 

“Thanks,” Richard said. I could see he was studying me. 

He probably thinks I’m a real troublemaker, I thought. 

Briana climbed off the bottom bunk. She dragged her duffel bag across the 
room to the bunk by the window. “It’s all yours,” she muttered. 

She didn’t say it in a friendly way. 

I felt bad. My bunk mates hate me already, I thought. 

Why do I always do that? Why do I always get nervous and start off on the 
wrong foot with people? 

Now I’ve got to try really hard to make them my friends, I decided. 

But a minute later, I did something horrible. 



3 


“Hey—thanks for trading bunks, Briana,” I said. “That was really nice of you.” 

She nodded but didn’t say anything. Meg pulled open her trunk and started 
shoving shorts and T-shirts into her dresser drawer. 

The third girl smiled at me. “Hi. I’m Janice,” she said. She had a raspy, 
hoarse voice. “Everyone calls me Jan.” 

Jan had a nice smile. She had her blond hair pulled back in a ponytail. She 
had dark blue eyes and red cheeks. She seemed to be blushing all the time. 

“Were you here last summer?” I asked her. 

She shook her head. “No. Briana and Meg were here. But this is my first 
summer. I went to tennis camp last year.” 

“I’ve never been to any kind of camp,” I confessed. “I—I guess I’m a little 
nervous.” 

“Are you a good swimmer?” Briana asked. 

I shrugged. “Pretty good, I guess. I don’t swim much. I don’t really like it.” 

Meg turned from her trunk. “You don’t like to swim, and you came to a 
water sports camp?” 

Briana and Jan laughed. 

I could feel my face grow hot. I didn’t want to tell them that my parents 
made me come to this camp. That just sounded too geeky. I didn’t know what to 
say. 

“I... uh... I like other things,” I stammered. 

“Oh—I love that swimsuit!” Briana declared. She pulled a bright yellow 
swimsuit from Meg’s trunk and held it up in front of her. “This is excellent!” 

Meg tugged it back. “Like it would really fit you!” she muttered, rolling her 
eyes. Her braces clicked when she talked. 

Meg looked a little like a bowling ball next to tall, graceful Briana. 

“Did you lose weight over the winter?” Briana asked her. “You look great. 
Really, Meg.” 

“I lost a little,” Meg replied. She sighed. “But I didn’t get any taller.” 

“I grew about a foot this year,” I chimed in. “I’m the tallest girl in my 
school. Everyone stares at me when I walk through the halls.” 

“Boo hoo,” Meg said sarcastically. “You’ve really got it tough. Would you 



rather be a shrimp like me?” 

“Well... not really,” I replied. 

Ooops. I realized I’d said the wrong thing. 

I saw a flash of hurt in Meg’s eyes. 

Why did I say that? I asked myself. 

Why do I keep putting my foot in my mouth? 

I picked up my backpack from where I had tossed it on the floor. I carried it 
to my bunk to unpack it. 

“Hey—that’s mine! Put it down!” Jan came rushing over to me. 

I glanced down at the backpack. “No. It’s mine,” I insisted. 

I started to unzip it—and it fell off the bed. 

A whole bunch of things fell out and clattered across the cabin floor. 

“Oh!” I cried out in surprise. The stuff wasn’t mine. 

I saw pill bottles. Medicine jars. And little plastic inhalers. 

“Asthma medicine?” I cried. 

Jan dropped to her knees and began gathering it all up. She glared up at me 
angrily. “Thanks a bunch, Sarah,” she growled. “Thanks for letting the whole 
world know I have asthma. Why don’t you stand up at the campfire tonight and 
announce it to the whole camp?” 

“Sorry,” I murmured weakly. 

“I told you it was my backpack,” Jan snapped. 

Meg bent down and picked up an inhaler for Jan. 

“Having asthma is nothing to be ashamed of,” she told Jan. 

“Maybe I like to keep some things to myself,” Jan snapped. She shoved all 
the medicine into the pocket and grabbed the backpack away. 

“Sorry,” I said again. “Really.” 

All three girls glared at me. Briana shook her head. Meg tsk-tsked. 

They hate me already, I thought. 

I felt sick. Really sick. 

They hate me, and it’s only the first day. The first hour. 

With a sigh, I slumped down on my bunk. 

Can things get any worse? I wondered. 

Guess the answer to that. 



4 


Later that night, we had our first campfire. It was built in a wide, flat clearing 
near the woods. Smooth logs were placed in a circle to be used as benches. 

I dropped down on an empty log with my back to the trees. Flames from the 
big fire danced brightly against the gray evening sky. 

The fire crackled and popped. It smelled so sweet. I took a deep breath. 

Counselors tossed more sticks on the fire. Soon the flames rose up over 
their heads. 

The night air was hot and dry. My cheeks burned from the heat tossed off 
by the fire. 

I turned away and gazed into the woods. The dark trees shivered in a light 
breeze. In the gray light, I saw a squirrel dart between tall weeds. 

I wondered what other animals lurked in the woods. I imagined there were 
bigger animals than squirrels in there. Bigger and more dangerous. 

A loud POP from the fire made me jump. 

It’s creepy outside at night, I thought. Why can’t they have the campfire 
indoors? In a fireplace or something. 

I slapped a mosquito on my neck. 

When I turned back to the fire, I saw Briana and Meg on another log bench. 
They were laughing about something. Talking to two girls I didn’t know. 

I saw Aaron on the other side of the flames. He was goofing with two other 
guys. They were wrestling around, trying to shove each other off the log. 

I sighed. Aaron has already made a bunch of friends, I thought. 

Everyone has made friends—but me. 

Aaron saw me staring at him. He waved quickly, then turned back to his 
friends. 

On the next log, three girls had their heads tossed back. They were loudly 
singing the camp song. 

I listened carefully, trying to learn the words. But they had a giggling fit 
halfway through and didn’t finish the song. 

Two older girls sat down on the other end of my log. They looked about 
fifteen or sixteen. I turned to say hi to them. But they were busy talking. 

One of them had a bag of Gummi Worms in her hand. She kept pulling 



them out of the bag one by one and slurping them slowly like spaghetti noodles. 

Richard, the head counselor, stepped in front of the fire. He had a black 
baseball cap turned backwards on his head. His baggy shorts were torn and dirty 
from working on the fire. 

He raised both hands over his head. “Are we all here?” he called out. 

I could barely hear him. Everyone was still talking and laughing. Across the 
fire, I saw Aaron standing up, wiggling his whole body in a funny dance. 

His friends were laughing their heads off. One of them slapped Aaron a 
high five. 

“Can we get started?” Richard called out. “Can we start our welcoming 
campfire?” 

A log cracked in the fire. Red embers shot up all around. 

“Oh!” I let out a cry as a hand grabbed my shoulder. 

“Who—?” I spun around, startled. And stared up at Briana and Meg. 

They leaned over me. In the darting firelight, I saw their frightened 
expressions. 

“Sarah—run!” Briana whispered. 

“Get up—quick!” Meg tugged my arm. “Run!” 

“Why? What’s wrong?” I sputtered. 



5 


I jumped shakily to my feet. “What’s wrong?” 

“Those boys,” Meg whispered. She pointed across the fire. “They threw 
fireworks in the fire! It’s going to explode!” 

“Run!” both girls cried. 

Meg gave me a shove to get me started. 

I stumbled—and then lurched forward. As I ran, I shut my eyes tight, 
expecting the blast any second. 

Could I get away in time? Were Meg and Briana escaping it too? 

I stopped short when I heard the laughter. 

Shrill, gleeful laughter. 

“Huh?” Swallowing hard, I turned back. 

And saw half the camp laughing at me. 

Meg and Briana slapped each other a high five. 

“No. Oh, noooo,” I murmured. How could I fall for such a dumb trick? 

How could they play such a mean joke on me? 

They must have told everyone to watch. As I stood at the edge of the 
clearing by myself, I could feel all the eyes on me. 

And I could hear kids laughing and making jokes. 

I saw Jan laughing. And I saw Richard and some of the other counselors 
grinning and shaking their heads. 

I know, I know. I should have laughed too. I should have made a joke of it. 

I shouldn’t have let it upset me. 

But the whole day had been so terrible. I was so nervous. And so eager not 
to make any more mistakes. 

I could feel my shoulders start to shake up and down. I could feel tears 
welling up in my eyes. 

No! I ordered myself. You cannot cry! You cannot allow yourself to cry in 
front of the whole camp. 

Sure, you feel like a total jerk, Sarah. But so what? It was just a joke. Just a 
dumb joke. 

I felt a hand on my arm. I pulled away. 



“Sarah—” Aaron stood beside me. His dark eyes were wide in the shadowy 
evening light. 

“I’m okay,” I snapped. “Go away.” 

“You’re such a bad sport,” he said softly. “Why can’t you ever let things 
slide off you? It was just a joke. Why go nuts over a dumb joke?” 

Do you know what I really hate? 

I really hate it when Aaron is right. 

I mean, he’s my younger brother—right? What right does he have to be the 
sensible, calm member of the Maas family? 

It really steams me when Aaron comes on like the older brother. 

“Do I need your advice?” I snarled. “Take a hike.” I gave him a shove 
toward the campfire. 

He shrugged and hurried back to his friends. 

I crept to the campfire. I didn’t go to my old seat. It was too close to the fire 
—and too close to Briana and Meg. 

I dropped down on the edge of a log near the woods, outside the glow of the 
fire. The darkness cooled me and helped to calm me down. 

Richard had been talking for a while. I realized I hadn’t heard a word he 

said. 

He stood in front of the crackling fire. He had a deep, booming voice. But 
everyone leaned in to hear him better. 

I gazed around the circle of campers. Their faces glowed orange in the 
bright firelight. Their eyes sparkled. 

I wondered if anyone here would be my friend. 

I knew I was feeling really sorry for myself. I wondered if any other new 
campers felt the way I did. 

Richard’s voice droned on in the back of my mind. He was saying 
something about the main lodge. Something about the meal schedule. Then he 
began talking about towels. 

I started to pay attention when he introduced the head waterfront counselor. 
Her name was Liz. 

Everyone clapped when she stood up beside Richard. One of the boys gave 
a loud wolf whistle. 

“She’s awesome!” another boy called out. 

Everyone laughed. 

Liz grinned too. She knew she looked really awesome. She wore tight 



denim cutoffs and a dark blue midriff top. She waved for everyone to get quiet. 

“Are you all having a good time?” she called out. 

Everyone cheered and clapped. Several boys whistled. 

“Well, tomorrow will be your first day at the waterfront,” Liz announced. 
“And before you go in the lake, there are lots of water rules we want you to 
know.” 

“Like, don’t drink the water!” Richard chimed in. “Unless you’re very 
thirsty!” 

Some kids laughed. I didn’t. The thought of drinking that disgusting, slimy 
water made me sick. 

Liz didn’t laugh, either. She frowned at Richard. “We need to take this 
seriously,” she scolded. 

“I was serious!” Richard joked. 

Liz ignored him. “When you get back to your bunks, you will find a list of 
water rules on your bed,” she continued, brushing back her long, frizzy red hair. 
“There are twenty rules on the list. And you need to know them all.” 

Huh? Twenty rules? I thought. How can there be twenty rules? 

It will take all summer to learn twenty rules. 

Liz held up a sheet of paper. “I’m going to go over the list with you now. If 
you have any questions, just call them out.” 

“Can we go swimming now?” a boy shouted, trying to be funny. 

Lots of kids laughed. 

But Liz didn’t crack a smile. “That’s rule number eight,” she replied. “No 
night swimming, even if counselors are with you.” 

“Don’t ever swim with counselors!” Richard joked. “They have germs!” 

Richard is pretty funny, I thought. He seems like a good guy. 

But Liz seems so serious. 

The sheet of paper fluttered in the wind. She gripped it with both hands. 
Her red hair caught the glow of the fire. 

“The most important rule at Camp Cold Lake is the Buddy System,” Liz 
announced. “When you are in the lake, you must always have a buddy.” 

She glanced quickly at the campers seated around her. “Even if you are only 
wading in up to your ankles, you must have a swimming buddy with you,” she 
said. “You may have a different buddy each time. Or you may choose a buddy 
for the whole summer. But you must always have a buddy.” 

She took a deep breath. “Are there any questions?” 



“Will you be my buddy?” a boy shouted. 

Everyone laughed. I laughed too. The kid’s timing was perfect. 

But once again, Liz didn’t crack a smile. “As waterfront counselor, I will 
act as everyone’s buddy,” she replied seriously. 

“Now, rule number two,” she continued. “Never swim more than three boat 
lengths from one of our safety boats. Rule number three—no shouting or 
pretending to be in trouble in the water. No horseplay. No kidding around. Rule 
number four...” 

She talked on and on, reading off all twenty rules. 

I groaned. She talks to us like we’re five year olds, I thought. 

And there are so many water rules. 

“Let me repeat one more time about the Buddy System...” Liz was saying. 

Gazing past the fire, I could see the dark lake. Smooth and black and silent. 

The lake has tiny waves. No current. No dangerous tides. 

So why are there so many rules? I wondered. 

What are they scared of? 



6 


Liz talked for at least half an hour. Richard kept cracking jokes, trying to make 
her laugh. But she never even smiled. 

She talked some more about every rule on the list. Then she told us to read 
the list carefully when we got back to our cabins. 

“Have a safe summer, everyone!” she called out. “See you at the 
waterfront!” 

Everyone cheered and whistled again as Liz stepped away from the fire. I 
yawned and stretched my hands over my head. That was really boring, I thought. 

Eve never heard of a place having so many rules. 

I swatted another mosquito on my neck. I was starting to feel really itchy. 
That’s what being outdoors does to me. It makes me itch like crazy. 

The fire had died down. A blanket of purple embers glowed on the dark 
ground. The night air grew cool. 

To end the campfire, Richard told everyone to stand and sing the camp 
song. “You new campers probably don’t know the words,” he said. “You’re 
lucky\” 

Everyone laughed. Then Richard began to sing, and everyone joined in. 

I tried to follow along. But I couldn’t catch all of the words. I picked up 
pieces of the song.... 

“Wetter is better ... ” 

“Get in the swim. 

Show your vigor and vim... ” 

“Every son and daughter 

should be in the water, 

the cold, cold water 

of Camp Cold Lake. ” 

Yuck. I agreed with Richard about the words to the song. They were so 
lame! 



Gazing across the fire, I saw Aaron singing his heart out. He seemed to 
know every word already. 

How does he do it? I wondered, scratching my itchy legs. How does he 
manage to be so perfect? To fit in everywhere? 

As the song ended, Richard raised his hands for quiet. “I have a few final 
announcements,” he called out. “First of all, none of you can carry a tune! 
Second...” 

I didn’t hear the rest. I turned to find Briana and Meg standing beside me. 

I took a step back. “What do you want?” I snapped. 

“We want to apologize,” Briana said. 

Meg nodded. “Yeah. We’re sorry we played that dumb joke on you.” 

Richard’s voice droned on behind us. Briana put a hand on my shoulder. 
“We got off to a bad start,” she said. “Let’s start all over again. Okay, Sarah?” 

“Yeah. Let’s start fresh,” Meg agreed. 

A smile spread over my face. “Great,” I said. “Excellent.” 

“Excellent!” Briana repeated, smiling too. 

She slapped me on the back. “A fresh start!” 

Richard was still making announcements. “Tomorrow at four-thirty, those 
interested in windsurfing...” 

Aaron will probably try that, I thought. I watched Briana and Meg walk 
away. 

A fresh start, I thought. I began to feel a lot happier. 

The happy feeling lasted for about two seconds. 

Then my back started to itch. 

I turned to the fire and saw Briana and Meg staring back at me. They were 
both giggling. 

Other kids had turned away from Richard and were watching me. 

“Ohhhh.” I groaned when I felt something warm wriggle against my back. 

Something warm and dry, moving under my T-shirt. 

“Ohhhh.” It moved again. 

I reached one hand back. And poked it under my shirt. 

What is it? What did Briana put back there? 

I grabbed the thing and pulled it out. 

And started to scream. 



7 


The snake wriggled in my hand. 

It looked like a long black shoelace. With eyes! And a mouth that kept 
snapping open and shut. 

“Noooooo!” I totally lost it. 

I let out a shrill scream. And I heaved the snake with all my might. 

It sailed into the woods. 

My back still itched like crazy. I could still feel it wriggling against my 

skin. 

I reached back and tried to scratch with both hands. 

Kids were laughing. Telling each other what Briana had done. 

I didn’t care. I just wanted to rub away the feeling of that snake against my 

skin. 

My whole body tingled. I uttered an angry cry. “How could you?” I 
shrieked at Briana and Meg. “What is your problem ?” 

Aaron came hurrying over to be the grown-up again. 

Just what I needed. Mr. Mature Kid Brother. 

“Sarah, did it bite you?” he asked softly. 

I shook my head. “I can still feel it!” I wailed. “Did you see it? It was three 
feet long!” 

“Calm down,” Aaron whispered. “Everyone is staring at you.” 

“Think I don’t know it?” I snapped. 

“Well, it was just a tiny snake,” Aaron said. “Totally harmless. Try to get 
yourself together.” 

“I—I—I—” I sputtered. I was too upset, too angry to talk. 

Aaron raised his eyes to Briana and Meg. “Why are those two girls picking 
on you?” he asked. 

“I don’t know!” I wailed. “Because... because they’re creeps ! That’s why!” 
“Well, try to calm down,” Aaron repeated. “Look at you, Sarah. You’re 
shaking all over.” 

“You’d shake too if you had a disgusting snake crawling up and down your 
skin!” I replied. “And I really don’t need your advice, Aaron. I really don’t—” 



“Fine,” he replied. He spun away and hurried back to his friends. 

“I don’t believe him,” I muttered. 

Dad is a doctor, and Aaron is just like him. He thinks he has to take care of 
everyone in the world. 

Well, I can take care of myself. I don’t need my little brother telling me to 
calm down every second. 

Richard was still talking. But I didn’t care. I stepped away from the 
campfire circle and started back to the cabin. 

The path curved through a patch of woods, up the sloping hill where the 
cabins were perched. Away from the glow of the fire, I was surrounded by 
darkness. 

I clicked on my flashlight and aimed the yellow circle of light at my feet. 
My sneakers crunched over dry leaves and twigs. The trees whispered above me. 

How did I get off to such a bad start? I asked myself. 

Why do Briana and Meg hate me so much? 

Maybe they’re just mean, I decided. Maybe they’re total creeps. Maybe 
they’re mean to everyone. 

They think they’re so hot because they were at camp last year. 

Without realizing it, I had wandered off the path. “Hey—” I swung the 
flashlight around, searching for the way back. 

The light swept over tilting trees, tall clumps of weeds, a fallen log. 

Panic tightened my throat. 

Where is the path? Where? 

I took a few steps. My sneaker crunched over leaves. 

And then my foot sank into something soft. 

Quicksand! 



8 


No. Not quicksand. 

There’s no such thing as quicksand. I remembered that from some science 
book I read in fifth grade. 

I lowered the flashlight. 

“Ohhhh.” Mud. Thick, gooey mud. 

My sneaker sank deep into the ooze. 

I pulled my leg up with a groan—and nearly toppled over backwards. 

It’s just mud, I told myself. It’s disgusting—but it’s no big deal. 

But then I saw the spiders. 

Dozens of them. The biggest spiders I ever saw. 

There must have been a nest of them in the mud. 

They were crawling over my shoe, crawling up the leg of my jeans. 

“Ohhhh. Yuck!” 

Dozens of spiders clung to me. I shook my sneaker. Hard. Then I began 
batting at them with my free hand. 

“I hate this caaaaaamp!” I screamed. 

I beat some spiders away with the flashlight. 

And then I had an idea. 

I mean, why shouldn’t I pay Briana and Meg back for what they did to me? 

They embarrassed me in front of the whole camp. And I hardly did 
anything to them. 

I emptied the batteries from the flashlight. I took a deep breath. Then I bent 
down—and scooped a bunch of spiders into the flashlight. 

Yuck. I felt sick. I really did. 

I mean, can you imagine —me handling spiders! 

But I knew it would be worth it. Soon. 

I filled the flashlight with the squirming, black creatures. Then I screwed on 
the top. 

I stepped over a fallen tree trunk. Found the path. And carrying the 
flashlight carefully, I eagerly hurried to the cabin. 

I stopped outside the door. The lights were on inside the cabin. 



I peeked in through the open window. No. No sign of anyone. 

I crept inside. 

I pulled up the blanket on Briana’s bed. Then I emptied half of the spiders 
onto her sheet. I carefully pulled the blanket over them and smoothed it out. 

I was pouring the rest of the spiders into Meg’s bed when I heard a 
shuffling noise behind me. Quickly, I pulled Meg’s blanket back into place and 
spun around. 

Jan stepped into the cabin. “What’s up?” she asked in her hoarse, croaky 
voice. 

“Nothing,” I replied, hiding the flashlight behind my back. 

Jan yawned. “It’s Lights Out in ten minutes,” she said. 

I glanced at Briana’s bunk. I’d left one corner of the blanket untucked. 
Briana won’t notice, I decided. 

I realized I was grinning. I quickly changed my expression. I didn’t want 
Jan asking a lot of questions. 

She turned and pulled a long white nightshirt from her dresser drawer. 
“What did you sign up for tomorrow?” she asked. “Free Swim?” 

“No. Canoeing,” I told her. 

I wanted to be in a nice, dry canoe. Not flopping around in the dirty lake 
with fish and other slimy creatures. 

“Hey. Me too,” Jan said. 

I started to ask if she would be my buddy. But Briana and Meg came 
strolling through the door. 

They saw me—and burst out laughing. 

“What was that wild dance you were doing at the campfire?” Briana teased. 

“You looked as if you had a snake down your back or something!” Meg 
declared. 

They laughed some more. 

That’s okay I thought. Go ahead and laugh. 

In a few minutes, when you climb under your covers, I’ll be laughing. 

I couldn’t wait. 



9 


A few minutes later, Jan turned out the lights. I lay on the hard mattress, staring 
up at Meg’s mattress above my head, grinning. Waiting... 

Waiting... 

Meg shifted her weight in the bunk above me. 

I heard her gasp. 

And then both Briana and Meg began to scream. 

I laughed out loud. I couldn’t hold it in. 

“It bit me! It bit me!” Briana howled. 

The lights flashed on. 

“Help!” Meg cried. She leaped out of bed. Her bare feet hit the floor hard. It 
sounded like an elephant landing. 

“It bit me!” Briana cried. 

She and Meg were both on the floor now, dancing and wriggling. Slapping 
at their arms, their legs, their backs. 

I bit my lip to make myself stop laughing. 

“Spiders! Spiders all over!” Meg shrieked. “Ow! It bit me too!” She pulled 
up the sleeve of her nightshirt. “Ow! That hurts!” 

Jan stood at the light switch. I hadn’t moved from my bed. I was enjoying it 
all too much. Watching them squirm and dance. 

But Jan’s words wiped the smile from my face. 

“Sarah put the spiders there,” she told Briana and Meg. “I saw her messing 
around at your bunks when I came in.” 

What a snitch. I guess she was still angry at me because I spilled her asthma 
medicine. 

Well, that put an end to the fun. 

I think Briana and Meg wanted to strangle me. They both had to go to the 
infirmary and wake up the camp nurse. They had to make sure the spider bites 
weren’t poisonous. 

How was I to know that these were the kind of spiders that bite? 

It was just a joke, after all. 

I tried to apologize when they came trudging back from the nurse. But they 



wouldn’t speak to me. And neither would Jan. 

Oh, well, I sighed. So they won’t be my friends. I’ll make other friends.... 

The next morning in the mess hall, I ate breakfast alone. The room had two long 
tables that stretched from wall to wall. One for boys and one for girls. 

I sat at the far end of the girls’ table and spooned up my cornflakes in 
silence. 

All the other girls were chattering away. At the other end of the table, 
Briana and Meg kept flashing me angry looks. 

I saw Aaron at the boys’ table. He and his friends were laughing and 
goofing on each other. Aaron balanced a pancake on his forehead. Another boy 
slapped it off. 

At least he ’s having fun, I thought bitterly. 

I had the sudden urge to go over and tell Aaron how unhappy I was. But I 
knew he would just tell me to lighten up. 

So I sat at my lonely end of the table and choked down my cornflakes. 

Did things get better when I arrived at the lake for canoeing? 

Three guesses. 

Kids were already pulling their canoes off the grassy shore, into the water. 
They all seemed to be paired up. 

Liz walked over to me. Her white one-piece bathing suit glowed in the 
morning sunlight. She had her frizzy red hair tied behind her head. 

She let a silver whistle fall from her mouth. “What’s your name?” she 
asked, eyes on the lake. 

“Sarah,” I told her. “I signed up for canoeing, but—” 

“You need a buddy,” she said. “Find a buddy. The canoes are over there.” 
She pointed, then trotted away. 

Canoes splashed into the water. The slap of the wooden paddles echoed 
around the shore. 

I ran to the stack of canoes, searching for a buddy. But everyone had 
already chosen partners. 

I was about to give up when I spotted Jan, pulling a canoe to the water. “Do 
you have a buddy?” I called. 

She shook her head. 

“Well, can I come with you?” I asked. 

“I don’t think so,” she replied nastily. “Do you have any more spiders you 



want to set loose?” 

“Jan, please—” I started. 

“Are you two together?” Liz appeared behind us, startling us both. 

“No. I—” Jan started. 

“I want to be her buddy, but she doesn’t want to,” I said. I didn’t mean to 
whine, but it came out that way. 

Jan made an ugly face at me. 

“Get your canoe in the water,” Liz ordered. “You two are the last ones in.” 

Jan started to protest. Then she shrugged and sighed. “Okay, Sarah. Let’s 

go-” 

We pulled on life preservers. Then I grabbed a paddle and one end of the 
canoe. We dragged it to the water. 

The little boat bobbed against the shore. The lake current was stronger than 
I thought. Low waves plopped steadily against the grassy shore. 

Jan climbed in and took a seat in the front. “Thanks for embarrassing me in 
front of Liz,” she muttered. 

“I didn’t mean—” I started. 

“Okay. Push off,” she commanded. 

I tossed my paddle into the canoe. Then I leaned over and gave the boat a 
hard shove with both hands. 

It slid smoothly away from the shore. Then I had to wade out to it and pull 
myself inside. 

“Whoa!” As I struggled to hoist myself up, the canoe nearly tipped over. 

“Watch it!” Jan snapped. “You’re such a klutz, Sarah.” 

“Sorry,” I murmured. I was so grateful to have a buddy, I didn’t want any 
more trouble between us. 

I pulled myself into the canoe and dropped down behind Jan. 

The canoe bobbed up and down as we began to paddle. The rocking waters 
sparkled like silver under the bright morning sunshine. 

It took us a while to find the right rhythm. 

Neither of us spoke. 

The slap of our paddles and the rush of water against the little canoe were 
the only sounds we made. 

The lake gleamed in front of us like a giant, round mirror. I could see 
several canoes up ahead. Jan and I were far behind them. 

The rubber life preservers were hot and heavy. We pulled them off and 



dropped them to the canoe floor. 

We paddled steadily, not too fast, not too slow. 

I glanced back. The shore seemed miles away. 

I felt a chill of fear. I’m not that strong a swimmer. I suddenly wondered if I 
could swim all the way to shore from out here. 

“Hey!” As I stared back at the shore, the canoe suddenly started to rock. 
“Whoooa!” I grabbed the sides. 

I turned—and to my horror, saw Jan standing up\ 

“Jan—stop! What are you doing?” I shrieked. “What are you doing?” 

The little boat rocked harder. I gripped the sides, struggling to steady it. 

Jan took a step. 

The canoe tilted. Water splashed over my feet. 

“Jan—stop!” I cried again. “Sit down! What are you doing?” 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “Bye, Sarah.” 



10 


The boat tilted more as she raised one foot to the side. She pulled off the T-shirt 
she had over her swimsuit and tossed it to the canoe floor. 

“No—please!” I begged. “Don’t leave me out here. I’m not a good 
swimmer. What if the boat tips over? I don’t think I can swim back from here!” 

“You ruined my summer,” she accused. “Now everyone knows I have 
asthma. So they won’t let me go on the six-day canoe trip.” 

“But—but it was an accident—” I sputtered. 

“And you’re messing up everything for Briana and Meg too,” Jan said 
angrily. 

“No. Wait—” I started. “I apologized to them. I didn’t mean—” 

She shifted her weight. 

Tilted the canoe the other way. 

Then she shifted her weight again. Again. 

Deliberately making the canoe rock. 

Deliberately trying to frighten me. 

“Don’t tip it over, Jan. Please—” I pleaded. 

She tilted it more. Made it rock so hard, I thought I’d tumble out. 

“I’m really not a good swimmer,” I repeated. “I really don’t think I—” 

She uttered a disgusted groan. Then she tossed back her hair. Raised her 
arms over her head. Bent her knees. Kicked off hard. 

And dove into the lake. 

“Noooo!” I let out a cry as the boat rocked violently. Jan’s dive sent up a 
tall, foamy wave of water. 

The canoe tilted... rocked... 

...and flipped over! 

I hit with a smack. Cold water rose up around me as I sank. 

Frozen in shock. 

I felt the canoe bounce above me on the surface. 

Then I started to choke as water invaded my nose and mouth. 

Sputtering and gagging, I thrashed my arms and legs. 

Pushed myself... pushed... pushed myself to the surface. 



And raised my head over the bobbing current. 

Still sputtering, I sucked in a deep breath of fresh air. Then another. 

Floating on the surface, I saw the canoe bobbing upside down on the water. 

I struggled to catch my breath, to slow my racing heart. 

Then I swam to the canoe. I grabbed on to it. Wrapped one arm around it. 
Held on for dear life. 

Bobbing with the canoe, I squinted into the sunlight, searching for Jan. 

“Jan? Jan?” I called to her. 

“Jan? Where are you?” 

I turned and searched in all directions. 

A feeling of cold dread tightened my chest. 

“Jan? Jan? Can you hear me?” I shouted. 



11 


I held on to the canoe with one hand and shielded my eyes with the other. “Jan? 
Jan?” I shouted her name as loudly as I could. 

And then I spotted her. 

I saw her blond hair glowing in the bright sunlight. And I saw her red 
swimsuit. Her arms moving steadily, smoothly. Her feet kicking up foamy 
waves. 

She was making her way to shore. 

She swam away and left me here, I realized. 

I turned and searched for the other canoes. Squinting against the sun, I 
could see them far ahead of me. Too far away to hear my shouts. 

Maybe I can turn the canoe over, I decided. Then I can climb in and paddle 
back to shore. 

But where were the paddles? 

I raised my eyes to the camp—and saw Jan talking to Liz. She was waving 
her arms frantically and pointing out to the water. Pointing to me. 

A crowd of kids gathered around them. I could hear excited voices. Shouts 
and cries. 

I saw Liz pull a canoe into the water. 

She’s coming to rescue me, I realized. Jan must have told her I couldn’t 
swim all the way back. 

I suddenly felt embarrassed. I knew all the kids on shore were watching me. 
I knew they were talking about what a wimp I must be. 

But I didn’t care. I just wanted to get back on dry land. 

It didn’t take Liz long to paddle out to me. When I pulled myself into the 
canoe, I started to thank her. 

But she didn’t let me get a word out. “Why did you do it, Sarah?” she 
demanded. 

“Excuse me?” I gasped. “Do what?” 

“Why did you tip the canoe over?” Liz asked. 

I opened my mouth to protest—but only a squeak came out. 

Liz frowned at me. “Jan says you deliberately tipped over the canoe. Don’t 
you know how dangerous that is, Sarah?” 



“But—but—but—!” 

“I’m calling a special camp meeting because of this,” Liz said. “Water 
safety is so important. The water safety rules must be followed at all times. 
Camp Cold Lake couldn’t exist if campers didn’t follow every rule.” 

“I wish it didn’t exist,” I muttered unhappily. 


* * * 


So Liz held a long meeting at the lodge. And everyone at camp had to be there. 

She went over the rules of water safety again. Rule by rule. 

And then she showed an endless slide show about the Buddy System. 

I sat way on the side and stared down at the floor. But every time I raised 
my eyes, I saw Briana, Meg, and Jan glaring angrily at me. 

Other campers kept staring at me too. I guess they all blamed me for this 
long, boring meeting. Jan probably told everyone in camp that I was the one who 
tipped over the canoe. 

“I want you to memorize all twenty water safety rules,” Liz was saying. 

More campers stared angrily at me. 

Everyone hates me, I thought, shaking my head sadly. And there is nothing 
I can do about it. 

Then, suddenly, I had an idea. 



12 


“I’m going to run away,” I told Aaron. 

“Good-bye,” he said calmly. “Good luck.” 

“No. Really!” I insisted. “I’m not kidding. I’m really going to run away 
from this camp.” 

“Send me a postcard,” Aaron said. 

I had dragged him away from the mess hall after dinner. I really needed to 
talk to him. I pulled him to the edge of the lake. 

No one else was down here. Everyone was still at the mess hall in the 
lodge. 

I glanced at the canoes, stacked in piles of three near the water. I pictured 
Jan’s blond hair, her red swimsuit. I pictured her swimming away, leaving me in 
the middle of the lake. 

And then lying to Liz. Getting me in trouble.... 

I shook Aaron by the shoulders. “Why won’t you take me seriously?” I 
cried through clenched teeth. 

He laughed. 

“You shouldn’t shake a person after they’ve just eaten the camp meat loaf.” 
He let out a loud burp. 

“You’re so gross.” I groaned. 

He grinned. “It’s a family tradition.” 

“Stop joking around. I mean it,” I snapped. “I’m really unhappy, Aaron. I 
hate this camp. There is no phone here we can use. I can’t call Mom and Dad. So 
I’m going to run away.” 

His expression changed. He saw that I was serious. 

He skipped a flat stone across the water. I watched the ripples spread out, 
then disappear. 

The lake reflected the gray evening sky. Everything was gray. The ground, 
the sky, the water. Reflections of trees shimmered darkly in the gray water. 

“Where are you going to run?” Aaron asked softly. I could see him quickly 
becoming the mature, “wiser” brother again. But I didn’t care. 

I had to tell him my plan. I couldn’t leave camp without letting him know. 

“Through the woods,” I said. I pointed. “There is a town on the other side 



of the woods. When I get to the town, I’m going to call Mom and Dad and tell 
them to come get me.” 

“You can’t!” Aaron protested. 

I stuck my chin out. “Why not?” 

“We’re not allowed in the woods,” he replied. “Richard said the woods 
were dangerous—remember?” 

I shoved Aaron again. I was so tense, so angry, I didn’t know what to do 
with my hands. 

“I don’t care what Richard said!” I bellowed. “I’m running away— 
remember?” 

“Give the camp a chance, Sarah,” Aaron urged. “We haven’t even been here 
a whole week. Give the place a chance.” 

That’s when I totally lost it. 

“I hate it when you’re so sensible!” I screamed. 

I shoved him hard. With both hands. 

His mouth flew open. He lost his balance—and toppled into the lake. 

He landed on his back in the wet mud just past the shore. 

“Ooof!” I heard the air shoot out of him. 

“Sorry—” I started. “It was an accident, Aaron. I—” 

He scrambled to his feet, pulling up greasy gunk and seaweed with him. 
Shaking his fists. Calling me all kinds of names. 

I sighed. Now even my brother was furious at me. 

What am I going to do? I asked myself. What can I do? 

As I trudged back to the cabin, another plan began to form in my mind. 

A really desperate plan. 

A really dangerous plan. 

“Tomorrow,” I murmured to myself, “I’m going to show them all!” 



13 


I thought about my plan all the next morning. I was frightened—but I knew I had 
to go through with it. 

Our group had Free Swim that afternoon. Of course, everyone had a buddy 
but me. 

I dug my bare feet into the muddy shore and watched everyone pair up and 
head into the water. Puffy white clouds floated overhead, reflected in the nearly 
still water. 

Tiny gnats jumped over the surface of the water. I stared at them, 
wondering why they didn’t get wet. 

“Sarah, it’s swim time,” Liz called. She hurried over to me. She wore a pink 
one-piece bathing suit under crisp white tennis shorts. 

I adjusted my swimsuit top. My hands were trembling. 

I really was scared by what I planned to do. 

“Why aren’t you swimming?” Liz demanded. She brushed a fly off my 
shoulder. 

“I—I don’t have a buddy,” I stammered. 

She glanced around, trying to find someone for me. But everyone was in 
the lake. 

“Well...” Liz twisted her mouth fretfully. “Go ahead and swim by yourself. 
Stay close to the shore. And I’ll keep an eye on you.” 

“Great. Thanks,” I said. I smiled at her, then trotted enthusiastically to the 
edge of the water. 

I didn’t want her to guess that it wasn’t going to be a normal swim for me. 
That I had something really terrible in mind.... 

I stepped into the water. 

Oooh. So cold. 

A cloud rolled over the sun. The sky darkened, and the air grew colder. 

My feet sank into the muddy bottom of the lake. Up ahead, I saw the gnats 
—hundreds of them—hopping on the water. 

Yuck, I thought. Why do I have to swim with mud and gnats? 

I took a deep breath and stepped out farther. When the cold water was 
nearly up to my waist, I lowered my body in and started to swim. 



I swam a few long laps. I needed to get used to the water. And I needed to 
get my breathing steady. 

A short distance away, Briana and some other girls were having some kind 
of relay race. They were laughing and cheering. Having a great time. 

They won’t be laughing in a few minutes. I told myself bitterly. 

A tall spray of water rushed over me. I cried out. 

Another wave smacked my face. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that I was being splashed—by Aaron. 

He rose up in front of me—and spit a stream of water into my face. 

“Yuck! How can you put this water in your mouth?” I cried, totally grossed 
out. 

He laughed and splashed away to join his buddy. 

He won’t be laughing in a few minutes, either, I told myself. He’ll treat me 
differently after today. 

Everyone will. 

I suddenly felt guilty. I should have told Aaron what I planned to do. I 
didn’t really want to scare him. I wanted to scare everyone else. 

But I knew if I told my plan to practical, sensible Aaron, he would talk me 
out of it. Or go tell Liz so that she would stop me. 

Well... no one is going to stop me, I vowed. 

Have you guessed my desperate plan? 

It was really quite simple. 

I planned to drown myself. 

Well... not really. 

I planned to dive down to the lake bottom. Stay under. A long, long time. 
And make everyone think that I had drowned. 

I can hold my breath for a very long time. It’s because I play the flute. I’ve 
really developed my lung power. 

I can probably stay underwater for two or three minutes. 

Long enough to scare everyone to death. 

Everyone will panic. Even Briana, Meg, and Jan. 

Everyone will feel sorry for how mean they were to me. 

I’ll get a new start. After my close call in the lake, everyone in camp will 
want to be nice to me. 

Everyone will want to be my buddy. 

So... here goes. 



I took one last look at all the laughing, shouting swimmers. 
Then I sucked in the biggest breath I had ever taken. 

And plunged down, down to the bottom of the lake. 



14 


The lake was shallow for only a few feet. Then the lake bottom gave way in a 
steep drop. 

I kicked hard, pushing myself away from the other swimmers. Then I pulled 
myself upright, lowering my feet. 

Yes. 

I dropped my hands to my sides and let myself sink. 

Down, down. 

I opened my eyes as I dropped to the lake bottom. I saw only green. Waves 
of pale light shimmered through the green. 

I’m floating inside an emerald, I thought. Floating down, down in a 
sparkling green jewel. 

I pictured the tiny emerald on the ring Mom wore every day. Her 
engagement ring. I thought about Mom and Dad, thought how sad they’d be if I 
really did drown. 

We never should have sent Sarah to that water sports camp, they would say. 

My feet hit the soft lake floor. 

A bubble of air escaped my mouth. I pressed my lips tighter, holding the air 
inside. 

I slowly floated up toward the surface. 

I closed my eyes. I kept my whole body still to make it look as if I’d 
drowned. 

I pictured the horror on Liz’s face when she saw my body floating so still, 
floating under the water, my hair bobbing on the surface. 

I almost laughed when I thought of Liz leaping into the lake to rescue me, 
having to get her crisp white tennis shorts wet, I forced myself to remain still. 

I shut my eyes even tighter. And thought about Briana, Meg, and Jan. 

They’ll feel so guilty They’ll never forgive themselves for the way they 
treated me. 

After my close call, they’ll see how mean they were. And they’ll want to be 
best friends with me. 

We’ll all be best friends. 

And we’ll have a great summer together. 



My chest began to feel tight. The back of my throat began to burn. 

I opened my lips and let out a few more bubbles of air. 

But my throat still burned, and so did my chest. 

I floated facedown. I kept my legs stiff and let my arms hang loosely at my 
sides. 

I listened for shouts of alarm. 

Someone must have spotted me by now. 

I listened for cries of help. For kids calling Liz. 

But I heard only silence. The heavy silence you hear when you’re 
underwater. 

I let out another bubble of air. 

My chest really hurt now. It felt about to explode. 

I opened my eyes. Was anyone nearby? Was anyone coming to rescue me? 

I saw only green. 

Where is everyone? I wondered. 

Liz must have spotted me by now. Why isn’t she pulling me up out of the 
water? 

I pictured her again in her white tennis shorts. I pictured her tanned arms 
and legs. I pictured her red hair. 

Liz—where are you? 

Liz—don’t you see me drowning here? You said you’d keep an eye on me, 
remember? 

I can’t stay under much longer. 

My chest is ready to explode. My whole body is tingling. Burning. My head 
feels about to pop open. 

Can’t anyone see me here ? 

A wave of dizziness swept over me. 

I shut my eyes, but the dizziness didn’t go away. 

I pushed out the rest of the air in my lungs. 

No air, I thought. No air left.... 

My arms and legs ached. 

My chest burned. 

With my eyes closed, I saw bright yellow spots. 

Dancing yellow lights. They grew brighter... brighter. They did a fast, 
furious dance all around me. 



Around my burning, tingling body. 

My chest... exploding... exploding... 

I’m so cold, I realized. Suddenly, I feel so cold. 

The dancing, darting yellow lights grew brighter. Bright as spotlights. 
Bright as flashbulbs, flashing in my eyes. 

Flashing around my still, cold body. 

I shuddered from the cold. 

Shuddered again. 

Cold, thick water filled my mouth. 

I’ve stayed under too long, I realized. 

No one is coming. No one is coming to save me. 

Too long... too long. 

I struggled to see. But the lights were too bright. 

Can’t see. Can’t see. 

I swallowed another mouthful of water. 

Can’t see. Can’t breathe. 

I can’t stay under any longer. I can’t wait any longer. 

I struggled to raise my head out of the water. But it felt so heavy. It weighed 
a ton. 

Can’t stay down... 

Can’t breathe. 

With a burst of strength, I moved my shoulders. Pulled them up. 

Hoisted up my head. 

So heavy... so heavy. My hair filled with water. My hair so heavy. The 
water running down my face. 

Over my eyes. 

I turned to shore. Squinted through the bright, darting lights. 

Squinted hard through the water running down my face. 

Squinted... 

No one there. 

I turned again. My eyes searched the water. 

No one there. No one swimming. No one on the shore. 

Where is everyone ? I wondered. Shivering. Shuddering. 

Where did everyone go? 



15 


I struggled to shore. 

My feet were numb. I couldn’t feel the muddy bottom as I staggered out of 
the water. 

I rubbed my arms. I couldn’t feel the touch of my hands. Couldn’t feel the 
water pouring off me, running down my back. 

Couldn’t feel anything. Numb. Numb all over. 

“Where is everyone?” I called. 

But did I make a sound? Did I have a voice? 

I couldn’t hear myself. 

I stepped onto the grass and shook myself. Like a dog trying to get dry. 
Trying to shake some feeling into my cold, numb body. 

“Where did you all go?” 

Hugging myself, I stumbled forward. I stopped when I saw the canoes. All 
tacked upside down by the shore and tied up. 

Weren’t kids canoeing today? Weren’t the canoes all out in the lake? 

“Hey!” I shouted. 

But why couldn’t I hear my shout? 

“Where is everyone?” 

No one on the shore. 

I spun around, nearly losing my balance. No one in the water. 

No one. No one anywhere. 

I stumbled past the life preservers and rubber rafts. Covered with a canvas 

tarp. 

Isn’t anyone going to use them? I wondered. Why are they covered up? 

Why did everyone leave the lake so quickly? 

Shivering, hugging myself, I made my way toward the lodge. I gasped 
when I noticed the trees. 

Bare. All winter bare. 

“Noooooooo!” a frightened wail escaped my throat. A silent wail. 

Could anyone hear me? 

When had the leaves fallen? Why had they fallen in the middle of summer? 



I started to trot along the path to the lodge. Cold. So cold. 

Something stung my shoulder. Something tingled my eyelids. 

Snow? 

Yes. Tiny white flakes drifted down, blown by a steady breeze. The bare 
trees rattled and creaked. 

I brushed snowflakes from my wet hair. 

Snow? 

But I knew that was impossible. 

All impossible. 

“Heeeeeeey!” My shout echoed through the trees. Or did it? 

Could anyone hear my frightened call? 

“Hellllllllllp!” I shouted. “Somebody hellllllp me!” 

Silence, except for the creaking tree limbs overhead. 

I started to run again. My bare feet moved silently over the cold ground. 

The cabins came into view as I made my way out of the trees. Their flat 
roofs were covered by a thin layer of snow. 

The ground was as gray as the sky. The cabins were all dark, the shingled 
walls gray. Gray all around me. 

A cold world of gray. 

I pushed open the door of the first cabin I came to. “Hey—I need help!” I 
cried. 

I stared into the empty room. 

No one there. No camp trunks. No clothes scattered about. 

I raised my eyes to the bunk beds against the wall. The blankets, the sheets 
—the mattresses—had all been taken away. 

I guess this cabin isn’t being used, I thought. 

I backed out of the door. Turned and ran down the row of cabins. All dark 
and silent. 

My cabin stood where the path curved up the hill. With a sigh of relief, I ran 
up to it and pushed open the door. 

“Briana? Meg?” 

Empty. And dark. 

The mattresses gone. The posters pulled down. No clothes. No bags or 
trunks. 

No sign that anyone had ever lived in here. 

“Where are you?” I shrieked. 



And then, “Where am I?” 

Where was my stuff? Where was my bed? 

Uttering another terrified wail, I lurched out of the cabin. 

Cold. So cold and numb. Running through the cold in my wet bathing suit. 

I tore through the camp. Pulling open doors. Peering into bare, empty 
rooms. Calling. Calling for someone—anyone—to help me. 

Into the main lodge. My cries echoing off the high, wooden rafters. 

Or did they? Was I really making a sound? 

Why couldn’t I hear myself? 

I burst into the mess hall. The long, wooden benches had been stacked on 
top of the tables. The kitchen stood dark and empty. 

What has happened? I wondered, unable to stop my trembling. 

Where did everyone go? Why did they all leave? How did they leave so 
quickly? How can it be snowing? 

I stumbled back out into the gray cold. Wisps of gray fog floated low over 
the gray ground. I hugged my frozen body, trying to warm myself. 

Terrified and confused, I wandered from building to building. I felt as if I 
were swimming again. Swimming in the thick gray mists. Swimming through 
endless layers of gray. 

And then I stopped when I heard a voice. 

A tiny voice. A girl’s voice. 

Singing. 

She was singing in a high, frail voice. 

“I’m not alone!” I cried. 

I listened to her song. A sad song sung so softly. 

And then I called out to her, “Where are you? I can’t see you! Where are 
you?” 



16 


I followed the tiny voice to the lodge. I saw a girl perched on the wooden steps. 

“Hey!” I called. “Hey! I was looking for someone! Can you help me?” 

She kept singing, as if she didn’t see me. As I walked closer, I realized she 
was singing the Camp Cold Lake song in her tiny, light voice. 

She had long curls of white-blond hair that flowed down the sides of her 
face. A pretty face, delicate and pale. So incredibly pale. 

She wore a sleeveless white T-shirt and white short shorts. Snowflakes fell 
all around us. I shivered. But she didn’t seem to notice the cold. 

She tilted her head from side to side as she sang. Her round blue eyes stared 
out at the sky. They reminded me of shiny blue marbles in her pale, pale face. 

I stepped up in front of her. I brushed snowflakes from my forehead. 

She didn’t turn to me until her song was finished. Then she smiled. “Hi, 
Sarah.” Her speaking voice was as soft as her singing. 

“How—how do you know my name?” I stammered. 

Her smile grew wider. “I’ve been waiting for you,” she replied. “My name 
is Della.” 

“Della—I’m so cold,” I blurted out. 

She rose to her feet. Turned. And pulled something out from behind the 
steps. 

A white bathrobe. 

She held it up and slipped it around my trembling shoulders. 

Her hands were so light. I could barely feel them. 

She helped me tie the belt. Then she stepped back and smiled at me again. 
“I’ve been waiting for you, Sarah,” she said. Her voice was a sigh, a whisper. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “Waiting—?” 

She nodded. Her white-blond hair fluttered with every move of her head. “I 
can’t leave without you, Sarah. I need a buddy.” 

I stared at her, trying to understand. 

“Where is everyone?” I cried. “Where did everyone go? Why are you the 
only one here?” I bmshed snowflakes from my eyebrows. “Della, how did it get 
to be winter?” 



“You’ll be my buddy—won’t you, Sarah?” Her blue eyes burned into mine. 
Her hair glowed around her pale face. 

I blinked. “I don’t understand—” I started. “Please answer my questions.” 
“You’ll be my buddy, won’t you?” she repeated, pleading with those 
amazing eyes. “I’ve waited so long for a buddy, Sarah. So long.” 

“But, Della—” 

She started to sing again. 

I shoved my hands into the pockets of the robe. I shivered. I couldn’t get 
warm. I couldn’t stop shaking. 

Why was she singing the Camp Cold Lake song so sadly? 

Why wouldn’t she answer my questions? 

How did she know my name? And why did she say she’d been waiting for 

me? 

“Della, please—” I begged. 

Singing her strange, sad song, she floated up the wooden stairs to the lodge. 
Her hair shimmered, golden in the gray light. Swirls of fog curled around her as 
she moved. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I realized I could see right through her. 

“Della—?” 

She floated over the stairs, tilting her head from side to side, singing in that 
breathy whisper of a voice. 

“Della—?” 

She stopped singing and smiled at me again. Snowflakes covered her blond 
hair. The fog still swirled around her. 

I could see the dark shingles of the lodge through her body. I stared right 
through her. 

“Sarah, you’re my buddy now,” she whispered. “I need a buddy. Everyone 
at Camp Cold Lake needs a buddy.” 

“But—but you ’re dead\” I blurted out. 

Della is dead, I realized. 

And I’m her buddy. 

That means... 

That means that I’m dead tool 



17 


Della floated over me. So light and pale. The wind fluttered her hair. It rose 
around her like a shimmering halo. 

“You’re dead,” I murmured. “And I am too.” 

Saying the words sent a cold shudder down my body. 

I began to realize the truth. I began to see what had happened. 

Della had probably drowned here. Drowned in the lake. 

That is why everyone at the camp is so crazy about water safety. 

That explains the endless water safety lectures. And the long list of rules. 
And why the counselors insist on the Buddy System at ah times. 

Della drowned here. 

And now I’m her buddy. 

I’m her buddy—because I drowned too. 

“Noooooooooo!” Along wail of horror, of disbelief, escaped my throat. 

I threw my head back and wailed like an animal. Wailed out my sorrow. 

Della floated over me, watching me. Waiting for me to stop. She knew what 
I was thinking. She knew I had figured everything out. 

She waited patiently. How long had she been waiting there for me? Waiting 
for a buddy? Another dead buddy? 

How long had she been waiting for another unlucky girl to drown? 

“Noooo!” I moaned. “No, I won’t do it, Della! I can’t do it! I won’t be your 
buddy! I won’t!” 

I spun around. So dizzy, I nearly dropped to my knees. 

I started to run. The white robe flew open. It flapped beside me like wings 
as I ran away from her. 

Ran barefoot over the snowy ground. 

Ran through the swirls of fog. Through the gray. 

“Come back, Sarah!” I heard Della call to me. “Come back! You have to be 
my buddy! I’m trapped here. Trapped as a ghost. I can’t leave this camp—I can’t 
get to the other world—without a buddy!” 

But I didn’t stop. I kept running through the camp. Past the cabins. Past the 
supply sheds at the edge of the woods. 



I kept running from her calls. Running from her ghostly voice. 

I don’t want to be her buddy, I told myself. I don’t want to be a ghost ! 

I blinked away snowflakes as I ran. Ran through the bare, creaking trees. 
Ran without looking back. 

I stopped when I reached the lake shore. Stopped when I felt the cold water 
lap over my feet. 

The cold, gray water. 

I struggled to catch my breath. But my chest hurt. Felt about to explode. 
Gasping, I turned—and saw Della floating through the trees. Floating 
toward me, her eyes glowing with blue fire. 

“You can’t leave without me, Sarah!” she called. “You can’t leave, Sarah!” 

I turned away from her. Turned back to the water. 

My chest. My head. 

Everything hurt so much. 

I couldn’t breathe. 

My chest was going to burst. 

I sank to the mud. 

As the gray faded to black. 



18 


Pinpricks of white light danced above me. 

I thought of fireflies, darting above the grass late at night. 

The tiny lights grew brighter. Round, like flashlight beams. 

Brighter still. 

Until I was staring into a glowing ball of gold. 

I blinked. 

It took me a long while to realize that I was staring up at the sun. 

I turned my head away. 

I suddenly felt heavy. I could feel the ground beneath me. I could feel the 
weight of my body on the ground. 

My body. My solid body, coming back to me. 

I heard a groan. Someone moved above me. 

I blinked several times. And squinted up at Liz. 

Her face was red. Her mouth was twisted in a hard scowl. 

“Ohhh.” I groaned as she pressed both hands on my chest. Raised her 
hands. Pressed again. 

I felt water slide from my open mouth. 

I choked. Felt more water pour down my chin. 

“She’s coming around,” Liz announced. She pressed hard on my chest 
again. “She’s alive!” Liz cried. 

Behind her, I could see bare legs. Swimsuits. Campers. 

Yes. The other campers. 

I groaned again. Liz continued to work over me. 

I’m lying on my back, I realized. I’m on the lake shore. Liz is giving me 
CPR. 

The other campers are standing around me. Watching. Watching Liz save 
my life. 

“I’m—ALIVE!” The word burst from my throat. 

I sat up. And gazed around. 

Everyone is back! I realized. It’s summer again. The leaves are back on the 
trees. The sun is beaming down. 



And everyone is back. Including me! 

Liz uttered a sigh and sank back on her knees. “Sarah, are you okay?” she 
asked breathlessly. She mopped sweat from her forehead with the back of her 
hand. “Are you okay?” 

“I... I think so,” I murmured. 

I had a sour taste in my mouth. I still felt a little dizzy. 

Behind Liz, some campers cheered and applauded. 

“We thought you were gone for a moment.” Liz sighed. “You stopped 
breathing. What a scare!” 

Two counselors helped me to my feet. I tried to shake off my dizziness. 
“I’m okay!” I cried. “Thank you, Liz. You—you saved my life!” 

I hugged Liz. Then I turned and hugged Aaron. 

Briana and Meg were standing nearby. I startled them by hugging them too. 

I was so happy to be alive! So happy to be away from that gray, gray winter. 
Away from that frightening ghost girl in the empty camp. 

“Sarah—what happened?” Liz asked, placing a hand on my still-wet 
shoulder. She gently brushed back my hair. 

“I’m not sure,” I told her. “I’m really not sure.” 

Liz shuddered. “When you stopped breathing, I... I got so scared.” 

“I’m fine now,” I told her with a smile. “Thanks to you.” 

“She did it for attention,” I heard someone mutter. 

I turned—and saw Jan whispering to another girl. “Now everyone has to 
say ‘Poor Sarah’,” Jan whispered nastily. “Now everyone has to be nice to her.” 

I felt hurt. I opened my mouth to say something to Jan. 

But I was so happy to be back, so happy to be alive, I just ignored it. 

I rested a hand on Aaron’s shoulder and let him walk me back to my cabin. 
“I’m going to enjoy the rest of camp,” I told my brother. “I really am.” 

The nurse checked me out carefully. Then I rested all afternoon. I took a long 
nap. 

When I woke up, I was starving. I realized I hadn’t eaten all day. 

I pulled on jeans and a camp sweatshirt and hurried to the campfire. As I 
trotted down the path toward the clearing by the woods, the aroma of hot dogs 
and hamburgers on the barbecue drifted out to me. 

Richard greeted me at the campfire circle. “Sarah, you look great!” he 
exclaimed. “I heard about... what happened at the lake this afternoon.” 



“Well, I’m fine now,” I told him. “I feel great.” 

“Hey—no more close calls,” he scolded. “Or else you have to swim in the 
kiddie pool.” 

“I’ll be careful,” I promised. 

“You’d better—because we don’t have a kiddie pool!” he joked. 

I laughed. 

“Take a seat,” he said, pointing to the circle of logs. “Take a seat, 
everyone!” he called out. “We’re going to have a meeting before we eat!” 

Most of the campers had already taken their places. I glanced around the 
circle quickly, searching for a place to sit. 

“Sarah—?” A voice called to me. 

“Sarah—over here.” 

I let out a shocked cry when I saw Della. 

Della. By herself on a log back near the woods. Her blond hair shimmering 
around her pale face. The pink evening sunlight shining through her body. 

Shining right through her. 

“Noooo!” I moaned. 

“Come over here, Sarah!” Della called. “Please—sit over here with me. Be 
my buddy!” 



19 


I raised my hands to my cheeks and let out a shrill scream. 

“No! You’re not here!” I wailed. “You’re a ghost! You don’t belong here! 
I’m alive now! I’m alive!” 

I turned and saw Richard and Liz hurrying toward me. 

Across the circle, Aaron jumped up and came running over. “Sarah—what’s 
wrong? What is it?” he cried. 

“Don’t you see her?” I shrieked. I pointed to the log near the woods. “She’s 
a ghost! But I’m alive!” 

Liz wrapped her arms around me. “It’s okay, Sarah,” she whispered. 
“You’re okay now.” 

“But—but she’s sitting there!” I sputtered. 

Everyone turned to the log. 

“There’s no one there,” Richard said. He narrowed his eyes at me. 

“You had a terrible shock,” Liz said softly. “A terrible shock. You’re still 
not quite yourself, Sarah.” 

“But—but—” I stammered. 

I saw Briana, Meg, and Jan huddled together, talking softly. Watching me. 

What are they saying about me? I wondered. 

“Do you want me to walk you back to your cabin?” Richard asked. 

I shook my head. “No. I’m starving!” 

Liz laughed. “Maybe that’s your problem. You’re so hungry, you’re seeing 
things! Let’s get you a hot dog—fast.” 

After a couple of hot dogs, I started to feel better. The campfire meeting 
began. I sat next to some girls from a different cabin. 

As Richard talked, I gazed around the circle. Stared at the campers’ faces, 
orange from the flickering campfire. Searching for Della. 

Della the ghost... 

Was she still here? Still watching me? Still waiting for me to be her buddy? 

I sat forward tensely. My whole body stiff. My eyes straining to see her 
pale, pale face. 

But she had vanished. 



For now. 

Liz took over the meeting. Most campers groaned when she started another 
lecture on water safety. 

“We had a close call today,” Liz said. “A frightening close call.” 

I knew everyone was staring at me. I could feel my face growing hot. I 
gazed into the yellow flames of the campfire. 

When I raised my eyes, I saw Briana, Meg, and Jan on the next log, 
whispering together. About me? 

“Our water safety rules are so important here at Camp Cold Lake,” Liz was 
saying. “Some campers joke that having so many rules is the curse of Camp 
Cold Lake, because we talk about the rules so much.” 

She pressed her hands against her sides. Her eyes moved from camper to 
camper. “But as we saw this afternoon,” she continued, “the Buddy System isn’t 
a curse—it’s a blessing.” 

A face rose up behind the darting flames of the fire. 

I gasped. 

Della! 

No. A girl from another cabin, climbing up to get more food. 

I sank back. 

I have to get away from this camp, I decided. I can’t have a good time here. 
Not if I always have to keep an eye out for Della. 

Liz rattled on about the water rules. 

Richard made a few announcements. 

Everyone sang some camp songs. 

When the campfire ended, I jumped up quickly and started along the path to 
my cabin. I had gone only a few steps when I heard fast footsteps behind me. 
And heard someone calling my name. 

Was it the ghost? 

I turned to see Aaron jogging up to me. “What was that screaming about?” 
he demanded. “Did you really think you saw a ghost?” 

“Why should I tell you?” I snapped. I continued along the path, walking 
rapidly. “You’ll only laugh at me.” 

“Try me,” he replied, running to catch up. “I won’t laugh. I promise.” 

“I saw a ghost girl,” I told him. “I swear I did. She called to me. She wants 
me to be her buddy.” 

Aaron laughed. “No. Really,” he said. “What did you really see? Be 



serious.” 

“I am serious!” I cried. “I have to get away from here, Aaron. I’m going to 
mn away. Get to a phone. Call Mom and Dad. Tonight. I’m going to tell them to 
come get me.” 

“You can’t!” Aaron replied. He grabbed my arm and forced me to stop 
walking. I could see kids staring at us as they walked past. 

“Mom and Dad won’t want to make more than one trip up here. So if you 
call them, they’ll make me come home too,” Aaron protested. “And I don’t want 
to leave. I’m having a great time!” 

“You don’t understand,” I told him. “I can’t stay here. I can’t—” 

“Please, Sarah,” he begged. “Try to stick it out. Give it a little more time. 
You’re just a little messed up because of the lake this afternoon. But you’ll be 
okay. Give it some time.” 

I didn’t say yes, and I didn’t say no. 

I just told Aaron good-night and headed to my cabin. 

I stopped outside the door. All the lights were on. I heard Briana, Meg, and 
Jan talking softly. 

They stopped talking as soon as I stepped inside. 

All three of them stared hard at me. Their expressions were tense. They 
moved quickly. 

Moved toward me as I started across the room. 

They formed a circle around me. Surrounded me. 

“What is it?” I cried. “What are you going to do?” 



20 


“We want to apologize,” Briana said. 

“We’ve been kind of rough on you,” Jan added in her scratchy voice. 
“We’re really sorry.” 

“We’ve been talking about it,” Briana said. “We—” 

“We decided we’ve been really unfair,” Meg interrupted. “We’re sorry, 
Sarah.” 

“I—I’m sorry too,” I stammered. I was so stunned by their apologies, I 
could barely speak. 

“Let’s start all over,” Briana suggested. She grabbed my hand. “Nice to 
meet you, Sarah. My name is Briana.” 

“Excellent. Afresh start!” Jan declared. 

“Thanks. I’m really glad,” I told them. And I meant it. 

Jan turned to Briana. “When did you do that to your nails?” 

Briana grinned and raised both hands. Her fingernails were a shiny, bright 
purple. “It’s a new color,” she said. “I did it after our swim.” 

“What color is it?” Meg asked. 

“Grape Juice, I think,” Briana replied. “They all have such crazy names.” 
She dug the bottle of nail polish from her pack and held it out to me. “Want to 
try it?” 

“Well... sure,” I replied. 

All four of us stayed up far past Lights Out, making our fingernails purple. 

Later, I lay in my bunk, drifting off to sleep. I had a smile on my face, 
thinking about my three bunk mates. My three friends. 

They had really cheered me up. 

But my smile faded when I heard a whispered voice float across the dark 
cabin. “Sarah... Sarah...” 

I gasped. 

And then the frail voice—soft as the wind—was so close... so close to my 

“Sarah. I thought you were my buddy, Sarah. Why did you leave me?” 

“No—please—” I begged. 


ear. 



“Sarah, I waited so long for you,” the ghostly voice whispered. “Come with 
me. Come with me, Sarah....” 

And then an icy hand gripped my shoulder. 



21 


“Ohhhhh!” 

I bolted up in the bunk. And stared out at Briana’s dark eyes. 

She let go of my shoulder. “Sarah,” she whispered. “You were whimpering 
in your sleep.” 

“Huh? What?” My voice quivered. My heart pounded. I realized I was 
drenched in sweat. 

“You were whimpering in your sleep,” Briana repeated. “Crying and 
moaning. I thought I’d better wake you.” 

“Uh... thanks,” I choked out. “Must have been a bad dream, I guess.” 

Briana nodded and crept back to her bunk. 

I didn’t move. I sat there trembling, staring out across the dark cabin. 

A bad dream? 

I didn’t think so.... 

“You can skip the long-distance swim today if you want,” Liz told me at 
breakfast the next morning. She leaned over my chair as I downed my 
cornflakes. I could smell the toothpaste on her breath. 

“Well...” I hesitated. “How long is the swim?” 

“We’re swimming halfway across the lake,” Liz replied. “Halfway out, then 
back. I’ll be in a boat at the halfway point. It isn’t really that far. But if you feel 
like skipping it today...” 

I set down my spoon. I could see Meg and Briana watching me from across 
the table. Beside me, Jan was struggling to choke down a half-toasted, frozen 
waffle. 

“Come on. Swim with us,” Briana urged. 

“I’ll be your buddy,” Jan said. “I’ll swim with you, Sarah.” 

Our frightening canoe adventure flashed into my mind. Once again, I 
pictured that horrible moment when Jan jumped from the canoe. Tipping it over. 
Leaving me there. 

But things were different now. 

We were friends. All four of us were friends now. I had to forget about what 
happened with the canoe. I had to forget about our bad start. 



“Okay,” I agreed. “Thanks, Jan. I’ll be your buddy.” I turned back to Liz. 
“I’m ready to swim.” 

The morning sun still floated low in the sky. It kept fading behind broad, gray 
clouds. And each time the sun disappeared, the air became as cold as the water. 

The lake was so cold in the early morning! 

As I waded in, I suddenly realized why it was named “Cold Lake”. 

We all stepped carefully into the water, shivering and complaining. The 
water lapped over my ankles, stinging them. I stopped with a gasp and waited to 
get used to the cold. 

I raised my eyes at the sound of a motorboat and saw Liz chugging to her 
place in the middle of the lake. When she reached the spot, she cut the engine. 
Then she picked up an electric megaphone. 

“Warm up first, everyone!” she instructed us. 

We all laughed. “Warm up? How are we supposed to warm up? It’s 
freezing!” 

Two girls near the shore began splashing each other. 

“Stop it! Whoooa! It’s collldV’ one of them shrieked. 

Taking another few steps over the soft lake bottom, I adjusted the top of my 
blue swimsuit. “We need wet suits,” I told Jan. 

She nodded, then waded out until the water lapped at her waist. “Come on, 
Sarah. Stick together.” She motioned for me to follow. 

I took a deep breath—and plunged into the water. 

A shock of cold swept over my body. But I dove under the water and swam 
out a few strokes. Then I raised my head and turned back to Jan. 

“Show off,” she muttered. She dipped her hands in the water, still 
struggling to get used to the cold. 

I laughed. “It’s refreshing!” I exclaimed, brushing my wet hair back. “Come 
on—just push off. It isn’t that bad.” 

Jan lowered herself into the water. Most of the swimmers were in the water 
now, moving in circles, floating on their backs, treading water. 

“Line up, everyone!” Liz instructed from her boat. Her voice through the 
megaphone echoed off the trees behind us. “Line up. Two at a time. Let’s go!” 

It took a while for everyone to get in place. Jan and I were second in line. 

I watched the first two girls begin to swim. One of them moved with 
smooth, steady strokes. The other one splashed and thrashed. 



Everyone cheered them on. 

Jan and I gave them about a two-minute head start. Then we began to swim. 

I tried to copy the first girl’s rhythmic stroke. I didn’t want to look like a 
klutz. I knew all the other swimmers were watching. But let’s get real. I’m not 
exactly headed for the Olympics. 

Jan pulled ahead easily. As we swam, she kept turning back to make sure I 
was keeping up with her. 

The turnaround spot was just past Liz’s motor-boat. I kept my eyes on it as I 
followed Jan through the water. It seemed very far away! 

Jan picked up speed. My arms started aching about halfway to the boat. 

I’m in bad shape, I told myself. I’ve really got to start working out or 
something. 

Liz’s boat bobbed gently up ahead of us. Liz was shouting something into 
the megaphone. But the splash of the water kept me from making out the words. 

Up ahead of me, Jan picked up the pace. 

“Hey—slow down!” I called. But there was no way she could hear me. 

Ignoring the aching in my arms, I struggled to catch up to her. I kicked my 
legs harder, splashing up water behind me. 

The sun dipped once again behind a high cloud. The sky darkened, and the 
water seemed to chill. 

Liz’s boat rocked in the water, just up ahead. I kept my eyes on Jan. 
Watched her steady kicks. Her hair bobbing on the lake surface like some kind of 
sea creature. 

When Jan turns back, I’ll turn back, I decided. 

I swam a little faster. Let’s turn, I pleaded silently. Jan, we’re here. We’re 
even with Liz’s motorboat. I’m ready to turn back now. 

But to my surprise, Jan kept stroking, kept swimming straight ahead. Her 
head ducked under the water. Her arms moved easily, gracefully, pulling her 
farther ahead of me. 

“Jan—?” 

My arms ached. My chest started to burn. 

“Hey, Jan—can we turn now?” 

She swam steadily ahead. 

With a burst of energy, I pulled myself forward. “Jan, wait—” I called. 
“We’re supposed to head back!” 

She stopped stroking. 



Did she hear me? 

Breathing hard, my chest burning, I swam up to her. 

She turned to face me. 

“Jan—■?” I gasped. 

No. Not Jan. 

It wasn’t Jan. It was Della! 

Her blue eyes sparkled as a gleeful smile spread over her pale, pale face. 
“Keep swimming, Sarah,” she whispered. “We’re going to swim farther. 
And farther. You’re my buddy now.” 



22 


She grabbed my arm. 

I tried to tug away. My wet arm slid in her grasp. 

But her grip tightened around my wrist. And she held on. Pulling me. 
Pulling me with her. 

“Owww!” 

She was strong. So strong for such a frail-looking girl. 

Such a frail-looking ghost ... 

“Let go!” I shrieked. 

I struggled, slapping the water. Kicking. Squirming and twisting. 

“Della—I won’t come with you!” 

I jerked my body around, spun hard—and broke free. 

And dropped beneath the surface. Lifting both arms, I rose up, coughing 
and sputtering. 

Where was she? 

Where? 

Was she right behind me? Ready to pull me with her, pull me out so far I 
couldn’t swim back? 

I spun away. The water rocked and tilted. 

The clouds overhead appeared to roar past. 

“Sarah... Sarah...?” Was she calling to me? 

Why couldn’t I see her now? 

I turned again. My eyes stopped on the boat. 

Yes. The boat. 

Ignoring my racing heartbeats, my aching arms, I plunged forward. 

The boat... got to reach the boat before she grabs me again. 

Swimming furiously, kicking with my last bit of strength, I dove for the 
boat. Stretching my arms out... stretching... 

And grabbed the side with both hands. Choking and gasping. 

Grabbed the side of the boat and tried to pull myself in. 

“Liz—help me.” The words escaped my throat in a hoarse whisper. 

“Liz—help me in.” 



The sun burst out from behind the clouds. I stared up into blinding golden 

light. 

“Liz—please...” 

Hands reached down for me. She bent to pull me into the motorboat. 

Leaned forward. Pulling me up. 

Blinking against the bright sunlight, I raised my eyes to her face. 

No! 

Not Liz’s face. Not Liz! 

Della! 

Della—pulling me into the boat. “What’s wrong, Sarah?” she whispered. 
Pulling me. Pulling me up to her. “Sarah, you’re okay. You’re perfectly okay.” 



23 


“Let go!” I wailed. 

I tore myself from her grip. 

And tried to blink away the sun. 

And stared up at Liz. 

Not Della. Liz. Her face twisted in concern. 

“Sarah, you’re okay,” she repeated. 

“But—” I stared up at her. Waiting for her face to change again. Waiting for 
her to become Della again. 

Had I only imagined Della’s face? Had the streaming sunlight tricked my 
eyes? 

With a sigh, I let her help me into the boat. 

I slumped to my knees. The boat rocked up and down. Liz narrowed her 
eyes at me. “What happened out there?” she asked. 

Before I could answer, I heard splashing outside the boat. 

Della? 

I froze. 

No. Jan pulled herself up on the side. She brushed her wet hair off her face. 
“Sarah—didn’t you hear me calling you?” she demanded. 

“Jan. I didn’t see you. I thought that—” My voice caught in my throat. 

“Why did you swim away from me?” Jan asked. “I’m your buddy— 
remember?” 

Liz drove me to shore. I changed my clothes and went to see Richard. I found 
him in his head counselor’s office, a little room about the size of a closet in the 
back of the main lodge. 

He was resting his feet on top of his tiny desk. He twirled a toothpick in his 
mouth. 

“Hey, Sarah—how’s it going?” He flashed me a friendly smile and 
motioned for me to take a seat in the folding chair across from his desk. 

I could see his eyes studying me. 

“I hear you had another little problem in the lake,” he said softly. He moved 



the toothpick to the other side of his mouth. “What’s going on?” 

I took a deep breath. 

Should I tell him there is a ghost girl who has been following me 
everywhere? Who wants me to be her buddy? 

He’d just think I’m nuts, I decided. 

“You had a bad shock yesterday,” Richard said. “We really thought that you 
drowned.” 

He lowered his feet and leaned over the desk toward me. “Maybe you went 
back in the water too soon,” he said. “Too soon after the shock.” 

“Maybe,” I murmured. 

And then I blurted out the question that was really on my mind. “Richard, 
tell me about the girl who drowned here.” 

His mouth dropped open. “Huh?” The toothpick fell onto his lap. 

“I know that a girl drowned in the lake,” I insisted. “Can you tell me about 
her?” 

Richard shook his head. “No girl ever drowned at Camp Cold Lake,” he 
said. “Never.” 

I knew he was lying. 

I had proof, after all. I had seen Della. And talked with her. 

“Richard, please—” I begged. “I really need to know. Tell me about her.” 

He frowned. “Why don’t you believe me, Sarah? I’m telling the truth. No 
campers have ever drowned at this camp. No boys. No girls.” 

I heard a soft sigh behind me. 

I glanced back at the open doorway—and saw Della standing there. 

I jumped to my feet. And pointed. “Richard!” I cried. “The girl who 
drowned! She’s standing right there! Don’t you see her?” 

Richard raised his eyes to the doorway. “Yes,” he replied softly. “I see her.” 



24 


“Huh?” I gasped and grabbed the edge of his desk. “You see her?” I cried. “You 
really do?” 

Richard nodded. He had a solemn expression on his face. “If it makes you 
feel better, Sarah, I’ll say that I see her.” 

“But you don’t really see her?” I demanded. 

He scratched his sandy-colored hair. “No. I don’t see anything.” 

I turned back to the doorway. Della grinned at me. 

“Sit down. Please,” Richard instructed. “You know, sometimes our mind 
plays tricks on us. Especially when we’ve been through a really bad scare.” 

I didn’t sit down. I stood in front of his desk and stared hard at Della. Stared 
right through her. 

“She’s not in my mind! She’s right there!” I shouted. “She’s standing right 
there, Richard. Her name is Della. She drowned at this camp. And now she’s 
trying to drown me too!” 

“Sarah—please calm down,” Richard said gently. He climbed around his 
desk and put a hand on my shoulder. Then he led me to the door. 

I was standing face-to-face with Della. 

She stuck out her tongue at me. 

“See? There’s no one there,” Richard said. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Why don’t you stay away from the lake for a few days,” he suggested. 
“You know. Just hang out and relax.” 

Della mouthed his words as he spoke. 

I turned away from her. 

She giggled. 

“Don’t go to the lake?” I asked Richard. 

He nodded. “Take a few days and rest up. You’ll feel much better.” 

I knew I wouldn’t feel better. I knew I’d still have Della following me 
everywhere, trying to make me her buddy. 

I sighed. “That won’t help,” I told him. 

“Then I have a different idea,” he said. “Pick a sport you haven’t tried, 



Sarah. Pick something really hard. Like water-skiing.” 

“I don’t get it,” I replied. “Why should I do that?” 

“Because you will have to think so hard about what you’re doing, you 
won’t have time to worry about ghosts.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Yeah. Right.” 

“I’m trying to help you,” he said sharply. 

“Well... thanks,” I replied. I didn’t know what else to say. “I guess I’ll go to 
lunch now.” 

I trudged out of the tiny office. And took a deep breath. The air was much 
cooler out in the main lodge. 

I turned the corner and headed toward the mess hall in the front of the 
building. As I turned another corner, I heard Della’s frail voice behind me. 

“You can’t get away, Sarah. You’re my buddy. There’s no need to run. 
You’ll always be my buddy.” 

The soft words—so close to my ear—sent shivers down my back. 

Something inside me snapped. 

I couldn’t hold in my fury. 

“SHUT UP!” I shrieked. “SHUT UP! SHUT UP! SHUT UP—AND 
LEAVE ME ALONE!” 

I spun around to see if she had heard me. 

And gasped in horror. 



25 


Briana stood behind me. 

Her mouth dropped open in shock. “Okay, okay. I’ll go away,” she said, 
backing up. “You don’t have to be so nasty, Sarah. I was just coming to see how 
you were doing.” 

Wow. I felt so bad. 

Briana thought I was talking to her. 

“I—I—” I stammered. 

“I thought you wanted to be friends,” Briana snapped. “I didn’t even say a 
word to you. And you bit my head off!” 

“I wasn’t talking to you!” I finally choked out. “I was talking to her!” 

I pointed to Della, who leaned against the wall behind us. Della waved to 
me and giggled. 

Sun from the open lodge window lit up Della’s blond hair from behind. I 
could see the window right through her body. 

“I was talking to her!” I repeated. 

Briana raised her eyes to the window. 

And the strangest expression spread over her face. 

The next morning, I gulped down some gooey scrambled eggs for breakfast. 
Then I made my way to the boat dock. 

Don’t ask why I decided to try water-skiing. 

I really don’t have an answer. 

I suppose I did it for Aaron. The night before, he begged me once again not 
to call Mom and Dad. 

Aaron really didn’t want to go home. He said he was having the best 
summer of his life. 

Sure, I thought. It’s easy for you to have a good summer. You don’t have a 
ghost following you around. 

“Please try to stay a while longer,” Aaron begged. 

I won’t go to the lake, I decided. I’ll hang around the cabin and read or 
something. 



But in the morning, I realized that was a bad plan. 

I’d be too scared to stay by myself in the cabin while everyone else was at 
the lake. I would have no way to protect myself against Della. 

Yes, I know I wasn’t thinking clearly. 

I was so stressed out, I could barely think at all! 

I should have stayed as far away from the water as possible. 

But I really didn’t want to be alone. So I followed Richard’s advice. And 
went to the boat dock. And told Liz I wanted to try water-skiing. 

“That’s great, Sarah!” Liz cried, flashing me a pleased smile. “Have you 
ever done it before? It’s easier than it looks.” 

I told her I’d never tried it. 

She pulled a yellow inflated life vest and a pair of skis from the equipment 

shed. 

Then she gave me a short lesson. Showed me how to lean back and how to 
bend my knees. 

A short while later, I was in the water waiting for the motorboat to come 
around. Meg was using the boat now, skiing behind it, sliding over the water. 
Her orange bathing suit glowed in the morning sunlight. 

The hum of the boat echoed over the water. The lake bobbed and rippled in 
the boat’s wake. 

Meg let out a cry and let go of the towrope as the boat sped near the dock. 
She splashed into the water, then quickly pulled off her skis. Then she came 
walking to shore. 

“My turn next,” I said softly. I felt a knot in my stomach. 

Meg flashed me a thumbs-up. 

I struggled with the skis, but finally got them in place. Then I pulled up the 
towrope, gripping it tightly in both hands. 

The boat motor sputtered and coughed. The boat rocked up ahead of me in 
the rippling blue water. 

I steadied myself. Lowered myself the way Liz had shown me. And took a 
deep breath. 

“Ready!” I called. 

The motor sputtered—and then roared. 

The boat pulled away so fast, the towrope nearly flew out of my hands. 

“Whooooooooaaa!” I opened my mouth in a long cry as the rope pulled me 


up. 



Yes! The skis bounced over the surface. I bent my knees and gripped the 
towrope tightly. 

I’m doing it! I realized. I’m water-skiing! 

The boat picked up speed. We headed in a straight line over the sparkling 
water. The cold spray swept over my face, my hair. 

I started to lose my balance. Tugged myself back up. Held on—and kept 
going. 

“Yessss!” I cried out loud. What an awesome feeling! 

But then the driver of the boat turned her head. 

And I recognized Della’s evil grin. 

As she worked the controls, Della’s white-blond hair flew up like wings 
around her pale face. Her blue eyes sparkled like the water. 

Her grin grew wider as she saw the horror on my face. 

“Turn around! Turn back! Please!” I begged. 

She made the boat swerve hard. 

I nearly toppled over. I gripped the towrope. 

My skis slapped the surface. Pain shot up to my knees. The cold spray 
washed over me. 

I gasped. Struggled to breathe. 

Della threw back her head and laughed. The sound was drowned out by the 
roar of the motor. 

I could see the sky through her body. The sunlight poured right through her. 

“Turn around!” I screamed. “Stop! Where are you taking me? Where?” 



26 


Della didn’t answer. She turned away from me, her hair flying wildly behind her 
head. 

The boat bounced over the water, sending up tall waves of foam and spray. 

The waves splashed over me. Chilling me. Blinding me. 

Gripped in panic, it took me a long time to realize that I had an easy escape. 

I let go of the towrope. 

My hands shot up. The tow bar snapped against the water. 

I skidded for a few seconds, my arms thrashing wildly. And then I toppled 
over and sank. 

The life vest pulled me back up. I bounced on the surface, gasping, spitting 
out water. My heart pounded. 

I felt so dizzy. The bright sunlight seemed to surround me. Which way was 
up? Which way to the shore? 

I spun around and saw the motorboat in the distance. 

“You didn’t get me this time!” I called to Della. 

But then I froze as the boat began to turn. Della swerved the boat, kicking 
up a tall wave of white water. 

Swerved it back around. Until it pointed to me. 

I gasped as I heard the motor roar. 

I bobbed helplessly in the water. 

The boat picked up speed, skipping over the rippling surface. 

She’s coming for me, I thought. She’s coming to make me her buddy 
forever. 

I’m trapped out here. 

She’s coming to run me over. 



27 


I treaded water, watching in horror as the boat sped toward me. 

I’ve got to dive under it, I realized. The only way to escape is down. 

I took a deep breath. Every muscle tensed. I knew I had to time my dive 
perfectly. 

The boat roared closer. I could see Della crouched over the motor. Guiding 
the boat. 

Aiming it. 

I took another deep breath. And then I realized I couldn’t dive. 

The life vest—it was holding me up. No way I could plunge beneath the 
surface. 

With a cry, I grabbed the front of the vest with both hands. 

And tugged. 

I can’t do this! I realized. I can’t get this thing off in time! 

The water rocked harder as the boat sped nearer. The whole lake seemed to 
tilt and spin. 

The boat—it’s going to tear me to pieces! I thought. 

I pulled at the vest. Pushed it. 

Please — please—slide over my head! 

No time. No time. 

I can’t dive! 

The motor’s roar drowned out my scream. 

With a frantic tug, I pulled the life vest up. Over my shoulders. 

Too late. 

The front of the boat bounced over me. 

Then the whirring motor blades sliced off my head. 



28 


I waited for the pain. 

I waited for the darkness. 

The water swirled around me. Blue, then green. 

Choking on a mouthful of water, I thrashed up to the surface. Struggling to 
breathe, I let the waves rock me back and forth. 

“The life vest!” I choked out. 

I held half of the vest in each hand. 

The motor blades had sliced the life vest in two. 

I tossed the two pieces away. And started to laugh. 

“I’m alive!” I cried out loud. “I’m still alive!” 

I turned and saw the boat speeding across the lake. Did Della think she had 
won? 

I didn’t care. I spun around. Found the shore. And started to swim. 

My close call gave me new energy. The strong, rocking current helped push 
me back to the camp. 

I heard girls calling to me as I stumbled onto the grass. And I saw Liz 
jogging quickly over. 

“Sarah—” she called. “Sarah—wait!” 

I ignored her. I ignored them all. 

I started to run. 

I knew what I had to do. I had to get away from Camp Cold Lake. I had to 
get away as fast as I could. 

I wasn’t safe here. Not as long as Della wanted me for her buddy. Not as 
long as Della wanted me to drown too. 

I knew no one would believe me. They all said they wanted to help. But no 
one could really help me—not against a ghost! 

I burst into the cabin and tore off my wet swimsuit. Tossing it to the floor, I 
frantically pulled on shorts and a T-shirt. 

I swept my wet hair back with both hands. Tugged on socks and my 
sneakers. 

“Got to get away. Got to get away,” I chanted to myself. 



What to do? Where to go? 

I’ll run through the woods to the town on the other side, I decided. I’ll call 
Mom and Dad. I’ll tell them I’m hiding in town. I’ll tell them to pick me up 
there. 

I stopped at the cabin doorway. 

Should I tell Aaron? 

No. No way, I decided. 

He’ll only try to stop me. 

I’ll get a message to Aaron from town, I decided. I’ll tell him where I am. 
But not until I’m safe. Not until I’m far away from this place. 

I poked my head out of the cabin and searched around, making sure the 
coast was clear. Then I stepped outside and made my way around to the back. 
And ran into Briana. 

She narrowed her eyes at me, studying my face. “You’re going?” she asked 
quietly. 

I nodded. “Yes. I’m going.” 

Once again, Briana’s expression changed. The light in her eyes seemed to 

fade. 


“Good luck,” she whispered. 



29 


Why is she acting so weird? I wondered. 

I didn’t have time to think about it. I gave Briana a wave. Then I ran past 
her and headed into the woods. 

I glanced back as I followed a path between the trees. And saw Briana still 
standing there behind the cabin. Watching me. 

Taking a deep breath, I turned and hurried along the path. 

The trees overhead cut off a lot of the sunlight. It grew darker and cooler as 
I ran. 

A hedge of sharp burrs and brambles scraped my bare arms and legs as I 
tried to edge past. I wished I had worn jeans and a sweatshirt. Something that 
covered me better. 

My sneakers slipped over a thick blanket of dead leaves. I had to skip over 
fallen tree limbs and clumps of thorny weeds. 

Tree roots rose up over the path. Tall, dry reeds leaned over me, as if 
reaching to grab me. 

The narrow path divided in two. I paused—breathing hard—trying to 
decide which path to take. 

Would they both lead me to town? 

I held my breath when I heard a voice. Singing. 

A bird? 

No. A soft voice. A girl’s voice. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned. Raising my eyes to the sound, I saw Della, perched on 
a low tree limb. She tilted her head from side to side as she sang. Her blue eyes 
sparkled, gazing down at me. 

“You—you followed me!” I stammered. “How did you know that I—” My 
voice caught in my throat. 

She giggled. “You’re my buddy,” she replied. “We have to stick together.” 

“No! No way!” I screamed up at her. “You lose, Della. I’m not going to be 
your buddy. Because I’m never going to the lake again. I’m never going to 
drown like you!” 

Della’s smile faded. “Drown?” She shook her head. “Sarah, what made you 
think that? You’re very confused. I didn’t drown.” 



“Huh?” My mouth dropped open. I stared up at her in shock. 

“Close your mouth, Sarah. A fly will fly into it.” Della tilted back her head 
and laughed. 

Then she shook her head again. “How could anyone drown at Camp Cold 
Lake?” she demanded. “They give a lecture about water safety every five 
minutes! No one ever drowned at Camp Cold Lake!” 

“You didn’t drown?” I cried. “Then how did you die?” 

She rested her hands on the tree limb and leaned forward, peering down at 
me. I could see through her body, see the leaves shaking in the breeze. 

“It’s a simple story,” Della said with a sigh. “One night I got tired of 
listening to the water safety lecture at the campfire. So I sneaked off into these 
woods.” 

She swept her hair back with a toss of her head. “I made one major 
mistake,” she continued. “I didn’t know the woods are filled with deadly 
poisonous snakes.” 

I gasped. “These woods? Snakes?” 

Della nodded. “It’s nearly impossible to cross through these woods without 
getting bitten,” she sighed. “I died of a snakebite, Sarah.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “But you were always at the lake,” I choked out. 
“Why did I always see you at the lake?” 

“Don’t you get it?” she replied. “That was my plan. I made you afraid of the 
lake, Sarah. I made you terrified of the lake. Because I knew you’d try to escape 
through the woods. I knew you’d run into the woods and die like me—and be 
my buddy.” 

“No—!” I protested. “I won’t. I—” 

“Sarah, look!” Della pointed toward the ground. 

I gazed down—and watched a fat black snake curl around my leg. 



30 


“Buddies forever,” Della sang cheerfully. “Buddies forever.” 

I stood frozen, gaping down in horror. Watching the fat snake wind itself 
around me. Feeling its warm, dry body scrape over my bare skin. 

“Nooooo.” A low moan escaped my throat as the snake arched its head. 

“It won’t hurt that much,” Della said brightly. “It’s like a bee sting, Sarah. 
That’s all.” 

The snake let out a loud hiss. It snapped open its jaws. 

I felt its body tighten like a warm rope around my leg. 

“Buddies forever,” Della sang. “Buddies forever...” 

“No! Sarah is not your buddy!” a voice rang out. 

I tried to turn toward the voice. But I couldn’t move. I felt the snake tighten 
its hold on my leg. 

“Briana!” I cried. “What are you doing here?” 

She hurried out from behind a clump of tall reeds. 

With one quick motion, she grabbed the snake in one hand. Slid it off my 
leg. And tossed it into the trees. 

Briana raised her eyes to Della. “Sarah can’t be your buddy, because she’s 
my buddy!” Briana shouted. 

Della’s eyes grew wide. She cried out in surprise. She gripped the tree 
branch to keep from falling. 

“You!” she exclaimed. “What are you doing here?” 

“Yes, it’s me!” Briana shouted up to her. “I’m back, Della.” 

“But—but how did you...” Della’s voice trailed off. 

“You tried to do the same thing to me last year,” Briana said. “You tried all 
summer to make me your buddy. You terrified me—didn’t you, Della?” 

Briana uttered an angry cry. “You didn’t think I’d come back. But I did. I 
came back to camp this summer... to protect the next girl!” 

“Nooo!” Della wailed. 

I finally understood. I stepped up to the tree beside Briana. “Briana is my 
buddy!” I declared. “And I’m coming back next summer to warn the next girl!” 

“No! No! Nooooo!” Della raged. “You can’t do that! I’ve waited so long! 



So lonnnng!” 

She let go of the tree limb and shook her fists at Briana and me. 

Lost her balance. 

Her hands flew up as she started to fall. 

She grabbed for the limb. Missed. 

And dropped silently to the ground. 

Then she was gone. 

Vanished. 

With a weary sigh, I climbed to my feet. I shook my head. “Is she gone for 
good?” I murmured. 

Briana shrugged. “I don’t know. I hope so.” 

I turned to Briana. “You—you saved my life!” I cried. “Thank you for 
following me. Thank you for saving me!” 

With a happy cry, I stepped up to her. “Thank you! Thank you!” 

I wrapped my arms around her to hug her. 

And my hands went right through her body. 

I gasped. I grabbed her shoulder. But I couldn’t feel a thing. 

I jumped back in shock. 

Briana narrowed her eyes at me. “Della killed me last summer, Sarah,” she 
said softly. “On the last day. But I didn’t want to be her buddy. I just never liked 
her.” 

She floated forward, raised herself off the ground, hovered over me. 

“But I need a buddy,” she whispered. “Everyone has to have a buddy. 
You’ll be my buddy—won’t you, Sarah?” 

I saw the hissing snake in her hand. 

But I couldn’t move. 

“You’ll be my buddy—won’t you?” Briana repeated. “You’ll be my buddy 
forever.” 




MY BEST FRIEND 
IS INVISIBLE 

Goosebumps - 57 
R.L. Stine 


1 


I sat at the dinner table and wished I was invisible. 

If I were invisible, I could sneak away from dinner without finishing my 
string beans. And I could creep up to my room and finish the book of ghost 
stories I’d been reading. 

I started to daydream. I’m Sammy Jacobs, the Invisible Boy, I told myself. I 
tried to picture how I’d look if I were invisible. 

Last week, I saw a movie about an invisible man. You couldn’t see his face 
or his body. But when he ate, you could see the food digesting in his invisible 
stomach. 

It was totally gross. 

I loved it. 

Staring at my string beans, I pictured them rolling around in my stomach. 

My parents’ voices droned on in the background. My parents are research 
scientists. They work in a college lab. They do weird things with light and lasers. 

And then they come home and talk about their work at dinner. And talk 
about their work. And talk about their work. 

My ten-year-old brother, Simon, and I can’t get a word in. 

We have to sit and listen to them talk about “light refraction” and “ocular 
impediments”. 

I’m a science-fiction freak. I love reading science-fiction books and comics. 
And I rent any movie that has an alien from another planet in it. 

But when I have to listen to my parents talk about their work, I feel like an 
alien from another planet. I mean, I can’t understand a single word they say! 

“Hey, Mom and Dad.” I tried to get into the conversation. “Guess what? I 
grew a tail today.” 

Mom and Dad didn’t hear me. They were too busy arguing about something 
called “morphology”. 

“Actually, I grew two tails,” I said, louder. 

They didn’t care. Dad was drawing some kind of chart on his napkin. 

I was really bored. I kicked Simon under the table. Just for something to do. 

“Ow! Stop it, Sammy!” he cried. He kicked me back. 



I kicked him again. 

Dad kept scribbling numbers all over his napkin. Mom squinted at his chart. 

Simon kicked me back. Too hard. 

“Whoa!” I screamed. My hands flew up—and sent my dinner plate flying. 

SPLAAT. 

Into my lap. 

A whole plateful of spaghetti and all the string beans—slid down my jeans. 

“Look what Simon made me do!” I shouted. 

“You started it!” Simon protested. 

Mom glanced up from the chart. At least I had her attention. And maybe I’d 
even get Simon into trouble. Simon never gets yelled at. He’s good. 

Mom’s gaze shifted from me to Simon. “Simon,” Mom started. 

All right! I thought. Simon is in for it now! 

“Help your clumsy brother clean up,” Mom said. She glanced down at the 
floor and pointed to the pile of spaghetti. “And make sure you mop up this 
mess.” Then she grabbed Dad’s pencil and scribbled a bunch of numbers next to 
his. 

Simon tried to help me clean up. But I pushed him away and did it myself. 

Was I steamed? Take a guess. 

Okay. Okay. Maybe the spaghetti wasn’t Simon’s fault. But nothing is ever 
Simon’s fault. Ever. 

Why? 

I told you—Simon is the good one. He never waits until the last minute to 
do his homework. He never has to be reminded to throw his clothes in the 
hamper. Or take out the garbage. Or wipe his feet when he comes in the house. 

What kind of kid is that? 

A mutant —if you ask me. 

“Simon is a mutant,” I mumbled as I used my napkin to wipe my dinner 
from my lap. 

“My Brother—the Mutant.” I smiled. I liked the sound of that. It would 
make a good science-fiction movie, I decided. 

I tossed the paper napkin into the trash and returned to the table. 

Well, at least I won’t have to eat any more string beans, I thought, staring 
down at my empty plate. 

Wrong. 

“Sammy, give me your dish. I’ll refill it.” Mom stood up, took my plate— 



and slipped on the spaghetti on the floor. 

Uh-oh. 

I watched as she lost her balance and slid across the kitchen. I laughed. I 
couldn’t help it. I mean, she looked pretty funny—sliding across the floor like 
that. 

“Who laughed?” Mom turned to face us. “Was it you, Simon?” 

“Of course not,” Simon answered. 

Of course not. Simon’s favorite words. 

Simon—do you want to watch TV? Of course not. Want to play ball? Of 
course not. Want to hear a joke? Of course not. 

Simon would never laugh at Mom. 

Simon did only serious things. 

Simon—the Serious Mutant. 

Mom turned to me and let out a long sigh. She returned to the table with my 
plate. Refilled. With lots more string beans. Great. 

Disappear. Disappear. I stared at my string beans and chanted silently. Last 
week I read a story about a kid who could make things disappear just by 
concentrating hard. 

It wasn’t working for me. 

“I can’t wait for Saturday to come,” I said, burying the string beans under 
the spaghetti. 

“Why?” Simon was the only one who asked. 

“I’m going to see School Spirit,” I told him. 

“School spirit?” Dad glanced up from his napkin chart, his eyes finally 
wide with interest. “School spirit is great! Who has school spirit?” 

“Nobody, Dad. School Spirit is the name of a new movie. It’s about a ghost 
that haunts an old boarding school,” I explained. “I’m going to see it on 
Saturday.” 

Dad placed his pencil down. “I wish you were more interested in real 
science, Sammy. I think real science is even stranger than the fantasy stuff you 
like.” 

“But ghosts are real, Dad!” 

“Your dad and I are scientists, Sammy,” Mom said. “We don’t believe in 
things like ghosts.” 

“Well, you’re wrong,” I declared. “If ghosts don’t exist, why have there 
been stories about them for hundreds of years? 



“Besides, this movie isn’t fantasy stuff,” I told them. “It’s a true story. Real 
kids were interviewed for it. Kids who swear they saw the ghost in school!” 

Mom shook her head. 

Dad chuckled. “What are you doing in school, Simon? Seen any ghosts 
lately?” 

“Of course not,” Simon replied. “I’m starting my science project this week. 
It’s called: How Fast Do We Grow? I’m going to study myself for six months. 
And make a growth graph for every part of my body.” 

“That’s wonderful!” Mom said. 

“Very original!” Dad exclaimed. “Let us know if we can help.” 

“Oh, brother,” I mumbled, rolling my eyes. “Can I be excused?” I pushed 
my chair away from the table. “Roxanne is coming over to do math homework.” 

Roxanne Johnson and I are both in the same seventh-grade class. We like to 
compete against each other. Just for fun. 

At least, I think it’s for fun. Sometimes I’m not sure what Roxanne thinks. 

Anyway, she’s one of my best friends. She likes science fiction too. We 
planned to see School Spirit together. 

I went upstairs to search for my math book. 

I opened the door to my room. 

I stepped inside—and gasped. 



2 


My homework papers lay scattered all over the floor. 

I’m not exactly the neatest kid in the world—but I do not throw my 
homework on the floor. 

Not usually, anyway. 

Well, at least not today. 

Brutus—my orange cat—sat in the middle of the mess, with his head buried 
underneath the pile of papers. 

“Brutus—did you do this?” I demanded. Brutus jerked his head up. He 
glanced at me—then darted under my bed to hide. 

Hmmm. That’s weird, I thought. Brutus actually looks scared. That is 
definitely weird. 

Brutus never hides from anything. In fact, he’s the meanest cat in the 
neighborhood. Every kid on the block has been scratched by Brutus—at least 
once. 

I looked at the window. It was open. The light-blue curtains billowed in the 
breeze. 

I gathered my papers from the floor. The wind probably blew them off my 
desk, I guessed. 

Wait a minute. Something was wrong. 

I stared at the window. 

I could swear I left that window closed. 

But I couldn’t have. I mean, there it was—wide-open. 

“What are you looking at?” Roxanne stepped into my room. 

“Something weird is going on here,” I told her, shutting the window. “I 
closed this before dinner. Now it’s open.” 

“Your mom must have opened it,” she said. “What’s the big deal, anyway? 
It’s just the window.” 

“It’s no big deal,” I said. “But my mom didn’t open it. Neither did Dad or 
Simon. We were all downstairs.” 

I shook my head. “I know I closed it. Brutus was the only one up here—and 
he didn’t open it.” 

I peered under the bed. There was Brutus—snuggled against my sneakers. 



Shaking. 

“Come on, Brutus. Come out,” I urged softly. “Don’t be afraid. I know she’s 
scary—but it’s only Roxanne.” 

“Very funny, Sammy.” Roxanne rolled her eyes. “I’ll tell you what’s scary. 
Your brother is scary.” 

“What do you mean?” I asked. 

“I passed him on the way up here. Do you know what he was doing?” she 
asked. 

“No,” I said. 

“He was lying on the living room floor. On a huge piece of cardboard. 
Tracing himself,” Roxanne replied. 

I shrugged. “He must be working on his science project. He’s studying 
himself.” 

“Your brother is definitely scary,” she said. “I’ll tell you something else 
that’s scary—the way you ran today. That was very, very scary. I didn’t think 
anyone could run that slow!” 

Roxanne beat me in the track race at school today. And she wasn’t going to 
let me forget it. 

“You won because of only ONE reason,” I told her. 

“And what was that ONE reason?” she mimicked me. 

I slid halfway under the bed and dragged Brutus out. Stalling for time. 
Stalling so I could come up with a good reason. 

“You won because—I let you!” I said finally. 

“Yeah, right, Sammy.” Roxanne folded her arms across her chest. 

“I did. I let you,” I insisted. 

Roxanne’s cheeks turned red. I could see she was getting really steamed. 

Making Roxanne angry is fun. 

“I let you win—because I wanted to help build up your confidence for the 
school Olympics,” I said. 

Whoa! That made Roxanne even angrier. Roxanne doesn’t like help from 
anyone. And she likes to think she’s the best at everything. 

Our school is going to compete against other schools in a mini-Olympics 
next week. Roxanne and I are both on the Olympic team. We were both on the 
team last year too. Roxanne ran every single day to make sure she was the best. 

But last year, we lost. 

I guess it was my fault. A camera flashed in my face. I tripped—and fell. 



“You lost fair and square today, Sammy—and you know it,” Roxanne 
snapped. “And you’d better not trip next week. And make us lose the Olympics 
again.” 

“Last year wasn’t my fault!” I cried. But Roxanne interrupted me. 

“Hey—what’s wrong with Brutus?” she asked, peering over my shoulder. 

I turned around and saw Brutus sitting in the corner—curled up in a tight 

ball. 

“I don’t know. He’s acting kind of strange today,” I said. 

“I know,” she agreed. “He didn’t even try to scratch me yet. He’s been 
acting— nice.” 

Brutus stood. He glanced at the window—and arched his back. 

Then he turned completely around and sat down, facing the wall. 

Weird. 

“So? What are we going to do for our term project?” Roxanne asked, 
plopping down on my bed. 

Our term project for our English class was due next month. Ms. Starkling, 
our teacher, wanted us to work in pairs. She said working in pairs would help us 
learn about teamwork and cooperation. 

“I have a really great idea,” I said. “How about a report on plants? You 
know—how much water they need. Stuff like that.” 

“That’s a really great idea,” Roxanne replied. “If you’re in kindergarten.” 

“Okay. Okay. Let me think.” I stood up and paced the room. “Got it! How 
about the life cycle of a moth? We could catch some—and see how long they 
take to die!” 

Roxanne stared at me. She nodded her head thoughtfully. “I think... that’s 
really stupid,” she said. 

So much for teamwork and cooperation. 

“Fine.” I folded my arms in front of me. “Why don’t you try to come up 
with an idea?” 

“I already have,” Roxanne declared. “I think we should do a report on True 
Haunted Houses. I know a haunted house right here in Middletown. It’s near the 
woods. Across from the college. I bet we’ll find a real ghost living there!” 

“There are no haunted houses in Middletown,” I said. “I know all about 
haunted houses—and there isn’t one anywhere near here.” 

“The house near the woods is haunted,” Roxanne insisted. “And that’s what 
we should study for our report. I’ll talk to the ghost and take notes. Your job will 



be to videotape us.” 

Roxanne never backs down. 

Sometimes that’s what I like about her. 

And sometimes that’s what I hate about her. Like now. 

“Don’t waste your time, Roxanne. I’m practically an expert on ghosts. That 
house is not haunted.” I tried to give Roxanne some good advice. 

A bad mistake. 

“You just don’t want to videotape us. You want to be the one who talks to 
the ghost and takes the notes,” she accused. 

I let out a sigh. 

“But it was my idea—so I get to pick first,” Roxanne said. “Ms. Starkling 
will go crazy when we find a real ghost for our project. We’ll probably win an 
award or something.” 

“We won’t find any ghosts in this town.” I shook my head. “This place is 
too boring. Nothing exciting ever happens here....” 

I stopped talking. 

A low, frightening moan filled the room. 

Roxanne jumped off the bed. 

She moved close to me. 

We slowly turned toward the sound. Coming from the hall. 

“Wh-what’s that?” Roxanne’s voice shook, pointing to the doorway. 

We both stared in horror—at an eerie light just outside my room. An eerie 
white light. 

We took a step back. 

The light grew brighter. 

Closer. 

It filled the doorway now. 

I held my breath. 

“Sammy —what is it?” Roxanne’s voice quivered. 

“I—I don’t know.” 

I watched the strange white light begin to roll and shimmer and stretch—as 
it reached for us. 



3 


We backed up against the wall. 

The light grew stronger, whiter. 

Blinding now. 

Another moan floated toward us—and I gasped. 

“A... ghost!” I cried. “No. It’s a... Dad?” 

Dad stepped into the room. Carrying some sort of bright light. 

“That’s about as real a ghost as youTl ever find!” Dad laughed. 

My heart stopped pounding. 

Brutus let out a loud wail and darted from the room. 

“Whoa—I didn’t think anything could scare that cat!” Dad laughed again. 

Mom burst into the room. “You said you were bringing that laser light home 
to repair it. Not to terrify these kids,” she scolded Dad. 

“Give me a break. It was just a joke.” Dad turned to us. “You thought it was 
funny—right, Sammy? Roxanne?” 

“Yeah... very funny, Dad,” I said, rolling my eyes. “One of your best jokes. 
Areal riot.” 

“I knew it was a laser light.” Roxanne moved back toward the bed. She sat 
down, trying to look cool. “When I saw how scared Sammy was, I played along. 
Super trick, Mr. Jacobs. We really fooled Sammy!” 

We really fooled Sammy! We? 

I wanted to strangle Roxanne. 

Sometimes I hate her. HATE her. 

Simon wandered into the room, carrying Brutus. “Your stupid cat ran over 
my body-tracing. He ruined it. Now I have to start all over again.” 

Simon let Brutus drop to the floor. He glanced at the light Dad held in his 
hand. Then he looked at me. 

“Sammy didn’t fall for that dumb light trick—did he?” he asked. 

“Why don’t you go watch your toes grow!” I shouted at my brother. 

“No. This is a different dumb light trick,” Dad chuckled. 

Mom cleared her throat—a warning to Dad. 

“Actually, Simon, this light is called a Molecule Detector Light.” Dad tried 



to turn serious. “Here—have a look at it.” He handed the light to Simon. 

It looked like a regular flashlight—but it definitely wasn’t. 

A regular flashlight didn’t shine with a shimmery, white, blinding light. 
“What does it do?” Simon studied the shiny silver casing that housed the 

laser. 

“It’s kind of like an X-ray,” Dad explained. “I can shine it in the air and see 
all kinds of insects and things that you normally can’t see.” 

“I know what we can use it for.” Simon turned the light toward me. “We 
can use it to find Sammy’s BRAIN!” 

Everyone laughed. Even Mom. 

“Hey! Good one!” Roxanne patted Simon on the back. “That’s the first time 
I ever heard you make a joke.” 

“I wasn’t joking,” Simon said flatly. 

That made everyone laugh even harder. 

“Out!” I yelled. “I want you all to leave!” 

Mom, Dad, and Simon left the room. Still laughing. 

“What about our math homework?” Roxanne demanded. “I thought we 
were going to do it together.” 

“I don’t feel like doing it now,” I grumbled. 

“Okay. Okay.” Roxanne backed out of the room. “You don’t have to do it. 
But I do. Ms. Starkling said it’s my turn at the chalkboard tomorrow. I want to 
make sure I get the equations right.” 

Roxanne left to do her homework. 

I opened my math book to do mine. 

I stared down at the numbers. 

But I couldn’t concentrate. 

I’ll get up early, I decided. And do my homework in the morning. 

I got up from my desk to change for bed. 

Brutus jumped into my desk chair—his favorite place to sleep. 

I crossed the room—and tripped on something in the middle of the floor. 
“Hey—what was that?” I spun around. 

I glanced at the floor. 

“Huh?” 

Nothing there. 



4 


I stared at the floor. 

I shook my head. 

I tripped over— nothing? 

It’s a good thing Roxanne didn’t see this one, I thought. I could hear her 
making fun of me now. “Practicing—to make sure we lose the race next week, 
Sammy?” 

I got into bed. 

I propped up my pillows and picked up the ghost-story book I was reading. 
I stared down at the page, but it was all just a blur. 

I closed the book and drifted off to sleep. But I tossed and turned all night 
long. Half asleep, half awake, I fluffed up my pillow. I pulled the covers up 
around me. I drifted off again—then woke up to a noise. 

Flapping. 

The flapping of my curtains in the night breeze. 

I sat up. I rubbed my eyes. 

I stared at the window. 

The open window! 

I bolted out of bed and slammed it shut. 

Who opened this window? WHO? 

Is it possible for a window to slide up? 

NO. 

It must be Simon. Simon must be playing a joke on me, I decided. 

But it couldn’t be Simon. Simon doesn’t play jokes. He’s always serious. 

I climbed back in bed—and stared at the window. Watching. Waiting. 
Waiting to see it open. 

But my eyelids grew heavy and I fell asleep. 

The next morning I woke up late. Brutus always wakes me up. But he didn’t 
today. 

I bolted up in bed to check the window. Closed. 

I glanced at my desk chair. Brutus was gone. 



I dressed quickly. I caught my reflection in the mirror as I headed out of my 
room. I looked wrecked. 

“Sammy, you look awful,” Mom said. “Did you get to bed late last night?” 

I slumped down at the kitchen table. Dad sat across from me, reading the 
newspaper. 

“No, not too late,” I told Mom. 

Dad peered over the newspaper. “You’re reading too many of those ghost 
books, Sammy. If you read about real science, you’d sleep better.” 

Dad went back to his newspaper. 

Mom poured some cereal into my breakfast bowl. I ate one spoonful—and 
Simon called me. 

“Sammy—come up here,” he shouted from his bedroom. “I need your 
help.” 

I ignored him. 

I ate another spoonful. 

“SAM-MY!” he screamed. 

“Sammy, go see what your brother wants,” Mom ordered. 

“SAM-MY! SAM-MY!” 

“WHAT?” I cried, charging into his room. “What’s your problem?” 

“That!” he said, pointing to the bed. “That is my problem.” 

Brutus lay curled up in Simon’s bed. 

“He slept in here last night,” Simon said. “And now I can’t get him out. He 
won’t move.” 

“Brutus slept in here?” 

I couldn’t believe it. 

Brutus always sleeps in my room. Always. 

“Yes, he slept in here,” Sammy said. “And I want him out!” 

“What’s the big deal? Just leave him there.” I turned to the door. 

“Wait!” Simon yelled. “I can’t leave him there. I can’t!” 

“Why not?” I asked, confused. 

“Because I have to make my bed,” Simon answered. 

I stared hard at my brother. “What planet are you from?” 

“Sammy,” Simon whined. “I have to make my bed. Mom says.” 

“Just make the bed over him. Mom won’t notice the lump.” 

I returned to the kitchen a few seconds later. I sat down at the table. 



Mom peered over my shoulder. “Sammy, how did you finish your cereal so 
fast?” 

“Huh?” 

I stared down into my breakfast bowl. 

Totally empty! 



5 


“Someone—someone ate my cereal!” I stammered. 

“You’re right!” Mom gasped. “It must have been a ghost!” 

Mom and Dad laughed. 

I stared at the empty bowl—and the spoon. 

“Look!” I shouted. “Someone did eat my cereal. I have proof. The spoon— 
it’s on the left side of the bowl. I always put my spoon on the right side of the 
bowl—because I’m right-handed. See?” 

I pointed to the spoon. 

To the proof. 

“Stop kidding around, Sammy. You’re going to be late for school.” Mom 
turned to Dad. “We’d better get going too.” 

“Did you do it?” I asked Dad as he reached for his briefcase. “Did you eat 
my cereal? Did you move the spoon? Was it a joke?” 

“You’re reading too many ghost stories,” Dad said. “Way too many.” Then 
he and Mom hurried off for work. 

For a few minutes, I sat at the kitchen table. Just sat there, staring into my 
empty cereal bowl. 

Someone ate my cereal. 

I am not going crazy, I told myself. 

Someone ate my cereal. 

But who? 

“Sammy. Sammy.” 

Huh? 

“Sammy, would you like to tell us what is so fascinating outside?” Ms. 
Starkling crossed her arms in front of her, waiting for my answer. 

A few kids giggled. 

I had been gazing out the classroom window. Thinking—about my window. 
My open bedroom window. And my disappearing cereal. 

“Uh—no. I mean, nothing,” I said. “I mean—I wasn’t looking at anything.” 
Some more giggles. 



“Sammy, come up to the chalkboard, please, and show the class how to 
finish this equation.” 

“But it’s Roxanne’s turn,” I blurted out. “I mean, isn’t Roxanne supposed to 
show the class today?” 

“Sammy, please.” Ms. Starkling tapped the chalkboard with a piece of 
chalk. “Now.” 

I glanced at Roxanne. She just shrugged her shoulders. 

I was in big trouble. 

I didn’t do my math homework last night. And I didn’t do it this morning, 
either—because Brutus didn’t wake me up on time. 

My temples pounded as I made my way to the front of the classroom. I 
walked slowly. Staring at the equation. Trying to figure out how to solve it 
before I got up there. 

I had no idea. 

Ms. Starkling handed me the piece of chalk. 

Silence fell over the classroom. 

I stared hard at the numbers on the board. 

My palms began to sweat. 

“Read the equation out loud,” Ms. Starkling suggested. She said it nicely. 
But I could tell she was losing her patience. 

I read the equation out loud. 

It didn’t help. 

I lifted the chalk to the board, even though I still didn’t know what to do. 

I stared at the numbers some more. 

I heard the sounds of kids shifting impatiently in their seats. 

I placed the chalk against the board—and gasped. 

I felt something squeeze my hand. Something cold and wet. 

My knees started to shake. 

I felt hot breath right up against my face. 

I tried to step back—but I couldn’t move. 

Something squeezed my fingers tighter and tighter. Squeezed until it hurt. 

The breathing against my face grew more rapid—sharp gasps that stung my 
cheeks. 

I wanted to pull free. But then my hand started to move across the 
chalkboard. 

My hand was moving—and it started to write! 



Someone was writing numbers for me! Someone was holding my hand! 
Moving it! Solving the equation! 

Someone I couldn’t see! 



6 


I yanked my hand back. I jerked free of the clammy, invisible grip. 

Then I dropped the chalk—and started screaming. 

And ran from the room. 

I ran into the hall. I leaned against the wall outside the classroom. My hands 
were shaking. My knees trembled. 

I could still feel the cold, ghostly fingers wrapped around my hand. 

I heard Roxanne inside—volunteering to finish the equation. 

“Sammy.” Ms. Starkling met me out in the hall. “What happened? Are you 
sick? Would you like to see the school nurse?” 

“I’m—I’m not sick,” I stammered. 

I didn’t want to explain what happened. 

I couldn’t explain it. I didn’t even want to try. 

“Are you sure you don’t want to see the nurse? You don’t look well.” Ms. 
Starkling felt my forehead. 

“No. I’m okay,” I lied. “I—I just felt a little dizzy—because I didn’t eat 
breakfast this morning.” 

Ms. Starkling believed me. She sent me to the lunchroom to get something 
to eat. 

As I made my way down the hall, I could still feel the clammy hand 
gripping my fingers. 

Still feel the hot breath on my face. 

Still feel the cold force as it pushed my hand along the board. Guiding it. 
Writing the numbers for me. 

I shivered. 

Maybe Dad is right. Maybe I have been reading too many ghost stories. 

I walked home alone after school. I wanted to be by myself. To think. 

I heard footsteps behind me. Footsteps pounding the pavement. Running 
toward me. 

“Sammy—wait up!” It was Roxanne. 

I pretended I didn’t hear her. I kept walking. 



“Sammy!” Roxanne caught up—out of breath. “What happened to you 
today?” 

“Nothing happened.” 

“Something happened,” she insisted. “Something happened to you in math 
class.” 

“I don’t want to talk about it,” I told her. 

“I’m really good at math,” Roxanne said smugly. “I’d be happy to help you 
—if you don’t understand it.” 

“I... don’t... need... help,” I replied through gritted teeth. I began to walk 
faster—but Roxanne kept up with me. 

We didn’t talk. 

Finally, Roxanne broke the silence. “Let’s go to the haunted house Saturday 
night. For our project. Okay?” 

“Maybe. I have to get home now. I’ll call you later to talk about it.” 

I broke into a run—and left Roxanne on the sidewalk, staring after me. 

I wanted to get home. 

I wanted to think about everything that had happened. 

I wanted to think about it—by myself. 

As I headed into the house, I wondered about my bedroom window. Would 
it be open? I made sure it was closed before I left this morning. But that didn’t 
mean anything. 

I started up the stairs. But I stopped when I heard Brutus meowing loudly in 
the kitchen. He always does that when he wants to go out. 

“Okay. Okay. I’m coming.” 

Brutus started to wail. 

“Hold it down, Brutus. I said I was—” 

I stopped in the kitchen door. 

There was Brutus—crouched on a chair. His fur stood straight up. He pulled 
back his lips in a menacing hiss. 

I followed his gaze—and let out a shriek. 

A pizza sat on the table. 

A slice from the pie floated above the plate—floated up by itself. 

I stared in shock as it rose higher and higher. 

“Who—who’s there?” I stammered. “I know someone is there! Who ARE 


you?” 



7 


“Who are you?” I demanded again. 

No answer. 

I stared at the pizza slice. Stared as it floated in midair. 

I watched as it was chewed up. Bite by bite. 

“Tell me who you are!” I shouted. “You’re really scaring me!” 

Another bite disappeared from the floating slice of pizza. And another. 

“This isn’t happening. It can’t be,” I whispered. 

I’ll close my eyes. When I open them—I’ll see that I imagined the whole 
thing, I told myself. 

And I’ll never read a ghost book again, I promised. 

Or watch a sci-fi movie. 

Another bite of the pizza disappeared. 

I closed my eyes. 

I opened them. 

The slice of pizza was gone. 

I let out a long sigh of relief. 

Then I realized it was gone—EATEN. 

“WHO ARE YOU?” I demanded. “Tell me—right now. Or I’ll—” 

“Sammy—who are you talking to?” Mom stood in the kitchen doorway, 
staring at me. 

“There’s someone here!” I cried. “Someone eating pizza!” 

“I can see that!” Mom said. “I can see that someone has eaten half a pizza 
—before dinner. Sammy, you know you’re not supposed to eat before dinner!” 

“I didn’t! It wasn’t me!” I cried. 

“Of course it wasn’t you,” Mom said. “It was the ghost from this morning 
—right? The one who ate your cereal. Sammy, please. This is serious. How 
many times have I told you—no snacking before dinner. You’re old enough to 
know better!” 

“But, Mom—” 

“No huts! I want you to go up to your room and straighten it up before we 
eat,” Mom ordered. “You left it a mess this morning. Please put your dirty 



clothes in the hamper and make your bed.” 

“But half the day is over. It doesn’t make sense to make my bed now,” I 
argued. 

“Sam-my!” Mom narrowed her eyes. Mom narrows her eyes when she’s 
angry. Right now her eyes were really narrowed. “GO!” 

Mom opened the refrigerator to get a drink. 

I turned to leave the kitchen—and froze. 

Right behind Mom, Brutus started to rise up from the kitchen chair. 
Floating up. Rising higher and higher. 

His fur stood straight up. He gazed down at the floor and let out a cry. He 
stretched out his paws to leap— 

“Mom, look!” I cried. “Look at Brutus!” 

Mom whirled around—too late. Brutus had landed safely back on the 
kitchen chair. 

Mom’s eyes grew really, really narrow. “Go up to your room now, Sammy!” 

What could I do? 

I left the kitchen and headed for the stairs. I turned into my room—and 
gasped. 

My room! 

My room looked like a garbage dump. 

Cereal boxes were strewn on the bed. Greasy food containers and crushed 
juice boxes littered my desk, my dresser, my chair—everywhere. 

I took a step inside and heard a loud crunch. I glanced down—and groaned. 
Frosted Flakes and Corn Pops carpeted the floor. 

“Who did this?” I cried. “WHO TRASHED MY ROOM?” 

I collapsed on my bed—and felt something sticky on the back of my pants. 
“Oooh, gross!” I moaned. “Peanut butter and jelly.” 

I pulled back the blanket for a clean place to sit—and found strands of last 
night’s spaghetti and some half-eaten chicken legs. 

“Who would do this?” I shook my head. “WHO?” 

Does Simon’s room look like this? I wondered. And Mom and Dad’s room? 
I ran down the hall to check. 

Simon’s room was spotless. Mom and Dad’s room was perfectly clean too. 

I walked back to my room—and froze. 

“Sammy!” Mom planted her hands firmly on her hips. Her face burned red 
with anger. “What have you done?” 



8 


“I—I didn’t do it, Mom!” I cried. “I didn’t make this mess!” 

“Give me a break,” Mom sighed. “If you didn’t do it, who did? I didn’t do 
it! Your father didn’t do it! Simon didn’t do it! Tell me, Sammy—who did it?” 

“M-maybe it was Simon.” I didn’t know what else to say. But I shouldn’t 
have said that. 

“First you trash your room. Then you try to blame your little brother! 
Sammy—I don’t know what’s gotten into you! I don’t want to see you 
downstairs until this room sparkles. Your father and I will discuss what to do 
about you later.” 

Mom turned to leave. “And don’t come down for dinner. You’ve eaten quite 
enough!” 

I stood in the center of my room and listened to Mom’s footsteps fade down 
the stairs. 

“How am I going to clean this mess?” I moaned. “It will take me a year.” 

“I’ll help you.” 

Who said that? 

I spun around to face the doorway. 

No one there. 

“Come on, Sammy,” a boy’s voice urged. “Let’s get going, or we’ll never 
clean up this mess.” 

I watched in disbelief as a cereal box floated up from my bed. Floated up 
and threw itself into the trash. 

“Who—who are you?” I stammered. “How do you know my name?” 

Another cereal box started to rise. And another. They tossed themselves 
into the trash too. 

I waited for the boy to answer me. 

But he didn’t. 

I stared at the last cereal box—waiting for it to rise up. 

It didn’t move. 

“Where are you?” I whispered. 

No answer. 



I scanned my bedroom—searching for a sign of him. Where did he go? 

I heard a rustling sound and spun around. 

My pillow hovered in the air. I watched as the pillowcase slid off it—all by 
itself! 

“Where are the clean sheets, Sammy? You know, you should make your bed 
in the morning—like Simon.” 

“How do you know me?” My voice started to rise. “How do you know my 
name? Who are you?” 

“Calm down,” the boy said. “No reason to get stressed. I arrived last night. I 
found out your name from Roxanne.” 

“You—you know Roxanne?” I sputtered. 

“No. I don’t know Roxanne. I heard her use your name last night,” he 
explained. “When she came over to do homework with you.” 

“What... are... you?” I asked slowly. 

My heart pounded as I waited for the boy’s answer. But he didn’t answer 
me. 

“WHAT ARE YOU?” I cried out. “Tell me! WHAT ARE YOU? Are you 
a... GHOST?” 



9 


“A ghost!” The boy broke into a fit of laughter. 

“You don’t believe in ghosts—do you?” the boy asked. 

“No, of course not,” I shouted. “I don’t believe in ghosts. I just believe in 
invisible kids!” 

“Okay. Okay. I see your point,” he said. “No—I’m not a ghost. I’m alive.” 

A loud, scraping sound cut through the air. 

I jumped in surprise—and saw my chair move out from my desk. 

“I hope it’s okay if I sit down,” he said. “Wow—is it hot in here.” 
Yesterday’s math homework floated up from my desk and began fanning the air. 

“Are you the one who keeps opening my bedroom window?” I demanded. 

“Uh-huh. It’s really hot up here. Why do you keep it so hot in your room?” 
he asked. 

“Forget about the window!” I said. “What do you want? Why are you here? 
Did you trash my room?” 

“Uh... I guess I really made a mess in here. I was really hungry. Sorry. But 
I’ll help you clean up.” The boy’s voice grew softer. “I just want to be your 
friend, Sammy.” 

“That’s ridiculous!” I said. “How can you be my friend? I can’t even see 
you! You’re invisible!” 

“I know,” the boy said softly. He sounded kind of sad. “I’ve been invisible 
for as long as I can remember. That’s why it’s so hard to have friends.” 

“Well—where are your parents?” I asked. 

“I don’t know. I really don’t. My parents left me here for some reason. I 
don’t know where they went. I know my name. That’s about it. My name is 
Brent Green, and I’m twelve.” 

Brent Green. An invisible boy. Right in my room. 

It was hard to believe. 

I mean, I’ve read a ton of science-fiction books. And I really believe in a lot 
of that stuff. But an invisible boy right in my room. Whoa! 

“Brent, I don’t know if I can be friends with you. I mean—this is weird.” 

“Sammy, who are you talking to?” Simon walked into my room. He 
glanced around. “Hey! There’s no one here. Were you talking to yourself?” 



I turned away from my desk chair. “Yeah, Simon. I was talking to myself.” 

I didn’t want to tell Simon about Brent. Not yet anyway. I wanted to find 
out more about him first. 

I wanted to be an expert on invisible people before I told anyone in my 
family! 

“You’re nuts, Sammy. You’re really nuts.” Simon gazed around the room. 
“Boy, this place is a total mess. How could you do this? No wonder Mom is so 
angry. You are in major trouble. Major trouble.” 

Simon picked up a chicken bone from my bed. “Yuck!” He held it between 
two fingers, then let it drop back on the sheet. “That’s gross!” 

He tiptoed carefully over the cereal on the floor. 

He slowly made his way to my chair. Brent’s chair. 

“Don’t sit there—” I tried to warn Simon. 

But it was too late. 



10 


I watched as the chair flew out from under Simon. Flew out—all by itself. 

Simon landed hard on the floor! He sat in a glob of grape jelly, his mouth 
gaping open in shock. 

“That was mean, Sammy! I’m telling Mom!” 

“I didn’t do anything!” I protested. “You missed the chair. It was your own 
fault!” 

Simon struggled to his feet and marched out of my room. 

“Ha! Ha!” Brent laughed. “Good one! Right, Sammy? I pulled the chair 
right out from under him!” 

Simon was downstairs right now—telling Mom what a horrible thing I had 
done to him. But I was already in trouble, I decided. So what difference did it 
make? And I had to admit it—watching Simon fall was pretty funny. 

Maybe having an invisible friend wouldn’t be too weird after all. I mean—it 
could be kind of fun. 

“Brent—what is it like to be invisible? I mean—can you walk through 
things?” I asked. 

“No,” Brent answered. “I can’t walk through anything.” 

“Are you... uh... dressed?” I asked. 

Brent laughed. “Don’t worry, Sammy. I’m dressed,” he said. Then he 
sighed loudly. “You know, I’m just a regular kid. I’m just like you—only 
invisible.” 

I’m just like you—only invisible. 

Suddenly I had a great idea. 

“Brent, could you make me invisible? Just for a little while. So I could see 
what it’s like?” 

“I wish I could. That would be fun. But I don’t know how to make someone 
invisible. Sorry,” he apologized. “Hey! I think we’d better get back to work here. 
This place is still a disaster.” 

Brent and I finished cleaning the room just as the front doorbell rang. 

I heard Mom answer it. A second later Roxanne burst into my room, 
carrying about a thousand books. She let them drop to the floor with a crash. 

“Hi, Sammy.” She smiled. “I came over to help you with your homework. I 



brought all my math books.” 

“Boy, am I glad you’re here!” I said. 

Roxanne smiled. “I knew you’d want my help.” 

“Not with that.” I shoved her books aside. “I want you to meet someone. 
His name is Brent—and he’s an invisible boy. And he’s here! Right in this 
room!” 

Roxanne’s eyes opened wide. “An invisible boy?” she whispered. 

“Yes!” I said. “He’s here!” 

Roxanne glanced around my room—and screamed. “I—I see him!” 

“You DO?” I asked. 

“Yes!” she repeated, pointing to my desk. “I see him. He’s standing right 
there!” 



11 


“You can see him?” I gasped, amazed. 

I faced my desk. 

I squinted. 

Stared really hard. 

I didn’t see a thing. 

Roxanne laughed. “Gotcha!” 

She gave me a not-so-friendly clap on the back, and I stumbled forward. 
“I’m tired of this dumb game.” Roxanne groaned. “Do you want to do math or 
not?” 

“But—I’m not kidding,” I insisted. “This is not a joke.” 

Roxanne dropped down on my bed and sighed. 

“I’ll prove it to you,” I told her. “Watch.” 

I gazed around my room, trying to figure out where he was. “Brent—pick 
up one of Roxanne’s books from the floor,” I said. “Show her you’re here.” 

I lowered my gaze to the floor. Wait till she sees this! I thought. She’ll 
totally freak! 

I kept my eyes glued to the pile. Waiting for one of them to float up. 

Nothing happened. 

“PLEASE, Brent,” I begged. 

I grabbed a pencil from my desk. I held it out. “Take this pencil from me. 
Make it float across the room!” 

Nothing. 

Roxanne rolled her eyes. “Please! I don’t have time for these stupid jokes, 
Sammy. Besides, it’s not funny.” 

“Brent? Hey—Brent?” 

It was no use. Brent was not going to cooperate. 

I dropped into my desk chair and threw my hands up into the air. “Thanks, 
Brent. Thanks a lot.” 

“Ready for math?” Roxanne asked. 

“No. I’m not ready,” I snapped. 

“You don’t have to yell,” she said. “Actually—I came over for another 



reason.” She slid off the bed and started collecting her math books from the 
floor. 

“I came over to see if we’re going to the haunted house Saturday night or 

not.” 

“We don’t have to go to the haunted house,” I cried. “We can do our report 
right here. Right in my room. We can do our report on Brent. Brent—The 
Invisible Kid!” 

“Yeah. Yeah. Yeah.” Roxanne started to lift her big pile of books from the 
floor. “The Invisible Kid. Right.” 

My shoulders sagged. 

“Listen, Sammy. We have to start our project. It’s going to be the best report 
in the whole class. No—it will be the best report anyone ever did in the history 
of the whole school.” 

“Can’t we talk about this tomorrow, Roxanne? I’m really not in the mood 
right now.” 

I was tired—and hungry. I hadn’t eaten anything since lunchtime. And I 
wanted to try to talk to Brent again. 

“No! We cannot talk about this tomorrow!” I could see that Roxanne was 
beginning to lose her patience. “We have to start planning now. I want to go to 
Hedge House Saturday night.” 

“What’s Hedge House?” I asked. 

Roxanne sighed loudly. “Hedge House is the haunted house. The one near 
the college. That’s what it’s called. I’ve been reading all about it.” 

Roxanne shuffled through her pile of books. “Here it is! Here’s the book 
about Hedge House. Do you want to hear some of it?” 

Do I have a choice? I asked myself. I leaned back in my chair and tried to 
pay attention. 

Roxanne stood in the middle of the room and began to read. 

“There have been many stories about the horrors of Hedge House,” she 
started. “But the true horror began when the Stilson family moved into town. 
They moved into Hedge House. No one had lived there in years—because 
everyone knew the house was haunted. 

“Tall, dark hedges grew around the house, enclosing it, sealing it off from 
curious eyes. 

“Every year, the hedges grew taller and darker, until they turned the color of 
night and shaded the highest windows. 



“The local people knew why the hedges grew that way. ‘It’s the will of the 
ghost’, they’d say. ‘To keep the house chilly and dark—as cold and icy as the 
spirit itself.’ 

“Everyone knew that—everyone but the Stilson family. 

“From the day the Stilsons moved in, the Hedge House ghost visited ten- 
year-old Jeffrey Stilson’s bedroom. The ghost visited every night. 

“‘Jef-frey,’ the ghost moaned. ‘Jef-frey — I’ve been waiting for you.’ 

“Each night, Jeffrey woke up shaking, frightened. He stared hard into the 
darkness of his room, searching for the man behind the voice. But no one was 
ever there. 

“He told his parents about the nightly visits. Told them again and again. 

“But they didn’t believe him. 

‘“Jef-frey, I’ve been waiting for you,’ the ghost’s voice returned one very 
chilly evening. ‘I need you. ’ 

“‘What do you want?’ Jeffrey cried out. ‘Tell me what you want—’ 

“At the sound of Jeffrey’s voice, the ghost appeared. 

“It was the ghost of a young man. From a time long ago. Jeffrey could tell, 
from the clothes it wore—short, baggy black pants that ended below the knees. 
Black socks pulled up high to meet the pants cuffs. And black boots with shiny 
silver buckles. 

“Jeffrey stared at the ghost. 

“He stared in horror at its black shirt. At the right sleeve that hung loosely 
at the ghost’s side. The sleeve with no arm inside. 

“ ‘Come with me, Jeffrey, ’ the ghost moaned. ‘Come with me—to learn the 
secret of this awful house.’” 

Roxanne closed the book and placed it down on the bed. 

“What’s the secret?” I demanded. “What’s the secret of Hedge House?” 

“I don’t know. I haven’t gotten to that part yet,” Roxanne said. “But I can 
tell you this. I know some people who’ve been inside Hedge House. And they 
say all kinds of spooky things happen there.” 

“Like what?” I asked. 

“Well, they say the doors open and close all by themselves,” she replied. 

I gasped—as the door behind Roxanne opened and closed by itself. 

“That’s right, Sammy,” Roxanne said. “It does make you lose your breath 
when you think about it.” 

The door opened and closed again. 



Very funny, Brent! I thought. 

“And they say the books float right off the bookshelves,” Roxanne 
continued. 

Brent began juggling three of my schoolbooks behind Roxanne’s back. 
Round and round they went, with the middle one always popping up—right over 
Roxanne’s head! 

I couldn’t help myself. I started to laugh. 

“What’s so funny, Sammy?” Roxanne frowned at me. 

I raised my hand to point behind her. But the books floated back to the 
shelf. 

I sighed. “Nothing.” 

“Good. Because this is not funny. I’m very serious about this report. I want 
it to be the best. And I want you to take great video shots to prove the ghost of 
Hedge House really exists!” 

My video camera floated up from the floor, aimed itself at Roxanne’s back 
—and I burst out laughing again. 

“SAMMY!” Roxanne jumped up angrily. “Quit it!” she shouted. “I’m going 
to strangle you if you don’t stop laughing! This report means a lot to me. It’s not 
just the grade. If I really do find the ghost, it’s going to make me famous!” 

“Huh?” I stared at her. 

Roxanne took a deep breath. Then she continued. “They say the ghost really 
hates light. They say if a light shines on him, he explodes into a rage—and 
destroys anything that is in his path.” 

I heard a soft squeak. 

I glanced around the room—and saw the light-bulb in the ceiling fixture 
turning. Turning all by itself. 

Brent is standing on my dresser, I realized. He’s unscrewing the lightbulb! 

“Roxanne, quick!” I shouted. “Look up at the ceiling! See that? Now do 
you believe me!” 



12 


“Do you see it, Roxanne?” I jumped up from my chair—really excited. Now 
Roxanne would have to believe me! 

I pointed to the lightbulb as it slowly turned in the socket—by itself! 

“See!” I shouted. “Now you believe me—right? It’s the invisible kid!” 

I spun around. I couldn’t wait to see the amazed look on her face! 

Roxanne wasn’t amazed. 

In fact, I couldn’t even see her face. 

She was kneeling down, head bent, gathering her books up from the floor. 

I glanced back up at the ceiling. The lightbulb wasn’t turning anymore. 

“Roxanne! Why didn’t you look?” I cried. “You missed it! You should have 
looked when I told you to!” 

“I should have picked a different partner,” Roxanne groaned. “I’m tired of 
your dumb jokes, Sammy!” 

I collapsed back into my desk chair. 

Roxanne balanced the stack of books in her arms and headed for the door. 
“Oh, I get it!” She whirled around to face me. “Now I understand what you’re 
doing.” 

“Huh?” 

“If you don’t want to come with me to the haunted house—just say so!” 
Roxanne said. “You don’t have to make up these stupid stories.” 

Roxanne was angry. 

I usually enjoy making Roxanne angry. But not this time. 

“An idiot,” she mumbled under her breath. “You must think I’m a total 
idiot. I’m leaving now, Sammy. I’m leaving you —and your invisible friend!” 

Then she stormed out of my room. 

“Are you still here, Brent?” I asked, searching around. 

No answer. 

I jumped up from my chair. 

“I know you’re here, Brent. Why did you do that to me?” I clenched my 
fists into two tight balls. “Why didn’t you show Roxanne that you were here?” I 
cried angrily. 



Silence. 

“Okay. Okay. I’m sorry I yelled. I didn’t really mean to yell at you, Brent. I 
just wanted Roxanne to believe me.” 

I sat back down in my chair. 

I took a deep breath. 

“Did you hear me, Brent? I said I was sorry.” 

No answer. 

“Please answer me,” I pleaded. “I want to talk to you. I want to find out 
more about you!” 

The room remained silent. 

Brent was gone. 

For good? 



13 


Did Brent really leave? 

Did he leave because I yelled at him? I wondered. 

Would he come back? 

I was still asking myself these questions on the way to school the next 
morning. 

An invisible kid. 

An invisible kid was in my room yesterday. 

Whoa! 

This was hard to believe. 

I wanted to tell Mom and Dad about Brent last night. But I wasn’t allowed 
out of my room. Even after I had cleaned it up. 

That was Simon’s fault. He told them I made him fall. So Mom and Dad 
ordered me to stay in my room all night—and think about how lucky I was to 
have a younger brother. 

That took about a second. 

The rest of the night I thought about Brent. 

What did he really want? I wondered, as the school bus rumbled toward 
school. He says he wants a friend. But should I believe him? 

I mean—a kid shows up in your room. An invisible kid. That’s pretty weird 
right there. And then he says he just wants to be your friend. 

Suddenly, I had a bad feeling about him. 

He wants something from me. I just know it. I’ve read tons of books about 
ghosts... monsters... you name it. 

And I can tell you this. They always want something. Your body. Your 
brain. Your blood. Something. 

My body. That’s it. 

That has to be it. 

Brent is a ghost who wants to fool me into being his friend—so he can take 
over my body! 

The thought made me shudder. 

Last night, I’d been too shocked—too amazed—to be frightened of him. 



But now, I had time to think. And I was really getting scared. 

Why did he come to our house? To my room? 

Maybe I can make a deal with him, I thought. Leave me alone—and I’ll 
give you my brother! 

I knew Brent wouldn’t go for that one—but it made me smile. 

I didn’t smile for long, though. 

I walked into school and stopped inside the doorway. I saw Claire, a girl 
from my class, standing by the water fountain. 

“Sure. I’ll go with you after school,” I heard her say. “Don’t worry—I’ll be 
there.” 

My mouth dropped open. 

Claire was talking—to no one. 

I walked slowly to my locker. 

A boy I knew from art class struggled with his lock. “Why can’t I get this 
thing open?” he complained. “It never got stuck before.” 

He turned to his left and said, “Okay—you do it.” 

And there was no kid standing next to him. 

He was also talking to someone invisible! 

I stared down the long hall. 

It was filled with kids. Kids talking. Kids talking to invisible kids! 

The school is filled with them! I realized to my horror. 

The school is filled with invisible people! 



14 


“Sammy!” 

I turned to see who called my name—praying I could see who it was. 

I sighed with relief. 

It was Roxanne. 

“Roxanne! You’re not going to believe—” I started. Then I stopped. 

Roxanne was grinning. 

She walked up to me and laughed right in my face. 

All the other kids in the hall began to laugh too. 

“You—you told everyone?” I sputtered. “You told everyone about the 
invisible kid in my room?” 

Roxanne tried to speak, but she couldn’t. She was doubled over, laughing 
really hard now. She nodded yes. 

“How could you do this to me?” I screeched. 

“Calm down.” Roxanne patted me on the shoulder. “It was just a joke. You 
have to admit we all did a good job of keeping a straight face.” 

“Ha ha,” I said weakly. I didn’t think it was the least bit funny. I’m going to 
get Roxanne for this, I promised myself. I don’t know how—but I will. 

I headed into my classroom with my head down and took my seat quickly. 

The other kids piled into the room. Some of them were still laughing. When 
they saw me, they pretended to talk to invisible people again. 

My face turned red. 

“Everyone is so chatty this morning!” Ms. Starkling noted. “Time to settle 
down. Please take out your homework.” 

“Oh, no,” I groaned. 

I didn’t do my homework last night. I’d forgotten all about it. 

I glanced around the room. 

I was the only one without the assignment. 

“Please pass your homework to the front of the room,” Ms. Starkling said. 

Claire sat in front of me. She waited for me to pass my homework to her 
before she passed hers up. 

I tapped her on the shoulder. “I don’t have it,” I whispered. 



“Uh-oh,” she said. “Did the invisible boy eat it?” Everyone around me 
giggled. 

“Quiet down, class,” Ms. Starkling warned. She collected all the 
homework, then told us to open our math books. 

Ms. Starkling wrote an equation on the board. “Sammy, are you feeling 
better today?” she asked when she finished. 

I nodded yes. 

I mean—what else could I say? No. Ms. Starkling, Em not feeling better. I 
met an invisible kid last night in my room—and now no one will ever believe me. 
Everyone thinks I’m crazy. 

“Good,” Ms. Starkling said. “Would you please come up and show the class 
how to solve this?” 

I couldn’t catch a break today. 

I stood up. 

“Not you, Sammy,” Ms. Starkling said. “I was talking to him.” 

She pointed to the seat next to me. 

The empty seat next to me. 

I glanced up at Ms. Starkling, puzzled. 

“Your invisible friend,” she said. 

That sent the whole class into a new fit of laughter. 

Ms. Starkling laughed. “Sorry, Sammy. I had to get in on the joke too.” 

Sorry? I knew she wasn’t sorry. She was laughing too hard. 

I was so embarrassed. Totally humiliated. 

And that was just the beginning of the day. The afternoon was much worse. 

At lunch period, I went to the library. I took a seat by myself. 

I didn’t want to hear any more invisible boy jokes. 

I didn’t want to talk to anyone. 

I took my tuna sandwich out of my backpack. I placed it on my lap so Ms. 
Pinsky, the librarian, wouldn’t see it. We’re not supposed to eat in the library, 
and I didn’t want to get caught. 

Everyone in school knows that when the librarian gets angry—watch out. I 
remember when Claire made her angry. Ms. Pinsky made Claire write a hundred 
book reports, three pages each! That was last year—but Claire is still writing the 
reports. I think she’s only up to book number twenty. 

I unwrapped the sandwich—and gasped. 

The sandwich began to rise up. 



“Brent—put it down!” I whispered. “What are you doing here?” 

A bite disappeared from the sandwich. 

“I was lonely in your room, all by myself,” Brent said. “And hungry.” 
Another bite of my sandwich vanished. 

I snatched the sandwich away from him. I glanced nervously around the 
room. “You can’t stay here. You have to leave!” 

“Please, let me stay,” Brent begged. “It’s no fun at home without you. I 
need a friend.” 

“Everyone thinks I’m nuts!” My voice started to rise. “Totally NUTS! All 
the kids in school are laughing at me. Even my teacher is making fun of me! You 
can’t stay here, Brent. You can’t—” 

A shadow fell over the table. 

I glanced up. 

The librarian stood over me, frowning and shaking her head. 



15 


“Ssssammy!” she hissed. “Who are you talking to? And why are you talking in 
the library?” 

I gulped. 

Her eyes narrowed into two angry slits. She clenched her lips tightly 
together. 

Then she glanced down at my lap and gasped. “Is that... FOOD?” 

I’m doomed, I realized. I’ll be writing book reports for the rest of my life. 
Thanks, Brent. Thanks a lot. 

“Sammy! How could you?” the librarian exclaimed. “You’ve broken my 
two most important rules!” 

I grabbed onto my seat, waiting for her to really let me have it. But she 
didn’t. 

“This is so unlike you,” she said. Her voice grew kinder. “Would you like to 
talk to the guidance counselor after school today? You know, talking to yourself 
is a sign that you are troubled by something.” 

I glanced around the library—at everyone gaping at me. I could feel my 
face turning hot. I knew I was blushing. 

“No, I’m fine,” I insisted. 

“If something is bothering you—it’s nothing to be ashamed of.” The 
librarian took a seat next to me. 

Now everyone started to whisper. 

I wanted to disappear. 

“Nothing is troubling me. Really,” I insisted, shoving my sandwich back in 
my backpack. 

“Maybe you should have a chat with the guidance counselor anyway,” she 
continued. “I’m sure you’ll find Ms. Turnbull very easy to talk to. I’ll tell her 
you are going to stop by.” 

The librarian was not going to give up. 

“I can’t see Ms. Turnbull after school today. I’m in the relay race in the 
Olympics,” I said. “I can’t miss the race. My whole team is depending on me!” 

“Okay.” The librarian stood up to leave. “But will you promise me 
something?” 



Sure, I thought. I’ll promise you anything—as long as you leave. NOW. 

I nodded yes. 

“I want you to come and see me if anything is bothering you. Will you do 
that?” She patted me on the shoulder. 

I nodded again—and she went back to her desk. 

I slowly glanced around—to see if everyone was still staring at me. 

They weren’t. 

They were all busy talking. Talking to invisible friends. And laughing. 

I shaded my eyes from the sun. It beamed down brightly on the track field. 

The sky was a deep blue. 

The air felt warm. Nice. Not too hot. 

A perfect day for a race. 

I peered into the bleachers. They spilled over with kids from all the schools 
in town. 

More kids arrived, trying to push their way into seats. But the bleachers 
were packed. Kids shouted and shoved and laughed and joked. Everyone seemed 
totally wired. 

My team gathered at one end of the field. I jogged over to them. 

“Hey! Sammy!” Roxanne greeted me and slapped me a high five. “Great 
day for a race! I know we’re going to win—I can feel it!” And then she added, 
“Unless you mess up.” 

“You don’t have to worry about me, Roxanne. I can outrun you any day,” I 
shot back. 

I ran a practice lap around the field. I ran fast and strong. I was pumped up. 
I felt totally confident. 

Three of us were going to run the relay race. 

Jed would start. Jed is a great runner. He’s tall and skinny and can take 
really long strides. 

I would run next. Then Roxanne would finish up. 

The three of us were the fastest runners in the whole seventh grade. 

We couldn’t lose. 

The race was about to begin. I jumped up and down to keep my muscles 
warm. 

I glanced up into the stands—and saw some kids pointing at me. Some of 
them laughed. 



“Oh, noooo,” I moaned. I know what they’re talking about. My invisible 
friend. 

After this race, you are going to keep a promise you made this morning, I 
told myself. You are going to pay Roxanne back—no matter what it takes. 

All my muscles tensed up. 

“Relax. Relax,” I repeated over and over, bending forward and rubbing my 
leg muscles. 

“Ready, Sammy?” Jed high-fived me. “We’re counting on you!” 

“Ready!” I said. 

But I couldn’t stop thinking about the kids in the bleachers—the ones who 
laughed every time they looked at me. 

And I couldn’t stop thinking about Ms. Starkling—and how she made fun 
of me. 

And I couldn’t stop thinking about the librarian—who thought I was totally 

nuts. 

My muscles tightened even more. 

I concentrated hard. Concentrated on shoving all those thoughts out of my 
mind. 

I did some warm-up exercises. My muscles began to loosen up. I started to 
feel better. 

The referee took his place on the field. 

Jed, Roxanne, and I lined up in race order. 

The six teams from the other schools were ready too. We all waited for the 
referee’s signal. As soon as he blew his whistle, the first runner would run 
around the track once—then pass the baton to the next runner. 

I trained my eyes on the referee. My heart pounded. I took a deep breath. 
Then another. 

The whistle blew. 

The race was on! 

Cheers rang out as Jed took off! He ran faster than I’d ever seen him run 
before. Amazing! 

Roxanne and I cheered him on. “Go, Jed! Gooooo!” 

Jed reached the halfway mark before any of the other runners. 

He raced to the finish. Practically flying now. Holding out the baton. 
Holding it out so I could grab it—and run. 

I could hear his sneakers pounding the ground. Dust flew up behind him. 



His face was red. His eyes were wide. 

He was only a few feet away from me. 

I dropped into my racing position. 

I stuck out my hand. Jed stretched out his arm. I grabbed the baton from 
him. The cheers in the bleachers rose to a roar. Here I go! I thought. RUN! 



16 


My shoes pounded the track. I swung my arms hard, gripping the baton in my 
right hand. 

I took long strides, leaning forward, building a rhythm. Faster. Faster than 
I’d ever run. 

The cheers thundered in my ears. “Go, Sammy! Go! Go! Go!” 

That made me run even harder. 

It felt so awesome! 

Without slowing down, I glanced over my shoulder. 

I was way ahead of all the other runners. 

I reached the halfway mark—and sprinted forward. We were going to win 
this race! Yes! 

The three-quarter mark was coming up—and I wasn’t even out of breath. 
The other runners were struggling, still way behind. 

I leaned forward. Pounded the hard track. 

And gasped when I felt a hand grab my shoulder. 

Another hand grabbed my waist. 

“Hey—!” I cried. 

And then I realized what was happening. 

“Brent—get away! What are you doing?” I wailed. 

“I’m going to help you win!” he cried breathlessly. “I’m going to show you 
I’m your friend! Watch!” 

Before I knew what was happening— 

Before I could stop him— 

My feet lifted up off the ground—and I started to fly! 



17 


“No! Stop! Put me down! Put me down!” I shrieked. 

He ignored my cries. He raised me off the ground. 

I flew about a foot. And felt Brent stumble. 

“Let go! Let go!” I screamed. 

I waved my arms wildly, trying to regain my balance. I kicked my legs, 
trying to break free of Brent’s grasp. 

I let out an angry cry as I fell to the track. 

I landed hard on my knees and elbows. Then my head banged down on the 
sharp cinders. 

The baton flew from my hand. I gazed up—and watched in horror as it 
rolled across the field. 

“Ohhhhh.” 

“Sorry, Sammy,” Brent cried from close by. “I only wanted to help. But I 
tripped.” 

I looked up—in time to see the other runners racing by me. 

We were going to lose. Big time. 

I raised my eyes to Roxanne and Jed. They glared back at me. They shook 
their fists angrily at me. 

I sat up. My elbows were scraped raw. My knees were bleeding. 

“Brent! How could you do this to me?” I wailed. 

“I was only trying to help,” he repeated. 

Another runner raced by me. His sneakers kicked up a chunk of cinders and 
mud. SPLAT —into my eyes. 

I felt a hand trying to wipe the mud away. 

I swung out my arm and shoved Brent hard. 

“Ow!” he cried. “Hey—why do you have to be a sore loser? Winning isn’t 
everything, you know.” 

With my head down, I shuffled off the field. As I walked by the bleachers, 
some kids from my school booed me. 

I got some cheers too—mostly from kids on the other teams. 

I could feel Jed’s and Roxanne’s burning glares as I made my way over to 



them. 

Jed didn’t say a word. I think he was too angry to speak. 

Roxanne didn’t have that problem. 

“How could you—you stupid clumsy cretin!” she shrieked. “We could have 
won! You blew it. You really blew it this time!” 

“It wasn’t my fault!” I cried. “It was the invisible kid!” 

Ugh. Wrong thing to say. 

“I wish you were invisible! ” Roxanne cried in disgust. 

I wish I were invisible too, I thought. This has to be the most awful day of 
my life. 

Brent is ruining my life. 

Maybe having an invisible friend would be fun for another kid. But it was 
definitely not fun for me. 

I have to do something about Brent, I decided. 

I have to do something right away. 



18 


“Come on, Sammy. Be a good sport. Measure me.” Simon shoved a tape 
measure in my face. 

“I told you, Simon. You haven’t grown since yesterday! Now—leave me 
alone.” 

I had just returned home from the worst day of my life. I definitely was not 
in the mood to measure Simon. 

“My project is a loser.” Simon lowered his eyes. “A total loser.” 

It was hard not to feel sorry for Simon. He was so serious about his science 
project. 

I tried to cheer him up. “Simon, we just don’t grow that fast,” I said. 
“Maybe you should study something else. How about measuring a puppy? 
Puppies grow faster than we do. Much faster.” 

“But we don’t have a puppy,” Simon replied. 

“How about Brutus? You can measure Brutus,” I said, guiding Simon out of 
my bedroom. 

“Brutus isn’t going to grow any more,” Simon whined. “You know that. 
He’s too old.” 

“I’ll think about it,” I told him. “I’ll try to come up with something you can 
study. But I need to think—alone.” 

I gave Simon a soft shove out of my room. Then I closed the door. 

I flopped down on my bed. And pulled the covers over my head. 

I wanted to disappear. 

I couldn’t face anyone—not Roxanne, not my teacher, not the librarian. Not 
the whole seventh grade. 

I heard a noise. 

I whipped off the blanket—and saw my window sliding up. “Phew. Why is 
it so hot in here?” a familiar voice demanded. 

“Oh, noooo,” I groaned. “You’re back?” 

“Lighten up, Sammy. Why don’t we go out and play some ball or 
something? Take your mind off things. I’m a really good pitcher.” 

“Brent—you have to leave.” 

“Good idea. Let’s leave this stuffy house. We’ll go out. Get a pizza. I’m 



hungry,” he said. “You must be hungry too.” 

“I mean it. You have to go,” I said softly. I didn’t want to hurt his feelings. I 
just wanted him to go. 

“But I don’t want to leave,” Brent replied. “I want to be your best friend. I 
really do.” 

“I can’t be your best friend,” I told him. “It’s not working out.” 

“Just give it a chance,” he insisted. “We’re going to have a great time 
together. You’ll see....” 

“Sammy! Time for dinner!” Mom called up the steps. 

“I’m going downstairs to eat,” I told Brent. “And when I come back—” 

“Don’t worry, I’ll still be here,” he said cheerfully. 

He’s never going to leave, I realized as I headed down for dinner. Never. 
What am I going to do? How am I going to get rid of him? 

There was only one thing to do. 

I took my seat at the dinner table. “Mom. Dad. I have something important 
to tell you.” 

My parents gazed up from their plates. 

I took a deep breath while they waited for me to go on. 

“There’s an invisible kid in my room—and I need your help. I have to get 
rid of him!” 

I had to tell Mom and Dad. 

I didn’t know what else to do. 

Mom and Dad were really smart—for parents. They were scientists, after 
all. They’d know how to get rid of Brent. 

“Not now, Sammy,” Mom said impatiently. “Your father and I had a very 
hard day today. We worked for hours on the Molecule Detector Light—and it’s 
still not working properly.” 

She sighed. “After dinner we’re going down to the basement to work on it 
some more. So eat quickly. We don’t have time for your wild stories.” 

I felt a kick under the table. “Cut it out, Simon.” I glared at my brother. 

“It wasn’t me.” Simon smirked. “It was the invisible kid!” 

Great. Simon, the serious mutant, is trying to be funny. 

I kicked Simon back. 

“Hey—that hurt!” he whined. 

“It wasn’t my fault. Your legs are in the way. They must be growing. Quick! 
Measure them!” I snickered. 



“Ha ha.” Simon rolled his eyes. “Is the invisible kid as funny as you are?” 
He kicked me again. 

“Simon—” I started. 

“Cut it out, you two!” Dad shouted. 

I turned to Dad. “But there really is an invisible kid. You’ve got to believe 
me. I need your help.” 

“Not tonight,” Dad groaned. “Please. Your mom and I had such a terrible 

day.” 

I tried again. “He could be dangerous. He’s upstairs and—” 

“Sammy—not another word. I mean it,” Dad said. “No more crazy stories.” 
So much for smart parents. 

Now what am I going to do? I wondered as Mom placed our dinner on the 
table. I’ve got to get rid of Brent. But how? 

All through dinner, I thought and thought. And by the time Mom served 
dessert, I had an idea! 



19 


“Brent? Are you here?” 

I held out a few pieces of chicken wrapped in a napkin. It was easy 
sneaking it out of the dining room. 

Mom and Dad talked about work all through dinner. Light refraction. 
Frequency waves. The usual stuff. They didn’t pay any attention to me. 

And Simon was too busy worrying about his science project. He was still 
the same size. He even measured his fingernails, but they hadn’t grown, either. 

When no one was looking, I wrapped the chicken in my napkin and placed 
it in my lap—and Brutus wailed. 

Brutus loves chicken. 

He tried to jump into my lap. 

He clawed at the napkin. 

He wailed some more. 

“Can’t you do something about that cat?” Mom asked. “Your father and I 
can’t think.” 

“Come on, Brutus.” I shoved the napkin under my T-shirt. “Let’s go 
upstairs.” 

I jumped up from my chair and waved for Brutus to follow me. He let out a 
sharp cry—and ran in the other direction. 

Wow! Brutus knows! I realized. Brutus knows that something weird is 
upstairs in my room. 

I bet that’s why he won’t sleep in my room anymore! 

I hurried to my room and held out the chicken. “Brent—aren’t you 
hungry?” I stood in one spot. I turned in a circle, holding out the chicken. 

“I’m starving. Thanks. Thanks a lot.” I felt a light tug as Brent took the 
food from my hand. 

I watched the napkin unfold by itself. 

“Mmmm. Fried chicken.” A big bite disappeared. “This is excellent. Your 
mom is a great cook! Thanks.” 

“Roxanne’s mom is a great cook too,” I said. “Better than my mom. Much 
better. I eat at Roxanne’s house all the time. Whenever I can.” 

Brent kept on eating. 



“You should eat at Roxanne’s. You’d see what I mean.” 

Brent kept on eating. 

“Hey! I just thought of a great idea!” I said. “You should be Roxanne’s best 
friend. Roxanne needs a ghost for our school project. You could be the ghost! 
That would make Roxanne so happy! She would have a ghost right in her own 
house. And you’d be happy too—eating all that great food! Come on! I can take 
you over there right now!” 

Brent stopped eating. 

“I am not going to Roxanne’s house,” he declared. “She’s a girl. I don’t 
want to be a girl’s best friend. I want to be your best friend. And I already told 
you—I am not a ghost.” 

The empty napkin floated toward me. “Is there any more chicken?” he 
asked. “I’m still hungry! And how about some dessert?” 

I sat down on my bed and waited for Brent to finish his second helping of 
chicken and the bowl of ice cream I sneaked upstairs for him. 

Then I tried again. “Brent, you have to leave. You have to go.” 

“But I want to be your best friend!” he insisted. “I’m never leaving. 
NEVER!” 

“Don’t you get it? I don’t want you to be my friend,” I told him. “I have 
plenty of friends—at least I did, until you came along.” 

I stood up and paced back and forth across my room. “You are ruining my 
life,” I said. “I want you to leave. I want you to get out of my house and never 
come back!” 

Silence. 

“Do you hear me?” 

More silence. 

“I know you’re here, Brent. Answer me!” 

“Please—can we talk later?” he finally replied. “I’m way tired. I need to get 
some rest.” 

The covers on my bed began to fold down. Then an invisible hand punched 
the pillow. 

“Ahhhh,” Brent sighed. “Your bed is so great!” 

That’s when I lost it. “We cannot talk later. We have to talk now. I want you 
to get out!” I screamed. “NOW!” 

“Really?” Brent’s voice changed. Deeper—and meaner. A lot meaner. 



“Y-yes. Really,” I stammered. 

“And what if I won’t go?” he asked. 

I took a step back—away from the bed. 

I didn’t like the way Brent said that. It sounded like a threat. 

“Well, Sammy—what if I won’t go?” he repeated menacingly. 

I took another step back—and felt a hot hand clamp down on my shoulder. 
I tried to break free—but I couldn’t. He was too strong. 

Brent grabbed my arm. He held it tightly. 

“Leave me alone!” I shouted. “Let me go!” 

But he started to pull me—toward the open window! 



20 


What did he plan to do? 

Push me out the window? 

“Stop! Let go! Hey—let go!” I shot my arms up—and broke free. 

“Sorry,” Brent muttered. “I was just goofing. You know. Good friends 
wrestle sometimes—right? Just for fun?” 

“Fun?” I cried weakly. My heart pounded in my chest. 

He’s dangerous, I realized. 

I don’t think he was kidding around. I think he wanted to shove me out the 
window. 

Frightened, I turned and started to run to the door. But I stumbled over his 
invisible feet and fell hard to the floor. 

Before I could scramble up, I felt his strong hands grab me again. 

“Let go!” I screeched, my voice high and shrill in panic. 

“I was just trying to help you up,” Brent said. 

His hands released me. 

I rubbed my sore wrists. 

“Really. I was just helping you up,” Brent insisted. “You believe me, don’t 
you? Say you believe me.” 

“Okay. Okay,” I grumbled. “I believe you.” 

“Great!” Brent cheered. 

“But you still have to leave,” I told him. “Everyone already thinks I’m too 
weird. I can’t have an invisible boy following me around, talking to me, living in 
my bedroom. Now go. Really. I mean it.” 

“But I can help you,” Brent cried. “I helped you already—with that math 
equation.” 

“Oh, yeah. You helped me all right.” I started pacing my room again. “You 
helped me look like a total geek in front of all my friends—and my teacher.” I 
winced just thinking about it. 

“Okay. I made a mistake. One little mistake,” Brent said. 

“ONE little mistake!” My voice started to rise. “What about in the library 
today? Now the librarian thinks I’m totally crazy. She wants me to see the 



guidance counselor!” 

I couldn’t help myself. I was yelling at him now. “And what about the track 
race? You ruined everything! You made me fall and lose the race. You made me 
disappoint everyone.” 

“Sorry,” Brent said softly. “I thought I could help you win. I just wanted to 
give you a boost.” 

“A boost?” I screamed. “You—you—” 

My closet door opened. 

My new, dark-blue Yankees baseball jacket floated out. “Hey—cool 
jacket!” Brent exclaimed. “I think the sleeves are too long, though. I don’t think 
it will fit me.” 

The jacket slid off the hanger. 

“Give that to me!” I snatched the jacket out of the air. “Now—leave! I don’t 
want you here.” 

“Sammy—who on earth are you yelling at?” Mom stood in my bedroom 
doorway. 

“The invisible kid!” I cried. “He’s here! He’s right here! You’ve got to 
believe me! Brent—say something!” 

Silence. 

“PLEASE, Brent!” I begged. 

Nothing. 

Mom walked over to me slowly, staring at me, shaking her head. She placed 
a hand on my forehead. “You don’t seem to have a fever.” 

“I’m not sick, Mom. I’m fine. Really. And I’m telling the truth.” 

“I don’t know...” Her voice trailed off. Then she studied me carefully. 
“Where are you going?” she asked. 

“I’m not going anywhere,” I said. 

“Then why are you holding your jacket?” 

I stared down at the jacket. “Oh, I just wanted to see if it still fits,” I lied. I 
mean—what else could I say now? 

“Of course it still fits. We bought it for you last week.” Mom stared hard at 
me. She placed her hand on my forehead again. “I don’t know,” she repeated. 
“You haven’t been yourself lately.” 

She glanced at my jacket again. Then she shook her head some more. “Now 
tell me—who were you shouting at?” 

“Uh... no one. I was just rehearsing my lines... for the school play.” 



“You’re in the school play?” she asked. 

“Uh... no. Not exactly,” I said. “I’m rehearsing... in case they ask me to be 
in it.” 

“Sammy, if something is bothering you—you know you can always tell me 
about it. Right?” 

“Right,” I said. 

Mom felt my forehead for the third time. She shook her head—again. She 
started for the door—and stopped. 

“Your father and I have been working very hard. I know we haven’t been 
paying much attention to you. But that’s going to change now. We’re going to be 
here for you. In fact, we’re going to be watching you very closely.” 

Great. 

Mom and Dad were going to start studying me—like one of their science 
projects. 

“It’s way too chilly in here, Sammy.” Mom walked over to my window and 
closed it. Then she left the room. 

“Are you still here, Brent?” I snapped. 

“Yes.” 

“Why did you do that to me? Why wouldn’t you speak to my mother?” I 
demanded. 

“Sorry,” Brent said. “But I don’t want anyone else to know about me. I just 
want to live with you and be your friend.” 

“Well, that’s not going to happen,” I replied sharply. 

I suddenly felt hopeful. Because Mom had just given me a great idea! 

Now I knew exactly what I had to do—to get rid of the invisible boy. 



21 


I ran straight across the hall to the bathroom. I turned the hot-water faucet in the 
shower up all the way. 

Yes! A few seconds later, the mirror started to cloud with steam. Then I 
turned on the hot water in the sink—and in the bathtub too. 

Wow. Was it hot in here! Hotter than a tropical rain forest, I thought. 

Excellent! 

I wiped the sweat from my forehead and raced back into my room. I made 
sure the window was closed tightly. Then I opened the valve on my radiator. I 
kept turning it—until I heard the loud hiss of steam escape into my room. 

Perspiration dripped from my face as the moist, warm air from the 
bathroom drifted into my room. 

“Sammy, what are you doing?” Brent wailed. “It’s too hot in here!” 

I laughed. “Sorry. But this is the way I like it!” 

I raced down the hall and opened the valve on Mom and Dad’s radiator, 
then Simon’s radiator too. I made sure all their windows were shut tight. 

“Sammy, stop!” Brent begged. “It’s too hot! Too hot!” 

I sat in my bed—and waited. 

Beads of sweat formed on my upper lip. My T-shirt, drenched with sweat, 
clung to me. 

Perfect! 

“I—I can’t take it anymore.” Brent’s voice started to grow faint. “I—I can’t 
stay here. It’s... too... hot.” 

Over his low cries, I heard my window slide up. 

And I knew that my plan had worked. Brent was gone—for good. 



22 


On Saturday night, Roxanne and I had planned to go to the movies to see School 
Spirit. But the plan had changed. Roxanne insisted that if I didn’t go to Hedge 
House with her, she’d never speak to me again. 

I believed her. 

“Can you walk a little faster?” Roxanne asked. “It’s getting cold out here.” 

She was right. A heavy fog had settled in. And a strong wind began to blow. 

I shivered in the damp night air. 

We walked quickly, down block after block. “We’re almost there,” Roxanne 
said as we neared the next corner. “Are you ready?” 

I shrugged. “Sure.” 

“Good.” Roxanne stopped. “We’re here.” 

Whoa! I peered up—at the highest, darkest hedges I had ever seen. A wall 
of hedges so thick you couldn’t even see through it! 

“I—I’ve never seen hedges grow so high before,” I stammered. 

“‘It’s the will of the ghost. To keep the house chilly and dark—as cold and 
icy as the spirit itself.’” Roxanne smiled. “I memorized that part from the book I 
read to you.” 

“How do we get in?” I asked, searching for a way through the tall shmbs. 

“You’re lucky you have me for a partner,” Roxanne sighed. “You don’t 
know anything.” 

We walked along the dark hedges until we came to a small opening. I 
peeked inside—and there stood Hedge House. Three stories high, tall and 
narrow, with lots of windows—most of them shattered. Sharp shards of glass 
poked up from the frames. 

Wow! The hedges did grow as tall as the highest windows—just as the book 
said. The shingles on the outside of the house were blackened and rotted with 
age. 

A strong gust of wind blew. 

The hedge tops beat against the pointed roof—and sent a loose shingle 
hurtling through the air. 

Roxanne and I jumped back—just in time. 

I could see Roxanne shiver. 



This house was really creepy! 

“If you’re scared, we don’t have to go in,” I told her. “We can still go see 
the movie.” 

“Me? Scared? Have you totally lost it?” she snapped. “Let’s go!” 

Roxanne headed up the broken stone steps to the front door. I followed right 
behind her. 

She walked up onto the wooden porch. “Be careful,” she said, glancing 
back at me. “These planks are kind of wobbly.” 

She reached out for the front door. She slowly turned the doorknob. 

The door swung open with a creak—and we stepped inside. 



23 


We stood in a large entrance hall. 

A fancy chandelier hung from the ceiling directly over our heads. Crystals 
in the shape of teardrops dangled from it. Crystals draped in a thick layer of dust 
and cobwebs. 

It felt icy cold in here. Much colder than outside. A sour odor rose up to 
greet us. 

I shivered. I groped for a light switch, and found one on the wall next to the 

door. 

I flicked the switch—but nothing happened. 

“It’s not going to work!” Roxanne whispered. “Nobody has lived here for 
years! Turn on your flashlight.” 

“What flashlight?” I asked. 

“You didn’t bring a flashlight? You were supposed to bring a flashlight,” 
she whispered. 

“I forgot,” I admitted. 

Roxanne sighed. “Did you bring the camcorder?” she demanded. 

“Yes, it’s right here.” I pulled the video camera out of my backpack. 

“At least you remembered something,” she muttered. She started to say 
something else. But instead, a cry escaped her lips. 

“What’s wrong?” I asked. 

“Didn’t you hear something—like a low moan?” she asked, excited. 

“No,” I told her. “I didn’t hear anything.” 

“Oh,” she said. “Well, we just got here. I bet we hear moaning soon. Make 
sure your camcorder is ready.” 

We stepped forward—into the living room. Into a cold white mist. 

“I can’t see a thing,” I whispered. “How did the living room get so foggy?” 

“Look.” Roxanne pointed to one of the walls where the fog came seeping 
through the cracks. It entered in narrow streams, then billowed and swirled, 
filling the room. 

I took another step—and the wind howled outside. 

Something white flew at me. 



I jumped back—then realized it was just the curtains. Filmy, white curtains 
flapping over the broken front windows. Flapping hard. 

Another gust blew. Stronger this time. It drove the streams of fog through 
the cracks. 

“There’s nothing in here,” I said. Another shiver ran through me. “Let’s go 
upstairs.” 

Roxanne led the way through the dining room and kitchen before we 
headed toward the steps. Both rooms were empty. Cold and empty. 

We walked down a long hallway. At the end of the hallway we found the 
staircase. The old, wood banister was badly splintered. Parts of it were missing 
completely. 

“Ready?” Roxanne groped the wall as she started up. 

I whispered “yes,” but I wasn’t so sure. I mean—I really didn’t think this 
house was haunted. But it was so dark, and damp, and foggy, and empty.... 
Anyone would be a little scared in here! 

As we climbed the staircase, the steps groaned under our feet. The air grew 
colder. 

At the top of the stairs we faced three doors. We peered into each doorway. 
Into small, dark rooms. 

I let out a relieved sigh when I saw they were all empty. 

We climbed the stairs to the third floor. It took us into a large room. This 
one wasn’t empty. 

Shredded clothing and torn blankets lay scattered on the floor. Three 
pillows sat propped against a wall—slashed, with the stuffing spilling out. 

A toppled wooden chair leaned against an old trunk. 

Roxanne crossed the darkened room and headed for the trunk. 

I kneeled down and studied a piece of black, crumpled material on the floor. 
I picked it up—and gasped. 

It was a black shirt—a black shirt with the right sleeve missing! Just like in 
the ghost story! 

“Let’s check out the trunk,” Roxanne whispered. 

“No! Look at this—” I started, then stopped—as a frightening moan drifted 
up the steps. 

We spun around to face the staircase—and gasped as the steps began to 
creak and groan. 

Footsteps! 



Roxanne’s mouth gaped open. 

My heart began to pound in my chest. 

Roxanne turned to me, but I peered down quickly so she wouldn’t see how 
frightened I was. 

“The—the ghost—is here,” she stammered. “It’s coming! Get the 
camcorder ready.” 

I fumbled for the power switch. It shook as I raised it up in my trembling 
hands. 

The footsteps reached the top of the stairs. 

Roxanne stood in the center of the room—frozen in fear. 

A deep, eerie moan filled the room. Followed by a shrill laugh. 

Then the chair flew across the room. And the lid of the trunk shot open. 

Roxanne leaped back. She took out her notebook and began scribbling 
notes. She was excited—and scared. Her pencil shook as she wrote. 

The lid of the trunk slammed down hard. We both jumped. 

I watched in horror as the chair began to rise up off the floor. It hovered in 
midair, then came down with a loud crash. 

“Don’t just stand there!” Roxanne screamed at me. “The camcorder! The 
camcorder! Get it on video!” 

I lifted the video camera—and the pillows soared through the room. 

The blankets came alive. They seemed to hurl themselves at us. They 
wrapped around our bodies. 

“Yuck!” I cried out. They smelled so sour, so rotten. 

The blankets spun us around like toy tops. Then they dropped to the floor. 

The trunk lid opened and banged closed—again and again. 

The windows slid up and crashed down. 

“It’s a ghost!” Roxanne exclaimed happily. “A real ghost! Do you believe 
it? We’re definitely going to get an A! Let me have that!” 

She grabbed my video camera. And peered through the viewfinder. 

“Noooooooo!” A terrified howl escaped her throat. She dropped the camera. 
It clattered to the floor. 

“Help me, Sammy!” she screamed. “It’s got me! It’s got me!” 



24 


“Let me go!” Roxanne shrieked. “Sammy—help! It’s got me! The ghost—it’s 
pulling me!” 

I gaped in horror as Roxanne’s jacket flew up behind her, tugged by an 
invisible, ghostly hand. 

Her whole body jerked as the ghost pulled—and sent her stumbling across 
the room. 

She tripped and fell to her knees. 

“Owww!” She uttered a terrified cry. Scrambled to her feet, her eyes wide 
with fright. 

I suddenly remembered the camcorder. I’ve got to get this on tape! I told 
myself. I raised the camera. 

Roxanne’s jacket flew out behind her again. “Ohhh—help!” she cried. 

She began to spin in a circle. Round and round. Faster and faster. Whirling 
helplessly, her arms flying up, her hair spinning out behind her head. 

I tried to hold the camcorder steady, but I couldn’t. 

“Drop that stupid camera—and help me! ” Roxanne shrieked as she whirled 
around the room. 

“Get away from her!” I yelled. “Leave her alone!” 

To my shock, Roxanne stopped spinning. Her knees buckled. She fell 
against the wall. Hit hard with a loud THUD. 

“Oh.” She shook her head as if trying to shake away her fear. “The Ghost of 
Hedge House—” she started. 

But before she could finish her sentence, she floated up from the floor. 

“No—please!” Roxanne begged, thrashing her arms wildly, kicking her 
legs. “LET ME DOWN! LET ME DOWN!” 

The ghost must have let go. Because Roxanne slid to the floor. She landed 
on her knees. 

Before she could climb up, a pillow floated from the floor. I stared in shock 
as it pressed itself over Roxanne’s face. 

She uttered a muffled cry. “Help—I can’t breathe! The ghost—he’s 
smothering me!” 

“Nooooo!” A cry tore from my throat as I dove across the room to 



Roxanne. 

“Nooooo!” With a desperate grab, I ripped the pillow away. “Go haunt 
someone else!” I screamed. 

Roxanne dropped to the floor. 

I tossed the pillow away and started toward her. But a cold hand tightened 
around my arm. “Jeffrey — I’ve been waiting for you,” a hoarse voice rasped. 

The Ghost of Hedge House! 

It talked! It talked to me! 

“I—I’m not Jeffrey!” I choked out. 

“Jeffrey — I’ve been waiting for you!” he moaned again. 

Then I felt myself being lifted off the floor. 

Before I could struggle free, the ghost jerked me back and forth—back and 
forth—so hard I thought my neck would snap. 

I wanted to scream. I wanted to fight back. 

But his grip was so strong. I felt so helpless.... 

A sour-smelling blanket rose up and wrapped itself tightly around me. I 
couldn’t move my hands or legs! 

I kicked and squirmed—struggling against the rotted fabric. And finally 
dropped facedown on the floor. 

A shrill laugh rang through the room. 

Roxanne and I staggered to our feet. We headed for the stairs. 

The ghost followed after us, moaning. “Jeffrey — I’ve been waiting for you. 
Jeffrey—come back! I’ve waited so long!” 

We reached the second-floor landing—and the ghost grabbed me from 
behind. “I’ve got you now, Jef-frey!” came his raspy whisper. “I’ve waited so 
long in this old house. So long...” 

His cold hands circled my neck. 

He tightened his grip. I couldn’t breathe! 

“I’m... not... Jeffrey,” I choked out. 

My last words. 



25 


I thought they were my last words. 

Everything flared bright red. The dark room spun and tilted behind the 
swirling red. 

Stars flashed in my eyes. So white and bright, my head ached. I tried to 
blink them away. 

And they faded to black. Everything faded to black. 

The Ghost of Hedge House had another victim. 

But no. 

Not quite. 

A hand grabbed mine. Pulled me. Pulled me from the darkness. 

“Sammy—come on!” Roxanne pleaded in a terrified whisper. “Come on! 
You’re okay! You’re okay!” 

And before I realized it, she had pulled me free. And we were running 
again. Running down the stairs. Through the misty living room. Out the door. 
And into the cold night. 

Breathing the air. The cool, sweet air. 

Breathing and running. 

Alive! 

Yes! Alive! Leaving the Ghost of Hedge House behind. And running. 
Running and breathing. 

The air never smelled so good. The night never looked so beautiful. 
Roxanne ran straight to her house. I watched her throw open her front door. 
She flew inside and slammed the door behind her. 

I jogged the rest of the way to my house. Burst breathlessly inside. And 
checked the front door twice to make sure it was locked. 

My legs trembling, my whole body vibrating, shaking— alive !—I ran up the 
stairs to my room. 

I sat down on my bed—and screamed in terror. Screamed at the black shirt 
draped on my pillow. 

The black shirt of the one-armed ghost! 



26 


“It’s only a shirt,” a voice said calmly. “What’s your problem?” 

I jumped to my feet—and saw a plate hovering in the air. And a sandwich 
vanishing, bite by bite. 

Brent! 

“Didn’t I do a great job?” Brent asked between bites. “Don’t I make an 
awesome ghost?” 

I saw my desk chair slide out. “That was hard work!” he sighed. “Boy, am I 
tired!” 

“You?” I shrieked. “That was you?” 

“I know. I know. I was awesome,” he said. “Jef-frey —I’ve been waiting for 
you!” Then he burst out laughing. 

“I—I—I—” I sputtered. 

“Don’t thank me,” Brent said. “Really. You don’t have to thank me. Now 
you’ll have the best report in school. I told you I could help you. I told you I 
could be your best friend.” 

“Oh, nooo!” I shouted. “Brent! How could you do that to me? You scared 
me to death! You scared Roxanne to death! You really hurt her! And you nearly 
strangled me!” 

“Don’t thank me,” he repeated. “You really don’t have to. I just wanted to 
show that I can help you.” 

“Get out of my house! Get out—now!” I screamed at him. “I mean it!” 

“GET OUT!” I cried, so loud my voice cracked. “Get out, you idiot! You 
nearly killed us! I want you to leave NOW. Get out!” 

I turned to the door and pointed to it. “Get—” 

Dad stood in the doorway, his face filled with concern. “Sammy, I’m sorry, 
son. But you’re too old to have an imaginary friend,” he said softly. 

“No, Dad. You don’t understand! He’s not my friend!” I cried. “He’s not my 
friend! He’s not!” 

Dad wrapped his arm around my shoulders. “Stay calm. Just try to stay 
calm.” 

He walked me to my bed. He made me sit down. 

He grabbed for my desk chair. 



“Don’t sit there!” I gasped. “He’s sitting there!” 

Dad sat down anyway. “Take a deep breath,” he instructed me. “Settle 
down. Now—let’s talk about this friend of yours.” 

“Dad! He’s not my friend. He wants to be my friend, but he’s not. He’s 
driving me crazy!” 

I shoved the black shirt aside and fell back on my pillow. And suddenly I 
had an idea. “I know! I bet we can get rid of him together! Dad—will you help 
me? Will you help me get rid of Brent?” 

“Of course I’ll help you,” Dad replied, his eyes studying me. He stood up. 
Took my hand. Guided me to the doorway. 

“Thanks, Dad! I really appreciate this. Thanks a lot.” I sighed with relief. 

I suddenly felt much better. As soon as Dad said he’d help, all my muscles 
relaxed. 

“Everything is going to be okay,” Dad said softly. 

“I know,” I replied. “I feel better already.” 

“That’s great, son. But can you tell me—what’s troubling you? Do you 
know? What made you invent this invisible friend—Brent?” 

I let out a loud groan. 

Dad didn’t believe me. He led me downstairs. 

“Where are we going?” I asked. 

He didn’t answer me. 

“Dad!” I cried. “Where are you taking me?” 



27 


“Where are we going, Dad? TELL ME NOW!” 

“Calm down, Sammy. We have an appointment with someone who can help 
you,” he finally answered. “Mom and I have talked about your problem with Dr. 
Krandall—and she’s going to see you now.” 

“I—I don’t want to go to a doctor!” I yelled. “I don’t need a doctor!” 

“Don’t worry.” Dad patted me on the back. “You’ll like talking to the 
doctor. She’s really nice. And very understanding.” 

Dad hurried to the kitchen to get his car keys. 

Dad thinks I’m crazy, I realized. He thinks I’ve totally lost it. 

So does everyone else I know. 

There’s no way I can convince anyone that Brent is real. 

He’s going to live with me forever. 

He’s going to ruin my life forever. 

Someone knocked at the door. I pulled it open. 

“Hi, Sammy.” It was Roxanne. “I had to come over!” she said. “I had to 
talk to you about the ghost! Wasn’t that awesome?” 

“Uh-huh. Really awesome,” I murmured. 

“Well, you don’t sound very excited. What’s the matter with you?” She 
headed into the living room and sat down on the couch. 

“Oh, nothing. Everyone thinks I’m crazy—that’s all.” I sat down beside her. 

Brutus sauntered in and curled up in my lap. 

“Did you tell your parents about the ghost? Is that why they think you’re 
crazy? Don’t worry! I’ll tell them it’s all true,” Roxanne assured me. “I’ll tell 
them we really saw it!” 

“It’s not about the ghost—” 

“Okay, Sammy. Let’s go.” Dad walked into the room, jingling the car keys 
in his hand. 

Mom and Simon followed behind him, both wearing very serious 
expressions. 

“Where are you going?” Roxanne asked. “Can I come too?” 

“No, Roxanne. I don’t think that would be a good idea,” Dad said softly. 



“I’m taking Sammy to a doctor. He’s been seeing things.” 

“But everything is going to be okay,” Mom chimed in. She gazed at me 
with a strange smile on her face. “Doctors know how to deal with these things.” 

“You don’t have to take Sammy to a doctor,” Roxanne started. “The ghost 

“Is your invisible friend a ghost? You didn’t tell me that part,” Mom said. 

“Your invisible friend?” Roxanne’s eyebrows shot up. “He’s still in your 
room?” 

“Wait, Dad—don’t take Sammy to the doctor!” Simon exclaimed. 

Whoa. I couldn’t believe this one. Simon was actually sticking up for me. 

“Don’t take him tonight,” Simon added. “Take him tomorrow. He’ll still be 
crazy tomorrow. I want you to help me with my science project tonight. I’m not 
growing fast enough. I want you to help me come up with a new topic.” 

“It will have to wait, Simon. Your brother needs help,” Dad said sternly. 
“Come on, Sammy. Let’s go.” 

“I am not going to a doctor!” I shouted. “Wait. What if I prove that Brent is 
real?” 

I didn’t give them a chance to answer. I had a plan. A really good plan. If it 
worked, they’d believe me. They’d have to believe me. 

I charged down to the basement. And searched Dad’s workbench. 

Where is it? Where is it? I searched frantically. It’s got to be here 
somewhere! 

I cleared the benchtop with a swipe of my hand. Everything clattered to the 
floor. But I found it! 

The Molecule Detector Light. 

I charged back upstairs. “This light lets you see invisible things, right?” I 
waved the light in Dad’s face. “So if I shine it on Brent, we’ll ah be able to see 
him! Right, Dad? Right?” 

“Maybe,” Dad replied doubtfully. “But, Sammy—” 

I ran to the stairs. Everyone followed me. 

Will it work? I wondered. Will it? 



28 


“Where are you, Brent? I know you’re here.” 

Everyone crowded into my room. 

They watched me as I slowly turned in a circle, searching for a clue. 
Searching for something that would tell me where Brent was. 

“Brent!” I called his name. 

He didn’t answer me. 

I turned on the detector light. 

I swept it through the room. 

No sign of Brent anywhere. 

“Sammy, this is silly,” Mom said. She turned to Dad for support, but Dad 
just shrugged his shoulders. 

I kneeled down and swept the light under my bed. 

No Brent. 

“Please put the light down,” Mom pleaded. “We’re wasting time. We have 
an appointment with the doctor.” 

I ignored her. 

“Where are you, Brent? I know you’re here!” I said. “Tell us where you are 
—now!” 

And then, finally, Brent spoke up. “Please. Please don’t do it, Sammy. 
Please—I don’t want you to see me.” 

Mom, Dad, Simon, and Roxanne gasped. 

“See!” I cried. “I told you! I told you he was here! I told you I’m not 
crazy!” 

I swept the light over my desk chair. Onto my bed. In front of my dresser. 
But Brent wasn’t any of those places. 

“Where are you, Brent? It’s okay. You can tell me. I have to show them.” 
“Please. NO!” Brent cried. “I don’t want you to!” 

I jerked open the closet door. 

I shined the light inside—and I saw him! 

“NO! I don’t believe it!” I gasped. “You’re—you’re a MONSTER!” 



29 


“You’re a MONSTER!” I cried again. 

The Molecule Detector Light shook in my trembling hand. I forced myself 
to hold the bright beam steady. 

“That’s why my parents made me invisible,” Brent said softly. “They 
thought I might survive if you couldn’t see me.” 

With my light still focused on him, Brent stepped toward me. 

I leaped back. “What are you going to do?” 

“Whoa—he is so UGLY!” Simon groaned. “Yuck! He has only one head!” 

“And look. He has only two arms—and they’re so short!” Roxanne cried. 
“He can’t wrap his arms around and around himself. How does he keep himself 
warm?” 

“And what’s that dark stuff growing on top of his head?” Simon pointed. 
“Why doesn’t he have tendrils and suction pods like we do? Where are his 
antennae? And how can he see with only two eyes?” 

“Calm down, everyone,” Dad instructed. “You’re not going to harm us—are 
you, Brent?” 

“No. Of course not,” Brent replied. “I just want to be Sammy’s friend.” 

“No! Be my friend!” Simon cried. “I need you for my science project!” 

Simon turned to Dad. “Can I have him, Dad? PLEASE! Can I have him for 
my science project? I really need him!” 

“That wouldn’t be fair,” Roxanne replied. “Sammy found him first!” 

“Everyone—quiet!” Mom ordered. “Brent—I’ve seen pictures of your 
species in a textbook. Hmm... let me see... what are you called?” 

“I’m called a human,” Brent answered shyly. 

“That’s right!” Mom snapped her fingers. “Now I remember. Human.” 

“Yuck,” Roxanne muttered, making a disgusted face. 

“I know I’m ugly,” Brent said sadly. “That’s why I didn’t want you to see 
me...” His voice trailed off. 

I stared at Brent in disbelief. A human. I’d never heard of one before. 

I tore my five eyes away from him and turned to Dad. “I know he’s ugly, 
Dad. But I think I’d like to keep him,” I said. “Can I? I’ll take good care of him. 
I promise!” 



“No. I don’t think so, Sammy.” Dad studied Brent for a moment. “I think 
we’d better take Brent to the zoo.” 

“Huh? The zoo?” I cried. “Why, Dad? Why does he have to live in a zoo?” 
“Well, he’ll get much better care there,” Dad answered. “After all, humans 
are an endangered species!” 







Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats



DEEP TROUBLE II 


Goosebumps - 58 
R.L. Stine 





1 


I’m back. 

That’s what I thought when I arrived on the Cassandra for another summer 
vacation. 

Yes, I, William Deep, Jr., world-famous undersea explorer, am back. 

One year older. One year wiser. One year tougher. 

I breathed in a big gulp of salty air. I gazed at the clear green Caribbean sea 
around me. 

My little sister, Sheena, stood beside me. But I pretended she wasn’t there. 

She sort of ruined the atmosphere for me. She usually does. 

The Cassandra is my uncle’s boat. It’s a floating research lab. 

My uncle, Dr. George Deep, is a marine biologist. My parents sent me and 
Sheena to visit him on our summer vacation. They sent us the year before too. 

Dr. D. lives on the boat in the Caribbean all year long, studying tropical 
fish. It’s fun for us. We get to swim and stuff. My uncle is really nice. And my 
parents figure we’ll learn a lot about science and ocean life while we’re with 
him. 

Last summer I made one of the most shocking discoveries in the history of 
marine biology. 

I found a mermaid. A real mermaid. 

No one believed me, of course. I wasn’t a grownup scientist. I was a 
twelve-year-old boy on vacation in the Caribbean. 

Know-it-all Sheena thought I was lying. 

My uncle, Dr. D., thought I was making it up. He didn’t believe in 
mermaids. 

Until I proved him wrong. 

We didn’t tell anyone about the mermaids. Some really bad guys wanted to 
capture them and put them in cages. To protect the mermaids, Sheena, Dr. D., 
and I agreed to keep them a secret. 

So the world will never know... 

And now, I’m back! I told myself. Billy Deep, one of the greatest explorers 
in the seven seas. 



And I’m not a twelve-year-old kid anymore. 

I’m thirteen. 

And this summer, I’m going to find something big. Something even more 
amazing than a mermaid. 

This time, the world will hear about it. This time I’ll be famous. 

I hope. 


* * * 


The fire coral glowed bright red. I snorkeled near it, careful not to touch it. 

I’d stepped on fire coral once before. It burned my foot like crazy. 

They don’t call it fire coral for nothing. 

I studied the coral wall. Neon-bright fish darted in and out of the delicate 
holes. It was beautiful. There, under the water, everything seemed calm. Quiet. 
Peaceful. 

But I knew better. I was an experienced snorkeler. A snorkeling hero. 

An untrained swimmer wouldn’t have noticed it. That little ripple in the 
water. The way the fish all suddenly disappeared. 

But I felt it. That whiff of danger. 

Something was coming. Something deadly. 



2 


I whirled around—and faced the intruder. 

A giant octopus! 

“WHOOOA!” The snorkel flew from my mouth as I cried out in shock. An 
octopus! It rose up in the water, its purple body as big as mine ! 

I shoved the mouthpiece back into my mouth. And frantically tried to thrash 
away from it. 

But before I could get moving, I felt something cold and soft wrap around 
my throat. 

Ohhhh. 

A tentacle as thick as a human arm. 

Its suction pods snapped to my skin. It started to pull me... pull me down. 

No! 

Gasping for breath, I lifted my head out of the water. And let out a choked 
cry for help. 

I felt another cold tentacle slide around my waist. And then another around 
my chest. 

I thrashed and kicked. But the huge creature was too powerful. The big 
suction pods made loud sucking sounds as they tightened against my skin. 

The tentacles pulled me... pulled me... 

Until everything went black. 

No! No! 

I wasn’t losing consciousness. The blackness that washed around me was 
octopus ink. 

I shut my eyes. Twisted and squirmed. 

But the tentacles pulled harder. Pulled me down into the inky blackness. 

I choked and sputtered. And struggled up to the surface. 

The water tossed and churned, black with octopus ink. 

The big suction pods bit into my bare skin. 

The tentacles tightened... tightened around my ribs, my stomach. 

I couldn’t breathe. Couldn’t move. 

I’m going under, I realized. I’m doomed. Doomed! 



My lungs felt about to explode. 

No! I thought. I can’t die! Not like this! 

There must be a way to make the octopus let go. 

With a last burst of strength, I slid my right arm free. 

Now what? Now what? 

I stretched a finger toward its throbbing, purple belly. 

Red and yellow stars flashed before my eyes. I knew I had little time. I was 
about to pass out any second. 

I reached toward the big throbbing body. With my last bit of strength, I 
wriggled my fingers. Please let this work, I prayed. Please... Then I started 
tickling. 



3 


My fingers tickled the purple belly. 

Tickle, tickle! 

The octopus squirmed. 

Tickle, tickle! 

The tentacles relaxed. 

Yes! Yes! It’s working! The octopus was ticklish! 

Its big body heaved—and it shoved me away. 

“Stop it, Billy!” the octopus whined. “I hate your stupid jokes. Stop tickling 

me!” 

Then the octopus pinched me. 

Okay, okay. So it wasn’t an octopus. It was my little sister, Sheena. 

Sheena always spoils my fun. She has no imagination. She hates to pretend. 
Well... it’s true that she doesn’t look much like an octopus. She looks a lot 
like me, actually. Skinny, with straight black hair. Hers is long, and mine is short. 
We both have dark blue eyes and bushy dark eyebrows. 

She’s younger than I am. She’s only eleven. But she acts like an old lady 
sometimes. She hates games. She likes cold, hard facts. 

“What were you pretending this time?” Sheena teased. “That you were a 
tickle-fish?” 

“None of your business,” I answered. She would never admit that I was a 
great undersea explorer. Had she forgotten about the mermaids? 

It didn’t matter. Other little sisters look up to their big brothers. Not Sheena. 
If I told her I was pretending she was an octopus, she’d never stop teasing 
me. 

“You’re a moron, Billy,” she groaned. 

Do you believe she calls a great undersea explorer a moron ? 

“I’ll show you,” I replied lamely. 

I love to play tricks on Sheena. It isn’t easy to fool her. 

But I had an idea. I thought of a mean trick to play on her that would scare 
her—but good. 

I swam back to the boat. 



I flipped my mask up and climbed aboard the Cassandra. It was a big, 
sturdy boat, about fifty feet long, with a large open deck. Below deck were 
research labs, a galley, and a few cabins for sleeping. 

The white deck steamed in the sun, deserted. It was about noon. 

Dr. D. must be down below, I realized. Perfect. 

I didn’t want him to see me and blow my trick. 

I reached under a stack of life jackets. I pulled out a square, gray vinyl 
pillow I’d hidden there. 

I stared out toward the reef. Sheena was busy snorkeling. She wasn’t 
looking. 

Good. 

Here was my plan: I was going to swim underwater, holding the gray pillow 
over my head. I’d hold it so one of the corners pointed up. You guessed it. Like a 
shark’s fin. 

Then I’d swim at Sheena as fast as I could. She’d think a shark was headed 
straight for her! 

It would scare her to death. I couldn’t wait to hear her screaming to me for 

help. 

“We’ll see who’s a moron,” I murmured to myself. 

I slipped back into the water. Holding the pillow in sharkfin position, I 
started kicking. I swam underwater toward the reef. Toward Sheena. 

After a few minutes, I bobbed up for breath. She hadn’t seen me yet. 

Holding the “sharkfin” high, I paddled closer. Closer. 

Then I heard them. At last. The screams. 

“Shark!” Sheena wailed. “Help! A shark!” 

Ha! Ha! Excellent screaming, Sheena! 

I finally fooled Miss Know-It-All! 

“Shaaark!” she wailed again. 

I couldn’t stay underwater any longer. I had to rise up so I could laugh in 
her face. 

I popped my head above the water. 

Hey! Sheena was swimming frantically toward the boat. She was still 
screaming like crazy. 

But she wasn’t looking in my direction. She hadn’t even seen me. 

“Shark!” she cried again. She made a frightened motion toward the reef. 

I saw it too. A huge sharkfin! A real one! 



4 


“Huh?” I let out a terrified gasp. 

The shark was as big as a whale ! 

Where did it come from? Dr. D. had told us there were no large sharks in 
the area. 

I guess no one told the shark! 

It rose up, tossed by a wave. And I gaped at its silvery-white body—as long 
as a canoe! 

It snapped its massive jaws. The CRAACK echoed over the water. 

“Whooooa!” I let go of the pillow and paddled for the boat as fast as I 
could. My heart raced. The water felt as thick as mud. Why couldn’t I swim 
faster? 

“Hurry, Billy!” Sheena called. I glanced back. 

The gigantic gray fin cut through the water like a powerboat. 

The shark sped straight for us. 

“Swim!” I ordered myself. “Faster! Faster!” 

Sheena and I thrashed toward the boat. I didn’t glance back again. I didn’t 
want to see how close the big shark was! 

Gasping, my entire body aching, I reached the Cassandra. I grabbed the 
side. Almost safe. Almost. 

Sheena scrambled up the ladder ahead of me. 

“Hurry!” I shouted. I clutched the ladder and glanced back. 

The shark roared closer. So close, I could see its glassy black eyes. And its 
mouth full of jagged teeth. 

“Sheena, go!” I screamed. I shoved her up onto the deck and scrambled up 
the ladder. 

“We made it!” Sheena gasped. 

Gasping for breath, my chest heaving, I stared over the rail. 

The shark kept coming! Like a submarine with teeth! 

“NOOOO!” 

I let out a hoarse wail as the huge fish slammed into the side of the boat! 

“NOOOOOO!” 



The whole boat rocked—and tilted. 

I grabbed the rail and held on. 

“Hold on, Sheena!” I shouted. “It’s attacking!” 

I braced myself for another jolt. 

Nothing happened. 

The shark disappeared into the churning water. 

Dr. D. appeared on deck, looking confused. “What’s going on?” he cried. 

Sheena and I ran to him, screaming, “A shark! A shark!” 

“What?” Dr. D. stared out to sea. 

The water gleamed calmly now. Soft waves splashed against the side of the 

boat. 

The monster shark had vanished. 

“Billy—there is nothing out there. What are you talking about?” Dr. D. 
demanded. 

“There was a shark! A huge shark! It chased us,” Sheena cried breathlessly. 
“It crashed into the boat!” 

“A shark?” Dr. D. shook his head. “No way. No way a shark could make the 
boat rock like that.” 

“But it was HUGE!” I screamed. “It was as big as ten sharks!” 

“As big as twenty sharks!” Sheena exclaimed. 

Dr. D. rubbed his bald spot. “I told you two before. I checked the radar. I 
checked out all of my sonic surveyors. There are no large sharks in this area.” 

He stared me in the eye and asked, “Are you sure, Billy? Are you sure you 
saw a shark?” 

“We’re sure!” Sheena insisted. We both knew he’d believe her before he’d 
believe me. 

“Come down to the lab with me, kids,” Dr. D. said. 

We followed him below deck to one of the labs. Dr. D. pointed to a large 
tank in the corner. It held a silvery fish the size of a big dog. 

Sheena gasped. “Wow! I’ve never seen a fish like that before!” 

“Neither have I,” Dr. D. said solemnly. “That’s what bothers me.” 

I stared at the fish as it swam around in the tank. It looked sort of familiar, 
but I didn’t know why. 

“I can’t identify it,” Dr. D. went on. “I’ve never seen a fish this size that 
looks like this. I’ve been searching through all my books, but I can’t find it!” 

He pointed to a stack of books on marine biology. I picked one up and 



flipped through it. It had page after page of cool color photos of all kinds of fish. 

Dr. D. glanced over my shoulder as I examined the book. “It can’t be in that 
section, Billy,” he told me. “All those fish are tiny.” 

I turned a page, looking for the big fish section. Then I turned another page 
—and gasped. 

Dr. D. gripped my shoulder as he stared down at the photo with me. “No!” 
he cried. “It can’t be!” 



5 


We crowded around the book, staring at the photo. It showed a fish exactly like 
the one in the tank. Thin, silvery... but there was one huge difference. 

“It’s a minnow!” Dr. D. exclaimed. “But that’s impossible!” 

I read the words under the picture. “Tropical minnow, one inch long.’” 

I glanced at the fish in the tank. It was more like four feet long! 

Dr. D.’s eyes narrowed as he studied the fish. “How could a minnow get so 
huge?” he wondered out loud. “I must examine it more closely.” 

Sheena and I stood behind him, watching. He studied the picture of the 
minnow through a magnifying glass. Then he turned to the giant minnow, staring 
at its scales, checking every mark. 

“The markings are exactly the same,” Dr. D. murmured. 

“Can I look through the magnifying glass?” Sheena asked. 

“Sure.” Dr. D. passed the glass to her. 

“A minnow...” Dr. D. murmured. “How can this giant fish be a minnow? 
It’s supposed to be as small as your goldfish, Billy.” 

My goldfish! “Whoops,” I cried. “I forgot to feed my goldfish this 
morning.” 

“Better go do it,” Dr. D. said. 

I started toward the lab door. On my way, I spotted a cabinet filled with 
glass bottles. “What’s in these, Dr. D.?” I asked. 

He turned away from the monster minnow to look. “Oh, that’s plankton,” 
he replied. “It’s made of tiny little plants and animals that clump together and 
float around in the water. Lots of fish eat it. I gathered these samples from the 
waters around here.” 

I picked up a bottle. All I could see was murky brown water with greenish- 
brown gunk floating on top. 

Sheena turned the magnifying glass on the plankton. “Gross,” she said. 

“Go ahead and take a bottle, Billy,” Dr. D. suggested. “Feed some to your 
goldfish. They’ll love it.” 

“Thanks, Dr. D.” Clutching the bottle, I headed down the passageway to my 
cabin. 

As I pushed open the door, I said, “Hello, little fish faces. I’ve got a 



delicious surprise for you!” 

But the fish had a bigger surprise for me. Way bigger. 

I stared at the fishbowl. And nearly dropped the bottle of plankton. 
Then I screamed, “NO!” 

I burst out of my cabin. “Help! Help! Dr. D.!” I cried. 

“There’s a head— someone’s head —in my fishbowl!” 



6 


Dr. D. and Sheena hurried out of the lab. I glanced back at my cabin door, and 
— oof !—slammed right into Sheena. 

“Ow!” she whined. “Watch it, Billy!” 

“Billy, what’s wrong?” asked Dr. D. 

“Ahead!” I gasped, pointing frantically to my cabin. 

I struggled to breathe. My stomach lurched. “Oh, wow. Oh, wow. There— 
there’s a human head in my fishbowl!” 

Dr. D. frowned and charged into my room. Sheena and I followed. 

He pushed open the door... and stopped short with a gasp. 

“See!” I shouted. 

The head stared at us, eyes open, through the glass. 

How could Dr. D. and Sheena stand to look at it? It was making me sick. I 
gulped and turned away. 

Sheena giggled. 

Giggled? 

“What’s the matter with you, Sheena?” I demanded. “What’s so funny?” 

She crossed the room and reached into the fishbowl. 

“Sheena, no!” I warned. “Don’t touch it!” 

Sheena laughed—and lifted the head out by the hair. Then she waved the 
head, dripping with water. 

“Oh, nooooo!” I groaned. I stared at the head in horror. 

I could see it clearly now. I could see that it wasn’t a human head after all. 

It was a large doll’s head. 

“Got you back!” Sheena taunted. “Got you back for all the tricks you’ve 
been playing on me all summer!” 

Dr. D. grinned. “You almost fooled me too,” he confessed. “The water in 
the fishbowl made the doll’s head look bigger than it really is. Good one, 
Sheena.” 

“Thanks, Dr. D.” Sheena took a little bow. 

My face felt hot. I knew I was blushing. I was so embarrassed. It just isn’t 
like me to fall for such a stupid joke! 



Besides, I’m supposed to be the joker. Not Sheena. 

I stared into the tank. Something was missing. 

“Hey!” I said. “Where are my goldfish? And where’s my snail?” 

Sheena shrugged. I grabbed her by the neck. “What did you do with them?” 

“Okay, okay, don’t worry,” she said. She pushed me away. “I put them in a 
smaller bowl and left them in the bathroom.” 

“Well, get them!” I insisted. I was really angry. 

“I’m going, I’m going,” Sheena said. She brought my fish and my snail 
back, and I gently returned them to their bowl. 

“Don’t ever touch them again!” I told my sister. “I don’t want anything to 
happen to them.” 

I watched the fish swim around for a minute. They didn’t look right. I 
shook my head. “Something’s the matter with them,” I said. 

“Give them a little plankton, Billy,” Dr. D. suggested. “That ought to perk 
them right up.” 

I grabbed the glass bottle and pulled off the stopper. I poured a little of the 
slimy gunk into the bowl. 

The fish darted to the surface and started eating. They looked much happier. 

“Wow,” I said. “They love it!” 

“I thought they would.” Dr. D. smiled, but his eyes clouded over with 
worry. “Now, kids, no more jokes, please. I’m going back to the lab to examine 
that giant minnow. And I don’t want to be disturbed.” 

“We’ll be quiet,” Sheena promised. 

Dr. D. hardly seemed to hear her. “There’s something strange going on 
here,” he murmured. “Something very, very strange...” 

Little did we know that things were about to get much stranger. 



7 


I paced the deck, thinking hard. I was dying to get Sheena back for that stupid 
doll trick. 

She seemed nervous the rest of the afternoon. Waiting for me to strike. 

But I hadn’t thought of anything good enough. I’d spent all night thinking, 
until I fell asleep. 

Now it was the next day. Sheena’s guard was down. Maybe she’d forgotten 
—forgotten that she’d been the last one to play a trick on me. 

And now it was her turn to be fooled. 

What would make her hair stand on end? I wondered. What would scare her 
so much, she’d scream her head off? 

The shark trick with the pillow had backfired. So I really owed her two 
tricks. 

Maybe I could leave something gross in her bed? 

The morning sun beat down on me. Summer days were hot in the 
Caribbean. I started to get a headache. 

But I finally thought of something good to do to Sheena. 

I grabbed my snorkeling gear and pulled it on. I decided to sneak off and 
explore a little. 

Dr. D. wanted us to stay close to the boat. But he didn’t want to be 
disturbed. So snorkeling seemed like a good idea. 

Mask and snorkel in place, I started down the boat ladder. 

“Caught you!” 

Sheena’s squeaky voice pierced my eardrums. She was always catching me 
doing something. 

“Where are you going?” she demanded. “Dr. D. said to stay close.” 

“I won’t go far,” I insisted. “I’m hot and I’m bored. I can’t sit on deck 
another second.” 

“Then I’m coming with you.” She snatched up her gear and started tugging 

it on. 

I dropped off the ladder and into the water. She slipped in beside me. 

“We shouldn’t be doing this,” she whispered. “What if that shark comes 
back?” 



“The shark is gone,” I said. “Don’t worry. Nothing bad will happen.” 
“Promise?” she asked, pulling down her mask. 

“Yeah. Sure. I promise,” I said. 

It was a peaceful, sunny day. The waves were as gentle as a lake. What 
could happen? 

Sheena and I swam out over the sunlit, gleaming water. We thought we’d 
see lots of pretty little fish. 

We found something else. Something we never expected in a million years. 



8 


I dunked Sheena’s head under the water. When she popped back up for air, I 
shouted, “Shark! Shark!” 

Sheena clonked me on the head with her fist. “Don’t even joke about it, 
Billy.” Still, I caught her glancing around nervously. 

I scanned the horizon too. No signs of a fin anywhere. 

A school of lemon-yellow fish drifted by, glowing like little suns in the 
water. Swimming slowly, I followed them to the coral reef. 

Wow, I thought. The coral made a cool shape at that spot. The fish swam 
through a big pink ring of coral and around a pointy coral peak. 

Sunlight filtered down on it through the water. It looked like the tower of a 
magic sand castle. 

A tiny crab popped out of one of the holes in the coral tower. It saw me 
coming and disappeared. 

The yellow fish suddenly rose to the surface, up to a plankton bed that 
floated on top of the water. 

The plankton looked just like the stuff Dr. D. kept in those bottles in his lab. 

I watched the fish nip at the plankton, just as my goldfish did. 

I surfaced and spit my snorkel out. 

“Sheena, check this out,” I called. 

No answer. 

“Sheena?” 

I saw a splash on the other side of the reef. Another splash. 

I glimpsed Sheena’s flippers as they slapped the water. 

I swam after her. She had her head down, snorkeling. She must have been 
watching something very closely. She swam fast, kicking her fins in a rapid, 
steady rhythm. 

“Sheena!” I called again. She couldn’t hear me. 

She wouldn’t hear me if I swam up beside her and screamed. She’s like that 
sometimes. Like when she does her homework. She gets so into it, she blocks 
everything else out. 

Of course she gets straight A’s. My mom and dad are constantly bragging 
about it. 



I sighed and paddled after her. I had to go get her. She was swimming out to 
sea without even realizing it. 

I watched her through my mask as I swam. What was that up ahead of her? 
A patch of cloudy water? 

Whoa. No. Not water. I’d never seen anything like it before. 

Sheena didn’t seem to see it. She was swimming steadily, straight for it. 
And, to my horror, it began to move! 

I blew water from my snorkel tube and squinted hard through my mask. 
The thing drifted closer. It was pink and rubbery. Like a soft blob of bubblegum. 
It billowed toward Sheena. 

And as I stared at it, it appeared to stretch. 

It billowed and stretched, billowed out like a pink parachute. Until it was 
bigger than Sheena. 

What is that thing? I wondered. Sheena, turn around! Didn’t she see it? 
Didn’t she see it expanding, curling out, stretching in front of her? 

“Sheena! Turn around! Turn around!” 

I wanted to shout. But I couldn’t shout underwater. 

I thrashed hard. Kicked. Spun around. Desperate to get her attention. 

Sheena!—turn around! I thought. Get away from that thing! Get away— 

now! 

But she kept her head down. And swam straight into the billowy pink blob. 
And as I stared on helplessly, it wrapped itself around her. Like an 
enormous pink clam, it opened wide... wider... and slipped itself around her. 
Held her. Held her tight. Pulled her inside. 

And swallowed her. 



9 


For a moment, I froze in terror. 

Then I pulled myself to the surface. Tossed off the mask. And started to 
swim toward her. 

I splashed across the water, racing toward the pink blob. It writhed and 
wriggled with my sister inside it. 

What is it? I wondered. What can it be? 

And then, as I pulled myself closer, I knew what it was. 

I was staring at a jellyfish! 

A jellyfish bigger than a human. 

Whoa! 

I could see through it. I saw the white, filmy slime and the red veins that 
made it look pink. 

And Sheena—trapped inside! 

Poor Sheena. Squirming. Kicking. Slapping at the gooey pink sides of the 
creature. 

Her face pushed up against the veiny jellyfish skin! Through her mask, I 
saw her eyes wide with terror. 

The ugly creature wrapped around her like a slimy blanket, covering her 
whole body. 

She pushed both fists against the filmy, pink curtain. 

I knew she didn’t have much air left in her lungs. 

I had to do something. But what? 

Sheena’s face twisted in panic. 

I’ll have to pry it open somehow, I decided. 

I swam up to the wriggling blob. I tried to grab its side. 

Ugh! My hands slid right off. 

I grabbed for it again. No way. I couldn’t get a grip on it. It was like 
squeezing Jell-O. 

Its skin slapped against me, so slimy and sticky. 

Sheena stared out at me, eyes bulging with terror. 

I tried to wrestle the ugly creature. I dug my fingernails into it. 



It wriggled and throbbed. But it didn’t open. 

Then I realized what I had to do. 

The thought made me want to puke. But I knew I had no other choice. 
Sheena couldn’t hold out much longer. 

I had to slide inside the jellyfish myself. I had to get in there somehow and 
pull Sheena out. 

I swallowed. 

My stomach lurched. 

I lowered my head and dove for the seam, the opening where the disgusting 
pink blob had folded itself in half. 

Here goes! I told myself. 

I’m going inside.... 



10 


I worked my hands inside first. Then I lowered my head and pulled myself in. 
The slime oozed across my face. The red veins rubbed my skin raw. 

I held my breath and worked my way toward Sheena’s feet. If I could make 
it halfway in and grab her feet, maybe I could yank her out. 

The blob pulsed, sucking me deep inside. I inched in, stretching toward 
Sheena’s foot. 

My lungs were ready to burst. I couldn’t hold my breath much longer. 
Closer, closer... 

Aha! My fingers closed around Sheena’s flipper! 

I tugged. Hard. 

Harder. 

She started to move. 

No. 

Oh, no! 

Sheena’s flipper. It came off in my hand. 

I let go of the flipper and reached up a little higher. I grabbed her foot. And 
tugged. 

Sheena slipped down a little. 

I yanked on her foot again. Come on! I thought. Move! 

But this time Sheena didn’t budge. 

The sticky pink skin tightened around us. My insides felt as if they were 
about to explode! 

The jellyfish squeezed us tighter and tighter. 

It was squeezing us to death! 



11 


I couldn’t move. My mind raced. 

How can I get out of here? How? 

There was no way. We were doomed! 

I’m going to black out, I realized. Another second without air, and... 
Suddenly, the jellyfish loosened its grip. With a horrible sucking noise, it 
peeled apart. 

It opened! 

I didn’t waste time. I grabbed Sheena and hauled her up. Up, up, to the 
surface. 

We burst out of the water, gasping for air. 

We made it! 

I sucked in a huge gulp of air. Aahh. It was great to breathe again. 

The blue faded from Sheena’s face as the color came back to her cheeks. 
“Are you okay?” I asked her. 

She nodded, still struggling to catch her breath. 

“You sure? Can you talk?” 

She nodded again. “Yes, Billy. I’m just great. I’ve never been better.” 

I knew she was fine. Her old smart-mouth was working perfectly. 

“What happened?” I cried. “Why did the jellyfish let us go?” 

Sheena shrugged. We peered down through the clear water. 

The jellyfish floated a few feet below us. And as we stared down at it, we 
saw why it forgot about us. 

We saw another enormous pink shape slither and slide toward the first one. 
It stretched out in the water as if spreading its wings. 

And then it tried to wrap the other jellyfish inside it. 

The two ugly creatures slapped together. The collision sent up a wave that 
tossed Sheena and me back. 

When I gazed down again, they were wrestling. Folding into each other. 
Slapping and twisting. Struggling to fold the other inside. To swallow it whole. 
Another sticky slap. Another. 

As they struggled, the water churned and swirled. 



The jellyfish monsters broke apart and slammed into each other again. 
Huge waves churned up around us. 

“We’ve got to get back to the boat!” I yelled. 

A wave slapped the side of my head. I choked and spit out a mouthful of 
seawater. 

We struggled to swim against the waves, but they kept knocking us down 
and pulling us out to sea. 

The water was so white and foamy, we couldn’t see the jellyfish fight 
anymore. But we could feel them. 

Another wave crashed down on us. I glanced around. “Sheena!” 

She was gone! 

I frantically searched through the foam. “Sheena!” 

Had she gone under? 

CRASH! Another wave. 

“Sheena, where are you?” I wailed. 

She popped up at last, sputtering and choking. I grabbed her and battled 
against the waves. I fought my way out of the wake of the jellyfish fight. 

A few seconds later, Sheena and I dragged ourselves aboard the Cassandra. 
“That was so weird,” Sheena said after we both had caught our breaths. 
“Those jellyfish—they were as big as cars!” 

“We’ve got to tell Dr. D. about this—right away!” I exclaimed. 

We ran down to the lab. No sign of Dr. D. there. 

“Dr. D.!” I called. “Where are you?” 

“I’ll check the galley,” Sheena said. 

I hurried to see if my uncle was in his cabin. No. The tiny room stood 
empty. 

“He’s not in the galley!” Sheena cried. “I don’t see him anywhere!” 

“Dr. D.!” I shouted. “Dr. D.!” 

No reply. 

Sheena’s chin quivered. I knew she was scared. 

It was impossible. But true. 

“He-he’s gone!” I cried. 



12 


A pang ripped through my stomach. Dr. D. had just—vanished! 

Sheena and I were alone in the middle of the sea! 

“What are we going to do?” I asked softly. 

“Don’t panic,” Sheena said. But her voice shook. “Think. Where could he 
go? Know what? Maybe he just went for a swim.” 

“A swim? A swim?” I cried, my voice rising. “We probably would have 
seen him! Besides, since when does Dr. D. just go for a swim? Never!” 

“Well—there’s always a first time,” Sheena suggested. Her eyes darted 
around nervously. I could see her thinking, trying to stay calm. 

“Maybe he went out in the dinghy,” she suggested. Dr. D. kept a small boat 
on deck for short trips. “Let’s see if it’s gone. Maybe he went out to look for us.” 

“Good idea.” At least it was something. A little hope to cling to. 

We hurried up to the deck. I crossed my fingers, hoping to find the dinghy 
gone. 

If the little boat was gone, that meant Dr. D. was probably okay. He’d be 
back soon. 

But if the dinghy was still tied to the deck, and Dr. D. wasn’t on the 
Cassandra ... 

Then what? 

I raced to the back deck and around to the right— 

“Oh, no.” I sighed. 

The dinghy sat in its usual spot. Dr. D. hadn’t taken it out. 

“Billy, I’m scared,” Sheena whispered. 

I was scared too, but I didn’t want to admit it. Not yet, anyway. 

“Let’s check every cabin again,” I suggested. “Maybe he’s in the bathroom 
or something. Maybe he didn’t hear us calling him.” 

Sheena followed me down the stairs that led below-deck. Halfway down, 
the railing rattled in my hand. 

“Cut it out, Sheena,” I snapped. 

“Cut what out?” she cried. 

Now the whole stairway shook. 



What was she doing? Jumping up and down? 

I turned around to check. She stood perfectly still. 
“See! I’m not doing anything!” 

The boat shook and tilted. 

I clutched the rail to keep from falling over. 
“What’s happening?” I cried. 



13 


“It’s an earthquake!” Sheena shrieked. 

“How can it be an earthquake?” I told her. “We’re on the water— 
remember?” 

We ran down the steps. The boat tilted, and we both banged hard into the 
cabin wall. 

We passed the lab. The bottles of plankton rattled in the cabinet. Everything 
rattled. I heard glasses breaking in the galley. 

I turned down the passage to my cabin—but I couldn’t get by. Something 
blocked my path. 

Something... 

“YAAAIIII!” A scream escaped my throat before I could stop it. 

“What is that thing?” I cried. 

Sheena caught up to me. “Huh? What thing?” 

And then she saw it too. It was hard to miss! 

“A monster!” 

A big creature blocked the passage. It was shiny and black and smooth. And 
almost perfectly round. It sat in a disgusting puddle of thick white slime. 

I’d never seen anything like it before. 

Except—something about it looked familiar. 

“What is it?” Sheena choked out. 

The monster stirred. It shook. 

And then its head poked out. Long, dripping, and gray—like an enormous 
slug. With two antennas sticking out of the top. 

“Billy”—Sheena grabbed my sleeve—“It’s—I think it’s a snail!” 

“You’re right,” I muttered in shock. “It is a snail. A gigantic, monster 
snail!” 

“How did it get on the boat?” Sheena demanded. 

“How did it grow so big?” I added. “It’s blocking the entire passage!” 

Slowly, slowly, the snail lifted its slimy head. It trained its big, sad, watery 
eyes on us—and moaned. 

“Help me! Help me!” it cried. 



14 


“YAAIIII!” Sheena screamed, and clutched my hand. 

I screamed back. “It’s talking!” 

“Kids! Help!” the snail moaned again. 

“Nooooooo! It’s talking! It’s talking! It’s so gross!” 

“Billy, calm down!” the snail scolded. “Stop screaming! I need... help!” 
Sheena and I both gasped. 

We both realized the snail wasn’t talking. It was Dr. D.! 

“I’m trapped. Under the snail!” he choked out. “Can’t breathe. Get me out. 
Hurry.” 

Dr. D.’s hand waved weakly from under the big snail. His fingers were 
dripping with the thick white slime. 

“The slime—it’s as thick as shaving cream!” I murmured. 

“Kids, hurry! Can’t breathe under here! The slime... going up my nose!” 
“What should we do, Dr. D.?” Sheena asked. 

He didn’t reply. 

“He’s suffocating!” I cried. “He’s drowning in snail slime!” 

A groan floated out from under the monstrous snail shell. 

“We’ve got to hurry!” Sheena cried. 

“I’ll tilt the snail over,” I told Sheena. “You pull Dr. D. out.” 

“Okay.” 

Dr. D. moaned. 

“We’re coming! We’re coming!” I cried. 

I pushed the shell. It was heavy. It didn’t move. 

“Try harder, Billy.” Sheena stood nearby, ready to grab Dr. D. and pull him 
out. 

I lowered my shoulder and threw my weight against the snail. “It’s not 
budging!” 

“I have an idea,” Sheena said. “The slime!” 

“Huh? What about it?” 

“The slime can help us,” she explained. She stood behind the snail. “Let’s 
both push the snail from behind. Maybe the slime will make it slide right off 



him!” 

I heard Dr. D. choking under the snail. He was swallowing slime! 

I started to gag. But I swallowed hard. Held my breath. Forced the nausea 
away. 

Sheena and I planted our feet behind the snail. 

“One, two, three, push!” she yelled. 

We threw our weight against the snail. It slid a little bit. 

“One more time—go!” 

We pushed again. 

The snail slowly slid off Dr. D.’s body. It hit the floor with a heavy thud. 

Dr. D. slowly climbed to his feet. He was covered with sticky white goop 
from head to toe. 

He coughed and spat out a big glob of slime. “Not tasty,” he muttered, 
shaking his head. 

“Dr. D.—what happened?” I asked. 

He smeared the gunk from his eyes. “I don’t know. All of a sudden, the boat 
started shaking. I fell down. And the next thing I knew— BOOM !—I found this 
giant snail on top of me!” 

I glanced at the snail. It stood quietly in the passageway, oozing slime. 
Where did it come from? And how did a snail get so big? 

“It seemed to come out of thin air,” Dr. D. said. 

“It looks a lot like the snail in my fishbowl,” I offered. “But my snail is tiny. 
It’s the size of my fingernail.” 

“Dr. D.!” Sheena cried. “We saw two gigantic jellyfish! One of them tried 
to squeeze me to death!” 

“What?” Dr. D. turned to Sheena. “Giant jellyfish? What on earth is going 
on in these waters?” 

The boat lurched. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as I lost my balance. 

The boat rocked hard to one side. We all slammed against the wall. 

“Now what?” Sheena moaned. 

“Grab the rail, kids!” Dr. D. shouted. “We’re tipping over!” 



15 


The boat heaved to one side. The huge snail slid across the floor and crashed into 
the wall. 

Tables drifted across the floor. Pictures fell off the walls. 

Sheena, Dr. D., and I were pressed against the wall. The boat tilted until we 
were practically lying down. 

“What’s happening?” Sheena cried. 

Crash! My cabin door flew open. Something thudded heavily inside. 

“What was that?” I asked. “Something’s going on in my cabin!” 

BOOM, BOOM, BOOM. I heard a heavy pounding sound from my room. 

“What on earth—?” Dr. D. murmured. 

Sheena gulped. “It sounds like some kind of monster!” 

BOOM, BOOM, BOOM. 

“I’m going to check it out,” I said. 

I tried to stand, but the tilt of the boat kept me pinned to the wall. 

“I can’t get up!” I complained. 

Sheena slid along the wall. “Try sliding!” 

I inched along the passageway. Sheena and Dr. D. slid along behind me. 

I came to a closed door—the door to Sheena’s cabin. I tried to step around 
it, but the gravity pull was too strong. I leaned against the door... 

“Whoa!” It flew open. I was about to fall in! 

I grabbed the door frame. Sheena’s cabin floor tilted down behind me. It 
was like being in the fun house at a carnival. 

“Hold on, Billy!” Dr. D. said. 

The floor tilted like a steep hill. If I let go of the door, I’d slide down the 
cabin floor. Then I’d have to crawl my way back up to the passage—if I could. 

I clung to the door frame. The gravity pulled me into Sheena’s room. 

“Help!” My feet slipped out from under me. I felt the wood giving way 
under my fingernails. 

“Pull yourself back up!” Dr. D. instructed. “Don’t let go!” 

I hauled my body uphill and threw myself to the left. I felt my back slap 
against the passage wall. 



I made it. I made it past Sheena’s room. Now all I had to do was slide down 
the passage to my cabin. 

BOOM, BOOM, BOOM. The pounding sound again, inside my cabin. 
Behind me, Sheena and Dr. D. struggled past the gaping door to Sheena’s 
cabin. 

At last I reached my cabin. The pounding grew louder. BOOM, BOOM, 
BOOM. 

What was going on in there? 

I peered through the doorway. 

“My goldfish!” I gasped. “Oh, nooooo!” 



16 


My goldfish bowl had smashed to the floor. My two fish lay in a puddle, 
flopping their tails. 

At least they looked like my goldfish. But there was one difference—one 
huge difference. 

My goldfish were gigantic! 

They filled my cabin. They were the size of small whales! 

Well, maybe not that big. But they were at least as big as me. 

BOOM, BOOM, BOOM. They flopped on the floor, their tails pounding into 
the wood. 

“They—they’re giants!” I gasped. 

“What’s going on?” Sheena cried. “How did everything get so big?” 

“Oh, my. Oh, my!” Dr. D. muttered over and over. “Oh, my!” He seemed to 
be in shock. 

We all stared at the fish. First the minnow, then the snail, and now this. It 
was hard to believe. 

What was happening? Why was everything suddenly growing so huge? 

“I feel like I’m living in some kind of dinosaur world,” I said. “Only instead 
of dinosaurs, we’re surrounded by giant sea creatures!” 

Dr. D. shook his head to clear it. “I’ve got to get a grip on myself. We’ve 
got big problems here!” 

“Huge problems!” Sheena added. 

“No wonder the boat’s tipping over,” Dr. D. said. “Those fish are 
monstrous! Their weight is pulling the boat over.” 

“My goldfish, my goldfish!” I couldn’t believe it. 

They looked beautiful, all golden and shiny. You could really see them now 
that they were so big—nearly as big as horses. Little brown specks on their gills 
and their scales glittered in the sunlight that spilled through my porthole. 

“We’ve got to get rid of them,” Dr. D. said. “Otherwise, they’ll tip over the 
boat.” 

“Can we shove them through the window?” Sheena asked. 

“They’re too big,” Dr. D. said. “We’ll have to haul them up to the deck 
somehow.” 



“And then what?” I asked. 

“Throw them overboard,” Dr. D. declared. “We can’t keep them here, that’s 
for sure.” 

“Maybe they’ll be happier in the ocean,” Sheena reasoned. “They probably 
hated being cooped up in that little bowl, anyway.” 

“But goldfish are freshwater fish!” I protested. 

“We have no choice, Billy,” Dr. D. said grimly. 

“We won’t survive out here. We won’t be able to sail anywhere—unless we 
get these giant fish overboard.” 

I knew he was right. The fish had to go. 

“You two grab the tail. I’ll push from the other side,” my uncle said. 

I tugged on the slick golden tail. “Unh—it’s so heavy!” I grunted. 

The fish flopped. The tail slapped Sheena’s hand. 

“Ow!” she cried. “That hurt!” 

“Hold him still!” Dr. D. ordered. 

We dragged the first fish out of my room—uphill—and into the passage. 
The snail no longer blocked our path. The snail slime in the passage helped us 
slide it out. 

We hauled the big fish up the steps. It flopped on the deck. 

“Good-bye, goldfish,” I said. 

We shoved it overboard. It flipped its tail and swam away. 

“Now we have to do it all over again,” Sheena complained. 

“And what about the snail?” I said. “It’s even heavier than these fish!” 

“One monster at a time,” Dr. D. said. 

As soon as we dragged the other fish overboard, the boat righted itself. 
“What a relief,” Dr. D. said. “I can stand up straight again!” 

“I’m beat,” Sheena whined. “This has been the worst day of my life.” 

We started back down below. The boat looked like the set of a disaster 
movie. Broken glass everywhere, pools of water, floors and walls streaked with 
white slime. And the giant snail sitting in the corner. 

“What are we going to do about him?” Sheena asked. 

Dr. D. sighed heavily. “Let’s just leave him for now.” 

I slipped on a puddle of slime on my way to my cabin. 

My cabin. What a mess. 

It looked as if a giant had come, turned it upside down, and shaken it. 



I headed for the closet to get a mop. I stopped. 

I thought I heard something. 

I listened. Yes. Footsteps. Up on deck. 

“Dr. D.?” I called. 

“Right here, Billy,” he answered. He was busy cleaning up his lab. 

Sheena popped out of her cabin. “Did you hear that?” she asked. 

I nodded. “Someone’s up on deck.” 

Dr. D. came out of the lab, wiping his hands on a towel. He glanced at me, 
then at Sheena. Then he looked up toward the ceiling. 

“If we’re all down here,” he began, “then who’s walking around up there?” 

We crept up the stairs and stepped out on deck. The afternoon sun beat 
down on us. “I don’t see anyone,” I said. “Look behind you,” boomed a deep 
voice. We turned around. There stood three men. Three total strangers. 



17 


The three men stood side by side, wearing shorts, button-down shirts, and 
boating shoes. 

The man who had spoken was tall and thin, with glasses and longish brown 
hair. On his left stood a burly, sunburned blond man. On the right, a curly-haired 
guy with a long, beaky nose on a birdlike face. 

I’d never seen any of them before. What were they doing on our boat? 

Dr. D. cleared his throat. “May I help you?” 

The tall man spoke. “I hope we didn’t frighten you. And I’m sorry to barge 
aboard like this, but we were worried. Are you in trouble? We saw your boat 
tilting dangerously to one side and became alarmed.” 

Dr. D. chuckled, trying to act casual. “We hit some rough water,” he lied. 
“But everything is all right now, as you can see.” 

Where did these guys come from? I wondered. I stepped to the edge of the 
deck and saw a motorboat tied up to the side. 

“I was afraid you were going to tip over,” the man said. “We thought we 
would have to rescue you!” 

“No, no. We’re fine now. Aren’t we, kids?” Dr. D. insisted. 

“Fine?” I blurted out. “What about—” 

Dr. D. squeezed my shoulder. Hard. I shut my mouth. 

Why was Dr. D. acting as if everything were okay? 

When goldfish blow up into monsters, everything is not okay. 

“It was very kind of you to come and help.” Dr. D. let go of my shoulder, 
finally. I rubbed it. 

“My pleasure.” The tall man smiled. “I’m glad there’s no trouble. Always 
happy to help a fellow sailor.” 

He offered his right hand. “I’m Dr. Ritter. These are my assistants, Mel 
Mason and Adam Brown.” Mel was the burly blond one. Adam was the curly- 
haired beaky one. 

Dr. D. shook his hand. “Nice to meet you. I’m Dr. George Deep. This is my 
nephew, Billy, and my niece, Sheena.” 

“Hi, kids. Wow, they look like good, strong swimmers.” 

Dr. D. grinned. “They are.” 



“What kind of doctor are you, Dr. Deep?” Dr. Ritter asked. “A surgeon on 
vacation?” 

Dr. D. shook his head. “No. I’m a marine biologist. The Cassandra is my 
floating lab.” 

“Really?” he asked. “A fellow scientist! Wonderful!” 

Dr. Ritter began to stroll around the deck, gazing at the ropes and 
equipment. His assistants followed him. 

“Tve got a floating lab myself,” Dr. Ritter told us. “Not far from here, as a 
matter-of-fact.” 

He sucked in a big breath of salty air and patted his chest. “Ah, yes. We 
marine biologists are a noble bunch, don’t you think, Dr. Deep? Studying the 
mysteries of the sea. It’s the last true frontier on earth, I always say.” 

Dr. D. trailed after him. “Yes. The last frontier,” he agreed. 

“What are you working on, if I may ask?” Dr. Ritter said. 

Dr. D. cleared his throat. “Oh, Tve got a couple of projects going. I can’t 
really talk about them now, Dr. Ritter. They’re in their early stages. I’m sure you 
understand.” 

The three strangers paused by the ladder where their boat was tied. 

“Yes. Indeed. I guess we should be leaving,” Dr. Ritter said. “I’m glad 
you’re all safe.” 

“Thanks for stopping to help,” Dr. D. said. 

Dr. Ritter put his hand on the ladder. Then he stopped. 

“By the way—you haven’t seen anything strange in the waters around here 
lately, have you?” 

“Strange?” Dr. D. asked. “What do you mean?” 

“Odd fish, unusual creatures, anything like that?” 

Odd fish! I couldn’t hold it in any longer. “We’ve seen all kinds of weird 
stuff!” I gushed. “My goldfish turned into giants! And we saw huge jellyfish 
bigger than a car! Ow!” 

Something sharp poked me in the ribs. My uncle’s elbow. 

Whoops. 

“I’m sorry to hear that,” Dr. Ritter said. 

“Yes, it was really scary!” I agreed. “Ow!” Dr. D.’s elbow again. “What did 
you do that for?” 

He frowned at me. 

What? I thought. What did I do this time? 



“Billy is just joking,” Dr. D. assured him. He played nervously with his 
glasses. 

Dr. Ritter said, “Joking? You weren’t really joking—were you, Billy?” 
“Well...” I gazed up at Dr. D. I didn’t know what to say. 

“I’m really sorry,” Dr. Ritter repeated. “I’m sorry you saw those creatures, 
Billy. Because now I can’t let you go.” 

“Huh?” I gasped. “What are you talking about?” 

“You’ve seen too much,” Dr. Ritter replied solemnly. “And now I have to 
decide what to do with you.” 

He snapped his fingers. The two assistants moved in. 



18 


“Hold on, there.” Dr. D. put his arms around me and Sheena. “Don’t pay any 
attention to Billy. He has a wild imagination.” 

“The wildest,” Sheena piped in. 

“He’s always making up stories,” Dr. D. went on. 

“He’s a big fat liar,” Sheena added. “Everybody knows that.” 

“Believe me, Dr. Bitter,” my uncle pleaded. “We haven’t seen anything 
strange at all. I mean, a giant goldfish? You’re a scientist, Dr. Bitter. You know 
as well as I do that that is impossible.” 

Dr. Bitter opened his mouth to speak. Something stopped him. Aloud noise. 
A loud, lumbering, thudding sound. 

CRASH! PLOP! 

Something broke through the doors and bounced onto the deck. 

The giant snail. 

I dropped my head in my hands. “Oh, no!” 

Dr. Ritter raised an eyebrow. “Looks like your brother is not the big fat liar 
you say he is.” 

“Oh, he’s a big fat liar, all right,” Sheena insisted. “And he’s stupid too.” 

I kicked her in the shins. 

“Ow!” she cried. 

“Kids, quiet!” Dr. D. commanded. 

The burly blond guy grabbed me. He pinned my arms behind my back with 
one hand and gripped me around the neck with the other. 

“Let go of me!” I shrieked. “That hurts!” 

“Quiet—or I’ll really hurt you!” the blond guy threatened. 

The beaky guy grabbed Sheena. She squirmed and tried to kick him. But he 
was too strong for her. 

“Let them go!” Dr. D. cried. 

Mel tightened his grip on me. 

“I’m so sorry, Dr. Deep,” Dr. Ritter said. “I hate to harm a fellow scientist. 
But you shouldn’t have snooped around here. I hate snoops.” 

He sighed. “What a shame you wandered into my plankton beds. What a 



shame you poked your nose into my experiments.” 

“What experiments?” Dr. D. asked. 

Dr. Ritter laid a strong hand on Dr. D.’s shoulder. “I’m working on such a 
brilliant project. It could change the world. It could solve all our problems!” 

“What is it?” 

“Ha-ha. You are a curious fellow!” Dr. Ritter laughed. “Well, I may as well 
tell you. I’ve been injecting a growth hormone into the plankton beds in these 
waters. The fish who feed on the plankton grow to be very large. You’ve seen 
the results yourself.” 

Dr. D. nodded. “But how does that solve any problems?” 

“In my heart, I’m a good man,” Dr. Ritter said. “I don’t want to hurt 
anyone. I want to help everyone ! I plan to raise huge fish to feed the world. No 
one will ever have to go hungry!” 

“Let go of me!” Sheena screamed. Adam still held her tightly. 

“This one is noisy,” Adam complained. 

“Let her go,” Dr. Ritter said. “For now.” 

Adam dropped his arms. But he stayed right behind Sheena. 

“Your experiments sound interesting, Dr. Ritter,” my uncle said. “I’d like to 
hear more. Are they working?” 

Dr. Ritter smiled. I could tell he liked to talk about his work. “Well, there 
are a few kinks at the moment. But nothing I can’t fix.” 

“What are you going to do with us?” Sheena broke in. 

Dr. Ritter frowned at her. “I’m afraid you know too much.” 

“But I am a scientist,” Dr. D. declared. “I would never tell anyone about 
your work. You have my word on that.” 

“Your word isn’t enough,” Dr. Ritter growled. His temper flared. His face 
reddened. “I can’t let anyone steal my idea.” 

“I would never steal!” my uncle insisted. 

“I’ll make sure of that,” the other scientist replied coldly. He turned to his 
two assistants. “Take them.” 

Before Sheena or I could move, Mel and Adam grabbed us and forced us 
into their motorboat. 

I broke away for a second. And scrambled for the ladder, trying to get back 
to the Cassandra. 

But before I could reach it, they grabbed Dr. D. and forced him aboard their 
boat too. 



Mel cut the line with one flick of a knife. Adam started the motor. 

It all happened so fast. We didn’t have a chance. 

Dr. Ritter jumped aboard and grabbed the wheel. He steered the boat out to 

sea. 

“Where are you taking us?” I cried. “What are you going to do?” 



19 


“Get down there!” Adam shoved Dr. D. down into the small cabin. Sheena and I 
stumbled after him. Mel followed behind us. 

“What are you going to do?” I repeated. 

“You’ll see,” Adam growled. 

We marched through a tiny galley. Mel and Adam forced us through a small 
door into a stuffy cabin with a table and chairs. Mel tied Dr. D. to a chair. 

“This really isn’t necessary,” my uncle said softly. I could see he was trying 
to sound calm. 

“Tell that to Dr. Ritter,” Mel muttered. 

Adam tied up Sheena, then me. 

“Not so tight!” I cried. I leaned over and bit Adam’s arm. 

“Good one, Billy!” Sheena bounced in her chair. 

“Hey!” Adam pulled back, rubbing his arm. “This kid bit me!” 

“Bite him back,” Mel muttered. 

Adam bared his teeth at me. But he didn’t bite me. And he didn’t tighten 
my ropes. 

My plan worked. I was tied to the chair—but not as tightly as he thought. 

Mel and Adam studied us. “Okay. We’ve taken care of them,” Mel said. 
“Let’s go get some lunch.” 

They left the cabin, shutting the door behind them. I could hear them in the 
little galley, rattling plates and silverware. 

I glanced out the porthole to my right. The boat was speeding away, far 
from the Cassandra. Out to sea. 

I jiggled my hands, trying to loosen the ropes. They were tied pretty well. If 
I could just get the rope to stretch a little... 

“What could this guy Ritter be up to?” Dr. D. wondered out loud. He wasn’t 
really talking to me and Sheena. He was figuring things out for himself. 

“This plankton he’s invented really does make fish grow bigger,” he said. 
“It could help end hunger in the world.” 

“Isn’t that good, Dr. D.?” Sheena asked. 

I rubbed my wrists against the ropes. Come on, loosen, I thought. 



“It might be good,” Dr. D. went on. “But it could be bad too. It could throw 
the whole balance of nature off.” 

Rub, rub, rub. I tested the ropes. Were they a little looser? 

“I mean, what are these giant fish supposed to eat? More and more 
plankton? They might eat up all the little fish. They might even start eating 
people. Who knows?” 

I stretched my hands against the ropes. The knot had loosened! I tried to 
pull one of my hands through. 

No. Still too tight. 

“And Dr. Ritter mentioned some kinks,” my uncle continued. “Some 
problems. I wonder what he was talking about. It could be anything.” 

I strained to hear what Mel and Adam were doing in the galley. It sounded 
as if they had taken their lunch up on deck. 

I yanked the ropes hard. I felt something give. 

I squeezed one hand through the rope. The knot burned against my skin. 

Pulling, pulling... 

I got it out! One hand was free! 

“Dr. D.!” I whispered. I held up my free hand. 

“Good going, Billy!” he whispered back. 

I untied my other hand and leaped up to untie my uncle. 

“Billy, hurry!” Sheena urged me. “Maybe we can sneak off the boat!” 

Then the door flew open. 

“You interrupted my lunch,” Dr. Ritter said, shaking his head. “That’s not 
very polite.” 

He blocked the doorway. Mel and Adam planted themselves beside him. 

“You want to get off the boat?” he asked. “That can be arranged. Mel, 
Adam. Take them on deck!” he ordered. 

Mel and Adam untied Sheena and Dr. D. and dragged us upstairs. Dr. 
Ritter’s lunch—sandwiches, a salad—sat half eaten on a table. 

The two men herded us to the side of the boat. I looked down. 

The ocean churned beneath us. No other boats, not a patch of land in sight. 

No one, nothing to save us. 

Nothing but sea—endless, deep sea. 

And gigantic, hungry, sea creatures. 

“Which one of you will jump first?” Dr. Ritter asked. “Or do you all want 
to go together?” 



I gazed down at the thrashing waves. Then I took a deep breath— 
And got ready to jump. 



20 


The waves crashed beneath me. My heart pounded so hard, it hurt. 

I sucked in a lungful of air. This could be my last breath, I realized. 

“Stop!” Dr. D. cried. “Let me jump, Ritter. Spare the kids. They can’t harm 
you or your experiments.” 

“I think a family should stick together,” Dr. Ritter said. “Especially a family 
of snoops.” 

“We’re not snoops!” Sheena protested. “We can’t help it if we accidentally 
saw some of your big fish!” 

“We won’t tell anyone about them! Really!” I cried. 

Dr. Ritter leaned close to Sheena. “Perhaps you would like to go first?” 

Sheena glared at him, but I saw her shaking. I knew she was really scared. 
And Sheena hardly ever gets scared. 

“Leave her alone,” Dr. D. warned. “Take us to an island—any island. 
Whatever is nearest. Then we won’t be able to tell anyone about your plankton 
experiments.” 

Dr. Ritter scowled. “There are no islands nearby. And I can’t take the 
chance. Sorry.” 

Dr. D. refused to give up. He kept trying to stall, to talk his way out of this. 

But there was no way. I could see that. 

Think! Think! I ordered myself desperately. There’s got to be some way to 
escape. There’s got to be. 

I glanced around, searching for something, anything. Maybe a life jacket! 
Didn’t they have life jackets on the boat? Or a floating ring? 

If I could grab some kind of float, at least we’d have a chance. 

But I didn’t see anything on the deck. I craned my neck to look back at the 
stern. 

My heart beat faster. Yes! A rubber lifeboat. 

“What are you looking at, kid?” Mel growled. “You looking for the coast 
guard or something? Believe me, there’s no one around to rescue you so forget 
about it.” 

“I—I wasn’t looking at anything,” I stammered. I was so scared, I could 
hardly breathe. 



“Enough of this stalling around,” Dr. Ritter interrupted. “You’re wasting my 
time. And you’re wasting your breath. And you’re going to need all the breath 
you’ve got. It’s time for a swim.” 

Sheena let out a scream. 

“Let her go,” Dr. D. shouted. 

Two strong hands gripped my shoulders. 

“Help!” I shrieked. “Please—no!” 

But screaming did no good. 

They pushed me over the side. 



21 


I shut my eyes and prepared for the cold shock of the water. 

But I didn’t fall. 

The strong hands didn’t let go. 

I felt myself pulled back into the boat—as a dark shadow swept overhead. 
“Huh?” I blinked several times. Was it a shadow—or my eyes? 

I heard a deafening noise. A clattering. A beating sound. 

I turned to Dr. D. He and the others all had their eyes on the sky. 

A helicopter? I thought. Is it a helicopter? Someone to rescue us? 

No. That clapping, pounding sound couldn’t be a helicopter’s roar. 

Another shadow swooped over the boat. 

And then an ugly cry ripped through the air. 

RRRAAAAAK! RRAAAAAAK! 

“Oh, no!” Dr. D. cried. “Here they come!” 

I shielded my eyes with one hand. And I saw them. 

Swooping low. Two enormous birds. Seagulls. Seagulls as big as my golden 
Lab back home! 

RRRAAAAAK! RRAAiAAAK! Their sharp cries were so shrill, they hurt my 

ears. 

“Here come two more victims of your great experiments, Ritter,” my uncle 
shouted over the pounding of their wings. 

“They must have eaten the plankton too!” Dr. Ritter exclaimed. 

The birds circled the boat. They cast huge shadows over us, their wings 
stretched out like sails. 

As I squinted up at them, they stopped circling. 

And lowered their talons. 

Are they hunting for food? I wondered, staring up at the sharp bird claws, 
gleaming in the sunlight. 

Are we the food? 

Before we could duck or try to hide, the two huge birds soared toward us. 
Talons raised. Ready to clutch their prey. 

Screeching all the way down. 



22 


I froze in panic. 

The screeching rang in my ears. Filled my brain. Made me feel as if my 
head would burst. 

I stared up at the raised talons. 

The shadows of the screeching birds washed over me. 

And then I felt a strong hand pushing me down. Down to the deck. I turned 
back and saw my uncle, his jaw set, his eyes on the sky. 

He pushed Sheena and me down. Then moved over us. Protecting us. 

I couldn’t see them. But I felt the heavy thud as the two heavy gulls landed 
on the boat. 

And then I heard the shouts of Dr. Ritter and his men. Angry shouts, over 
the shrill squawks of the birds. 

I twisted my head. Tried to see. But my uncle pushed my head down again. 
Holding his arms over Sheena and me. 

I heard a struggle behind us. More squawks. More frantic cries. 

I heard the heavy pounding of wings. 

A table fell over. Dishes crashed to the floor. 

A cry of pain. 

“Quick, kids—now’s our chance!” Dr. D. whispered. He pulled us to our 
feet. Then, protecting us with his back, he shoved us across the deck to the 
lifeboat. 

“Billy! Help me untie this thing!” Dr. D. ordered. 

The three of us struggled with the knots that held the lifeboat to the deck. 

“Hurry!” Dr. D. urged us. “Before they see what we’re up to!” 

“RRRAAAAK!” I turned and saw that one of the birds had Adam pinned 
under its sharp claws. Mel and Dr. Ritter were struggling to pull the powerful 
bird off him. 

“This knot’s undone!” Sheena announced. She worked on another knot. 

I nervously tugged at the knot in my hands. I was so scared, I couldn’t 
think. My fingers felt thick and clumsy. 

Hurry! I ordered myself. Hurry—before they catch us! 



Finally, I ripped open the last knot and pulled the lifeboat free. Dr. D. tossed 
it into the water, holding it by a rope. 

“Okay. Let’s go! Jump in! Now!” 

I gripped the rail of the motorboat and braced myself to jump. 

“Hey!” I heard a cry behind me. I turned back and saw Mel staring at us. 
“Hey—they’re getting away!” 

He motioned to us. “Stop!” he shouted. He grabbed a spear gun. “Don’t 
move!” he ordered. 

I hesitated. The sharp point of the metal spear sparkled in the sunlight. 
Would he really shoot us? 

“Go, kids! Now!” Dr. D. cried. 

Mel aimed the spear gun at my uncle—and fired. 



23 


WHOOSH! 

I couldn’t see it. It moved so fast, I could only hear the spear fly through 
the air. 

To my horror, Dr. D. slumped to the deck. 

“You—you shot him!” I shrieked. 

“Dr. D.! Dr. D.!” Sheena cried. We both hurried to his side. 

Our uncle sat up. 

“It—it missed!” He seemed surprised. He leaped to his feet. “Into the 
lifeboat, kids! ” he cried. 

A gull squawked. I heard Adam scream. Mel turned back to help him. 

I took a running jump, shut my eyes, and threw myself overboard. 

PLOP! I landed in the soft rubber boat. Sheena jumped in after me. Then 
Dr. D. 

“Stop, or I’ll shoot!” Dr. Ritter called. He picked up Mel’s spear gun and 
aimed it at us. 

A gull’s wing bumped his arm, knocking the gun into the water. 

We frantically scooped our hands through the water, paddling away from 
Dr. Ritter’s boat. 

“You can’t escape!” Dr. Ritter called after us, shaking his fist. “I’ll get 
you!” 

Dr. D. grabbed the lifeboat paddles. He started paddling with all his 
strength. The ocean pulled us away. 

The ocean turned rough and foamy. A wind kicked up and blasted us, 
churning up huge waves. The waves carried us quickly out to sea. 

Dr. Ritter’s boat faded into the distance. 

“Well, we escaped,” Sheena sighed. “But where are we going?” 

No sign of land anywhere. No sign of another boat. Nothing but water. 
Churning water and crashing waves. 

The rubber lifeboat smacked down hard on the water. “Hold on, kids,” Dr. 
D. shouted. “Here comes a big one!” 

I gripped the sides of the boat as a huge wave tossed us into the air. 



THUMP! We landed in a valley between waves. Then another wave 
smashed over us. 

I shivered, totally soaked. 

“Is everybody okay?” Dr. D. asked. Sheena and I nodded. 

Then a gigantic wave caught us from behind. 

The lifeboat bounced high in the air. I clung to the side. 

But Sheena’s hands slipped off. She flew up into the air—and disappeared 
into the white foam. 

“Sheena!” I screamed. “She fell overboard!” 

Her head bobbed up. “H-h-help!” she sputtered. She sank below again, her 
arms thrashing. 

I waited for her to bob back up. 

Waited. 

Waited. 

Please—I prayed. 

And then there she was. I leaned over the side. Leaned forward. More. 
More... 

And grabbed her arm and hauled her back into the boat. 

“Are you all right, Sheena?” Dr. D. asked. 

She coughed. Water ran down her face. “I think so.” 

Dr. D. held on to her as another big wave drenched us. 

We huddled in the lifeboat, wet, shivering, hungry, and tired. The lifeboat 
puddled with water. It was like sitting in a wading pool. 

The sky grew dark. It would be night soon. 

We’ll have to spend the night out here, I realized. Out here in the middle of 
the ocean. 

We can’t even rest. The ocean is so rough. If we let go of the boat for a 
second, we could be thrown into the sea. 

We had no food, no water. Nothing. 

“It can’t get any worse than this, can it?” I demanded. “Can it?” Sheena 
sneezed. Dr. D. said nothing. It can’t get any worse, I repeated to myself. And 
then it did. 



24 


The sky darkened to black. Then lightning crackled overhead. 

KABOOM! 

A roar of thunder shook our tiny lifeboat. 

Rain poured down on us. Heavy sheets of cold rain. 

“I don’t believe this!” Sheena wailed. She wiped strands of wet hair from 
her face. 

We sat glumly in the boat. The waves bounced us. The wind blew across 
our drenched skin. The rain hammered down on us. 

Lightning ripped across the sky. 

Dr. D. gazed up at the heavy, low clouds and frowned. “It’s not going to let 
up anytime soon,” he announced. 

Great. 

Meanwhile, the lifeboat filled up with water. 

Dr. D. tried to scoop the water out with his hands. “Help me bail, kids!” he 
ordered. “If the boat fills up too much, we’ll sink!” 

We furiously scooped the water out. But the rain filled the boat as fast as we 
could empty it. What were we going to do? 

I took off one of my sneakers and tried bailing water with it. It worked 
better than nothing. So Dr. D. and Sheena used their shoes to bail too. 

The rain roared down for hours. “I’m so tired!” I complained. I threw down 
my shoe. “I can’t bail any more water. I can’t!” 

“Don’t give up, Billy,” Dr. D. scolded. “We’ll make it.” He didn’t sound as 
if he really believed it, though. 

“Don’t worry,” he said, shouting over a boom of thunder. “We’re going to 
be all right.” 

I don’t see how, I thought. If we don’t starve to death, we’ll sink! There’s 
no one around to save us. No one... 

The rain finally stopped. By then it was night. Totally dark. No moon. No stars. 
Just a black sky blanketed by clouds. 

“I’m so cold,” Sheena whined. 

“I’m hungry,” I added. 



“I’m seasick!” Dr. D. admitted. 

“I’m all three,” I told them. “Plus thirsty, tired, and wet.” 

We all laughed. What else could we do? 

When things get this bad, it suddenly seems ridiculous! 

We huddled together for warmth. My stomach growled. 

But I was so tired... so tired. I couldn’t keep my eyes open. I fell asleep. 

I woke up with a THUMP. The boat had hit something. 

I opened my eyes. And stared out at a silvery, pale world. 

I’m dreaming, I thought. I closed my eyes again. 

But then I felt my wet clothes sticking to my skin. 

No, I realized. I’m awake. 

My eyes flew open. Sheena and Dr. D. sat up, yawning and stretching. 
“What’s happening?” Sheena murmured. 

“The boat’s not moving,” I realized. “It stopped.” 

I reached out to touch the water. Instead of water, my fingers sifted through 

sand. 

Dry land! 

“Hey!” I cried. “We’ve landed somewhere!” 

The sky lightened a little. The sun was just rising. I could begin to make out 
where we were. 

“Land!” Sheena shouted. She jumped out of the boat. “Hurray! Land! I 
don’t believe it! I don’t believe it!” 

Dr. D. stood up and stretched. “Wow! That feels good.” 

The sun shone brighter now. I threw myself on the sand. “Bake me, sun!” I 
sighed. 

“I wonder where we are,” Dr. D. said softly, gazing around. 

“Wherever we are, I hope they’ve got food,” Sheena added. 

Our lifeboat had landed on a sandy beach. Up a slope I could see a stand of 
palm trees. Other than that, nothing. No docks, no boats, no houses. 

“No sign of any people,” Dr. D. noted. “I’m going to take a look around.” 
“I’m coming too,” I said. 

“Me too!” Sheena said. 

We followed Dr. D. along the beach. We walked along the edge of the 
water. 

“Look! A coconut tree!” Sheena pointed to a tall tree on the beach. A few 



coconuts nestled in the sand beneath it. 

“Let’s open one,” she insisted. “I’m starving!” 

Dr. D. grabbed a coconut and smashed it against a rock. The coconut split 
open. 

Sheena and I pounced on it. We picked up the broken pieces and chewed 
the coconut meat. 

“Feel better?” Dr. D. asked, sipping coconut milk from the shell. 

I wiped the sweet liquid from my chin. “A little,” I said. “But I could sure 
use a hamburger. Make that two. And a double order of french fries with tons of 
catsup.” 

“Or a pizza,” Sheena added. 

“We’ll catch some fish later,” Dr. D. promised. “We can build a fire and 
cook them.” 

We continued our way around the island. 

“Maybe we’ll find a restaurant,” Sheena wished out loud. 

But after about ten minutes, Dr. D. groaned. “Oh, no!” 

“What is it?” I asked. 

“Look.” He pointed a few yards down the beach. 

Our lifeboat. We were right back where we’d started. 

“You mean, that’s it?” I asked. “We’ve seen the whole island in ten 
minutes?” 

“That’s it.” Dr. D. sighed. “It’s tiny.” 

Sheena sighed too. “I’m still hungry. And I don’t want coconuts!” 

“Looks as if we’ve landed on a deserted island,” Dr. D. said. “But don’t 
worry. We’ll find something to eat.” 

I touched my face. My skin was hot. The sun had felt so good at first—but 
now I was getting sunburned. 

Another question nagged at me. But I was so hungry, I tried to push it out of 
my mind. 

“Billy, run into that clump of palm trees,” Dr. D. ordered. “See if you can 
find some wood to build a fire.” 

I wandered into the grove, hunting for something to burn. There wasn’t 
much to be found. Mostly a lot of vines. 

And that nagging worry wouldn’t go away. 

We were stuck on a tiny island, with nothing but a rubber raft. 

And I had one question, a question I was afraid to ask out loud: 



How were we ever going to get off? 



25 


I found a few sticks and carried them back to the beach. Dr. D. was digging a pit 
for the fire. 

“Good job, Billy.” He took the sticks from me. “This will do for now.” 

Sheena was wading near the shore. I sat down on the sand. “Dr. D.—” I 
began. “What are we going to do? Do you think we’re far from the Cassandra ?” 

Dr. D. sighed. “I’m afraid I have no idea where we are,” he admitted. 

“So—what’s going to happen? Are we going to rot on this island?” I knew 
we couldn’t last long. So far, we’d had nothing to eat but coconuts. 

Dr. D. rubbed two of the sticks together, trying to get them to light. “Maybe 
someone will see our fire. Maybe a plane will fly over us, or a boat will pass by. 
Maybe someone will find the Cassandra empty and come searching for us.” 

I leaned back and gazed at the empty sky. “But that could take forever!” I 
cried. “Nobody even knows we’re missing! Except Dr. Ritter—and I don’t want 
him to find us.” 

I heard a shriek. I turned and saw Sheena running up the beach, waving 
something in one hand. 

“Look! Hey—check this out!” she shouted. “I caught a fish! I caught a fish 
with my bare hands!” 

She held out a small, wriggling silverfish. 

“It’s puny,” I said. 

“So? Let’s see you catch one!” she shot back. 

Dr. D. took the fish and set it on the sand. “It’s better than nothing.” 

“I’ll catch a bigger one,” I declared. 

Sheena and I raced back to the water. We waded in hip-high. A few small 
fish darted around us. 

“These are all pretty small,” I complained. “We need some of Dr. Ritter’s 
plankton to make them grow.” 

“I wouldn’t want to eat one of his giant fish,” Sheena replied, making a 
disgusted face. “Yuck.” 

“Maybe if we go a little deeper we’ll find bigger fish,” I suggested. 

We waded in farther. A silverfish with a black stripe swam past me. 

“That one is a little bigger,” I said. I made a grab for it. Missed. 



I tried again. I swam out a little farther, chasing the fish. 

I guess I waded out deeper than I meant to. Suddenly I felt a sharp pain in 
my foot. 

At first I thought Sheena was pinching me. But the pain quickly swept up 
my whole leg. “Hey—what’s going on?” I cried. I lowered my gaze to the water 
—and let out a frightened scream. 



26 


“Oh, nooooo!” I moaned. 

I stared down at the water—down at the creature beneath the water. 

I saw a hairy back. A brown-purple shell. Enormous pincers. 

And knew I’d been grabbed by a giant crab! 

The crab was as big as a card table. And it squeezed my toe in a pincer the 
size of my dad’s lug wrench! 

“Help!” I screeched. “Ohhhh, help!” 

The crab snapped its claws. I managed to slip my toe out of its grip. 

Slipping and stumbling, I scrambled back to shore as fast as I could. 

“A giant crab!” I shouted. “Hey—look out! It’s following me!” 

Sheena let out a gasp and came splashing out of the water. 

The giant crab scrabbled onto the sand, moving sideways, its hairy legs 
moving rapidly. 

“I don’t believe it!” Dr. D. cried. 

The crab moved toward us with amazing speed, snapping its claws. Click... 
click... CLICK. 

“Into the trees! Quick!” Dr. D. shouted. 

We ran into the palm tree grove. I scrambled up a tree, out of the crab’s 
reach. Sheena climbed up behind me. Dr. D. grabbed the branch of another tree 
and swung himself up. 

The crab watched us from below. It raised its hairy claws as if reaching for 
us. Click... CLICK. 

“If only we could cook it!” Sheena exclaimed hungrily. “That thing could 
feed us for a week!” 

“It must have eaten some of Dr. Ritter’s plankton! Its huge size has made 
this crab very hungry!” 

The crab clicked its big claws, trying to grab us. Its body heaved in and out, 
in and out. 

It stood there for what seemed like hours. 

“How long will it wait before it gives up?” I asked. 

Dr. D. shrugged. “Your guess is as good as mine.” 



I heard a crack. 

At first, I thought it was the crab claws snapping. 

Another crack. Too close to be the crab. 

Coming from right beneath Sheena and me. 

The tree branch. 

Crack. 

To my horror, I realized that Sheena and I were too heavy for it. The branch 
was breaking off the tree. 

My sister and I were about to drop into the crab’s waiting claws. 



27 


With a low cry, I reached up both arms. I tried to grab the branch above us. 

I reached... reached... 

No. My arms were too short. 

“We—we’re falling!” Sheena cried. 

With a loud craaaack, our branch broke off. 

And we tumbled down... down... onto the crab’s hairy back. 

No. 

Onto the hot sand. 

“Huh?” I gasped and spun around. 

The crab had moved away. It was scrabbling rapidly back toward the water. 
Sheena sat up, her expression still startled. 

Our uncle climbed down from his branch. “Are you two okay?” 

We watched the huge creature splash back into the ocean. 

“I’m never going back in that water,” I declared. 

“Who knows what other monsters are waiting in there!” 

“But how will we catch any fish?” Sheena wailed. “We’re going to starve to 
death!” 

Dr. D. wasn’t listening to us. He had turned away and was gazing down the 
beach. “Oh, no!” he cried. “The tide—it came in! The life raft!” 

All three of us started running to the spot where we’d left our lifeboat. But 
it was gone. 

I stared out over the ocean—and I spotted a yellow speck in the distance. 
The lifeboat. 

The tide had carried it away. 

“Now we’ll never get off this stupid island!” I cried. “Never.” 

Dr. D. didn’t reply. He didn’t need to say anything. The worried expression 
on his face said it all. 

We passed the rest of the day keeping in the shade, chewing coconut meat. 

“I’ll never eat coconut again,” Sheena whined. “Not even in candy bars!” 
We didn’t talk much. What was there to say? 



Night fell slowly. We watched the sky fade from blue to purple to black. 

Dr. D. sat up suddenly. “Did you hear that?” he asked. 

I sat up too. And listened hard. 

“What is it?” Sheena asked. 

“It’s coming from the beach,” Dr. D. said. 

We walked quickly down to the beach. Two huge animals splashed and 
played in the water. 

“Whales!” Sheena cried. 

“No—not whales,” Dr. D. said. “Dolphins!” 

The dolphins ate the plankton too, I realized. 

“What’s that yellow thing they’re playing with?” Sheena asked. “It looks 
like—” 

“It is!” I shouted. “Our lifeboat! The dolphins brought it back!” 

The lifeboat rope had tangled around the middle of one of the dolphins. 
Wherever the dolphin swam, the boat trailed behind it. 

“Let’s go rescue it!” Dr. D. cried. He splashed into the water. Sheena and I 
followed him. No time to worry about giant crabs. We had to get that raft. 

We swam out to where the dolphins played. They gurgled at us. They didn’t 
seem afraid of us at all. 

Why should they be? They were a lot bigger than we were! 

They’re only dolphins, I told myself. Dolphins don’t hurt people. 

But I was a little afraid of them. Especially since our visit from the giant 

crab. 

Dr. D. grabbed the edge of the rubber raft. Sheena and I climbed in. 

“Now, if I can just get that rope from around this dolphin...” Dr. D. 
groaned. 

He tugged on the rope. The dolphin began to swim. 

“The dolphin is carrying us away!” Sheena said. “Wait, dolphin! Stop!” 

The dolphin didn’t stop. It kept swimming, faster and harder. 

Dr. D. hauled himself into the boat. 

The island was a speck behind us now. We couldn’t swim back to it if we 
wanted to! The dolphin was carrying us far out to sea. 

“We might as well settle back and enjoy the ride,” Dr. D. said. “There’s 
nothing else we can do.” 


The dolphin pulled us all night long. The sea was calm that night. We slept in the 



boat again. 

When I opened my eyes, everything was gray. Misty. 

I heard the dolphin gurgling and chirping, as if it were talking to us. 

The sun was just about to come up. The ocean was covered with a thick 
blanket of fog. 

The dolphin poked its head over the side of the boat. It had slipped the rope 
off. It was free now. 

With a splash, it swam away. It quickly disappeared through the thick fog. 

I peered through the fog. I could barely see past the lifeboat. We were still 
in the middle of the ocean. But I thought I saw something nearby. Something big 
and white. 

Like a boat. 

My heart sank. 

Oh, no, I thought. I think I’ve seen this boat before. 

I shut my eyes again, wishing it would go away. 

I opened them. There it was. 

No! It can’t be! It’s too horrible! 

I shook Dr. D. “Wake up!” I cried. “Look where we are!” 

Dr. D. opened his eyes. “Huh?” my uncle muttered. “Where are we?” 

“The dolphin carried us back!” I wailed. “Back to Dr. Ritter’s boat!” 



28 


“Oh, no!” Sheena wailed. “Not again!” 

“What are we going to do?” I asked. 

“Shhh!” Dr. D. whispered. “Stay calm. They don’t know we’re here. Maybe 
we can get away somehow.” 

“Get away?” I exclaimed. “To where?” 

“I can’t stay on this raft another minute!” Sheena insisted. “I want to go 
home!” 

“That stupid dolphin!” I muttered. “I thought dolphins were supposed to be 
smart! I can’t believe it pulled us to Dr. Ritter’s boat.” 

The fog surrounded us like a thick gray curtain. It swept in and out, making 
Dr. Ritter’s boat appear to shimmer. 

The rubber raft drifted closer to the boat. I could almost touch the side of 
the bow. 

I thought I saw a word printed there. I did. The name of the boat. 

I strained to read it. I could make out the first few letters. 

C-A-S... 

Huh? 

“Dr. D.!” I cried. “It’s not Dr. Ritter’s boat. It’s our boat! It’s the 
Cassandra !” 

Dr. D. squinted. “Yes!” he cried. “You’re right, Billy!” 

We were safe! Sheena and I jumped up and danced around. 

“We’re home! We’re home! We’re home!” we sang. 

The lifeboat bounced under our feet. “Whoa!” I cried. We nearly tipped it 

over! 

“Sit down, kids,” Dr. D. said. “We’re two feet from safety. We don’t want to 
drown now.” 

We paddled the rubber raft to our boat and dragged ourselves aboard. 

I was so tired. But I couldn’t help doing another little dance on the deck of 
the Cassandra. 

Sheena slapped me five. “Nothing can stop us!” she cried happily. “Not a 
stormy night on the high seas! Not getting stranded on an empty island! 



Nothing!” 

Dr. D. laughed. “I can’t wait to take a shower and go to bed. But first—I’m 
cooking us all a big breakfast.” 

“Pancakes!” I suggested. 

“Pancakes and waffles!” Sheena cried. 

“Breakfast is going to have to wait,” a deep voice said. We all froze. 

Dr. Ritter stepped out of the cabin. “You won’t be hungry much longer,” he 
sneered. 



29 


“I can’t take this!” Sheena wailed. Tears formed in her eyes. 

“Quiet!” Dr. Ritter snapped. 

Dr. D. laid a hand on Sheena’s shoulder and shushed her. “Where are your 
assistants?” he asked Dr. Ritter. 

“That’s none of your business. I don’t need them now. I can take care of 
you myself,” Dr. Ritter replied. “You’re all very tired and weak, aren’t you? 
Even you, Dr. D. That’s what happens when you don’t eat for two days.” 

I glanced at Dr. D. It was true. He looked exhausted. 

“Go ahead,” Dr. Ritter went on. “Get back in the lifeboat. I dare you.” 

My eyes fell on the rubber boat. Dr. Ritter knew what he was doing. I 
would rather have eaten fish guts with horseradish than get back in that thing. 

“What do you want now, Ritter?” Dr. D.’s voice was tired, but angry. “Why 
did you wait here for us?” 

Dr. Ritter scowled. “I can’t let you live. I can’t let you tell the world about 
my plankton.” 

“We promised we wouldn’t tell!” Sheena cried. “Look—cross my heart and 
hope to die.” She crossed her heart and held up her hand, Girl Scout-style. 

Dr. Ritter laughed. “You’re very amusing. I’m so sorry it has to end this 
way. Really, I am.” 

The sun finally burned through the fog. I shivered. I wasn’t cold and wet 
anymore. But Dr. Ritter was giving me chills. 

“All of you—down to the lab,” Dr. Ritter ordered. “Go!” 

He forced us downstairs. Into my uncle’s lab. 

Dr. Ritter stood in front of the cabinet—the one that held the plankton 
bottles. 

“I believe these are the plankton samples you collected, Dr. Deep,” he said. 
“Am I right?” 

Dr. D. nodded. 

“Good. You’ve gathered a lot of my work. You must have been very 
interested in it.” 

“Of course I was,” Dr. D. said. “I’m a scientist.” 

“Yes,” Dr. Ritter hissed. “You’re a scientist. You want to learn more—am I 



right?” 

Dr. D. nodded slowly. 

“Excellent. You asked me earlier about the side effects of my plankton 
experiments, Dr. Deep. About the few kinks I haven’t worked out yet. I think 
now is the time to show you what they are.” 

Dr. Ritter opened the glass door of the cabinet. “When fish eat the plankton, 
they grow huge.” He pointed to the bottles of plankton lined up on the shelves. 

“You’ve already seen that, haven’t you? But what do you think happens 
when a human eats the plankton? Billy? Want to take a guess?” Dr. Ritter asked. 

I took a stab at it. “Um—they grow into giant people?” 

“Wrong!” Dr. Ritter cried. “Sheena? What do you think?” 

Sheena shrugged. “I couldn’t care less.” 

“You should care, Sheena,” Dr. Ritter said. “Because whatever happens, it’s 
going to happen to you.” 

He turned to my uncle. “Dr. Deep? Any guesses? Or have you already 
figured it out in your research?” 

“Just tell us what happens, Ritter,” Dr. D. snapped impatiently. 

“All right. I’ll tell you. When a human eats the plankton, he turns into a 
fish!” 

“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“Is this fairy-tale time?” my uncle groaned. 

Dr. Ritter ignored us. “The human becomes a fish!” he repeated. “Almost 
instantly! And that person will remain a fish—for the rest of his life.” 

“That’s impossible!” Dr. D. protested. “You’re crazy, Ritter. Let us take you 
to shore and get you some help.” 

“I’ll show you who’s crazy,” Dr. Ritter declared. “I’ll prove it to you!” 

He grabbed me by the back of the neck. 

“Hey! Let go!” I shouted. 

He didn’t say a word. He just shoved me up to the glass cabinet. He shoved 
my face close to a row of bottles. Bottle after bottle filled with murky brown 
plankton. 

“Take a bottle, Billy,” he ordered. “Any bottle.” 

He pushed me again, until my forehead nearly knocked a bottle over. Then 
he let go. 

“Go ahead,” he repeated. “Choose one.” 

“Why?” I asked. “Why do you want me to take a bottle?” 



“I’ll tell you why,” Dr. Ritter said. “Because you’re going to drink it, Billy. 
All of it.” 



30 


I stared at the bottles. 

“Take one, Billy,” Dr. Ritter insisted. “Or I’ll take one and pour it down 
your throat.” 

I had no choice. 

I reached up and picked the last one from the middle shelf. 

I stared at it. Disgusting brown and green glop. 

Not exactly the breakfast I had in mind. 

“Wait till you see this, Dr. Deep,” Dr. Ritter said. He stared at me. His eyes 
gleaming. 

“The growth hormone reacted strangely with the plankton,” Dr. Ritter 
explained. “As soon as the boy drinks it, heTl turn into a fish. It takes only a 
minute or two.” 

He grabbed the bottle from me. He opened it and handed it back. 

“Drink.” 

I lifted the bottle to my lips. 

“No!” Sheena cried. 

Dr. D. covered the lip of the bottle with one hand. 

“Wait, Billy,” he said. “This is ridiculous, Dr. Ritter. Stop this silliness 
immediately. And let us go.” 

“I can’t do that. I already explained why,” Dr. Ritter answered. 

“You need help, Dr. Ritter,” Dr. D. said. “You’re not thinking clearly. 
You’re a brilliant man. You could be a great scientist.” 

“I am a great scientist,” Dr. Ritter insisted. “I’m about to prove that to you 
right now! Drink, Billy!” 

Dr. D.’s hand still covered the bottle. 

Thank you, Dr. D., I thought. 

“You can’t be a great scientist if you hurt people,” Dr. D. insisted. “Let us 
go. We’ll get you the help you need. Then you can change the world for the 
better.” 

“You’re an idiot, Dr. Deep,” Dr. Ritter sneered. “You’ll be the next one to 
turn into a fish. Just as soon as I finish with the boy.” 



He swatted Dr. D.’s hand away from the bottle. “Drink that plankton now, 
Billy,” he commanded. “Or I’ll throw you all overboard.” 

I swished the brown liquid in the bottle. 

I gulped. 

It looked so gross. 

But what was my choice? Drown or drink... 

My hand trembled as I raised the bottle to my lips. And I drank it down. 



31 


I made a disgusted face. My whole body shook. 

Then I stood there stiffly. Every muscle tensed. Waiting. 

The others stared at me. They didn’t move, either. 

Sheena’s chin trembled. “I don’t want you to turn into a fish, Billy! Why 
did you drink it? Why didn’t you throw it on the floor?” 

“He would just pick out another bottle for me,” I replied hoarsely. I could 
still taste the liquid in my mouth. I felt it gurgling around in my stomach. 

At least a minute passed. Then another minute. 

“Okay,” Dr. Ritter said. “It should happen—now!” 

He pointed at me. I stood there. I was still a boy. 

“I don’t see any changes,” Dr. D. said. 

“Give it another minute,” Dr. Ritter insisted. “I know it works. I tried it on 
my assistant, Mel, last night. He’s swimming around out there playing tag with a 
blue marlin right now!” 

The room fell silent as we all waited for me to turn into a fish. 

My stomach felt a little queasy. Otherwise, nothing. 

I sighed and shifted my feet. 

“It’s been more than five minutes, Ritter,” Dr. D. said. “Looks like your 
plankton doesn’t work.” 

Dr. Ritter scowled furiously. “No! That’s impossible! It works! I know it 
works!” 

He grabbed me and shook me. “Fish! Turn into a fish!” 

I bumped him away. He toppled backwards. 

Dr. D. pounced on him. “Gotcha!” 

Dr. Ritter pushed him off. And grabbed a bottle of plankton. 

He raised the bottle over his head. 

“Look out, Dr. D.!” Sheena cried. 

Dr. Ritter swung the bottle. 

Dr. D. ducked. 

I snatched the bottle from Dr. Ritter’s hand. 

My uncle leaped at Dr. Ritter. Dr. Ritter dodged him and dashed out of the 



lab. 


“He’s going up on deck!” Sheena shouted. 

We raced after him. Dr. D. tackled Dr. Ritter on the deck. Dr. Ritter rolled 
away. He jumped on Dr. D. 

They wrestled around. I set the bottle of plankton down. 

“Get off him!” I yelled. I tried to pull Dr. Ritter off my uncle. 

Dr. Ritter elbowed me away. Dr. D. grabbed him. They rolled across the 
deck. 

“Dr. D.—look out!” I screamed. He was about to roll overboard. 

With a grunt, Dr. D. jumped to his feet. He dove on Dr. Ritter and pinned 
him to the deck. 

“Get a rope, Billy! Quick!” he ordered. 

I grabbed the first rope I found on the deck. “Tie him up!” Dr. D. ordered. 
“Sheena—help me hold him down.” 

Sheena took a running start and leaped on top of Dr. Ritter. 

Dr. Ritter grunted. “My stomach!” 

Sheena sat on top of him. Dr. D. pinned his arms down. I wrapped the rope 
around his wrists. 

Dr. D. had taught me some sailor’s knots the summer before. My mind 
raced, trying to remember them. 

How did it go? I thought in a panic. Over, under, around? 

Dr. Ritter squirmed under Sheena. “Hurry, Billy!” she snapped. 

“I’m trying!” I said. 

“It’s over, Ritter,” Dr. D. said. “We’re taking you to the International Sea 
Life Patrol.” 

Over, under, over? 

“No, you’re not!” Dr. Ritter cried. He bucked Sheena off. 

She tumbled to the deck. 

He wrenched his hands from the rope and shoved Dr. D. away. 

My crummy knots were useless. 

Dr. D. tried to grab him. But Dr. Ritter dove away and crawled across the 
deck. He snatched up a bottle of plankton. 

He stood and waved the bottle at us. “You’ll never turn me in!” he declared. 

Then he pulled the bottle open, tilted it over his mouth, and drank it down. 



32 


“It works!” Dr. Ritter declared. “I’ll prove it to you!” 

He tossed the bottle aside. The glass smashed on the deck. 

“You can’t fool us, Dr. Ritter,” Sheena said. “We know that stuff doesn’t 
work. We saw Billy drink it.” 

But Dr. Ritter’s body began to tremble. Quickly, his skin began to darken to 
a slivery, blue-gray. 

“Something’s happening!” Dr. D. exclaimed. 

Dr. Ritter’s skin began to flake. Then it turned scaly. It glittered in the 
sunlight. 

His body began to shrink. His clothes slid off the slick scales. His hair fell 
away. His head flattened. His whole body shrank and flattened. 

“It’s working!” I gasped. “He’s turning into a fish!” 

Dr. Ritter’s arms shriveled into fins. His legs melted together, melted into a 
fish tail. 

He flopped on the deck. One flat eye stared glassily up at us as he flapped 
his tail. 

“He’s a fish!” Sheena cried. “I don’t believe it!” 

With one great flip of his tail, the fish plopped over the side of the deck and 
into the water. 

We watched him as he dove under the surface. 

“Stop him!” I shouted. “He’s getting away! We can’t let him escape!” I 
started for my snorkeling flippers. 

But Dr. D. squeezed my shoulder. “No, Billy. It’s okay. Let him go.” 

“Huh? Why?” 

“You heard what he told us, Billy. Dr. Ritter will be a fish forever,” Dr. D. 
explained. “He can’t do anyone any harm now.” 

I stared down at the silvery fish. It splashed its tail in the water and swam 
out to sea. 

“Wow,” Sheena gasped, pressing her hands against her cheeks. 

Dr. D. put his arms around us. “I guess that adventure is over,” he sighed. “I 
was never so scared in my life.” 



Sheena and I agreed. “I’m scared—and amazed,” I told my uncle. “I’ll 
never forget the strange things we saw this week.” 

We followed Dr. D. down to help him prepare breakfast. He stopped in his 
lab. 

“What a mess,” he sighed. “I guess I’ll clean it up later.” 

Sheena walked over to the cabinet of plankton bottles. She turned to me and 
narrowed her eyes at me. “Hey, Billy—you drank a bottle of plankton too.” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. So?” 

“So why didn’t you turn into a fish like Dr. Ritter did?” she demanded. 

“You know why,” I teased. 

“I do not.” 

“Yes, you do. It’s because I’m not human. I’m superhuman.” 

She punched me in the stomach. “Come on. Tell me the real reason.” 

Dr. D. folded his arms across his chest. “Yes, Billy. Tell us. I’d be interested 
to hear this.” 

I grinned. “Well, it’s all thanks to you, Sheena.” 

“Me?” 

“Uh-huh. I was really angry after you played that trick on me. You know, 
the doll’s head in the goldfish bowl?” 

Sheena giggled. 

“Ha-ha. Hilarious. Anyway, I spent all day and all night trying to think up a 
good trick to play on you. To get you back.” 

“That’s all you ever do, Billy,” Sheena said. “What’s so different about 
that?” 

I tapped the cabinet. “I had a great idea. I took one of the plankton bottles 
and dumped the plankton out.” 

Dr. D. grimaced. “You what?” 

“Sorry, Dr. D.,” I said. “I figured you had so many, you wouldn’t miss one.” 

“I still don’t get it,” Sheena said. “Then what?” 

“I washed out the bottle. Then I poured iced tea into it,” I explained. “I was 
going to bring you in here and say, ‘Hey, Sheena! Want to see me drink 
plankton?’ Then I’d gulp down the iced tea and totally gross you out!” 

“That wouldn’t have grossed me out,” Sheena protested. 

“Yes, it would!” I insisted. “You would’ve puked all over the cabin floor!” 

“No, I wouldn’t!” 

Dr. D. interrupted us. “You planted a bottle of iced tea in the plankton 



cabinet? So when Dr. Ritter told you to choose a bottle...” 

“Right!” I cried. “I picked the bottle of iced tea!” 

Sheena laughed. She laughed so hard, she almost choked. 

“I know it’s funny,” I said. “But even I don’t think it’s that funny.” 

She hiccupped and caught her breath. “I don’t believe it,” she gasped. “You 
and I are starting to think alike, Billy.” 

“What do you mean?” 

“I played the same trick on you!” she cried. “The exact same trick! I put 
iced tea in a bottle too. Watch!” 

She pulled a bottle from an end of the cabinet, ripped off the stopper, and 
gulped it down. 

Dr. D. and I gaped at her in shock. 

Sheena made a weird face. Her eyes bulged. She grabbed her stomach. 

“Oh, wow,” she groaned. “Did I drink the right bottle?” 







THE HAUNTED SCHOOL 


Goosebumps - 59 
R.L. Stine 


1 


An invisible hand grabbed me and pulled me off the ladder. 

I landed on my back on the gym floor with an “Oooof! ” My head made a 
loud THUD as it banged the floorboards. 

I raised myself slowly, blinking hard, trying to shake off the shock. Then I 
pulled myself up on my elbows and saw Ben Jackson laughing. 

Thalia Halpert-Rodis dropped her lipstick into her bag and came running 
over to me. “Tommy—are you okay?” she demanded. 

“Yeah. Fine,” I muttered. “I was just testing the floor. You know. Seeing 
how hard it is.” 

“It isn’t as hard as your head!” Ben joked. “You’re going to have to pay for 
breaking the gym floor!” He laughed again. 

“Ha-ha.” Thalia rolled her eyes, then made a disgusted face at him. She 
turned to me. “Don’t encourage him, Tommy. He’s about as funny as a dead 
pigeon.” 

“I think dead pigeons are funny!” Ben insisted. 

Thalia rolled her eyes again. Then she grabbed my hand and tugged me to 
my feet. 

I felt so embarrassed. I wanted to go hide under the bleachers. 

Why am I always such a total klutz? 

No invisible hand pulled me off the ladder. I just fell. That’s what I usually 
do if I find myself on a ladder. I fall off. 

Some people are climbers. I’m a fallen 

But I really didn’t want to look like a geek in front of Thalia and Ben. After 
all, I just met them. And I really wanted to impress them. 

That’s why I signed up for the Dance Decorations Committee. I wanted to 
meet kids. It’s hard to make new friends when you start a new school in sixth 
grade. 

Maybe I’d better start at the beginning. 

My name is Tommy Frazer and I’m twelve. Just before school started this 
fall, my dad got married again. And right after the wedding, we moved to Bell 
Valley. 

We had to move so fast, I barely had a chance to say good-bye to my 



friends. And before I could catch my breath, here I was—the new kid at Bell 
Valley Middle School. 

I didn’t know anyone here. I hardly even knew my new mom! 

Can you imagine what it’s like to suddenly have a new school, a new house, 
and a new mom? 

The first couple of days at Bell Valley Middle School were hard. Kids 
weren’t unfriendly. But they already knew who their friends were. 

I’m not shy. But it was really impossible to just go up to someone and say, 
“Hi. Want to be my friend?” 

I was pretty lonely the first week or so. Then last Monday morning, Mrs. 
Borden, the principal, came into our room. She asked if anyone wanted to 
volunteer for the Dance Decorations Committee. She needed kids to decorate the 

gym. 

My hand was the first to shoot up. I knew it would be a great way to make 
new friends. 

So here I was after school in the gym two days later. Making new friends by 
falling on my head like a geek. 

“Do you think you should see the nurse?” Thalia asked, studying me. 

“No. My eyes always roll around like this,” I replied weakly. At least I still 
had my sense of humor. 

“The nurse left, anyway,” Ben said, checking his watch. “It’s late. We’re 
probably the only ones in the building.” 

Thalia shook out her blond hair. “Let’s get back to work,” she suggested. 

She opened her bag and pulled out her lipstick. I watched her apply a thick 
coat of red to her lips, even though they were already red. Then she brushed 
some kind of orangey powder on her cheeks. 

Ben shook his head but didn’t say anything. 

Yesterday, I heard other kids teasing Thalia about her makeup and lipstick. 
They said she was the only girl in sixth grade who uses that stuff every day. 

They were pretty mean to her. One girl said, “Thalia thinks she’s painting a 
masterpiece.” 

Another girl said, “Thalia couldn’t go to gym class because she had to wait 
for her face to dry.” 

A boy said, “Her face must be broken. That’s why she’s always fixing it!” 

Everyone laughed really hard. 

Thalia didn’t seem to mind all the jokes and teasing. I guess she’s used to it. 



Before school this morning, I heard some kids saying that Thalia was stuck- 
up. That she thought she was soooo beautiful, and that’s why she was always 
paying so much attention to her looks. 

She didn’t seem stuck-up to me. She seemed really nice. She was pretty 
awesome looking too. I wondered why she thought she needed to wear makeup 
at all. 

Thalia and Ben look a lot alike. They could be brother and sister, but 
they’re not. 

They are both tall and thin. And they both have blue eyes and curly blond 

hair. 

I’m short and a little chubby. And I have black hair that sticks straight out 
like straw. It’s real tough hair. I can brush it for hours, but it still goes wherever it 
wants. 

My new mom says I’ll be really handsome as soon as I lose my baby fat. I 
don’t think that was a very good compliment. 

Anyway, Thalia, Ben, and I were painting some big banners to go up on the 
gym wall. Thalia and I were working together on a banner that read BELL 
VALLEY ROCKS! 

Ben started to paint a poster that read DANCE TILL YOU PUKE! But Mrs. 
Borden poked her head in and asked him to think of a better slogan. 

He groaned and grumbled and started over. Now his poster read 
WELCOME, EVERYONE! 

“Hey—where’s the red paint?” Thalia called to Ben. 

“Huh?” He was down on his hands and knees, using a thick brush to paint 
the w in WELCOME. 

Thalia and I were also down on the floor, painting the black outlines to our 
poster. She climbed to her feet and stared down at Ben. “Didn’t you bring any 
red paint down to the gym? I only see black.” 

“I thought you were bringing it,” he replied. He pointed to a stack of cans 
under the basketball hoop. “What are those?” 

“All black,” she told him. “I asked you to bring down some red— 
remember? I want to put red in the middle of the letters. Black and red are the 
school colors, you know.” 

“Duh,” Ben muttered. “Well, I’m not going upstairs for it, Thalia. The art 
room is on the third floor.” 

“I’ll go!” I volunteered, a bit too eagerly. 



They both stared at me. 

“I mean, I don’t mind,” I added. “I can use the exercise.” 

“You really did hit your head—didn’t you!” Ben joked. 

“Do you remember where the art room is?” Thalia asked. 

I set down my brush. “Yeah. I think so. You go up the stairs in back— 
right?” 

Thalia nodded. Her curly blond hair bounced whenever she moved her 
head. “Right. You go up three flights to the top floor. Then you go straight down 
the hall to the back. Turn right. Then turn right again. And it’s at the back.” 

“No problem,” I said. I started jogging to the double gym doors. 

“Bring at least two cans!” she called after me. “And some clean brushes.” 

“And bring me a Coke!” Ben called. He laughed. 

What a joker. 

I started running at full speed to the exit. I’m not sure why I started to run. I 
guess I was trying to impress Thalia. 

I lowered my shoulder. And burst through the double doors. 

And barreled at full speed into a girl standing in the hall. 

“Hey—!” She let out a startled cry as we both toppled to the floor. 

I landed on top of her with a groan. 

Her head made a loud CRACK as it hit the concrete floor. 

Stunned, we both lay there for a second. Then I rolled off her and 
scrambled to my feet. 

“Sorry,” I managed to choke out. I reached out to help her up. 

But she angrily shoved my hand away and climbed up without my help. 

As she stood, I saw that she was at least a foot taller than me. Tall and 
broad-shouldered and powerful looking, she reminded me of those women 
wrestlers on TV. 

She had white-blond hair, which had fallen over her face. She was dressed 
all in black. And she stared at me furiously with steel-gray eyes. 

Frightening eyes. 

“I’m really sorry,” I repeated, taking a step back as I stared up at her. 

She took a heavy step toward me. Then another. Those cold gray eyes froze 
me against the wall. 

She scowled. And moved closer. 

“Wh-what are you going to do?” I stammered. 



2 


I pressed my back tight against the wall. “What are you going to do?” I repeated. 

“I’m going to walk home—if you’ll ever let me!” she growled. She spun 
away, her hands squeezed into big fists. 

“I said I was sorry!” I called after her. 

She vanished up the stairs without turning back. 

Those weird gray eyes stayed in my mind. 

I gave her time to leave the building. Then I started up the stairs. 

It was a long climb to the top floor. My legs still felt a little shaky from 
mnning into that strange girl. And it was kind of eerie, being the only person up 
here. 

My shoes thudded on the hard steps, and the sound thundered in the empty 
stairwell. The halls stretched out like long, dark tunnels. 

I was out of breath when I finally reached the landing on the third floor. I 
started down the hall, humming to myself. My voice sounded hollow in the 
empty hall. It echoed off the long row of gray lockers. 

I stopped humming as I made my first right turn. I passed an empty 
teachers’ lounge. A computer lab. Then some rooms that looked empty. 

Another right turn took me into a narrow hall with wooden floors that 
creaked and groaned under my shoes. 

I stopped outside the room at the end of the hall. A small hand-lettered sign 
beside the door read ART ROOM. 

I grabbed the doorknob and started to pull open the door. 

But I stopped when I heard voices inside the room. 

Startled, I gripped the doorknob and listened. I heard a boy and a girl. They 
were talking softly. I couldn’t make out their words. But the kids sounded like 
Thalia and Ben. 

What are they doing up here? I wondered. 

Why did they follow me? How did they get up here before I did? 

I pushed open the door and stepped inside. “Hey, guys—” I called. “What’s 
going on?” 

My mouth dropped open. The room was empty. 

“Hey—” I called. “Are you guys in here?” 



No reply. 

My eyes darted around the big room. Golden afternoon sunlight poured in 
through the windows. 

The long art tables stood clean and empty. Some clay pots were drying on 
the window ledge. A mobile made of wire hangers and soup cans hung from the 
ceiling light. 

Weird, I thought, shaking my head. I heard voices in here. I know I did. 

Are Thalia and Ben playing a little joke on me? I wondered. Are they 
hiding up here? 

I made my way quickly to the big supply closet and pulled open the door. 
“Caught you!” I cried. 

No. No one in there. 

I stared into the dark closet. Am I starting to hear voices? I wondered. 
Maybe my fall off the ladder was worse than I’d thought! 

I reached up and pulled the chain to turn on the closet light. On both sides 
of me, shelves of art supplies reached to the ceiling. I spotted the red paint we 
needed and started to slide a few cans off the shelf. 

But I stopped when I heard a girl laugh. 

Then a boy said something. He sounded excited. He was talking rapidly. 
But I couldn’t make out the words. 

I spun back to the art room. No one there. 

“Hey—where are you?” I called. 

Silence now. 

I pulled a paint can off the shelf and tucked it under my arm. Then I 
grabbed another can with my free hand. 

“Hey—!” I called out when I heard the voices again. 

“This isn’t funny!” I cried. “Where are you hiding?” 

No reply. 

They must be in the next room, I decided. I carried the paint cans out into 
the art room and set them down on the teacher’s desk. Then I crept into the hall. 

I stopped at the next door and poked my head into the room. It was some 
kind of storage room. Boxes marked fragile were stacked against one wall. 

No one there. 

I checked the room across the hall. No one there, either. 

As I walked back to the art room, I heard the voices again. 

The girl was shouting now. And then the boy shouted too. 



It sounded as if they were calling for help. But for some reason their voices 
seemed muffled, kind of far away. 

My heart started to beat a little faster. My throat suddenly felt dry. 

Who is playing this joke on me? I wondered. Everyone has gone home. The 
whole building is empty. So who is up here? And why can’t I find them? 

“Ben? Thalia?” I shouted. My voice echoed off the long wall of gray 
lockers. “Are you up here?” 

Silence. 

I took a deep breath and stepped back into the art room. I’m just going to 
ignore them, I decided. 

I hoisted up the two cans of paint and made my way back out into the hall. I 
glanced quickly both ways, thinking I might see Thalia and Ben. 

A shadow leaned out from an open doorway. 

I froze and stared. 

“Who—who’s there?” I called. 



3 


A man backed out of the doorway, pulling a large vacuum cleaner. He wore a 
gray uniform and had the stub of an unlit cigar clenched in his teeth. 

The janitor. 

I sighed and made my way to the stairs. I don’t think he saw me. 

The stairway curved halfway down. I started down the steps, but I stopped 
in front of a large bulletin board on the wall. I glanced over the notices of school 
events, a calendar, and a lost-and-found list. 

Oh, wow. I’m in trouble. I don’t remember seeing this on my way up, I told 
myself. 

I gazed back up to the top of the stairs. Did I take the wrong stairway? Will 
these stairs take me back to the gym? 

Only one way to find out, I decided. 

Gripping the paint cans tightly, I turned and continued down. 

To my surprise, the stairs ended at the second floor. 

I gazed down a long hallway, searching for stairs to take me to the gym in 
the basement. But I saw only closed classroom doors and long rows of metal 
lockers. 

The paint cans started to feel heavy. My shoulders ached. I set the cans on 
the floor and took a moment to stretch my arms. 

Then I picked up the cans and started walking again, my footsteps ringing 
in the empty hall. I glanced into the rooms I passed. 

Whoa! 

A skeleton grinned at me from a doorway. 

My mouth dropped open. But I quickly got myself together. “Probably 
some kind of science lab,” I murmured. 

I thought I saw a small black cat lurking at the end of a row of lockers. I 
stopped and squinted down at it. Not a cat. Somebody’s black wool ski cap. 

“Tommy—what is your problem?” I said out loud. 

I never realized how creepy a school building can be after everyone has left. 
Especially a totally unfamiliar school building. 

I turned the corner into another long, empty hall. Still no stairs in sight. 

Ben and Thalia must wonder what happened to me, I thought. They must 



think I got lost. 

Well... I am lost. 

I passed a display case of shiny sports trophies. A red-and-black pennant 
draped over the case proclaimed GO, BISONS. 

That’s our team name. The Bell Valley Bisons. 

Aren’t bisons big and very slow? And aren’t they almost extinct? 

What a lame team name! 

I continued down the hall, thinking hard. Thinking of better team names. 
The Bell Valley Hippos... the Bell Valley Warthogs... the Bell Valley Water 
Buffalos... 

That last one made me laugh. 

But I stopped laughing when I realized I’d reached the end of the hall. A 
dead end. 

“Hey—!” I called out, my eyes searching the closed doors. Shouldn’t there 
be a stairway here? Some kind of exit? 

There appeared to be a narrow doorway. But it was boarded up. Old, rotting 
boards had been nailed over the entire opening. 

I never should have volunteered to get the paint, I told myself. This school 
building is too big, and I don’t know my way around. 

Thalia and Ben are probably fed up by now. 

I gazed down the long hall. Two unmarked doors stood side by side against 
one wall. They didn’t appear to be classroom doors. 

I decided to try one. 

I leaned forward and pushed a door with my shoulder. And stumbled into a 
large, dimly lit room. 

“Whoa—where am I?” My voice sounded small and shrill. Squinting into 
the gray light, I saw a crowd of kids staring back at me! 



4 


The kids stared back at me so stiffly, so still... still as statues. 

And then I realized they were statues! 

Statues of kids. At least two dozen of them. 

They were old-fashioned looking. Their clothes were funny, like from an 
old movie. The boys wore sports jackets and very wide neckties. The girls’ 
jackets all had wide shoulder pads. Their skirts came down to their ankles. 

I lowered the paint cans to the floor. Then I took a few cautious steps into 
the room. 

The statues were so real looking, so lifelike. More like department-store 
mannequins than statues. Their glass eyes glistened. Their red mouths were set 
sternly, not smiling. 

I stepped up to the statue of a boy about my age and grabbed the sleeve of 
his jacket. Real cloth. Not sculpted stone or plaster. 

It was so dark in the room. Hard to see clearly. 

I reached into the pocket of my khakis and pulled out my red plastic lighter. 

I know, I know. I’m not supposed to have a lighter. There’s no reason why I 
would have one except my grandfather gave me the lighter a few weeks before 
he died. And I’ve carried it around with me as a good luck charm ever since. 

I flicked the lighter and raised the flame to the boy’s face. The skin was so 
real. It even had tiny pimples on one cheek and a scar under the chin. 

I closed the lighter and slipped it back in my pocket. Then I touched the 
boy’s face. Smooth and cool, carved or molded out of some kind of plaster. 

I rubbed my finger over one of his eyes. Some kind of glass or plastic. 

I tugged at the back of his dark brown hair. It started to slide off. 

A wig. 

Beside him stood a statue of a tall, thin girl in a black sweater, and a long, 
straight black skirt down to her ankles. I gazed up into her dark, shiny eyes. She 
appeared to stare back at me. 

So sad. Her expression seemed so sad to me. 

Why weren’t any of these statues smiling? 

I squeezed her hand. Cool plaster. 

Why are these statues here? I wondered. Who put them here in this hidden 



room? Is it some sort of art project? 

I stepped back—and spotted an engraved sign over the door. My eyes 
moved quickly over the big, block letters: 

CLASS OF 1947 

I stared at the sign. Read it again. Then I turned back to the roomful of 
statues. And one of the statues called out: “What are you doing here?” 



5 


“Huh?” I let out a loud gasp. 

“What are you doing in here, young man?” the voice repeated. 

Blinking hard, I whirled around. 

And saw Mrs. Borden, the principal, standing in the open doorway. 

“You—you’re not a statue!” I blurted out. 

She moved quickly into the room, holding a clipboard against the front of 
her sweater. “No, I’m not,” she replied without smiling. 

She glanced down at the two paint cans on the floor. Then she stepped up 
beside me, her eyes studying me. 

Mrs. Borden is very short. She is only an inch or two taller than me. And 
she’s kind of chubby. She has curly black hair and a round, pink face. She 
always seems to be blushing. 

Some kids told me that she’s really nice. I met her only for a moment when 
I showed up at Bell Valley my first morning. 

That morning, she was all upset about a pack of dogs that were swarming 
over the playground and frightening the little kids. She didn’t have time to talk to 
me. 

Now she stood so close to me, I could smell the peppermint on her breath. 
“Tommy, I think you must be lost,” she said softly. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I guess,” I murmured. 

“Where are you supposed to be?” she asked, still clutching the clipboard to 
her chest. 

“The gym,” I replied. 

She finally smiled. “You’re a long way from the gym. This is the entrance 
to the old building. The gym is in the new building, way on the other side.” She 
gestured with the clipboard. 

“I took the wrong stairs,” I explained. “I was coming from the art room, and 

55 

“Oh, right. You’re on the Dance Decorations Committee,” she interrupted. 
“Well, let me show you how to get back downstairs.” 

I turned to the statues. They all stood so still, so silently. They seemed to be 
eavesdropping on Mrs. Borden and me. 



“What is this room?” I asked. 

She put a hand on my shoulder and started to move me toward the door. 
“It’s a private room,” she said softly. 

“But what is it?” I repeated. “I mean—these statues. Who are these kids? 
Are they real kids or something?” 

She didn’t reply. Her hand tightened on my shoulder as she guided me to 
the door. 

I stopped to pick up the paint cans. When I glanced back at Mrs. Borden, 
her expression had changed. 

“This is a very sad room, Tommy,” she said, her voice just above a whisper. 
“These kids were the very first class in the school.” 

“The class of nineteen forty-seven?” I asked, glancing at the sign. 

The principal nodded. “Yes. Just about fifty years ago. There were twenty- 
five kids in the school. And one day... one day, they all disappeared.” 

“Huh?” Startled by her words, I dropped the paint cans to the floor. 

“They vanished, Tommy,” Mrs. Borden continued, turning her gaze to the 
statues. “Vanished into thin air. One minute they were here in school. The next 
minute, they were gone... forever. Never seen again.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. I didn’t know what to say. How could twenty- 
five kids vanish? 

Mrs. Borden sighed. “It was a terrible tragedy,” she said softly. “A terrible 
mystery. The parents... the poor parents...” 

Her voice caught in her throat. She took a deep breath. “They were so 
heartbroken. The parents had the school boarded up. Closed forever. The town 
built a new school around it. The old building has stood empty ever since that 
horrible day.” 

“And these statues?” I asked. 

“A local artist made them,” Mrs. Borden replied. “He used a class photo. A 
photo of everyone. The artist used the photo to make these statues. A tribute to 
the missing children.” 

I stared at the roomful of statues. Kids. Vanished kids. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

I picked up the paint cans. Mrs. Borden opened the door. 

“I—I didn’t mean to come in here,” I apologized. “I didn’t know...” 

“No problem,” she replied. “This building is very big and very confusing.” 

I led the way out to the hall. She closed the door carefully behind us. 



“Follow me,” she said. The heels of her shoes clicked loudly on the hard floor as 
she walked, swinging the clipboard at her side. 

She walked really fast for a tiny person. Holding a paint can in each hand, I 
had to struggle to keep up with her. 

“How are you getting along, Tommy?” she asked. “Aside from getting lost, 
I mean.” 

“Fine,” I said. “Everyone’s been really great.” 

We turned a corner. I had to jog to catch up to her. We turned another 
corner. Into a brighter hallway. The tile walls were a bright yellow. The linoleum 
floor gleamed. 

“This is where you meant to go,” Mrs. Borden announced. “And there is the 
stairway down to the gym.” She pointed the way, then smiled at me. 

I thanked her and hurried off. 

I couldn’t wait to get back to the gym. I hoped Thalia and Ben weren’t 
angry about how long it took me. I was really eager to ask them about the class 
of 1947.1 wanted to hear what they knew about all those missing kids. 

Holding the cans of red paint, I made my way down the two flights of stairs 
to the basement. It all looked familiar now. 

I ran past the lunchroom to the double gym doors at the end of the hall. 
Pushed open the doors with my shoulder. And burst into the gym. 

“Hey—I’m back!” I called. “I—” 

The words caught in my throat. Thalia and Ben were sprawled facedown on 
the gym floor. 



6 


“Oh, nooooooo!” I let out a wail of horror. 

The paint cans fell from my hands and clattered heavily to the gym floor. 

One of the cans rolled in my path, and I stumbled over it as I hurtled toward 
my new friends. “Thalia! Ben!” I screamed. 

They both giggled. 

And raised their heads from the floor, grinning. 

Ben opened his mouth in a long, phony yawn. 

“We got so tired waiting for you, we fell asleep!” Thalia declared. 

They both laughed again. Ben shot Thalia a high five. 

They both climbed to their feet. Thalia hurried over to her purse. She pulled 
out a lipstick tube and began applying another red coat to her lips. 

Grinning, Ben narrowed his eyes at me. “You got lost—right?” 

I nodded unhappily. “Yeah. So? Big deal,” I muttered. 

“I win the bet!” Ben cried happily. He held out a hand to Thalia. “Pay up.” 

“Whoa! I don’t believe you two!” I exclaimed. “You bet on whether I got 
lost or not?” 

“We were pretty bored,” Thalia confessed. She handed Ben a dollar. 

He shoved it into his jeans pocket. Then he glanced up at the big scoreboard 
clock. “Oh, wow!” he cried. “I’m late! I promised my brother I’d get home by 
five.” 

He ran to the bleachers and started gathering up his backpack and jacket. 

“Hey, wait—” I called. “I want to tell you what I saw upstairs! I mean, it 
was so weird. I—” 

“Later,” he said, pulling on his jacket as he jogged toward the double doors. 

“But what about the red paint?” I cried. 

“I’ll drink it tomorrow!” he shouted. Then he disappeared out the doors. 

I watched them bang shut. Then I turned to Thalia. 

“He’s pretty funny sometimes,” she said. “I mean, sometimes he makes me 
laugh.” 

“Ha-ha,” I muttered. 

I picked up the cans of red paint and carried them over to our banners on 



the floor. “Sorry it took me so long,” I told her. “But—” 

She was brushing some kind of makeup onto her eyelids. “You saw 
something weird upstairs?” she asked, glancing at me over the little round mirror 
she held in her free hand. 

“Well, first I ran into the hall and knocked over this weird girl,” I told her. 
Thalia narrowed her eyes at me. “What weird girl?” 

“I don’t know her name,” I replied. “She’s big—a lot taller than me. And 
really tough looking. And she has the weirdest gray eyes, and—” 

“Greta?” Thalia asked. “You knocked over Greta?” 

“Is that her name?” I replied. 

“Dressed in black?” Thalia asked. “Greta always dresses in black.” 

“Yeah. That was her,” I said. “I knocked her flat. Then I fell on top of her. 
Smooth move, huh?” 

“Watch out for her, Tommy,” Thalia warned. “Greta is definitely weird.” 
She started to roll up her banner. “So what happened to you upstairs?” 

“I heard something,” I told her. “When I got to the art room. I heard voices. 
Kids’ voices. But when I went inside the room, there was no one there.” 

“Huh?” Thalia’s mouth dropped open. “You—you heard them?” she 
stammered. 

I nodded. 

“You really heard them?” 

“Yes. Who were they?” I demanded. “I kept searching for them. All over 
the third floor. I heard them, but I couldn’t see them. And then Mrs. Borden—” 

I stopped talking when I saw that Thalia had tears in her eyes. 

“Hey—what’s wrong?” I asked. 

She didn’t answer me. She spun away—and ran from the gym. 



7 


A few days later, Thalia had a run-in with Greta. And it almost turned violent. 

It was Thursday afternoon. Mr. Devine, our teacher, received a message 
from the office. He read the message a few times, moving his lips as he read. 
Then, muttering to himself, he left the room. 

It was near the end of the school day. I guess everyone was tired of sitting 
in school. We were all ready to break out of there. 

So as soon as Mr. Devine disappeared, everyone kind of exploded. I mean, 
guys jumped up and started running around the room. Doing funny dance moves 
and just goofing. 

One kid turned on a boom box he had hidden under his desk and cranked 
the music up. Some girls were laughing wildly about something in the back of 
the room, tossing their heads and slapping their hands on their desks. 

I sit in the back row since I’m a new kid. Ben was absent. I think he had a 
dentist appointment or something. 

So since I didn’t really know anyone else yet, I sort of was left out of all the 

fun. 

I tapped my hand to the music and pretended I was having a good time. But 
actually, I felt kind of awkward and lonely. And I secretly wished that Mr. 
Devine would come back so that things could return to normal. 

I stared out the window for a while. It was a cloudy autumn day. Very 
windy. The swirling wind gusts sent red and yellow leaves sailing and twisting 
over the playground. 

I stared at them for a while. Then I turned back into the room, and my eyes 
landed on Thalia in the front row. 

She wasn’t paying any attention to all the dancing and joking and wild 
laughter. She had her little mirror raised to her face and was slicking a layer of 
lipstick onto her lips. 

I waved and tried to get her attention. I wanted to know if she and I were 
going to work on decorations after school in the gym. 

I tried calling to her. But she couldn’t hear me over all the noise. She stared 
into her little mirror and didn’t turn around. 

I started to stand up and walk over to her—when I saw Greta lean over 



Thalia’s desk and grab the lipstick tube from her hand. Greta laughed and said 
something to Thalia. She held the lipstick tube out of Thalia’s reach. 

Thalia let out an angry scream. She swiped at the lipstick. But she wasn’t 
fast enough to grab it back. 

Greta’s gray eyes glinted with excitement. She laughed and heaved it to a 
guy across the room. 

“Give that back! ” Thalia shrieked. 

She leaped to her feet. Her eyes were wild, and her face was pale. 

“Give that back! Give it! Give it! ” 

With a furious growl, Thalia dove across the row of desks and tried to 
tackle the boy. 

Laughing, he dodged away from her and tossed the tube back to Greta. 

The metal tube hit a desk and bounced onto the floor. 

Thalia hurtled herself to the floor, grabbing at it wildly with both hands. 

I was halfway to the front of the room. As she and Greta wrestled on the 
floor for the lipstick, I gaped at Thalia in shock. 

What is the big deal? I wondered. Why is she so desperate to get that tube 
back? It’s only lipstick, after all. 

Other kids were watching the struggle. I saw the girls at the back of the 
room laughing at Thalia. They were the ones who had teased her about wearing 
makeup. 

Some kids cheered as Greta came up with the lipstick. She raised it in her 
big fist. 

Thalia screamed and grabbed at it. 

And then Greta raised the lipstick tube higher toward Thalia’s face. 

And drew a red smiley face on Thalia’s forehead. 

Thalia had tears in her eyes now. I saw that she was totally losing it. 

I didn’t really understand why she was so insane about it. But I decided I 
had to do something. 

Hero time for Tommy Frazer. 

“Hey—give that back to her!” I boomed. 

I took a deep breath and stepped forward to teach Greta a lesson. 



8 


Greta was holding the lipstick tube high over her head, pushing Thalia away 
with her other hand. 

“Give it back to her!” I insisted, trying to sound tough. “It isn’t funny, 
Greta. Give Thalia the lipstick.” 

I jumped up—and grabbed the hand with the lipstick in it. 

I heard some kids cheering and clapping. I didn’t know which of us they 
were cheering. 

Using both hands, I started to pry the tube from Greta’s big hand. 

And that’s when Mr. Devine returned to the room. 

“What’s going on?” he demanded. 

I turned to see him glaring at me through his round, black-frame eyeglasses. 

I lowered my hands from Greta’s fist. The lipstick tube dropped to the floor. 
It rolled under Thalia’s desk. 

With a tiny cry, she dove for it. 

“What’s happening in here?” Mr. Devine moved quickly to the front of the 
room. 

“Tommy, why are you up here?” the teacher demanded. Behind his thick 
glasses, his eyes looked as big as tennis balls! “Why did you leave your seat?” 

“I was just... uh... getting something,” I choked out. 

“He was helping me,” Thalia chimed in. I gazed down at her. She seemed a 
lot calmer now that she had her lipstick back. 

Meanwhile, my heart was pounding like crazy. 

“Get back to your seats, everyone,” Mr. Devine ordered. “I should be able 
to leave the room for two minutes without everyone going berserk.” He turned 
his stare on Greta. 

“Just goofing around,” she muttered. She tossed back her white-blond hair 
and dropped heavily into her seat. 

I slumped back to my desk and took deep breaths. I wanted to ask Thalia 
what the big deal was about her lipstick. But she didn’t turn around. 

It took a few more seconds for Mr. Devine to get everyone calmed down. 
Then he glanced up at the clock above the chalkboard. 

“We have twenty more minutes until the bell rings,” he announced. “I have 



to take care of some paperwork at my desk. So I’d like you to use the time for 
quiet reading.” 

He pulled off his glasses and blew a speck off one of the lenses. His eyes 
looked like tiny marbles when he took the glasses off. 

“Your book reports are all due on Monday,” he reminded us. “So this would 
be a good time to do some reading.” 

There was a lot of chair scraping and book bag thudding and thumping as 
we all pulled out our reading books. A few seconds later, the room fell silent. 

I was reading a book of short stories by Ray Bradbury for my book report. 
I’m not a science-fiction freak or anything. But these stories were really good. 
Most of them had surprise endings, which I really like. 

I tried to concentrate on the story I was reading. It was about these kids who 
live on a planet where it never stops raining. A very sad story. They never ever 
see the sun shine. And they can never go outside to play. 

I read a couple of pages. And then I nearly dropped the book when I heard a 
voice. A girl’s voice. Very soft—but very near. 

“Please help me, ” she cried. “Help me .... ” 

Startled, I slammed the book shut and glanced around. 

Who said that? 

My eyes landed on Thalia. Was she calling to me? 

No. She had her face buried in a book. 

“Help me — please!” I heard the girl plead again. 

I spun around. No one there. 

“Did anyone hear that?” I asked, more loudly than I’d planned. 

Mr. Devine raised his eyes from his papers. “Tommy? What did you say?” 

“Did anyone hear that girl?” I asked. “Calling for help?” 

A few kids laughed. Thalia turned and frowned at me. 

“I didn’t hear anything,” Mr. Devine replied. 

“No. Really,” I insisted. “I heard her. She said, ‘Please help me.’” 

Mr. Devine tsk-tsked. “You’re too young to start hearing voices.” 

Some more kids laughed. I didn’t think it was very funny. 

I sighed and picked up my book. I couldn’t wait for the bell to ring. I really 
wanted to get out of that classroom. 

I thumbed through the book, trying to find my page. 

But before I found it, I heard the girl’s voice again. 

So soft and near. And so unhappy. 



“Help me. Please. Please, somebody—help me. 



9 


On the night of the school dance, Ben, Thalia, and I got to the gym early. With 
only an hour to go, we were busily putting the finishing touches on the 
decorations. 

I thought it all looked pretty great. 

We had banners strung out in the hall outside the gym. And two big banners 
in the gym, proclaiming BELL VALLEY ROCKS! and WELCOME, 
EVERYONE! 

We tied huge bouquets of helium balloons to the two basketball hoops. The 
balloons were all red and black, of course. And we had red and black crepe- 
paper streamers on the walls and over the bleachers. 

Thalia and I had spent days painting a big poster of a bison giving the 
thumbs-up sign. Underneath the bison, it read BISONS RULE! in red and black 
letters. 

Thalia and I aren’t very good artists. The bison didn’t really look much like 
the photos of bisons we’d found in books. Ben said it looked more like a cow 
that had been sick for a long time. But we hung the poster up, anyway. 

Now, the three of us were arranging a red-and-black crepe-paper tablecloth 
over the refreshment table. I glanced up at the scoreboard clock. Seven thirty. 
The dance was scheduled to start at eight. 

“We still have a lot to do,” I said. 

Ben tugged his end of the paper tablecloth too hard. I heard a soft ripping 
sound. 

“Ooops,” he said. “Anybody bring any tape?” 

“It’s no problem,” Thalia told him. “We’ll just cover the torn part with soda 
bottles or something.” 

I glanced at the clock again. “When is the band supposed to arrive?” 

“Any minute,” Thalia replied. “They were supposed to get here early to set 

up.” 

Some kids had formed a band called Grunt. It was sort of a strange band— 
five guitar players and a drummer. And I heard some kids saying that three of the 
guitar players didn’t really know how to play. 

But Mrs. Borden asked them to perform a few songs at the dance. 



It took us a while to get the tablecloth straight. It wasn’t quite big enough 
for the table. 

“What’s next?” Ben asked. “Do we have decorations for the gym doors?” 

Before I could answer, the double doors swung open, and Mrs. Borden 
came charging in. At first, I didn’t recognize her. She wore a shiny bright red 
party dress. And she had her black curly hair piled up high on her head behind a 
silver tiara. 

Even with her hair piled up, she still wasn’t much taller than we were! 

Her eyes darted around the gym as she hurried over to us. “It looks great! 
Just fabulous, guys!” she gushed. “Oh, you worked so hard! You did a wonderful 
job!” 

We thanked her. 

She slapped a Polaroid camera into my hands. “Take pictures, Tommy,” she 
instructed me. “Snapshots of the decorations. Hurry. Take a whole bunch before 
people start arriving.” 

I examined the camera. “Well... okay,” I agreed. “But Thalia, Ben, and I 
still have some stuff to do. We have posters for the doors. And we need more 
balloons over there. And—and—” 

Mrs. Borden laughed. “You’re a little stressed!” 

Thalia and Ben laughed too. I could feel my face turning hot. I knew I was 
blushing. 

“Take it easy, Tommy,” Mrs. Borden said, patting my shoulder soothingly. 
“Or you won’t survive until the dance.” 

I forced a smile. “I’m okay,” I told her. 

Little did I realize that—after all my hard work—I would never see the 
dance. 



10 


“Yo! Look out!” 

“Move that amp! Hey, Greta—move that amp!” 

“Move it yourself!” 

“Where’s my wa-wa? Did anyone see my wa-wa pedal?” 

“I ate it for breakfast!” 

“You’re not funny. Move that amp!” 

The band members arrived while I was snapping Polaroids. And they 
instantly took over, making a big racket as they set up by the bleachers. 

The guitarists were all guys. Greta was the drummer. Seeing her lug her 
drums across the gym reminded me of the lipstick battle in class on Thursday. 

After school, I’d asked Thalia what the big deal was. “Why did you go 
nuts?” I asked. 

“I didn’t go nuts!” Thalia insisted. “Greta did. She thinks because she’s so 
big and strong she can just grab whatever she wants.” 

“She’s really weird,” I agreed. “But you were so upset—” 

“I like that lipstick. That’s all,” Thalia replied. “It’s my best lipstick. Why 
should I let her grab it from me?” 

Now Greta, dressed in black as always, was setting up with the rest of the 
band. They were all laughing and shoving each other around, tossing cables back 
and forth, tripping over their guitar cases. Acting like big shots because they had 
a band. 

A few other kids started to arrive. I recognized the two girls who were the 
ticket takers. And a couple of kids from the refreshment committee, who started 
complaining that somebody ordered only Mountain Dew and no Coke. 

I scrambled around, snapping photos of the banners and the balloons. I was 
setting up to shoot our bison poster—when a loud shout made me spin around. 

I saw Greta and one of the guitar players pretending to have a duel with 
guitars. The other band members were laughing and cheering them on. 

Greta had picked up one of the guitars. She and the other guy raised their 
guitars high over their heads and came charging at each other. 

“No—stop!” I screamed. 

Too late. 



Greta’s guitar ripped right through the BELL VALLEY ROCKS! banner. 
Tore it in two! 

I let out a loud groan as the two halves of the banner drooped to the floor. I 
turned and saw the unhappy faces of Thalia and Ben. 

“Hey—sorry about that!” Greta called. Then she burst out laughing. 

I hurried over to the wrecked banner and picked up one end. Thalia and Ben 
were right behind me. 

“What are we going to do?” I cried. “It’s ruined.” 

“We can’t just leave it here hanging over the floor,” Thalia said, shaking her 
head. 

“We need it!” I declared. 

“Yeah. It’s our best banner,” Thalia agreed. 

“Maybe we can tape it back together,” I suggested. 

“No problem. We’ll tape it together,” Ben said. “Come on, Tommy.” He 
grabbed my arm and started to pull me. 

I almost dropped Mrs. Borden’s Polaroid. “Where are we going?” I 
demanded. 

“Up to the art room, of course,” Ben replied. He started jogging to the 
double gym doors, and I followed. 

It won’t take long to tape it together, I thought. Then I’ll get a ladder from 
the janitor’s closet, and we’ll hang it back up. 

We stepped out into the hall—and I stopped. Kids were arriving for the 
dance, hurrying to the gym. 

“We don’t have time to fix the banner!” I told Ben. 

“We’ll hurry,” he said. “No problem.” 

“But—but the art room is way up on the third floor!” I sputtered. “By the 
time we get all the way back down to the gym...” 

“Relax,” Ben said. “It won’t take that long—if you’d stop complaining. 
Come on. Let’s go!” 

Ben was right. I started running down the hall. Kids were pouring into the 
gym. I knew we had to hurry. 

“Hey—not that way!” I heard him calling. “You’re going the wrong way, 
Tommy!” 

“I know where I’m going!” I called back. “I went this way last time!” 

I ran to the end of the hall and turned a corner. 

“Tommy—stop!” Ben called. 



“It’s up this way!” I called back to him. “This way is faster. I know it.” 

But I was wrong. I should have listened to Ben. A few seconds later, the 
hall ended at a boarded-up wall. 

“See?” Ben cried breathlessly. “What is your problem? The stairs are back 
there.” 

“Okay. I made a mistake,” I told him. “I wanted to hurry, that’s all.” 

“But you don’t know where you’re going!” he said angrily. “Remember, 
Tommy? You need a road map to find your toes!” 

“Very funny,” I muttered. I gazed around. “Where are we?” 

“I don’t know! I can’t believe I followed you!” Ben was annoyed. He 
banged both fists against the boarded-up wall. 

“Hey—!” 

We both cried out as the rotted, old boards broke away. Startled, Ben 
stumbled forward—and crashed right through the boards. 

They splintered and fell to the floor. And he fell on top of them. 

“Oh, wow.” I bent to help him up. “Check this out!” I said, peering down a 
dark hall. “This must be the old school building. The building they closed off.” 

“Thrills and chills,” Ben muttered. He groaned and rubbed his knee. “I 
scraped my knee on those boards. I think it’s bleeding.” 

I took a few steps into the dark hall. “This school has been closed off for 
fifty years,” I told him. “We’re probably the first kids in here since then!” 

“Remind me to write that in my diary,” Ben growled, still mbbing his knee. 
“Are we going to the art room or what?” 

I didn’t answer him. Something on the wall across from us caught my eye. I 
walked over to it. 

“Hey, Ben. Look. An elevator.” 

“Huh?” He hobbled across the hall to me. 

“Do you believe it?” I asked. “They had an elevator in the old school.” 

“Those kids were lucky,” Ben replied. 

I pressed the button on the wall. To my surprise, the doors slid open. “Whoa 
—!” I peered inside. A dusty ceiling lamp clicked on, sending pale white light 
down through the metal car. 

“It’s on!” Ben cried. “It’s working!” 

“Let’s take it to the third floor,” I urged. “Come on. Why should we walk 
up all those stairs?” 

“But—but—” Ben held back. But I grabbed his shoulders and pushed him 



inside the elevator. And followed him in. 

“This is great!” I exclaimed. “I told you I knew how to get there.” 

Ben’s eyes darted nervously around the narrow gray elevator car. “We 
shouldn’t be doing this,” he murmured. 

“What could happen?” I replied. 

The doors closed silently. 



11 


“Are we moving?” Ben asked. His eyes rose to the elevator ceiling. 

“Of course not,” I replied. “We haven’t pushed the button vet.” 

I reached out and pushed the button with a big black 3 on it. “What is your 
problem, anyway?” I demanded. “Why are you so nervous? We’re not robbing a 
bank or anything. We’re just riding an elevator because we’re in a hurry.” 

“The elevator is fifty years old,” Ben replied. 

“So?” I demanded. 

“So... we’re not moving,” Ben said softly. 

I pushed the button again. And listened for the hum that meant we were 
going up. 

Silence. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Ben said. “It’s not working. I told you we shouldn’t 
try it.” 

I pushed the button again. Nothing. 

I pushed the button marked 2. 

“We’re wasting time,” Ben said. “If we ran up the stairs, we’d be up there 
already. The dance is starting, and the stupid banner is trailing on the floor.” 

I pushed the 3 button again. And the 2 button. 

Nothing. No noise. We didn’t move. 

I pushed the button marked B. 

“We don’t want to go to the basement!” Ben cried. I heard a little panic start 
to creep into his voice. “Tommy, why did you push B?” 

“Just trying to get it to move,” I said. My throat suddenly felt a little dry. I 
had a knot in the pit of my stomach. 

Why weren’t we moving? 

I pushed all the buttons again. Then I pounded them with my fist. 

Ben pulled my hand away. “Nice try, ace,” he said sarcastically. “Let’s just 
get out of here, okay? I don’t want to miss the whole dance.” 

“Thalia is probably a little steamed by now,” I said, shaking my head. I 
pushed 3 a few more times. 

But we didn’t move. 



“Just open the doors,” Ben insisted. 

“Okay. Fine,” I agreed unhappily. My eyes swept over the control panel. 
“What’s wrong?” Ben asked impatiently. 

“I—I can’t find the door open button,” I stammered. 

He shoved me out of the way. “Here,” he said, gazing over the silvery 
buttons. “Uh...” 

We both studied the control panel. 

“There’s got to be a door open button,” Ben muttered. 

“Maybe it’s this one with the arrows,” I said. I lowered my hand to a button 
at the bottom of the metal panel. It had two arrows on it that pointed like this: 

<>. 

“Yes. Push it,” Ben said. He didn’t wait for me to do it. He reached past me 
and pushed the button hard with his open hand. 

I stared at the door, waiting for it to slide open. 

It didn’t move. 

I slapped the <> button again. And again. 

Nothing. 

“How are we going to get out of here?” Ben cried. 

“Don’t panic,” I told him. “We’ll get the doors open.” 

“Why shouldn’t I panic?” he demanded shrilly. 

“Because I want to be the one to panic first!” I declared. I thought my little 
joke would make him laugh and calm him down. After all, he was always 
making jokes. 

But he didn’t even smile. And he didn’t take his eyes off the dark elevator 
doors. 

I pushed the <> button one more time. I kept it pressed in with my thumb. 
The doors didn’t open. 

I pushed the 3 and the 2 buttons. I pushed the 1 button. 

Nothing. Silence. The buttons didn’t even click. 

Ben’s eyes bulged. He cupped his hands around his mouth. “Help us!” he 
screamed. “Can anybody hear me? Help us!” 

Silence. 

Then I spotted the red button at the top of the control panel. “Ben—look,” I 
said. I pointed to the red button. 

“An emergency button!” he exclaimed happily. “Go ahead, Tommy. Push it! 
It’s probably an alarm. Someone will hear it and come rescue us!” 



I pushed the red button. 

I didn’t hear an alarm. 

But the elevator started to hum. 

I heard the clank of gears. The floor vibrated beneath our feet. 

“Hey—we’re moving!” Ben cried happily. 

I let out a cheer. Then I raised my hand to slap him a high five. 

But the elevator jerked hard, and I fell against the wall. 

“Uh-oh,” I murmured, pulling myself up straight. I turned to Ben. We stared 
at each other in wide-eyed silence, not believing what was happening. 

The elevator wasn’t moving up. Or down. It was moving sideways. 



12 


The elevator rumbled and shook. I grabbed the wooden railing on the side. Gears 
clanked noisily. The floor vibrated beneath my shoes. 

We stared at each other, realizing what was happening. Neither of us spoke. 

Ben finally broke the silence. “This is impossible,” he murmured. His 
words came out in a choked whisper. 

“Where is it taking us?” I asked softly, gripping the rail so hard that my 
hands hurt. 

“It’s impossible!” Ben repeated. “It can’t be happening. Elevators only go 
up and—” 

The car jolted hard as we came to a very sudden stop. 

“Whoooa!” I let out a cry as my shoulder slammed into the elevator wall. 

“Next time, we’re taking the stairs,” Ben growled. 

The doors slid open. 

We peered out. Into total blackness. 

“Are we in the basement?” Ben asked, sticking his head out the door. 

“We didn’t go down,” I replied. A shiver ran down the back of my neck. 
“We didn’t go up or down. So...” 

“We’re still on the first floor.” Ben finished my sentence for me. “But why 
is it so dark here? I can’t believe this is happening!” 

We stepped out of the elevator. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust to the darkness. But they couldn’t adjust. It 
was too dark. 

“There must be a light switch,” I said. I ran my hand along the wall. I could 
feel the outline of tiles. But no light switch. 

I swept both hands up and down the wall. No. No light switch. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Ben urged. “We don’t want to get trapped here. We 
can’t see a thing.” 

I was still searching for the light. “Okay,” I agreed. I lowered my hand and 
started back to the elevator. 

I heard the doors slide shut. 

“No!” I let out a sharp cry. 



Ben and I banged on the elevator doors. Then I felt along the wall for the 
button to open the doors. 

Panicked, my hand trembled. I swept my open palm all along the wall on 
both sides of the closed doors. 

No button. No elevator button. 

I turned and leaned my back against the wall. I was suddenly breathing 
hard. My heart pounded. 

“I can’t believe this is happening,” Ben muttered. 

“Would you please stop saying that!” I demanded. “It is happening. We’re 
here. We don’t know where. But we’re here.” 

“But if we can’t call the elevator, how do we get out of here?” Ben whined. 

“We’ll find our way,” I told him. I took a deep breath and held it. I decided 
I had to be the calm one since he was being so whiny and scared. 

I listened hard. “I can’t hear any music or voices or anything. We must be 
far away from the gym.” 

“Well... what do we do?” Ben cried. “We can’t just stand here!” 

My mind whirred. I squinted into the darkness, hoping to make out the 
shape of a door or a window. Anything! 

But the blackness that surrounded us was darker than the sky on a starless 
night. 

I pressed my back against the cool tile wall. “I know,” I said. “We’ll keep 
against the wall.” 

“And?” Ben whispered. “And we’ll do what?” 

“We’ll move along the wall,” I continued. “We’ll move along the wall until 
we come to a door. A door to a room with a light. Then maybe we’ll be able to 
figure out where we are.” 

“Maybe,” Ben replied. He didn’t sound hopeful. 

“Stick close behind me,” I instructed him. 

He bumped up against me. 

“Not that close!” I said. 

“I couldn’t help it. I can’t see!” he cried. 

Moving slowly—very slowly—we started walking. I kept my right hand on 
the wall, sliding it along the tiles as we walked. 

We’d only taken a few steps when I heard a sound behind me. A cough. 

I stopped and turned around. “Ben—was that you?” 

“Huh?” He bumped into me again. 



“Did you cough?” I asked softly. 

“No,” he replied. 

I heard another cough. Then a loud whisper. 

“Uh... Ben...” I said, grabbing his shoulder. “Guess what? We’re not 
alone.” 



13 


We both gasped as the lights came on. Dim and gray at first. 

I blinked several times and waited for the light to brighten. 

But it didn’t. 

I stared out. We were in a room! A gray classroom. My eyes moved from 
the black chalkboard to the charcoal-colored teacher’s desk. To the dark gray 
student desks. The pale gray tile walls. Then down to the black-and-gray patterns 
on the classroom floor. 

“Weird,” Ben muttered. “My eyes—” 

“It’s not your eyes,” I assured him. “The light is so dim in this room, it 
makes everything look gray and black.” 

“It’s like being in an old black-and-white movie,” Ben declared. 

Squinting into the dim light, we started edging toward the classroom door. 
“Let’s get out of here,” I suggested. “Before the lights go out again.” 

We were halfway across the room when I heard another cough. And then a 
girl’s voice rang out. “Hey—!” 

Ben and I both stopped. We turned as a girl about our age stepped out from 
behind a book cabinet. 

She stared at us. 

We stared back at her. 

She was kind of cute, with short, straight black hair and bangs across her 
forehead. She wore an old-fashioned-looking V-necked sweater, a long, pleated 
skirt, and black-and-white saddle shoes. 

I opened my mouth to say hi. But no sound came out as I noticed her skin. 
Her skin was as gray as her sweater. And her eyes were gray. And her lips were 
gray. 

She was like the room. She was in black-and-white too! 

Ben and I exchanged confused glances. Then I turned back to the girl. She 
clung to the side of the cabinet, eyeing Ben and me suspiciously. 

“Were you hiding back there?” I blurted out. 

She nodded. “We heard you coming. But we didn’t know who you were.” 

“We?” I asked. 

Before she could answer, four more kids—two boys and two girls—jumped 



out from behind the tall cabinet. 

All gray! All in shades of gray! 

“Look at them!” one of the boys cried. His eyes bulged as he stared at us. 
“I don’t believe it!” another boy shouted. 

Before Ben and I could move, they rushed forward. 

All shouting and crying out at once, they stampeded across the room. 
Surrounded us. 

Grabbed us. 

Pulled at our clothes. 

Pulled us. Screaming. Laughing. Shrieking. 

Pulled out my shirt. Ripped my sleeve. 

“Ben—!” I screamed. “They—they’re going to tear us apartl” 



14 


“Look! Look at this!” a girl cried. She held up my shirtsleeve. 

Two boys tugged at the rest of my shirt. 

I dropped to the floor. Tried to squirm away. 

But they had us surrounded. 

A girl pulled off one of my shoes. 

Ben swung his fist hard, trying to fight them away. His hand smacked the 
blackboard, and he cried out in pain. 

“Stop!” I heard a boy shout over the cries of the others. “Stop it! Get away 
from them!” 

I kicked out with both feet. I saw Ben swing his fist again. 

“Stop it!” the boy screamed. “Get away! Come on—stop!” 

The kids backed away. The girl dropped my shoe. I grabbed it off the floor. 

They took several steps back, moving in a line, staring at us. 

“The color!” a girl exclaimed. “So much color!” 

“It hurts my eyes!” a boy cried. 

“But it’s so beautiful !” a girl gushed. “It—it’s like a dream!” 

“Do you still dream in color?” a boy asked her. “My dreams are all in black 
and white.” 

Tugging on my shoe, I climbed shakily to my feet. I struggled to straighten 
my khakis and tuck in my torn shirt. 

Ben rubbed the hand he had smacked. His blond hair was matted with 
sweat. His face was bright red. 

“Tommy,” he whispered. “What’s going on? This is crazyV 

I stared at the five kids lined up in front of us. 

“No color...” I murmured. 

All of them were in black and white. Their clothes, their skin, their eyes, 
their hair—no color at all. Only shades of gray and black. 

As I struggled to catch my breath, I studied them. And realized they didn’t 
look like modern kids, like kids from our school. 

The girls all wore skirts, long skirts down to their ankles. The boys wore 
big-collared sports shirts, tucked into baggy, pleated pants. 



Like in an old movie... I thought. 

And all black and gray. 

We all stared at one another for a long while. Then the boy who seemed to 
be their leader spoke up. “We’re all sorry,” he said. “You see, we—” 

“We didn’t mean to hurt you,” the girl beside him interrupted. “It’s just 
that... we haven’t seen color for so long.” 

“I just wanted to touch it,” the girl with black bangs across her forehead 
added, shaking her head sadly. “I wanted to touch color. It’s been so long. So 
long...” 

“Did you come to help us?” the first boy asked softly. His gray eyes locked 
on mine. Pleading eyes. 

“Help you?” I replied. “No. No, we didn’t. You see—” 

“That’s too bad,” the girl with black bangs said, frowning. 

“Huh? Too bad?” I didn’t understand. “Why?” I asked. 

“Because,” replied the girl, “now you can never leave.” 



15 


“Hey—we’ve already scared them. They think we’re a bunch of crazed savages. 
Don’t try to scare them even more, Mary!” the boy scolded. 

“I’m not!” she insisted, crossing her arms over the front of her gray sweater. 
“I just think they should know the truth. I think—” 

“The truth?” I interrupted. “What’s going on here? This is a joke—right?” 

“Yeah. Go ahead. Wipe off the gray powder from your face and tell us it’s a 
joke,” Ben chimed in. 

The girl named Mary bit her bottom lip. I saw a tear form in her left eye. It 
brimmed over and ran down her gray cheek. “It’s no joke,” she choked out. 

“Give us a break!” Ben groaned. “Just make the lights brighter, and—” 

“That won’t help!” the boy cried angrily. 

Mary turned to him. She wiped the tear from her cheek. “I really thought 
they came to help us,” she said in a quivering voice. “I really thought that 
finally...” Her voice trailed off. 

Another girl put her arm around Mary. 

I shut my eyes for a moment. Squinting into the gray was giving me a 
headache. 

“Will someone tell us what is going on?” I heard Ben demand. 

I opened my eyes to see all five gray kids moving across the room toward 
us. 

The leader was a little taller than me. He had wavy black hair, and big black 
eyes that crinkled at the sides. I saw a small gray scar above one eyebrow. He 
had broad shoulders beneath his gray T-shirt. He was very athletic looking. 

The girl beside him was tall and very thin. She had long gray hair that fell 
straight down her back. She had sad gray eyes. 

“I’m Seth,” the boy said. “This is Mary and this is Eloise.” He pointed. 
“Eddie and Mona.” 

Ben and I introduced ourselves. 

“We didn’t mean to frighten you,” Mary repeated. “But can we touch your 
colors? We haven’t seen color for so long. We just—” Her voice cracked. She 
turned away. 

“Uh... Ben and I have to get back to the dance,” I told them, eyeing the 



door. “You see, we’re on the Decorations Committee. And a banner tore. And—” 

“You can’t get back,” Seth said. His dark eyes narrowed on mine. “Mary 
told you the truth. You can’t get back.” 

“That’s stupid,” Ben replied, shaking his head. “We’re in the old building— 
right? We’ll follow the hall till it leads to the new building. The gym is right 
downstairs.” 

Eloise coughed. I realized she was the one I’d heard when the lights were 
still out. She wiped her nose with a gray tissue. She appeared to have a cold. 

“You’re not in the old building,” she said hoarsely. 

“Then where are we?” Ben demanded. “The basement?” 

The gray kids shook their heads. 

“It’s a little hard to explain,” Seth said. 

“Well, we’ll find our way back,” I told them, starting for the door. “I mean, 
the school isn’t that big. We won’t be lost for long.” 

“You’re not really in the school,” Eloise said, wiping her nose again. 

“Excuse me?” Ben cried. “This looks a lot like a classroom to me. See? 
Desks? Chairs? Chalkboard?” 

“Let’s go,” I said. I gave him a little push toward the door. 

“Sit down,” Seth ordered sharply. 

Ben and I were nearly to the classroom door. 

“I said sit down,” Seth repeated. 

“You’d better listen to him,” the girl named Mona warned. 

Seth motioned impatiently to two desks. “Sit.” 

I swallowed hard. I felt a chill of fear over my entire body. I didn’t 
understand what was going on here. And I didn’t really want to understand. 

I just wanted to get away from this gray room and these black-and-white 

kids. 

They moved across the room toward us. Their expressions were tense. Seth 
held his arms stiffly at his sides, as if ready for a fight. 

“Sit down, guys,” he insisted. 

“Sorry. Some other time,” Ben replied. 

He and I both had the same idea in our heads. 

We both turned and ran at the same time. We made a mad dash for the 
classroom door. 

I got there first. 

I grabbed the door handle. Turned it. And pulled. 



“Come on! Come on!” Ben cried frantically. 
“It—it won’t open!” I shrieked. 

The door was locked. 



16 


In a total panic, Ben grabbed the doorknob and bumped me out of the way. He 
tugged with both hands. Then he lowered his shoulder to the door and tried 
pushing it open. 

But the door didn’t budge. 

“That door won’t open,” Seth said calmly. 

I turned. Seth still held his arms tensely at his sides. The other four gray 
kids stood on either side of him, their eyes narrowed at us, squinting at us 
through the dim gray light. 

“Why—why is it locked?” I stammered breathlessly. 

“It isn’t a door we can use,” Mary replied. Another tear glistened on her 
pale gray cheek. “It leads to the world of color.” 

“Huh? Excuse me?” I cried. 

“Whose idea is this little joke?” Ben demanded impatiently. “It’s not funny, 
guys! Not funny!” 

I could see that Ben was about to lose it. I put a hand on his arm, a signal to 
calm down. 

I had a feeling that these kids weren’t joking. 

“How do we get out of here?” Ben demanded. He banged a fist against the 
door. “You can’t keep us in this weird gray room. No way!” 

Seth motioned to the desks again. “Sit down, guys,” he pleaded again. 
“We’re not trying to keep you here. And we don’t plan to hurt you or anything.” 

Ben glanced at his watch. “But—but—” 

“We’ll try to explain,” Mary offered. “You really should try to understand 
what has happened.” 

“Especially since you will be staying here with us,” Eloise added. 

Another cold shiver ran down my back. “Why do you keep saying that?” I 
asked. 

They didn’t reply. 

Ben and I dropped into desk chairs. The three girls took chairs across from 
us. Eddie crossed his gray arms and leaned against the blackboard. 

Seth pulled himself up onto the teacher’s desk. “It’s hard to know where to 
start,” he said, running a hand back through his thick black hair. 



“Start by telling us where we are,” I demanded. 

“And then tell us how to get to the gym,” Ben insisted. “Make it short— 
okay?” 

“You’ve come to the other side,” Seth said. 

Ben rolled his eyes. “The other side of what?” he asked impatiently. 

“The other side of the wall,” Seth replied. 

Eloise sneezed. She pulled a wad of tissues from the bag at her side. “I can’t 
get rid of this cold,” she sighed. “I think it’s because there’s no sunlight.” 

“No sunlight?” I cried. “The other side of the wall?” I let out a loud groan. 
“Will you all please stop talking in mysteries?” 

Mona turned to Seth. “Start at the beginning,” she said. “Maybe that will 
help them.” 

Eloise fumbled around in her gray bag. Finally, she pulled out a pack of 
tissues and placed them on the desk in front of her. 

“Well, okay,” Seth agreed. “The beginning.” 

Ben and I exchanged glances. Then we leaned forward to listen. 

“The five of us were in the very first class at Bell Valley School,” Seth 
began. “The school opened about fifty years ago, and—” 

“Whoa! Wait a minute!” Ben jumped to his feet. “Tommy and I aren’t 
morons!” he declared. “If you went to school fifty years ago, you’d be at least 
sixty years old!” 

Seth nodded. “Guess you’re good at math, huh?” It was a joke, but it 
sounded bitter. 

“We haven’t aged,” Mary explained, straightening her black bangs with one 
hand. “We’ve stayed exactly the same age for fifty years!” 

Ben rolled his eyes. “I think that elevator took us to Mars!” he whispered to 
me. 

“It’s all true,” Eddie said, shifting his weight. “We’re frozen here. Frozen in 
time.” 

“The elevator must move between your world and ours,” Mona said, gazing 
back at it. “No one else has ever come here by elevator. It’s not how we arrived.” 

“I don’t understand,” I confessed. “None of this makes sense to me. The 
elevator was boarded up. Hidden. Why did it bring us here?” 

“It must be the only connection between our worlds,” Mona said 
mysteriously. 

❖ “This is all crazy. We’re missing the dance,” Ben whispered. 



“Let them finish the story,” I told him. “Then weTl go.” 

Seth stood up and began pacing back and forth. “The first class at Bell 
Valley School was pretty small,” he told us. “There were only twenty-five of us. 
It was a brand-new school, and we were kind of happy to be the first ones in it.” 

Eloise sneezed. Mona said, “Bless you.” 

“One day, our principal announced it was Class Photo Day,” Seth 
continued. “A photographer came to take a group photo of our class.” 

“Was it a color photo?” Ben broke in. He laughed. But no one else did. 

“School photos weren’t in color in the nineteen forties,” Mary told Ben. 
“They were in black and white.” 

“We all gathered in the library to take the photo,” Seth continued. “All 
twenty-five of us. The photographer lined us up.” 

“I recognized him right away,” Eddie broke in. “He was an angry man. An 
evil man. He hated kids.” 

“We were all in a crazy mood,” Mona added. “We were laughing and joking 
around a lot and pretending to wrestle. And the photographer became furious 
because we wouldn’t stand still for him.” 

“We all hated him,” Eddie chimed in. “The whole town knew he was evil. 
But he was the only photographer around.” 

“I’ll never forget his name,” Eloise said sadly. “Mr. Chameleon. I’ll never 
forget it. Because... because a chameleon changes colors—and we can’t.” 

“Mr. Chameleon?” Ben snickered. “Didn’t he used to hang out with Mr. 
Lizard?” 

“Ben, stop—” I pleaded. 

I could see that Ben didn’t believe a word of Seth’s story. He kept making 
jokes. But Seth and the others looked so solemn, so bitter. 

Staring at their old-fashioned clothes and haircuts, at their sad, gray faces, I 
believed them. They were the vanished kids, I realized. The lost class of 1947. 

“The photographer lined us up in three rows,” Seth continued, pacing back 
and forth, hands shoved in his gray pants pockets. “He stood behind his big box 
camera. It had a drape on the back that he stuck his head under. Then he raised 
the flash high. 

“He told us to say ‘cheese’. Then the flash went off with a loud CRACK!” 

“But it wasn’t a normal flash,” Mary broke in. “It was so bright... so 
bright...” Her voice trailed off. 

“So bright, we couldn’t see,” Seth continued, shaking his head. “The room 



—the library—it disappeared in the flash. And when we could open our eyes, 
when we could see again... we were here.” 

Ben opened his mouth. Probably to make another lame joke. But I guess he 
changed his mind. He closed his mouth without saying anything. 

“We were here,” Seth repeated, his voice shaking with emotion. He 
slammed the desk with his fist. “We weren’t in the library anymore. We weren’t 
in the real school anymore. We were here. Here in this black-and-white world.” 

“As if we were trapped inside a photograph,” Mona broke in. “Trapped 
forever inside a black-and-white photograph.” 

“Trapped in Grayworld,” Eddie said bitterly. “That’s what we call it. 
Grayworld.” 

“We’ve tried everything,” Eloise added. “We’ve tried every way to get 
back. We still call out for help. We still think maybe someone will come....” 

“I heard you,” I murmured. “I was in class. And I heard you calling.” 

“But—but—” Ben sputtered. “I don’t get it. Where exactly are we?” 

No one answered for a long moment. Then Seth walked up to Ben. Pressing 
his hands on the desktop, he lowered his face close to Ben’s, staring Ben in the 
eyes. 

“Ben,” he said, “did you ever see a wall and wonder what was on the other 
side?” 

Ben glanced uncomfortably at me. “Yeah. I guess,” he replied. 

“Well, we’re on the other side!” Seth cried. “We’re on the other side of your 
world. And now, you are too.” 

“Soon you will be one of us!” Eddie said. 

“No—!” Ben cried. 

He said more, but I didn’t hear him. 

I glanced down at my hands—and opened my mouth in a high scream of 
horror. 



17 


“My—my fingers !” I shrieked. 

I held both hands up to show them. My fingers had turned gray. The gray 
was spreading onto my palms. 

Ben grabbed my hand and pulled it close to examine it. “Oh no,” he 
murmured. “No...” 

“Ben—yours too!” I cried. 

He dropped my hand and studied his hands. His right hand was almost 
entirely gray. The fingers on his left hand were gray, and the color in his palm 
was starting to fade. 

“No... no...” he repeated, shaking his head. 

I raised my eyes to the five gray kids. “You—you weren’t joking,” I choked 
out. 

They stared back at us with blank expressions. 

Mary stared at my hands. “It moves quickly,” she said finally. “You’ll see.” 

“No!” I cried, jumping to my feet. “What can we do? We can’t turn gray! 
We can’tl” 

“You have no choice,” Eloise said sadly. “You are in Grayworld now. All 
color fades so quickly here.” 

“You are one of us now,” Seth repeated. “Once you turn completely gray, 
you will never be able to turn back.” 

“No!” Ben and I both protested. 

“We’re getting out!” I cried. I kicked my chair aside and ran back to the 
classroom door. I turned the knob and struggled to pull it open. 

Ben stepped up beside me, and we both pulled until we were groaning and 
our faces were bright red. 

“It’s bolted shut from the other side,” Seth called. “You’re wasting your 
time.” 

“No—” I insisted. “We’re getting out. We’re getting out now!” 

With a desperate cry, I raised both fists and started pounding on the wall. 
“Help us!” I screamed. “Somebody—help us! Can you hear me? Please—help!” 

I pounded until my fists hurt. Then I lowered my hands with a sigh. 

“Don’t you think we already tried that?” Mary asked bitterly. “We pound on 



the walls and call for help all the time.” 

“But no one ever answers,” Eloise added. “And no one ever comes to help.” 

I gazed down at my hands. They were completely gray to the wrists. I 
pulled up my sleeves. The color of my arms was starting to fade. 

“Ben—!” I started. He was staring at his graying skin too. 

My mind whirred. I suddenly felt dizzy. 

“How do we escape from here? How do we get back to our world?” 

“Maybe the elevator?” Ben suggested. 

“It’s no use,” Seth warned. 

But we ignored him and bolted through the aisle between the desks. To the 
alcove in back of the big gray classroom. The narrow alcove that held the 
elevator. 

“There’s no elevator button,” Mary called after us. “No way to call the 
elevator.” 

“It never runs,” Seth added. “It hasn’t run in fifty years. When we heard it 
moving tonight, we couldn’t believe it.” 

“There’s got to be a way!” I cried. 

I smoothed my hand over the wall beside the elevator doors. “There’s got to 
be a hidden button.” The wall felt warm and smooth. 

I pounded it with my fist until my whole hand ached. 

Ben pressed his hands along the crack between the two doors. With a groan, 
he struggled to pry the elevator doors open. 

No luck. 

“A screwdriver?” he called over his shoulder. “Does anyone have a 
screwdriver?” 

“Or maybe a knife, or a stick, or something?” I added. “To pry the doors 
apart?” 

“We tried it,” Eloise moaned in her hoarse, scratchy voice. “We tried 
everything. Everything !” 

I kicked the metal doors hard. I felt so fmstrated, and angry, and frightened 
—all at the same time. 

Pain shot up my foot and leg. I hobbled back against the wall, breathing 

hard. 

My shirtsleeves were graying. I pulled up one sleeve. The gray on my skin 
had moved past my wrist. 

“Sit down with us,” Mary called. “Sit down and wait. It really isn’t that 



bad.” 

“You get used to it,” Seth added softly. 

“Used to it?” I cried shrilly, still breathing hard. “Used to a world without 
any color? Used to being totally in black and white? And not being able to go 
home? Or go anywhere?” 

Mary lowered her head. The others gazed back at Ben and me, their gray 
faces solemn and sad. 

“I—I’m not going to get used to it!” I stammered. “Ben and I are getting 
out of here.” 

I raised one hand and rubbed it with the other. I guess I thought maybe I 
could rub the gray off. My skin felt warm and soft as ever. It didn’t feel any 
different. 

But the color was gone. And the gray was creeping up, creeping up fast. 

“What are we going to do?” Ben cried. His eyes were wild. His voice came 
out high and shrill. 

“The window!” I shouted, pointing. “Come on. Out the window!” 

“No!” Seth shouted. He moved quickly to block our path. “No—don’t! I’m 
warning you—” 

“Don’t go out there!” Eddie cried. 

Why are they trying to stop us? I wondered. They don’t want us to escape! 
They want to keep us here! They want us to be as gray as they are! 

“Out of the way, Seth!” I cried. 

Ben dodged one way. I dodged the other. 

Seth made a grab for me. But I slid away from him. 

And dove to the window ledge. 

Staring out into the gray night, I shoved up the window. 

“Stay away from the kids!” 

“They’re crazy! They’ve all gone crazy!” 

“They’ll take you to the pit!” 

We heard their cries and warnings behind us. But they didn’t make any 
sense to us. So we ignored them. 

Ben and I climbed onto the window ledge—and scrambled out. 



18 


Ben dropped onto the ground with a hard THUD. I followed him, landing on my 
feet on soft grass. 

The night sky spread overhead, a solid black. No stars. No moon. 

Seth and the others appeared at the window, shouting and signaling for us to 
come back. But we both took off, jogging over the dark grass. 

We crossed the street and saw low, dark houses set far back on gray lawns. 
No lights shone in the windows. No cars came by. No one was out walking. 

“Is this Bell Valley?” Ben asked as we crossed another street and kept 
jogging. “Why doesn’t it look familiar?” 

“These aren’t the same houses across from the school,” I said. 

A chill of fear made me stop running. 

How could there be a whole different town out here? And where were the 
people who lived here? 

Was it deserted? Was it like a movie set? I suddenly wondered. Not a real 
neighborhood at all? 

The kids’ warnings repeated in my ears. Maybe Ben and I made a mistake, I 
thought. Maybe we should have listened to them. 

I turned back toward the school. Wisps of fog came floating up from the 
ground. The school rose darkly behind the spreading gray mist. 

Startled, I squinted hard at it. “Whoa—Ben,” I gasped. “Check out the 
school.” 

He was studying it too. “That’s not our school!” he exclaimed. 

We were staring at a low, square building with a flat roof. Only one story 
high. Gray light flooded from the only window facing the street. 

The light fell on a slender, bare flagpole planted near the street. And a small 
set of swings, silvery gray in the dim wash of light. 

“We’re in a different world,” I said, my voice shaky and shrill. “We’re in a 
different world—so close to ours.” 

“But—but—” Ben sputtered. 

The clumps of fog began to float together, forming a billowing wall. It 
moved quickly up from the ground, hiding the bottom of the building from us 


now. 



“Let’s keep going,” I urged Ben. “There’s got to be a way out of here!” 

We started to jog again, moving past darkened houses and empty lots. 
Running under black-trunked trees, all winter bare. Our shoes clattering over 
streets without cars or streetlights. 

I kept gazing up at the sky, hoping to see the moon or the blinking light of a 
star. But I stared up at a ceiling of solid black. 

We’re like shadows, I thought. Shadows running through shadows. 

Stop it, Tommy! I scolded myself. Don’t start thinking weird thoughts. Just 
keep your mind straight ahead on what you have to do. 

Which is to find a way to escape from this place. 

We jogged past a black mailbox, across another empty street. And as we 
ran, the fog swept around us. 

It floated low at first, clinging to the dark grass, billowing over the streets. 
There was no breeze. No wind at all. 

But the fog quickly began to rise. It rose all around us. Hiding the houses 
behind it. Hiding the bare trees and streets and driveways—hiding everything 
behind a thick, swirling curtain of gray. 

With a groan, Ben stopped jogging. 

I ran right into him. “Hey—!” I cried out breathlessly. “Why did you stop?” 

“I can’t see anything,” he choked out. “The fog...” He lowered his hands to 
his knees and leaned forward, struggling to catch his breath. 

“We’re not getting anywhere—are we?” I asked softly. “I mean, we could 
probably keep running forever. And we’d never get out of this place.” 

“Maybe we should wait till morning,” Ben suggested, still bent over. “Then 
the fog will probably be gone and we can see where we’re going.” 

“Maybe...” I said doubtfully. 

I shivered. I wondered how much of me had turned gray. Did I have any 
color left? 

I pulled up my shirt and struggled to see. But it was too dark. Everything 
looked black and gray. I couldn’t tell. 

“What do you want to do?” I asked Ben. “Go back to the school?” 

The fog swept around us. So thick, I could barely see him. 

“I—I don’t think we could find the school in this fog,” he stammered. I 
could hear the fear in his voice. 

I turned back. 

He was right. I couldn’t see the street or the trees on the other side of the 



thick mist. 

“Maybe we can retrace our steps,” I suggested. “If we keep going in that 
direction—” I pointed. 

But in the thick, spinning fog, I wasn’t sure it was the right direction. 

“This was dumb,” Ben muttered. “We should have listened to those kids. 
They were trying to help us, and—” 

“It’s too late to think about that,” I said sharply. “I have an idea. Let’s try to 
find our way through the fog to one of the houses and spend the night there.” 

“You mean break in?” Ben demanded. 

“They seem to be empty,” I replied. The fog swirled thicker, wrapping us up 
tightly. I tugged his arm. “Come on. We’ll find a place to wait until morning. It’s 
better than standing out here all night.” 

“I guess...” he agreed. 

We turned and began walking up a sloping front yard. We had to move 
slowly because we could barely see. 

We took six or seven steps—and then I let out a scream as someone 
knocked me to the ground. 



19 


“Ohhhhhh!” A terrified moan escaped my throat. 

I rolled onto my back. 

A black cat tumbled beside me. 

A cat? 

It had jumped onto my shoulders from a tree limb. 

The cat stared up at me with gray eyes. Its black fur bristled. Its tail stood 
straight up. 

And then it took off, vanishing into the fog. 

I pulled myself shakily to my feet. 

“Tommy, what happened?” Ben demanded. 

“Didn’t you see that cat?” I cried. “It jumped down on me. Knocked me to 
the ground. I thought... I thought...” The words caught in my throat. 

“Are you okay? I couldn’t see it,” Ben replied. “The fog—it’s so thick. All 
of a sudden, you screamed. You scared me to death!” 

I rubbed the back of my neck. Why did the cat jump on me like that? I 
wondered. 

Maybe it’s lonely, I decided. With no other people around. 

And just as I thought that, I heard a girl’s voice. “Over here!” she called. 

And then a boy, very nearby, shouted: “Don’t let them get away! Grab 
them!” 



20 


Ben and I squinted into the fog. We heard shrill voices. And then the thump of 
footsteps over the grass. But we couldn’t see anyone. 

We didn’t know which way to run. 

“This way! Over here!” the girl repeated breathlessly to her friend. 

“Stop them!” another girl chimed in. 

Ben and I spun around. “Who’s there?” I tried to shout. But my voice 
spilled out weak and frightened. “Who is it?” 

And then, figures appeared in the swirling fog. Shadowy, gray figures. 
Running toward us and then stopping just near enough to see through the curtain 
of gray. 

Staring, surprised faces. 

Their arms out. Bodies tense. Hair blowing in the circling mist. 

I backed up to Ben. We stood back to back, gaping out at them as they 
formed a tight circle around us. 

“They’re—kids!” Ben exclaimed. “More kids!” 

Are they the rest of the missing class? I wondered. 

“Hey—!” I called to them. “What are you doing out here?” 

They stared back at us in silence. 

The fog billowed and shifted. I saw a short, black-haired girl whispering to 
a big kid in an old-fashioned-looking black jacket. And then the fog covered 
them again, and they seemed to vanish before my eyes. 

Other kids appeared and disappeared. There must have been about twenty 
of them. 

They spoke softly to one another, gazing out at us, keeping in a tight circle. 

“What are you doing out here?” I repeated, trying not to sound as frightened 
as I felt. “My friend and I—we’re lost. Can you help us?” 

“You still have color,” a girl murmured. 

“Color. Color. Color.” The word was repeated among the circle of gray 

kids. 

“They must be the other kids from the class,” Ben whispered. “The kids 
Seth and the others warned us about.” 



Seth’s warning flashed back into my mind: “They’re crazy. They’ve all 
gone crazy. ” 

“We’re lost!” I cried. “Can you help us?” 

They didn’t reply. They whispered excitedly among themselves. 

“Turn, turn, ” a boy called suddenly. So loud, I jumped back. 

“What did you say?” I demanded. “Can you help us?” 

“Turn, turn,” a girl repeated. 

“We don’t belong here!” Ben cried. “We’re trying to get away from here. 
But we’re totally lost.” 

“Turn, turn,” a few voices murmured. 

“Please—answer us!” I begged. “Can you help us?” 

And then they all chanted, “Turn, turn. ” And they began to dance. 

Keeping the circle tight, they moved to the right in a rapid rhythm. They 
raised one leg high, and stepped to the right. Lowered the leg and gave a little 
kick. Then another high step to the right. 

Some kind of weird dance. 

“Turn, turn,” they chanted. “Turn, turn.” 

“Please—stop!” Ben and I both pleaded. “Why are you doing that? Are you 
trying to scare us?” 

“Turn, turn. ” The dark, dancing figures moved in and out of the swirling 

fog. 

The fog lifted for a moment, and I saw that they were holding hands as they 
danced. Holding hands tightly. Keeping the circle closed. 

Keeping Ben and me inside. 

“Turn, turn,” they chanted. A step, then a kick. “Turn, turn. ” 

“What are they doing?” Ben whispered to me. “Is it a game or something?” 

I swallowed hard. “I don’t think so,” I replied. 

The fog shifted again. It lowered over the grass, then billowed away. 

I squinted at the chanting faces as they moved in the circle. 

Their expressions were hard. 

Their eyes cold. 

Cold, unfriendly faces. 

“Turn, turn. Turn, turn. ” 

“Stop it!” I screamed. “Give us a break! What are you doing? Please— 
somebody explain!” 

“Turn, turn. ” The chant continued. The circle of kids moved to the right. 



They stared at Ben and me, as if challenging us—as if daring us to stop them. 

“Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray. 

Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray! ” 

The circle spun around us. The kids danced in rhythm in the billowing fog. 
A steady, frightening rhythm. 

So cold... so menacing. 

So crazy ! 

“Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray. 

Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray. ” 

And suddenly, watching the eerie dance, listening to their machinelike 
chant, I knew. I knew what they were doing. It was some kind of weird 
ceremony. They were watching us, holding us there. Holding us there until we 
were gray like them. 



21 


“Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray. ” 

As the kids moved in their tight circle, chanting softly, I studied their faces. 
So hard... so cold. 

They were trying to frighten us. 

I counted nine girls and ten boys. All dressed in old-fashioned clothes. Big, 
heavy shoes. And I suddenly wished this was all an old movie. All just a movie 
and not really happening to Ben and me. 

“Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray. ” 

“Why are you doing this?” Ben shouted over their eerie chant. “Why won’t 
you talk to us?” 

They continued their circle dance, ignoring his cries. 

I turned to him, leaning close so that he could hear me. “We have to make a 
mn for it,” I said. “They’re crazy. They’re going to keep us here. Until we are 
totally gray like them.” 

Ben nodded solemnly, his eyes on the circle of kids. 

He cupped his hands around his mouth to reply to me. And I gasped. His 
hands were completely gray. 

I raised both of my hands to my face. Gray. Solid gray. 

How far had the gray traveled? How much time did Ben and I have? 

“We’ve got to get away from them,” I told him. “Come on, Ben. On the 
count of three. You run this way. And I’ll run that way.” I motioned in two 
different directions. 

“If we take them by surprise, maybe we can break through,” I said. 

“And then what?” Ben replied. 

I didn’t want to answer that question. I didn’t know the answer. “Let’s just 
get away from them!” I cried. “I can’t stand that stupid chanting for one more 
second!” 

Ben nodded. He sucked in a deep breath. 

“One...” I counted. 



“Turn, turn. 

Turn to gray. ” 

The chanting kids had tightened their circle. They were nearly arm in arm. 
Had they read our minds? 

“Two...” I counted. I tensed my leg muscles. Prepared to run. 

The curtain of fog had lifted. Puffs of mist clung to the ground. But I could 
see dark houses beyond the circle of kids. 

If we can break through their linked arms, maybe we can hide in one of 
those houses, I thought. 

“Good luck,” Ben murmured. 

“Three!” I shouted. 

We lowered our heads and started to run. 



22 


I went about four steps and slipped on the wet grass. 

“OW!” I cried out as pain shot up my right leg. Did I pull a muscle? 

The chanting stopped. The gray kids let out shouts of surprise. 

My leg throbbed with pain. I had to stop. I bent to rub the leg muscle. 
Raising my gaze, I saw Ben dart toward the circle. “Aaaiiiii!” He let out a 
wild scream as he ran. 

Two boys tackled him: one high, one low. Ben dropped to the grass, and 
they fell on top of him. 

“Get off! Get off me!” Ben shrieked. 

A boy and girl grabbed me roughly. They spun me around. And shoved me 
hard toward Ben. 

“Let us go!” I cried. “What are you doing? Why are you keeping us here?” 
They pulled Ben to his feet. And shoved us together. 

They grouped around us quickly, bodies tensed, ready to capture us if we 
tried another escape. 

“We’re not going anywhere,” I sighed. “Will somebody please explain what 
is going on here.” 

“Turn, turn, ” a girl with long gray braids said in a husky voice. 

“I’ve heard that!” I cried angrily. 

“Turn to gray,” the girl added. “We’re waiting for you to turn.” 

“Why?” I demanded. “Just tell us why.” 

“No color in the moon,” she replied. “No color in the stars.” 

“No color in my dreams,” a boy added sadly. 

“Please—make sense!” Ben pleaded. “I—I don’t understand!” 

I rubbed my sore leg. The pain had faded, but the muscle still ached. 

“Just help us get back to the school,” I pleaded. 

“We left the school!” a boy shouted. “No color in the school.” 

“No color anywhere,” a girl cried. “We’ll never go back to school.” 

“No school! No school! No school!” some kids chanted. 

“But we have to get back there!” I insisted. 

“No school! No school! No school!” they chanted again. 




“It’s no use,” Ben whispered in my ear. “They’re totally messed up! They 
don’t make any sense at all.” 

I felt a chill. The air was turning colder. 

A wave of terror swept over me. I struggled to fight it back. 

Kids grabbed Ben and me. They pushed us roughly across the grass. They 
held us tightly by the shoulders and forced us forward. 

“Where are you taking us?” I screamed. 

They didn’t answer. 

Ben and I struggled to break free. But there were too many of them. And 
they were too strong. 

They pushed us up a dark hill. Wisps of fog swirled around our feet as we 
climbed. The tall grass was wet and slippery. 

“Where are we going?” I cried. “Tell us! Where are you taking us?” 

“The Black Pit!” a girl exclaimed. She pressed her mouth close to my ear as 
we walked. “Will you jump, or will we have to push you?” 



23 


“Pit? What kind of pit?” I screamed. 

No one answered. 

We stopped at the top of the hill. They kept their tight grip on Ben and me. 
Over Ben’s shoulder, I saw four kids approaching. As they came nearer, I saw 
that they were carrying four large buckets. 

They set the buckets down in a row. They shoved Ben and me toward them. 
Steam poured up from a dark, bubbling liquid inside. A sharp, sour aroma 
rose up in the steam. 

A girl carried a stack of metal cups in her arms. She handed a cup to a boy. 
He dipped it into the thick black liquid. It made a hissing sound as the cup 
dipped low into the liquid. 

“Ohhh!” I gasped as the boy raised the steaming cup to his lips, tilted his 
head back, and poured the disgusting liquid down his throat. 

“No color in the cup!” a boy shouted. 

“Drink the blackness!” a girl cried. 

“Drink! Drink! Drink!” Kids cheered and applauded. 

They lined up eagerly. And as Ben and I stared in horror, they each dipped a 
cup into the smelly black gunk—and then drank it down. 

“No color in the drink! No color in the cup!” 

“Drink! Drink the blackness!” 

I tried once again to break free. But three boys held me now. I couldn’t 
move. 

Kids were cheering and laughing. A boy drank a whole cup of the smelly 
black liquid—and then spewed it into the air. 

Loud cheers. 

A girl spit loudly and sprayed black gunk into the face of the girl beside her. 
A boy sprayed the black liquid up like a fountain. 

“We cover ourselves in blackness!” a boy boomed in a loud, deep voice. 
“We cover ourselves because there’s no color in the moon! No color in the stars! 
No color on the earth!” 

A girl spit black gunk over the hair of a short boy with glasses. The black 
liquid rolled slowly down his forehead and over his glasses. He bent to fill his 



cup, drank, and spit a gob of it down the front of the girl’s coat. 

Laughing and cheering, hooting at the top of their lungs, they sprayed each 
other. Spit and sprayed the hot black gunk until they were all drenched, all 
dripping, covered in oily blackness. 

“No color in the cup! No color in the drink!” 

And then the hands gripped me tighter. And Ben and I were pulled to the 
top of the hill. 

I gazed down the other side. And saw a steep drop. And down below, at the 
bottom... 

Too dark. 

I couldn’t see a thing. But I could hear the loud bubbling. I could see thick 
steam floating up, wave after wave of it. And I could smell the sharp, sour odor 
—so strong, I started to gag. 

“The Black Pit!” someone cried. “Into the Black Pit!” 

Lots of kids cheered. 

Ben and I were pushed to the edge of the dropoff. 

“Jump! Jump! Jump!” some kids began to chant. 

“Jump into the Black Pit!” 

“But—why?” I shrieked. “Why are you doing this?” 

“Cover yourself in blackness!” a girl screamed. “Cover yourself like us!” 

Kids laughed and cheered. 

Ben turned to me, his face twisted in fear. “It—it’s boiling hot down there,” 
he stammered, gazing into the bubbling pit below. “And it smells like dead 
animals!” 

“Jump! Jump! Jump!” kids began to chant. 

My eyes swept over them. Laughing. Cheering. The black goo running 
down their faces, down their clothes. The kids tossed their heads back and 
spewed gobs of black liquid into the air. 

“Jump! Jump! Jump!” 

Suddenly, the chanting and laughter stopped. I heard screams. 

Strong hands grabbed me around the waist from behind. And shoved me 
hard—into the steaming pit. 



24 


No. 

I didn’t fall. I didn’t go over the side. 

The hands held on to me. Spun me around. 

I squinted into a familiar face. Seth! 

“Run!” he cried. “We came to rescue you!” 

I turned and saw Mary and Eloise guiding Ben down the hill. 

“Let’s go!” Seth cried. 

We started to run. But we didn’t get far. 

The other kids had been startled at first. But they quickly got over their 
surprise. And formed a tight circle around us. 

“They’ve trapped us!” I cried. “How can we break through?” 

We stopped and stared at them as they began to circle us, moving silently, 
their faces smeared with the black liquid, their clothing drenched and stained. 

“I thought we could outrun them,” Seth started. “But—” 

1 lowered my gaze to a pile of dead leaves on the ground. And an idea 
flashed into my mind. 

I shoved my hand into the pocket of my khakis. 

“Get ready,” I warned the others. 

Ben turned to me. “Get ready for what?” he demanded. 

“Get ready,” I repeated. “Get ready to move.” 



25 


“Okay!” I cried. 

I raised the lighter. Clicked it once. Twice. 

A yellow flame shot up. 

“Owww!” a girl cried. 

Several other kids cried out. Some shielded their eyes or turned away from 
the flame. 

“Too bright!” a girl screamed. 

“My eyes! It hurts my eyes!” 

“Grab it! Grab it!” a boy wailed. 

But I wasn’t finished. 

I lowered the flame to the pile of leaves at our feet. The leaves caught 
instantly, with a loud WHOOOOSH. Bright orange flames roared up. 

“Nooooo!” The kids covered their eyes and cried out in pain. 

“Let’s go!” I called to Ben and the others. But I didn’t need to say it. They 
were already running over the dark grass. I lowered my head and ran after them. 

I heard kids screaming and crying behind us. 

“I can’t see! I can’t see!” 

“Somebody—do something!” 

“Put out the fire!” 

I glanced back. The pile of burning leaves sent up a darting wall of red- 
orange light. So bright against the black night sky. 

Covering their eyes, the kids were scrambling away, running in all 
directions. No one was chasing after us. 

Trotting hard through the foggy night, Seth and the two girls led us away 
from the hill. “We tried to warn you about the others,” Mary said breathlessly. 
“But you ran away. You wouldn’t listen.” 

“They’ve lost their minds,” Seth added sadly. “They can’t think straight 
anymore.” 

“They’re like some kind of wild gang now,” Eloise added. “They have their 
own laws. Their own strange traditions. They cover themselves in black goo 
every night. It’s—it’s really frightening.” 



“That’s why the five of us stay in the school,” Eloise explained. “We’re 
afraid of them too.” 

“They do horrible, crazy things,” Mary said. “They’ve given up all hope. 
They don’t care what they do.” 

I shivered. The gray moon had disappeared behind clouds again, and the air 
grew cold. The three gray kids seemed to fade with the moonlight. 

I heard shouts. From nearby. Excited voices. 

“They’re coming back!” I cried. 

“We’d better hurry,” Seth said. “Follow us.” 

He and the two girls turned and began mnning toward the street. Ben and I 
followed, keeping in the deep shadow of the tall hedges that lined the yards. 

I heard the shouts again, from close behind us. 

“Where are you taking us?” Ben asked in a breathless whisper. 

“Back to the school,” Seth replied. 

“To help us get out of this place?” I cried. “To help us back to our own 
world?” 

“No,” Seth replied without slowing his stride. “We told you, Tommy. We 
can’t help you go back. But you’ll be safer in the school with us.” 

“A lot safer,” Mary added. 

Jogging hard, Ben and I followed them through dark yards and over empty 
streets. The bare trees cracked and groaned overhead. The only other sound was 
the steady THUD of our shoes as we ran. 

I didn’t hear the other kids’ voices. But I knew they had to be nearby. Still 
searching for us. 

I breathed a sigh of relief when the little school building came into view. 
Ben and I hurried inside. We followed Seth and the two girls back to the large 
classroom. Mona and Eddie were waiting there for us. 

I sat down at a desk and struggled to catch my breath. When I looked up, I 
found all five kids staring wide-eyed at Ben and me. 

“What’s wrong?” I demanded. 

They didn’t answer for a long moment. Then, finally, Eloise said, “You’d 
better check yourself out in the mirror.” She pointed to a tall mirror near the 
elevator alcove. 

Ben and I made our way quickly to the mirror. 

My heart was pounding by the time I stepped in front of it. A heavy feeling 
of dread swept over me. 



I knew what I was about to see. 

But I prayed I was wrong. 

I took a deep breath—and gazed into the mirror. 



26 


“Nooooo.” Ben opened his mouth in a sorrowful moan. 

We stared at two gray figures. 

My khakis, my shirt. Gray now. My hair. My eyes. All of me. All in shades 
of gray. 

“We’re almost one of them,” Ben murmured. He uttered another moan. 
“What are the school colors here? Gray and gray?” He tried to laugh. But I saw 
his whole body tremble. 

“No—wait!” I cried. “Ben, look. We still have a little time!” 

I pointed into the mirror. 

My ears were gray. And the gray had spread over my lips and chin. But my 
cheeks still held their color. My cheeks and my nose. 

Ben’s face was the same. “That’s all that’s left,” he sighed. “The front of 
my face.” 

“We’re sorry,” Mary said, stepping up behind us. “We’re really sorry. In a 
few minutes, you’ll be gray like us.” 

“No—!” I insisted, spinning away from the mirror. “There’s got to be a 
way. Hasn’t anyone ever escaped?” 

Seth’s answer shocked me. 

“Yes,” he said softly. “One girl escaped from Grayworld. Just a few weeks 
ago.” 

“After fifty years, one of us made it back to the world,” Mona sighed. 

“How?” Ben and I cried at the same time. 

“How did she do it?” I demanded. 

They all shook their heads. “We don’t know,” Eloise replied sadly. “She just 
disappeared. We’ve been waiting for her to come back for us.” 

“When the elevator opened tonight, we thought it was her,” Eddie said. “We 
thought she had come back to rescue us.” 

Greta! 

Her face flashed into my mind. 

Of course! Greta, that strange girl with her gray eyes, her white-blond hair, 
her all-black outfits. 



Greta had escaped from Grayworld. Greta had returned to the world of 
color. No wonder she was so eager to get her hands on Thalia’s bright lipstick! 

Greta... 

Why hadn’t she returned to rescue her friends? 

How did she make her escape? 

My eyes traveled to the elevator at the back of the room. Open! I ordered it 
silently. Open up — now! Please open! 

But, of course, the gray doors remained shut. 

I shoved my hands into my khakis pockets. Thinking hard, trying to fight 
down my panic, I started to walk to the front of the room. 

Ben slumped into a chair, shaking his head sadly. “This can’t be 
happening,” he muttered. He pounded the desktop angrily. “This can’t be 
happening!” 

“Think, Tommy. Think,” I instructed myself out loud. “There’s got to be a 
way to stop the gray. There’s got to be a way to bring the color back. Think!” 

My mind raced. I was too frightened to think clearly. 

Every muscle in my body tensed. 

Thinking hard, I pulled out the plastic lighter from my pocket. Nervously, I 
twirled it between my fingers. Slid it from hand to hand. 

Think! Think! 

I fumbled with the lighter. It fell out of my hand and clattered onto the 
floor. 

I stared at it as I bent to pick it up. The lighter had been bright red. But now 
the plastic had faded to gray. 

But the flame... 

Suddenly, I had an idea. 

I stood up and turned to the others. I raised the lighter. “What if...” I 
started, thinking hard. Excited by my flash of hope. 

“What if I lit up the room with yellow light from the other world? Do you 
think the color—the yellow light—would wash away the gray?” 

“You already tried it—outside,” Ben reminded me. 

“But that was outside,” I replied. “What if I light it near the wall? Do you 
think the bright color will make the gray wall fade away so that we can escape to 
the other side, the side of color?” 

They stared back at me, their eyes locked on the lighter in my hand. 

I didn’t wait for their reply. 



“I’m going to try it,” I announced. 

I raised the plastic lighter high. 

Their eyes followed the lighter as I raised it high. 
“Good luck,” Ben whispered. “Good luck to us all.” 
I clicked the lighter. 

Clicked it again. 

Clicked it. 

Clicked it hard. 

It wouldn’t light. 



27 


I slammed the lighter onto the desktop. 

“It’s out!” I wailed. “I used it up. It’s out of fluid.” 

“No—” Ben cried. “Try it again, Tommy. Please—give it one more try.” 

I groaned and picked up the lighter. My hand was trembling. My throat 
suddenly felt so dry. 

It seemed like such a good idea. If only I could get it to flame. 

“Here goes,” I murmured, raising the lighter again. “One more try.” 

My palm slippery from sweat, I nearly dropped the lighter again. I tightened 
my grip on it. Raised my thumb. 

Clicked it. 

Clicked it again, harder. 

And the flame shot up. 

“Yesssss!” Ben cried. 

But his happy cry faded quickly. 

The flame leaping up from the lighter was gray. 

Everyone groaned. 

I stared at the gray flame, dancing on top of the gray lighter. Held tight in 
my gray fist. “It’s no use,” I choked out. 

I clicked off the flame and shoved the lighter back into my pocket. I turned 
to Ben. “Sorry,” I muttered glumly. “I tried.” 

Ben nodded, swallowing hard. 

I gasped. “Ben—your face! Your cheeks! ” 

“Gray?” he asked softly. 

I nodded. “Your nose is all that’s left,” I told him. “Your nose has the only 
color.” 

“Yours too,” he reported. 

The five gray kids stood in silence across the room. Seth shook his head 
sadly. 

What could they say? 

This had already happened to them. They had lived in a black-and-white 
world for fifty years. 



And now Ben and I were doomed to be part of that cold, gloomy world. 

I rubbed my nose. How long would it keep its color? I wondered. 

How long until I became one of them? 

My eyes wandered to the elevator. If only Ben and I had taken the stairs to 
the art room. If only... 

Too late to think about that now. 

I stared hard at the elevator doors. Once again, I silently ordered them to 
open. 

I let out a startled cry when I heard a loud, rumbling sound. 

Everyone jumped up. Alert. Listening. 

The rumble grew to a roar. “What’s happening?” Ben cried. 

“The elevator!” Eloise gasped, pointing. 

We all hurried across the room. We were just a few feet away—when the 
elevator doors slid open. 

We all stepped up to see who was inside. 

“Greta!” I cried. 



28 


No. Not Greta. 

To my shock, Thalia stood in the elevator doorway. 

She peered out tensely. Her blond hair gleamed in the elevator light. Her 
blue dress sparkled brightly. The color almost hurt my eyes. 

A red-lipped smile spread over her face. “I found you! I did it!” she cried 
happily. 

She came running out of the elevator. With a happy cry, she threw her arms 
around Mary and hugged her tight. Then she hugged Eloise and Seth, Mona and 
Eddie. 

Happy cries rang out from everyone. 

“Thalia—you came back!” 

“Are you okay?” 

“We’ve been waiting for you!” 

“Whoa—wait—the elevator!” I cried. “Don’t let it go!” 

I made a frantic dive. 

Too late. 

The doors slid shut. 

I crashed into them and bounced off. “Nooooo!” I let out a long, frantic 
wail. “Nooooooo! The elevator! The elevator!” I banged on the doors with both 
fists. 

I spun around to face Thalia. 

She gasped and raised a hand to her mouth. “Oh—I’m so sorry!” she cried. 
Her blue eyes grew wide. “I—I was so happy to see my friends, I forgot!” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

Trembling, I slumped against the wall. Our one chance to escape. Too 
late... too late... 

The five gray kids circled around Thalia, hugging her, laughing, asking her 
a thousand questions. 

“We missed you so much!” Eloise cried. “We waited for you to come back 
and rescue us.” 

“I missed you guys too,” Thalia told them. “I tried to come back. But I 



couldn’t find the way. I didn’t know how to get back here—until tonight.” 

She turned to Ben and me. “I escaped a few weeks ago,” she explained. 
“Just before school started. I went over to your world, the real world. But I had 
to disguise myself.” 

“You mean—” I started. 

“The makeup,” Thalia continued. “The makeup and the lipstick. I had to 
keep putting that stuff on all the time. To cover up my gray skin. I—” 

“But your eyes—” I interrupted. “They’re blue.” 

“Contact lenses,” she explained. She let out a long sigh. “It was so hard, so 
much work. I had to be so careful. I had to apply coat after coat of makeup and 
lipstick. I couldn’t let anyone know. 

“Kids made fun of me,” Thalia sighed. “But that wasn’t the worst part. I 
wanted to stay in the world of color and brightness. But I was a fake. A phony, 
covering up with makeup. I no longer belonged there. I belonged here in 
Grayworld.” 

Thalia sighed again. “But I couldn’t find the way back. Then tonight, you 
and Ben didn’t return to the gym. I went searching for you. I found the hole in 
the boarded-up wall. And I found the elevator. And it brought me here, to my 
friends.” 

“Welcome back,” Mary said, putting a gray arm around the shoulders of 
Thalia’s dress. The color on the dress had already started to fade. 

“You’re right. This is where you belong,” Seth told her. 

“When you escaped, we thought about you all the time,” Mona added. “We 
wondered how you were doing. And we wondered if you would come back for 
us.” 

“You don’t want to go there,” Thalia replied. “And I don’t want to go back. 
We don’t belong there. We cannot live there. I don’t want to pretend anymore. I 
just want to stay here with you and be myself.” 

She pulled a makeup kit and a tube of lipstick from her bag and tossed it 
down on a desktop. “No more makeup. No more lipstick. No more pretending.” 

“But what about us?” Ben cried. “Tommy and I have only a minute or two 
more before we’re totally gray!” 

“Aren’t you going to help us escape from here?” I pleaded. “Aren’t you 
going to help us get back?” 

Thalia shook her head sadly. “I’m sorry, guys.” 



29 


I swallowed hard, thinking about home. My dad. My new mom. My dog. 

I’ll never see them again, I realized. 

I’ll never see color again. Never see blue ocean waves or a red, setting sun. 

“I’m sorry, guys,” Thalia repeated. “Sorry I didn’t explain this to you right 
away.” 

“Explain what?” I cried. 

“I think I can get you back to the other side,” she said. 

She picked up her lipstick tube. “This is how I escaped a few weeks ago,” 
she said. “This lipstick tube was buried in my bag for fifty years. I’d forgotten all 
about it.” 

She unscrewed the cap and showed us the bright red lipstick. “I found it a 
few weeks ago. When I opened it, it was still red!” Thalia exclaimed. “It was 
some kind of miracle. Maybe because it had been closed up. It still had its 
color.” 

Thalia moved to the wall. “I was so excited to see the color red after fifty 
years,” she explained. “I started drawing on the wall with it. And to my shock, 
wherever I spread the lipstick, it made a hole in the wall!” 

“That’s amazing!” Eddie cried. 

The others excitedly agreed. 

“The lipstick burned right through the wall,” Thalia continued. “I—I was so 
shocked, I didn’t know what to do. I drew a window on the wall. And I climbed 
through it. I escaped. That’s how I did it.” 

She raised the lipstick tube to the gray wall. “I tried to come back for you 
guys,” she told her friends. “But the hole closed up as soon as I went through it.” 

She frowned. “I drew a lipstick window on the wall on the other side. But 
in the real world, lipstick is only lipstick. It didn’t work. I couldn’t get back to 
you. I had no way of finding you, no way to return here.” 

I glanced at Ben. To my horror, he had turned completely gray. Except... 
except for the tip of his nose. 

“Thalia—hurry!” I begged. “Draw a window for Ben and me! Please—we 
don’t have any time left!” 

Without another word, she turned to the wall. 



Her hand moved quickly, outlining a red window. Filling it in. 

“Hurry! Please, hurry!” I pleaded, staring as she frantically rubbed the red 
lipstick over the wall. 

Would it work? 



30 


As soon as she finished the window, I grabbed Ben. I shoved him through the 
hole. “Come on!” I cried. “We can do it!” 

“Good-bye, Ben. Good-bye, Tommy,” the others called. 

Halfway through the wall, I turned back to them. “Come with us!” I cried. 
“Hurry! You can come with us!” 

“No, we can’t,” Seth called sadly. 

“Thalia is right. We’d hate it. We belong here now,” Mary said. 

“Don’t forget me!” Thalia called. Her voice broke with sadness. She turned 
away. 

I turned too. Turned to the other world, our world. Ben and I stepped 
through the wall. And found ourselves back in school. 

I heard music booming down the hall. Kids shouting and laughing. 

The dance! 

We were back at the dance. 

With a gleeful shout, I shoved open the door to the boys’ room. Ben and I 
dove inside. Ran up to the mirror. 

Gaped at ourselves. 

Our colorful selves. 

All red and blue and pink and yellow. All in color! So many colors! 

We slapped each other high fives. And tossed back our heads and screamed 
out our happiness. Screamed and screamed. 

We were back. Back to normal. Back in the world. 

Back at the dance. 

We banged open the boys’ room door. Burst into the hall. 

And ran into Mrs. Borden. 

“There you are!” she cried. “I’ve been looking all over for you two!” 

She grabbed each of us by the hand and began tugging us down the hall. 

“Mrs. Borden—we have to tell you—” I started. 

“Later,” she interrupted. She pushed us into the gym. “We’ve all been 
waiting for you. You’ve held everyone up.” 

“But—you don’t understand !” I sputtered. 



“You want to be in the photo—don’t you?” Mrs. Borden demanded. Kids 
were lined up in front of the bleachers. She shoved Ben and me into the front 
row. 

“We want everyone who worked on the dance in the photo,” Mrs. Borden 
declared. 

She turned to the photographer behind his camera. “Okay, Mr. Chameleon,” 
she called. “You can take the shot now!” 

“Mr. who?” I cried. “No! Wait! Wait\” 

FLASH. 








WEREWOLF SKIN 


Goosebumps - 60 
R.L. Stine 





1 


I stepped down from the bus and squinted into the sunlight. Shielding my eyes 
with one hand, I searched the small parking lot for Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta. 

I didn’t remember what they looked like. I hadn’t seen them since I was 
four, eight years ago. 

But the Wolf Creek bus station was so tiny. Just a little wooden shack in the 
middle of a big parking lot. I knew I couldn’t miss them. 

“How many suitcases?” the bus driver growled out of the side of his mouth. 
Despite the cold October air, he had a damp sweat stain on the back of his gray 
uniform. 

“Just one,” I said. I was the only passenger to get off at Wolf Creek. 

Across from the bus station, I saw a gas station and a one-block stretch of 
small stores. Beyond that, I could see the woods. The trees shimmered yellow 
and brown, the autumn leaves still clinging to their branches. Dry, brown leaves 
fluttered across the parking lot. 

The driver grunted as he hoisted up the sliding door to the baggage 
compartment. He pulled out a black bag. “This yours, kid?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. Thanks.” 

I shivered from a gust of cold wind. I wondered if Mom and Dad had 
packed enough warm clothes for me. They’d had to pack me up in such a hurry. 

They weren’t expecting to be called out of the country on business just 
before Halloween. They’d had to fly to France. And they’d had to find a place 
for me to stay for two weeks. Maybe longer. 

My aunt and uncle were the lucky winners! 

I adjusted the camera bag on my shoulder. I kept my camera on my lap the 
whole bus ride. I didn’t want it bouncing around in the baggage compartment. 

My camera is the most valuable thing I own. I don’t go anywhere without 
it. And I seldom let it out of my sight. 

The driver slid my suitcase over the pavement to me. He slammed shut the 
baggage compartment. Then he started back into the bus. “Someone picking you 
up?” 

“Yes,” I replied, searching for Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta again. 

A mud-splattered blue van squealed into the parking lot. The horn honked. I 



saw a hand waving to me from the passenger window. 

“There they are!” I told the bus driver. But he had already climbed back 
inside and shut the door. The bus hissed and groaned, and pulled away. 

“Alex—hi!” Aunt Marta called from the van. 

I picked up my suitcase and trotted over to them. The van screeched to a 
stop. Uncle Colin climbed out from behind the wheel. Aunt Marta came running 
from the other side. 

I didn’t remember them at all. I pictured them as young and dark-haired. 
But they were both pretty old-looking. They were both very tall and lean. As 
they hurried across the lot to me, they reminded me of two skinny grasshoppers 
with tufts of gray hair on their heads. 

Aunt Marta wrapped me in a hug. Her arms felt so bony. “Alex—it’s so 
wonderful to see you! I’m so glad you came!” she exclaimed. 

She let go quickly and backed away. “Uh-oh. I’m crushing your camera 
case!” 

I shifted it around my neck. “No, it’s a hard case,” I replied. “It’s okay.” 

Smiling, Uncle Colin shook hands with me. His wavy gray hair fluttered in 
the breeze. His cheeks were red and sort of cracked. Age lines, I guess. 

“You’re so big and grown-up,” he said, “I’m going to have to call you Mr. 
Hunter instead of Alex.” 

I laughed. “No one calls me Mr. Hunter—yet,” I told him. 

“How was the long bus ride?” he asked. 

“Bumpy,” I told him. “I don’t think the driver missed a single pothole! And 
the man next to me had the hiccups the whole way.” 

Aunt Marta chuckled. “Sounds like a fun trip.” 

Uncle Colin lowered his eyes to my camera case. “Like to take pictures, 
Alex?” 

I nodded. “Yes. I want to be a photographer someday. Just like you two.” 

Their smiles grew wider. That seemed to please them. 

But Uncle Colin’s smile faded quickly. “It’s a hard way to make a living,” 
he said. “Lots of traveling. We never stay in one place for long.” 

Aunt Marta sighed. “That’s why we haven’t seen you for so many years.” 
She hugged me again. 

“I was hoping maybe I could go out on a shoot with you,” I said. “I’ll bet 
you two could teach me a lot!” 

Uncle Colin laughed. “We’ll teach you all our secrets.” 



“You’re staying for at least two weeks,” Aunt Marta added. “So we’ll have 
plenty of time for photography lessons.” 

“Not if we spend the whole time in this parking lot!” Uncle Colin declared. 
With a groan, he hoisted my suitcase into the back of the van. 

We climbed in. And a few seconds later, we pulled away from the bus 
station, into town. 

A post office whirred past. Then a small grocery and a dry cleaner. We 
crossed a street, and thick woods surrounded us on both sides. 

“Is that all there is?” I cried. 

“Alex,” Aunt Marta replied, “you’ve just had the grand tour of Wolf 
Creek.” 

“Hope you won’t be bored in such a tiny town,” Uncle Colin added, turning 
the van sharply as the road curved through the trees. 

“No way!” I cried. “I really want to explore the woods.” 

I’m a city kid. I seldom even get to touch a tree. Going into the woods, I 
thought, will be so interesting—like visiting another planet. 

“I want to shoot a hundred rolls of film in the woods!” I declared. The van 
bumped hard, sending my head bouncing against the van roof. 

“Slow down, Colin!” Aunt Marta scolded. She turned back to me. “Your 
uncle only knows one speed —light speed.” 

“Speaking of light, we’ll show you some tricks for shooting outdoors,” 
Uncle Colin said, pressing his foot even harder on the gas pedal. 

“I’ve entered a photography contest back home,” I told them. “I want to 
snap a great Halloween photo. Something really wild to win the contest.” 

“Oh, that’s right. Halloween’s only a couple days off,” Aunt Marta said, 
glancing at my uncle. She turned back to me. “What do you want to be for 
Halloween, Alex?” 

I didn’t have to think about it. I’d already decided back home. 

“A werewolf,” I told her. 

“NO!” she screamed. 

Uncle Colin also let out a cry. 

The van plowed through a stop sign. I flew off the seat and hit the door 
hard. And stared helplessly through the bouncing windshield—as we swerved 
into the path of a roaring truck. 



2 


“AAAAAIIIII!” 

Was that me screaming? 

Our van rocked hard. I bounced again. Landed on my knees on the floor. 

Uncle Colin swerved onto the grassy shoulder. 

I saw a blur of red—and heard the truck roar past. Its horn blared angrily. 

Uncle Colin slowed to a stop under the trees. His wrinkled face had turned 
red. He swept both hands back over his thick gray hair. 

“Colin, what happened?” Aunt Marta asked softly. 

“Sorry,” he muttered. He took a deep breath. “Guess I just wasn’t 
concentrating.” 

Aunt Marta tsk-tsked. “Nearly got us killed.” She turned in the passenger 
seat to gaze at me. “Alex—you okay?” 

“Yes. I’m fine,” I told her. “I didn’t expect it to be so exciting here!” I tried 
to make a joke. But my voice came out kind of shaky. 

My camera case had fallen to the floor. I picked it up, opened it, and 
checked out the camera. It seemed okay. 

Uncle Colin shifted into Drive and pulled the van back onto the road. 
“Sorry about that,” he murmured. “I’ll be more careful. Promise.” 

“You were thinking about the Marlings again—weren’t you?” Aunt Marta 
accused him. “When Alex said werewolf, you started thinking about them, and 

55 

“Be quiet, Marta!” Uncle Colin snapped. “Don’t talk about them now. Alex 
just arrived. Do you want to scare him before we even get home?” 

“Huh? Who are the Marlings?” I demanded, leaning to the front. 

“Never mind,” Uncle Colin replied sharply. “Sit back.” 

“They’re not important,” Aunt Marta said. She turned to the windshield. 
“Hey—we’re almost home.” 

The sky seemed to darken. The old trees grew over the narrow road, their 
leaves blocking the sunlight. 

Watching the blur of red and yellow as the woods swept past, I thought 
hard. My aunt and uncle were certainly acting a little strange, I decided. I 
wondered why Uncle Colin had snapped at my aunt so angrily when she’d 



mentioned the Mailings. 

“Why do they call it Wolf Creek?” I asked. 

“Because the name Chicago was already taken!” Aunt Marta joked. 

“There used to be wolves in the woods,” Uncle Colin explained softly. 

“Used to be!” my aunt exclaimed. She lowered her voice to a whisper, but I 
could still hear her. “Why don’t you tell Alex the truth, Colin?” 

“Be quiet!” he repeated through clenched teeth. “Why do you want to scare 
him?” 

Aunt Marta turned to the passenger window. We drove on in silence for a 
while. 

The road curved, and a small circle came into view. Three houses stood 
nearly side by side on the circle. I could see the woods stretching on behind the 
houses. 

“That’s our house—in the middle,” Uncle Colin announced, pointing. 

I gazed out at it. A small, square white house on top of a neat, recently 
mowed front lawn. A long, low, ranch-style house—gray with black shutters— 
stood to the right. 

The house on the left was nearly hidden by overgrown bushes. Tall weeds 
rose up over the patchy front yard. A broken tree branch lay in the middle of the 
driveway. 

Uncle Colin pulled the van up the driveway to the middle house. “It’s small 
—but we’re not here that often,” he said. 

Aunt Marta sighed. “Always traveling.” 

She turned to me again. “There’s a nice girl who lives next door.” She 
pointed to the ranch-style house on the right. “She’s twelve. Your age, right?” 

I nodded. 

“Her name is Hannah. She’s very cute. You should make friends with her so 
you won’t be lonely.” 

Cute? 

“Any boys in the neighborhood?” I asked. 

“I don’t think so,” my aunt replied. “Sorry.” 

My uncle stopped the van at the top of the driveway. We climbed out. I 
stretched my arms over my head. All my muscles ached. I’d been sitting for over 
six hours! 

I glanced at the gray shingle house on the right. Hannah’s house. I 
wondered if she and I would become friends. 



Unde Colin unloaded my suitcase from the back of the van. 

I turned to the house on the left. What a wreck! The house was totally dark. 
Some shutters had fallen off. Part of the front porch had caved in. 

I crossed the driveway and took a few steps closer to the weird, run-down 
house. “Who lives there?” I asked my aunt. 

“Stay away from there, Alex!” Uncle Colin screamed. “Don’t ask questions 
about them! Just stay away from that house!” 



3 


“Calm down, Colin,” Aunt Marta told my uncle. “Alex isn’t going over there.” 

She turned to me. “The Marlings live in that house,” she said, lowering her 
voice to a whisper. She raised a finger to her lips. “No more questions—okay?” 

“Just stay away from there,” Uncle Colin growled. “Come help me unload 
the car.” 

I took one last glance at the run-down wreck of a house. Then I trotted over 
to help my uncle. 

It didn’t take long to unpack. Aunt Marta helped me in the guest room 
while Uncle Colin made us turkey sandwiches in the kitchen. 

My room was small and narrow, about the size of my closet back home. 
The tiny closet smelled of mothballs. But Aunt Marta said the odor would go 
away if we left the closet door and the window open. 

I crossed the tiny room to open the window. And saw that it faced the 
Marlings’ house next door. A rusted wheelbarrow tilted against the Marlings’ 
side wall. The windows were dark and coated with dust. 

I squinted into the window across from mine—and thought about Uncle 
Colin’s shouted warning. 

Why was he so worried about the Marlings? 

I raised the window and turned back to my aunt. She tucked the last of my 
T-shirts into the top dresser drawer. “The room is small. But I think you’ll be 
cozy here, Alex,” she said. “And I cleared all the junk off the desktop so you’ll 
have a place to do homework.” 

“Homework?” I uttered. 

Then I remembered. I’d promised to go to the local school for the weeks I 
stayed in Wolf Creek. 

“Hannah will take you to school Monday morning,” Aunt Marta promised. 
“She is in sixth grade too. She’ll show you around.” 

I didn’t want to think about going to a strange school. I picked up my 
camera. “I can’t wait to get into the woods and take some shots,” I told my aunt. 

“Why don’t you go after lunch?” she suggested. Straightening her gray hair, 
she led the way through the short hall to the kitchen. 

“All moved in?” Uncle Colin asked. He was pouring orange juice into three 



glasses. The sandwiches were set out on the small, round kitchen table. 

Before I could answer him, we heard a hard knock on the back door. Aunt 
Marta opened it, and a girl about my age walked in. Hannah. 

Hannah was tall and thin, an inch or two taller than me. Aunt Marta was 
right. Hannah was kind of cute. She had straight black hair, olive-green eyes, and 
a nice smile. She wore a big green sweater pulled down over black tights. 

Aunt Marta introduced us. We both said, “Hi.” 

I hate meeting new people. It’s always so awkward. 

Aunt Marta asked Hannah if she’d like a turkey sandwich. “No, thanks,” 
Hannah replied. “I already ate lunch.” 

I liked her voice. It was real low and husky. Kind of hoarse. 

“Alex just arrived on the bus,” Aunt Marta told her. “That’s why we’re 
having such a late lunch.” 

I gobbled my sandwich down in a few seconds. I guess I didn’t realize how 
hungry I was. 

“Hannah, why don’t you and Alex do some exploring in the woods?” Uncle 
Colin suggested. “He’s a city kid. You’ll have to show him what a tree is!” 

Everyone laughed. 

“I’ve seen lots of them in movies!” I joked. 

Hannah had a great, husky laugh. 

“I want to take a million photos,” I told her, grabbing my camera case. 

“You’re into photography?” Hannah asked. “Just like your aunt and uncle?” 

I nodded. 

“I hope you have color film,” Hannah said. “The fall leaves are really 
awesome now.” 

We said good-bye to Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta and headed out the front 
door. A red afternoon sun was sinking behind the trees. It made our shadows 
stretch long and skinny over the grass. 

“Hey—you’re stepping on my shadow!” Hannah protested, grinning. She 
swung her leg to make her shadow kick my shadow. 

“Ow!” I cried. I swung my fist, and my shadow slugged her shadow. 

We had a good shadow fight, punching and kicking. Finally, she stomped 
on my shadow with both of her sneakers. And I dropped to the ground, making 
my shadow slump over the grass in a dead faint. 

As I sat up, Hannah had her head tossed back, laughing. Her straight black 
hair blew wildly around her face. 



I pulled my camera from the case and quickly snapped a photo of her. 

She stopped laughing. And straightened her hair with both hands. “Hey— 
why did you do that?” 

I shrugged. “Just wanted to.” 

I climbed to my feet and raised the camera to my eye. I turned and pointed 
it toward the Marlings’ house next door. I took a few steps toward the house, 
trying to frame it in my viewfinder. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as Hannah grabbed my arm. 

“Alex—don’t take a picture!” she warned in a throaty whisper. “They’ll see 
you!” 

“So what?” I shot back. But I felt a shiver as I saw something move in the 
dark front window. 

Was someone staring out at us? 

I lowered my camera. 

“Come on, Alex.” Hannah tugged me toward the back. “Are we going into 
the woods or not?” 

I squinted up at the Marlings’ house. “Why was my uncle so upset when I 
asked about that house?” I asked Hannah. “What’s the big deal?” 

“I don’t really know,” she replied, dropping my arm. “The Marlings are 
supposed to be a weird old couple. I’ve never seen them. But... I’ve heard 
stories about them.” 

“What kind of stories?” I demanded. 

“Frightening stories,” she whispered. 

“No. Really. What kind of stories?” I insisted. 

She didn’t answer. Her olive-green eyes narrowed at the broken porch, the 
faded, stained shingles. “Let’s just stay away from there, Alex.” 

She started jogging along the side of the house toward the backyard. But I 
didn’t follow her. I crossed the driveway and stepped into the tall weeds of the 
Marlings’ front yard. 

“Alex—stop! Where are you going?” Hannah called. 

Holding my camera at my waist, I made my way quickly up to the house. 
“I’m a city kid,” I told Hannah. “I don’t scare easily.” 

“Alex, please—” Hannah pleaded. “The Marlings don’t like kids. They 
don’t like anyone coming up to their house. Please. Let’s go to the woods.” 

I stepped up carefully onto the rotting floorboards of the front porch. I 
raised my eyes to the front window. 



The reflection of the setting, red sun filled the glass. For a moment, it 
appeared that the window was on fire. 

I had to look away. 

Then, as the sunlight faded from the window-pane, I turned back—and 
gasped. 

Inside the house, the window curtains were slashed and torn. 

As if some kind of animal had clawed them, clawed them to shreds. 



4 


“Hannah—did you see this?” I called. I couldn’t take my eyes off the shredded 
curtains. 

She stood across the driveway, leaning her back against my aunt and 
uncle’s house. “I don’t want to come over there,” she said softly, folding her 
arms over her chest. 

“But the curtains—” I started. 

“I told you they’re weird,” Hannah said sharply. “And they don’t like kids 
gawking through their windows. Come on, Alex.” 

I backed away from the Marlings’ house. My shoe caught on a raised 
floorboard of the rotting porch, and I nearly fell. 

“Are we going to the woods or not?” Hannah asked impatiently. 

“Sorry.” I pulled my shoe free and followed her toward the back. “Tell me 
more about the Marlings,” I said, jogging to catch up to her. “Tell me some of 
the frightening stories you heard about them.” 

“No way,” Hannah replied in her breathy voice. 

We trotted across my aunt and uncle’s backyard. The tall yellow and red 
trees of the woods, tilting in afternoon shadows, stretched beyond the smooth 
lawn. 

“Please?” I begged. 

“Maybe in a few days, after Halloween,” Hannah replied. “After the full 
moon.” 

I followed Hannah’s gaze to the sky. A bright white moon—almost round as 
a tennis ball—rose over the trees, even though it was still daylight. 

Hannah shuddered. “I hate when the full moon comes,” she said. “I’ll be so 
happy when it’s gone.” 

“Why?” I demanded. “What’s the big deal about a full moon?” 

She gazed back at the Marlings’ house. And didn’t reply. 

We made our way through the trees. The fading sunlight filtered through the 
leaves, sending shimmering spots of gold over the ground. Our shoes crackled 
over twigs and dead leaves. 

I found a gnarled old tree, bent over like an old man. The bark was pitted 



and wrinkled like aged brown skin. Fat gray roots reached up from the dirt. 

“Wow! This is so cool\” I declared, pulling my camera from the case. 

Hannah laughed. “You really are a city kid.” 

“But—look at this tree!” I declared. “It’s like—it’s like it’s alive!” 

She laughed again. “Trees are alive, Alex!” 

“You know what I mean,” I grumbled. 

I started to snap photos of the bent, old tree. I stepped back and leaned 
against a tilted birch tree. I tried to frame the old tree so that its shape looked 
human. 

Then I moved all around the tree, photographing its creases, its wrinkles. I 
shot one slender branch that lowered itself to the ground like a weary arm. 

I dropped down to my knees and snapped the roots reaching up from the 
ground like skinny legs. 

A soft buzz made me raise my gaze. A hummingbird hovered over a 
flowering weed. I turned and tried to capture the tiny bird in my camera lens. 

But the hummingbird was too fast for me. It darted away before I could 
snap my shutter. 

I climbed to my feet. Hannah was sitting cross-legged on the ground, 
crunching dead leaves between her hands. 

“Doesn’t that hummingbird know summer is over?” I murmured. 

She stared at me blankly, as if she had forgotten I was there. “Oh. Sorry, 
Alex. I didn’t see it.” She climbed to her feet. 

“What happens if you keep going straight?” I asked, pointing deeper into 
the woods. 

“You come to Wolf Creek,” Hannah replied. “I’ll show you the creek next 
time. But we’d better get going. We should get out of the woods before the sun 
goes down.” 

I suddenly thought of the wolves Uncle Colin had told me about. The 
wolves that gave Wolf Creek its name. 

“The wolves that used to live here in these woods,” I said. “They’re all 
gone—right?” 

Hannah nodded. “Yes. They’re gone.” 

And then a shrill howl rose up—so close, so close behind me. The high, 
shrill wail of a wolf. 

And I opened my mouth in a terrified scream. 



5 


I stumbled back against the birch tree. My camera banged against the trunk, but I 
didn’t drop it. 

“Hannah—?” I choked out. Her eyes were wide with surprise. 

But before she could reply, two boys burst out from behind a tall evergreen 
shrub. They tossed back their heads and howled like wolves. 

“Hey —you guys!” Hannah exclaimed, making a disgusted face. 

They were both short and thin, both with straight black hair and dark brown 
eyes. They finished their howls, then gazed at me, gazed at me hungrily, like 
wolves. 

“Did we scare you?” one of them teased, his dark eyes flashing excitedly. 
He wore a dark brown sweater pulled down over black denim jeans. He had a 
long purple wool muffler wrapped around his neck. 

“You two always scare me!” Hannah joked. “Your faces give me 
nightmares!” 

The other boy wore a baggy gray sweatshirt and baggy khakis that dragged 
on the ground. He tossed back his head and let out another shrill wolf howl. 

Hannah turned to me. “They’re in my class,” she explained. “That one is 
Sean Kiner.” She pointed to the boy with the purple muffler. “And he’s Arjun 
Khosla.” 

“Arjun?” I struggled with the name. 

“It’s Indian,” he explained. 

“Hannah told us you were coming,” Sean said, grinning. 

“You’re a city kid, right?” Arjun asked. 

“Well, yeah. Cleveland,” I murmured. 

“So how do you like Wolf Creek?” Arjun asked. It didn’t sound like a 
question. It sounded like a challenge. 

They both stared at me with their dark eyes, studying me as if I were some 
kind of weird fungus. 

“I—I just got here,” I stammered. 

They exchanged glances. “There are some things you should know about 
the woods,” Sean said. 

“Like what?” I asked. 



He pointed to my feet. “Like you shouldn’t stand in a big clump of poison 

ivy!” 

“Huh?” I jumped back. And stared at the ground. 

They both laughed. 

There wasn’t any poison ivy. 

“You guys are about as funny as dog puke,” Hannah sneered. 

“You ought to know. You eat it for breakfast!” Sean replied. 

He and Arjun laughed and slapped each other a high five. 

Hannah sighed. “Remind me to laugh later,” she muttered, rolling her eyes. 
For some reason, that started the two boys howling again. 

When they stopped, Sean reached for my camera. “Can I see it?” 

“Well...” I pulled back. “It’s a very expensive camera,” I told him. “I really 
don’t like anyone else touching it.” 

“Ooooh. Expensive!” he teased. “Is it cardboard? Let me see it!” He 
grabbed for it again. 

“Take my picture,” Arjun demanded. He pulled his lips apart with two 
fingers and stuck out his tongue. 

“That’s an improvement!” Hannah told him. 

“Take my picture!” Arjun repeated. 

“Give Alex a break,” Hannah snapped. “Get out of his face, you two.” 

Arjun pretended to be hurt. “Why won’t he take my picture?” 

“Because he doesn’t take animal photos!” Hannah sneered. 

Sean laughed—and snatched the camera from my hands. 

“Hey—come on!” I pleaded. I made a grab for it and missed. 

Sean tossed the camera to Arjun. Arjun raised it and pretended to snap 
Hannah’s photo. “Your face cracked the lens!” he exclaimed. 

“I’m going to crack your face!” Hannah threatened. 

“It’s a really expensive camera,” I repeated. “If anything happens to it—” 
Hannah swiped the camera out of Arjun’s hands and handed it back to me. 

I cradled it in my arms. “Thanks.” 

The two boys moved toward me menacingly. Their dark eyes gleamed. 
Again, watching them approach, their faces so hard, their eyes so cold, I thought 
of wild animals. 

“Leave him alone,” Hannah scolded. 

“We’re just goofing,” Arjun replied. “We weren’t going to hurt the camera.” 



“Yeah. We’re just kidding around,” Sean added. “What’s your problem?” 

“No problem,” I replied, still cradling the camera. 

Arjun raised his eyes to the darkening sky. Through the trees I could see 
only gray. “It’s getting kind of late,” Arjun murmured. 

Sean’s smile faded. “Let’s get out of here.” His eyes darted around the 
woods. Shadows deepened, and the air grew colder. 

“They say some kind of wild creatures are loose in the woods,” Arjun said 
softly. 

“Arjun—give us a break,” Hannah groaned, rolling her eyes. 

“No. Really,” Arjun insisted. “Some kind of creature tore off a deer’s head. 
Tore it clean off.” 

“We saw it,” Sean reported. His dark eyes glowed excitedly in the dimming 
light. “It was so gross!” 

“The deer’s eyes stared up at us,” Arjun added. “And bugs crawled out of 
its open neck.” 

“Yuck!” Hannah exclaimed, covering her mouth with one hand. “You’re 
making this up—right?” 

“No. I’m not.” Sean glanced up at the moon. 

“It’s almost a full moon. The full moon makes all the strange creatures 
come out of hiding,” he continued, speaking so softly, his voice just above a 
whisper. “Especially at Halloween. And the moon will be completely full that 
night.” 

I shivered. The back of my neck tingled. I suddenly felt cold all over. 

Was it the wind? Or Sean’s frightening words? 

I pictured the deer head lying on the ground. 

Pictured the shiny black eyes staring up blankly, lifelessly. 

“What are you going to be for Halloween?” Arjun asked Hannah. 

She shrugged. “I don’t know. I haven’t decided yet.” 

He turned to me. “Do you know what you want to be, Alex?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I want to be a werewolf.” 

Arjun uttered a near-silent gasp. The two boys exchanged glances. 

Their smiles faded. Their faces turned solemn. 

“What’s wrong?” I asked. 

No reply. 

“Hey—what’s wrong?” I repeated. 

Arjun lowered his gaze to the ground. “We have enough werewolves in 



Wolf Creek,” he murmured. 

“What do you mean?” I cried. “Come on, guys—what do you mean by 
that?” 

But they didn’t answer. 

Instead, they turned and vanished into the woods. 



6 


Aunt Marta invited Hannah to stay for dinner. The four of us squeezed around 
the small kitchen table and spooned up big bowls of steaming chicken soup. 

“You make the best soup!” Hannah told my aunt. 

Aunt Marta smiled. A little broth dripped down her chin. She reached for 
her napkin. “Thank you, Hannah. I just throw everything in it I can find.” 

“Sorry we were late for dinner,” I said. “I lost track of time. I didn’t want to 
leave the woods. It was so interesting.” 

Uncle Colin’s eyes moved to the kitchen window. He stared up at the rising 
moon. Then he lowered his gaze to the Marlings’ house next door. 

“I photographed an awesome-looking tree,” I told him. “It was wrinkled 
and bent over like an old man.” 

Uncle Colin didn’t reply. His eyes were still focused out the window. 

“Colin—Alex is talking to you,” Aunt Marta scolded. 

“Huh? Oh.” He turned back to the table, shaking his head as if shaking 
away his thoughts. “Sorry. What were you saying?” 

I told him again about the old tree. 

“I’ll help you develop those shots,” he offered. “Maybe tomorrow. I set up a 
darkroom in the little bathroom in the attic. We really need a bigger house. 
Especially with all the work we’ve been doing lately.” 

“What are you photographing now?” I asked. 

“Creatures of the night,” he replied. His eyes wandered to the window 
again. I followed his gaze to the Marlings’ back window. Totally dark. 

“We’re photographing nocturnal animals,” Aunt Marta explained. “Animals 
that come out only at night.” 

“You mean like owls?” Hannah asked. 

Aunt Marta nodded. “We’ve found some wonderful owls in the woods— 
haven’t we, Colin?” 

Uncle Colin turned back from the window. Silvery light from the full moon 
washed over the windowpane. “The night creatures don’t like to be 
photographed,” he said, spooning up a carrot and chewing it slowly. “They are 
very private.” 

“Sometimes we wait in one spot for hours,” my aunt added. “Waiting for a 



creature to poke its head up from its hole in the ground.” 

“Can I come with you one night?” I asked eagerly. “I can be real quiet. 
Really.” 

Uncle Colin swallowed a chunk of chicken. “That’s a fine idea,” he said. 
But then his expression grew solemn. And he added, “Maybe after Halloween.” 

I turned and saw Aunt Marta staring out at the Marlings’ house. “The moon 
is still low,” she said thoughtfully. “But it’s so bright tonight.” 

“Almost like daylight out there,” Uncle Colin said. What was that 
expression that quickly passed over his face? Was it fear ? 

My aunt and uncle are both acting so weird tonight, I decided. So nervous. 

Why do they keep staring out the window? What do they expect to see at 
the Marlings’ house? 

I couldn’t hold it in any longer. “Is everything okay?” I asked them. 

“Okay?” Uncle Colin narrowed his eyes at me. “I guess...” 

“Are you two thinking about your Halloween costumes?” Aunt Marta 
demanded, changing the subject. 

“I think I’m going to be a pirate again this year,” Hannah replied. She 
finished her chocolate milk and licked the chocolate syrup on the edge of the 
glass. “You know. I’ll wrap a bandanna around my head and wear a patch over 
one eye.” 

“Colin and I might have some funny old clothes you can wear,” Aunt Marta 
offered. She turned to me. “How about you, Alex?” 

I still wanted to be a werewolf. But I remembered the last time I’d told that 
to my aunt and uncle. Uncle Colin had nearly cracked up the car! 

So I smiled and quietly told them, “Maybe I’ll be a pirate too.” 

I spooned up the last of my soup. 

I had no way of knowing that in a few hours, when the moon rose to its 
peak in the sky, I’d be nearly face-to-face with a real werewolf. 



7 


After Hannah went home, I made my way to my little bedroom. I straightened up 
a bit, shoving clothes into the dresser drawers. 

I’m not the neatest person in the world. Let’s face it—I’m a total slob. But I 
knew if I let the clutter pile up in this tiny room, I’d never find anything. 

I sat down at the desk and wrote a short letter to Mom and Dad. I told them 
everything was fine. I wrote that I’d have at least a thousand great photographs 
to show them when they came home from France. 

When I finished addressing the letter, I wasn’t feeling sleepy. But I decided 
I should probably go to bed, anyway. 

I started to the closet to find my pajamas. But I stopped at the window. 

And stared out at a pale orange light. 

Alight in a side window of the Marlings’ house! 

The light shimmered between two tilting trees, their leaves vibrating in the 
wind. A pale orange rectangle of light on the bottom floor of the house, near the 
back. 

A bedroom window? 

I pressed closer to the glass and squinted hard into the darkness. Squinted 
into the dim rectangle of orange. 

Was I about to see one of the Marlings? I held my breath and waited. 

I didn’t have to wait long. 

I let out a gasp as a silhouette crossed the window next door. A gray figure 
caught in the rectangle of orange. 

Was it a man? 

I couldn’t tell. 

The silhouette moved. It’s an animal, I realized. 

No. A man. 

Mr. Marling? 

I pressed against the glass, squinting hard. Was it a large dog? A man? I 
couldn’t see clearly. 

The silhouette moved away from the window. 

And then I heard a long, high animal wail. 



The sound floated out through the window next door. Floated across the 
narrow space between our houses. 

The high, animal howl swept into my room. Swirled around me. 

Such an ugly, frightening sound. Half-human, half-animal. A cry I had 
never heard before. 

A chill rolled down my back. And then another. 

Another howl made me gasp. 

I stared out as the silhouette returned to the window. A creature with its 
head tilted back. Its jaws open, uttering such frightening animal cries. 

I’ve got to take a picture, I told myself. I’ve got to photograph the howling 
silhouette. 

I spun away from the window. Dove across the tiny room to the dresser. 

Reached for my camera. 

My camera? 

It was gone. 



8 


“No—!” I uttered a shocked cry. 

My hands fumbled frantically over the desktop. 

I left the camera there. I knew I had. 

But no. No camera. 

My eyes swept around the room. I had just straightened up. Everything was 
in place. The desktop. The dresser. 

No camera. No camera. 

I dropped to my knees and searched under the bed. 

No camera. 

I crawled over to the closet. Pulled open the door. And searched the closet 
floor. 

As I searched, another wolf howl burst into my room. Higher. Shriller. 

And then I heard two howls together. The sirenlike wails blending in a 
strange, sour harmony. 

Was it Mr. and Mrs. Marling? 

As I climbed to my feet, I heard a scraping sound. Wood against wood. 

The sound of a window opening. 

I heard a heavy THUD. 

Feet landing hard on the ground. 

And then I heard low grunts. Heavy, thudding footsteps. 

Footsteps right outside my room! 

I dove back to the window. Breathlessly, my heart pounding, I stared out. 

Too late. 

No one out there now. 

All dark. The orange light gone from the Marlings’ window. The house 
completely covered in black again. 

The trees shaking, black against the blue-black sky. The leaves silvery, 
shimmering under the bright light of the moon. 

I stared out there for a long moment, waiting for my heart to stop racing. 
Fistening for the high howls, the heavy, thudding footsteps. 

Silence now. 



My camera... 

I forced myself to turn away from the window. I hurried out of the room 
and down the short hall to the living room. Did I leave the camera case here 
when Hannah and I returned from the woods? 

No. No sign of it. 

I checked the kitchen. Not there, either. 

“Aunt Marta! Uncle Colin!” I called them. My voice came out tinier than 
I’d planned. 

I ran back down the hall. Past my room. Past the bathroom and the linen 
closet. Their room stood at the end. “Have you seen my camera anywhere?” I 
cried. 

I shoved open the door to their bedroom. 

Dark in there. Dark and empty. 

I could smell Aunt Marta’s flowery perfume. And the sharp odor of photo- 
developing fluid. 

They’ve gone out to the woods to photograph animals, I realized. 

I’m all alone here. 

I took a deep breath and held it. Calm down, Alex, I instructed myself. 
You’re perfectly okay. You’re perfectly safe. 

You will find your camera as soon as you get calm. It’s probably right out in 
plain sight. But you’re so crazy and pumped up, you can’t see it. Just calm 
down! 

I took another long, deep breath. I was starting to feel calmer. 

I closed my aunt and uncle’s bedroom door and started back down the hall. 

I was halfway to my room when I heard the soft, scraping sound. 

And then the thud of footsteps. 

I froze. And listened. 

More footsteps. Heavy thuds. 

Where were they coming from? 

Overhead? 

Yes. 

I peered up at the low ceiling. 

Another scraping sound. More thudding footsteps. They’re in the attic! I 
realized. Whatever those howling creatures are— they’re in the house! 



9 


I dropped back against the wall. My whole body shook. 

I swallowed hard. And listened to the heavy footsteps above my head. 

I’ve got to get out of here! I told myself. I’ve got to get out of this house! 

I’ve got to tell Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta! 

But my legs felt like Jell-O. I didn’t know if I could walk. 

I took a shaky step. Then another. 

And then I heard a new sound from upstairs. 

I stopped and listened. 

Humming? Was someone humming? 

With a burst of energy, I grabbed the door to the attic. I pulled it open and 
shouted up the stairs, “Who’s up there? Who is it?” 

“It’s me, Alex!” a familiar voice called down. 

“Hannah—?” I choked out. I stared up to the attic. “Wh-what are you doing 
up there?” 

“Didn’t your aunt tell you I came back?” Hannah called. 

“No, she didn’t,” I replied. 

“She said she had some old clothes up here that might make a good 
costume. So I came back to check it out.” 

Her head appeared at the top of the stairs. “Why do you sound so weird?” 

“I—I thought—” I began. But the words caught in my throat. 

I started up the stairs. 

“No—!” Hannah cried. “Don’t come up!” 

I stopped on the third step. “How come?” I called. 

“I’m not dressed. I’m trying on stuff,” she explained. She smiled down at 
me. “Besides, I want to surprise you. There’s some awesome old stuff up here. 
Your aunt and uncle must have looked really weird when they were young.” 

Her head disappeared from view. I could hear the rustle of clothes up there. 

I backed down the stairs. “Hey—do you know where my camera is?” I 
asked. “I’ve looked all over the house, and—” 

“Oh, no!” Hannah groaned. Her head appeared again. This time she wasn’t 
smiling. 



“What?” I called up to her. 

“Your camera, Alex. Do you think maybe you left it in the woods?” 

I gasped. “I don’t know. I thought...” My voice trailed off. I had a sick, 
heavy feeling in the pit of my stomach. 

“You had it when Sean and Arjun left,” Hannah said. “But when we came 
back to the house, I don’t remember you carrying it.” 

“Oh, wow!” I shook my head. “I’ve got to go get it, Hannah. I can’t leave it 
overnight in the woods.” 

“No —/” she cried. “Alex, listen to me. You can’t go out there.” 

“I have to!” I cried. 

“But the woods aren’t safe at night,” she protested. “They really aren’t 
safe.” 

I turned away and ran down the hall. I pulled on my jacket and found a 
flashlight on the floor of the hall closet. I tested it a few times. The light was 
steady and bright. 

“I’ll be back in a few minutes,” I shouted up to Hannah. 

“No—please, Alex!” I heard her call down. “Listen to me! Don’t go into the 
woods tonight! Wait for me to get dressed. Just wait for me—okay?” 

But I couldn’t leave my camera out there to be ruined. 

I closed the front door behind me and stepped out into the light of the 


moon. 



10 


I began trotting along the side of the house toward the backyard. Heavy black 
clouds covered the moon. The night air felt colder than I’d thought. Wet. I 
zipped my down jacket as I ran. 

I glanced at the Marlings’ house as I jogged past. Nothing to see there. The 
back window had been left wide open. But the house was completely dark. Not a 
light on anywhere. 

The grass was slick and wet from a heavy dew. I felt a splash of cold on my 
forehead. 

A raindrop? 

I groaned as I thought of my camera, sitting out in the woods. It was such 
an expensive camera. I prayed I could find it before it started to rain. 

Several tiny animals scampered silently past my feet. 

I stopped. 

No. Not animals. Fat, dead leaves. They scuttled over the dark grass, 
pushed by swirls of wind. 

I lowered my head under a tree branch and entered the woods at the back of 
the yard. The old trees shivered and creaked. 

The steady WHOO of an owl, far in the distance, made me think of my aunt 
and uncle. They were here with their cameras somewhere in the woods. I 
wondered if I would run into them. 

I followed the twisting path through the trees. Another raindrop fell heavily 
on the top of my head. Rain spattered the ground. 

I stopped when the bent tree came into view. The tree I had photographed 
with Hannah that afternoon. I played my flashlight over its curved shape. 

“At least I’m heading in the right direction,” I said out loud. 

I stepped over a fallen tree branch and moved deeper into the woods. The 
trees began to hiss, the leaves shaking in the rising wind. I could still hear the 
owl’s steady WHOO WHOO in the distance. 

My flashlight dimmed, then brightened again. Its thin circle of light made a 
path for me between the trees. 

“All right!” 

I cried out when the light swept over my camera case. I had set it down on a 



flat tree stump. How could I have forgotten it there? 

With another happy cry, I picked it up. I actually felt like hugging it. I was 
so happy to have it back. I checked it out carefully, turning it under the 
flashlight. 

I wiped away the few raindrops that clung to the top. Then, cradling it 
under one arm, I started back to the house. 

The rain had stopped, at least for a moment. I started to hum happily. I 
wanted to skip all the way home! 

The camera meant more to me than anything. I promised myself I’d never 
leave it anywhere again. 

I stopped humming when I heard the angry sound. 

An animal snarl. A fierce, throaty roar. 

I dropped the flashlight. 

The creature roared again. 

Where was it? Where was it coming from? 

Right behind me! 



11 


I bent and grabbed up the flashlight. My knees suddenly felt weak. A cold wave 
of panic swept over my body. 

I heard loud animal grunts. Another angry snarl. 

I forced myself to move. I had to get away from here. 

A clump of fat shrubs rose up in front of me. Clutching my camera case, I 
darted behind them. And dropped to my knees. 

Hidden behind the bushes, I struggled to catch my breath. To stop my heart 
from thudding so hard in my chest. 

I couldn’t see around the fat leaves of the bush. But I could hear the 
animal’s grunts and growls. I ducked lower, hoping I was completely out of 
view. 

Hoping it couldn’t smell me. 

And then I heard the crash of heavy feet on the ground. A high wail of 
anger, like a cry of attack. 

A frightened bleat rose up. So high and tiny. A terrified cry—cut off 
quickly. 

Snapped off. 

Leaning into the shrub, my legs trembling, my whole body shaking, I heard 
a struggle. 

So close. So close, I felt I could stand up—reach out—and touch the 
attacker and his prey. 

So close, I heard every grunt, every frightened cry. 

A thud. A growl. Another tiny, helpless bleat. 

A loud ripping sound. 

Wet chewing. The slap of jaws. More rapid chewing. An animal burp. 
Another ripping sound. 

I shut my eyes, picturing what was happening right in front of me. 

I heard a thud. Then silence. 

The hiss of the wind seemed to grow louder. 

A hiss... then silence. 

I opened my eyes. 



I stood up shakily. 

And heard heavy footsteps. Twigs and leaves crackling under heavy feet. 
The footsteps approaching rapidly. Coming my way. 

Coming for me. The creature—the hungry creature—was moving toward 
me. 

“Ohhhh.” A low cry of terror escaped my throat. 

Gripping the camera case tightly, I spun away from the clump of shrubs. 
And started to run. 

I heard animal grunts behind me. Heavy-breathing pants. 

I didn’t glance back. 

I ran deeper into the woods. I thought I heard the splash and trickle of a 
creek on my right. Wolf Creek? I didn’t stop to see. 

A branch scratched my cheek as I scrambled past it. Pain shot over my face. 
I raised one arm to shield myself as I ran. 

Ran blindly. Ran through the darkness. 

Where was the flashlight? 

Oh, no. I’d left it behind in the bushes. 

It was of no use to me, anyway. I was running too fast to keep to the path. 

I lowered my shoulder and pushed my way through a patch of tall reeds. 
They snapped back, slapping me wetly as I shot through them. 

My foot caught on a half-buried rock. I slid off it, somehow keeping my 
balance. 

I leaped over an upraised tree root—and kept running. 

Over the harsh gasps of my breath, I listened for the heavy, thudding 
footsteps behind me. The animal growls. 

Was the creature still chasing me? 

I grabbed a smooth, damp tree trunk and stopped. I hugged the trunk, 
struggling to keep my legs from collapsing, struggling to catch my breath. 

I turned and gazed back. 

Nothing there. 

No growls. No grunts. No bang of heavy feet on the ground. 

I sucked in breath after breath. My lungs burned. My mouth felt so dry, I 
couldn’t swallow. 

I’m okay, I told myself. I’m safe—for now. 

I gazed into the deep darkness. 

And the creature hit me from behind. 



12 


“Hunh—!” 

I uttered a startled groan. And dropped to the ground. 

I spun around to face my attacker. 

No one there. 

Nothing. 

“Huh?” A shocked cry escaped my lips. 

I started to scramble to my feet—and saw what had hit the back of my head. 
A bird’s nest. A dried-up, broken bird’s nest. It must have fallen from a tree 
limb above my head. Probably shaken loose by the gusts of wind. 

“Oh, wow.” I shook twigs from my hair. Then, cradling the camera case 
under my arm, I gazed around. 

Where was I? 

Trees up ahead slanted as if leaning against each other. A low mound of 
rocks stood at the edge of a ridge of tall reeds. 

I’m lost, I realized. 

I gazed up at the sky. No moon. The heavy rain clouds covered the moon 
and stars. 

How do I get back? I squinted into the darkness, searching for the path. 
Searching for anything I might recognize. 

Nothing. 

If I could find the creek, maybe I could find the spot where I found my 
camera, I decided. 

But which direction was the creek? 

I was completely turned around. 

I shivered. A cold raindrop spattered on the shoulder of my jacket. 

I jumped. That bird’s nest had made me terrified of things falling from the 

sky! 

What should I do? 

My mind whirred frantically with ideas. 

Should I call out for help? Shout to my aunt and uncle? Maybe if I called 
loud enough, they would hear me. 



But, no. If I shout, the animal—the snarling creature—will hear me first. 

Was it still searching for me? Was it still nearby? 

I decided I’d better not call for help. 

What should I do? What ? 

Start walking in one direction? And just keep going no matter what? 

No. I remembered a book I’d read where a guy was lost in the desert. And 
he tried walking in a straight line. And he just made circles. He went around and 
around and didn’t even realize it until he saw his own footprints in the sand! 

Maybe I should wait until the sun comes up, I decided. I’ll never find my 
way in this darkness. When it’s daylight, I’ll have a much better chance. 

I didn’t like the idea of spending the night in the woods. But waiting here 
until I could see where I was going seemed like a good idea. 

But then I heard a clattering sound. And felt the rain start to pound down 
hard. A freezing rain, swept by gusting wind. 

I can’t stay here, I realized. 

I have to get back to the house. 

I walked and walked, trying to retrace my steps. I sighed with relief when I 
finally came to the clump of bushes where I’d hid. I found the flashlight and 
gripped it tightly in my free hand. 

I took a guess on which direction to go next. 

Ducking my head against the rain, I started to walk again. 

Less than a minute later, I stumbled over something. 

Something soft. 

I landed on my knees. Turned back to see what I had tripped over. 

And let out a cry of horror. 



13 


The flashlight trembled in my hand. The quivering light revealed an ugly picture. 

I gaped down at an animal body. No. Two. 

Two animals. 

What were they? I couldn’t tell. They’d been clawed to pieces. 

Completely ripped apart. 

I remembered the ripping sounds I’d heard. The sounds of these animals 
being torn apart. My stomach lurched. 

What kind of animal did this? 

What kind of animal was strong enough to tear other creatures apart? 

A chill ran down my back. 

I pulled myself to my feet. I forced myself to look away. 

The rain poured down. I shielded my camera case under my jacket—and 
started to run again. 

I had to get away from that ugly sight. Would I ever be able to forget it? 

The wind whipped the rain around me. I felt as if I were running through 
ocean waves. But I couldn’t stop. 

My fear kept me running. 

That fierce creature still lurked in these woods. Still growled and hunted, 
somewhere nearby. 

My sneakers were soaked. I slipped and slid in the soft mud. 

I’m not sure how long I ran. I stopped when I nearly ran right into the 
creek. Pounded by the rain, it splashed over its low bank. 

I turned and followed it, feeling a little more confident. After a while, I 
spotted a narrow path cut through the tilting trees. 

I turned onto the path. Would it lead me out of the woods? I had to try it. 

The rain slowed to a soft patter. My sneakers sank deep into the mud as I 
trotted along the curving path. 

Soon I came to the bent, old-man tree. 

“Yes!” I cried out loud. “Yes!” I waved my fist triumphantly in the air. I 
was almost home. 

I picked up my pace. A few minutes later, I burst out of the woods, into my 



aunt and uncle’s backyard. 

I was so happy! I wanted to fly! 

I couldn’t wait to get into the warm house. To pull off my soaked clothes 
and get into something dry. 

But I stopped in the middle of the backyard. 

And stared into the circle of yellow light from my flashlight. 

Stared down at the strange footprints in the wet grass. 

Deep, rutted footprints heading into the Marlings’ backyard. 

I bent into the light to see them better. They weren’t human footprints. They 
were too long and too wide and shaped differently from human feet or shoes. 

Animal footprints. 

Keeping the beam of light in front of me, I trailed the footprints, following 
them over the grass. 

Across the Marlings’ weed-choked backyard. 

I stopped when I saw where the strange footprints led. 

Right up to the Marlings’ open bedroom window. 



14 


When I came into the kitchen for breakfast the next morning, Aunt Marta was on 
the phone. She stood at the counter with her back to me. But she turned as I said 
good morning to my uncle, and flashed me an angry look. 

“Yes, I understand,” she said into the phone. “Well, it won’t happen again.” 

I took my place at the table beside Uncle Colin. He sipped from a white 
coffee mug, his eyes on Aunt Marta. 

“It won’t happen again,” my aunt repeated into the phone. She frowned. 
“I’ll make sure he stays away. No. He wasn’t spying on you, Mr. Marling.” 

So that’s who she was talking to. 

Uncle Colin shook his head unhappily. “I warned you not to go near that 
place, Alex,” he said. “We don’t need those people calling over here.” 

“Sorry,” I murmured. “But—” 

I wanted to tell him about last night, about everything that had happened to 
me and everything I’d seen. 

But he raised a finger to his lips, motioning for me to be silent while my 
aunt was on the phone. 

“No. My nephew wasn’t taking pictures of your house, Mr. Marling,” Aunt 
Marta continued. She rolled her eyes. “I promise. He won’t bother you again. I’ll 
talk to him right now. Yes. Okay. Good-bye.” 

She set down the receiver and turned to Uncle Colin with a sigh. “Those 
people,” she murmured. 

“We have to be careful,” Uncle Colin replied, narrowing his eyes at me. 
“We don’t want to get them worked up.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “I saw things—” 

“They saw you, Alex,” my aunt interrupted. “They saw you prowling 
around their house late last night. They are very angry about it.” 

She poured herself a mug of coffee and came over to the table. She sat 
down and swept a strand of gray hair off her forehead. 

“What were you doing outside last night?” my uncle asked. 

“I’m really sorry. But I had no choice. I left my camera out in the woods,” I 
explained. “I had to run out and get it. I couldn’t leave it out all night— 
especially with the rain.” 



“But you didn’t have to go near the Marlings’ house—did you?” Aunt 
Marta demanded. 

“I—I heard animal howls from inside their house!” I blurted out. “And I 
saw strange footprints going up to the bedroom window at the side.” 

Unde Colin nodded calmly. He took a long sip of coffee. “The footprints 
were probably from their dogs,” he said, glancing at Aunt Marta. 

“Dogs?” I cried. 

They both nodded. “They have two huge German shepherds,” my aunt 
explained. “Mean as they come.” 

“And as big as wolves,” Uncle Colin added, shaking his head. He reached 
for a slice of toast and began to butter it. 

I sighed. I felt a little better. 

Two German shepherds. That explained the howls and the footprints in the 
wet grass. 

“Are you ready for school?” Aunt Marta asked. “Hannah will be here any 
minute.” 

“I’m almost ready,” I replied. I gulped down a glass of orange juice. “When 
I was in the woods last night...” I started. 

They both stared at me. 

“I saw some animals that got ripped up. I mean, killed.” 

Uncle Colin nodded. “The woods are dangerous at night,” he said softly. 

“We really don’t want you out there at night, Alex,” Aunt Marta said. She 
pulled a piece of lint off the shoulder of my T-shirt. Then she tenderly brushed 
my hair back with her hand. “Promise us you won’t go again.” 

“Promise,” I murmured. 

“And promise that you’ll stay away from the Marlings,” my uncle added. 

Before I could reply, the doorbell rang. Hannah came into the kitchen, 
weighted down under a bulging backpack. “Ready?” she asked. 

I nodded and shoved my chair back from the table. “Yeah. I guess I’m 
ready,” I told her. “This is so weird. Going to someone else’s school.” 

“You’ll like my teacher, Mr. Shein,” Hannah replied. “He’s very interesting. 
And he’s really nice.” 

I grabbed my backpack and my jacket. We said good-bye to my aunt and 
uncle and headed out the front door. 

I glanced at the Marlings’ house as we made our way to the street. The 
bedroom window at the side had been closed, I saw. The house was dark as 



always. 

“Did you find your camera?” Hannah asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. But it wasn’t easy.” I told her about my scary adventures. 

She tsk-tsked. “I warned you, Alex,” she said. “You wouldn’t catch me in 
the woods after dark.” 

A yellow school bus rumbled past. Some kids in the bus called out the 
window to Hannah. She waved back to them. 

The morning sun still floated low in the sky. A silvery frost clung to the 
lawns. The air felt crisp and cold. 

“One more block to school,” Hannah said. “Are you nervous?” 

I didn’t answer. I was thinking about the Marlings. I told Hannah about the 
howls I’d heard inside their house. “Uncle Colin says they have two German 
shepherds. Really big and really mean,” I told her. 

“No, they don’t,” Hannah replied sharply. 

I stopped walking. “Excuse me?” I cried. 

“The Marlings don’t have any dogs,” she repeated. “I’ve lived here as long 
as they have, and I’ve never seen them.” 

“Then why did my uncle tell me that?” I demanded. 

“So you won’t be scared,” Hannah replied. 

“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. “If the Marlings don’t have dogs, 
what made those weird footprints outside their window?” 

Hannah shook her head. Her olive-green eyes locked onto mine. “Alex, 
don’t you get it?” she cried. “Haven’t you figured it out yet?” 

“Figured what out?” I asked. 

“The Marlings are werewolves!” Hannah declared. 



15 


Why is everyone in Wolf Creek obsessed with werewolves? I wondered. 

I laughed at Hannah and teased her the rest of the walk to school. I mean, 
how could anyone actually believe in werewolves today? 

“You’re only trying to scare me,” I told her. “But I don’t scare easily— 
remember? I saw one of the German shepherds. It was howling in the Marlings’ 
window.” 

Hannah shrugged. “Believe what you want to believe,” she murmured. 

“Don’t try to scare me with werewolves anymore,” I told her. 

But I had a surprise when we arrived at school. Even Mr. Shein, the sixth- 
grade teacher, wanted to talk about werewolves all morning! 

He was about forty, short, and chubby, with thinning brown hair and thick 
black eyeglasses perched on his round pink face. He wore a yellow sweater that 
made him resemble a ripe pear. 

But Hannah was right. He was very nice. Very friendly. He welcomed me 
eagerly and introduced me to the other sixth graders, and really made me feel at 
home. 

He assigned me a seat near the door in back. Hannah sat in the front row. 

I spotted Sean and Arjun near the windows on the other side of the 
classroom. They nodded, but didn’t say hi or anything. 

They both looked rumpled and kind of tired. Their baggy clothes were very 
wrinkled. Their hair was wild. They look as if they’d been up all night, I 
thought. 

Weird thought... 

After taking attendance and making a few announcements, Mr. Shein sat on 
the edge of his desk. His eyes traveled around the room. He waited for us to 
settle down. 

“Does anyone know what the study of lycanthropy is?” he asked. Behind 
his glasses, his dark eyes glowed. 

I had never heard the word. But to my surprise, several hands shot up. He 
called on Arjun. 

“It’s about people changing into wolves,” Arjun said. 

“Werewolves!” Sean exclaimed. 



Mr. Shein nodded. “Yes. Werewolves,” he repeated. “That’s what 
lycanthropy is the study of.” He cleared his throat. “Since Halloween comes later 
this week, I thought we might spend some time discussing lycanthropy.” 

“There is going to be a full moon on Halloween night this year!” a tall, 
athletic-looking boy interrupted. 

“Yes, there is,” Mr. Shein agreed. “Many people believe a full moon is 
needed to bring the werewolf to life—but they are wrong. Although a 
werewolf’s powers do grow stronger as the moon grows fuller.” 

Crossing his legs, he leaned back and began to talk. He explained how the 
werewolf legends began over two hundred years ago in Europe. A normal 
person, bitten by a werewolf, becomes a werewolf himself when moonlight 
shines on him. 

“It is a curse that cannot be removed,” Mr. Shein said, speaking in a low, 
steady voice. Trying to sound spooky. “No matter how much he tries to live a 
normal life, a man inflicted with the curse turns into a wolf under the light of the 
moon.” 

“Girls too?” Hannah asked. 

Some kids giggled. 

“Yes. Girls too,” the teacher answered seriously. 

“The werewolf must rage and howl,” Mr. Shein continued. “And prowl the 
woods or forest in search of victims.” 

“Cool!” a red-haired boy in front of me muttered. 

Everyone laughed. 

“At daybreak, the werewolves must shed their wolf skin,” the teacher 
explained. “They return to human form. They must hide their wolf skin until the 
next night. They must hide the skin in a safe place. Because if someone takes the 
werewolf’s skin and burns it... the werewolf will die.” 

“Cool!” the red-haired boy repeated. 

More laughter. Kids started talking excitedly. 

It took a while for Mr. Shein to quiet everyone. He jumped to his feet, 
pulled down his yellow sweater, and paced in front of the chalkboard. 

“Does anyone in this class believe that werewolves really exist?” he asked. 

I snickered. I didn’t think any kids would raise their hands. 

But to my surprise, every single hand in the room shot up. 

“You all believe in werewolves!” Mr. Shein declared. 

“Yes, we do,” I heard Arjun murmur softly. 



“Yes, we do,” Sean repeated. 

I turned and realized they were both staring hard at me. 

I felt a sudden chill. What is their problem? I wondered. Why are they 
acting so weird? 



16 


After school, Sean and Arjun came up to me at the back of the classroom. 
Outside the room, lockers slammed. The tile walls echoed with shouts and 
laughter. 

The two guys studied me solemnly. “What’s up?” I greeted them, zipping 
my backpack. 

Mr. Shein waved and walked out, carrying a bulging briefcase. The three of 
us were alone in the room. 

“How’s it going?” Sean asked. 

“Is it weird being in a new school?” Arjun said. 

“Yeah. Kind of,” I told them. “Especially since I know I’m only here for a 
few weeks.” 

“You’re lucky!” Arjun joked. “Sean and I are stuck here.” 

“Wolf Creek isn’t so bad,” I said. I swung the backpack onto my shoulder. 

The two boys stared at me intently. They didn’t say anything. Sean shoved 
his hands into his baggy jeans pockets. Arjun fiddled with a silver ring on his 
little finger. 

Finally, Sean broke the silence. “You don’t believe in werewolves,” he said 
softly. 

“Huh? Well...” I hesitated. 

“You didn’t raise your hand,” Arjun added. “Everyone else did.” 

“Yeah. I know,” I replied. “I really don’t believe in them. I mean, come on, 
guys. It’s practically the twenty-first century. See a lot of guys with fur on their 
faces walking around the streets? I don’t think so!” 

I meant it to be funny. But they didn’t laugh. They kept staring at me with 
their solemn faces. 

“Werewolves exist,” Arjun said softly. “We can prove it to you.” 

“For sure,” I replied sarcastically, rolling my eyes. “The Easter Bunny 
exists too. I saw him riding a bus back home in Cleveland.” 

“We can prove it to you, Alex,” Arjun insisted. “We can show you a 
werewolf.” 

“A real one,” Sean added. 

“No, thanks,” I said. “I really—” 



“You can take pictures of it,” Arjun interrupted. 

“Yeah. You can take a whole roll!” his friend cried. 

That made me stop and think. I remembered the photo contest I planned to 
enter. I needed a Halloween photo—a really good Halloween photo—for the 
contest. 

They moved closer, surrounding me, forcing me to back up until I bumped 
into the windowsill. 

“Want to see a real werewolf, Alex?” Sean demanded. 

“Want to take photos of a real werewolf?” Arjun asked. 

They stared hard at me, challenging me. 

“What do I have to do?” I asked. 



17 


Aunt Marta laughed. “Hannah—you look dreadful !” she cried, pressing her 
hands against her cheeks. 

“Thank you!” Hannah took a low bow. “Thank you!” 

After dinner, Hannah had come over to show off her Halloween costume. 
She changed her mind about dressing as a pirate. The costume she chose instead 
was hard to describe. She had taken a lot of old clothes, torn them all up, and 
sewn them back together. 

Her baggy pants had one brown leg and one green leg. And they had 
checkered patches at the knees. She wore a ragged shirt of yellow, blue, red— 
every color you can imagine. An even more colorful jacket over the shirt. And a 
floppy rag hat that kept falling over her face. 

“What are you supposed to be?” I asked. “A junkyard?” 

She didn’t laugh. “I’m a rag doll,” she replied. “Don’t you get it?” She 
tugged at the jacket. “Rags?” 

Aunt Marta and Uncle Colin both laughed. I was happy to see them 
enjoying themselves. They had both seemed tired and low at dinner. They had 
barely spoken to me. 

“There used to be a song about a rag doll,” Aunt Marta said. “Remember it, 
Colin?” 

My uncle shook his head. “I don’t remember anything anymore,” he 
replied. “I’m lucky if I remember to get up in the morning!” 

“Oh, give me a break, Colin!” Aunt Marta scolded. She gave him a playful 
shove. She began singing a song about a rag doll. 

Hannah did a silly dance, twirling her hands above her head. One of her 
jacket sleeves fell off, and we all laughed. 

“Where’s your costume, Alex?” my aunt demanded. “Go put it on. Come 
on. Let’s have a preview.” 

“I—I haven’t put one together yet,” I stammered. 

“Well, let’s get some old clothes and make you a costume tonight!” Aunt 
Marta insisted. 

“No. I... need to think about it,” I told her. 

I didn’t have my mind on costumes. I kept glancing out the front window at 



the darkening sky. Thinking about what I planned to do later. 

I planned to meet Sean and Arjun in the woods by the creek. At school, 
they told me to take my camera and meet them there. 

They said that the werewolf comes to that spot every night when the moon 
is at the highest point in the sky. “It howls up at the moon,” Arjun said in an 
excited whisper. “And then it lowers its head and laps up water from the creek.” 

“Wait till you see it!” Sean exclaimed. “It’s a man and a wolf at the same 
time. He’s half-human, half-animal.” 

I narrowed my eyes at the two of them. I tried to decide if they were 
goofing or not. Their expressions were so serious—and so excited—I decided 
they were telling the truth. 

Was it possible? Did werewolves really exist? 

I pictured the howling creature in the Marlings’ window. And I pictured the 
two animals in the woods, ripped to pieces. 

By a werewolf? 

The back of my neck tingled. I’d never believed in werewolves. But I’d 
seldom been out of the city. 

Here in this small town surrounded by woods, they began to seem real. 

“Will you meet us at midnight?” Sean asked. 

I didn’t want to return to the woods at night. Not after what I’d seen there. 

But I didn’t want them to know I was afraid. 

And I really needed a great photo to win the contest. A photo of a werewolf 
would definitely win! What else could come close? 

So I agreed to sneak out of the house and meet Sean and Arjun at midnight 
in the woods. But now, as it grew later, I began to feel really nervous about it. 

As I glanced out at the darkness beyond the window, I had a heavy feeling 
in the pit of my stomach. And my hands were suddenly cold and clammy. 

“Alex, what are you thinking about?” Aunt Marta’s voice broke into my 
thoughts. 

“Huh?” I blinked and shook my head. 

Everyone laughed. “You were staring out the window with the strangest 
look on your face,” Hannah declared. 

“Oh. Just watching the moon,” I said with a shrug. 

“It’s Moon Madness!” Uncle Colin joked. “OOOH. Looks like a bad case!” 

“What’s that?” I asked. 

“How should I know?” my uncle replied. “I just made it up!” 



We all laughed again. 

Everyone was in such a good mood. I wished I could relax and have fun 
too. But all I could think about was sneaking out to the woods. 

Hannah went home a short while later. I said goodnight to my aunt and 
uncle and closed myself up in my room. 

I glanced at the bed-table clock. It read ten fifteen. 

Nearly two hours to wait. 

I checked out my camera. Made sure I had it loaded with high-speed film. 

Then I sat down to read a photography magazine—and wait—hoping the 
time would pass quickly. 

My eyes stared at the pages of the magazine. But I couldn’t read. I couldn’t 
concentrate. 

Every few seconds, my eyes went up to the bed-table clock. 

Why does time move so slowly when you’re waiting? 

Finally, at about ten to midnight, I closed my magazine. Pulled on an extra 
sweater and then my jacket. I grabbed my camera case and slung the strap over 
my shoulder. 

Then I tiptoed to the bedroom door. 

My aunt and uncle were probably out in the woods, photographing night 
animals. But in case they decided to stay in tonight, I didn’t want them to hear 
me sneak out. 

I clicked off the lights in my room. Then I reached for the doorknob and 
tugged. 

“Hey—!” 

I turned the knob and tugged again. I turned it the other way and gave the 
door a hard jerk. “I don’t believe it!” I gasped. I’d been locked in. 



18 


The door must be stuck, I decided. 

I tugged it hard. Tugged it a dozen times. I even tried pushing. But I 
couldn’t budge it. It had definitely been locked, locked from the outside. 

I angrily spun away from the door. 

Why did my aunt and uncle lock me in? I wondered. Because of last night? 
Because of my close calls in the woods? 

“They can’t do this to me!” I exclaimed. 

I ran to the window. I jerked the curtains apart and reached for the window 
handles. 

The window slid up a few inches—and I let out a gasp. 

Metal bars had been installed outside. 

When did they put those on? This afternoon? 

I’m a prisoner! I told myself. I’m locked in this room like an animal in a 

cage! 

“They can’t do this to me!” I repeated. “They can’t!” 

I slid the window up all the way. I grabbed the metal bars with both hands 
and struggled to pry them loose. 

But they wouldn’t budge. 

I was still tugging on the bars when I heard a low growl. 

My hands dropped away, and a sharp cry escaped my throat. 

I froze. 

And heard another growl. Louder this time. 

And close. So close. 

A shrill howl rose up. From the Marlings’ house? 

I moved my face up close to the bars and peered out. Their bedroom 
window stood open again. But the house was completely dark. No lights 
anywhere. 

I squinted into the darkness. The moon had disappeared behind a cloud. I 
could barely see across to their house. 

Pressed against the bars, I heard an animal grunt. And then a thud. 

A dark shape dropped down from the Marlings’ open window. Another 



thud. Another shape dropped down on all fours. 

One of the creatures raised its head in a long, mournful howl. 

And then they took off, loping heavily toward the backyard, heading to the 
woods. 

Dogs? Wolves? Humans? 

I couldn’t see clearly in the darkness. 

I stared out, and a silvery light washed over the house as the cloud drifted 
away from the moon. 

But now it was too late. Too late. 

The creatures had vanished. 

I pounded the bars with my fists. 

Sean and Arjun were waiting for me by the creek. And there was no way I 
could get there. 

What would they think? That I was a total chicken? A wimp? 

I’m missing my big chance to take a winning photograph! I realized. 

Angrily, I slammed the window shut. 

“Tomorrow night!” I declared out loud. “Tomorrow night I’m getting out of 
here. My aunt and uncle won’t stop me. 

“Tomorrow night I’m going into the woods, and I’m going to find out the 
truth about werewolves!” 



19 


“How could you do that to me?” I shrieked. I burst into the kitchen for breakfast 
the next morning, and strode angrily up to my aunt and uncle. 

“How could you lock me in my room without telling me?” I cried. 

Aunt Marta set down her coffee mug. She gazed up at me with a troubled 
expression. Then she turned to Uncle Colin. “Maybe we should have told Alex,” 
she said. 

Uncle Colin narrowed his eyes at me. “Did you try to get out last night, 
Alex?” 

“Well...” I hesitated. I didn’t want to tell them what I had planned to do. “I 
don’t like being in a cage!” I protested. “I’m twelve years old, and I really think 

“We’re sorry,” Aunt Marta interrupted. She glanced at the kitchen clock and 
poured me out a bowl of cornflakes. 

“But we did it for your own good,” Uncle Colin added. He folded his 
napkin tensely between his hands. “We had no choice. We can’t let you go 
running out to the woods the way you did your first night. It just isn’t safe.” 

“We’re responsible for you,” Aunt Marta said, pushing the cereal bowl 
across the table to me. “We promised your parents we’d return you safe and 
sound. We don’t want to lock you in, Alex. But we have to make sure—” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Besides, the Marlings called the police yesterday,” Uncle Colin said, 
frowning. 

“They what?” I cried. “They called the police—about me?” 

He nodded. “They complained about you spying on them,” he said. 

I let out an angry scream. “That’s totally stupid!” I cried. “I didn’t spy on 
them! I didn’t do anything to them!” 

“Okay, okay.” Aunt Marta came around the table and placed a comforting 
hand on my shoulder. “Don’t worry about the Marlings. Just don’t go anywhere 
near their house—okay?” 

I turned to her. “Are they werewolves?” I blurted out. 

Uncle Colin gasped. 

Aunt Marta uttered a short laugh. “Is that what Hannah told you?” she 



demanded. 

“Well... yes,” I replied. 

She shook her head. “Hannah has a twisted sense of humor,” she said. 

“The Marlings are just very odd, very unfriendly people,” Unde Colin told 
me. He glanced out the kitchen window toward their house. And added: “Two 
unfriendly people with two very unfriendly dogs.” 

“Hannah said they don’t have any dogs,” I insisted. 

Uncle Colin made a disgusted face. “Tell your friend Hannah to stop pulling 
your leg.” 

“What do you mean?” I asked. 

“She’s trying to scare you, Alex. Don’t listen to her.” 

The doorbell rang. Hannah had arrived to walk me to school. 

I was happy to get out of the house. I still felt angry about being locked up. 

As we walked to school, I didn’t tell Hannah about it. I knew she’d 
probably think it was funny. And she’d tell other kids about how my aunt and 
uncle were so worried about me, they locked me in like a baby. 

I didn’t mention the Marlings’ dogs, either. I didn’t want to get into another 
argument about werewolves. I wanted to find out the truth for myself. 

At school, I hung my jacket in my locker and started to Mr. Shein’s class. 
But as I turned the corner, Sean and Arjun stepped up to block my path. 

They’d been waiting for me. They moved quickly to back me against the 
wall. Their eyes glowed with excitement. 

“Hey, Alex.” Sean poked me in the shoulder. 

“Seen any werewolves lately?” Arjun demanded. 



20 


“Uh... well..I didn’t know what to say. “You see... my aunt and uncle...” 

Why were they staring at me like that? Were they trying to scare me? 

A strange grin spread over Sean’s face. “Have a good time in the woods last 
night?” he asked. 

“Yeah. How was it?” Arjun demanded. “Catch any werewolves, Alex?” 

I bumped them off me and stepped away from the wall. “You mean you 
weren’t there?” I cried. 

They both burst out laughing. They slapped each other a high five. 

“Of course not!” Arjun declared. “Why would we go into the woods in the 
middle of the night?” 

“I was sound asleep by midnight,” Sean said, grinning. 

They laughed and congratulated each other again. 

A joke. The whole thing had been a joke. They didn’t wait for me in the 
woods at midnight. They never intended to go to the woods. 

“So how was it?” Sean asked. “Were you surprised when Arjun and I didn’t 
show up?” 

“No. I didn’t even think of you,” I told them. “Do you know why? Because 
I was too busy taking photos of the werewolf!” 

“Huh?” Sean cried. 

It was their turn to be surprised. 

Of course I was lying. But they had no way of knowing that I hadn’t gone 
to the woods, either. 

“What did you see?” Arjun asked suspiciously. 

“I followed a werewolf,” I told him, forcing myself not to crack a smile. 
“He came to the creek and he drank, just as you said.” 

“Give me a break,” Sean groaned. 

“Yeah. Really!” Arjun rolled his eyes. “In your dreams.” 

“I can prove it. I took a whole roll of film,” I told them. 

“Let’s see the pictures,” Sean demanded. 

“I haven’t developed them yet,” I replied. 

They stared at me, trying to decide if I was telling the truth. I felt a laugh 



about to explode inside me. But somehow I kept a straight face. 

The bell rang. 

“We’re late!” Arjun cried. 

The three of us bolted down the hall to the room. We dove into our seats 
two seconds before Mr. Shein walked in. 

Don’t ask me what we talked about all morning. I didn’t hear a word. 

I was thinking hard, thinking about Sean and Arjun. What was I going to 
tell them tomorrow when they asked to see the werewolf photos? 

Would I have to confess that I lied to them? 

No, I decided. I had a better plan. 

“I’m going to sneak out tonight and take pictures of the Marlings’ house,” I 
whispered into the phone. 

“Huh? Alex? Why are you whispering?” Hannah’s voice rang shrilly in my 
ear. 

I was whispering because my aunt and uncle had only one telephone. An 
old-fashioned black phone set on a table in the living room. And the two of them 
were in the next room preparing dinner. I could see them from the armchair I 
slumped in. 

“Hannah, I’m going to hide at the side of the house,” I whispered. “And I’m 
going to snap some pictures of whoever—or whatever—jumps out of that 
bedroom window tonight.” 

“Do you have a sore throat or something?” Hannah demanded. “I can’t hear 
you, Alex.” 

I opened my mouth to repeat what I’d said—but Aunt Marta entered the 
room. “Dinner is ready, Alex. Who are you talking to?” she asked. 

“Hannah,” I told my aunt. “I’ve got to go,” I said into the phone. “Talk to 
you later.” I hung up the receiver. 

I hoped that maybe Hannah might want to sneak out at midnight and keep 
me company. I’ll have to ask her later, I decided. 

Yawning, pretending to be very sleepy, I went to my room a little after ten 
o’clock. A few minutes later, I heard the lock click outside my door. My aunt or 
uncle had locked me in again. 

But this time, I fooled them. This time, I was prepared. 

Before dinner, I’d jammed a wad of bubblegum into the latch. The door 



wasn’t really closed. 

Once again, I pulled on an extra sweater. And checked out my camera. And 
waited, gazing at the bed-table clock. 

Just before midnight, I swung the camera case over my shoulder. Slid the 
bedroom door open easily. And crept out of the house, under the white light of 
the moon, ready to solve the mystery of the Marlings. 



21 


I cast a quick glance at the Mailings’ house. Then I turned away and trotted 
across the wet grass to Hannah’s house. 

No lights were on. The storm door in back hadn’t been shut. The wind 
made it swing open, as if inviting me in. 

But I made my way up to Hannah’s bedroom window on the other side of 
the house. Silver moonlight washed over the glass, making it reflect the trees 
like a mirror. 

I couldn’t see inside. But the window was open a few inches. 

“Hannah—?” I called in a loud whisper. “Hannah—are you awake?” 

I heard someone stirring inside. The curtains shifted. “Who’s there?” 
Hannah called out sleepily. 

“It’s me!” I whispered, standing on tiptoe. “It’s Alex. Come to the window.” 

“Alex? What are you doing out there?” she demanded. 

“I’m going to take photos of the Marlings,” I told her. “Come out with me, 
Hannah.” 

“Huh? Photos?” she called out. “But it’s so late, Alex. I was asleep, and—” 

“Every night I hear howls from their house,” I told her. “And then someone 
—or something—jumps out of their bedroom window and runs into the woods. 
My uncle says it’s their dogs, but—” 

“I told you,” she interrupted. “The Marlings don’t have dogs. They’re 
werewolves. I know you don’t believe me. But it’s true. Your aunt and uncle 
know it’s true. But they don’t want you to be scared.” 

“That’s why I want to take photos,” I explained. “I mean, I could be the first 
person in the world to get a werewolf on film! Get dressed, Hannah. Come on!” 
I pleaded. “I want you to see too.” 

“You’re crazy, Alex! Get back in the house!” Hannah warned. She appeared 
at the window. She pulled it up higher and leaned out. 

“I’m not coming out there,” she insisted. “It’s too dangerous. You told me 
about those two animals you saw. They were ripped to shreds—right? If the 
Marlings see you, they’ll do the same thing to you!” 

Her words sent a cold shiver down the back of my neck. But I was 
desperate to solve the mystery—and to snap a great photo. 



“They won’t see us!” I told her. “We’ll hide behind the bushes at the side of 
the house.” 

“Don’t say us,” Hannah called out. “I’m not doing it, Alex. I’m too scared. 
I’m warning you, go back inside.” 

“Please!” I pleaded. I grabbed her arm. “Come on out, Hannah. You want to 
see the werewolves too—don’t you?” 

“No way!” She jerked her arm away. “Go home, Alex,” she repeated. “It’s 
not a game. It’s really dangerous.” 

“Listen, Hannah—” I started. 

But she slid the window shut. 

I stared at the reflection of the trees in the glass. Maybe she’s right, I 
thought. Another cold shiver ran down my back. Maybe this is a big mistake. 
Maybe it is too dangerous. If the Marlings catch me... 

I gasped when I heard a low growl. 

I froze. 

I didn’t have to turn around. I knew from the sound. 

A werewolf—it had sneaked up behind me. 



22 


Another low grunt made me cry out. 

My knees started to collapse. I took a deep, shivering breath and spun 
around to face the creature. 

No. 

Not there. 

No one there. 

I swallowed. Swallowed again. My mouth suddenly felt bone-dry. 

Another growl. I realized where it came from. From the back of the 
Marlings’ house. 

They’re about to jump out the window, I told myself. Those are the sounds I 
hear every night just before they climb out the bedroom window. 

And I’m standing out here in the open. I’ll be the first thing they see! 

My legs didn’t want to work. But I gritted my teeth, took a deep breath— 
and forced myself to move. 

My sneakers slid on the wet grass. I slipped, but I didn’t fall. 

I scrambled to the bushes that divided my aunt and uncle’s house from the 
Marlings’ house. 

I dropped to my knees, panting noisily. My heart pounded so hard, my chest 

hurt. 

I ducked my head. And grabbed for the straps on my camera case. 

A high, shrill animal howl floated out from the Marlings’ open bedroom 
window. The light of the moon made the side of their house gleam. 

The yard was nearly as bright as day. Everything glistened from the frosty 

dew. 

Ducking low behind the bushes, I could see every leaf, every dew-covered 
blade of grass. 

I tugged at the zipper of my camera case. I knew I had to pull the camera 
out—fast. But my hands were shaking so bad, I couldn’t budge the zipper. 
Another howl made me turn back to the window. 

A shadow moved. 

A leg slid out. 



Another leg. 

A slender form dropped to the ground. 

It all happened so quickly. As if time had been put on fast-forward. 

My eyes on the window, I struggled to unzip the camera case. 

Another body crawled out from the darkness of the Marlings’ bedroom 
window. 

Two forms stood on the ground and stretched. 

Two humans ! 

Not wolves. 

Humans. 

What were they wearing? 

Capes? 

Dark fur capes, draped over their shoulders, hanging heavily behind them. 

They had their backs to me. I couldn’t see their faces. 

Hands on their waists, they stretched, bending back, bending from side to 
side, as if limbering up their muscles for a long jog. 

And then they raised their heads to the moon—and howled. 

Turn around! I pleaded silently, trembling behind the bushes. Please turn 
around! I want to see your faces! 

“Ohhhh...” I uttered a startled moan as their fur capes began to move. The 
heavy capes began to curl around them, to tighten around their bodies. 

And I realized they weren’t capes. They were some kind of animal skins. 

Furry skins. With arms. And legs... 

The dark skins wrapped themselves tightly over the two humans. The fur 
spread over their bodies, slid over their heads, covered their legs, their arms, 
their hands. 

“Ohhhhh...” I shook so hard, I let go of the camera case and hugged 
myself. Hugged myself tight, trying to hold myself in, trying to keep myself 
together. 

The two figures howled again, raising their furry arms over their heads. 
Silvery claws slid out from their paws. 

The two creatures raked the claws at each other playfully, pretending to 
attack. Growling and grunting, they lowered themselves to all fours. 

No longer humans. 

Animals... wolf creatures... 

Hannah is right, I realized. She told the truth. The Marlings are 



werewolves. They turned into wolves under the moonlight. 

Gasping for breath, I snatched up the camera case. I fumbled once again 
with the zipper. Finally managed to pull it open. 

And they turned. They both turned toward me. 

Two wolves ! 

Their dark eyes stared out from beneath fur-covered foreheads. Their furry 
snouts snapped open to reveal rows of curled animal teeth. 

Werewolves. The Marlings were werewolves. Human and wolf at the same 

time! 

The werewolves nuzzled each other, growling softly. I raised the camera. I 
pulled myself up to my knees. 

I’ve got to snap a picture. Do it now, Alex! I ordered myself. 

But my hands shook so badly, I wasn’t sure I could hold the camera steady 
enough. 

Do it! Do it! 

I raised the viewfinder to my eye. I stood up a little higher to see over the 
top of the bush. 

“Ohhh.” As I raised myself, a sharp twig scraped the side of my face. 

And I dropped the camera! 

It landed on the grass with a THUD. 

The two wolf creatures turned. 

And saw me! 



23 


I sank to the ground. Pressed myself flat on my stomach. 

My chest heaved. I breathed through my mouth, struggling to keep 
perfectly still, perfectly silent. 

Did they see me? Did they? 

I raised my head enough to peer out at them beneath the bottom branch of 
the bush. 

They had their fur-covered snouts raised. They sniffed the air. 

Did they smell me? Did they know I was hiding down here? 

Were they about to leap into the bush and rip me apart with those long, 
silvery claws? 

I held my breath, squinting across the grass at them. 

They sniffed some more, grunting softly. 

Then they turned away. Dropped to all fours. And loped off, heading to the 
woods. 

I waited until I could no longer hear the soft thud of their paws or their low 
growls and grunts. Then I slid forward on my stomach, reached out, and grabbed 
my camera. 

My camera! 

I hadn’t snapped any photos. Not a single shot. 

I climbed shakily to my feet and rubbed the wet dew from the lens. Then I 
raised my eyes to the woods. 

I have to follow them, I decided. 

I have to take some photos. This is the chance of a lifetime! 

If I can take the first-ever shots of actual werewolves, I’ll be famous! I 
pictured myself in newspapers and on magazine covers. I imagined my photos of 
the Marlings on display in fancy photo galleries. 

And I thought of how proud of me Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta would be. 

That thought sent a chill down my back. Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta— 
they were working in the woods right now. Busy photographing animals of the 
night. 

Did they know that two werewolves were on the loose? Did they know that 
two werewolves were prowling the woods, searching for victims? 



They’re not safe out there, I realized. 

Of course, following the werewolves into the woods was crazy—and 
dangerous. But now I had two reasons to chase after them. 

I had to snap some pictures —and warn my aunt and uncle. 

My eyes on the woods, I jammed the camera into the case and slung it over 
my shoulder. Then I began trotting across the backyard toward the trees, 
following the fresh paw prints in the frosty grass. 

I ducked into the trees and followed the curving path. Moonlight trickled 
through the treetop leaves, making eerie, shifting patterns on the ground. 

I didn’t have to go far to catch up with the two werewolves. Just past the 
bent, old-man tree, I heard an animal grunt. And then a shrill cry of attack. 

I stopped—and peered through a low evergreen shrub. Mouths gaping open, 
claws raised, the two wolf creatures leaped. 

They’ve caught someone! I realized, frozen in horror. 

Who is it? My aunt? My uncle? 



24 


The two werewolves wrestled with their prey. 

I heard a shrill bleat of pain. Then I saw four hooves shoot up in the air. 

Not a human, I realized, squinting into the dim light. They’ve trapped a 
deer. A baby deer. 

They’re going to kill it. 

They’re going to tear it to shreds. 

What can I do? I asked myself. How can I save it? 

I didn’t think. I was too terrified to think clearly. 

I tossed back my head. And I let out a loud wolf howl. 

My cry echoed off the trees. 

The snarling werewolves stopped their attack. They raised their heads. 

They turned toward my cry. 

Just long enough for the fawn to scramble to its feet. It shook itself—like a 
dog after a bath—and took off into the trees. 

The werewolves sniffed the air furiously. They didn’t seem to notice that 
the fawn had escaped. Their eyes glowed red in the pale moonlight. They turned, 
uttering low, angry growls. Lowered their heads. And came charging at me. 



25 


I staggered back. 

Too frightened to move. 

No time to run. 

The ground seemed to shake under the thunder of the wolves’ paws. 

I opened my mouth to scream—but no sound came out. 

The wolves’ jaws snapped. Their red eyes glowed as if on fire. 

I raised my arms in front of me, as if to shield myself. 

Prepared for the attack. 

And the wolves turned away. Turned sharply to the right, running together. 
A scrawny brown rabbit scrambled over the path. 

The wolves had turned away from me to chase the rabbit! 

Snarling furiously, they lowered their heads—and caught the rabbit easily. 
The little creature didn’t put up much of a fight. 

One wolf snapped its neck. The other bit hungrily into its belly. 

Breathing hard, I swung my camera case around. And pulled the camera out 
with a quick jerk. 

My hand trembled as I raised the viewfinder to my eye. But I steadied the 
camera with both hands. 

And clicked off a shot. 

And then another. 

I snapped a shot of the wolves tugging the rabbit apart. And another shot of 
the two of them eating side by side. 

When the wolves finished, nothing remained of the rabbit. Licking their 
teeth, they turned and loped off into the trees. 

Holding my camera in front of me with both hands, I followed after them. 

I guess I was in some kind of shock. I know I wasn’t thinking clearly. 

I was barely thinking at all! 

I had nearly been caught by the two werewolves. They would have finished 
me the way they’d finished that poor rabbit. 

But I knew I had to follow them. I had to stay in the woods. 

I had to warn my aunt and uncle. I had to find them and tell them they were 



wrong about the Marlings. That Hannah told the truth. 

I had to let them know the danger they were in. 

And I had to take more photographs. 

I’d been through such a horrible scare. My heart pounded, and my arms and 
legs felt all trembly and weak. I didn’t feel like me. I felt as if I were outside 
myself, watching myself. 

But I knew I couldn’t run back to the house. Not until my aunt and uncle 
were safe. 

I kept pretty far behind the creatures, far enough that I could slip behind a 
tree or bush if one of them glanced back. And I kept my camera raised, ready to 
snap off shots. 

They loped slowly to the creek. I watched them lower their heads and 
noisily lap up water. 

They didn’t look at all human now. Their bodies had become wolf bodies. I 
couldn’t see anything human in their faces. Their glowing eyes were animal 
eyes. 

They took a long drink from the creek, washing down their dinner, I guess. 
I steadied my camera and clicked off several shots. 

I wished Hannah had come with me. I wanted someone else to be there with 
me, to see what I was seeing. 

I couldn’t wait to get back and tell her that she was right about the 
Marlings. That they really were werewolves. 

The two wolf creatures suddenly raised their heads from the water, turned, 
and sniffed the air. 

Did they smell me? Or some other prey? 

I slid behind a fat tree trunk and held my breath. 

When I carefully peered out, they were loping along the creek shore. I 
waited until they had gone a short distance, then I crept out and followed them. 

I followed the two werewolves all night. I finished one roll of film, then 
popped in another. I shot them rising up on their furry hind legs and howling at 
the moon. And I clicked off several more horrifying shots of them devouring 
small animals. 

And I searched for my aunt and uncle. Desperate to warn them, to tell them 
what I had learned. 

As I trailed behind the creatures—so frightened and excited—I completely 
lost track of time. It was as if I were walking through a dream. None of it 



seemed real. 

Finally, a red crack of sunlight appeared along the ground. To my shock, it 
was nearly daybreak. 

The werewolves moved slowly now. Their loping trot had become a stiff¬ 
legged walk. 

As they stepped out of the trees into their backyard, they rose up onto their 
hind legs. They staggered awkwardly to the back of their house. 

I stayed by the trees, afraid to go too close. The sky was brightening as the 
sun made its way higher. If the wolf creatures turned around, they could see me 
easily. 

I raised my camera. I had only a few shots left. 

The two werewolves staggered on two legs to the side of their house. They 
stretched their furry forearms and raised their faces to the brightening sun. 

“Oh!” I couldn’t help it. I uttered a shocked cry as they began to shed their 
skins. 

The fur appeared to peel back. 

The claws slid out of view. And the fur pulled back, revealing their human 
hands. 

As I gaped in amazement, the black wolf fur peeled off their arms and legs, 
then slid off their bodies. 

They had their backs to me. 

The fur skins settled into capes again. The two humans reached up and 
pulled off the heavy capes. 

I’m going to see the Marlings for the first time! I realized. 

They lowered the wolf skin capes to the ground. 

They turned slowly. 

And I saw their faces. 



26 


As the morning sunlight washed over their faces, I nearly cried out—in horror 
and disbelief. 

Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta stretched, brushed back their silvery hair, then 
bent to pick up their wolf skins. 

My aunt and uncle —they were the werewolves! 

Uncle Colin raised his eyes to the woods. I fell back behind a tree. Did he 
see me? 

No. 

My whole body trembled. I wanted to cry out: “No! No! This can’t be 
happening!” 

But I pressed myself against the tree and kept my jaws clamped tight. I 
couldn’t let them see me. I couldn’t let them know that I knew the truth. 

The smooth tree trunk felt cool against my forehead. I had to think. I had to 
make a plan. 

What should I do? I knew I couldn’t stay with them any longer. I couldn’t 
live in a house with two werewolves. 

But where could I go? Who would help me? 

Who would believe me? 

I watched my aunt and uncle fold up their wolf skins. Then Uncle Colin 
helped Aunt Marta climb into the Marlings’ bedroom window. Once she was 
inside, he followed her in. 

“The Marlings!” I murmured to myself. Were they okay in there? Or did my 
aunt and uncle do something terrible to them? 

A few minutes later, Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta climbed back out of the 
window. Then they scurried across the driveway, into their own house. 

I clung to the tree trunk for a while, watching the two houses. Thinking 

hard. 

Were the Marlings asleep in their house? Did they know that the two 
werewolves were in there? Were the Marlings werewolves too? 

I wanted to run away. To make my way to the street and just keep running 
until I was miles and miles away. 

But I had to find out about the Marlings. I couldn’t leave without finding 



out the truth about them. 

So I watched the two houses for a while longer. No sign of anyone moving 
about. 

I pushed myself away from the tree and quickly made my way through the 
Marl mgs’ overgrown backyard. 

I ducked behind bushes and kept my eyes on my aunt and uncle’s house. 
The blinds on their bedroom windows were shut. 

Holding my breath, I darted to the Marlings’ bedroom window. I grabbed 
the windowsill and peered inside. Dark. I couldn’t see anything. 

“Here goes,” I murmured softly. “Good luck, Alex.” 

I lifted myself up onto the sill, then lowered my legs into the room. It took a 
few seconds for my eyes to adjust to the dim light. 

And then what I saw shocked me nearly as much as learning that my aunt 
and uncle were werewolves. 

I saw nothing. 

The bedroom was completely bare. Not a stick of furniture. No artwork or 
mirrors on the wall. No carpet over the dust-covered floorboards. 

Turning to the bedroom door, I spotted the two wolf skins. They were 
neatly folded and piled side by side in front of the closet. 

Taking a deep breath, I moved cautiously to the open doorway. I poked my 
head out into the hall. Also unlit and bare. 

“Anyone home?” I choked out in a tiny voice. “Hello? Anyone home?” 

Silence. 

I crept down the hall toward the front of the house. I peered into each room. 

They were all bare and empty, covered with a thick layer of dust. 

I stepped into the middle of the living room. No furniture. No lights. No 
sign that anyone had lived here in years! 

“Oh, wow!” I cried out as I realized the tmth. My voice echoed off the bare 
walls. 

No one lives here, I told myself. There are no Marlings! 

My aunt and uncle had made them up. They used this house to hide their 
wolf skins. They’d made up the Marlings to keep people out of the house. 

No Marlings. No Marlings. No Marlings. 

It was all a lie! 

I have to warn Hannah, I decided. No one is safe around here. 

I pictured my aunt and uncle devouring that helpless little rabbit last night. I 



pictured them wrestling with that baby deer. 

I have to tell Hannah and her family, I decided. And then we have to run 
away from here—as far as we can. 

I turned and made my way quickly through the empty house. Then I 
lowered myself out the bedroom window into the backyard. 

The morning sun was still a red ball, low over the treetops. The early dew 
glistened over the grass. 

“Hannah, I hope you’re awake,” I murmured. “If not, I’ll have to wake you 

up.” 

I turned away from the Marlings’ window and began to run across the back 
toward Hannah’s house. 

I went about six or seven steps. Then I stopped with a gasp as Aunt Marta’s 
voice rang out behind me. “Alex—what on earth are you doing out there?” 



27 


I spun around. My knees nearly collapsed. The ground tilted up, then down. 

Aunt Marta stood in the kitchen doorway. “Alex—why are you up so early? 
It’s Saturday morning.” She narrowed her eyes at me suspiciously. 

“I—well...” I was shaking so hard, I couldn’t speak! 

“Where are you going in such a hurry?” my aunt demanded. I saw Uncle 
Colin standing behind her in the kitchen. 

“To... Hannah’s,” I managed to reply. “To talk about... uh... our costumes 
for trick-or-treating tonight.” 

I watched her face. Did she believe me? 

I didn’t think so. 

“It’s too early to be running over to Hannah’s,” she scolded. She motioned 
for me to come inside. “Come in, Alex. Come get some breakfast first.” 

I hesitated. My mind whirred. 

Should I make a run for it? Run to the street and keep going? 

How far would I get before they caught me? My aunt and uncle were both 
werewolves. If they caught me—what would they do to me? Would I be their 
breakfast? 

No. I decided not to run. Not just yet, anyway. Not until I had a chance to 
talk to Hannah. 

I felt Aunt Marta’s eyes on me as I made my way slowly into the house. 
Uncle Colin muttered good morning. He stared hard at me too. “Early start, 
huh?” he asked softly. 

I nodded and took my place at the breakfast table. 

“Marta and I worked all night,” Uncle Colin reported. He yawned. “We 
took some pretty good shots.” 

That’s a lie! I wanted to shout. I followed you. I saw what you did. I know 
what you are! 

But I didn’t say anything. Just stared down at my cereal bowl. 

I’m having breakfast with two werewolves! I thought, feeling my stomach 
churn. My aunt and uncle run through the woods at night, murdering and ripping 
animals apart. 

I can’t sit here another minute! I told myself. I started to get up. 



But I felt Uncle Colin’s hand on my shoulder. “Relax, Alex. Have a nice 
breakfast,” he said softly. 

“But, I—” I didn’t know what to say. I was too terrified to eat. I wanted him 
to take his hand off me. It was making my whole body tremble. 

“It’s Halloween,” Uncle Colin said. “You’ll be out late tonight.” 

“Have a good breakfast,” Aunt Marta chimed in. 

They watched me as I choked down my cornflakes. They didn’t smile. They 
were studying me coldly. 

They know that I followed them, I decided. They know that I know their 
secret. 

They’re not going to let me get away. 

“Uh... I have to go to Hannah’s now,” I said, struggling to sound calm and 
cheerful. I slid my chair back and started to stand up. 

But I felt Uncle Colin’s hand grip my shoulder again. He grasped me tightly 
and held on. 

“Alex, come with me,” he ordered. 



28 


He kept his hand clamped tightly on my shoulder as he led me to the back of the 
garage. He walked quickly and didn’t say a word. 

I wondered if I could break out of his grip and make a run for it. How far 
would I get? 

He let go of my shoulder. What did he plan to do? 

“I’m sorry I followed you,” I said in a choked whisper. “I—I won’t tell 
anyone what I saw.” 

He hadn’t heard me. He had moved to the corner of the garage and picked 
up a long-handled tool. 

He shoved it toward me. “I need your help this morning,” he said. “There’s 
a lot of yard work to be done.” 

I swallowed. “Yard work?” 

Uncle Colin nodded. “That’s a weed whacker. Have you ever used one 
before?” 

“No. Not really,” I confessed. The handle shook in my hand. 

“It’s pretty easy,” he said. “I need you to cut down all these weeds behind 
the garage.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” I replied, feeling dazed. 

“And be careful not to toss any weeds in the Marlings’ yard,” he warned. 
“I’m sure they’ll be watching your every move. Waiting to complain to us about 
you.” 

“No problem,” I replied. 

There are no Marlings! I wanted to scream. 

“I’ll work with you,” Uncle Colin said, wiping sweat off his forehead with 
the back of his hand. “Together we can teach these weeds a lesson they’ll never 
forget.” He grinned for the first time that morning. 

Does he know that I know? I wondered. Is that why he’s keeping me here 
this morning? 

My uncle and I worked in the yard all day. Whenever I would take a short break, 
I’d catch him watching me coldly, studying me. 

I was so frightened. I wanted to drop my tools and run. 



But I couldn’t leave without warning Hannah and her family. They had to 
know that they were in danger too. 

I didn’t see Hannah until after dinner. She burst in just as we were finishing. 

“Well? How do I look?” she demanded. She did a fast twirl in her rag-doll 
costume. 

“You look wonderful!” Aunt Marta gushed. 

Hannah frowned at me. “Alex, where’s your costume? Come on. You’re not 
ready to trick-or-treat?” 

“Uh... it’s upstairs,” I told her. “It won’t take me long to get it together. 
Uh... come help me—okay?” 

I practically pulled her all the way to my room. 

“It’s a great night out,” she said. “Perfect for trick-or-treating. The night of 
the full moon.” 

I tugged her into the room and shut the door behind us. “We’ve got a 
problem,” I told her. 

She fiddled with the rag hat that flopped down over her forehead. 
“Problem?” 

“Yeah. Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta are werewolves.” 

“Huh?” Her eyes bulged. “What did you say?” 

I explained everything. Speaking rapidly in a low whisper, I told her all that 
I’d seen last night. “They hide their wolfskins in the Marlings’ house,” I 
finished. 

“But the Marlings—?” Hannah started. 

“There are no Marlings!” I cried. “The house is empty. My aunt and uncle 
use it as a hiding place for their wolf skins.” 

Hannah stared at me openmouthed for a long time. Her chin trembled. 
“But... what are we going to do?” she cried breathlessly. “Your aunt and uncle— 
they seem like such nice people. They’ve always been so nice to me.” 

“They’re werewolves!” I cried. “We have to tell your family. We have to 
hurry away from here. We have to get help. Tell the police or something.” 

“But—but—” Hannah sputtered, her face twisted in panic. 

And suddenly I had another idea. “Wait!” I cried. “Hannah, what did Mr. 
Shein say about werewolves shedding their skin? Didn’t he say that if someone 
finds their skins and burns them, the werewolves will be destroyed?” 

Hannah nodded. “Yes. That’s what he said. But—” 

“So that’s what we’ll do!” I cried excitedly. “We’ll go next door, and—” 



“But you don’t want to kill your aunt and uncle—do you?” Hannah replied. 
“Oh. No. Of course not,” I told her. “I’m so frightened, I’m not thinking 
clearly. I just thought—” 

“Whoa. Wait a minute, Alex!” Hannah cried, grabbing my arm. “I know 
what we can do. I have a plan that might work!” 



29 


I heard my aunt and uncle moving around in the living room. Outside the 
bedroom window, the white full moon was rising behind the trees. Wisps of 
black cloud floated over it like wriggling snakes. 

Hannah tugged me farther into the room. “What if we hide the wolf skins?” 
she asked in an excited whisper. 

“Hide them?” I whispered back. “What will that do?” 

“Your aunt and uncle won’t be able to find them,” Hannah replied. “The 
night will pass. They won’t be able to change into wolves.” 

“So maybe if they go a whole night without the skins, it will cure them!” I 
cried. 

Hannah nodded. “It’s worth a try, Alex. It might just work, and—” She 
stopped. “No. Wait. I have an even better idea. We’ll wear the skins!” 

“Excuse me?” I gasped. “Wear them? Why?” 

“Because your aunt and uncle will search everywhere for the skins,” 
Hannah replied. “They’ll search every house, every garage, every yard. But they 
won’t look for them on us! That’s the last place they’d look!” 

“I get it,” I replied. “And we’ll make sure to stay away so they don’t see us 
until after daybreak.” 

I wasn’t sure whether the plan made any sense or not. Hannah and I were 
both too frightened to think! 

Maybe... just maybe... we could cure Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta by 
keeping the skins from them until morning. 

“Let’s try it,” I said. 

“Okay,” Hannah agreed. “Quick—get into your pirate costume. We don’t 
want your aunt and uncle to suspect anything. While you’re doing that, I’ll sneak 
next door and slip on one of the wolf skins.” 

She pushed me toward the old clothes I had tossed onto the bed. “Hurry. It’s 
getting late. Meet me in back of the garage. I’ll bring out your wolf skin for 
you.” 

Hannah disappeared out the door. I heard her in the living room. She said 
good-bye to Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta and told them she was going to meet 
me outside. 



I heard the front door slam. Hannah was on her way next door to get the 
wolf skins. 

I quickly pulled on the ragged old shirt and torn trousers of my costume. I 
wrapped a bandanna around my head. 

A sound at the bedroom door made me spin around. 

“Aunt Marta!” I cried. 

She stood in the doorway, frowning at me. “It won’t work,” she said, 
shaking her head. 

“Huh?” I gasped. 

“Alex, it won’t work,” she repeated unhappily. 



30 


My aunt moved quickly into the room. 

I couldn’t move. No time to try an escape. 

“It won’t work. That costume won’t work,” Aunt Marta said, shaking her 
head. “You need some makeup. Some black stains on your face. Something to 
make you look less clean!” 

I burst out laughing. I thought Aunt Marta had overheard our plan. But she 
only wanted to improve my pirate costume! 

It took several minutes for my aunt to apply the makeup. Then she searched 
several drawers until she found a gold hoop earring, which she clipped on one 
ear. 

“There. Much better,” she said, grinning. “Now, hurry. Hannah is waiting 
for you.” 

I thanked her and hurried out. Hannah was waiting for me. Behind the 
garage. Already in a wolf skin. 

I gasped when I saw her. It was so strange seeing Hannah’s eyes peering out 
from above a fur-covered snout. 

“What took you so long?” she demanded. Her voice was muffled inside the 
furry wolf head. 

“Aunt Marta,” I replied. “She had to fix up my costume.” I narrowed my 
eyes at Hannah. “How does it feel in there?” 

“Very itchy,” she grumbled. “And hot. Here.” She handed me the other wolf 
skin. “Hurry. Put it on. The moon is already high. Your aunt and uncle will be 
looking for these soon.” 

I took the skin from her. My hand sank into the thick fur. I unfolded it and 
held it up. “Here goes,” I whispered. “I said I wanted to be a werewolf for 
Halloween. Guess I get my wish.” 

“Just hurry!” Hannah urged. “We don’t want them to catch us.” 

I pulled the wolf skin over my head. Down over the old clothes of my 
costume. It felt a little tight. Especially the furry legs. The face fit snugly over 
my face. 

“You’re right. It’s itchy,” I groaned. “It’s so tight. I’m not sure I can walk!” 

“It loosens up after a bit,” Hannah whispered. “Come on. Let’s get away 



from here.” 

She led the way across the backyard. Then we turned and trotted along the 
side of her house and down to the street. 

I heard voices in the next block. Kids shouting, “Trick-or-treat!” 

“We might be safer with other kids,” I suggested. “I mean, if we find a 
whole group and stick with it....” 

“Good idea,” Hannah replied. We crossed the street. 

It was already getting really hot inside my wolf skin. I could feel the sweat 
mnning down my forehead. 

We walked for several blocks. But most of the kids were younger than us. 
We didn’t find anyone good to hang out with. 

We turned a corner and walked several more blocks, into the next 
neighborhood. 

“Hey—look who’s there!” Hannah declared, bumping my arm. 

I followed her gaze and saw a mummy and a robot carrying trick-or-treat 
bags across someone’s front lawn. 

“It’s Sean and Arjun,” Hannah cried. 

“Let’s trick-or-treat with them!” I suggested. I began running across the 
grass, waving my paw at them. “Hey, guys! Hey!” 

They turned and stared at us. 

“Wait up!” I called through my fur-covered snout. 

They screamed. And dropped their bags. And took off, running full speed, 
shrieking for help. 

Hannah and I stopped at the edge of a driveway and watched them run. 
“Think maybe we scared them?” Hannah said, laughing. 

“Maybe a little,” I replied. 

We both laughed. 

But not for long. 

I heard heavy, running footsteps on the pavement behind us. 

I turned—and let out a gasp as my aunt and uncle came mnning furiously 
down the street. 

“There they are!” Uncle Colin cried, pointing at us. “Get them!” 



31 


I froze for a moment, horrified by the sight of my aunt and uncle running toward 
us so furiously, so desperately. 

“Don’t move!” Aunt Marta pleaded. “We need those skins!” 

My legs refused to budge. But then Hannah gave me a hard shove. And we 
both took off. 

We ran wildly, across lawns and empty lots. We cut behind someone’s 
house, then dove through an opening in their tall hedge. 

My aunt and uncle stayed close behind, running full speed, and calling out 
as they ran, “Give us our skins! Give us our skins!” 

Their breathless voices rang in my ears. Their words became an eerie chant. 

“Give us our skins! Give us our skins!” 

We must have run for blocks. It all became a dark blur to me. My heavy 
wolf paws thumped the ground. I struggled to keep my balance. Sweat poured 
down my face inside the heavy fur. 

Another turn. More dark backyards. And then the tilting, tangled trees of 
the woods rose up in front of us. 

Hannah and I dove into the woods, darting between the trees and tall weeds. 
And still my aunt and uncle came after us, chanting, chanting their desperate 
plea: 

“Give us our skins! Give us our skins!” 

We scrambled up a low hill lined with evergreens. Pinecones slid under my 
heavy paws and rolled down the hill. Hannah stumbled and dropped to her 
knees. She scrambled on all fours to the top. 

“Give us our skins! Give us our skins!” 

The cry grew shrill and breathless. 

And then—suddenly—everything seemed to stop. 

As if the whole world had stopped spinning. 

As if even the wind had stopped blowing on top of that little hill. 

I could feel the silence. 

Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta had stopped their chant. 

Panting, Hannah and I turned to face them. 



“The moon—” Hannah whispered breathlessly to me. She pointed. “The 
full moon, Alex. It’s so high. It must be at its peak.” 

And as she whispered those words, my aunt and uncle dropped to their 
knees. They tossed back their heads. As the white light of the moon washed over 
their faces, I saw their pain, their horror. 

They opened their mouths in long, mournful howls. 

Their howls became hideous screams. They tore at their hair with both 
hands. Shut their eyes. And screamed, screamed in agony. 

“Hannah—what have we done?” I cried. 



32 


Tugging at their hair, my aunt and uncle screamed. 

And then, they lowered their hands. And closed their mouths. And a calm 
seemed to sweep over them. 

As Hannah and I stared down at them, Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta helped 
each other to their feet. They brushed each other off. Smoothed down their hair. 

When they finally gazed up at us, I saw tears in their eyes. 

“Thank you,” they both cried. 

“Thank you for saving us!” Uncle Colin exclaimed. 

And then they rushed up the hill to hug us, hug us so joyfully. 

“You freed us from the curse!” Aunt Marta declared, tears running down 
her face. “The moon reached the highest point in the sky, and we didn’t 
transform. Colin and I are no longer werewolves!” 

“How can we ever thank you?” Uncle Colin cried. “You are both so 
wonderful. So brave.” 

“So hot!” I grumbled. “I can’t wait to get out of this itchy skin!” 

Everyone laughed. 

“Let’s go back to our house!” Aunt Marta cried. “We’ll have a real 
celebration!” 

The four of us hurried back to the house. We laughed and joked all the way. 

Uncle Colin and Aunt Marta made their way in through the kitchen door. 
“Homemade doughnuts!” Aunt Marta promised. “And big mugs of hot 
chocolate! How does that sound?” 

“Sounds great!” Hannah and I agreed. 

Hannah started to follow them into the house. But I held her back. 

“Let’s dump the skins next door,” I said. “No one will ever need them 
again. Let’s dump them in the abandoned house.” 

She hesitated. She seemed afraid to go back into that dark, empty house. 

But I went running over to the Marlings’ house. I couldn’t wait to take off 
the hot, smelly wolfskin. 

I pulled myself onto the window ledge, then lowered my legs into the open 
bedroom window. I stepped into the room. Pale moonlight washed over the bare 
floorboards. 



Hannah dropped into the room behind me. “Alex—?” she called. 

I started to tug off the heavy wolf skin. 

But something near the closet caught my eye. 

I stopped and walked over to it. 

A folded-up wolf skin lay on the floor against the wall. 

“Huh?” 

I let out a startled cry. And turned to Hannah. “How can there be a wolf 
skin in here?” I asked. “There were only two of them—right? You put one on, 
and you gave one to me.” 

Hannah stepped up beside me. Her eyes locked on mine. “I didn’t wear the 
one from this house, Alex,” she said softly. “I used my own. I just got it last 
night.” 

“Huh?” I cried. “I don’t get it.” 

“You will,” she whispered. 

She knocked me to the floor with her heavy forepaws, and sank her teeth 
into my chest. 




I LIVE IN YOUR 
BASEMENT! 


Goosebumps - 61 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“‘Don’t do that. You’ll poke your eye out.’ That’s what my mom says. No matter 
what I’m doing.” 

I told that to my friend Jeremy Goodman as we trotted to the playground 
behind our school. 

Jeremy laughed. “Your mom really says that, Marco?” 

I nodded and picked up the pace, keeping side by side with Jeremy as we 
crossed Fulton Street. 

“Last night, I had a lot of homework,” I told him. “I took out three new 
pencils and started to sharpen them. My mom came into the room and said, 
‘Don’t do that. You’ll poke your eye out.’” 

Jeremy laughed again. “What does she want you to use? Crayons?” 

I didn’t laugh. It wasn’t funny to me. I’m twelve years old, and my mom 
treats me like some kind of baby. 

She’s always warning me about everything I do. 

“Don’t climb that tree. You’ll break your neck.” 

“Don’t fill the bathtub so full. You’ll drown.” 

“Don’t eat so fast. You’ll choke.” 

She has a warning about everything! I keep expecting her to say, “Marco, 
don’t breathe so much. You’ll break your nose!” 

She drives me crazy. She constantly thinks up new ways I might hurt 
myself or do some kind of damage. 

“Sit up straight or your spine will curve.” 

“Don’t make ugly faces. Your face will freeze, and you’ll always look like 
that.” 

“Don’t pick your nose. Your finger will get stuck.” 

She’s also the world’s expert on germs. According to Mom, everything you 
touch or see will give you germs. 

“Don’t hug the dog. It has germs.” 

“Don’t take a bite of Jeremy’s candy bar. Germs.” 

“Don’t put your hands in your pockets. Germs.” 

Mom is always on guard duty. Always alert. Always ready to step in and 



warn me about something. 

It makes my life a little hard. 

She doesn’t like for me to play softball with my friends. She’s sure I’ll 
break my leg. That’s if I’m lucky. If I’m unlucky, I’ll break every bone in my 
body. 

Do you know how hard it would be to break every bone in your body? 

My mom is the only person in the world who thinks people do it every day 
of the week! 

That’s why I had to sneak out of the house to go play softball at the 
playground with Jeremy and some other kids from my school. 

It was a warm, sunny day. The green lawns along Fulton Street all glowed 
in the sunlight. The air smelled fresh and sweet. 

It felt so good to be jogging down the sidewalk with Jeremy, looking 
forward to playing a game, laughing and spending time with friends. 

School had let out early because of some kind of teachers’ meeting. I 
hurried home and dropped off my backpack. 

The house was empty, except for Tyler, my dog. He’s part cocker spaniel, 
part we-don’t-know-what. 

Tyler was happy to see me. He licked my face. 

Mom doesn’t like it when I let Tyler lick my face. You know why. The 
terrible “G” word. 

Mom was out shopping or something. I guess she forgot that I’d be home 
early. 

Such a lucky break. I changed into a ragged pair of jeans and a T-shirt. 
Then I grabbed my baseball glove and hurried out to meet Jeremy before Mom 
returned home. 

“Marco, what would your mom do if she caught you playing softball?” 
Jeremy asked. 

“Warn me,” I replied. “She never punishes me or anything. She just warns 

me.” 

“My parents never warn me about anything,” Jeremy said. 

“That’s because you’re perfect!” I teased. 

Jeremy slugged me on the arm. 

Actually, I wasn’t teasing. Jeremy is perfect. He gets all A’s in school. He’s 
good at sports. He takes care of his little sister. He almost never gets in trouble. 

He doesn’t touch anything with germs. 



Perfect... 

We passed the bus stop and crossed Fairchild Avenue. Our school came into 
view. It’s a long, one-story building that stretches in a straight line for nearly a 
whole block. 

The walls of the school are painted bright yellow. As yellow as an egg yolk. 
Mom says they discuss the color a lot at Parent Association meetings. No one 
likes it. 

Jeremy and I jogged through the teachers’ parking lot to the playground 
behind the building. The softball diamond stood behind the row of swings. 

A bunch of kids were already there. I recognized Gwynnie Evans and Leo 
Murphy. 

The Franklin twins were arguing as usual, standing nose to nose, screaming 
at each other. They’re weird guys. You can never put them on the same team. 

“You can start now!” Jeremy shouted. “The all-stars are here!” 

He took off across the grass. Leo and some of the other kids called out to 
us. 

I slowed to a walk, breathing hard. Jeremy is a lot better athlete than I am. 

Gwynnie stood on the pitching mound, swinging two bats and talking to 
Lauren Blank. Gwynnie is always trying to prove that she’s better in sports than 
any of the boys. 

She’s big and strong. She’s at least half a foot taller than me, and she’s got 
much bigger shoulders. She’s always pushing kids around and acting tough. 

No one likes her. But we always want her on our team because she can hit 
the ball a mile. And if some kind of argument breaks out, Gwynnie always wins 
it because she can yell the loudest. 

“Let’s get started,” Jeremy declared. 

“Who’s choosing up sides?” I asked. “Who are the captains?” 

Leo pointed. “Gwynnie and Lauren.” 

I took off running to the pitcher’s mound. Gwynnie dropped one of the bats 
to the ground. She had the other one in her grip. 

I guess she didn’t see me. 

As I ran up to her, she pulled the bat back—and swung it with all her might. 

I saw the bat move. 

But I didn’t have time to duck or move out of the way. 

The bat made a loud THUNK as it slammed into the side of my head. 

At first, I didn’t feel a thing. 



The ground tilted up. 

But I still didn’t feel anything. 

Then the pain exploded in my head. 

Exploded... exploded... exploded. 

Everything flashed bright red. 

So bright, I had to shut my eyes. 

I heard myself shrieking. Neighing like a horse. A shrill wail I never heard 
before. 

And then the ground flew up to swallow me. 



2 


I woke up staring at the ceiling. 

A blue ceiling light—blue as the sky—blurred then sharpened, blurred then 
sharpened above me. 

Mom’s face floated into view. 

I blinked once. Twice. I knew I was home. 

Mom’s eyes were red and wet. She had her black hair pulled back tightly. 
But several strands had fallen loose and hung down her forehead. 

Her chin trembled. “Marco—?” 

I groaned. 

My head ached. Everything ached. 

I’ve done it, I thought. I’ve broken every bone in my body. 

“Marco—?” Mom repeated in a whisper. “Are you waking up, dear?” 

“Huh?” I groaned again. 

Something was sitting on my head. Weighing me down. 

Tyler? Why was the dog sitting on my head? 

My arms ached as I slowly raised my hands to my head. 

And felt a bandage. A heavy bandage. 

I lowered my hands. The room began to spin. I gripped the couch cushions, 
holding on for dear life. 

I stared up at the blue ceiling light until it came into focus. The den. I was 
lying on the soft leather couch in the den. 

Mom floated into view again, her chin still trembling. She pulled a blanket 
up nearly to my chin. “Marco? You’re awake?” she repeated. “How do you 
feel?” 

“Great,” I muttered. 

Talking made my throat hurt. 

She stared down at me. “Can you see me, dear? It’s me. Your mom.” 

“Yeah. I can see,” I whispered. 

She wiped one eye with a tissue. Then she stared at me some more. 

“I can see fine,” I told her. 

She patted my chest over the blanket. “That’s good, dear.” 



I groaned in reply. 

Please don’t say, I told you so! I thought. I crossed my fingers, even though 
it hurt to cross them. And I prayed. Please don’t say I told you so. 

Mom’s expression changed. She frowned at me. “I told you not to play 
baseball,” she said. 

“It wasn’t baseball,” I choked out. “It was soft-ball.” 

“I told you not to play,” Mom said sternly. “But you didn’t listen to me. 
And now you’ve cracked your head open like an eggshell.” 

“Huh?” I gasped. “Cracked it open? Mom, will I be okay?” 

She didn’t answer. 

“Will I?” I demanded. “Tell me the truth. What did the doctor say, Mom? 
Will I be okay?” 



3 


“Of course,” she replied. Her face floated over me for a second, then slid out of 
view. 

I didn’t like the way she said it. It sounded false. Too cheerful. 

“Tell me the truth,” I insisted. “Am I really going to be okay?” 

No answer. 

I lifted my head. Sharp pain shot down the back of my neck. 

Mom had vanished from the room. I could hear her putting plates away in 
the kitchen. 

I tried calling her. But my voice came out in a hoarse whisper. 

I lowered my head slowly to the couch cushion and shut my eyes. 

I guess I drifted off to sleep. The ringing phone woke me up. 

I blinked up at the blue ceiling light, forcing it to come into focus. The 
phone rang and rang. I waited for Mom to pick it up. But she didn’t answer it. 

Did she go out and leave me all alone? I wondered. She wouldn’t do that. 
Where is she? 

Groaning, I rolled onto my side and grabbed the phone off the coffee table. 
I raised it to my ear. 

“Owww! ” 

I banged it too hard against the bandage over my head. The side of my head 
throbbed with pain. 

“Hello?” I croaked. 

I heard breathing on the other end. And then a voice I didn’t recognize said, 
“I hope you’re okay, Marco.” 

“Who—who is this?” I stammered. I shut my eyes tight, trying to push 
away the pain of my throbbing head. 

“I hope you’re okay,” the voice repeated. A boy’s voice. “I don’t want 
anything bad to happen to you.” 

“Huh? You don’t?” I murmured. “Uh... thanks.” I kept my eyes shut. The 
pain pulsed at my temples. It was hard to hold the phone over the heavy 
bandage. 

“Who is this?” I demanded again. 



“I don’t want anything bad to happen to you,” the boy said again. “Because 
you’re going to take care of me from now on.” 

“Excuse me?” I choked out. “I don’t understand.” 

Silence at the other end. 

I took a deep breath. I decided to ask the question one more time. “Who is 
this?” 

“It’s me,” the voice replied. “Keith.” 

“Keith?” 

“Yes. Keith.” 

“I—I don’t know you,” I stammered. 

“You should,” the boy replied softly. “You should know me, Marco. I live 
in your basement.” 



4 


Did I hang up? Or did Keith hang up? 

I’m not sure. I felt very confused, very upset. 

Keith hadn’t called to be friendly. I knew he was trying to scare me. 

But, why? 

Was it actually a friend of mine? Someone from school playing a joke? It 
wasn’t a very funny joke. 

I stared at the ceiling, feeling groggy and weak. I don’t know how much 
time passed. 

I kept picturing Gwynnie standing on the pitcher’s mound. I saw her 
swinging two bats. Then one. I saw the bat whirling toward my head. 

“Ohhh.” I uttered a low moan and forced the picture from my mind. 

“How are you doing, Marco?” a voice whispered. 

I gazed up at Mom. She had brushed her hair and put on lipstick. She had 
changed into a bright green T-shirt and a dark skirt. 

“Feeling better?” she asked. “I brought you a bowl of cereal. You should try 
eating something. If you don’t eat, acid will burn a hole in your stomach.” 

“Mom—the phone,” I started groggily. “It rang and—” 

“Yes, I know,” she interrupted. “It was Jeremy. He wanted to know if he 
could come over to see you.” 

“Huh? Jeremy?” 

She nodded. “I told him you weren’t quite ready for visitors. I said he could 
probably come tomorrow.” 

“I didn’t mean that call,” I said. I pulled myself up onto my elbows. My 
head didn’t throb as badly. The room didn’t spin and tilt. 

I was starting to feel a little stronger. 

“I got another call,” I told her. “You didn’t pick up, so I answered it.” 

“But, Marco—” Mom started. 

“It was from a strange boy,” I continued. “It was a very weird call. He said 
his name was Keith. And he said he lived in our basement.” 

Mom’s expression changed. She lowered her eyes. “Oh, wow,” she 
murmured. 



“It was kind of a frightening call,” I said. “Why would somebody call and 
say they lived in our basement?” 

Mom placed a cool hand on my hot forehead. “I—I’m a little worried about 
you, Marco,” she said softly. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” 

“You have to take things slowly,” she replied. “You didn’t listen to my 
warnings. And you had a very bad hit on the head.” 

“But, Mom, that phone call I got—” 

Her chin quivered again. “You’re not thinking clearly, Marco,” she said. 

“Why? Why do you say that?” I demanded. 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “There’s no phone in this room,” she said. 



5 


I woke up early the next morning. I sat up, feeling alert. Refreshed. Before I 
even stood up, I knew I was a lot better. 

My head didn’t throb. My muscles didn’t ache. 

I took a long shower. The water felt so crisp and sharp on my skin. 

I was drying myself when I realized I no longer had the bandage on my 
head. I spotted it on the floor by my bed. I guessed it had fallen off during the 
night. 

Stepping up to the medicine chest mirror, I checked out the damage. Not 
too bad. I had an ugly purple bruise on my right temple. It had swelled up like a 
giant mosquito bite. 

But the rest of my head had its normal shape. 

I winked at myself. My eyes seemed sharp and clear. 

I let out a loud cheer. My throat didn’t hurt. I was so happy to be feeling 
strong again. 

I pulled on a pair of baggy jeans and a sweatshirt. And I hurried down to 
the kitchen for breakfast. 

“Don’t run in the kitchen like that,” Mom warned. “You’ll bang into the 
counter and break your kneecap.” 

Kneecap? 

That was a new one! 

“I’m starving!” I cried. I poured myself a big bowl of my favorite cereal 
combo—Frosted Flakes and Corn Pops, all mixed together. I grabbed a spoon 
and began gobbling hungrily. 

“Don’t eat cereal so fast,” Mom warned. “It’ll clog your stomach pipes.” 

I’d heard that one before. 

“Guess you’re feeling better,” Mom said. She smiled at me and squeezed 
my hand. 

I nodded. “I feel fine,” I told her. “What day is it?” 

“Saturday,” she replied. Her smile faded. “I’m glad you’re feeling better. 
But I want you to stay in today.” 

“You always want me to stay in,” I grumbled. 

“You’re still weak,” she said. “You might faint and hit your head on the 



sidewalk.” 

‘Til stay in,” I promised. 

A loud THUD THUD made me jump. “What was that?” I yelped. 

Mom stood up. She studied me. “It’s just someone knocking on the door,” 
she said. “See? You’re still not yourself, Marco.” 

“I said I won’t go out,” I groaned. 

Jeremy came into the kitchen. He stopped halfway across the room and 
stared at me. “Are you alive?” he asked. 

I pinched my arm. “Yeah,” I told him. 

“Don’t pinch yourself. You’ll make a bruise,” Mom warned. 

Jeremy didn’t come any closer. He stood in the middle of the kitchen and 
stared at me. 

“Why don’t you sit down while I finish my cereal?” I asked him. “It’s okay 
to come over here. You won’t catch what I’ve got.” 

“Did you eat breakfast?” Mom asked Jeremy. “Never go out on an empty 
stomach. Your whole system will stop working.” 

Jeremy walked slowly to the table. “I just keep picturing Gwynnie swinging 
that bat,” he said. He swallowed hard. “It was so horrible. I saw the whole 
thing.” 

He dropped into the chair next to me and sighed. “I thought she knocked 
your head off, Marco. I really did. I was sick. I thought I was going to heave up 
my lunch on the grass.” 

“Don’t talk about heaving at the breakfast table,” Mom scolded. She started 
for the door. “I have to leave for a short while, Marco. Remember your promise. 
Don’t go out.” 

“I remember,” I muttered. 

“And take it easy,” she instructed. “Just sit and talk. Don’t do anything else. 
You’ll pass out.” 

When she disappeared, Jeremy turned to me. “You really okay?” he asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I don’t feel bad at all.” I finished the last of the cereal and 
poured myself a glass of orange juice. “I feel a lot better than yesterday,” I 
declared. 

“Gwynnie called me last night,” Jeremy said. “She wanted to know how 
you were doing. She was really messed up. You know. About hitting you.” 

I snickered. “You mean she didn’t brag about what a great swing she has?” 

“No way!” Jeremy insisted. 



“Well, it wasn’t her fault,” I said. “I ran right into her bat. It was a real 
smooth move.” 

We talked about the accident for a while longer. Then I asked Jeremy if he 
wanted to feel the purple bump on the side of my head. 

“Hey—no way!” he cried, making a sick face. 

I knew that would gross him out. 

He helped me put away the breakfast stuff. “What do you want to do?” I 
asked him. 

“Your mom said you can’t go out,” Jeremy reminded me. 

“So we’ll stay in,” I replied. 

“Want to play pool?” he suggested. 

We have a pool table in our basement. It’s a regulation-size table, and there 
isn’t quite enough room for it. You have to tilt your pool cue up and play around 
the concrete beams. 

“Yeah. I’ll play you,” I agreed. He’s a much better pool player than I am. 
But sometimes I get lucky and beat him. 

I finished shoving the breakfast dishes into the dishwasher. Then I led the 
way to the basement door. 

I reached for the doorknob—then stopped. 

I live in your basement 

I remembered the boy’s voice on the phone. So flat and cold. 

You’re going to take care of me from now on.... I live in your basement. 

His words came back to me. They made me hesitate at the door. 

But I only imagined that call, I told myself. 

There was no boy. No voice. No Keith. 

I imagined it because I got hit on the head. 

Right? 

I pulled open the door. I gazed down the basement steps. 

Then, gripping the banister, I led the way down. 



6 


As soon as I reached the basement, I ran around turning on all the lights. Even in 
the laundry room. 

Jeremy picked up a pool cue and began to chalk the tip. “What is your 
problem, Marco?” he called. “Are we going to play or not?” 

“I like a lot of light,” I told him. 

I peeked behind the big stack of cartons near the furnace. Then I squeezed 
behind the furnace to see if anyone was living back there. 

Nothing but a tall mountain of dust. I was beginning to feel a little silly. 

Why would anyone be living in my basement? The whole idea was crazy. 

I trotted over to the pool table and picked out a cue. Then Jeremy and I 
began to play. 

He sank the three ball in a side pocket. On his next shot, balls clattered all 
over the table. But nothing dropped in. 

My turn. I had to squeeze between the table and a concrete pole and tilt the 
cue up toward the ceiling. Not an easy shot. 

I missed everything. 

“Did you ever play pool with Gwynnie?” Jeremy asked, moving around the 
table to find his best shot. 

“No. Never,” I told him. “Is she any good?” 

He snickered. “She plays pool the way she plays softball. She hits the balls 
so hard, she cracks them. A bunch of us were playing once at the Youth Center. 
Gwynnie sent a ball flying off the table, and it sailed out the window!” 

“Maybe she thinks she has to hit a home run!” I joked. 

We both laughed. Laughing made the side of my head hurt. 

Thinking about Gwynnie made my head hurt! 

Jeremy bounced the seven ball into the eight ball. The eight ball almost 
dropped into a corner pocket. “That was close!” He sighed. 

Maybe you don’t know the rules of pool. If the eight ball goes in, you lose. 

That’s the only way I ever beat Jeremy. 

“The Franklin twins were playing at the Youth Center too,” Jeremy 
continued. “And they got into a fight.” 



I rolled my eyes. “So what else is new?” 

“It was so dumb,” Jeremy said. “They were arguing over which is the six 
ball and which is the nine ball. They started fencing with their pool cues. And 
then they smeared blue chalk all over each other.” 

“Nice,” I murmured. I hit the twelve ball a solid shot, but it didn’t go in. 
“Why do you think the Franklin twins fight all the time?” I asked. 

Jeremy thought about it for a moment. “Because they’re twins,” he said 
finally. “Even they can’t tell each other apart. And so they have to prove they’re 
different from each other.” 

“That’s very deep,” I replied. I wanted to think about that. 

But a strange sound made me spin away from the table. 

A scratching sound. Very close. 

A scratch. Then a BUMP. 

“Did you hear that?” I whispered to Jeremy. 

He nodded. “Yes.” He pointed to the stairs. 

Another BUMP. 

We have a large pantry cabinet under the stairwell. The noises were coming 
from inside the cabinet. 

We both stared at the wooden cabinet door. 

Another BUMP. 

“There’s someone in there,” I muttered. “Someone trying to get out.” 

Jeremy narrowed his eyes at me. “Why would someone be hiding in your 
cabinet?” 

I made my way over to the cabinet door. “Who’s in there?” I called. 

No reply. 

A scraping sound. Someone right behind the door. 

“Who is it?” I repeated. 

No reply. 

I grabbed the cabinet door. Took a deep breath. Tugged it open. 

And screamed as a creature leaped out at me. 



7 


“A squirrel!” Jeremy cried. 

Yes. A fat gray squirrel jumped from the closet—onto my leg. 

It fell off. Hit the floor, its eyes wild, its legs thrashing the air. Sliding on 
the linoleum, it took off across the basement. 

“How did a squirrel get in there?” Jeremy asked. 

I was still too startled to reply. I watched the squirrel try to climb one of the 
concrete beams. It slipped off, turned, and ran toward the laundry room. 

I finally found my voice. “We’ve got to get it out of here!” I shrieked. 
“Mom freaks out when animals get in the house. You know. They have germs.” 

The squirrel was staring back at us from the laundry room door. “Get him!” 
I cried. 

Jeremy and I chased after the squirrel. 

It darted around the laundry room. Behind the dryer. Nowhere to run now. 

“I’ve got it!” I shrieked. I stretched out my hands and made a wild dive. 

But the squirrel scampered right over my back. Dodged past Jeremy. And 
raced back into the main room. 

My head started to throb. I was breathing hard. 

I darted out of the laundry room. The squirrel ran under the pool table, its 
bushy tail standing straight up. 

I checked to make sure both basement windows were open. Then I grabbed 
an old fishing net from against the wall. 

The frightened animal stopped running and turned back to Jeremy and me. 
Its whole body trembled. Its little black eyes pleaded with us. 

“Here, squirrel! Here, squirrel!” I called to it, waving the net. “We’re not 
going to hurt you.” 

I swiped the net at it. Missed. 

The squirrel took off. Jeremy dove for it. He missed too. 

As we watched helplessly, the squirrel jumped onto the pile of cartons by 
the furnace. Climbed to the top. And leaped out of the basement window. 

“Yesssss!” Jeremy and I both cheered and slapped each other a high five. 

“Victory over all squirrels!” Jeremy boomed in his deepest voice. 



I didn’t know what that was supposed to mean. But we both burst out 
laughing. 

Mom’s voice from the top of the stairs cut our laughter short. “What’s going 
on down there?” she called. 

“Nothing,” I replied quickly. “Just playing pool.” 

“Marco—be careful with those pool sticks,” she shouted. “You’ll poke your 
eye out.” 

Jeremy and I played a few games. He beat me easily each time. But we had fun. 
And we didn’t poke out any eyes. 

Mom made us sandwiches and chicken noodle soup for lunch. She kept 
warning us to blow on the soup or else we’d burn the skin off our tongues. 

Yuck. 

After lunch, I started to feel tired. So Jeremy went home. 

“Go up to your room and watch TV or take a nap,” Mom advised. “I 
warned you not to overdo it.” 

“I didn’t overdo it,” I grumbled. But I went upstairs and took a long nap. 

Too long. Late that night, I couldn’t get to sleep. I felt wide awake. 

I read for a while. Then I did a little channel surfing, but I didn’t find 
anything good to watch. 

I glanced at my bed table clock. A few minutes after midnight. 

My stomach growled. Maybe I need a midnight snack, I decided. 

I clicked on the hall light and made my way downstairs to the kitchen. But I 
didn’t get as far as the kitchen. To my surprise, the basement door stood open. 

“Weird,” I muttered. Mom always keeps that door closed. She’s a nut about 
keeping doors shut. 

I walked over to the door. And started to push it closed. 

But I stopped when I heard a scraping sound down there. 

Footsteps? 

I poked my head into the opening and peered down into the darkness. “Who 
—who’s down there?” I called. 

I heard more scraping steps. 

And then a boy’s voice called up. “It’s me. Keith. Don’t you remember? I 
live down here.” 



8 


“No! You don’t exist!” 

The words burst from my mouth. My cry sounded shrill and frightened. 

I heard more footsteps on the linoleum floor. Then the basement light 
flashed on. 

And I stared down at—Mom! 

“Huh?” I gasped. 

“Marco—why aren’t you asleep?” she demanded, frowning up at me, hands 
at her waist. 

“Uh... because I’m awake,” I replied. “Mom, what are you doing down 
there?” 

“Laundry,” she said. “I couldn’t sleep, either. So I decided to do laundry. 
You know. It always relaxes me.” 

“Mom—come upstairs. Now!” I cried. “There’s someone down there with 
you!” 

She squinted up at me. Tilted her head, examining me with her eyes. “What 
do you mean?” she asked softly. 

“Hurry!” I insisted. “That boy. He talked to me again. He’s down there, 
Mom. He says he lives down there.” 

“Marco, I’m worried about you,” Mom said calmly. She started up the 
stairs, her eyes locked on me. “You’re not making any sense, dear.” 

“But I am\” I insisted. “I heard him, Mom. He talked to me—just now! 
He’s down there! Really!” 

“It’s too late to call Dr. Bailey,” she fretted. She stepped up beside me and 
pressed her palm against my forehead. “No fever.” 

“Mom—I’m not imagining it!” I wailed. 

“Tomorrow is Sunday,” she said. “I want you to rest all day. Then we’ll see 
if you are ready to go back to school on Monday.” 

“But, Mom—” I started. “I—” 

The boy’s voice interrupted me from downstairs. “Marco,” he called, “listen 
to your mother.” 

“Mom—did you hear that?” I shrieked. 



9 


“Hear what?” Mom demanded, eyeing me sharply. 

“The boy—” I started. But I didn’t finish. Someone bumped me hard from 
behind. 

I stumbled toward the basement—and nearly fell down the stairs. 

“Whoa—!” I let out a cry and spun around. 

Tyler wagged his tail at me. He shuffled forward and bumped me again. He 
does that all the time. Just to be friendly, I guess. 

“You stupid dog!” I shrieked. “You nearly killed me!” 

Tyler stopped wagging. He stared up at me with his big brown eyes. 

“Don’t yell at the dog,” Mom scolded. “You’re really not doing well, 
Marco. Let’s tuck you in, okay? You are definitely overtired.” 

“But, Mom—” 

I decided not to argue. What was the point? 

I glanced down into the basement, hoping to catch a glimpse of the boy. But 
I saw only darkness. 

Where was he? Where was he hiding? 

I knew I hadn’t imagined him. I knew I had really heard him. 

So what was going on? 

Mom let me go to school on Monday. The way things turned out, I wished she 
had kept me home. 

I felt fine. The bump on my head was still purple. But it had shrunk to about 
the size of a quarter. 

When I went into the school building, everyone ran up to me. The Franklin 
twins were arguing about which backpack was whose. They are always getting 
their stuff mixed up. 

But when they saw me, they dropped both backpacks and hurried over. 

“Marco—how are you?” 

“Are you okay?” 

“Let me see your bruise.” 

“Wow. That’s real ugly!” 



“Does it hurt?” 

“I can’t believe you’re back!” 

“You must have a really hard head!” 

Everyone laughed and joked and made a big fuss over me. I enjoyed being 
the center of attention for once. Usually, no one pays any attention to me at all! 

I was feeling pretty good about things. 

Until the bell rang and Miss Mosely asked me to come up to the front of the 
class. “I think we’re all glad to see you in school today, Marco,” she said. 

Jeremy started clapping, and then everyone else clapped. Even Gwynnie, 
who sits right in front of the teacher. 

“Since we’ve been studying health care,” Miss Mosely continued, “I want 
you to tell everyone what it was like in the hospital.” 

Hospital? 

I stared at her. My brain did a flip-flop. My mouth dropped open. 

Had I been in the hospital? 

“What was your room like in the hospital?” Miss Mosely asked. “What 
kind of doctor examined you? What did the doctor look for?” 

I blinked. Thinking hard. Trying to remember. 

“Tell us everything,” Miss Mosely insisted. She crossed her arms and stared 
at me through her round, black-framed eyeglasses, waiting for me to talk. 

“I—I don’t remember,” I stammered. 

One of the Franklin twins laughed. A few kids whispered to each other. 

“Well, what do you remember about the hospital, Marco?” Miss Mosely 
asked, speaking slowly and clearly as if talking to a three-year-old. 

“I don’t remember anything. Nothing at all!” I blurted out. 

Gwynnie leaned forward so that she practically hung over Miss Mosely’s 
desk. “Maybe I should hit him on the head again,” she said. “You know. To help 
bring back his memory.” 

A few kids laughed. 

Miss Mosely frowned at Gwynnie. “That’s a terrible thing to say. It’s not a 
joke. Memory loss from a hit on the head can be very serious.” 

Gwynnie shrugged her big shoulders. “Just kidding,” she muttered. “Can’t 
anyone take a joke?” 

Meanwhile, I was still standing up there in front of everyone. Feeling 
awkward and confused. 

Why didn’t I remember the hospital? The first thing I remembered, I was 



lying on the den couch at home. 

Miss Mosely motioned for me to sit down. “We’re glad you’re okay, 
Marco,” she said. “And don’t worry about the things you forgot. Your memory 
will come back.” 

Up till then, I didn’t know it had left. I dropped into my seat, feeling weak 
and shaken. 

The rest of the day was a blur. 

I was still thinking hard that afternoon as I started walking home. Still 
trying to remember something about the hospital. 

I saw some kids starting a softball game on the playground diamond. 
Thinking about softball gave me a chill. 

I started to turn away—but someone caught my eye. 

Gwynnie! 

She came chasing after me across the grass. She carried a baseball bat, 
raised high over her head. 

She had a grim, determined look on her face. 

“Marco! Hey—Marco!” she called, waving the bat menacingly. 

She’s going to hit me again, I knew. 

But, why? 

“No—!” I let out a cry. And gaped at her in horror. 

“Gwynnie—please don’t!” 



10 


“Marco! Hey—Marco!” 

Gwynnie had a fierce look on her face. She swung the bat over her head 
again. 

I froze. My legs refused to move. 

With a loud cry, I finally managed to turn away. And I started to run. 

I hurtled across the street without checking for traffic. What is her problem? 
Is she crazy? I asked myself. Why is she doing this? 

Did Gwynnie really think she could bring back my memory with a smack 
on the head? 

I turned the corner, breathing hard, the backpack bouncing on my shoulders. 
Glancing back, I saw her on the other side of the street. Two school buses 
rumbled by, forcing her to wait. 

I lowered my head, shifted the backpack, and forced myself to pick up 
speed. 

By the time I reached home, my heart pounded so hard it hurt. And the 
bump on my head throbbed with pain. 

I dove into the house and slammed the door behind me. Then I pressed my 
back against the door and struggled to catch my breath. 

“Marco? Is that you?” Mom called from the den. 

Still gasping for breath, I tried to choke out an answer. But only a low 
croaking sound escaped my throat. 

Mom appeared in the living room doorway. She narrowed her eyes, 
studying me. “How was your first day back?” 

“Okay,” I managed to murmur. 

“You didn’t overdo it—did you?” she demanded. “Why do you look so 
pale? Did you take gym, Marco? I gave you a note to excuse you from gym— 
remember?” 

“We... didn’t... have... gym,” I gasped. 

Mom was always giving me notes to excuse me from gym. She was sure I’d 
poke my eye out or break every bone in my body in gym class. 

“Why are you so out of breath?” she asked, crossing the room tome. She 
placed a hand on my forehead. “You’re sweating. Didn’t I warn you about 



sweating? It’ll give you a cold.” 

“Really. I’m fine,” I said, starting to feel normal again. I slipped out from 
under her hand and peeked out the front window. 

Had Gwynnie chased me all the way home? 

I didn’t see her out there. 

“I felt okay today,” I told her. “No problem.” 

I wanted to ask her about the hospital. But I didn’t want her to know that I’d 
lost my memory. It would only cause a lot more trouble. 

So I didn’t say anything about it. Instead, I made my way to the stairs. “I’ve 
got a lot of homework to catch up on,” I told her. “I’ll be up in my room.” 

“Do you want a snack?” she called after me. “You shouldn’t do homework 
on an empty stomach.” 

“No thanks,” I replied. I climbed the stairs and hurried down the hall. 

I stopped in the doorway. 

And let out a startled cry when I saw a boy sitting on my bed. 

He looked about my age. He had wavy black hair around a thin, serious 
face. He gazed at me with round dark eyes. Sad eyes. He wore black denim jeans 
and a loose-fitting plaid flannel shirt. 

He didn’t appear at all surprised to see me. 

“Who—who are you?” I stammered. 

“It’s me. Keith,” he replied softly. “I told you. I live in your basement.” 



11 


I didn’t say anything. My mind went blank. I stared at the boy from out in the 
hall. 

My knees suddenly felt weak and trembly. I grabbed the sides of the 
doorframe to keep from falling. 

A cruel smile spread slowly over Keith’s face. His dark eyes flashed. 
“Come in. I thought we should get to know each other,” he said. “Since you are 
going to take care of me from now on.” 

I swallowed hard. 

I stood there frozen for a long moment. 

And then I screamed, “No! No way!” 

I pulled the bedroom door shut. It had a key and a lock, which we never 

use. 

My hand trembled as I grabbed the key and turned it. 

I tested the door. 

Yes! I had locked Keith in. He was trapped inside my bedroom. 

Now Mom would see him. Now she would have to believe me. 

“Mom!” I shouted. “Come up here! Hurry!” 

No reply. 

Had she gone out? 

No. She was probably in the kitchen starting dinner. 

I tested the door again, making sure it was locked tight. Then I plunged 
down the stairs, calling to her. 

“Marco? What on earth—?” She came running from the kitchen, carrying 
an onion and a knife. 

“Come upstairs! Hurry!” I cried. “I’ve caught him! He’s in my room!” 
“Caught who?” She eyed me suspiciously. “Who is in your room?” 

“The boy!” I shouted. I grabbed her by the arm and started to pull her up 
the stairs. “Keith. The boy who lives in the basement.” 

“Marco—wait.” Mom tugged her arm free. “Please don’t start that again. 
You know how worried I get when you start talking crazy.” 

“I’m not crazy!” I wailed. 



I grabbed her arm again. The onion fell out of her hand and bounced across 
the floor. 

“Stop pulling me. I’m coming,” she snapped. “You’re acting very strange, 
Marco. I don’t like this one bit. Dr. Bailey said that if you started acting in a 
weird manner, I should call him immediately and—” 

“Mom—just don’t talk!” I begged. “Don’t say another word. Please— 
follow me. He’s in my room. I locked him in. You’ll see him with your own 
eyes. Then you’ll know I’m not crazy.” 

She grumbled, but she followed me up the stairs. 

I stopped outside my room and reached for the key. My heart pounded so 
hard, I thought my chest might explode. My head started to throb. 

I turned the key. And pushed open my bedroom door. 

“There!” I declared, pointing to my bed. 



12 


Mom and I both let out cries of surprise. 

Tyler sat staring at us from the bed. 

He panted loudly. His tongue hung out. When he saw us, his tail started to 

wag. 

Mom placed a firm hand on my shoulder. “Go lie down on that bed, 
Marco,” she ordered. “I’m calling the doctor right now.” 

“No. Wait,” I insisted. I ducked out from under her grip. 

I dropped to the floor and peered under the bed. “Keith—where are you?” 
Not under there. 

I climbed to my feet, ran across the room, and tugged open the closet door. 
“Keith—?” 

No. 

I spun around. Where else could he be hiding? 

Tyler leaped off the bed and bounded from the room. 

“That poor dog doesn’t like being locked up,” Mom fretted. 

“I didn’t lock him in here!” I shouted. “I locked Keith in.” 

She tsk-tsked. “You’re going to be fine, Marco. Really you are.” Her voice 
trembled. 

It was easy to figure out what she really meant: That hit on the head 
scrambled your brains, Marco. You’re acting like a total nutcase! 

I took a deep breath and tried to explain again. “Mom, I don’t know how 
Tyler got in here. But I do know there was a boy in my room. And I locked him 
in.” 

“I’m going to phone Dr. Bailey right now,” Mom replied. “But I don’t want 
you to worry. Everything will be okay.” She hurried from the room. 

Everything will be okay. Mom’s words lingered in my mind. 

As usual, she was wrong. 

Dr. Bailey’s waiting room was all blue and green. A huge fish tank against one 
wall bubbled quietly. The blue and green chairs, blue and green carpet, and blue 
and green walls made me feel as if I were in a fish tank too! 



Mom and I checked in with the woman behind the desk. Then we sat down 
on a hard plastic couch against the wall. 

On the plastic chairs across from us, a girl sat with her father. The girl was 
about seven or eight. Every few seconds, she hiccupped loudly. Her whole body 
shook with each hiccup. 

“She’s been doing that for two weeks,” her father explained, shaking his 
head. 

“Dad,” the girl snapped, “it’s only been HIC ten days.” 

“Has she been eating eggs?” Mom asked the father. “Too many eggs can 
give you the hiccups.” 

The man stared at Mom. 

“It’s the egg whites,” Mom continued. “They’re too slippery. You can’t 
digest them.” 

The man stared at Mom some more. Finally he murmured, “I don’t think it 
was eggs.” 

The girl hiccupped and shook. 

The fish tank bubbled. 

I felt as if I were swimming with the fish. Floating through thick blue water. 

But I can’t breathe underwater! I told myself. 

The girl hiccupped again. 

The sound was starting to drive me crazy. I wanted to go home. I turned to 
Mom, who had picked up a magazine and was thumbing through it. “Can we 
go?” I pleaded. “I’m okay.” 

She shook her head. “Dr. Bailey just wants to look at you,” she replied, 
keeping her eyes on the magazine. “A hit on the head is serious. You only have 
one head, you know.” 

The girl hiccupped. 

“Try holding your breath,” her father instructed her. 

“I’ve been holding it for ten days!” she grumbled. 

Several hundred hiccups later, the nurse led Mom and me into Dr. Bailey’s 
office. As I stepped inside, I saw that his office was blue and green too. 

The doctor was a cheerful, chubby man. He had a round face, a shiny, bald 
head, and he wore a bow tie under his green lab coat. The bow tie bobbed up and 
down on his Adam’s apple when he talked. 

He came around the desk to shake hands with me. Then he used his thumbs 
to pull up my eyelids so that he could examine my eyes. 



“Hmmm... looks okay,” he murmured. 

He ran his thumb gently over the bump on my head. “Does that hurt, 
Marco?” 

“A little,” I confessed. 

“It’s healing nicely,” he told Mom. “Very nicely indeed. Now what seems to 
be the problem, Marco?” 

I hesitated. Should I tell him about Keith? If I do, will he think I’m crazy 
too? Will he send me back to the hospital or something? 

Should I tell him I don’t remember anything about being in the hospital? 

Dr. Bailey gazed at me patiently, waiting for me to begin. 

Finally, I decided, okay, I’ll tell him everything. He’s a doctor, after all. He 
will understand. 

So I told him I couldn’t remember the hospital. And then I told him about 
the boy who said he lived in our basement. And I told him about actually seeing 
Keith. And locking him in my room. And finding Tyler. 

The whole story. I told him everything. It felt good to tell it. 

Dr. Bailey sat behind his desk and kept his eyes locked on me the whole 
time. His bow tie twitched on his Adam’s apple. But he didn’t say a word until I 
finished. 

Then he leaned forward and sighed. “It doesn’t sound too bad,” he said. 

“Oh, thank goodness!” Mom exclaimed. 

Dr. Bailey scratched his bald head. “But do you know what I would like to 
do just to make sure everything is okay?” he asked. 

“What?” Mom and I said together. 

“I’d like to remove your brain and examine it under a microscope,” Dr. 
Bailey said. 



13 


“Huh?” I gasped. I nearly fell out of my chair. 

“It isn’t a difficult operation,” Dr. Bailey said, flashing me a calm, 
reassuring smile. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Once I crack the skull open, the brain slides out easily,” the doctor 
explained. 

“I—I don’t think so,” I protested. 

He shrugged. His bow tie hopped up and down on his throat. “I can’t really 
see the brain clearly unless I remove it.” 

My heart was pounding. My hands were suddenly icy cold. I studied Dr. 
Bailey’s round face. “You’re joking—right?” I demanded. “This is some kind of 
a sick joke?” 

Mom nudged me in the side. “Listen to the doctor,” she said. “The doctor 
knows what he’s talking about. If he says the brain comes out, it comes out.” 

Dr. Bailey leaned farther across the desk. His face loomed so close, I could 
see tiny beads of sweat on his forehead. “It won’t hurt much,” he said. 

I turned to Mom. “You’re not going to let him do it—are you?” I demanded. 

She patted my hand. “Whatever the doctor thinks is best. Dr. Bailey is a 
very good doctor, Marco. Very experienced.” 

The doctor nodded. “I’ve removed a lot of brains,” he told me. “I don’t 
mean to brag, but—” 

“Can Mom and I talk about this?” I asked, stalling for time. “Can we come 
back tomorrow or something? I feel fine. Really, I do. In fact, I feel excellent !” 

Dr. Bailey scratched his bald head again. “That’s a good idea,” he replied to 
my mom. “Why don’t you call me tomorrow? We can schedule the de-braining 
then.” 

The what? 

The de-braining? 

I jumped up from my chair and darted for the door. I didn’t wait for Mom. I 
didn’t say good-bye. I just ran. 

Mom followed me into the waiting room. “Marco, that was really rude of 
you!” she scolded. 



“I’d like to keep my brain,” I replied angrily, and kept walking to the office 
door. As we passed, I said good-bye to the girl with hiccups. 

“Hie Hie Hie,” she said. I think her problem was getting worse! 

“Doctors know what’s best,” Mom said, hurrying across the parking lot 
after me. 

I climbed into the car and crossed my arms over my chest. “I’m perfectly 
okay, Mom,” I told her through gritted teeth. “My brain is totally normal. I’ll 
never see that boy Keith again. He’s gone forever. I know he is. I’ll never see or 
hear him again.” 

But of course I was wrong. 



14 


Mom said not to worry about losing my brain. She said we’d wait a few days 
before deciding what to do. 

That made me feel a lot better. 

That night, I was writing a homework assignment on my computer. Miss 
Mosely had given us a creative writing assignment. We had to write a story from 
someone else’s point of view. 

I decided to write about a typical day from Tyler’s point of view. It was fun 
to try to get inside the mind of a dog. 

A dog has an IQ of ten. That’s what I learned on one of those science shows 
on TV. A ten IQ isn’t very smart. You can’t figure too many things out with an 
IQ of ten. That’s why Tyler always looks confused and surprised. 

That’s why he can spend ten minutes barking at a plastic trash bag. 

I leaned over my keyboard, typing away. I was enjoying myself. I don’t 
usually like to write papers, but this was a fun assignment. 

When the phone rang, I groaned and kept typing. I waited for Mom to pick 
it up downstairs. But she didn’t. 

I stood up and walked over to the phone on my bed table. A chill froze the 
back of my neck. 

Was it him? Was it Keith? 

I remembered the first time he had called. The day I’d been hit on the head. 

My hand grabbed the phone, but I didn’t pick it up. I couldn’t decide what 
to do. I didn’t want to talk to him again. I wanted him to disappear. 

On the sixth ring, I lifted the phone to my ear. “Hello?” 

“Hi, Marco. It’s me.” 

Another chill ran down the back of my neck. Then I recognized the voice. 
“Jeremy?” 

“Yeah. Hi. What’s up?” 

“Jeremy?” I repeated. 

“Yeah. You okay, Marco? I just wondered how you were doing.” 

“Oh. I’m okay,” I told him. I sat down on the edge of my bed. “I’m feeling 
all right. I’m working on the creative writing assignment.” 

“Yeah. Me too,” Jeremy replied. “Whose point of view did you choose?” 



“My dog’s,” I replied. 

He laughed. “I’m writing about my cat!” 

“You think everyone in class chose an animal?” I asked. “That would be 
funny.” 

We talked and laughed about stuff for a while. Talking to Jeremy cheered 
me up. I was starting to feel really normal again. 

“I’d better get back to work,” I said after a few more minutes. I set down 
the phone and crossed the room to my computer. 

I started to sit down—but stopped when I saw the monitor screen. 

My writing—my words—had all disappeared. 

A face stared out at me from the screen. 

Keith’s face! 

“No—!” I let out a cry. 

And a powerful arm slid around my neck from behind. And began to 
tighten around my throat. 



15 


“Unnnnh.” 

I struggled to breathe. 

The arm tightened around me. 

I tossed up my hands. Spun around hard. 

And gaped at Gwynnie. 

She stepped back, grinning. 

“Huh?” I choked out. “What’s the big idea?” 

Her grin grew wider. “Did I scare you?” 

“No,” I replied, still breathing hard. “I’m used to people sneaking in and 
strangling me from behind.” 

She laughed. “I wanted to surprise you. Guess I don’t know my own 
strength.” 

“Sure you do,” I muttered, rubbing my neck. “What are you doing here, 
Gwynnie?” 

She dropped down heavily onto my desk chair. “Actually, I came to 
apologize.” 

“Huh?” My mouth dropped open. 

“Really,” she insisted. She used both hands to brush her thick black hair 
back over her broad shoulders. “I felt bad about my joke in class today. You 
know. About hitting you on the head again.” 

“Yes. I remember,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

“It was really stupid,” Gwynnie continued. “I don’t know why I said it. So I 
wanted to say I’m sorry.” 

“Gwynnie, you chased me after school—” I protested. “You came after me 
with a baseball bat and—” 

“No!” she cried, jumping up from the chair. “I was running after you to 
apologize.” 

“Then why were you carrying the bat?” I demanded. 

“I was up next,” she explained. “That’s all.” Her expression changed. “Did 
you really think I was going to hit you on the head again?” 

“Well...” I didn’t want to tell her that was exactly what I thought. She’d tell 



everyone in school that I was afraid of her. Everyone would have a really good 
laugh about what a ’fraidy cat Marco is. How I ran away from someone who 
only wanted to apologize. 

Gwynnie locked her green eyes on me. “You know, I feel bad about 
everything, Marco,” she said softly. “I keep picturing you the other afternoon 
when I swung the bat and hit you. I keep picturing the way you dropped to your 
knees, screaming.” 

She sighed. “I—I was so scared. You just lay there on the grass. You didn’t 
move. I—I thought...” She glanced away. 

“I’m okay,” I told her. “I’m fine now. Really.” 

“Well, I never got a chance to say I’m sorry,” Gwynnie replied. “So here I 
am.” She raised her eyes to me. “You’re really okay?” 

I nodded. Then I remembered Keith. 

“I have one big problem,” I told Gwynnie. “This boy. He keeps following 
me. Calling me. Showing up in my room.” 

Her green eyes grew wide with surprise. “A boy? In your room?” 

I nodded. “Look. His face—it’s on the computer screen!” I pointed. “I was 
working on the writing assignment. I answered the phone. And when I came 
back, my writing was gone. And his face stared out at me on the screen. Look!” 

Gwynnie gazed at the monitor. When she turned back to me, her expression 
was confused. 

“Marco,” she said, staring hard at me. “Your computer isn’t turned on!” 



16 


“No way!” I cried. 

I turned to the monitor. Black. The screen was black. 

No face. No words. 

Gwynnie walked across the room and leaned against the window ledge. She 
crossed her arms in front of her. “That was a joke—right?” she demanded. 

I couldn’t take my eyes from the screen. Had I imagined the face? No! I 
saw it there. 

I’m not crazy! I told myself. 

“He did it!” I told Gwynnie, my voice shaking. “Keith. His name is Keith. 
He—he’s playing tricks on me. He’s haunting me!” 

Gwynnie eyed me suspiciously. “Marco, when did you see him for the first 
time? After the hit on the head—right?” 

“I don’t care!” I cried. “He’s here, Gwynnie. I saw him. He sat right there. 
Right on my bed. He says he lives in my basement.” 

Gwynnie shook her head. Her dark hair tumbled over her face again. “Calm 
down, Marco. Stop and think about it.” 

“I can describe him,” I insisted breathlessly. “He has black hair. Same color 
as yours. And dark circles around his eyes. And a real serious expression.” 

Gwynnie tsk-tsked. “Just think about it,” she repeated. “Why would he be 
here? Why would he be in your basement?” 

“He told me I have to take care of him,” I replied heatedly. “He said I have 
to take care of him for the rest of my life!” 

Gwynnie narrowed her eyes at me. She didn’t say anything. I could see her 
studying me. 

And I could almost read her thoughts: 

Poor Marco. 

He’s totally lost it. 

An idea flashed into my mind. 

“Gwynnie, he’s down there,” I said softly. “Keith is down in the basement. I 
know he is.” 

She still didn’t reply. 



“Come down with me?” I asked. “Please?” 

She bit her bottom lip. 

Gwynnie is a lot braver than I am, I told myself. She’s bigger than I am. 
And she’s meaner and stronger. 

If we find Keith down in the basement, I’ll feel a lot safer if Gwynnie is 
around. 

“This is dumb,” she said finally. “I should get home. I haven’t even started 
the creative writing assignment.” She headed for the door. 

“No. Wait!” I pleaded, hurrying after her. “I’m not crazy, Gwynnie. Come 
down to the basement with me so I can prove it.” 

She stopped at the doorway. “Well...” 

“Please!” I begged again. “He’s down there. We’ll find him. I know we 
will.” And then I added, “You’re not afraid—are you?” 

“Of course not!” Gwynnie snapped. She groaned and tossed up her hands. 
“Okay. Okay. Let’s go down to your basement.” 

I knew that would get her. 

“Come on. Hurry,” Gwynnie urged. “Show me your little friend. Then I’ve 
got to get home.” 

I led the way to the basement stairs. Then I pulled open the door and 
clicked on the light. 

I peered down the wooden stairway. Nothing to see down there. 

But I felt a chill of fear, anyway. 

“You go first,” I told Gwynnie. 



17 


Our sneakers thudded on the wooden steps. The air grew colder as we made our 
way down. Mom is always complaining that we have no heat in the basement. 

Gwynnie led the way, moving quickly. My hand gripping the banister, I 
hurried to stay close to her. 

At the bottom of the stairs, I stopped short to keep from bumping into her. 
We both glanced around the main room. 

A ceiling light had gone out. Half the room was hidden in deep shadows. I 
heard the DRIP DRIP DRIP of a faucet, coming from the laundry room at the far 
wall. 

The sound of heavy breathing made me gasp. Then I realized the sound 
came from Gwynnie. 

Gwynnie took a few steps into the room. Then she cupped her hands around 
her mouth and shouted, “Hey, boy—are you down here?” 

I crept up beside her. And listened. 

No reply. 

“Keith?” Gwynnie shouted. “Keith? Where are you?” 

I shuddered. He was down here. I knew he was. Why wasn’t Gwynnie 
afraid? 

A sudden sound made me jump. My eyes moved up to the ceiling. Gusts of 
wind were rattling the basement windows. 

I stopped to listen to another strange sound. A mouse? 

No. Just Gwynnie’s sneakers squeaking over the linoleum floor. 

We moved deeper into the room. I stepped up to the pool table. I peered 
underneath. 

No one under there. 

Gwynnie pulled open the pantry door beneath the stairwell. She clicked on 
the light and searched the shelves. 

She closed the door and turned to me. “I’m starting to feel a little silly, 
Marco.” 

“He’s down here,” I insisted, my voice just above a whisper. “He says he 
lives down here. I know he’s here.” 

Gwynnie sighed. “I’ll give it a few more minutes. Then I’m out of here.” 



“Let’s search over here,” I said. “By the furnace.” 

We made our way across the room. The furnace stood in the dark part of the 
room. It rose up in front of us like some kind of gigantic creature. 

“Keith?” Gwynnie called. “Keith—where are you hiding? Come out, come 
out—wherever you are!” 

Her voice echoed off the dark walls. Outside, the wind howled, rattling the 
windows. 

“Hey—wait up!” I whispered. I didn’t want Gwynnie to get too far ahead of 
me. 

She pulled open an old clothes cabinet. “Keith—are you in there?” 

The smell of mothballs floated out. Gwynnie slammed the closet door shut. 

“Keith? Don’t be shy, Keith!” she called. 

We peered behind the furnace. No one hiding back there. 

“The laundry room is the only room we haven’t searched,” I told her. 

“I’ll bet he’s hiding in the dryer,” Gwynnie teased. 

I knew she wasn’t taking me seriously. But I didn’t care. I was glad to have 
her down there with me. I never could have searched the basement on my own. 

I followed her toward the laundry room against the wall. We were halfway 
across the floor when she stopped suddenly. 

“Oh, wow!” she exclaimed. “There he is! I see him!” 



18 


“Huh?” My heart leaped. I let out a gasp and spun around. 

And stared at my mom’s old clothing dummy. 

Gwynnie laughed. “Ooops. A little mistake!” 

My whole body was shaking. “You’re not funny!” I managed to choke out. 
I tried to punch her. But she dodged away from me, laughing hard. 

“Marco, give up,” she said, shaking her head. “I know you’re trying to 
scare me with this phony Keith story. But it just isn’t scary enough. I know 
there’s no one down here.” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. “You mean you didn’t believe me for one 
second?” 

“Of course not,” Gwynnie replied. “Who would believe a story like that?” 

“And you thought I was just trying to pay you back for hitting me on the 
head?” I asked shrilly. 

She nodded. “You want to go to school tomorrow and tell everyone how 
you scared me,” Gwynnie accused. 

“No. You’re wrong. Listen to me—” I pleaded. 

“No way,” she interrupted. She turned and headed toward the stairs. 

“Gwynnie, listen—!” I begged, chasing after her. 

She stopped at the bottom of the stairs and turned back to me. “You can’t 
scare me, Marco,” she said. Her eyes caught the light from the stairwell. A 
strange smile spread over her face. 

“You can’t scare me,” she repeated. “I’ll show you why.” 

“Excuse me?” I didn’t understand. “If you’d only listen to me...” 

“I’ll show you something,” Gwynnie said. 

She placed both hands on the wooden banister. Then she opened her mouth. 
Wide. 

Wider. 

Her mouth stretched open. Wider... wider. 

Until the rest of her face disappeared behind her open mouth. 

Her tongue plopped heavily over her chin. 

And then something pink began to pour out. 



Something pink and glistening wet rolled out from the gaping mouth. 

More... more... swelling as it poured out. 

At first, I thought she had a big gob of bubblegum in there. But as the pink 
gunk flowed up from her throat, the mouth pulled open even further, and her 
head disappeared behind it. 

And I realized... 

I realized... 

I realized I wasn’t staring at bubblegum. 

I was staring at Gwynnie’s insides! 

I saw yellow organs clinging to the glistening pink flesh. Something long 
and gray twisted out of her mouth, wrapped around itself. 

Dark purple lungs slid over the drooping tongue. 

And then her red heart—so red, so startlingly red—plopped from her open 
mouth, throbbing, throbbing steadily, throbbing wetly. 

“Ohhhhh.” I uttered a long moan of horror. 

But I couldn’t turn away. Couldn’t take my eyes off Gwynnie as her insides 
poured from her mouth. 

I stood there. Stood there and stared in amazement and cold horror at the 
pulsing, quivering organs clinging to the oozing pink flesh. 

Stood there watching Gwynnie—until she had turned completely inside out. 

And then I opened my mouth in an endless scream. 



19 


My scream rose like a shrill siren. 

Gwynnie—inside out Gwynnie—quivered in front of me, quivered and 
pulsed. 

The sound of my scream seemed to make her quiver harder, quiver like a 
mound of pink and yellow Jell-O. 

And as I screamed, a white light flashed around us. So bright, I closed my 
eyes and still saw it. 

Such a bright white, blinding white. 

My scream cut through the whiteness. Gwynnie vanished inside it. The 
basement vanished too. 

I sank into the white, into the shrill wail of my own cry. 

And when I opened my eyes, I stared up at a white ceiling. A white ceiling 
light. White curtains over a half-open window, revealing gray clouds. 

My throat ached. I cut off my scream. 

I blinked into the new whiteness. 

And Mom’s face floated into view. 

“Marco? Are you waking up?” she asked softly. 

Her lipstick was smeared. Her eyes were bloodshot. I saw dried tear tracks 
on her pale cheeks. 

“Waking up?” I choked out, my voice hoarse and sleep-clogged. 

“You’re going to be okay,” Mom said, patting my chest under the blanket. 

I glanced around. I was lying on my back in a bed. In a small room. A 
hospital room. 

“You had a bad hit on the head, Marco,” Mom said. “The ambulance rushed 
you here, to the hospital. You’ve been out for nearly an hour.” 

“Huh? I’ve been out?” I whispered. “You mean asleep?” 

Mom nodded. 

“But I was down in the basement,” I protested. “Gwynnie and I were 
searching for the boy.” 

Mom’s expression turned fearful. Her chin trembled. “Boy? What boy?” 

“Keith,” I told her. “The boy who says he lives in our basement.” 



“Marco, you were dreaming,” Mom said. 

“It—it was so frightening,” I sighed. 

“From your hit on the head,” Mom explained. “You were out cold. It must 
have given you terrible nightmares.” 

“You mean I haven’t been home?” I cried. “I haven’t been in school?” 

Mom eyed me carefully, studying me. “No. You’ve been in this hospital bed 
ever since you were hit.” 

She shook her head. “I warned you, Marco. I told you not to play baseball. I 
knew something like this would happen.” 

She kept on talking, but I didn’t listen. 

I was thinking hard. And feeling so happy. 

It had all been a dream. Keith living in my basement... Dr. Bailey wanting 
to remove my brain... Gwynnie turning inside out... 

All a wild, frightening dream. 

It never happened. None of it. 

And now it was over. And I was going to be okay. 

I felt so great, I wanted to leap up from the bed. I wanted to shout and cheer 
and jump for joy. 

But then I gazed over Mom’s shoulder to the door. 

And I saw... Gwynnie! 

“Noooo!” I uttered a horrified cry. 

Gwynnie was real. Gwynnie was alive! And she was coming for me, 
hurrying across the room to get me, an evil gleam in her eyes! 



20 


I let out a scream. I struggled to climb up. But the sheet and blanket were tucked 
in too tight. 

I couldn’t move. 

“Mom—stop her!” I pleaded. “Please—don’t let her hurt me!” 

Gwynnie stepped up to the side of the bed, her eyes glowing. Mom put a 
hand on Gwynnie’s shoulder. “Marco, what’s wrong?” Mom demanded. “Why 
are you afraid of your own sister?” 

Sister? 

“No—!” I protested. “She swung the bat. She hit my head. And then—” 

“I did not!” Gwynnie whined. “I wasn’t the one who hit you! Are you 
crazy?” 

Mom tugged Gwynnie back a few steps. “Gwynnie didn’t do it, Marco,” 
Mom said softly. “Gwynnie wasn’t at the playground. Don’t you remember?” 

“That bump on his head messed up his memory,” Gwynnie said. She stared 
hard at me, shaking her head. “Do you remember anything, Marco?” 

“Of course,” I murmured. 

But I suddenly felt dizzy. As if my brain were spinning inside my head. I 
felt so confused. I didn’t know what I remembered and what I’d forgotten. 

“How much is four and four?” Gwynnie demanded. 

“Gwynnie, give Marco a break,” Mom scolded. She turned back to me. 
“You do remember your little sister now—right, Marco?” 

Little sister? 

Gwynnie was twice my size. 

“Yes, I remember her,” I replied. I rolled my eyes. “How could I forget her? 
I guess the horrible dream mixed everything up,” I explained. “In my dream, she 
wasn’t my sister. And she swung the bat that—” 

“Your friend Jeremy swung the bat!” Gwynnie declared. “Don’t you 
remember anything?” 

“Jeremy?” I cried. 

“It will take Marco a little while,” Mom told Gwynnie. “But Dr. Bailey says 
he will be perfectly okay.” 

“But he’ll be stupid,” Gwynnie insisted. 



Mom gasped. “Gwynnie! Why do you say that?” 

Gwynnie giggled. “Because he was stupid before he got hit on the head!” 

I let out a growl. I wanted to jump up and punch Gwynnie. But the sheet 
was too tight. And I felt too weak. 

My head throbbed. Pieces of my dream kept flashing back into my mind. 

Once again, I saw Gwynnie down in the basement, turning inside out. I saw 
her pink and yellow insides quivering like a pile of Jell-O. 

And I saw Keith, sitting on my bed. So calm and relaxed, as if the bedroom 
was his! 

“Mom,” I said, trying to force away the strange, confusing pictures. “There 
is no boy named Keith—is there? I mean, I don’t know a boy named Keith. He 
doesn’t live in our basement—does he?” 

“Of course he does!” Gwynnie cried. 



21 


“Huh?” I stared at her in horror. 

Gwynnie grinned. “The basement is filled with people!” she exclaimed. 
“Dozens of them. They call themselves The Basement Club. They stay down 
there until we all leave. And then they come upstairs and use our stuff.” 

She laughed, as if she had just made up the funniest joke. 

“Stop teasing your brother,” Mom scolded her. “Why are you picking on 
him, Gwynnie? Can’t you see he’s had a rough time?” 

“Sorry,” Gwynnie said to me, still grinning. 

“She’s just nervous,” Mom explained. “She was very worried about you, 
Marco. Really.” 

I settled back on the pillow. “The dream... it seemed so real,” I murmured. 

“Get some rest,” Mom replied tenderly. “You need time to get over this.” 

She waved Gwynnie to the door. “Your sister and I will go out to the 
waiting room and let you get some sleep.” 

“But—when can I go home?” I demanded. 

“Soon,” Mom promised. “As soon as Dr. Bailey checks you out. He said if 
you’re okay, you can come home right away.” 

“Great!” I cried. 

I really wanted to get out of that hospital bed. For one thing, the tight sheets 
were strangling me. And I knew I wouldn’t have such weird, disturbing dreams 
in my own bed. 

“See you later, Marco,” Gwynnie called as she stepped out the door. She 
instantly poked her head back in. “One last question. How much is four and 
four?” 

“Gwynnie—!” Mom shoved Gwynnie down the hall. 

“Nine!” I called after them. 

Gwynnie laughed. “Hey—you got it right!” 

I stared at the doorway for a long time after they left. Then I stared at the 
ceiling for a while, counting the white squares. 

My head throbbed. But I started to feel calmer. The room stopped spinning. 

I shut my eyes, and I guess I fell asleep. 



The next thing I knew, I felt someone gently tapping my shoulder. I opened 
my eyes to find a young doctor in a white lab coat staring down at me. 

“Marco? Are you awake?” he asked softly. Tm Dr. Bailey.” 

He didn’t look anything like the Dr. Bailey in my dream. He had wavy 
blond hair and bright blue eyes. He was young and tanned. He looked like an 
actor—a TV doctor—not a doctor in real life. 

“How are you feeling?” he asked, his voice low and whispery. “A little 
dizzy? Do you have a headache?” 

“A little,” I replied. 

“That’s normal,” he said. “Let me just check you out, Marco. Bet you’re 
ready to go home.” 

“I’m ready,” I declared. 

“Well, let’s see...” Dr. Bailey said, studying my eyes. “Your eyes look nice 
and clear. That’s a very good sign. Open your mouth, please.” 

I opened my mouth. 

The doctor reached in with his right hand. He grabbed my tongue. And 
started to pull it. 

“Hey—!” I tried to protest. But I couldn’t speak. 

His fingers tightened their grip on my tongue. And he pulled harder. 

Stop! You’re hurting me! What are you doing? 

That’s what I wanted to shout. 

But all I could get out was a muffled, “Haaaaaah?” 

Dr. Bailey tugged hard on my tongue. It slid out of my mouth, as long as a 
hot dog. 

I struggled to squirm away. But he held my chest down with one hand while 
he pulled my tongue with the other. 

Pulled... pulled... 

My tongue was a yard long. It drooped down the side of the bed. 

Dr. Bailey reached deeper into my mouth and pulled. 

Pulled out more tongue. More... 

Yard after yard. My tongue curled on the floor, wet and pink. 

I tossed my head back and struggled to breathe. 

As the doctor pulled... pulled more tongue from my open mouth. 

More tongue. More... 

My tongue piled up like an endless wet snake on the floor beside the bed. 

Humming to himself, Dr. Bailey continued to pull. 



It’s a dream, I told myself. Another frightening nightmare. 

I shut my eyes tight and willed myself to wake up, to lift myself from the 
dream. 

Wake up, Marco! Wake up! Wake up! 

But when I opened my eyes, the doctor still hunched beside me, pulling out 
my tongue. Pulling... pulling... 

It wasn’t a dream. 



22 


And then I woke up. 

And stared up at the white squares on the ceiling. 

I pulled myself onto my elbows. Sweat poured down my forehead. My head 
throbbed. 

“Dr. Bailey—?” I choked out. 

Gone. 

Blinking away my confusion, I glanced around the room. The white 
curtains fluttered over the half-open window. A bed against the far wall stood 
empty. 

All alone. 

I was all alone in the hospital room. 

I glanced down at the floor, expecting to see a pink coiled pile of my 
tongue. 

No. The floor was clean. I moved my tongue against my teeth. My normal¬ 
sized tongue. 

I uttered a long, relieved sigh. 

I’m okay, I thought. And I’m awake. I’m finally awake. 

No more disgusting nightmares. 

I heard heavy footsteps in the hall. I turned to the door in time to see a giant 
enter the room! 

The man smiled at me and rubbed his stubbly black beard. He had to be at 
least seven feet tall! He ducked his head as he stepped into the room. He had 
bushy black hair and thick black eyebrows that looked like caterpillars floating 
over his eyeglasses. 

His white lab coat hung loosely over his long body. A stethoscope bobbed 
against his broad chest as he walked. 

“Feeling a little better, Marco?” he asked. “I’m Dr. Bailey.” 

“Uh... are you the real Dr. Bailey?” I blurted out. 

He furrowed his bushy eyebrows. “What do you mean?” 

“Well...” I started. “The other Dr. Bailey... I mean... the Dr. Bailey in my 
dream...” 



He sat down on the edge of the bed. The mattress sank under his weight. He 
studied me with his eyes for a long moment. “Yes, yes. I’m a little troubled by 
these dreams of yours,” he said finally. 

He placed the end of the stethoscope on my chest and listened for a few 
seconds. “Heartbeat is completely normal,” he reported. 

He frowned. “Your mother and your sister are down in the hospital 
cafeteria. They’ll be up in a minute. They told me about your dreams,” he said 
quietly. “Your mom said you were a little confused by them. And frightened.” 

I nodded. “They were scary. And they seemed so real. The colors were so 
real. And...” I didn’t know what else to say. 

Dr. Bailey nodded. “I want to keep you here one more night, Marco,” he 
said, tucking the stethoscope under his lab coat. “Your X rays are okay. I 
couldn’t find any skull damage. The skin is bruised. But your head should heal 
up nicely.” 

“That’s great!” I interrupted. 

He nodded again. “Yes. But I’m a little troubled by all these strange dreams 
you’ve been having.” 

“So I have to stay here one more night?” I asked, disappointed. 

He climbed to his feet. Standing so close to me, he appeared to be a mile 

high! 

“Yes. One more night,” he replied, scribbling some notes on a clipboard. 
“I’ll check back with you in the morning. I’m pretty sure you will be able to 
leave then.” 

“Thank you, doctor,” I said in a tiny voice. I couldn’t hide how upset I felt. 
I really wanted to get out of that hospital. 

Dr. Bailey turned at the door. “Oh. I almost forgot,” he said, shaking his 
head. 

He pulled a square envelope from the pocket of his lab coat. “This came for 
you, Marco. A few minutes ago. While your mom and sister were downstairs. I 
almost forgot to deliver it.” 

He handed the envelope to me. “Get some rest,” he instructed. “I’ll do my 
best to get you out of here in the morning.” 

I thanked him again. I watched him duck his head as he made his way out 
into the hall. Then I examined the envelope. It said FOR MARCO on the 
outside, in a handwriting I didn’t recognize. 

I tore the envelope open and pulled out a note. The handwriting was small 



and very sloppy. I squinted hard at it and read: 


Dear Marco, 

Please hurry home. It’s time for you to start taking care of me. 
I’m waiting for you in the basement. 

Keith 



23 


A few minutes later, Mom and Gwynnie walked into the room. 

“We brought you a treat,” Gwynnie announced. She handed me a Milky 
Way bar, my favorite. 

“The nurse said you can eat whatever you want,” Mom said. She stepped up 
to the bed. “Was the doctor here? What did he say?” 

“He said I can probably go home in the morning,” I told her. “But, Mom 

_ ?” 

She narrowed her eyes at me. 

“Aren’t you going to eat the candy bar?” Gwynnie asked. 

“Later,” I replied sharply. 

“But it’s your favorite!” Gwynnie insisted. 

I knew what she wanted. She wanted a bite! 

I ignored her and gazed up at my mother. “Mom, Dr. Bailey gave me this 
letter. I don’t understand where it came from. It’s from that boy Keith. You 
know. The one in my dream. But that’s impossible. How—?” 

“What letter?” Mom interrupted. “Show it to me, Marco. Let me read it.” 

I reached for the letter. I had set it down on top of the blanket. 

No. Not there. 

I fumbled around the bed for it. 

No. 

I sat up and searched. Had it fallen on the floor? 

No. I didn’t see it there. 

I lifted the pillow and peered underneath. I tugged up the sheet and blanket 
and searched in the bed. 

“That’s so weird,” I murmured, shaking my head. “I had it in my hand. And 
I just set it down a minute ago.” 

Mom and Gwynnie exchanged glances. 

“No. Really!” I protested. 

“Maybe you should get back into bed,” Mom said. “I don’t think Dr. Bailey 
wants you walking around yet.” 

“But I’ve got to find that letter,” I insisted. 



“Your candy bar is melting,” Gwynnie said. 

“I don’t care about the stupid candy bar!” I screamed. “I got a letter from 
that boy who says he lives in our basement. And I want to prove it to you!” 

“Stop screaming, Marco,” Mom scolded. “You’re not thinking clearly. You 
need to rest.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

I turned to the door as Dr. Bailey poked his head in. “There you are!” he 
smiled. “Marco, are you out of bed already? Feeling stronger, huh?” 

“Dr. Bailey—tell them!” I cried. “You just brought me a letter—right? Tell 
them about the letter you brought me.” 

Dr. Bailey’s heavy black eyebrows rose up to his forehead. “Letter?” he 
asked. “What letter?” 



24 


That night, I tried not to fall asleep. I didn’t want any more nightmares. I didn’t 
want to see that boy Keith again. And I didn’t want to see my sister or anyone 
else opening their mouth and turning inside out. 

I kept my eyes wide open and stared at the gray sky out the window. And 
listened to the sounds of the hospital outside my room. 

But I fell asleep, anyway. And slept hard, without a single dream. 

When I awoke the next morning, Mom and Gwynnie were already in my 
room. Mom was packing my bag. 

I groaned and pulled myself up on one elbow. 

“Wake up, Sleeping Beauty,” Mom said cheerfully. “Dr. Bailey says you 
can go home this morning.” 

“Great!” I cried, my voice still hoarse from sleep. My head ached. My hand 
shot up to the bandage on the side of my head. 

“Don’t touch it,” Mom warned. “Your head will hurt for a while. But you’re 
okay.” 

I lowered my legs to the floor. I felt a little dizzy, but I stood up. 

“Dr. Bailey says you can go back to school as soon as you feel strong 
enough,” Mom said. 

“You’re so lucky!” Gwynnie exclaimed. “You missed all the tests—and a 
really bad-news assembly with bagpipe players.” 

“Get dressed,” Mom instructed. 

She didn’t have to tell me twice. I practically dove into my clothes. 

I was so happy to be going home, I wanted to sing and dance. I even 
hugged Gwynnie, for the first time in my life! “I’m sorry I dreamed you weren’t 
my sister,” I told her. 

“Yuck! Don’t hug me again,” Gwynnie replied, making a face. “You’re 
scaring me, Marco. You’d better start acting normal!” 

“Don’t worry,” I told her. “I’ll be normal. As soon as we get home, I’ll be 
as normal as a person can be! ” 

And I meant it. 

When we arrived home, I kissed the front door! I was so happy. I’d only 
been away for two days—but it seemed like two years! 



Mom got to work in the kitchen, making a homemade pizza. My favorite 
food. Mom puts lots of cheese on her pizza, and slices of hot dogs instead of 
pepperoni. 

She usually makes a pizza only on weekends. But today was a special day, a 
day to celebrate. 

Jeremy came over that afternoon. He apologized for hitting me in the head 
with the bat. 

I told him I didn’t even remember how it happened. 

“I’m not sure, either,” Jeremy replied. “You were standing behind me. I 
didn’t see you there at all. It was my turn at bat. I took a practice swing, and... 
BAM.” 

I struggled to remember. But it didn’t come back to me. 

“I’m really sorry, Marco,” Jeremy apologized again. 

“It wasn’t your fault,” I told him. “Don’t blame yourself.” 

“Maybe you knocked some sense into him!” Gwynnie replied from the den 

door. 

“Get out of here, Gwynnie!” I shouted. “What are you doing out there in the 
hall? Spying on us?” 

“Why would I spy on you?” she shot back. “You’re too boring!” 

I think Gwynnie has a cmsh on Jeremy. She’s always showing off when he 
comes over. 

“Mom rented some movies. We’re going to watch one now,” I called to her. 
“Are you going to watch it with us?” 

“Bor-ring!” she replied. But she plopped down on the arm of the couch, 
anyway. She crossed her arms in front of her chest. “What movie?” 

I pulled out an Indiana Jones movie I’d seen about ten times. “This one is 
cool,” I said. “Let’s watch it again.” 

Mom usually doesn’t let us watch movies in the middle of the afternoon. 
She says it’s bad for our eyes. 

But today was a special day. 

Homemade pizza and an Indiana Jones movie. It doesn’t get much better 
than that—right? 

The three of us sat in the den, eating slice after slice and watching the 
movie. Mom kept interrupting every few minutes to ask how I felt. 

Each time, I told her, “Fine.” 

But near the end of the movie, my head started to ache. I felt tired and a 



little shaky. 

I decided I’d better take a nap. I said good-bye to Jeremy and told him I’d 
call him later to go over our homework. Then I went up to my room. 

With a weary sigh, I sat down on the bed and pulled off my sneakers. Then 
I tugged down the covers. 

I started to climb into bed—but I suddenly had the strange feeling I was 
being watched. 

I turned away from the bed—and saw a boy leaning in the doorway. 

“Jeremy—?” I called out. 

No. As he stepped into the room, I recognized him. 

Keith. 



25 


I blinked once. 

Twice. 

Trying to make him disappear. 

But he crossed the room steadily, slowly, his dark eyes locked on me. 

“No way!” I cried, jumping to my feet. “You can’t be here! I dreamed you!” 
“I know,” he replied calmly. 

“I dreamed you!” I shouted. “And I’m awake now. I know I’m awake!” 

I pinched my arm. I scratched my cheek. 

“Ow!” It hurt. 

I was awake. Definitely awake. Not dreaming. 

“You can’t be here, Keith!” I repeated, my knees shaking, my whole body 
trembling. “No way you can be here. I’m awake now. And you don’t exist!” 

Keith stopped a few feet in front of me. “Sure, I do,” he replied. A smile 
spread over his solemn face. His dark eyes flashed. “I live in your basement, 
Marco. You know that. I told you that before.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “You are not real. You were only in my dreams!” 
Still smiling, Keith shook his head. “I’m real. Touch me.” He held out his 

arm. 

I hesitated. Then I reached out slowly... slowly... and squeezed his hand. 
“Hey—!” I jumped back. He was real! 

He laughed. “I told you.” 

“But in my dreams...” I started. 

“I used your dreams,” Keith explained. “I communicated with you in your 
dreams. I put myself in your dreams.” 

“Wh-why?” I stammered. 

His smile faded. “I wanted you to know that I was here. Waiting for you.” 

I didn’t like the cruel expression on his face. I didn’t like the way he was 
talking. 

He frightened me. 

He was trying to frighten me, I suddenly realized. 

My heart thudded in my chest. The side of my head began to throb. 



I took a step back. My legs hit the edge of my mattress. And I tumbled onto 
my back on the bed. 

Keith quickly stepped up in front of me, blocking my way, keeping me 
from climbing to my feet. 

“I’ve been waiting for you, Marco,” he repeated, his eyes hard and cold. 
“Because you’re going to take care of me. For the rest of your life.” 

“No—!” I shouted. 

I squirmed to the side and tried to jump up. 

But he was too fast for me. He moved quickly to block me. 

I stared up at him in fright. “No. No way!” I repeated shrilly. 

“You’re going to do whatever I say, Marco,” Keith insisted. He leaned over 
me, threatening me. 

“Go away! You don’t belong here! You’re frightening me!” I blurted out. 

“Get used to it!” he hissed. He leaned closer, so close his face was nearly 
touching mine. 

“Get used to it, Marco,” he said through clenched teeth. “You have no 
choice. I’m here. I’m real. I live in your basement. You have to take care of me 
now. You have to take care of everything I need.” 

“Nooooo!” I let out a horrified howl. 

And spun out from under him. 

I dropped to the floor on my knees. Then I scrambled past him and jumped 
to my feet. 

He whirled around, and I saw the anger in his dark eyes. He uttered a fierce 
growl. 

“Where are you going, Marco?” he demanded. 

He didn’t wait for an answer. 

He pounced. Like an attacking animal. 

I dodged away from him. Then I staggered backwards to my desk. 

If only I could get to the bedroom door. 

But he hunkered in the middle of the room now, panting like a wild 
creature, his eyes blazing. 

Blocking my path. 

With another low growl, he started toward me again. 

I searched the room. Searched for a way to escape. 

Searched for a weapon. Something to keep him away. 

“You can’t get away from me, Marco,” he cried. “You’re going to take care 



of me—forever!” 

He dove for me again. 

I leaned back against the desk. My hand tightened around a paperweight. A 
big, heavy stone owl that Gwynnie had given me for my last birthday. 

As Keith leaped, I swung my fist with the owl paperweight. 

And slammed Keith in the head with it. 

His dark eyes bulged in shock. 

His mouth dropped open, but no sound came out. 

He slumped to the floor. Collapsed in a heap. And didn’t move. 

“Keith—?” I called down in a tiny, quivery voice. “Keith?” 

He didn’t move. His eyes stared blankly up at the ceiling. 

“Keith—?” 

I let the heavy stone owl drop to the floor. And then I crouched down beside 
the still body. 

“Keith? Keith—?” 

“Oh, noooo,” I moaned. “What have I done?” 



26 


“Keith—?” 

I shook his shoulders. His head bounced on the carpet. His eyes stared up at 
me glassily. They didn’t blink. 

“Nooooo!” I let out another terrified moan. And jumped to my feet. 

The room spun around me. The floor tilted and bobbed. My head throbbed. 

I stumbled to the door. I planned to call Mom for help. 

But I turned back before I reached the doorway. 

And saw Keith start to change. 

“Huh?” I uttered a gasp. And stared down at him in shock and horror. 

His features—his eyes, his nose, his mouth—melted into the flesh of his 
face. Then his head slid into his neck. 

Like a turtle pulling into its shell, Keith’s head disappeared into his 
shoulders. His arms and legs slid into the trunk of his body. 

His clothes fell away. 

The skin on his body glimmered and turned milky, like the skin of a snail or 
a slug. 

As I gaped in shock, the body began to wriggle across the carpet. It flopped 
wetly, heavily toward me. 

I gasped as I saw the thick trail of yellow slime it left on the carpet behind 
it. 

And then, before I could force my trembling legs to move, the spongy, wet 
creature rose up. 

Stretched... 

And wrapped itself around my waist. 

“Unnnnnh.” I let out a sick groan of disgust. Its sour aroma shot up to my 
nostrils, choking me. Its sticky wet flesh tightened around me. 

I opened my mouth to scream for help. 

But it choked off my air. 

The odor... so foul and heavy. Wave after wave of it washed over me like 
some kind of poison gas. 

I tried to kick the creature. 



But my sneakers sank into the soft, gooey slime. 

I punched with both fists. And tried butting it with my head. 

My punches made wet SQUISH SQUISH sounds as my hands disappeared 
into the spongy body. 

It was like battling a slimy, sticky sponge. 

I tried wrestling it. Bending it back. Back... 

But the foul-smelling goo stretched. 

Stretched over me. Over my face. 

So warm and sticky. Pulsing. 

It wrapped around my head. 

Covered my face. Covered my nose. 

The warm, sticky slime slid up my nostrils. 

I—I can’t breathe! I realized. 

I’m going to suffocate inside this thing! 



27 


I knew I didn’t have much time to free myself. With a burst of strength, I swung 
my head back. 

But the warm goo moved with me. Pressed tighter against my face. I could 
feel the sticky slime climbing up my nose, into my mouth. 

I had to get help. But how? 

I stumbled forward. Could I walk? Could I push the heaving, spongy 
creature with me? 

If I could get downstairs... 

My heart pounding, I forced myself forward. 

Butting against the heavy blob, pushing, digging my knees into its flesh as I 
struggled to move. 

Yes! I took a step. Then another. 

Was I through the bedroom door? 

I stared through the creature’s milky flesh. Stared right through its thick 
body. 

The house was a shadowy blur on the other side. 

I couldn’t breathe. My chest began to burn. I couldn’t hold my breath much 
longer. 

I had to keep going! 

Pushing, butting it, forcing my legs to take another step... another step... I 
made my way down the hall with the creature over me. 

Yes. Yes. Every step taking me closer to help. 

Yes... 

And then suddenly my feet lifted off the floor. I tumbled forward. 

Falling! I was falling down the stairs. 

The sticky creature bounced beneath me, cushioning me like a foam rubber 
pillow. 

Down... all the way down the stairs. 

We bounced hard together at the bottom. 

My head jerked free from the sticky goo. 

I gasped in a mouthful of air. So cool and sweet. My lungs about to 



explode. 

I sucked in another long breath. 

And then the slime covered my face again. 

I tried to roll free. But it stuck to the front of my body, wrapping itself 
tightly around me again. 

I kicked off from the wall. Bounced forward. 

Through the hall. Into the kitchen. 

Mom—where are you? My desperate question. 

Mom—are you home? Don’t you hear me? 

The creature clung to my face, to my chest. Its foul odor swept over me. A 
wave of dizziness made me slump to my knees. 

No! 

I forced myself up, carrying the weight of the spongy wet creature. 

Across the kitchen. Peering through its glassy body. 

Up to the kitchen counter. 

And slammed it into the sharp counter edge. 

I backed up—and pushed forward again. As hard as I could. 

SLAM! 

I drove the slimy creature into the edge of the counter. 

Again. Again. 

Pushing with all my strength. Then backing up and shooting forward again. 
SLAM! SLAM! 

Its body made a sharp squishy sound with each blow. 

But it clung to me tightly, clung to my face, shutting off my air. Clung to 
me until I could feel my strength fade away. 

One more try. One more slam into the counter. 

I shot forward as hard as I could. 

I heard a loud SPLAlAAT. 

And to my shock, the spongy warm goo fell off my face. 

Dropped from my chest. Dropped to the floor with a heavy PLOP. 

Gasping, sucking in air, panting so hard, my chest ached, I stared down. 

And saw two of the milky slime creatures. 

I had cut it in two. 

The two halves throbbed wetly on the kitchen linoleum. They bobbed 
helplessly like fat insects on their backs. 



“Mom —” I choked out. In only a whisper. 

“Mom... ” No sound. I couldn’t force out a sound. 

I reached my fingers into my throat—and pulled out a thick chunk of slimy 
goo. Gagging, I heaved it into the sink. 

“Mom—!” 

Where was she? 

I heard a voice from somewhere in the house. From the den? 

“Mom?” 

Was she talking on the phone? 

Couldn’t she hear me battering the slime creature against the counter? 
Couldn’t she hear me calling to her? 

“Mom—?” 

I staggered toward the door. 

But I took only a step. 

Before I could move farther, I felt something tighten around the legs of my 
jeans. 

“Ohhhh!” I lowered my gaze—and saw both halves of the spongy slime 
creature wrapping around me. 

I kicked out one leg. Then the other. But they clung tightly. And stretched. 
Two of them now. Spreading their sticky, warm bodies up my jeans, up the 
front of my shirt. 

I grabbed at them with both hands. And pulled. 

But my hands slid off their shimmering wet flesh. 

“Mom—! Gwynnie—! Somebody—help!” 

They swept over my face. Two of them. Two of them now. 

So heavy. 

I fell to my knees. Then sank onto my back. 

So heavy... the two of them were weighing me down. 

As I thrashed and slashed at them, squirming and kicking, they melted. 
Melted back into one. 

And spread around me. Pressing me inside. 

Until I was trapped inside. 

No air left... no air. 

And then, staring helplessly through the thick slime, I saw something move 
across the kitchen. 



Someone moving quickly. A blur of color. 

Mom? 

Was she in time? 

Could she pull me out of this disgusting creature? 

I gazed up at her from inside the thick, milky body. 

Hurry, Mom. 

I can’t breathe. 

Don’t you see me here, trapped inside this goo? 

Hurry. 

Staring hard at the blur of color, I saw her run up to the creature. Saw her 
stare down, hands raised to the sides of her face. 

Pull me out, Mom! I urged silently. 

Pull me out — now! I pleaded. 

But, no. 

She just stood there. 

Stood there and watched as my last bit of breath escaped my lungs. 



28 


“Get up, Marco,” Mom ordered. She lowered her hands and pressed them 
against her waist. 

“Get up, Marco,” she repeated sternly. “What are you doing on the floor?” 
“Huh?” I gasped. “Mom—help! I’m trapped inside this thing! I can’t 
breathe!” 

She stared down at me, frowning and shaking her head. “Marco, this really 
isn’t the time for dumb games. Will you please get up off the floor?” 

Games ? 

“Don’t you see?” I cried. “Keith’s head disappeared, and he turned into a 
big hunk of slime. I tried to get away, but he swallowed me and—” 

She turned away from me and walked to the sink. I heard the water start to 

mn. 

“Mom—?” 

“I’m starting to worry about you, Marco,” Mom said in a low, steady voice. 
“You’re not making any sense. Now, get up. I don’t want you rolling on the floor 
like a baby!” 

I sat up and gazed around. 

“Hey—!” I let out a startled cry. 

No slime creature. 

I rubbed the floor with both hands. The floor was perfectly dry. 

I’m having another dream, I told myself. 

The glob of slime wasn’t real. Our wrestling match down the stairs didn’t 
happen. The whole thing was another disgusting dream. 

I’m not sitting on the floor in the kitchen. I’m asleep in my bed, dreaming 

this. 

And now I’m going to wake up and end it. 

Wake up! 

Wake up, Marco! I ordered myself. 

I climbed to my feet. Mom was at the sink, drinking a tall glass of water. 
Wake up, Marco! 

If this was a dream, why couldn’t I escape from it? 



I turned—and slammed my forehead into a cabinet. 

“Owww!” The pain exploded in my head, shot down my neck, my back. 

“I’m not dreaming,” I murmured out loud. 

Mom turned from the sink. “What did you say?” 

“I’m not dreaming,” I repeated, feeling dazed. 

“At least you are standing up,” Mom replied. She studied me. “Does your 
head hurt, Marco?” 

Yes. It hurt because I slammed it into a cabinet. 

But I said, “No. I’m fine, Mom.” 

And then I ran out of the kitchen. I had to get out of there. I had to think. I 
had to be alone and figure this out. 

“Marco—?” Mom called after me. 

But I didn’t turn back. I ran up the stairs and into my room. And I slammed 
the bedroom door behind me. 

“Marco, take it easy,” a voice said. 

I gasped and raised my eyes to the bed. Keith sat cross-legged on the 
blanket, the pillow between his hands. 

“Sit down,” he said, motioning to my desk chair. “Take a deep breath. 
Relax. We’re going to spend a long time together. The rest of your life.” 



29 


“Am I dreaming?” I asked in a tiny voice. 

Keith didn’t reply. He pointed to the chair. “Sit down,” he ordered. 

I glanced at the door. I thought about escaping. 

But I suddenly felt so tired, so totally weak and weary. 

My legs started to give way. My whole body trembled. 

“I’m sooooo tired,” I moaned. I turned back to Keith. “You win,” I 
murmured. “You’ve beaten me.” 

He smiled and pointed again to the chair. 

I slumped into it with a long sigh. “I can’t fight you,” I told him wearily. “I 
don’t know if I’m dreaming or awake. And I don’t have the strength to find out.” 

His smile grew wider. A victory smile, I guess. His dark eyes flashed. 

“You win,” I repeated sadly. “I’ll do whatever you want.” 

He jumped to his feet and crossed the room. Then he patted me on the 
shoulder, as if I were his puppy dog. “Smart boy,” he said. 

He stood in front of me and crossed his arms. His grin was frozen on his 
face. “I knew you’d see it my way,” he said. “Because you are a very smart boy, 
Marco.” 

I lowered my head. I couldn’t stand seeing that sick grin on his face. 

“I know you will take very good care of me,” Keith continued. “I know you 
will do whatever I tell you to. For as long as you live.” 

He suddenly spun away and started to the door. 

“Where are you going?” I demanded weakly. 

“I’m going down to the basement,” he replied. “Where I live. And do you 
know what I’m going to do?” 

“No,” I choked out. 

“Guess,” he demanded. 

“I can’t guess,” I snapped. “Give me a break.” 

“I’m going down to the basement and make a list of all the things you can 
do for me right away,” Keith said. “You wait here, Marco. When I finish my list, 
I will come back and we can go over it together.” 

“Right,” I muttered under my breath. I rolled my eyes. 



Was he serious about this? Did he really expect me to be his slave— 
forever? 

He stopped at the door and turned back to me. 

“Before I go, there’s just one thing I want to show you,” he said. 

He took a few steps back into the room. Then he opened his mouth wide. 

Shiny pink stuff poured out of his mouth. For a second, I thought he was 
blowing a bubblegum bubble. 

But I quickly realized what was happening. 

His glistening, wet insides poured out of his mouth. Yellow organs clung to 
the pink flesh. His purple heart plopped out from between his teeth, pulsing 
inside a thick web of blue ropelike veins. 

I stared in horror, watching him turn inside out. 

Then I started to scream. 

And Keith opened his mouth—teeth on the outside—and he screamed too. 



30 


I opened my eyes and blinked. My eyes were dry and caked. My mouth felt as 
dry as cotton. 

I must have been sleeping a long time, I told myself. 

Still lying fiat, I stretched my arms out. The muscles ached. 

My head ached. 

With a groan, I lifted my head off the pillow. Then I raised myself up onto 
both elbows. 

“Whoa...” I murmured. The basement slowly came into focus. I felt so 
dizzy... dizzy and weak. 

“Keith—you’re awake!” 

I heard Mom’s voice. And then she popped into view. 

I opened my mouth to greet her, but only coughed. I cleared my throat. 

“You’re finally awake, Keith,” Mom said. “I’ve been waiting for so long.” 

I shook my head hard, trying to shake away my confusion. I glanced 
around, struggling to focus my eyes. 

Yes. Here I was. Safe and sound in the basement, where Mom and I live. 

But what had happened to me? Why had I been asleep for so long? 

Strange pictures floated through my mind. 

“Mom—” I choked out. “Mom, I had such terrible nightmares.” 

She tenderly brushed my hair off my forehead. Her hand felt warm and 
smooth. “What did you dream?” she asked softly. 

“I—I dreamed that Marco was hit in the head with a baseball bat,” I 
stammered. 

Mom bit her bottom lip. “You dreamed about Marco?” she asked, staring 
hard at me. 

I nodded. “Yes. Marco was hit by a bat, and I—” 

“But you were hit by a bat, Keith,” Mom interrupted. “Not Marco.” 

“Everything was turned around in the dream,” I told Mom. “I dreamed that 
I went up to Marco’s room. And I told him who I was. I told him I live in his 
basement.” 

Mom sat down on the edge of my cot. “Then what happened?” she asked. 



“He started fighting me,” I told her. “Marco was horrible to me. He started 
wrestling me. And he pulled me down the stairs. I was so frightened !” 

Mom narrowed her eyes at me sternly. “Keith, I warned you—didn’t I? I 
warned you never to play with humans.” 

“Yes, but—” I started. 

She raised a hand to silence me. 

“Never play with humans, Keith,” Mom scolded. “You’re a monster. You 
should never forget it.” She sighed. “Just because you look exactly like a human 
doesn’t mean you can be friends with the humans.” 

“I know. I know,” I grumbled. 

How many times had I heard this boring lecture before? At least a hundred! 

“I warned you never to play ball with Marco and the other humans,” Mom 
continued. “But you didn’t listen to me. And look—look what happened.” 

I raised my hand and felt the bandage on the side of my head. 

“You were hit in the head with a bat, Keith,” Mom said, her voice 
trembling. “You were badly hurt. It’s no wonder you had terrible nightmares.” 

“Mom, please—” I tried to sit up. 

But she gently forced me back onto my back. “You can’t go up and play 
with the humans,” she continued her lecture. Once Mom starts, it’s impossible to 
stop her. “We have to be so careful, Keith. So careful.” 

“I know! I know!” I cried. “I know the whole lecture, Mom. We’re 
monsters, and we live in Marco and Gwynnie’s basement. And if they ever find 
out we’re down here, they’ll get frightened and chase us away.” 

Mom frowned at me. “I know it’s tempting to go up there and play with 
them,” she said. “But I hope you’ve learned your lesson. You had me so worried 
this time, Keith.” 

“I’m sorry, Mom. I’ll be careful from now on,” I promised. 

That seemed to make her happy. She smiled at me. 

“Okay,” she said. “You need your rest. Turn inside out and get some sleep.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. 

I said good-night to her and watched her disappear to the other side of the 
basement. 

Then I opened my mouth and began to turn inside out. It felt so good to let 
my insides pour out. So clean and refreshing. 

My heart and arteries slid from between my teeth. My stomach was halfway 
out my mouth—when I heard a sound. 



No! 

A sound on the basement stairs! 

I glanced up—and saw Marco standing there. 
Did he see me? 



31 


Staring hard at the figure on the basement stairs, I quickly sucked up my insides. 
My heart and veins slid back into my body. Then I swallowed my lungs. 

Did Marco see me? 

Yes. 

His eyes bulged with shock. His mouth hung open. 

A wave of panic swept over me. A chill ran down my back. 

This is our worst nightmare, I thought. I’ve been caught. I’ve been seen by 
a human. 

Now what? 

I stared back at Marco and waited for him to speak. 

It took him a long time. He gripped the banister and held on to it tightly. He 
squinted across the gray basement at me, squinted hard as if he didn’t believe 
what he was seeing. 

“Who are you?” he asked finally in a small, frightened voice. 

I swallowed hard. 

What should I say? How should I answer? 

I had to think fast. 

“Who are you?” he repeated, a little louder, a little stronger. 

“Uh... you’re dreaming!” I called to him. 

He squinted harder at me. 

“Go back upstairs,” I told him. “It’s just a dream.” 

Would he believe me? 






MONSTER BLOOD IV 


Goosebumps - 62 
R.L. Stine 


1 


Evan Ross was thinking about Monster Blood. He thought about Monster Blood 
a lot. 

Evan wished he had never discovered Monster Blood. The sticky, slimy 
green goo had to be the most dangerous substance on Earth. 

Evan knew that as soon as you open a can of Monster Blood, you are 
doomed. The Monster Blood will grow and grow—and suck up everything in its 
path. 

And if you accidentally eat some of the green goo —look out! A tiny chunk 
of Monster Blood had turned Cuddles, the classroom hamster, into a growling 
monster as big as a gorilla! 

And when Evan accidentally swallowed a little bit of it, he shot up taller 
than his house. It was not the happiest day of Evan’s life. It was a day he kept 
trying to forget. 

So why was he thinking about Monster Blood today? 

His green sweater reminded him of Monster Blood. He had begged his 
mom not to make the sweater green. But she had already started knitting it. Too 
late to change colors. 

“You look good in green,” she told him. “It brings out your eyes.” 

“I don’t want to bring out my eyes,” Evan told her. 

He wanted to scream. The yarn she used was greener than the Jolly Green 
Giant! He pictured himself trapped inside a giant green blob of Monster Blood. 

“Wear it to your cousin Kermit’s,” Mrs. Ross instructed him. 

“I don’t need a sweater,” he protested. “Just put it in my suitcase.” 

“Wear it. It’s winter,” she insisted. “It gets cold, even here in Atlanta.” 

“I don’t want to stay at Kermit’s,” Evan grumbled, pulling the sweater over 
his head. Yuck. Green—and itchy. “How long are you and Dad going to be out 
West?” 

“Only nine or ten days,” his mother replied. 

“‘Only’?” Evan cried, struggling into the tight wool sleeves. “I’ll die! Aunt 
Dee’s food is so horrible! She puts that hot sauce on everything. Even 
brownies!” 

“Your aunt does not put hot sauce on brownies,” Mrs. Ross replied sternly. 



“She likes to make spicy food, but—” 

“I’ll explode!” Evan insisted. “And that geeky little creep, Kermit—” 

“Don’t call your cousin a geeky little creep,” Mrs. Ross scolded. 

“Well, he is one—isn’t he?” Evan demanded. 

“That’s beside the point,” his mom said. She pulled the green sweater down 
over Evan’s waist and admired it. “It fits perfectly. And I like that shade of 
green.” 

“I look like a ripe watermelon,” Evan grumbled. 

“Don’t forget, Aunt Dee is paying you to babysit Kermit,” his mom 
reminded him. She handed him his suitcase. “You want to go to sleepaway camp 
this summer, right? Well, you can’t go to camp unless you earn the money to pay 
for it.” 

“I know, I know.” He kissed his mom good-bye. 

“Your dad and I will call you when we get to Tucson,” Mrs. Ross said. 
“Take good care of Kermit. And don’t give Aunt Dee a hard time.” 

“I won’t eat till you get back,” Evan told her. “I’ll probably weigh ten 
pounds.” 

His mom laughed. 

She thinks I’m joking, Evan thought bitterly. 

He hoisted up his backpack and his suitcase and headed for the back door. 
He passed a mirror in the hall and caught a glimpse of himself in the sweater. 
“Sick,” he muttered. “I look like a pickle.” 

“Evan—what did you say?” his mom called. 

“I said, Thanks for the cool sweater!”’ he called back to her. 

A few seconds later, he was walking through backyards, making his way to 
Kermit’s house at the end of the block. Maybe I can hide this sweater 
somewhere, he thought. Maybe I can give it to Kermit as a Christmas present. 

No. Kermit is such a shrimp, the sweater would be down to his knees. 

It was a sunny, crisp winter day. The sweater glowed under the bright 
sunlight. It really did remind Evan of Monster Blood. 

He pictured the slimy green gunk. He pictured heaps and heaps of it, oozing 
over the backyards he passed, bubbling and pulsing. 

As he walked along, Evan had no idea that he was about to have another 
Monster Blood adventure. 

He had no idea that he was about to discover a whole new kind of Monster 
Blood. 



He had no idea that the green Monster Blood was silly kid stuff compared 
to the Monster Blood he was about to find. 



2 


He was nearly to Kermit’s backyard, still thinking about Monster Blood, when a 
dark shadow swept over him. 

He raised his eyes. “Conan—!” he gasped. 

A big hulk of a boy loomed in front of him, hands clenched into big fists, 
blocking Evan’s path. He lived in the house behind Kermit’s. 

His name was Conan Barber. But everyone called him Conan the Barbarian. 
That’s because he was the biggest, meanest kid in Atlanta. 

Conan placed the heel of his size-twelve sneaker on top of Evan’s shoe and 
stomped down hard. 

Evan yelped in pain. “Conan—why’d you do that?” he squealed. 

“Do what?” Conan grunted. He narrowed his cold blue eyes at Evan. 

“You—you crushed my foot!” Evan gasped. 

“Accidents happen,” Conan replied. He snickered. Despite the winter cold, 
he wore a gray muscle shirt and tight black spandex bike shorts. “Here. Let me 
fix it,” he offered. 

And he stomped down with all his might on Evan’s other shoe. 
“Owwwwwww.” Evan took a few painful hops, holding his throbbing foot. 
“What’s the big idea?” 

“Breaking in my new sneakers,” Conan replied, snickering again. 

Evan wanted to wipe the smile off Conan’s face. But how do you wipe the 
smile off a kid who’s built like a Monster Truck ? 

“I’ve got to go,” Evan said quietly. He picked up his suitcase and motioned 
with his head toward Kermit’s house. 

“Hey—!” Conan stared down at the ground. Then he raised his eyes to 
Evan. “Not so fast. You got the bottoms of my sneakers dirty.” 

“Excuse me?” Evan tried to step around Conan. But Conan blocked his 

path. 

“Brand-new sneakers,” Conan grumbled. “And you got the bottoms dirty.” 
“But—but—” Evan sputtered. 

“Oh, well.” Conan sighed. “I’ll let you go this time.” 

Evan’s heart pounded. He breathed a loud sigh of relief. “You will? You’ll 
let me go?” 



Conan nodded. He swept a beefy hand back through his wavy blond hair. 
“Yeah. You caught me in a good mood. Get going.” 

“Th-thanks,” Evan stammered. 

Conan stepped aside. Evan started past him. 

He stopped when he heard a high, shrill voice ring out: “Leave my cousin 
alone!” 

“Oh, noooo,” Evan moaned. He turned to see Kermit running across the 
grass. 

“Leave Evan alone!” Kermit called. He waved a tiny fist at Conan. “Pick on 
somebody your own size!” 

“Kermit—stay out of this! ” Evan shouted. 

Kermit stepped up beside Evan. He was tiny and skinny. He had a pile of 
white-blond hair, a serious face, and round black eyes behind red plastic-framed 
glasses. 

Standing next to Conan, he reminded Evan of a little ant. A bug that Conan 
could easily crush with one tromp of his heavy-duty size twelves. 

“Take a walk, Conan!” Kermit squeaked. “Give Evan a break!” 

Conan’s eyes narrowed to angry slits. “I was going to give Evan a break,” 
he growled. “Until you came along. But now I guess I have to teach you both a 
lesson.” 

He turned and grabbed the front of Evan’s sweater. 



3 


“Evan—what happened to your sweater?” Aunt Dee demanded. 

Evan set his suitcase down on the kitchen floor. “Well...” 

The left sleeve of his new sweater was normal length. Conan had taken the 
right sleeve and pulled it... pulled... pulled... until the sleeve dragged on the 
ground. 

“Mom made one sleeve a little too long,” Evan explained. He didn’t want to 
tell his aunt about Conan. 

Why look for trouble? 

Conan promised that next time he’d pull Evan’s right arm until it fit the 
sleeve! 

“Evan picked a fight with Conan,” Kermit reported. 

Aunt Dee’s mouth dropped open. “You shouldn’t start fights, Evan.” 

Evan glared at Kermit. Why was the little creep always trying to get Evan 
in trouble? 

“That boy Conan is big,” Aunt Dee commented. “You really shouldn’t pick 
on him.” 

Good advice, Evan thought bitterly. He lifted the mile-long sweater sleeve, 
then let it drop back to the floor. 

“I’m going to fix Conan,” Kermit declared. “I mixed up a formula that 
grows hair. I’m going to give it to Conan to drink—and he’ll grow hair on his 
tongue. Whenever he tries to talk, he’ll just go, ‘Woffff woffff.’” 

Aunt Dee laughed. “Kermit, stop!” she scolded. “You’re starting to sound 
like a mad scientist!” 

“I am a mad scientist!” Kermit declared proudly. 

He and his mother laughed. But Evan couldn’t even force a smile. 

It’s no joke, Evan thought. Kermit really is a mad scientist. He spends all 
his time down in his lab in the basement mixing bottles of green stuff with 
bottles of blue stuff. 

One afternoon down in the lab, Evan asked Kermit what he was trying to 
discover. “I’m searching for a secret formula,” Kermit replied, pouring a red 
liquid into a test tube. 

“A secret formula that will do what?” Evan had asked. 



“How should I know?” Kermit exclaimed. “It’s secret!” 

Now Evan had to spend the next ten days watching Kermit do his mad 
scientist act. And somehow he had to keep Kermit out of trouble. 

“I’m so glad you’re staying with us,” Aunt Dee told Evan. “I just think it’s 
great that you two cousins are so close.” 

“Yeah. Great,” Evan muttered. 

“Wofff wofff!” Kermit declared, giggling. 

Aunt Dee led the two of them to Kermit’s room at the back of the house. 
Kermit had a foldout bed where Evan would sleep. 

Books and computer disks and papers and science magazines cluttered the 
floor. Evan had to step around a giant plastic model of the solar system to get to 
the dresser. 

Aunt Dee helped him unpack his suitcase. Then she said, “You two run 
along. Go outside or something. I’m going into the kitchen to make dinner.” 

Dinner. The word sent a chill down Evan’s back. 

“What are we having?” he asked. 

“It’s a surprise,” Aunt Dee told him. 

Another chill. 

“I brought my Super-Soaker,” Evan told Kermit. “Let’s go outside and have 
a water fight.” 

Kermit shook his head. “I don’t think so.” He led the way down the 
basement stairs to his science lab. “I want to show you something.” 

Evan stared at the shelves of jars and bottles and test tubes, all brimming 
with mysterious, dangerous materials. “I really don’t feel safe—” he started. 

Something bumped him hard from behind. 

Evan spun around and gazed down at Dogface, Kermit’s huge sheepdog. 
“Stop bumping me!” Evan snapped. 

The dog stuck out his fat tongue and licked Evan’s hand. It left a sticky gob 
of dog drool in his palm. 

“Dogface likes you,” Kermit said. 

“Yuck,” Evan groaned. He searched the lab table for a paper towel to wipe 
off the gunk. 

“I want to try a little test,” Kermit told him. 

“No way!” Evan protested. “No little tests! The last time you tried a little 
test, you turned my nose blue.” 

“That was a mistake,” Kermit replied. “This test is different. This test isn’t 



dangerous.” He raised his right hand. “I swear.” 

“What do I have to do?” Evan asked warily. “Drink something and have my 
tongue grow hair?” 

Kermit shook his head. “No. I’m not ready to test that on a human yet.” 

“Good,” Evan said, relieved. “Let’s get our Super-Soakers and go outside.” 
Evan really wanted to have a water fight. It was the only time he was allowed to 
attack Kermit and get away with it! 

“After the test,” Kermit replied. “The test only takes a minute. I promise.” 

Evan sighed. “Okay. What do I have to do?” 

Kermit held up a black bandanna. “A blindfold,” he said. “Put it on.” 

“Excuse me?” Evan cried, backing away. “Do you really think I’m going to 
let you blindfold me?” 

“It isn’t dangerous!” Kermit insisted in his high, shrill voice. “I just want to 
see if you can identify something. That’s all. It will take a second.” 

Evan argued with his cousin for a while longer. But he ended up slipping on 
the blindfold. “Promise we’ll go outside after this?” 

“Promise,” Kermit replied. He checked to make sure Evan’s blindfold was 
tight. Then he took Evan’s hand and lifted it to a big glass jar. 

He pushed Evan’s hand into the jar. “Tell me what’s in the jar,” Kermit 
instructed. 

Staring at total blackness, Evan wrapped his hand around something warm 
and prickly. 

“Hmmmm...” What is it? he wondered. What could it be? 

As he tried to identify it, he felt something crawl up the back of his hand. It 
slipped under his shirt cuff and crawled up his arm. 

“Huh?” 

He felt a soft, pinching sensation on his hand. 

Something prickled his wrist. 

What is it? What is it? 

He couldn’t take it anymore. He ripped away the blindfold. 

Gazed into the jar. 

And then let out a horrified scream. 



4 


“Tarantulas?” Evan shrieked. 

One of the hairy creatures clung to his arm underneath his shirtsleeve. 
Another inched its way across the back of his hand. 

“Don’t scream like that,” Kermit warned, his eyes locked on Evan’s arm. 

“What kind of test is this?” Evan shrieked. “What are you trying to prove?” 

Kermit didn’t look up from the crawling tarantulas. “Someone told me that 
tarantulas won’t bite you,” he explained. “Unless they sense your fear.” 

“Are you kidding me?” Evan cried. “Sense my fear?” 

“Ssshhhh.” Kermit raised a finger to his lips. “Be very calm. Calm... 
calm...” He grinned at Evan. “This is an interesting experiment—isn’t it?” 

“I’ll kill you!” Evan screamed. “I’ll kill you for this, Kermit! When I’m 
finished with you, you’ll go ‘woffff woffff ’ for the rest of your life!” 

“Careful,” Kermit warned softly. “Your arm is shaking. Don’t let them see 
your fear.” 

Evan struggled to steady his arm. One tarantula prickled his wrist. Another 
one stood on the back of his hand. 

“Get these off.” Evan demanded in a frantic whisper. “I’m warning you— 
HEEEEY!” 

Evan felt a hard bump from behind. 

Dogface again! 

Startled, Evan’s hands shot up—and two tarantulas went flying. 

One landed with a soft THUD on the lab table. 

The other landed on Evan’s head. 

Evan gasped. He felt eight pointy tarantula legs scrambling through his hair. 

“Don’t upset it,” Kermit instructed. “Be very calm. Don’t let it know you’re 
afraid. A tarantula bite can be very painful.” 

“Hey, guys—what’s going on down there?” Aunt Dee’s voice rang through 
the basement. 

“Evan is playing with my tarantulas,” Kermit reported. 

Playing ? 

Evan wanted to scream. He pictured Kermit eating a tarantula sandwich. 



No. That’s not a good enough punishment, he decided. 

“Well, it’s too nice a day to stay down in the basement playing with 
spiders,” Aunt Dee scolded. 

“My tarantulas aren’t just any old spiders!” Kermit fumed. 

“Evan, your friend Andy is here,” Aunt Dee called down. “I think all three 
of you should go outside and get some fresh air.” 

“Andy?” Evan called. Without thinking, he started toward the stairs. 

“Don’t move!” Kermit warned. “Don’t get them excited!” 

Evan froze. The tarantula prickled the top of his head. He watched in horror 
as the other one made its way across the lab table and began crawling up his 
arm. 

Andy burst down the stairs, taking them two at a time. Her short brown hair 
bobbed behind her as she hurried across the basement to them. 

Andy didn’t dress like most sixth graders. She didn’t care what other kids 
wore. She liked bright colors. 

Today she wore a shiny magenta windbreaker over yellow tights. Her bright 
orange backpack hung over one shoulder. 

“Hey, guys!” she greeted them breathlessly. “What are you doing?” 

“An experiment,” Kermit replied solemnly. 

“So what else is new!” Andy said, rolling her eyes. But then her mouth 
dropped open in shock. She pointed at Evan with a trembling finger. “Evan! You 
have a tarantula on your head!” 

Evan felt the creature dig into his hair. 

“It’s part of the experiment,” Kermit told Andy. “There’s another tarantula 
crawling on his arm.” 

“Get... them... off....” Evan ordered Kermit through gritted teeth. 

Andy laughed. “This is an awesome experiment!” 

Evan let out a growl and raised his fists. 

“Calm,” Kermit warned. “If they sense your fear, you’re dead meat.” 

Evan turned to Andy for help. But she had unzipped her backpack and was 
digging inside. 

The tarantula prickled his scalp as it moved toward his left ear. “Kermit...” 
he begged. 

Evan gasped as Andy pulled a blue plastic can from her backpack. 

“Evan, look what I found!” Her dark eyes lit up. An evil grin spread across 
her face. 



“Monster Blood!” Evan cried. “Where’d you get that?” 

“Somewhere,” Andy teased. She raised her hand to the lid and started to 
twist it off. 

“No—!” Evan shrieked. He dove toward her, grabbing for the can. “Don’t 
open it! Andy— don’t]” 



5 


Andy pulled the can from Evan’s reach. 

And twisted it open. 

“NOOOO!” Evan shrieked. 

She tilted the can so that he could see inside. 

Empty. 

She laughed and tossed the can aside. “April Fools’!” 

“But it isn’t April!” Kermit declared. 

Evan gulped—and felt something pinch his ear. The tarantula! The Monster 
Blood can had frightened him so much, he’d forgotten about the creatures 
crawling over his body. 

“Uh-oh. Now you’ve excited them!” Kermit warned. “I think we’re going 
to learn how painful a tarantula bite can be.” 

Evan froze. He signaled frantically with his eyes for Andy to help him. 

“Okay, okay,” she said finally. She stepped up to Evan and plucked the 
tarantula off his head. 

“You’re ruining the experiment!” Kermit protested. 

Andy pulled the other tarantula off Evan’s arm. She handed them to Kermit. 

Grumbling to himself, Kermit dropped them into the glass jar. Then he 
scribbled some notes in a notebook. 

Evan glared angrily at his cousin, clenching his hands into tight fists. The 
tarantulas were gone, but his skin still prickled. “Let’s get the Super-Soakers,” he 
growled. 

He couldn’t wait to drench Kermit. He wanted to soak the little freak, to 
make him sputter and choke and shiver and shake until he begged for mercy. 

And then Evan would really let him have it! 

“It’s kind of cold out for a water fight,” Kermit said. 

“I don’t care,” Evan growled. “Let’s go.” 

He turned to Andy. She swung her backpack away and zipped it before he 
could see what was inside. 

“What else have you got in there?” Evan demanded. “More dumb jokes?” 

She sneered. “That’s for me to know and you to find out.” 



“Do you have more Monster Blood in there?” His voice cracked. “Do you 
have real Monster Blood?” 

“That’s for me to know and you to find out,” she repeated, hugging the 
backpack to her side. 

Maybe I’ll soak her too, Evan thought. She’s asking for it. “Come on 
outside,” he told her. “You can just watch.” 

“Like I believe you,” she replied, rolling her eyes again. “I’ll wait in here 
and do my homework. No way am I getting wet.” 

Evan eyed the backpack intently. Did she have a real can of Monster Blood 
in there? Did she? 

Please—let the answer be no! he prayed as he led Kermit to the backyard. 

They filled their squirt-gun canisters from the garden hose behind the 
garage. And the chase was on. 

Kermit ran. Evan fired first. The Super-Soaker sprayed a stream of water 
over Kermit’s head. 

Evan lowered the squirt gun, and the water stream bounced off the back of 
Kermit’s down jacket. 

Evan pumped hard and kept the water flowing, squeezing the trigger again. 
Again. He raised the spray and caught Kermit in the back of the neck. 

Kermit let out a yipe as the cold water ran down his back. 

He spun around. And shot a stream of water in Evan’s direction. 

Evan dropped to his knees on the grass. The water stream flew over him. 

He pulled the trigger and sent water splashing down the front of Kermit’s 
jacket. 

“Yo! Hey—!” A booming voice made Evan spin around. 

“Conan—!” Evan cried. 

Kermit sent a spray of icy water into the back of Evan’s head. 

Evan jumped up and staggered forward. “Kermit—stop!” He caught his 
balance before he bumped into Conan. 

“You trying to get my new sneakers wet?” Conan snarled. 

“No. No way,” Evan replied. He lowered his Super-Soaker to his side. 

Kermit stepped up beside Evan. “Give us a break, Conan,” Kermit said. 
“Evan isn’t afraid of you!” 

“Oh, yeah?” Conan replied menacingly. 

“Evan says he can take you down any day,” Kermit boasted. 

“I did not say that!” Evan cried. “Kermit—what is your problem?” 



He turned to Conan. “I didn’t say that. Really. My cousin is a little mixed 
up. You know. From the fumes. All those chemicals he fools around with.” 

Conan shook his beefy head. “You guys are really asking for it,” he 
muttered angrily. He took a step toward Evan. 

Evan gulped. He felt his Super-Soaker move. 

He turned—and saw that Kermit had reached behind him. 

Kermit was pushing up Evan’s squirt gun. 

Before Evan could jerk it away, Kermit pulled the trigger. 

And a stream of water poured out over Conan’s new sneakers. 



6 


Conan let out an angry cry. And grabbed the front of Evan’s coat. 

“I—I didn’t do it!” Evan sputtered. 

“It came out of your squirt gun,” Conan replied. His big hands tightened on 
the coat. He tugged, lifting Evan off the ground. 

“What are you going to do?” Evan shrieked. 

“Hey—what’s up?” Andy came trotting out from the house. 

Conan let Evan drop to the ground. 

Evan stumbled but quickly caught his balance. 

“Evan is teaching Conan a lesson,” Kermit reported. 

Evan gave his cousin a hard shove. “I’m warning you, Kermit....” 

Conan eyed Andy suspiciously. “What’s in your hand?” he demanded. 

Evan turned as Andy held up her hand. She gripped a small blue plastic can. 

“No—!” Evan gasped. “Andy—is that the empty one?” 

She shook her head, an evil grin on her face. “Not empty. This one is full.” 

Evan took a step back. “Get rid of it, Andy.” 

Kermit reached for the can. “It’s the real stuff? Let me see it,” he demanded 
eagerly. 

“Are you crazy?” Evan cried. “Why did you bring that here, Andy? You 
know how dangerous it is.” 

Andy’s brown eyes flashed excitedly. She didn’t say a word. Instead, she 
raised the blue can and started to pull off the lid. 

“Nooo!” Evan wailed. “Have you totally lost it?” 

Andy grinned at him. 

“Don’t open it!” Evan pleaded. “Please—don’t open it!” 

With a grunt, Conan stepped forward and swiped the can from Andy. “Let 
me see this stuff,” he growled. 

He raised the can in front of his face—and pulled off the lid. 



7 


Conan pulled open the lid—and three cloth snakes sprung out and hit him in the 
face. 

He let out a startled yelp and let the can fall from his hand. 

Andy tossed back her head and roared with laughter. Kermit laughed too, a 
high, shrill whinny. 

Evan swallowed hard. Too shaken to laugh. 

No one ever played jokes on Conan. No one. 

Evan stared hard at Conan, frozen in terror. Conan’s face was bright red. He 
was actually blushing! 

Now he’s going to pound us, Evan thought. When Conan is finished with 
us, we’re going to look just like those three fake snakes on the ground. 

But to Evan’s surprise, Conan spun around and stomped off without saying 
a word. 

“That was a close one,” Evan murmured. 

“It was funny!” Andy exclaimed. “What’s your problem? Lose your sense 
of humor?” 

“Yes,” Evan told her. “I don’t think Monster Blood is funny. It turned my 
dog, Trigger, into a giant. It turned our classroom hamster into a roaring monster. 
And it turned me into a twelve-foot-tall freak! That was the worst day of my 
life!” 

“I saved you—remember? I shrank you back to your real size,” Kermit 
bragged. 

“Yes, you did,” Evan had to admit. “That was the last good thing you ever 

did.” 

Kermit pouted. “That’s not a nice thing to say, Evan. I shared my tarantulas 
with you—didn’t I?” 

Evan groaned in reply. 

Kermit’s expression suddenly changed. Behind his glasses, his eyes flashed. 
“Wait right here,” he told them. He took off, running to his house. 

“Where are you going now?” Evan called after him. 

“I almost forgot what I wanted to show you,” Kermit called back. “It’s the 
coolest thing!” 



He disappeared into the house. 

Evan turned to Andy. “How am I going to survive ten days with him?” he 
wailed. “I just got here. And I’ve already had tarantulas climbing on my head!” 

Andy laughed. “It could have been worse.” 

“How could it be worse?” 

“Well... it could have been head lice,” she said. “Remember when Kermit 
was collecting head lice?” 

“You’re not cheering me up, Annnnndrea,” Evan groaned. 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she grumbled. “Wow. You’re in a bad mood. Just 
think of all the money you are earning. Your aunt is paying you five dollars an 
hour to keep an eye on him—right?” 

“If I survive,” Evan moaned. 

He turned to the house. Kermit came running across the grass, carrying a 
glass case between his hands. 

“Now what is he bringing?” Evan cried. 

“Maybe this is the head lice,” Andy said. 

“Will you please stop talking about head lice?” Evan pleaded. “You’re 
making my head itch!” 

“Check this out!” Kermit cried, holding the glass case up to them. 

Evan squinted into the case. He saw white mice inside. Six or eight of them. 
With tiny black eyes and twitching pink noses. Crawling all over each other. 

“Kermit—why did you bring your white mice outside?” he demanded. 

“Watch,” Kermit replied. 

He pulled off the lid and dumped all the mice onto the grass. 

The mice didn’t hesitate. They scampered off in all directions. One of them 
ran right between Andy’s legs. She cried out in surprise and leaped out of the 
way. 

“Are you crazy?” Evan shrieked. “Your mice are all getting away!” 

“No, they’re not,” Kermit replied calmly. He pulled a small gray control 
unit from the back pocket of his baggy jeans. It looked a lot like a TV remote 
control. 

“This is so cool!” Kermit exclaimed. “See? I built an electric fence all the 
way around the backyard.” 

“I don’t see any fence,” Andy said. 

“Of course not. It’s electric,” Kermit told her. “It’s like the invisible fences 
people use to keep their dogs in the yard.” 



Evan squinted to the back of the yard. “I can’t even see your mice 
anymore,” he told Kermit. “They’ve all run away.” 

“No way,” Kermit insisted. He raised the slender control unit. “I have 
electric current going all around the yard. If a mouse tries to go through it, he 
gets a mild shock.” 

“But they’re gone!” Andy laughed. “The mice are all gone!” 

Kermit gazed around the backyard. 

His mouth dropped open. He slapped his forehead. “Oh, wow! I forgot to 
turn the fence on! I forgot to throw the switch!” 

He raised the control unit and pushed a red button. 

“YAAAIIIIII!” Evan let out a scream as a jolt of electricity shot through his 
body. 



8 


Evan’s arms waved wildly. His legs wiggled and bent. 

Kermit pushed the red button again. The buzzing stopped. 

Kermit stared at Evan. “Sorry. Guess you shouldn’t be standing there.” 

Evan took a deep breath and held it. He waited for his skin to stop tingling. 

“You looked like you were dancing!” Andy exclaimed. She threw her arms 
up and wiggled her body, imitating Evan. 

“Am I supposed to think that’s funny?” Evan asked weakly. 

“Are you okay?” she asked. “Your hair is standing straight up on end!” 

Evan pushed his hair down with both hands. But it popped right back up. 

He glared at Kermit. “Any other great inventions?” 

“Not right now,” Kermit replied. “You have to help me.” 

“Help you do what?” Evan growled. 

“Round up my mice,” Kermit said. He began crawling across the grass on 
his hands and knees. “Hurry! They are expensive lab mice. Mom will kill me if I 
lose them.” 

Evan and Andy saw they had no choice. They dropped to their hands and 
knees and began crawling like Kermit. 

“I don’t see any mice,” Evan whispered to Andy. “I think Kermit is in 
major trouble.” 

He heard a heavy thumping sound behind him. He turned and saw Dogface, 
the big sheepdog, bouncing across the yard. 

“No, Dogface!” Kermit cried. “No! Go home! Go home!” 

Furiously wagging his stubby tail, the big dog leaped onto Evan, sending 
him sprawling on the grass. 

“Dogface—you’re scaring the mice away!” Kermit wailed. 

Ignoring Kermit’s desperate pleas, the dog made a wide circle, excitedly 
running round and round the yard, barking and wagging his tail. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” an angry voice called. “Can’t you keep that dog 
quiet?” 

Conan came leaping over the low bushes that separated the two yards. Then 
he ran about three steps—and stopped. 



Evan heard a crackling sound. Then a loud BUZZ. 

Conan’s eyes bulged. His hands shot up. His body twisted in a wild dance. 
“Oh, wow,” Kermit murmured. “Didn’t I shut that off?” 

He fumbled with the control unit. The buzzing stopped. 

Conan took a few seconds to catch his breath. 

Then he let out a furious roar. And dove at Evan. 

“Wh-what are you going to do to me?” Evan stammered. 



9 


Evan leaned his elbows on the dinner table and stared down at the pile of 
spaghetti on his plate. Aunt Dee couldn’t mess up spaghetti—could she? he 
wondered. 

“Evan—what happened to your ear?” Aunt Dee asked. 

Evan sighed. His left ear was normal. But his right ear throbbed and burned. 
He knew it must look like a red cabbage! 

“What on earth happened to you?” his aunt demanded. 

Evan didn’t want to describe how Conan had won a tug-of-war with his ear. 
He mumbled something into his plate. 

“Evan got into another fight with Conan,” Kermit told his mom. 

She lowered her fork. “Evan—is that true?” 

Evan nodded. “It wasn’t exactly a fight.” 

“I warned you to stay away from that boy,” his aunt scolded. “You really 
should be smart enough not to pick a fight with someone so big.” 

“And Evan lost all my white mice too,” Kermit whined. 

His mother’s mouth dropped open. “Those mice cost a lot of money!” She 
narrowed her eyes at Evan. 

Evan swallowed hard. “I’m not the one who brought them outside,” he 
choked out. 

“I left you in charge,” Kermit’s mom said sternly. “You are responsible for 
what goes on here when I’m away.” She scowled and waved her fork at him. “If 
it’s too big a job for you, Evan, I can find a grownup to come stay with Kermit.” 

“No!” Evan cried. 

Being responsible for Kermit was impossible. But he didn’t want to lose the 
job. If he didn’t earn money, he couldn’t go to sleepaway camp. 

“I can handle the job,” he told his aunt. 

Across from him, Kermit gobbled down mouthful after mouthful of 
spaghetti. The orange sauce ran down his chin. 

Evan rolled several spaghetti strands on his fork, then took a big bite. 

He chewed for about three seconds. Then he let out a scream. 
“ YAAAAAAIIIII! ” 

His mouth was on fire! His head felt about to explode! 



“Is it spicy enough?” Aunt Dee asked. “Did I put in enough hot sauce?” 


Later, as Evan changed into his pajamas, Kermit typed away on his computer. 
Evan’s lips were swollen from the spicy spaghetti. They looked like two big 
salamis hanging from his face. 

He gazed at himself in the dresser mirror. His ear resembled a red cabbage. 

He shook his head unhappily, thinking about Conan. “I have to do 
something about him,” he mumbled. 

Kermit spun around from his keyboard. “What did you say?” 

“Conan went too far this time,” Evan grumbled bitterly. “He’s making me 
look like a freak.” 

“Yes, you do,” Kermit agreed. 

“Shut up. I didn’t ask you,” Evan snapped. “You’re not exactly Brad Pitt!” 

“Who’s that?” Kermit asked. 

Evan ignored him. He climbed into bed. He hit the pillow a few times, 
fluffing it up. He knew he wouldn’t be able to sleep. 

He was too angry. 

“This time Conan went too far,” he repeated, muttering to himself. “This 
time I have to find a way to pay him back.” 

Behind his red-framed glasses, Kermit’s round black eyes lit up. “You mean 
revenge ?” he asked excitedly. 

“Yeah. I guess,” Evan replied, settling his huge ear on the pillow. His hands 
were clenched into tight fists. His whole body felt tense. 

“Revenge.” He repeated the word a few times. “That’s what I want. 
Someone has to show Conan that he cannot keep pushing everyone around and 
beating everyone up. Revenge...” 

Kermit shut off his computer. When he turned back to Evan, he had a wide 
grin on his face. “I think I can help you,” he said. 



10 


“Let me show you something,” Kermit said eagerly, lowering his voice to a 
whisper. He pulled something out of his bottom desk drawer and brought it over 
to Evan’s foldout bed. 

“Look.” Kermit’s grin grew wider. He handed the object to Evan. 

“Hey—!” Evan cried out. “It’s so hairy!” 

Evan stared at the small object. Some kind of ball, covered in thick, greasy 
black hair. “This is totally gross,” he told Kermit. “What is this? Why are you 
showing it to me?” 

“It’s an egg,” Kermit said, giggling. 

“Huh?” Evan nearly dropped it. He turned the hairy thing between his 
hands. “What kind of egg?” he asked suspiciously. 

“Just an egg,” Kermit replied. “I took it from the refrigerator.” 

“But—” Evan started. 

“Remember, I told you about my hair-growing formula?” Kermit asked. “I 
said it wasn’t ready yet. But it is.” 

Evan handed the hairy egg back to his cousin. It was too creepy. It was 
making him sick. 

He swallowed. “You really can grow thick hair like that on an egg?” 

Kermit nodded, grinning. He cradled the egg in his hands as if it were a 
precious jewel. “My hair mixture works, Evan. We can use it to pay Conan 
back.” 

“Whoa!” Evan cried. “We can’t make him drink it and turn his mouth all 
hairy. That’s too horrible—even for Conan.” 

“I know,” Kermit agreed. “But we can pour it on his hands, can’t we? We 
can give him werewolf hands! That would be pretty funny—wouldn’t it?” 

Evan laughed. “Yeah. Yeah, it sure would! Let’s do it!” 

Kermit carried the hairy egg back to his desk drawer. “I was going to test 
my hair mixture out on Dogface next,” he told Evan. “But Dogface is already 
hairy enough. Conan is better.” 

“Much better,” Evan agreed, smiling for the first time that night. “Where is 
your hair mixture?” 

“Don’t worry. I have it hidden safe and sound,” Kermit replied. “It will be 



ready when we need it.” 


* * * 


It took Evan hours to fall asleep. Partly because he couldn’t stop thinking of his 
revenge against Conan. And partly because Kermit was snoring his head off. 

Evan stared up at the ceiling with his hands over his ears, unable to shut out 
the awful sound. A throaty gluggg glugggg, followed by a whistle. 

Kermit is obnoxious even when he’s asleep, Evan thought bitterly. 

When he finally fell asleep, Evan dreamed he was standing in his pajamas 
in Kermit’s backyard. It was night. Long shadows fell over the grass. 

Peering into the back of the yard, Evan saw Kermit’s white mice. At least 
half a dozen of them. They had clustered around something hidden in the grass. 

In the dream, Evan moved closer. And saw what had interested the lab 
mice. 

A blue can. An open can of Monster Blood! 

Evan’s mouth dropped open in horror. 

The green gunk had bubbled out of the can. And the white mice were 
silently gobbling it. Gobbling down chunk after chunk. Their teeth gnashing up 
and down. Their furry bodies quivering with excitement as they ate. 

As they swallowed down the sticky green goo, they grew. Evan stared in 
shock. The mice inflated until they were as big as dogs. Then bigger. The giant 
mice rose up on their hind legs. 

They’re taller than me! Evan saw, stumbling back. And so fat! They must 
weigh two hundred pounds! 

They turned to him, gnashing their teeth hungrily. As tall as the house, the 
mice lurched heavily toward Evan. 

One of them tossed back its head, opened its jaws wide, and let out a roar. 
Evan saw rows of jagged gray teeth. 

And then the mice lurched heavily toward him. Their feet thudded the 
ground. Their dark eyes glinted in the silvery glow from the moon. 

“Nooooooooo!” He opened his mouth in a long, high howl. 

He raised his hands to protect himself. 

The mice rose over him now. One of them lowered its head. Its jagged teeth 
slid around Evan’s waist. Its jaw tightened. 

Evan felt its hot, sour breath stream over him. 



Felt the teeth dig into his side. 

And then he was being lifted up. Lifted in the giant jaws of the white 
mouse. The mouse clamped its jaws shut. Bit down hard. 

Evan knew it was chewing him. Chewing him to pieces. 

He opened his eyes. Began to lift himself from the frightening dream. Lift 
himself... lift himself... 

And heard a tapping at Kermit’s bedroom window. 

Evan squinted through the darkness. To the window. And saw a giant 
mouse! 



11 


No. 

No. The mouse was part of the dream. 

I’m still half in my dream, half awake, Evan realized, blinking his eyes. 

He shook himself hard. Shook himself awake. 

The mouse faded slowly, then vanished. And Evan stared at the window, 
stared at Andy outside in the darkness. Tapping on the glass. Tapping so 
urgently. 

Evan jumped from the small foldout bed. His legs were tangled in the 
blanket. He stumbled and had to grab the edge of Kermit’s dresser to catch his 
balance. 

One foot had fallen asleep. He dragged it, limping to the window. He 
silently pushed open the window, careful not to wake Kermit. 

Kermit snored away, glugging and whistling. He had kicked his blanket to 
the floor. He had fallen asleep with his glasses on. 

Evan leaned out into the darkness. A gust of cold wind made him shiver. 

“Andy—what are you doing here?” he cried out. 

“Get dressed,” Andy ordered. “Hurry, Evan. I have to show you 
something.” 

“Huh?” He glanced back at Kermit’s clock radio. “It’s almost midnight!” 

Andy raised a finger to her lips. “Sssshhhh. Hurry. Get dressed. I think 
you’ll want to see this.” 

She held up a can. A blue plastic can. 

Evan groaned. “You really came here in the middle of the night for another 
joke? Give me a break, Andy. What’s going to spring out at me this time?” 

But then he saw the serious expression on Andy’s face. 

“It isn’t a joke—is it?” he whispered. 

She shook her head. 

“It’s Monster Blood—right?” Evan demanded. 

Andy nodded. “I think so. The can—it looks the same.” 

Evan spun away from the window. He pulled on jeans and a sweatshirt right 
over his pajamas. His hands trembled as he tied his shoes. 



He grabbed his down jacket from the closet. And climbed out the window. 

“I was dreaming about Monster Blood,” he told Andy. 

She bit her bottom lip. “This isn’t a dream,” she replied quietly. 

Evan shivered. It was a cold, clear night. 

Andy wore her magenta windbreaker and a pair of silvery leggings. She had 
a red wool ski cap pulled down over her short brown hair. 

She raised the plastic can to Evan. “I think it’s the real thing. I hurried over 
as soon as I was sure my parents were asleep.” 

“Where did you get it?” he whispered. 

“Behind the lab on Peachtree where my dad works. We were picking him 
up before dinner. I was waiting in the parking lot behind the lab. I found this in a 
whole pile of stuff.” 

“You didn’t open it—did you?” Evan demanded. 

“No way,” she replied. She tried to hand him the can. But he waved it away. 

“I don’t want it,” Evan told her. “Why did you bring it over here?” 

Andy shrugged. “I thought after this afternoon, you might want to pay 
Conan back for being such a big jerk.” 

“Yes, I do want to pay Conan back,” Evan admitted. 

“So use the Monster Blood,” Andy urged. “You can put a little of it in his 
lunch at school. You can—” 

“No way!” Evan cried. “Conan is already a mountain! I don’t want to make 
him any BIGGER!” 

The light faded from Andy’s dark eyes. “I guess you’re right. But we could 
put Monster Blood in his bed. Or—” 

“Stop!” Evan ordered. “It’s too dangerous. I don’t want to use Monster 
Blood on Conan. Kermit and I have another plan for Conan. A really good plan.” 

“What is it?” Andy demanded eagerly. 

“I’ll tell you as soon as you get rid of the Monster Blood,” Evan told her. “I 
really don’t want that stuff around. Go hide it someplace where no one will ever 
find it.” 

“But, Evan—” Andy protested. 

Evan didn’t let her finish. “You know what will happen if that can gets 
opened,” he said firmly. “It will bubble up. And it will grow and grow, and we 
won’t be able to stop it.” 

“Okay, okay.” Andy rolled her eyes. “I’ll take it home. I’ll find a good 
hiding place.” 



“Promise?” Evan demanded, eyeing her sharply. 

“Promise,” she repeated, raising her right hand. 

“Hey—what’s that?” a voice called from behind them. 

Evan spun around and saw Kermit scramble out the open window. 
Kermit grabbed the blue can from Andy’s hand. 

“Cool!” he cried. “Monster Blood! Is it real?” 

He didn’t wait for an answer. 

He gripped the can tightly—and pulled off the lid. 



12 


“No! Don’t do that!” Evan screamed. 

Too late. 

“Close it up!” Evan cried frantically. “Close the can—quick!” 

Kermit stood staring into the open can. “It’s too dark. I can’t see anything.” 

“Give me that!” Evan ordered. He leaped forward and tried to swipe the can 
away. 

He grabbed the can—but knocked the lid from Kermit’s hand. 

Kermit made a wild grab for the lid. But a gust of wind blew it out of his 
reach. 

As Evan gaped in horror, the wind lifted the plastic lid... lifted it over their 
heads. 

“Noooooo!” He let out a long wail as the lid spun crazily above them. He 
made a wild grab. Another. Missed. 

The wind carried the lid up to the slanted roof of the house. It hit the 
shingles. Slid down a few feet. And came to a rest in the metal rain gutter. 

“I don’t believe this,” Evan muttered. 

“I’ll get the ladder from the garage,” Kermit offered. He took off across the 
dew-wet grass. 

“Hurry!” Evan cried. 

“The Monster Blood—it’s moving!” Andy exclaimed, pointing with a 
trembling finger. 

Evan gazed down at the can gripped tightly in his hand. He couldn’t really 
see inside. Dark clouds had drifted over the moon, blocking out the light. 

Evan brought the can close to his face. And gasped. 

“Andy—it’s bluer 

“Huh?” She pressed close to him. Their heads banged as they both eagerly 
stared into the can. 

Yes. The thick glop inside the can was blue—not green. 

It made a sick plopping sound as it rolled from side to side, like an ocean 
wave. 

“It—it’s trying to get out!” Andy stammered. 



“Hurry, Kermit!” Evan called. 

Kermit came running from the garage, an aluminum ladder tilted over one 
shoulder. 

“Why is it blue?” Andy asked. 

The thick goo lapped at the side of the can. As Evan stared in horror, it 
splashed up over the top. 

“Kermit—please hurry! Get the lid!” he cried. 

Kermit propped the ladder against the side of the house. Then he turned 
back to them. “Someone else has to climb up,” he called. 

“Just do it!” Evan screamed frantically. “The stuff is spilling out over the 

top!” 

“But I’m afraid of heights!” Kermit declared. 

Evan rolled his eyes. “It isn’t that high. Just climb up, and—” 

“I can’t!” Kermit whined. “Really!” 

“I’ll do it.” Andy ran to the ladder. Kermit held it steady for her. 

Evan watched her scramble up. The Monster Blood bobbed and plopped in 
the can. The clouds rolled away from the moon. It was definitely bright blue, 
Evan saw. 

And definitely trying to raise itself out of the can. 

Andy climbed up to the gutter. Holding the ladder with her right hand, she 
reached out to the lid with her free hand. 

Reached... reached... 

And the wind blew the lid from the gutter. 

“Noooo—!” Andy screamed. She grabbed for it. 

Lost her balance. 

Grabbed the sides of the ladder with both hands. 

The lid spun crazily in the air. Then it swooped down to the grass. 

“I’ve got it!” Kermit cried. He dove for it and grabbed it in one hand. 

“Yes!” Evan cried happily. “Put it on the can—quick!” 

Andy carefully lowered herself rung by rung. 

She reached the ground, turned, breathing hard, and hurried back to Evan. 
Kermit came running over with the lid. 

But before he reached Evan, a voice rang out from the yard across from his. 
“Hey—what’s going on?” 

Evan looked up to see Conan running across the grass. 



“Oh, no!” Evan moaned, and the Monster Blood can fell out of his hand. 



13 


With a gasp, Evan bent to pick up the can. 

Had the blue Monster Blood spilled out? 

No. 

He lifted it carefully, holding one hand over the open top. 

Conan stopped at the edge of the yard. “What are you three babies doing 
out so late?” he demanded. ‘Til tell your mommies!” 

“Give us a break, Conan,” Andy called. “We’re not bothering you!” 

“Your face is bothering me!” Conan shot back. Then his eyes fell on the can 
in Evan’s hand. “What’s that?” 

Evan nearly dropped the can again. “This? Uh... nothing.... It’s_” 

Evan’s mind went blank. He couldn’t think of a good lie to tell Conan. 

Kermit grabbed the can away from Evan. “It’s candy,” he told Conan. “Blue 
Fruit Roll in a Barrel! We saw it on TV, and it’s awesome.” 

“Give me some! ” Conan ordered. He reached out his big hand. 

“No way!” Kermit teased him, pulling the can back. “We’re not sharing 
with you!” 

He pretended to lick the blue candy. “Wow. That’s really excellent!” 

“Guess I’m going to have to take it from you,” Conan declared menacingly. 
He took a step toward them, his hand outstretched. “Give it.” 

“Are you crazy?” Evan whispered to Kermit. “Why did you tease him? 
Now he’s going to take it and—” 

“No problem,” Kermit whispered back. A sly grin spread over his face. 
“Watch.” 

“Give it,” Conan thundered, waving his outstretched hand. He took another 
step toward them. Another. 

Evan heard the crackle of electricity before he saw the white spark. 

Conan’s eyes bulged. His hands shot up. His knees buckled. 

“Urg. Urg.” He uttered two strange cries as Kermit’s invisible electric fence 
zapped him again. 

Conan staggered back, gasping for breath. His broad chest heaved up and 
down. He reminded Evan of a bull about to charge. 



Kermit raised the can and pretended to eat the Monster Blood again. “Wow. 
That is excellent !” he declared. 

Conan glared at the three of them. Even across the dark yard, Evan could 
see the fury on his face. 

But the bull couldn’t charge. Couldn’t get to them. Not as long as the 
electric fence was turned on. 

Conan balled his hands into fists. “You’re history,” he called to them. “All 
three of you. You’re roadkill.” 

He spun around. Swinging his fists hard at his sides, he stomped into his 
house. 

Andy let out a sigh of relief. “That was pretty good!” she told Kermit. 

A high, shrill giggle escaped Kermit’s throat. “Yeah. Not bad!” 

“There’s just one problem,” Evan murmured. “We’re roadkill if we ever 
leave this backyard!” 

He turned to Kermit. “Give me back the can. We’d better close it—” 

Evan gasped. 

The can in Kermit’s hand! He was holding it upside down! 

Evan grabbed for it. 

Too late. 

With a sick PLOP, the blue gunk dropped out of the can. 

It landed on the grass in front of Evan’s feet. He stared down at it as it 
quivered. Quivered and shook, like blue Jell-O. 

It glowed in the light from the moon. Glowed bright blue. 

Bobbed and trembled. 

And grew. 

“It’s... changing shape!” Andy cried. She leaned forward, resting her hands 
on her knees, and gazed down wide-eyed at it. 

The blue blob wiggled. It rolled over once, moving away from Evan. 

And grew some more. 

It rolled again. Wiggled from side to side. 

And then rose up. Up... as if trying to stand. 

“I don’t believe this!” Evan choked out. “It’s some kind of creature !” 

“You’re right!” Kermit agreed. “It’s ALIVE!” 



14 


Evan squatted on the grass, watching the blue Monster Blood intently. Andy and 
Kermit stood openmouthed as the creature bounced, and grew, and took shape. 

A sleek blue head popped up from the body. A curved gash in the head 
became a mouth. It turned up in a goofy grin. 

Two big, round eyes appeared above the mouth. 

The creature was about the size of a chipmunk. It made a squeaking sound 
as it bounced over the grass. Its rubbery body throbbed rapidly, like a heart. 

“It’s so cute!” Andy declared, raising her hands to the sides of her face. “It’s 
like a lovable little blob creature.” 

“It looks friendly,” Kermit added. “It keeps staring up at us and smiling.” 

Evan didn’t say a word. As he studied the creature, a heavy feeling of dread 
formed in the pit of his stomach. 

I don’t care how cute the little guy looks, he thought. This is Monster 
Blood. And Monster Blood is always evil. 

“Let’s try to push it back in the can,” he suggested. 

The creature bounced and squeaked. 

“Do you think it will fit?” Kermit asked. 

Evan stared at the grinning blob. “We have to squeeze it back in,” he told 
them. 

“But it’s so cute!” Andy protested. She bent down close to the little 
creature. “You’re a cute guy, aren’t you?” she said to it. “Do you like to be 
petted?” 

Andy reached for it with both hands. 

It slid right through her fingers and bounced away, squeaking loudly. 

“Oooh! It’s so cold and wet!” Andy declared. “Look! It’s like a little seal!” 

She made another grab for it. But again the blobby creature bounced away 
from her. 

Kermit stepped in front of it. “I’d like to get it under a microscope,” he said. 
“Maybe take a few tissue samples.” 

“You have to catch it first,” Evan told him. 

Kermit dove for it. Grabbed. 



The creature bounced over his hands and escaped. 

“Hey—he licked me!” Kermit exclaimed. “I think he licked me.” 

“He seems to be friendly,” Andy said. She dropped to her knees. “Here, 
Blobby. Here, Blobby,” she called. She held out her hands to it. 

To everyone’s surprise, the creature bounced over to her. 

Andy trapped it gently between her hands. She giggled. “It’s so co/d!” 

She ran her hand tenderly over the back of its quivering body. “Do you like 
to be petted?” she asked it again softly. 

The creature purred. 

Evan and Kermit both let out cries of surprise. 

Andy petted the blue blob some more. It purred louder. 

“He likes it!” Andy declared, laughing. 

“Weird,” Kermit murmured. “See if you can pull off a hunk so I can study 
it.” 

“No way!” Andy cried. “You’re not hurting my little Blobby.” She petted it 
tenderly. 

“Be careful,” Evan warned. “This is Monster Blood—remember?” 

“It can’t be,” Andy argued. “Monster Blood is green. This cute thing is 
something else.” 

“It might be a different kind of Monster Blood,” Kermit suggested. “You 
know. A different flavor.” 

“Whoa!” Andy cried out as the creature bounced out of her hands. 
Throbbing wetly, it began bouncing and rolling toward the garage. 

“Catch it!” Evan cried. 

All three of them chased after the creature. It moved surprisingly fast. 

Kermit made a grab for it—and it slid through his hands. 

Evan ran in front of it and tried to block its path. But it rolled around him 
and kept bouncing. 

“Don’t let it get away!” Andy cried. 

Evan made another frantic grab—and lifted the wet blob off the ground. 
“Got it!” Evan cried. 

But the creature changed shape. Squeaking loudly, it pulled itself in until it 
resembled a giant worm. And then it slid easily from Evan’s hands. 

“Whoa—it’s co/d!” Evan exclaimed. He examined his hands. The creature 
had left a coating of wet blue slime on Evan’s palms. 

Evan glanced up in time to see the creature roll to the back of the yard. 



“Stop it!” he cried. “Don’t let it go over to Conan’s yard!” 

He ran to catch up to it. Kermit reached it first. “Hey—what’s it doing?” 
Kermit demanded. “It’s turning on the garden hose.” 

The hose was coiled against the back of the garage. A long end of it 
stretched along the ground. 

Evan stopped and stared as the creature perched on top of the nozzle. Its 
body began to bounce up and down in a steady rhythm. It stopped squeaking and 
began to make loud gulping sounds. 

“Is it drinking?” Andy asked. 

“Huh? I think it is! ” Evan cried, staring in amazement. 

The creature bobbed on top of the hose nozzle. Drinking. And as it drank, it 
grew. 

“It’s inflating—like a water balloon!” Kermit declared. 

“We’d better stop it before it gets too big,” Evan warned. 

Evan tried to turn the water off, but the spigot wouldn’t budge. “It’s stuck!” 
he cried. “I can’t turn it! It’s stuck!” 

The creature gulped more water. It was as big as a basketball now, and still 
growing. 

Evan grabbed it with both hands and tugged. His hands slid off the slippery, 
wet body. 

The creature was as big as a beach ball. 

“Help me!” Evan cried, grabbing the creature again. “We’ve got to pull it 
off the hose.” 

He gave a hard tug. But the gulping creature held on to the hose. 

Andy stepped up beside Evan. They both wrapped their arms around the 
inflating creature and struggled to pull it loose. 

“It—it’s attached itself!” Evan gasped. 

The creature bulged, bigger, bigger, until Evan and Andy couldn’t get their 
arms around it. 

“Now what?” Evan groaned. 

And the creature exploded. 

Evan heard a deafening POP. A wave of cold water and slime hurtled over 
him, knocking him over. 

Evan landed in a sitting position. 

“Ohhhhh.” He let out a groan as he wiped the thick blanket of slime off his 
eyes and face. 



“Sick,” he heard Andy mutter. 

He turned and saw that Kermit and Andy were also drenched. Thick gobs of 
slime clung to Kermit’s glasses. Andy’s hair was soaked, matted flat on her head. 

“Sick,” Andy repeated, staring down at her slime-covered hands. “Oh, 
yuck. This is sick” 

Evan wiped more goo from his eyes. Then he turned to where the creature 
had stood—and gasped in shock. “Oh, noooo!” he cried. “Am I seeing things?” 



15 


Two blue creatures bobbed beside the garage. 

Two creatures about the size of chipmunks. 

Squeaking softly, they grinned at Evan, Kermit, and Andy. Their big black 
eyes rolled in their heads. 

“It multiplied !” Kermit exclaimed. 

Evan swallowed hard. He scooped a gob of slime off his shoulder. “I don’t 
like this,” he murmured. “I don’t like this one bit.” 

“But they’re so cute!” Andy protested. 

Evan shivered. The night air suddenly felt much colder. He turned to the 
house. It was covered in darkness. 

What if Aunt Dee wakes up and catches us out here? he wondered. I’ll be in 
major trouble. My baby-sitting job will be over. No sleepaway camp... 

“It’s getting late,” he told them. “We’ve got to go in.” 

“But we can’t just leave these little guys out here!” Andy protested. 

Evan sighed. He knew Andy was right. “Okay,” he agreed, “let’s round 
them up quickly. We’ll get a bag or a bucket or something.” 

The two blue blobs began bouncing in different directions. 

“No! Don’t let them get away!” Evan cried. “If they split up, we’ll never 
catch them.” 

“I have an idea,” Kermit said. He darted across the grass and picked up the 
garden hose. He turned the nozzle, and a hard spray shot out. 

“I’ll keep them against the back of the garage,” he announced. “You go find 
something to put them in.” 

Evan watched as Kermit raised the hose and aimed the spray at the two 
creatures. 

The hard spray sent them both flying against the garage wall. 

“It’s working!” Kermit cried. “I’ve trapped them!” 

He kept the spray on them. The water pushed them back, pressing the two 
creatures against the garage. 

“Hurry—!” Kermit cried. 

But Evan hesitated. He watched as the two creatures opened their mouths 



wide. Wider. And began to gulp. 

“Kermit—turn off the hose!” Evan shouted. “It’s a bad idea. They’re 
drinking it!” 

As the stream of water shot into their gaping mouths, the creatures inflated 
rapidly. They gulped the water hungrily, blowing up bigger and bigger. 

“Kermit—shut off the hose!” Evan ordered. 

Too late. 

Another loud explosion. Another burst of water and slime. 

And now Evan stared across the lawn at FOUR blue blobs! 

Startled, Kermit dropped the hose. Water shot across the lawn. 

Evan dove for the garage and frantically turned the water spigot. The water 
dribbled to a stop. 

But the four blue creatures were already lapping up water from the grass. 
And growing bigger. 

“We have to stop them,” Evan gasped. “We have to pick them up before 
they explode again.” 

He and Andy ran together, frantically reaching down to grab two of them. 
But Andy stopped suddenly—and Evan ran right into her. 

“Whoa!” he cried. “Why did you stop?” 

“Look at them.” Andy pointed. 

Evan gazed down at the bobbing creatures. They were lapping the night 
dew off the grass. “What about them?” he asked impatiently. 

“These four look different,” Andy replied. “Check out their faces. They’re 
not smiling.” 

“Who cares?” Evan shrieked. “They’re drinking! Why do we care if they’re 
smiling or not? Do we want eight of them? No! So let’s get them!” 

Evan leaped forward and grabbed one in each hand. One blue blob slipped 
out and bounced away, squeaking loudly. 

Evan wrapped both hands around the other one, determined to hold it tight. 
“Get a bucket!” he told Andy. “Or a garbage bag or something!” 

Then Evan let out a scream as a sharp jolt of pain shot through his arm. 

He looked down. The blue creature had clamped its jaws around his wrist. 

“H-help!” Evan stammered. “Owwwww! It—it’s biting me! It’s biting my 
hand off!” 



16 


Evan tugged at the creature with his free hand. “Help me! Ow! It—it’s sucking 
my skin!” he wailed. 

Kermit and Andy dove to his side. They both grabbed at the wet blue blob. 
Andy’s hands slipped off, and she stumbled backwards. 

But Kermit held on, held on with both hands. And tugged. Tugged until 
they all heard a loud POP. 

Kermit pulled the creature off and tossed it across the yard. 

Evan rubbed his arm. “It was sucking my skin,” he moaned. “Sucking the 
water out, I guess.” 

Kermit started running to the house. “I’m telling Mom,” he cried. “This is 
too dangerous!” 

“No!” Evan grabbed Kermit around the waist. “I can’t get in any more 
trouble with your mom. Let’s get them all rounded up first. If we don’t, there 
will be hundreds of them!” 

Evan turned to Andy. Her teeth were chattering. “This is getting scary,” she 
murmured. “Listen to them.” 

The blue blobs weren’t grinning anymore. Low growls came out of their 
scowling mouths. 

“They were so cute,” Andy said softly. “But now they’re turning mean.” 

Two of the creatures were rolling in the grass, sucking up moisture. Two 
others were bouncing toward the garden hose. 

Evan turned away. He glanced quickly to the house. “Where is Kermit?” he 
asked. 

Andy shrugged. “Did he go inside to tell his mother?” 

“I hope not,” Evan moaned. “I’m going to be in such bad trouble!” 

The blue blobs were inflating, getting ready to explode and multiply. 

“I’m already in big trouble,” Evan told himself. He started to the house. But 
halfway there, he saw Kermit running from the garage. 

“I’ll catch them!” Kermit cried. He waved a long-handled net in the air. 
Evan recognized it—the net Kermit used to collect butterflies. 

Kermit ran across the grass, swinging the net. 

Evan heard a loud, wet explosion. His eyes swept over the dark lawn. How 



many were there now? 

Eight? 

Yes. 

His throat tightened in panic. We can’t catch them all! he thought. 

Kermit lowered the net to the grass. Swung hard. And captured one of the 
blue blobs. 

It uttered a sharp growl. The net bounced and shook at the end of its pole. 

“Got one! Where do I dump it?” Kermit called excitedly. 

Evan spotted a bucket at the side of the garage. He ran across the grass 
toward it, waving to Kermit to follow him. 

Kermit saw the bucket too. He began to lower the net into it. “In you go!” 
he cried. 

But they both heard a ripping sound. 

The creature hurtled out from the net—and bounced away. 

“He—he chewed through the net!” Kermit exclaimed. He tossed the net 
aside. 

Evan picked up the bucket and chased after the bouncing creature. “Just 
pick them up and toss them in,” he cried. “If we can keep them from drinking, 
they won’t multiply.” 

Andy dove for one. It slipped out of her hands. “We need gloves,” she 
suggested. “We could hold them better if—” 

“We don’t have time to find gloves!” Evan cried. “If we don’t catch them 
fast, there will be a hundred of them!” 

“But what if they grab on to you?” Andy cried. “What if they start sucking 
your skin?” 

Evan didn’t know how to answer that question. He swallowed hard. “Just 
be careful,” he told her. 

Hearing low grunts, he raised his eyes to Aunt Dee’s flower garden. “Oh, 
noooo!” he moaned. 

“Mom’s flowers!” Kermit cried. 

Three or four of the creatures were sucking the water from the flowers. The 
blobs were already huge, ready to explode. A wide path of flowers lay dead and 
wilted behind them. 

Kermit’s mother took such pride in her flower garden; she struggled to keep 
it blooming all through the winter. And now it’s a mess, Evan saw. 

And she’s going to blame me. 



“Get them!” he shouted. “Get them out of the flowers!” 

But he heard a muffled scream. And spun around. 

“Help me... help...” Andy struggled as a big blue blob wrapped around her 

face. 

It pulsed and throbbed. 

She hit it with both fists. Pounded it. 

She dropped to her knees, struggling to remove it. 

Evan froze in horror as the creature grunted and growled, spreading wetly 
over Andy’s face. 

“Help...” she moaned. “Can’t breathe... can’t breathe...” 



17 


Evan gasped in horror as Andy struggled with the blue creature. She pounded it 
with her fists. Pulled at its slippery skin. Shoved it with her open palms. 

Evan took a deep breath. Ran over to her. And grasped the creature in both 
hands. 

It’s so slippery and cold! he thought. 

He dug his fingers into its wet flesh, tightening his grip. 

Then he heaved up with all his strength. 

The creature lifted off Andy’s face with a loud POP. Evan lost his balance 
and nearly fell. 

The blob slipped out of his hands, bounced over the grass, and landed in a 
large puddle near the driveway. 

“Ohhhhhh, sick!” Andy moaned. She wiped thick slime off her face. Still 
on her knees, her whole body trembled. 

Evan raised his eyes to the blob. Facedown, it gulped the puddle noisily. Its 
shimmery blue body bulged bigger, bigger... 

Until it exploded—sending a wave of water and slime over Evan and Andy. 
Evan staggered back as the cold gunk washed over him. 

Wiping it off his eyes, he helped Andy to her feet. 

“The flowers!” Kermit cried. “They’ve ruined them all!” 

Evan turned to the garden. In time to see two more inflated blue blobs 
explode into four. 

The four new blobs bounced up and down furiously, gnashing their pointed 
teeth. 

“The new ones have teeth!” Andy declared. “Each time they explode, they 
get meaner!” 

“I’ve had enough of this!” Evan exclaimed. He grabbed a shovel on the 
ground beside the flower garden. “Kermit, Andy—hurry! Get big trash bags!” 

Kermit darted into the garage. A few seconds later, he came out carrying 
two plastic trash bags. He handed one to Andy. They swung them open and ran 
to catch up with Evan. 

“Let’s get these guys!” Evan declared. 

He lowered the shovel blade to the ground and scooped up a blue blob. 



Andy held out her trash bag. Evan dropped the creature into the bag. It 
plopped in heavily. Andy gripped the top of the bag and held on. 

Working feverishly, Evan scooped up another one and dropped it into 
Andy’s bag. 

Another explosion sent a wave of slime flying. Evan ducked under it—and 
caught two blue blobs on his shovel blade. With a groan, he swung the blade 
hard into Kermit’s trash bag. 

In minutes, the two trash bags bulged. 

“Only a few left,” Evan said, catching his breath. Despite the cool night air, 
sweat poured down his forehead. 

Beside the garage, two creatures gulped water hungrily from a puddle on 
the grass. Another creature bounced over the wilted flower garden, uttering low, 
angry growls. 

“These guys are trying to get out,” Kermit complained. He had hoisted his 
bag over his slender shoulder. 

The bag throbbed. Inside it, the creatures grunted and growled. 

“What are we going to do with these bags?” Andy demanded. “These blue 
things are alive! We can’t just throw them in trash cans.” 

“They wouldn’t fit, anyway,” Kermit said. 

Evan wiped sweat off his forehead with the back of his hand. “Let’s get 
them all collected first,” he sighed. “Then we can decide what to do.” 

It took several minutes to round up the final three. They kept bouncing 
away and sliding off the shovel. 

Finally, all of the grunting, growling creatures were caught. Evan helped 
Kermit and Andy tie up the bulging trash bags. 

“Now what?” Andy demanded. 

Evan blinked as a bright yellow light flashed on. 

Another light. 

The lawn shimmered green, nearly as bright as day. The colors all came into 
focus. 

Evan spun toward the house. The porch light had been turned on. And all 
the lights around the yard. 

“It’s Mom!” Kermit gasped. “We’re caught!” 



18 


Evan could see Aunt Dee in the kitchen, moving to the back door. “Quick— 
don’t let her see! Hide the trash bags!” he cried. 

“But where?” Kermit demanded. 

“Just hide them!” Evan ordered. 

Kermit and Andy grabbed up their bulging trash bags. Kermit led the way 
around the side of the house. “We’ll drag them to the basement,” he said. “I’ll 
lock them in a storage closet or something. We can figure out what to do with 
them in the morning.” 

The back door swung open, and Aunt Dee stepped out onto the back stoop. 
She tightened her bathrobe belt and squinted around the yard. 

“My garden!” she shrieked in horror, raising her hands to her face. 

And then her eyes stopped on Evan. 

“Huh?” she gasped. “Evan—what on earth are you doing out at this time of 
night?” 

“Well...” 

Evan’s mind raced. He knew there was no way he could come up with a 
good explanation. 

“My flowers—!” Aunt Dee cried. 

“I... uh... I heard someone out here,” Evan started. “But...” 

I’m a terrible liar, he told himself. I’d better not even try to make up a story. 

“Get in the house—this instant!” his aunt growled. “I’m going to have a 
long talk with your parents when they get back. I’m very disappointed in you, 
Evan. Very disappointed.” 

“Sorry,” Evan gulped. He obediently slunk into the house. 

Aunt Dee was talking angrily, scolding him, asking him what he was doing 
outside. 

But he didn’t hear her. He was thinking about the two bulging, throbbing 
bags of blue Monster Blood creatures in the basement. 

We’ll get rid of them in the morning, he told himself. Then everything will 
be okay. Right? 

Right? 

Right. He answered his own question. 



Aunt Dee scolded Evan for a few minutes more. Kermit was already tucked 
into bed when Evan finally entered the darkened bedroom. 

Evan stepped into the room and closed the door behind him. “Did you lock 
up the bags somewhere?” he whispered. 

“No problem,” Kermit replied sleepily. He yawned. “All safe and sound.” 

Evan got undressed quickly, letting his clothes fall to the floor. He began to 
feel sleepy too. The battle against the blue blobs had worn him out. 

He sighed. 

Tomorrow will be better, he thought. Til be able to think more clearly in the 
morning. I’ll figure out a way to get rid of all the Monster Blood creatures. 

He pulled the covers down a few inches and slid into the foldout bed. He 
settled in. Rested his head on the pillow. 

Then he felt the cold, wet creature on his back. 

And he started to scream. 



19 


The dampness spread over the back of Evan’s pajamas. The cold chilled him 
until his skin prickled. 

He leaped up. Whirled around. Let out another cry as the lights flashed on. 

He stared down at a wet washcloth on his sheet. 

And heard Kermit’s high-pitched giggle. 

“Kermit—you jerk!” Evan cried. 

His cousin stood by the light switch, shaking with laughter. 

“Kermit—do you really think this was the best time to play such a mean 
joke?” Evan demanded, his heart still pounding. 

Kermit shrugged. “Guess not.” Then he started giggling all over again. 

Evan angrily grabbed up the cold, wet washcloth and heaved it at his 
cousin. “Let’s get some sleep,” he growled. “We have a lot to do tomorrow. And 
it’s no joke.” 


* * * 


Evan dreamed about blue balloons. There were dozens of them in the dream, and 
they grew bigger and bigger. 

The balloons floated above him, their long strings hanging down. Evan 
tried to capture the balloons by grabbing the strings. 

But as he held on, the strings turned into wriggling snakes. 

Evan tried to let go, but the snakes wrapped around his hands. And the huge 
blue balloons lifted him off the ground and carried him higher and higher—until 
they popped. 

And he woke up. 

Morning sunlight washed into the bedroom. Evan felt tired and shaky, as if 
he hadn’t slept at all. He glanced across the room at his cousin. 

Kermit had kicked all his blankets off onto the floor. He slept at the foot of 
his bed, twisted like a pretzel. 

He probably had bad dreams too, Evan thought. 

He spotted the wet washcloth on the floor. 

Good! Evan said to himself. Kermit deserves bad dreams! 



But as he pulled on jeans and a sweatshirt, a heavy feeling of dread swept 
over Evan. 

The Monster Blood creatures. They were down in the basement. Waiting. 
How can we get rid of them? Evan asked himself. Should we tell Aunt 
Dee? Should we call the police? 

He stared at himself in the mirror as he brushed his teeth. His eyes were 
bloodshot. He had dark circles around them. 

He shook Kermit’s shoulders and woke him up. “Huh?” Kermit groaned. 
He squinted hard at Evan, as if he didn’t recognize him. 

“Wake up,” Evan ordered. “We have a job to do—remember?” 

Kermit blinked several times. Without his big red glasses, his eyes looked 

tiny. 

“We have to dump those trash bags somewhere,” Evan reminded him. 

“I have an idea,” Kermit replied. 

They hurried to the kitchen. Aunt Dee had left a note on the refrigerator. 
She went early to the garden store to buy new flowers for her garden. She told 
the boys to make cereal for breakfast. 

But Evan didn’t feel like eating. His stomach felt as if it were filled with 

lead. 

“We’ll eat after we take care of the blobs,” he told Kermit. 

Kermit nodded solemnly. He led the way to the basement stairs. 

“Where did you hide the trash bags?” Evan asked as they started down the 
steps. 

“I locked them in the little bathroom,” Kermit replied. 

“Huh?” Evan let out a gasp. He grabbed Kermit and spun him around. 
“Isn’t there a sink in that bathroom? And a toilet? And water pipes?” 

“Well... yeah,” Kermit replied. “But the creatures are in bags—remember?” 
“Plastic bags!” Evan reminded him. “They probably chewed through those 
bags in seconds!” 

Kermit’s mouth dropped open. “Do you think so?” 

They stopped outside the bathroom door. Evan pressed his ear to the door, 
listening hard. “Uh-oh,” he murmured. “I think I hear running water.” 

“Oh, wow.” Kermit shook his head. “Oh, wow. Oh, wow. I just remembered 
something else.” 

“Something else?” Evan narrowed his eyes on his cousin. “What else did 
you just remember?” 



Kermit swallowed. “Uh... well... I just remembered that this bathroom is 
where I hid the bottle that has my hair-growing formula.” 

“Oh, nooooo,” Evan moaned. 

“I didn’t want anyone to find it,” Kermit explained. “No one ever uses this 
bathroom. So I hid it in here.” 

Evan pressed his ear to the bathroom door again. He reached for the knob. 
“No—don’t!” Kermit cried. 

“We have no choice,” Evan told him. 

He pulled open the door. 



20 


“Oh, nooooo!” Evan screamed. 

He tried to slam the door shut. But Monster Blood creatures bounced into 
the doorway, blocking the door. 

“There are hundreds of them!” Kermit shrieked. “And—and they’re all 
hairy \” 

As the big blobs bounced past the two boys into the basement, Evan gaped 
into the little bathroom in shock. 

Dozens and dozens of the blobs bounced and drank and growled and 
chomped their pointy teeth. Their sleek blue skin was now covered in thick tufts 
of long black hair. 

Water poured from the sink faucets. The hairy blue creatures bobbed over 
the sink, gulping thirstily. Others hovered over the toilet, drinking their fill. 

Evan gripped the doorknob so hard, his hand ached. He stared into the 
room, too horrified to move. 

“The walls...” he murmured in a trembling whisper. “Oh, no. The walls...” 

The walls and ceiling and floor were covered with a layer of oozing blue 
slime. The pipe under the sink had been chewed clear through. Creatures bobbed 
beneath it, sucking up water. Others drank from puddles on the slime-covered 
floor. 

“What are we going to—” Kermit started. 

He didn’t finish his sentence. A deafening POP rocked the little room as 
two Monster Blood creatures exploded to become four. A wave of cold, wet 
slime washed over Evan and Kermit. 

Evan staggered back as several growling creatures bounced out of the 
bathroom. He saw three others pushing their way out through the basement 
window. Two were bouncing on the stairs. 

“We’ve got to stop them!” he cried as another explosion and another flying 
wave of slime shook the room. 

“But how?” Kermit whined. 

Evan didn’t have a chance to answer. A wet blue blob leaped onto his 
shoulder. With an angry snarl, it sank its teeth into Evan’s sweatshirt. 

Evan uttered a groan of pain. “It—it’s sucking...” he stammered. 



He ducked, swung around. And batted it away with a hard punch. 

The creature roared furiously—and dove for Kermit. 

Kermit dodged away—and fell over a hairy blue blob. “Help me—!” he 
cried out as he landed on his back in a thick slime puddle. “They’re totally fierce 
now!” 

Kermit is right, Evan realized. There’s nothing cute about these creatures 
now. They are ferocious—and deadly. 

POP! POP! 

And there are more of them every second! 

Evan ducked away from another attacking creature. He reached both hands 
out and pulled Kermit to his feet. 

“They’re all getting away!” Evan declared. 

“Maybe we should let them!” Kermit declared. 

Evan glared at his cousin. “Do you want to be responsible for wrecking the 
whole town? OWWWW!” He cried out as a hairy blob bit into his ankle. 

Evan kicked the creature away. 

Kermit shook his head. “They drank up all my hair-growing formula. I’ll 
never be able to mix it right again.” 

We were going to use it for my revenge against Conan, Evan thought 
bitterly. Well... forget that idea. 

“We don’t have time to worry about your hair formula,” Evan told his 
cousin. 

POP! 

Another wave of slime slapped the bathroom wall. 

“If they keep multiplying and multiplying,” Evan said, “they could 
outnumber the people in this town. They could drink up the whole water supply. 
Drain all the flowers and plants. They could keep spreading and spreading—and 
drink up the entire country!” 

Kermit gulped. “And it would be all my fault. I opened the can.” 

The growls and snarls and chomps of jagged teeth were deafening. Hairy 
blue creatures bounced out the window, up the steps, all around the basement. 

“We have to get rid of them somehow,” Evan moaned. “No. We can’t just 
get rid of them. We have to kill them!” 

“Oh, wow,” Kermit muttered. Then his expression brightened. “I have an 
idea!” he declared. 



21 


“My electric fence! ” he cried. “If we can herd them to the backyard, we can zap 
them with the electricity. Maybe it will dry them up!” 

“Hey—!” Evan exclaimed. “Maybe it will. It’s worth a try.” Then he 
hesitated. “How do we get them to the backyard?” 

Kermit shrugged. 

POP! Another blob exploded into two. 

Evan covered his ears to block out the angry growls and roars. He glanced 
frantically around the basement. And spotted several brooms and mops leaning 
against the wall near the laundry room. 

“Come on—let’s round them up!” he told Kermit. 

He grabbed a broom and handed another one to his cousin. The two of them 
began swinging the brooms, batting the hairy blobs, poking them, moving them 
out. 

The creatures squealed in protest. But their balloonlike shape made them 
easy to bat and shove along. 

It seemed to Evan to take hours. By the time they herded the last of the 
stragglers into the backyard, his arms ached and his sweatshirt was drenched 
with sweat. 

“What’s going on? What on earth are you doing?” Andy came running 
across the yard. She wore bright green leggings and a purple sweater. She 
goggled as she saw how many bouncing blobs the boys were herding. 

“Yuck!” she groaned. “They’re all hairy! Sick!” 

“They’re out of control!” Kermit declared. “And it’s all my fault!” 

Weird, Evan thought. Kermit never takes the blame for anything. Maybe 
he’s growing up. 

“That’s why I came up with a brilliant plan to kill them!” Kermit declared. 

Same old Kermit, Evan thought. 

“We’re going to zap them,” Evan told Andy breathlessly. “On the invisible 
fence!” 

“You’re going to shock them to death?” she cried, staring at the bouncing, 
growling monsters. 

“It’s worth a try,” Evan gasped. He slapped a blob into line with a swing of 



his broom. The black hair over its body stiffened and stood straight up. It tried to 
bite the broom handle. But Evan slapped it away with another swing. 

“Get ready!” Kermit cried. He swung his broom back and forth, frantically 
trying to keep the angry creatures in line. 

“Okay! Push them! Push them forward—into the invisible fence!” 

Evan swung his broom hard. 

The blobs bounced forward, squealing and growling, snapping their teeth. 

Forward. Forward. Toward the edge of the yard. 

Will it work? Evan wondered. Will the jolt of electricity destroy the ugly, 
destructive things? 



22 


He swung the broom hard, batting the monsters forward. 

Swung it again. 

They bobbed and bounced over the low shrubs that divided the yards. 

On into Conan Barber’s backyard. 

“Nooooooo!” Kermit let out a cry and slapped his forehead. “The switch! I 
forgot to turn it on again!” 

Creatures bounced into the next yard. Beneath the tufts of black hair, their 
skin glowed bright blue in the morning sunlight. 

“You jerk!” Evan shrieked at his cousin. “How could you forget again? 
How could you?” 

Andy plopped down on the grass, lowering her head and uttering an 
unhappy sigh. 

Kermit fumbled in his back pocket for the fence control. He finally tugged 
it out and pressed the red button to turn on the power. 

ZZZAAAAAP! 

Evan shrieked and leaped into the air as a powerful shock jolted through 

him. 

“I told you not to stand there!” Kermit cried. 

Evan jumped aside. 

“I turned it up all the way!” Kermit declared. 

“Too late,” Evan muttered. 

The Monster Blood creatures had all bounced and rolled into the next 
backyard. 

Conan’s yard. 

“Oh, no,” Evan moaned softly. “Here comes more trouble.” 

All three of them gasped as Conan came lumbering across his yard, a can of 
Coke in one hand, his other hand balled into a tight, angry fist. 



23 


“Conan—go back!” Evan warned. But his voice came out tiny and weak. He 
knew that Conan couldn’t hear him over the growls and snarls of the Monster 
Blood creatures. 

“What’s the big idea?” Conan boomed. “It’s not my birthday! Get these 
balloons out of my yard!” 

“Get back! Get back!” Evan tried to warn him. 

Kermit and Andy stood frozen, watching Conan storm toward the bouncing, 
evil blobs. 

Evan waved frantically with both hands. “Get back—!” 

Conan scowled at him. “Are you ordering me around in my own yard?” 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered. 

Conan kicked at one of the creatures. “Whoa. This balloon has hair on it!” 

He bent to pick the creature up—and it jumped onto his arm. With a growl, 
it swallowed Conan’s Coke can. 

“Hey—!” Conan protested. 

The creature started to swell up from the liquid. 

Conan struggled to shake it off. But it clung tightly to his arm. 

And then, with a loud, wet POP, it exploded. 

Thick slime splashed over Conan’s face. He spluttered, thrashed his arms 
out in surprise. Wiped the slimy goo from his eyes. 

And blinked at two hairy, round creatures clinging to his arm. 

“Get these off me!” he shrieked. 

With a furious cry, he swung his free arm—and batted the two blobs 
together. They made a loud SQUISH as they collided with each other. And they 
dropped to the ground. 

Another creature bit into Conan’s leg. Conan stumbled and tripped over 
another one. 

He pulled himself up quickly, glaring furiously at Kermit. “You invented 
these hairy things—didn’t you!” he accused. “Don’t even answer. It’s some kind 
of lab experiment—right? I know this is your kind of thing.” 

“No. Listen—” Kermit started weakly. 



Another Monster Blood creature exploded, sending a wave of cold slime 
over Conan. 

He spluttered again and tried to wipe it away. Then he shook a fist at them. 
“It’ll be payback time—real soon,” he threatened. “Payback time!” 

And he slunk back toward his house, covered in slime. 

Evan breathed a sigh of relief. We have enough problems without having 
Conan in our face, he thought. 

Of course, Conan will be back. But we can’t worry about that now. 

He gazed over the backyards. The Monster Blood creatures were spreading 
out over the entire block. 

What are we going to do? Evan wondered. 

He turned back to the house. “Hey—Aunt Dee is home!” he cried. 

“When did she get back?” Kermit wondered. 

“We have to tell her what’s happened,” Andy urged. “We need help. We 
can’t round these creatures up on our own.” 

The three of them took off, running across the slime-puddled grass to the 
back door. A few seconds later, they burst breathlessly into the kitchen. 

Kermit’s mom had her back to them. She was stirring a long spoon in a big 
aluminum pot on the stove. She turned as the storm door slammed. 

“What’s up, guys?” She smiled at them. 

“We need help!” Kermit blurted out. 

Aunt Dee’s smile faded. “Help? What’s wrong?” She turned back to the 
stove. “Keep talking. I just have to stir this. I’m mixing up a new batch of 
spaghetti with hot sauce for my reading club tonight.” 

“We have a real problem. Andy found a can of Monster Blood, and Kermit 
opened it,” Evan told her, all in one breath. 

“That’s nice,” Aunt Dee replied, frowning at her hot sauce. She sniffed and 
peered down into the steaming pot. “I think it needs more peppers.” 

“Mom—you’ve got to listen !” Kermit pleaded. 

“I am listening,” she insisted, stirring harder. “Go on with your story.” 

“It’s not a story. It’s real,” Evan told her. 

Still stirring, she glanced back at him. “I hope there isn’t any serious 
trouble, Evan. You are in charge, you know. Being out in the middle of the night 
and ruining my flower garden is enough trouble for one visit. When I tell your 
parents—” 

“Mom, please !” Kermit begged. 



“I’m afraid we do have more trouble,” Andy told her. 

“The Monster Blood poured out and formed a little blob creature,” Evan 
continued, his voice trembling. “It was cute at first. But it drank a lot of water 
and exploded into two. Then the two exploded into four.” 

Evan glanced out the kitchen window. The creatures were rolling and 
bouncing all over the backyard. Some of them had discovered the garden hose 
and were soaking up water, inflating rapidly. 

Several of them were forcing their way into the big wooden doghouse in a 
corner of the yard. 

Oh, no, Evan thought. That’s where I stashed the Super-Soakers. Plenty of 
water for them in Dogface’s house. 

“Now there are hundreds of them, Mom,” Kermit continued the story. “And 
they’re not cute anymore. They’ve grown hair, and they’ve turned really fierce. 
They’re spreading out all over the neighborhood, and—” 

“That’s nice,” Aunt Dee said absently, frowning at her hot sauce. 

“Mom—just take a look at them!” Kermit pleaded. “Look out the window. 
Now!” 

“I can’t right now,” she replied. “I have to stir—” 

The phone rang. 

She handed the long wooden spoon to Evan. “I’ve been waiting for that 
call. Stir for me till I get back, okay?” 

Before Evan could reply, she ran from the kitchen. 

“I don’t think she heard us,” Kermit said, shaking his head unhappily. “If 
only she would take one look out the window. Then maybe...” His voice drifted 
off. 

Evan sighed and stirred the sauce. The steam rising up from the pot burned 
his eyes. “This stuff is deadly!” he declared. 

And that gave him an idea. 

He glanced out the window in time to see a wet explosion of slime from the 
doghouse. The creatures had found the Super-Soakers. More of them had 
clustered around the little wooden structure. 

He turned to Kermit and Andy. “Let’s try Aunt Dee’s hot sauce,” he 
whispered. 

“Excuse me?” Kermit and Andy stared at him, confused. 

“You want to eat now?” Kermit asked. “I thought you hated Mom’s hot 
sauce.” 



“I do,” Evan admitted, still whispering. “Because it kills\” 

“I get it!” Andy declared, her dark eyes widening in excitement. “You think 
maybe the hot sauce will kill the Monster Blood creatures.” 

Evan nodded. “It’s liquid. So they’ll try to drink it. And maybe it will be too 
hot for them to handle.” 

“Maybe it will blow them up for good!” Andy exclaimed. 

“Worth a try, I guess,” Kermit said softly. 

Evan glanced to the door. No sign of Aunt Dee. 

“Quick—” he whispered. “Help me carry the pot outside.” 



24 


Evan grabbed two pot holders off the counter and handed one to Andy. Then 
they each grabbed a handle on the top of the big stew pot and lifted it carefully 
off the stove. 

“It weighs a ton,” Andy groaned. 

“Mom likes to make a lot of hot sauce,” Kermit explained. “She keeps the 
extra sauce in the freezer. For emergencies, I guess.” 

He held the back door open. Evan and Andy, hoisting the steaming pot 
between them, carried it out the door. 

Evan raised his eyes to the backyard and let out a cry. “We may be too 
late,” he moaned. “There are so many of them!” 

Squinting into the sunlight, he thought he saw thousands of them! They 
bounced and rolled over the backyards. They growled and grunted. 

They gulped water from the garden hose. Dozens of them were bouncing 
through a neighbor’s flower bed, drinking the plants dry. 

Two houses down, Monster Blood creatures had gathered in a small, 
backyard goldfish pond. They were busily drinking the pond dry. Some of them 
were sucking the liquid out of the goldfish! 

“Too late,” Evan murmured. “We’re just too late.” 

“It might work,” Andy said, not very enthusiastically. “If we can get them 
to drink it.” 

“I—I have to set it down,” Evan told her. “The handle is hot. My hand is 
burning.” 

“Mine too,” Andy replied. 

They set the steaming stew pot down on the grass in the center of the yard. 

“Now how do we get them to try it?” Kermit asked. Without waiting for an 
answer, he cupped his hands around his mouth and began shouting, “Come and 
get it! Come and get it!” 

Evan grabbed him and pulled him back. “I don’t think they speak English,” 
he told Kermit, rolling his eyes. 

“Let’s back away from the pot and let them discover it on their own,” Andy 
suggested. 

“Good idea,” Evan replied. He tugged Kermit back some more. “They 



haven’t had any trouble finding liquid everywhere. If we step back a bit, they’ll 
discover the hot sauce.” 

The three of them backed toward the garage, keeping their eyes on the pot 
of hot sauce. 

Monster Blood creatures bounced over three or four backyards, sucking up 
any liquid they could find. Flower beds lay wilted and dead. Large patches of 
grass were brown and dry. 

Will they find the hot sauce? Evan wondered. 

Will they try it? Will it destroy them? 

It nearly destroyed me! he remembered. It burned my lips and took all the 
skin off the roof of my mouth! 

Will it burn up the hairy blue blobs? 

The spicy aroma of the hot sauce drifted to Evan’s nose. You can probably 
smell it all over the backyards, he guessed. 

He stared without blinking at the aluminum pot gleaming in the sunlight. 
And he crossed his fingers, hoping his idea would work. 

As he watched, a few Monster Blood creatures turned toward the pot. Their 
round eyes bulged. They began bobbing up and down, as if excited. 

Then they started to bounce toward the hot sauce. 

“Yesssss!” Evan whispered. “Yessss!” 

But before the creatures could reach the pot, another figure came bounding 
into the backyard. 

Evan was concentrating so hard, at first he didn’t recognize the big 
sheepdog. But Kermit’s cries made Evan realize what was happening. 

“Dogface—get away!” Kermit cried frantically. “Dogface—no! Go home, 
boy! Dogface—go home!” 

But the big dog ignored Kermit’s cries. Wagging his stub of a tail furiously, 
he trotted toward the shining hot sauce pot. 



25 


“Dogface—get away!” Kermit cried, frantically waving the big sheepdog back. 

Panting hard, his pink tongue hanging down from his furry face, Dogface 
bounded up to the hot sauce pot. Ignoring Kermit’s desperate cries, he lowered 
his head to the pot and sniffed it. 

“No! Go away! Go away!” Evan joined in on Kermit’s cries. “Get him 
away from there!” 

They couldn’t move fast enough. 

The big dog bumped the pot over. The orange hot sauce poured out over the 
grass. 

Dogface lowered his head and licked up a few tastes. 

Blue Monster Blood creatures bounced closer. A few began hungrily 
drinking up the spilled hot sauce. 

Evan waited and watched, his fingers crossed so hard, they hurt. 

No. No. 

The hot sauce didn’t bother the hairy blue blobs a bit. 

But Dogface raised his head from the ground. Behind his thick fur, his 
black eyes rolled crazily. The big dog opened his jaws in a long howl of pain. 

And as he howled, a growling blue blob leaped onto the dog’s back. 

Stunned and in pain, Dogface shook himself hard. But the creature clung to 
the fur on his back. 

“No! Get away!” Evan shrieked as another blob leaped onto Kermit’s dog. 

With another howl, the big dog took off. His big paws pounded the grass. 
He shook himself as he ran, trying to throw off the two creatures. 

Kermit stood openmouthed in shock. 

“The blobs are drinking up all the hot sauce!” Andy declared. “And now 
they’re biting and snapping at each other! It’s turning them even meaner!” 

“Come on!” Evan cried, running after the dog. “We’ve got to save Dogface! 
Those creatures will kill him!” 

Evan took a deep breath and started running full speed, following the 
howling dog. Kermit and Andy ran right behind him. 

“Dogface—whoa!” Kermit called. “Dogface—stop! Stop!” 



But, as always, the dog ignored Kermit. 

Shaking his back, he ran in crazy zigzags. 

Through backyards. And then across a street. And onto the sidewalk. 

The dog barked and howled in protest. But the two blobs hung on, 
appearing to enjoy the ride. 

“Dogface—wait!” Kermit pleaded. 

The three kids ran as fast as they could, zigzagging across streets and yards, 
following the barking, frightened dog. 

As they neared the school, Evan glanced back. And saw that the Monster 
Blood creatures were following them. Dozens of them, bouncing and rolling 
over the front yards. 

They were growling and snapping at everything in their path. One of them 
exploded, sending a spray of slime over someone’s front yard. 

“They’re all following us!” Evan cried breathlessly. 

Kermit and Andy turned back. “Oh, wow!” Kermit muttered. “It’s like a 
parade!” 

“Hey—what’s that?” Evan heard a woman shout. “What are you kids 
doing?” 

“Hey—get off my grass!” He heard a man’s angry cry. 

He heard startled voices. And saw people bursting out of their houses. Two 
kids jumped off their bikes and stared. A man on a ladder cried out in surprise 
and nearly toppled to the ground. 

“Dogface—please stop !” Kermit wailed. 

But the big dog galloped across the street, heading to the playground behind 
the school. Just past the sidewalk, he stopped and began rubbing his back against 
a wide tree trunk. 

The hairy blobs on the dog’s back bounced and scraped against the rough 
tree bark. But they held on tight. 

With another howl, Dogface took off, running wildly across the softball 
field, kicking up dust in the infield, bucking his head, shaking his whole body. 

And then the big dog slumped to the ground. 

The three kids gasped as Dogface toppled onto his side. 

The two blobs had their mouths buried in the dog’s thick fur. 

Dogface kicked out once with all four legs. 

And then didn’t move. 



26 


“They killed him! They killed him!” Kermit screamed. 

“No!” Evan cried. “He’s still breathing!” 

Sprawled on his side, the big dog’s chest heaved. The ugly creatures gulped 
hard, bobbing on top of the dog’s thick fur. 

Evan and Andy dove for the dog. Evan grabbed one of the drinking 
creatures in both hands. He twisted it hard—then tugged it off. 

The blob opened its wet mouth in an angry roar. It snapped its blue jaws at 
Evan. 

Evan raised it up and heaved it into the sea of bobbing blue creatures that 
swarmed over the playground. 

Then he turned to Andy. She struggled to pull off the remaining blob. 

She gave a hard pull. “Yuck! This hair is so gross!” she wailed. Her hands 
slid off, and she stumbled back. 

Dogface uttered a weak groan. The dog’s big eyes rolled crazily in his head. 

Evan grabbed the hairy blob. He twisted it hard, the way he twisted the first 
one. He pulled up with all his strength. 

The creature lifted off Dogface with a loud POP. It snarled furiously and 
snapped its jaws over Evan’s wrist. 

“OWWW!” Evan howled in pain. 

He turned and heaved the ugly creature as high and far as he could. It 
bounced off a tree limb, then fell into the crowd of bobbing Monster Blood 
creatures. 

Dogface climbed quickly to his feet. He shook himself hard. He seemed to 
be okay. 

Kermit squatted down to hug him. 

Evan gazed over the playground. Monster Blood creatures swarmed over 
the softball field, over the volleyball courts, over the whole block! 

People came out of houses and came running to the playground. Evan heard 
the wail of a siren—and saw a black-and-white police cruiser turn the corner. It 
squealed to a halt, and two dark-uniformed officers came scrambling out. 

Andy bumped up against Evan. “Bad news,” she said, frowning. “I don’t 
think we can keep this a secret anymore.” 



Evan shook his head. He knew Andy was making a joke. But this was no 
time to be funny. 

He had been in trouble before. He had the whole town chasing him last 
year, when Monster Blood had turned him into a giant. 

And now, Monster Blood had gotten him in major trouble once again. How 
could he ever explain this? What could the police do against these horrible, 
frightening creatures? 

POP! A fat blob exploded into two. 

Across the playground, people pushed closer to get a better view. 

The creatures were roaring now, roaring like angry tigers. They bit at each 
other and chewed the ground. 

The two police officers were struggling to force their way through the 
angry, bouncing creatures. One of the officers had a phone to his ear. Probably 
calling for more officers, Evan thought. 

Behind him, he heard a weak cry. 

Evan spun around—and gasped. Hairy blobs had leaped onto Kermit. One 
sat on top of Kermit’s blond hair. Two more had climbed to his shoulders. 
Another perched on his back. 

“Help...” Kermit choked out. He thrashed his arms and tried to squirm out 
from under the creatures. 

But they spread out over him, digging their mouths into his skin. 

“Ohhhh.” Kermit uttered a groan and fell to his knees. 

And several more creatures leaped onto him. They made wet sucking noises 
as they covered his body. Kermit disappeared beneath them. 

“YAAAIIII!” 

Evan heard another shrill cry. He turned to see Andy covered in hairy 
creatures too. She swung her fists furiously, trying to bat them away. 

She ducked and squirmed and shook herself. 

But they spread over her shoulders, down her arms. One of them leaped up 
and grabbed on to her hair. It spread itself wetly over her face. 

Evan dove for Kermit. He slipped and landed hard on his knees. He 
grabbed at a blob on Kermit’s shoulder and tugged it. 

It came off with a wet POP. 

Evan grabbed for another one. 

But before he could pull it off, he felt a cold, wet slap on the back of his 
neck. 



Then he felt a heavy, wet blob thump onto his head. Cold slime ran down 
Evan’s face. 

He reached up. Tried to grab the evil thing. 

Too late. 

Two more blobs leaped onto him and attached themselves to his back. 
“Can’t... breathe...” Evan gasped. 

The weight of the creatures pushed him down. 

Down... 

Facedown in the wet grass. 

He dug his elbows into the ground. Tried to push up. Tried to struggle to his 
knees. 

I’ve got to get up, he told himself. I can’t let them cover me like a blanket. 
Like a smothering blanket... 

But the creatures were too heavy. There were too many of them on him. 

He let out a whimper of pain as he felt mouths biting at him. Drinking... 
Choking off his air. Smothering him... 

I’m doomed, Evan realized. 

This time, the Monster Blood got me. This time, the Monster Blood wins. 



27 


The creatures covered Evan. Darkness swept over him. 

He struggled to breathe. 

He wondered if Kermit and Andy were being smothered beside him. 

He sucked in a mouthful of air. A cold, wet blob pressed over his face. Evan 
couldn’t let the air out. 

He heard a rush, a buzz in his ears. 

The sound of my own blood, he thought. My own blood pulsing through 
my veins. 

He suddenly felt lighter. 

I’m fading, he thought. 

He let out the mouthful of air. 

Hey—the creature moved away from my face! Evan realized. 

What’s going on? 

He raised his head—and saw an amazing sight. 

Kermit and Andy were climbing to their feet. The blobs had moved away 
from them. They had moved away—to fight the other blobs. 

They’re all fighting each other! Evan saw. 

Furious growls rose over the playground as the creatures bit each other, 
tugged at hair, at slimy blue flesh, dug their pointy teeth into each other. 

With a groan, Evan climbed to his knees. He shook off his dizziness and 
gazed at the incredible scene. 

“They’re swallowing each other!” Andy gasped. “They turned so mean, 
they’re going after each other'.” 

She’s right, Evan realized. They’re getting meaner and meaner. So mean, 
they’re destroying each other! 

Kermit picked up his glasses from the ground. He wiped off some blades of 
grass, then slid them over his face. “I don’t believe it!” he cried, watching the 
creatures devour each other. 

In minutes, the blobs had eaten each other. They had completely vanished. 

The grass was covered with slime and wet tufts of black hair. 

The last blob left rolled over and died, its blue flesh ripped to shreds. But 



nothing else remained of the hundreds of creatures. 

Not a trace. 

Evan stood up shakily. He dusted himself off. Squinting into the sunlight, 
he looked around. 

Groups of neighborhood people talked excitedly. They shook their heads 
and shrugged their shoulders as they talked, trying to make sense of the whole 
thing. 

I could make sense of it for them, Evan thought. But they’d never believe 
me. 

He turned to Kermit and Andy. “Are you okay?” 

They nodded. Andy pulled a chunk of slime from her dark hair. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Kermit said. 

But before Evan could move, a shadow fell over him. 

He turned and stared up at the two grim-faced police officers. “You again,” 
one of them accused, narrowing his dark eyes at Evan. 

“I... I...” Evan stammered. 

“I think you three kids are in big trouble,” the other officer said softly. 

“Trouble?” Evan choked out. “Why? What did we do?” 

The officers gazed around the playground. 

“What did we do?” Kermit repeated shrilly. “We didn’t do anything wrong. 
We didn’t commit any crime.” 

“There’s nothing here,” Andy added. “Look around. There’s nothing here to 
blame us for.” 

“Well...” The officers hesitated. 

One of them picked up a slimy wad of black hair from the grass. “How 
about littering?” he asked his partner. “I think we can charge them with 
littering.” 

“Let’s forget about it,” the other officer muttered. He turned to the three 
kids. “Go on. Go home. Let’s forget any of this ever happened.” 

I hope I can, Evan thought as he turned and started jogging away with the 
others. 

I hope I can forget about it. 

“That was a close one,” Kermit said softly as they jogged across the street. 

“Yeah. A close one,” Andy repeated. 

“I just feel bad I never got to look at one of those guys under a 
microscope,” Kermit said. 



“Yuck,” Andy murmured. Her whole body shivered. “I keep thinking about 
that disgusting hair on their bodies. It felt so wet and slimy when it brushed 
against your skin.” 

“What a waste of good hair-growing formula!” Kermit grumbled. 

“Let’s stop talking about it,” Evan suggested. “That policeman is right. We 
should try to forget the whole thing.” 

They didn’t say a word for the rest of the way back. Evan started to feel 
better as Kermit’s house came into view. 

Maybe this horrible adventure is over, he told himself. 

But his heart sank, and a heavy feeling of dread swept over him when he 
saw Aunt Dee waiting for them on the front stoop. 

“Evan, you are responsible,” she said sternly, narrowing her eyes angrily at 
him. “I want a full explanation.” 

“Well...” Evan didn’t know where to begin. 

“I shouldn’t have opened the can of Monster Blood,” Kermit told her. 

“That’s what started it,” Evan said. “Then the blue creatures started 
exploding, and—” 

“Stop right now!” Aunt Dee ordered, raising her hand in a halt sign. “I 
don’t want to hear about your silly blue creatures. If you want to waste your time 
on fantasy games, that’s your business.” 

She crossed her arms in front of her and glared at Evan angrily. “I want to 
know what happened to my pot of hot sauce!” 

“Huh?” Evan gasped. 

The whole town was nearly overrun by gross, water-sucking monsters. And 
all she cares about is her precious hot sauce! 

“I’m waiting,” Aunt Dee said sternly, tapping her foot. 

“Well...” Evan started. 

What can I tell her? he asked himself, thinking hard. What can I say? 

“Evan took your hot sauce,” Kermit chimed in. “He ate it, Mom. Evan 
loves your hot sauce. He ate the whole pot himself.” 

I don’t believe this! Evan groaned to himself. After all we’ve been through, 
the little rat just got me in trouble again! 

But to Evan’s surprise, he found Aunt Dee smiling at him. “Evan, I’m so 
flattered,” she said. “I didn’t know you liked it so much. I’ll make you a big pot 
of it every time you come for a visit!” 

“Uh... great,” Evan replied weakly. 

“Go get my stew pot. Then come inside for lunch,” she instructed them. She 
disappeared into the house. 

Evan led the way around to the back. He scowled at Kermit. “I can’t believe 
you told your mom that.” 

Kermit shrugged. “It was the only thing I could think of.” 

Evan gazed around the backyard. The flower garden was dead and dry. Big 
patches of grass lay brown and flat. 

The stew pot sat on its side in the middle of the yard. 

Evan started toward it—but stopped with a startled cry as a figure staggered 
out from behind the garage. 

A hulking creature with glowing red eyes! 



28 


“Whoa!” Evan exclaimed. 

Kermit and Andy huddled close to him as the creature lumbered into view. 

As it stepped into the bright sunlight, Evan saw that it wasn’t a creature at 
all. The three of them were staring at a man in a white work suit. 

The work suit looked like the kind of space suit worn by astronauts. It 
covered the man from head to foot. The man’s face was completely covered too. 
He peered out at them through bright red goggles. 

“Who—who are you?” Evan managed to choke out. 

The man stopped halfway across the yard. He stared out at them, his eyes 
dark behind the red goggles. Finally, he lifted a gloved hand and pulled back his 
hood. 

He removed the goggles, took a few deep breaths, and pushed his curly 
black hair off his forehead. “No blue creatures here?” he asked, looking around. 
“I guess I didn’t need the safety suit.” 

“Who—who are you?” Evan stammered again. 

“I’m looking for my little blue guys,” the man replied. “I heard there was 
quite a fuss at the playground. The police said you might be able to help me.” 

“Those are your creatures?” Andy cried. 

The man nodded. “Allow me to introduce myself. I’m Professor Eric Crane. 
From the Science Institute downtown.” He glanced once again around the yard. 
“Do you have the can?” 

“I—I kept it in the garage,” Evan told him. “But how do we know it’s 
yours? Who are you? Why are you wearing that uniform?” 

“Did you really invent those disgusting blue blobs?” Andy demanded. 

The man took a few steps toward them. The safety uniform was so big and 
bulky, he walked awkwardly and slowly. 

“Bring me the can, and I’ll explain,” he told them. 

Evan obediently brought the plastic can from the garage. He put it into 
Professor Crane’s gloved hand. 

“Those creatures—they got meaner and meaner,” Andy told him. “They got 
so mean, they ate each other up.” 

The professor sighed. “I know,” he said. “That’s why I threw them away. 

My underwater fighting force was a total failure.” 

“Excuse me?” Evan cried. “Fighting force?” 

“I developed the blue liquid in my lab,” Professor Crane explained. “It was 
supposed to be a monster fighting force. For underwater combat. A special army 
of fighters who would get meaner and meaner, and multiply underwater until 
they outnumbered the enemy.” 

“Cool idea,” Kermit murmured. And then he added, “I guess.” 

Professor Crane shrugged. “But it didn’t work. They get too mean. It was a 
bad experiment.” 

He glanced down at the can in his gloved hand. “But I should have been 
more careful when I tossed the can out. Much more careful.” The professor 
shook his head. “I spent ten years on this. Ten years and fifty million dollars. All 
a waste. All a total waste.” 

With a bitter sigh, he started to pull the lid off the can. 

But he let out a startled cry as Dogface bumped him from behind. The big 
sheepdog ran hard into Professor Crane—and the Monster Blood can flew out of 
his hand. 

Evan watched it bounce over a low shrub and roll to a stop in Conan’s yard. 

“That’s okay,” Evan told him. “It’s empty.” 

Professor Crane shrugged and uttered another unhappy sigh. “Ten years...” 
he murmured. “Ten years...” 

Shaking his head, he stomped off. He turned back to them when he reached 
the driveway. “You won’t tell anyone about this, will you?” he called. “It would 
be very embarrassing to me if you did.” 

“No problem,” Evan replied. 

He watched the scientist lumber down the drive. Then Evan turned back to 
Kermit and Andy. 

For some reason, Kermit was giggling. 

“What’s so funny?” Evan asked. 

Kermit pointed. “Look. Conan came running out. He discovered the 
Monster Blood can.” 

“But it’s empty—isn’t it?” Evan cried. “Isn’t it?” 

He started to run toward Conan. But Kermit held him back. 

“Kermit—let me go!” Evan demanded. “We have to warn Conan. That stuff 
is dangerous. If there is any of it left in there, and he opens it—” 

“I think there’s a tiny bit left in the can,” Kermit told Evan. “You wanted 



your revenge—didn’t you? This is perfect. Conan will let the stuff out, and in a 
few minutes he’ll have bouncing blue blobs to take care of.” 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered. 

“It’ll be funny,” Andy agreed. “Conan will be terrified. He won’t know 
what to do with them. They’ll suck up his whole yard. It’s a great revenge, Evan. 
And it’s harmless. They’ll just eat each other in the end.” 

“Meanwhile, Conan will have the most frightening time of his life,” Kermit 
added gleefully. 

“Okay, okay,” Evan agreed. “You’re right. It’s pretty funny. Let’s not warn 
him.” 

“Lunchtime! Come on in, you guys!” Aunt Dee called from the kitchen 

door. 

Evan glanced back as he followed the others into the house. Conan had the 
blue can in his hands. He popped open the lid. 

Evan giggled to himself and went in to lunch. 

After lunch, they carried the dishes into the kitchen and loaded them in the 
dishwasher. “What do you want to do this afternoon?” Kermit asked. “How 
about some experiments in my lab?” 

“No way!” Andy replied. 

Evan heard Conan calling them. “Hey, you three! Hey, guys!” Conan 
shouted from the backyard. 

Evan led the way out the door. He couldn’t keep a smile from spreading 
across his face. Conan probably wants us to help him round up the blue blobs, he 
thought. 

But to his surprise, he saw no blue blobs in the backyard. 

“What’s going on?” Evan asked Conan. 

Conan grinned at him. “I found that blue candy of yours,” he said. 

“Huh? Blue candy?” Evan gasped. 

Conan nodded. “Yeah. You remember. That candy you wouldn’t share with 
me the other night. I found it and I ate it. It was pretty good. Sticky, but good.” 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered. 

“Now I just have two small problems,” Conan continued. “For one thing, I 
can’t stop drinking water.” 

“What’s the other problem?” Evan asked in a trembling voice. 

“Look,” Conan replied. He waved toward his backyard. 

And a figure came running out from the house. 

Another Conan! 

That Conan was followed by two more Conans! 

The four Conans swept around Evan, Kermit, and Andy, and formed a 
circle around them. 

“This is my other problem,” Conan said, narrowing his eyes menacingly at 
Evan. “There are four of us now. And I don’t know why—but we’re feeling 
MEANER than usual!” 














